BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.46.010 and 1994 c 272 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of any county or city shall identify
in the adopted budget the capital projects funded in whole or in part
from the proceeds of the tax authorized in this section, and shall
indicate that such tax is intended to be in addition to other funds
that may be reasonably available for such capital projects.
(2)(a) The legislative authority of any county or any city may
impose an excise tax on each sale of real property in the
unincorporated areas of the county for the county tax and in the
corporate limits of the city for the city tax at a rate not exceeding
one-quarter of one percent of the selling price. The revenues from
this tax shall be used by any city or county with a population of five
thousand or less and any city or county that does not plan under RCW
36.70A.040 for any capital purpose identified in a capital improvements
plan and local capital improvements, including those listed in RCW
35.43.040.
(b) After April 30, 1992, revenues generated from the tax imposed
under this subsection in counties over five thousand population and
cities over five thousand population that are required or choose to
plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall be used solely for financing capital
projects specified in a capital facilities plan element of a
comprehensive plan and housing relocation assistance under RCW
59.18.440 and 59.18.450. However, revenues (((a))) (i) pledged by such
counties and cities to debt retirement prior to April 30, 1992, may
continue to be used for that purpose until the original debt for which
the revenues were pledged is retired, or (((b))) (ii) committed prior
to April 30, 1992, by such counties or cities to a project may continue
to be used for that purpose until the project is completed.
(c) A county may not impose the tax authorized in this subsection,
beginning July 1, 2010, if the county's intergovernmental revenues for
police operations as a percentage of all expenditures for police
operations, exceeds forty percent. The percentage calculation under
this subsection is based on expenditures in the adopted budget for the
prior calendar year. If a county later meets the requirements of this
subsection, the tax may be reimposed on July 1st of the year following
the year in which the requirements of this subsection are met. This
subsection only applies to counties with a population of one million
five hundred thousand or more.
(3) In lieu of imposing the tax authorized in RCW 82.14.030(2), the
legislative authority of any county or any city may impose an
additional excise tax on each sale of real property in the
unincorporated areas of the county for the county tax and in the
corporate limits of the city for the city tax at a rate not exceeding
one-half of one percent of the selling price.
(4) Taxes imposed under this section shall be collected from
persons who are taxable by the state under chapter 82.45 RCW upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within the unincorporated areas of the
county or within the corporate limits of the city, as the case may be.
(5) Taxes imposed under this section shall comply with all
applicable rules, regulations, laws, and court decisions regarding real
estate excise taxes as imposed by the state under chapter 82.45 RCW.
(6) As used in this section, "city" means any city or town and
"capital project" means those public works projects of a local
government for planning, acquisition, construction, reconstruction,
repair, replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of streets; roads;
highways; sidewalks; street and road lighting systems; traffic signals;
bridges; domestic water systems; storm and sanitary sewer systems;
parks; recreational facilities; law enforcement facilities; fire
protection facilities; trails; libraries; administrative and/or
judicial facilities; river and/or waterway flood control projects by
those jurisdictions that, prior to June 11, 1992, have expended funds
derived from the tax authorized by this section for such purposes; and,
until December 31, 1995, housing projects for those jurisdictions that,
prior to June 11, 1992, have expended or committed to expend funds
derived from the tax authorized by this section or the tax authorized
by RCW 82.46.035 for such purposes.

--- END ---