BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.510 and 2002 c 290 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:

TABLE 1A

Sentencing Grid

SERIOUSNESS

LEVEL
OFFENDER SCORE

0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8 9 or
more

XVI Life Sentence without Parole/Death Penalty

XV 23y4m 24y4m 25y4m 26y4m 27y4m 28y4m 30y4m 32y10m 36y 40y

240- 250- 261- 271- 281- 291- 312- 338- 370- 411-

320 333 347 361 374 388 416 450 493 548

XIV 14y4m 15y4m 16y2m 17y 17y11m 18y9m 20y5m 22y2m 25y7m 29y

123- 134- 144- 154- 165- 175- 195- 216- 257- 298-

220 234 244 254 265 275 295 316 357 397

XIII 12y 13y 14y 15y 16y 17y 19y 21y 25y 29y

123- 134- 144- 154- 165- 175- 195- 216- 257- 298-

164 178 192 205 219 233 260 288 342 397

XII 9y 9y11m 10y9m 11y8m 12y6m 13y5m 15y9m 17y3m 20y3m 23y3m

93- 102- 111- 120- 129- 138- 162- 178- 209- 240-

123 136 147 160 171 184 216 236 277 318

XI 7y6m 8y4m 9y2m 9y11m 10y9m 11y7m 14y2m 15y5m 17y11m 20y5m

78- 86- 95- 102- 111- 120- 146- 159- 185- 210-

102 114 125 136 147 158 194 211 245 280

X 5y 5y6m 6y 6y6m 7y 7y6m 9y6m 10y6m 12y6m 14y6m

51- 57- 62- 67- 72- 77- 98- 108- 129- 149-

68 75 82 89 96 102 130 144 171 198

IX 3y 3y6m 4y 4y6m 5y 5y6m 7y6m 8y6m 10y6m 12y6m

31- 36- 41- 46- 51- 57- 77- 87- 108- 129-

41 48 54 61 68 75 102 116 144 171

VIII 2y 2y6m 3y 3y6m 4y 4y6m 6y6m 7y6m 8y6m 10y6m

21- 26- 31- 36- 41- 46- 67- 77- 87- 108-

27 34 41 48 54 61 89 102 116 144

VII 18m 2y 2y6m 3y 3y6m 4y 5y6m 6y6m 7y6m 8y6m

15- 21- 26- 31- 36- 41- 57- 67- 77- 87-

20 27 34 41 48 54 75 89 102 116

VI 13m 18m 2y 2y6m 3y 3y6m 4y6m 5y6m 6y6m 7y6m

12+- 15- 21- 26- 31- 36- 46- 57- 67- 77-

14 20 27 34 41 48 61 75 89 102

V 9m 13m 15m 18m 2y2m 3y2m 4y 5y 6y 7y

6- 12+- 13- 15- 22- 33- 41- 51- 62- 72-

12 14 17 20 29 43 54 68 82 96

IV 6m 9m 13m 15m 18m 2y2m 3y2m 4y2m 5y2m 6y2m

3- 6- 12+- 13- 15- 22- 33- 43- 53- 63-

9 12 14 17 20 29 43 57 70 84

III 2m 5m 8m 11m 14m 20m 2y2m 3y2m 4y2m 5y

1- 3- 4- 9- 12+- 17- 22- 33- 43- 51-

3 8 12 12 16 22 29 43 57 68

II 4m 6m 8m 13m 16m 20m 2y2m 3y2m 4y2m

0-90 2- 3- 4- 12+- 14- 17- 22- 33- 43-

Days 6 9 12 14 18 22 29 43 57

I 3m 4m 5m 8m 13m 16m 20m 2y2m

0-60 0-90 2- 2- 3- 4- 12+- 14- 17- 22-

Days Days 5 6 8 12 14 18 22 29

Numbers in the first horizontal row of each seriousness category
represent sentencing midpoints in years(y) and months(m). Numbers in
the second and third rows represent standard sentence ranges in months,
or in days if so designated. 12+ equals one year and one day.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.515 and 2008 c 108 s 23 and 2008 c 38 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2A

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN
EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVI Aggravated Murder 1 (RCW
10.95.020)

XV Homicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW
70.74.280(1))

Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIV Murder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

((Trafficking 1 (RCW 9A.40.100(1))))

XIII Malicious explosion 2 (RCW
70.74.280(2))

((Malicious placement of an explosive
1 (RCW 70.74.270(1))))

XII Assault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

((Malicious placement of an imitation
device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))))

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

((Trafficking 2 (RCW 9A.40.100(2))))

XI Manslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

X Child Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

((Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW
9A.42.020)))

Indecent Liberties (with forcible
compulsion) (RCW
9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(a))

((Malicious explosion 3 (RCW
70.74.280(3))))

Sexually Violent Predator Escape
(RCW 9A.76.115)

IX ((Abandonment of Dependent Person 1
(RCW 9A.42.060)))

Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW
70.74.180)

((Hit and Run--Death (RCW
46.52.020(4)(a))))

Homicide by Watercraft, by being
under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW
79A.60.050)

((Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious placement of an explosive 2
(RCW 70.74.270(2))))

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular Homicide, by being under
the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug (RCW 46.61.520)

VIII Arson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Homicide by Watercraft, by the
operation of any vessel in a
reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

((Promoting Commercial Sexual Abuse
of a Minor (RCW 9.68A.101)))

Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW
9A.88.070)

((Theft of Ammonia (RCW
69.55.010)))

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation
of any vehicle in a reckless manner
(RCW 46.61.520)

VII Burglary 1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

((Civil Disorder Training (RCW
9A.48.120)))

Dealing in depictions of minor engaged
in sexually explicit conduct (RCW
9.68A.050)

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide by Watercraft, by disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
79A.60.050)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible
compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(b) and (c))

((Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW
9A.76.140)

Malicious placement of an explosive 3
(RCW 70.74.270(3))

Negligently Causing Death By Use of a
Signal Preemption Device (RCW
46.37.675)))

Sending, bringing into state depictions
of minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.060)

((Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in
the first degree (RCW
9.41.040(1))))

Use of a Machine Gun in Commission
of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for
the safety of others (RCW
46.61.520)

VI Bail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW
9A.76.170(3)(a))

((Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)))

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

((Intimidating a Judge (RCW
9A.72.160)))

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW
9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

((Malicious placement of an imitation
device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))))

Possession of Depictions of a Minor
Engaged in Sexually Explicit
Conduct (RCW 9.68A.070)

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

((Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful Storage of Ammonia (RCW
69.55.020)))

V ((Abandonment of Dependent Person 2
(RCW 9A.42.070)

Advancing money or property for
extortionate extension of credit
(RCW 9A.82.030)))

Bail Jumping with class A Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

((Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW
9A.42.030)))

Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW
9A.44.160)

Domestic Violence Court Order
Violation (RCW 10.99.040,
10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070,
or 74.34.145)

Driving While Under the Influence
(RCW 46.61.502(6))

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

((Extortionate Extension of Credit
(RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect
Extensions of Credit (RCW
9A.82.040)))

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

((Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW
9.94.070)))

Physical Control of a Vehicle While
Under the Influence (RCW
46.61.504(6))

((Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW
9A.56.310)))

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

((Rendering Criminal Assistance 1
(RCW 9A.76.070)))

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1
(RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually Violating Human Remains
(RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

((Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070)))

IV Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault 3 (of a Peace Officer with a
Projectile Stun Gun) (RCW
9A.36.031(1)(h))

((Assault by Watercraft (RCW
79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by
Witness (RCW 9A.72.090,
9A.72.100)

Cheating 1 (RCW 9.46.1961)

Commercial Bribery (RCW
9A.68.060)))

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))

((Endangerment with a Controlled
Substance (RCW 9A.42.100)

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit and Run -- Injury (RCW
46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit and Run with Vessel -- Injury
Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))))

Identity Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2))

((Indecent Exposure to Person Under
Age Fourteen (subsequent sex
offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting Event
(RCW 9A.82.070)

Malicious Harassment (RCW
9A.36.080)

Residential Burglary (RCW
9A.52.025)))

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

((Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW
9A.56.080)))

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

((Trafficking in Stolen Property 1
(RCW 9A.82.050)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(b))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health care service
contractor (RCW 48.44.016(3))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health maintenance
organization (RCW 48.46.033(3))

Unlawful transaction of insurance
business (RCW 48.15.023(3))

Unlicensed practice as an insurance
professional (RCW 48.17.063(3))

Use of Proceeds of Criminal
Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1)
and (2))))

Vehicular Assault, by being under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, or by the operation or
driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner (RCW 46.61.522)

((Willful Failure to Return from
Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)))

III ((Animal Cruelty 1 (Sexual Conduct or
Contact) (RCW 16.52.205(3))))

Assault 3 (Except Assault 3 of a Peace
Officer With a Projectile Stun
Gun) (RCW 9A.36.031 except
subsection (1)(h))

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

((Bail Jumping with class B or C
Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Commercial Sexual Abuse of a Minor
(RCW 9.68A.100)))

Communication with a Minor for
Immoral Purposes (RCW
9.68A.090)

((Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW
9A.46.120)))

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

((Cyberstalking (subsequent conviction
or threat of death) (RCW
9.61.260(3))

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)))

Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

((Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)))

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW
9A.76.180)

((Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW
9A.76.150)

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property
(RCW 81.60.070)

Mortgage Fraud (RCW 19.144.080)

Negligently Causing Substantial Bodily
Harm By Use of a Signal
Preemption Device (RCW
46.37.674)

Organized Retail Theft 1 (RCW
9A.56.350(2))

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW
9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun or
Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle
(RCW 9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW
9A.88.080)

Retail Theft with Extenuating
Circumstances 1 (RCW
9A.56.360(2))

Securities Act violation (RCW
21.20.400)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW
9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent
conviction or threat of death)
(RCW 9.61.230(2))

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.083)

Theft with the Intent to Resell 1 (RCW
9A.56.340(2))

Trafficking in Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.82.055)))

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW
9A.40.040)

((Unlawful possession of firearm in the
second degree (RCW 9.41.040(2))

Vehicular Assault, by the operation or
driving of a vehicle with disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from Work
Release (RCW 72.65.070)))

II ((Computer Trespass 1 (RCW
9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(3))

Escape from Community Custody
(RCW 72.09.310)))

Failure to Register as a Sex Offender
(second or subsequent offense)
(RCW 9A.44.130(11)(a))

((Health Care False Claims (RCW
48.80.030)))

Identity Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(3))

((Improperly Obtaining Financial
Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW
9A.48.070)

Organized Retail Theft 2 (RCW
9A.56.350(3))

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.56.150)

Possession of a Stolen Vehicle (RCW
9A.56.068)

Retail Theft with Extenuating
Circumstances 2 (RCW
9A.56.360(3))

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of a Motor Vehicle (RCW
9A.56.065)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or
Lease-purchased Property (valued
at one thousand five hundred
dollars or more) (RCW
9A.56.096(5)(a))

Theft with the Intent to Resell 2 (RCW
9A.56.340(3))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW
48.30A.015)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(a))

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW
2.48.180)

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or
Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))))

Voyeurism (RCW 9A.44.115)

((I Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police
Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False Verification for Welfare (RCW
74.08.055)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Fraudulent Creation or Revocation of a
Mental Health Advance Directive
(RCW 9A.60.060)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW
9A.48.080)

Mineral Trespass (RCW 78.44.330)

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 2 (RCW 9A.56.075)

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or
Lease-purchased Property (valued
at two hundred fifty dollars or
more but less than one thousand
five hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(5)(b))

Transaction of insurance business
beyond the scope of licensure
(RCW 48.17.063(4))

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts
(RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful Possession of Fictitious
Identification (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Instruments of
Financial Fraud (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of a Personal
Identification Device (RCW
9A.56.320)

Unlawful Production of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Trafficking in Food Stamps
(RCW 9.91.142)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW
9.91.144)

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3

TABLE 1B

SENTENCING GRID
FOR CRIMES COMMITTED AFTER JULY 24, 1999

SERIOUSNESS

LEVEL
OFFENDER SCORE

0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8 9 or
more

XVI Life Sentence without Parole/Death Penalty

XV 17y5m 18y3m 19y 19y8m 20y5m 21y2m 22y8m 24y7m 27y 29y10m

180- 188- 196- 203- 211- 218- 234- 254- 278- 308-

240 250 260 271 281 291 312 338 370 411

XIV 10y7m 11y5m 12y1m 12y8m 13y5m 14y 15y3m 16y6m 19y2m 21y8m

92- 101- 108- 116- 124- 131- 146- 162- 193- 224-

165 176 183 191 199 206 221 237 268 298

XIII 9y 9y8m 10y5m 11y3m 12y 12y3m 14y2m 15y8m 18y8m 21y8m

92- 101- 108- 116- 124- 131- 146- 162- 193- 224-

123 134 144 154 164 175 195 216 257 298

XII 6y8m 7y5m 8y 8y8m 9y4m 10y 11y8m 13y 15y2m 17y5m

70- 77- 83- 90- 97- 104- 122- 134- 157- 180-

92 102 110 120 128 138 162 177 208 239

XI 5y7m 6y3m 6y9m 7y5m 8y 8y7m 10y7m 11y5m 13y5m 15y3m

59- 65- 71- 77- 83- 90- 110- 119- 139- 158-

77 86 94 102 110 119 146 158 184 210

X 3y7m 4y1m 4y5m 4y9m 5y3m 5y6m 7y2m 7y9m 9y4m 10y9m

38- 43- 47- 50- 54- 58- 74- 81- 97- 112-

51 56 62 67 72 77 98 108 128 149

IX 2y3m 2y6m 3y 3y4m 3y7m 4y1m 5y6m 6y3m 7y9m 9y3m

23- 27- 31- 35- 38- 43- 58- 65- 81- 97-

31 36 41 46 51 56 77 87 108 128

VIII 1y5m 1y9m 2y3m 2y6m 3y 3y4m 4y9m 5y6m 6y3m 7y9m

16- 20- 23- 27- 31- 35- 50- 58- 65- 81-

20 26 31 36 41 46 67 77 87 108

VII 13m 1y5m 1y9m 2y3m 2y6m 3y 4y1m 4y9m 5y6m 6y3m

11- 16- 20- 23- 27- 31- 43- 50- 58- 65-

15 20 26 31 36 41 56 67 77 87

VI 10m 13m 1y5m 1y9m 2y3m 2y6m 3y4m 4y1m 4y9m 5y6m

9- 11- 16- 20- 23- 27- 35- 43- 50- 58-

11 15 21 26 31 36 46 56 67 77

V 7m 10m 12m 13m 1y6m 2y4m 3y 3y7m 4y5m 5y3m

5- 9+- 10- 11- 17- 25- 31- 38- 47- 54-

9 11 13 15 22 32 41 51 62 72

IV 5m 7m 10m 12m 13m 1y6m 2y4m 3y 3y9m 4y6m

2- 5- 9- 10- 11- 17- 25- 32- 40- 47-

7 9 11 13 15 22 32 43 53 63

III 1m 4m 6m 8m 11m 15m 1y6m 2y4m 3y1m 3y7m

23 days- 2- 3- 7- 9- 13- 17- 25- 32- 38-

2m 6 9 9 12 17 22 32 43 51

II 4m 5m 6m 10m 13m 15m 1y6m 2y4m 3y1m

0-68 2- 2- 3- 9- 11- 13- 17- 25- 32-

Days 5 7 9 11 14 17 22 32 43

I 3m 4m 4m 6m 10m 13m 15m 1y7m

0-45 0-68 2- 2- 2- 3- 9- 11- 13- 17-

Days Days 4 5 6 9 11 14 17 22

Numbers in the first horizontal row of each seriousness category
represent sentencing midpoints in years(y) and months(m). Numbers in
the second and third rows represent standard sentence ranges in months,
or in days if so designated. 12+ equals one year and one day.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4

TABLE 2B

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN
EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XIV Trafficking 1 (RCW 9A.40.100(1))

XIII Malicious placement of an explosive 1
(RCW 70.74.270(1))

XII Malicious placement of an imitation
device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Trafficking 2 (RCW 9A.40.100(2))

X Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW
9A.42.020)

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW
70.74.280(3))

IX Abandonment of Dependent Person 1
(RCW 9A.42.060)

Hit and Run--Death (RCW
46.52.020(4)(a))

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious placement of an explosive 2
(RCW 70.74.270(2))

VIII Promoting Commercial Sexual Abuse
of a Minor (RCW 9.68A.101)

Theft of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

VII Civil Disorder Training (RCW
9A.48.120)

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW
9A.76.140)

Malicious placement of an explosive 3
(RCW 70.74.270(3))

Negligently Causing Death By Use of a
Signal Preemption Device (RCW
46.37.675)

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in
the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1))

VI Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Intimidating a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful Storage of Ammonia (RCW
69.55.020)

V Abandonment of Dependent Person 2
(RCW 9A.42.070)

Advancing money or property for
extortionate extension of credit
(RCW 9A.82.030)

Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW
9A.42.030)

Extortionate Extension of Credit (RCW
9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect
Extensions of Credit (RCW
9A.82.040)

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW
9.94.070)

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW
9A.56.310)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1
(RCW 9A.76.070)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070)

IV Assault by Watercraft (RCW
79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by
Witness (RCW 9A.72.090,
9A.72.100)

Cheating 1 (RCW 9.46.1961)

Commercial Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Endangerment with a Controlled
Substance (RCW 9A.42.100)

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit and Run -- Injury (RCW
46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit and Run with Vessel -- Injury
Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under
Age Fourteen (subsequent sex
offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting Event
(RCW 9A.82.070)

Malicious Harassment (RCW
9A.36.080)

Residential Burglary (RCW
9A.52.025)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Trafficking in Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.82.050)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(b))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health care service
contractor (RCW 48.44.016(3))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health maintenance
organization (RCW 48.46.033(3))

Unlawful transaction of insurance
business (RCW 48.15.023(3))

Unlicensed practice as an insurance
professional (RCW 48.17.063(2))

Use of Proceeds of Criminal
Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1)
and (2))

Willful Failure to Return from
Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

III Animal Cruelty 1 (Sexual Conduct or
Contact) (RCW 16.52.205(3))

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Commercial Sexual Abuse of a Minor
(RCW 9.68A.100)

Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW
9A.46.120)

Cyberstalking (subsequent conviction
or threat of death) (RCW
9.61.260(3))

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW
9A.76.150)

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property
(RCW 81.60.070)

Mortgage Fraud (RCW 19.144.080)

Negligently Causing Substantial Bodily
Harm By Use of a Signal
Preemption Device (RCW
46.37.674)

Organized Retail Theft 1 (RCW
9A.56.350(2))

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW
9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW
9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW
9A.88.080)

Retail Theft with Extenuating
Circumstances 1 (RCW
9A.56.360(2))

Securities Act violation (RCW
21.20.400)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW
9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent
conviction or threat of death)
(RCW 9.61.230(2))

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.083)

Theft with the Intent to Resell 1 (RCW
9A.56.340(2))

Trafficking in Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.82.055)

Unlawful possession of firearm in the
second degree (RCW 9.41.040(2))

Vehicular Assault, by the operation or
driving of a vehicle with disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from Work
Release (RCW 72.65.070)

II Computer Trespass 1 (RCW
9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(3))

Escape from Community Custody
(RCW 72.09.310)

Health Care False Claims (RCW
48.80.030)

Improperly Obtaining Financial
Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW
9A.48.070)

Organized Retail Theft 2 (RCW
9A.56.350(3))

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.56.150)

Possession of a Stolen Vehicle (RCW
9A.56.068)

Retail Theft with Extenuating
Circumstances 2 (RCW
9A.56.360(3))

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of a Motor Vehicle (RCW
9A.56.065)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one
thousand five hundred dollars or
more) (RCW 9A.56.096(5)(a))

Theft with the Intent to Resell 2 (RCW
9A.56.340(3))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW
48.30A.015)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(a))

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW
2.48.180)

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or
Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

I Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police
Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False Verification for Welfare (RCW
74.08.055)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Fraudulent Creation or Revocation of a
Mental Health Advance Directive
(RCW 9A.60.060)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW
9A.48.080)

Mineral Trespass (RCW 78.44.330)

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 2 (RCW 9A.56.075)

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two
hundred fifty dollars or more but
less than one thousand five
hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(5)(b))

Transaction of insurance business
beyond the scope of licensure
(RCW 48.17.063)

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts
(RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful Possession of Fictitious
Identification (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Instruments of
Financial Fraud (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of a Personal
Identification Device (RCW
9A.56.320)

Unlawful Production of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Trafficking in Food Stamps
(RCW 9.91.142)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW
9.91.144)

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Sec. 5 RCW 9.94A.505 and 2008 c 231 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When a person is convicted of a felony, the court shall impose
punishment as provided in this chapter.
(2)(a) The court shall impose a sentence as provided in the
following sections and as applicable in the case:
(i) Unless another term of confinement applies, a sentence within
the standard sentence range established in RCW 9.94A.510, section 3 of
this act, or RCW 9.94A.517;
(ii) RCW 9.94A.701 and 9.94A.702, relating to community custody;
(iii) RCW 9.94A.570, relating to persistent offenders;
(iv) RCW 9.94A.540, relating to mandatory minimum terms;
(v) RCW 9.94A.650, relating to the first-time offender waiver;
(vi) RCW 9.94A.660, relating to the drug offender sentencing
alternative;
(vii) RCW 9.94A.670, relating to the special sex offender
sentencing alternative;
(viii) RCW ((9.94A.712)) 9.94A.507, relating to certain sex
offenses;
(ix) RCW 9.94A.535, relating to exceptional sentences;
(x) RCW 9.94A.589, relating to consecutive and concurrent
sentences;
(xi) RCW 9.94A.603, relating to felony driving while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug and felony physical
control of a vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug.
(b) If a standard sentence range has not been established for the
offender's crime, the court shall impose a determinate sentence which
may include not more than one year of confinement; community
restitution work; a term of community custody not to exceed one year;
and/or other legal financial obligations. The court may impose a
sentence which provides more than one year of confinement if the court
finds reasons justifying an exceptional sentence as provided in RCW
9.94A.535.
(3) If the court imposes a sentence requiring confinement of thirty
days or less, the court may, in its discretion, specify that the
sentence be served on consecutive or intermittent days. A sentence
requiring more than thirty days of confinement shall be served on
consecutive days. Local jail administrators may schedule court-ordered
intermittent sentences as space permits.
(4) If a sentence imposed includes payment of a legal financial
obligation, it shall be imposed as provided in RCW 9.94A.750,
9.94A.753, 9.94A.760, and 43.43.7541.
(5) Except as provided under RCW 9.94A.750(4) and 9.94A.753(4), a
court may not impose a sentence providing for a term of confinement or
community custody that exceeds the statutory maximum for the crime as
provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(6) The sentencing court shall give the offender credit for all
confinement time served before the sentencing if that confinement was
solely in regard to the offense for which the offender is being
sentenced.
(7) The court shall order restitution as provided in RCW 9.94A.750
and 9.94A.753.
(8) As a part of any sentence, the court may impose and enforce
crime-related prohibitions and affirmative conditions as provided in
this chapter.
(9) In any sentence of partial confinement, the court may require
the offender to serve the partial confinement in work release, in a
program of home detention, on work crew, or in a combined program of
work crew and home detention.

Sec. 6 RCW 9.94A.530 and 2008 c 231 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The intersection of the column defined by the offender score
and the row defined by the offense seriousness score determines the
standard sentence range (see RCW 9.94A.510, (Table 1A), section 3 of
this act, (Table 1B) and RCW 9.94A.517, (Table 3)). The additional
time for deadly weapon findings or for other adjustments as specified
in RCW 9.94A.533 shall be added to the entire standard sentence range.
The court may impose any sentence within the range that it deems
appropriate. All standard sentence ranges are expressed in terms of
total confinement.
(2) In determining any sentence other than a sentence above the
standard range, the trial court may rely on no more information than is
admitted by the plea agreement, or admitted, acknowledged, or proved in
a trial or at the time of sentencing, or proven pursuant to RCW
9.94A.537. Acknowledgment includes not objecting to information stated
in the presentence reports and not objecting to criminal history
presented at the time of sentencing. Where the defendant disputes
material facts, the court must either not consider the fact or grant an
evidentiary hearing on the point. The facts shall be deemed proved at
the hearing by a preponderance of the evidence, except as otherwise
specified in RCW 9.94A.537. On remand for resentencing following
appeal or collateral attack, the parties shall have the opportunity to
present and the court to consider all relevant evidence regarding
criminal history, including criminal history not previously presented.
(3) In determining any sentence above the standard sentence range,
the court shall follow the procedures set forth in RCW 9.94A.537.
Facts that establish the elements of a more serious crime or additional
crimes may not be used to go outside the standard sentence range except
upon stipulation or when specifically provided for in RCW 9.94A.535(3)
(d), (e), (g), and (h).

Sec. 7 RCW 9.94A.589 and 2002 c 175 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) or (c) of this subsection,
whenever a person is to be sentenced for two or more current offenses,
the sentence range for each current offense shall be determined by
using all other current and prior convictions as if they were prior
convictions for the purpose of the offender score: PROVIDED, That if
the court enters a finding that some or all of the current offenses
encompass the same criminal conduct then those current offenses shall
be counted as one crime. Sentences imposed under this subsection shall
be served concurrently. Consecutive sentences may only be imposed
under the exceptional sentence provisions of RCW 9.94A.535. "Same
criminal conduct," as used in this subsection, means two or more crimes
that require the same criminal intent, are committed at the same time
and place, and involve the same victim. This definition applies in
cases involving vehicular assault or vehicular homicide even if the
victims occupied the same vehicle.
(b) Whenever a person is convicted of two or more serious violent
offenses arising from separate and distinct criminal conduct, the
standard sentence range for the offense with the highest seriousness
level under RCW 9.94A.515 or section 4 of this act shall be determined
using the offender's prior convictions and other current convictions
that are not serious violent offenses in the offender score and the
standard sentence range for other serious violent offenses shall be
determined by using an offender score of zero. The standard sentence
range for any offenses that are not serious violent offenses shall be
determined according to (a) of this subsection. All sentences imposed
under (b) of this subsection shall be served consecutively to each
other and concurrently with sentences imposed under (a) of this
subsection.
(c) If an offender is convicted under RCW 9.41.040 for unlawful
possession of a firearm in the first or second degree and for the
felony crimes of theft of a firearm or possession of a stolen firearm,
or both, the standard sentence range for each of these current offenses
shall be determined by using all other current and prior convictions,
except other current convictions for the felony crimes listed in this
subsection (1)(c), as if they were prior convictions. The offender
shall serve consecutive sentences for each conviction of the felony
crimes listed in this subsection (1)(c), and for each firearm
unlawfully possessed.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, whenever a
person while under sentence for conviction of a felony commits another
felony and is sentenced to another term of confinement, the latter term
shall not begin until expiration of all prior terms.
(b) Whenever a second or later felony conviction results in
community supervision with conditions not currently in effect, under
the prior sentence or sentences of community supervision the court may
require that the conditions of community supervision contained in the
second or later sentence begin during the immediate term of community
supervision and continue throughout the duration of the consecutive
term of community supervision.
(3) Subject to subsections (1) and (2) of this section, whenever a
person is sentenced for a felony that was committed while the person
was not under sentence for conviction of a felony, the sentence shall
run concurrently with any felony sentence which has been imposed by any
court in this or another state or by a federal court subsequent to the
commission of the crime being sentenced unless the court pronouncing
the current sentence expressly orders that they be served
consecutively.
(4) Whenever any person granted probation under RCW 9.95.210 or
9.92.060, or both, has the probationary sentence revoked and a prison
sentence imposed, that sentence shall run consecutively to any sentence
imposed pursuant to this chapter, unless the court pronouncing the
subsequent sentence expressly orders that they be served concurrently.
(5) In the case of consecutive sentences, all periods of total
confinement shall be served before any partial confinement, community
restitution, community supervision, or any other requirement or
conditions of any of the sentences. Except for exceptional sentences
as authorized under RCW 9.94A.535, if two or more sentences that run
consecutively include periods of community supervision, the aggregate
of the community supervision period shall not exceed twenty-four
months.

Sec. 8 RCW 9.94A.480 and 2002 c 290 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A current, newly created or reworked judgment and sentence
document for each felony sentencing shall record any and all
recommended sentencing agreements or plea agreements and the sentences
for any and all felony crimes kept as public records under RCW
9.94A.475 shall contain the clearly printed name and legal signature of
the sentencing judge. The judgment and sentence document as defined in
this section shall also provide additional space for the sentencing
judge's reasons for going either above or below the presumptive
sentence range for any and all felony crimes covered as public records
under RCW 9.94A.475. Both the sentencing judge and the prosecuting
attorney's office shall each retain or receive a completed copy of each
sentencing document as defined in this section for their own records.
(2) The sentencing guidelines commission shall be sent a completed
copy of the judgment and sentence document upon conviction for each
felony sentencing under subsection (1) of this section and shall
compile a yearly and cumulative judicial record of each sentencing
judge in regards to his or her sentencing practices for any and all
felony crimes involving:
(a) Any violent offense as defined in this chapter;
(b) Any most serious offense as defined in this chapter;
(c) Any felony with any deadly weapon special verdict under RCW
9.94A.602;
(d) Any felony with any deadly weapon enhancements under RCW
9.94A.533 (3) or (4), or both; and/or
(e) The felony crimes of possession of a machine gun, possessing a
stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful
possession of a firearm in the first or second degree, and/or use of a
machine gun in a felony.
(3) The sentencing guidelines commission shall compare each
individual judge's sentencing practices to the standard or presumptive
sentence range for any and all felony crimes listed in subsection (2)
of this section for the appropriate offense level as defined in RCW
9.94A.515 or 9.94A.518, or section 4 of this act, offender score as
defined in RCW 9.94A.525, and any applicable deadly weapon enhancements
as defined in RCW 9.94A.533 (3) or (4), or both. These comparative
records shall be retained and made available to the public for review
in a current, newly created or reworked official published document by
the sentencing guidelines commission.
(4) Any and all felony sentences which are either above or below
the standard or presumptive sentence range in subsection (3) of this
section shall also mark whether the prosecuting attorney in the case
also recommended a similar sentence, if any, which was either above or
below the presumptive sentence range and shall also indicate if the
sentence was in conjunction with an approved alternative sentencing
option including a first-time offender waiver, sex offender sentencing
alternative, or other prescribed sentencing option.
(5) If any completed judgment and sentence document as defined in
subsection (1) of this section is not sent to the sentencing guidelines
commission as required in subsection (2) of this section, the
sentencing guidelines commission shall have the authority and shall
undertake reasonable and necessary steps to assure that all past,
current, and future sentencing documents as defined in subsection (1)
of this section are received by the sentencing guidelines commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 3 and 4 of this act are each added
to chapter 9.94A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act takes effect August 1, 2009.

--- END ---