BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.667 and 2007 c 417 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
a person operating a moving motor vehicle while holding a wireless
communications device to his or her ear is guilty of a traffic
infraction.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to a person
operating:
(a) An authorized emergency vehicle, or a tow truck responding to
a disabled vehicle;
(b) A moving motor vehicle using a wireless communications device
in hands-free mode;
(c) A moving motor vehicle using a hand-held wireless
communications device to:
(i) Report illegal activity;
(ii) Summon medical or other emergency help;
(iii) Prevent injury to a person or property;
(d) A moving motor vehicle while using a hearing aid.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not restrict the operation
of an amateur radio station by a person who holds a valid amateur radio
operator license issued by the federal communications commission.
(4) For purposes of this section, "hands-free mode" means the use
of a wireless communications device with a speaker phone, headset, or
earpiece.
(5) The state preempts the field of regulating the use of wireless
communications devices in motor vehicles, and this section supersedes
any local laws, ordinances, orders, rules, or regulations enacted by a
political subdivision or municipality to regulate the use of wireless
communications devices by the operator of a motor vehicle.
(6) ((Enforcement of this section by law enforcement officers may
be accomplished only as a secondary action when a driver of a motor
vehicle has been detained for a suspected violation of this title or an
equivalent local ordinance or some other offense.
(7))) Infractions that result from the use of a wireless
communications device while operating a motor vehicle under this
section shall not become part of the driver's record under RCW
46.52.101 and 46.52.120. Additionally, a finding that a person has
committed a traffic infraction under this section shall not be made
available to insurance companies or employers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect August 1, 2009.

--- END ---