BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the state has
a vital interest in the recovery of wild, depressed, and endangered
salmon and steelhead populations, and recognizes the need to manage
commercial and recreational fisheries consistent with efforts to
protect and recover wild salmon and steelhead. The department's
management of harvest has a key role in leveraging record salmon
recovery investments to protect and restore habitat, improve
hatcheries, and make hydroelectric operations more fish friendly.
(2)(a) The legislature further finds that due to the widespread
external marking of hatchery produced salmon it is possible to
differentiate between marked hatchery fish and unmarked wild fish.
Independent, congressionally chartered, scientific reviews have
identified an urgent need to reduce the negative impacts of excess
returning hatchery salmon through the selective harvest of marked
hatchery fish while protecting wild salmon stocks needed for recovery.
In mixed stock fisheries, these selective methods must be capable of
catching and releasing wild, depressed, and endangered salmon stocks
unharmed so they can reach the spawning grounds.
(b) The legislature reaffirms that the department of fish and
wildlife's management of the state's fish and wildlife resources should
be based on long-term sustainability, recovery of wild endangered
stocks, and the best available science for sound management practices.
The federal endangered species act also requires that the state's
management of hatcheries and harvest does not jeopardize the health of
listed wild salmon or steelhead species.
(3) The legislature further finds that an urgent need exists for
the department of fish and wildlife to evaluate and recommend
alternative types of salmon fishing gear that will minimize the impact
of fishing on wild, depressed, and endangered salmon and steelhead
populations. Although current state law directs the department of fish
and wildlife to evaluate and implement these alternative gear types,
little progress has been made to make critically needed advances. Many
forms of these gear types have been used successfully for hundreds of
years and at least one of these methods is currently being used by the
Colville tribe in the upper Columbia river.
(4) It is the intent of this act to reaffirm the legislature's
support for opportunities to optimize the economic benefits resulting
from fishing in the state while protecting and recovering wild,
depressed, and endangered salmon populations. By selectively
harvesting marked hatchery salmon and avoiding the harvest of unmarked
wild salmon, commercial and recreational fishers will have greater
access to plentiful surplus hatchery fish under federal endangered
species act requirements. This will result in increased economic
activity in rural areas, new markets for tourism, and the preservation
of an iconic species for the enjoyment of future generations.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.04.012 and 2000 c 107 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Wildlife, fish, and shellfish are the property of the state. The
commission, director, and the department shall preserve, protect,
perpetuate, and manage the wildlife and food fish, game fish, and
shellfish in state waters and offshore waters.
The department shall conserve the wildlife and food fish, game
fish, and shellfish resources in a manner that does not impair the
resource. In a manner consistent with this goal, the department shall
seek to ((maintain the economic well-being and stability of the fishing
industry in the state)) optimize the economic benefits resulting from
fishing in the state. The department shall promote orderly and
sustainable fisheries ((and shall enhance and improve recreational and
commercial)) with the goal of enhancing and improving opportunities for
fishing in this state.
The commission may authorize the taking of wildlife, food fish,
game fish, and shellfish only at times or places, or in manners or
quantities, as in the judgment of the commission does not impair the
((supply)) long-term sustainability of these resources.
The commission shall attempt to maximize the public recreational
game fishing and hunting opportunities of all citizens, including
juveniles, ((disabled)) individuals with disabilities, and senior
citizens.
Recognizing that the management of our state wildlife, food fish,
game fish, and shellfish resources depends heavily on the assistance of
volunteers, the department shall work cooperatively with volunteer
groups and individuals to achieve the goals of this title to the
greatest extent possible.
Nothing in this title shall be construed to infringe on the right
of a private property owner to control the owner's private property.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.50.030 and 2001 c 163 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person shall not use, operate, or maintain a gill net which
exceeds one thousand five hundred feet in length ((or a drag seine)) in
the waters of the Columbia river for catching salmon.
(2) ((A person shall not construct, install, use, operate, or
maintain within state waters)) The department may authorize the use of
a pound net, round haul net, lampara net, fish trap, fish wheel, scow
fish wheel, set net, weir, seine, or fixed appliance for ((catching
salmon or steelhead except under the authority of a trial or
experimental fishery permit, when an emerging commercial fishery has
been designated allowing use of one or more of these gear types. The
director must consult with the commercial fishing interests that would
be affected by the trial or experimental fishery permit)) the purpose
of catching salmon in commercial, experimental, or test fisheries in
state waters. In evaluating, implementing, and adopting rules for the
use of this gear, the department shall recognize and optimize the use
of gear designed to minimize the lethality of commercial salmon fishing
to nontarget, endangered, and depressed wild stocks of salmonids and
other species through the avoidance of or live capture, sorting, and
release of these species with minimal mortality. The director may also
authorize the use of this gear for scientific investigations.
(3) The department, in coordination with the Oregon department of
fish and wildlife, shall adopt rules to regulate the use of
monofilament in gill net webbing on the Columbia river.
(4) Not later than one year after the effective date of this
section, the department shall provide a report to the legislature and
the governor outlining a schedule, not to exceed five years, for
transitioning to the exclusive use of commercial salmon fishing gear
designed to minimize the lethality of commercial salmon fishing to
nontarget, endangered, and depressed wild stocks of salmonids and other
species through the avoidance of or live capture, sorting, and release
of these species with minimal mortality.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.50.050 and 1998 c 190 s 79 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((commission shall not authorize)) use of reef net fishing gear
((except in)) may be authorized by the commission in the reef net areas
described in this section. The commission may also authorize the use
of reef net fishing gear in other areas if the gear is designed to
minimize the lethality of commercial salmon fishing on endangered and
depressed wild salmonids and nontarget species in mixed stock
fisheries.
(1) Point Roberts reef net fishing area includes those waters
within 250 feet on each side of a line projected 129° true from a point
at longitude 123° 01' 15" W. latitude 48° 58' 38" N. to a point one
mile distant, as such description is shown upon the United States Coast
and Geodetic Survey map numbered 6300, published September, 1941, in
Washington, D.C., eleventh edition.
(2) Cherry Point reef net fishing area includes those waters inland
and inside the 10-fathom line between lines projected 205° true from
points on the mainland at longitude 122° 44' 54" latitude 48° 51' 48"
and longitude 122° 44' 18" latitude 48° 51' 33", ((a [as])) as such
descriptions are shown upon the United States Coast and Geodetic Survey
map numbered 6380, published March, 1947, in Washington, D.C., eighth
edition.
(3) Lummi Island reef net fishing area includes those waters inland
and inside a line projected from Village Point 208° true to a point 900
yards distant, thence 129° true to the point of intersection with a
line projected 259° true from the shore of Lummi Island 122° 40' 42"
latitude 48° 41' 32", as such descriptions are shown upon the United
States Coast and Geodetic Survey map numbered 6380, published March,
1947, in Washington, D.C., eighth edition, revised 11-25-57, save and
except that there shall be excluded therefrom all waters lying inside
of a line projected 259° true from a point at 122° 40' 42" latitude 48°
41' 32" to a point 300 yards distant from high tide, thence in a
northerly direction to the United States Coast and Geodetic Survey
reference mark number 2, 1941-1950, located on that point on Lummi
Island known as Lovers Point, as such descriptions are shown upon the
United States Coast and Geodetic Survey map number 6380 as aforesaid.
The term "Village Point" as used herein shall be construed to mean a
point of location on Village Point, Lummi Island, at the mean high tide
line on a true bearing of 43° 53' a distance of 457 feet to the center
of the chimney of a wood frame house on the east side of the county
road. Said chimney and house being described as Village Point Chimney
on page 612 of the United States Coast and Geodetic Survey list of
geographic positions No. G-5455, Rosario Strait.
(4) Sinclair Island reef net fishing area includes those waters
inland and inside a line projected from the northern point of Sinclair
Island to Boulder reef, thence 200° true to the northwesterly point of
Sinclair Island, as such descriptions are shown upon the United States
Coast and Geodetic Survey map numbered 6380, published March, 1947, in
Washington, D.C., eighth edition.
(5) Flat Point reef net fishing area includes those waters within
a radius of 175 feet of a point off Lopez Island located at longitude
122° 55' 24" latitude 48° 32' 33", as such description is shown upon
the United States Coast and Geodetic Survey map numbered 6380,
published March, 1947, in Washington, D.C., eighth edition.
(6) Lopez Island reef net fishing area includes those waters within
400 yards of shore between lines projected true west from points on the
shore of Lopez Island at longitude 122° 55' 04" latitude 48° 31' 59"
and longitude 122° 55' 54" latitude 48° 30' 55", as such descriptions
are shown upon the United States Coast and Geodetic Survey map numbered
6380, published March, 1947, in Washington, D.C., eighth edition.
(7) Iceberg Point reef net fishing area includes those waters
inland and inside a line projected from Davis Point on Lopez Island to
the west point of Long Island, thence to the southern point of Hall
Island, thence to the eastern point at the entrance to Jones Bay, and
thence to the southern point at the entrance to Mackaye Harbor on Lopez
Island; and those waters inland and inside a line projected 320° from
Iceberg Point light on Lopez Island, a distance of 400 feet, thence
easterly to the point on Lopez Island at longitude 122° 53' 00"
latitude 48° 25' 39", as such descriptions are shown upon the United
States Coast and Geodetic Survey map numbered 6380, published March,
1947, in Washington, D.C., eighth edition.
(8) Aleck Bay reef net fishing area includes those waters inland
and inside a line projected from the southwestern point at the entrance
to Aleck Bay on Lopez Island at longitude 122° 51' 11" latitude 48° 25'
14" southeasterly 800 yards to the submerged rock shown on U.S.G.S. map
number 6380, thence northerly to the cove on Lopez Island at longitude
122° 50' 49" latitude 48° 25' 42", as such descriptions are shown upon
the United States Coast and Geodetic Survey map numbered 6380,
published March, 1947, in Washington, D.C., eighth edition.
(9) Shaw Island reef net fishing area number 1 includes those
waters within 300 yards of shore between lines projected true south
from points on Shaw Island at longitude 122° 56' 14" latitude 48° 33'
28" and longitude 122° 57' 29" latitude 48° 32' 58", as such
descriptions are shown upon the United States Coast and Geodetic Survey
map numbered 6380, published March, 1947, in Washington, D.C., eighth
edition.
(10) Shaw Island reef net fishing area number 2 includes those
waters inland and inside a line projected from Point George on Shaw
Island to the westerly point of Neck Point on Shaw Island, as such
description is shown upon the United States Coast and Geodetic Survey
map numbered 6380, published March, 1947, in Washington, D.C., eighth
edition.
(11) Stuart Island reef net fishing area number 1 includes those
waters within 600 feet of the shore of Stuart Island between lines
projected true east from points at longitude 123° 10' 47" latitude 48°
39' 47" and longitude 123° 10' 47" latitude 48° 39' 33", as such
descriptions are shown upon the United States Coast and Geodetic Survey
map numbered 6380, published March, 1947, in Washington, D.C., eighth
edition.
(12) Stuart Island reef net fishing area number 2 includes those
waters within 250 feet of Gossip Island, also known as Happy Island, as
such description is shown upon the United States Coast and Geodetic
Survey map numbered 6380, published March, 1947, in Washington, D.C.,
eighth edition.
(13) Johns Island reef net fishing area includes those waters
inland and inside a line projected from the eastern point of Johns
Island to the northwestern point of Little Cactus Island, thence
northwesterly to a point on Johns Island at longitude 123° 09' 24"
latitude 48° 39' 59", as such descriptions are shown upon the United
States Coast and Geodetic Survey map numbered 6380, published March,
1947, in Washington, D.C., eighth edition.
(14) Battleship Island reef net fishing area includes those waters
lying within 350 feet of Battleship Island, as such description is
shown upon the United States Coast and Geodetic Survey map numbered
6380, published March, 1947, in Washington, D.C., eighth edition.
(15) Open Bay reef net fishing area includes those waters lying
within 150 feet of shore between lines projected true east from a point
on Henry Island at longitude 123° 11' 34 1/2" latitude 48° 35' 27 1/2"
at a point 250 feet south, as such descriptions are shown upon the
United States Coast and Geodetic Survey map numbered 6380, published
March, 1947, in Washington, D.C., eighth edition.
(16) Mitchell Reef net fishing area includes those waters within a
line beginning at the rock shown on U.S.G.S. map number 6380 at
longitude 123° 10' 56" latitude 48° 34' 49 1/2", and projected 50 feet
northwesterly, thence southwesterly 250 feet, thence southeasterly 300
feet, thence northeasterly 250 feet, thence to the point of beginning,
as such descriptions are shown upon the United States Coast and
Geodetic Survey map numbered 6380, published March, 1947, in
Washington, D.C., eighth edition.
(17) Smugglers Cove reef fishing area includes those waters within
200 feet of shore between lines projected true west from points on the
shore of San Juan Island at longitude 123° 10' 29" latitude 48° 33' 50"
and longitude 123° 10' 31" latitude 48° 33' 45", as such descriptions
are shown upon the United States Coast and Geodetic Survey map numbered
6380, published March, 1947, in Washington, D.C., eighth edition.
(18) Andrews Bay reef net fishing area includes those waters lying
within 300 feet of the shore of San Juan Island between a line
projected true south from a point at the northern entrance of Andrews
Bay at longitude 123° 09' 53 1/2" latitude 48° 33' 00" and the cable
crossing sign in Andrews Bay, at longitude 123° 09' 45" latitude 48°
33' 04", as such descriptions are shown upon the United States Coast
and Geodetic Survey map numbered 6380, published March, 1947, in
Washington, D.C., eighth edition.
(19) Orcas Island reef net fishing area includes those waters
inland and inside a line projected true west a distance of 1,000 yards
from the shore of Orcas Island at longitude 122° 57' 40" latitude 48°
41' 06" thence northeasterly to a point 500 feet true west of Point
Doughty, then true east to Point Doughty, as such descriptions are
shown upon the United States Coast and Geodetic Survey map numbered
6380, published March, 1947, in Washington, D.C., eighth edition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 77.50.110 (Commercial salmon fishing -- Unauthorized gear)
and 1998 c 190 s 84, 1996 c 267 s 24, 1983 1st ex.s. c 46 s 69, & 1969
ex.s. c 23 s 1; and
(2) RCW 77.50.120 (Maintaining consistent salmon harvest levels)
and 2001 c 163 s 1.

--- END ---