BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I - BENEFITS
Sec. 1 RCW 50.04.030 and 1991 c 117 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Benefit year" with respect to each individual, means the fifty-two
consecutive week period beginning with the first day of the calendar
week in which the individual files an application for an initial
determination and thereafter the fifty-two consecutive week period
beginning with the first day of the calendar week in which the
individual next files an application for an initial determination after
the expiration of the individual's last preceding benefit year:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the foregoing limitation shall not be deemed to
preclude the establishment of a new benefit year under the laws of
another state pursuant to any agreement providing for the interstate
combining of employment and wages and the interstate payment of
benefits nor shall this limitation be deemed to preclude the
commissioner from backdating an initial application at the request of
the claimant either for the convenience of the department of employment
security or for any other reason deemed by the commissioner to be good
cause.
An individual's benefit year shall be extended to be fifty-three
weeks when at the expiration of fifty-two weeks the establishment of a
new benefit year would result in the use of a quarter of wages in the
new base year that had been included in the individual's prior base
year.
Before July 4, 2010, no benefit year will be established unless it
is determined that the individual earned wages in "employment" in not
less than six hundred eighty hours of the individual's base year((:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That)). On or after July 4, 2010, no benefit year
will be established unless it is determined that the individual earned
wages in "employment" in not less than one thousand three hundred hours
of the individual's base year. However, a benefit year cannot be
established if the base year wages include wages earned prior to the
establishment of a prior benefit year unless the individual worked and
earned wages since the last separation from employment immediately
before the application for initial determination in the previous
benefit year if the applicant was an unemployed individual at the time
of application, or since the initial separation in the previous benefit
year if the applicant was not an unemployed individual at the time of
filing an application for initial determination for the previous
benefit year, of not less than six times the weekly benefit amount
computed for the individual's new benefit year.
If an individual's prior benefit year was based on the last four
completed calendar quarters, a new benefit year shall not be
established until the new base year does not include any hours used in
the establishment of the prior benefit year.
If the wages of an individual are not based upon a fixed duration
of time or if the individual's wages are paid at irregular intervals or
in such manner as not to extend regularly over the period of
employment, the wages for any week shall be determined in such manner
as the commissioner may by regulation prescribe. Such regulation
shall, so far as possible, secure results reasonably similar to those
which would prevail if the individual were paid his or her wages at
regular intervals.

Sec. 2 RCW 50.04.310 and 2007 c 146 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An individual is "unemployed" in any week during which the
individual performs no services and with respect to which no
remuneration is payable to the individual, or in any week of less than
full time work, if the remuneration payable to the individual with
respect to such week is less than one and one-third times the
individual's weekly benefit amount plus five dollars. The commissioner
shall prescribe regulations applicable to unemployed individuals making
such distinctions in the procedures as to such types of unemployment as
the commissioner deems necessary.
(2) An individual is not "unemployed" during any week which falls
totally within a period during which the individual, pursuant to a
collective bargaining agreement or individual employment contract, is
employed full time in accordance with a definition of full time
contained in the agreement or contract, and for which compensation for
full time work is payable. This subsection may not be applied
retroactively to an individual who had no guarantee of work at the
start of such period and subsequently is provided additional work by
the employer.
(3)(a) An officer of a corporation who owns ten percent or more of
the outstanding stock of the corporation, or a corporate officer who is
a family member of an officer who owns ten percent or more of the
outstanding stock of the corporation, whose claim for benefits is based
on any wages with that corporation, is:
(((a))) (i) Not "unemployed" in any week during the individual's
term of office or ownership in the corporation, even if wages are not
being paid;
(((b))) (ii) "Unemployed" in any week upon dissolution of the
corporation or if the officer permanently resigns or is permanently
removed from their appointment and responsibilities with that
corporation in accordance with its articles of incorporation or bylaws.
(b) This subsection does not apply to officers of corporations with
annual revenues of less than two million five hundred thousand dollars.
(4) As used in this section, "family member" means persons who are
members of a family by blood or marriage as parents, stepparents,
grandparents, spouses, children, brothers, sisters, stepchildren,
adopted children, or grandchildren.

Sec. 3 RCW 50.20.099 and 2000 c 2 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To ensure that unemployment insurance benefits are paid in
accordance with RCW 50.20.098, the employment security department shall
verify that an individual is eligible to work in the United States and
has a social security account number before the individual receives
((training)) unemployment benefits under ((RCW 50.22.150)) this title.
The department may use the e-verify program administered by the United
States citizenship and immigration services for this purpose.
(2) By July 1, 2002, the employment security department shall:
(a) Develop and implement an effective method for determining,
where appropriate, eligibility to work in the United States for
individuals applying for unemployment benefits under this title;
(b) Review verification systems developed by federal agencies for
verifying a person's eligibility to receive unemployment benefits under
this title and evaluate the effectiveness of these systems for use in
this state; and
(c) Report its initial findings to the legislature by September 1,
2000, and its final report by July 1, 2002.
(3) Where federal law prohibits the conditioning of unemployment
benefits on a verification of an individual's status as a qualified or
authorized alien, the requirements of this section shall not apply.

Sec. 4 RCW 50.20.050 and 2008 c 323 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) With respect to claims that have an effective date before
January 4, 2004:
(a) An individual shall be disqualified from benefits beginning
with the first day of the calendar week in which he or she has left
work voluntarily without good cause and thereafter for seven calendar
weeks and until he or she has obtained bona fide work in employment
covered by this title and earned wages in that employment equal to
seven times his or her weekly benefit amount.
The disqualification shall continue if the work obtained is a mere
sham to qualify for benefits and is not bona fide work. In determining
whether work is of a bona fide nature, the commissioner shall consider
factors including but not limited to the following:
(i) The duration of the work;
(ii) The extent of direction and control by the employer over the
work; and
(iii) The level of skill required for the work in light of the
individual's training and experience.
(b) An individual shall not be considered to have left work
voluntarily without good cause when:
(i) He or she has left work to accept a bona fide offer of bona
fide work as described in (a) of this subsection;
(ii) The separation was because of the illness or disability of the
claimant or the death, illness, or disability of a member of the
claimant's immediate family if the claimant took all reasonable
precautions, in accordance with any regulations that the commissioner
may prescribe, to protect his or her employment status by having
promptly notified the employer of the reason for the absence and by
having promptly requested reemployment when again able to assume
employment: PROVIDED, That these precautions need not have been taken
when they would have been a futile act, including those instances when
the futility of the act was a result of a recognized labor/management
dispatch system;
(iii) He or she has left work to relocate for the spouse's
employment that is due to an employer-initiated mandatory transfer that
is outside the existing labor market area if the claimant remained
employed as long as was reasonable prior to the move; or
(iv) The separation was necessary to protect the claimant or the
claimant's immediate family members from domestic violence, as defined
in RCW 26.50.010, or stalking, as defined in RCW 9A.46.110.
(c) In determining under this subsection whether an individual has
left work voluntarily without good cause, the commissioner shall only
consider work-connected factors such as the degree of risk involved to
the individual's health, safety, and morals, the individual's physical
fitness for the work, the individual's ability to perform the work, and
such other work connected factors as the commissioner may deem
pertinent, including state and national emergencies. Good cause shall
not be established for voluntarily leaving work because of its distance
from an individual's residence where the distance was known to the
individual at the time he or she accepted the employment and where, in
the judgment of the department, the distance is customarily traveled by
workers in the individual's job classification and labor market, nor
because of any other significant work factor which was generally known
and present at the time he or she accepted employment, unless the
related circumstances have so changed as to amount to a substantial
involuntary deterioration of the work factor or unless the commissioner
determines that other related circumstances would work an unreasonable
hardship on the individual were he or she required to continue in the
employment.
(d) Subsection (1)(a) and (c) of this section shall not apply to an
individual whose marital status or domestic responsibilities cause him
or her to leave employment. Such an individual shall not be eligible
for unemployment insurance benefits beginning with the first day of the
calendar week in which he or she left work and thereafter for seven
calendar weeks and until he or she has requalified, either by obtaining
bona fide work in employment covered by this title and earning wages in
that employment equal to seven times his or her weekly benefit amount
or by reporting in person to the department during ten different
calendar weeks and certifying on each occasion that he or she is ready,
able, and willing to immediately accept any suitable work which may be
offered, is actively seeking work pursuant to customary trade
practices, and is utilizing such employment counseling and placement
services as are available through the department. This subsection does
not apply to individuals covered by (b)(ii) or (iii) of this
subsection.
(2) With respect to claims that have an effective date on or after
January 4, 2004, and before July 4, 2010:
(a) An individual shall be disqualified from benefits beginning
with the first day of the calendar week in which he or she has left
work voluntarily without good cause and thereafter for seven calendar
weeks and until he or she has obtained bona fide work in employment
covered by this title and earned wages in that employment equal to
seven times his or her weekly benefit amount.
The disqualification shall continue if the work obtained is a mere
sham to qualify for benefits and is not bona fide work. In determining
whether work is of a bona fide nature, the commissioner shall consider
factors including but not limited to the following:
(i) The duration of the work;
(ii) The extent of direction and control by the employer over the
work; and
(iii) The level of skill required for the work in light of the
individual's training and experience.
(b) An individual is not disqualified from benefits under (a) of
this subsection when:
(i) He or she has left work to accept a bona fide offer of bona
fide work as described in (a) of this subsection;
(ii) The separation was necessary because of the illness or
disability of the claimant or the death, illness, or disability of a
member of the claimant's immediate family if:
(A) The claimant pursued all reasonable alternatives to preserve
his or her employment status by requesting a leave of absence, by
having promptly notified the employer of the reason for the absence,
and by having promptly requested reemployment when again able to assume
employment. These alternatives need not be pursued, however, when they
would have been a futile act, including those instances when the
futility of the act was a result of a recognized labor/management
dispatch system; and
(B) The claimant terminated his or her employment status, and is
not entitled to be reinstated to the same position or a comparable or
similar position;
(iii)(A) With respect to claims that have an effective date before
July 2, 2006, he or she: (I) Left work to relocate for the spouse's
employment that, due to a mandatory military transfer: (1) Is outside
the existing labor market area; and (2) is in Washington or another
state that, pursuant to statute, does not consider such an individual
to have left work voluntarily without good cause; and (II) remained
employed as long as was reasonable prior to the move;
(B) With respect to claims that have an effective date on or after
July 2, 2006, and before July 4, 2010, he or she: (I) Left work to
relocate for the spouse's employment that, due to a mandatory military
transfer, is outside the existing labor market area; and (II) remained
employed as long as was reasonable prior to the move;
(iv) The separation was necessary to protect the claimant or the
claimant's immediate family members from domestic violence, as defined
in RCW 26.50.010, or stalking, as defined in RCW 9A.46.110;
(v) The individual's usual compensation was reduced by twenty-five
percent or more;
(vi) The individual's usual hours were reduced by twenty-five
percent or more;
(vii) The individual's worksite changed, such change caused a
material increase in distance or difficulty of travel, and, after the
change, the commute was greater than is customary for workers in the
individual's job classification and labor market;
(viii) The individual's worksite safety deteriorated, the
individual reported such safety deterioration to the employer, and the
employer failed to correct the hazards within a reasonable period of
time;
(ix) The individual left work because of illegal activities in the
individual's worksite, the individual reported such activities to the
employer, and the employer failed to end such activities within a
reasonable period of time;
(x) The individual's usual work was changed to work that violates
the individual's religious convictions or sincere moral beliefs; or
(xi) The individual left work to enter an apprenticeship program
approved by the Washington state apprenticeship training council.
Benefits are payable beginning Sunday of the week prior to the week in
which the individual begins active participation in the apprenticeship
program.
(3) With respect to claims that have an effective date on or after
July 4, 2010, an individual shall be disqualified from benefits
beginning with the first day of the calendar week in which he or she
has left work voluntarily and thereafter for seven calendar weeks and
until he or she has obtained bona fide work in employment covered by
this title and earned wages in that employment equal to seven times his
or her weekly benefit amount.
The disqualification shall continue if the work obtained is a mere
sham to qualify for benefits and is not bona fide work. In determining
whether work is of a bona fide nature, the commissioner shall consider
factors including but not limited to the following: (a) The duration
of the work; (b) the extent of direction and control by the employer
over the work; and (c) the level of skill required for the work in
light of the individual's training and experience.

Sec. 5 RCW 50.20.066 and 2006 c 13 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
With respect to claims that have an effective date on or after
January 4, 2004:
(1) An individual shall be disqualified from benefits beginning
with the first day of the calendar week in which he or she has been
discharged or suspended for misconduct connected with his or her work
and thereafter for ten calendar weeks and until he or she has obtained
bona fide work in employment covered by this title and earned wages in
that employment equal to ten times his or her weekly benefit amount.
Alcoholism shall not constitute a defense to disqualification from
benefits due to misconduct.
(2)(a) With respect to claims that have an effective date on or
after January 4, 2004, and before July 4, 2010, an individual who has
been discharged from his or her work because of gross misconduct shall
have all hourly wage credits based on that employment or six hundred
eighty hours of wage credits, whichever is greater, canceled.
(b) With respect to claims that have an effective date on or after
July 4, 2010, an individual who has been discharged from his or her
work because of gross misconduct shall have all hourly wage credits
based on that employment, or one thousand three hundred hours of wage
credits, whichever is greater, canceled.
(3) The employer shall notify the department of a felony or gross
misdemeanor of which an individual has been convicted, or has admitted
committing to a competent authority, not later than six months
following the admission or conviction.
(4) The claimant shall disclose any conviction of the claimant of
a work-connected felony or gross misdemeanor occurring in the previous
two years to the department at the time of application for benefits.
(5) All benefits that are paid in error based on this section are
recoverable, notwithstanding RCW 50.20.190 or 50.24.020 or any other
provisions of this title.

Sec. 6 RCW 50.20.120 and 2006 c 13 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Subject to the other provisions of this title, benefits
shall be payable to any eligible individual during the individual's
benefit year in a maximum amount equal to the lesser of thirty times
the weekly benefit amount, as determined in subsection (2) of this
section, or one-third of the individual's base year wages under this
title: PROVIDED, That as to any week which falls in an extended
benefit period as defined in RCW 50.22.010(1), an individual's
eligibility for maximum benefits in excess of twenty-six times his or
her weekly benefit amount will be subject to the terms and conditions
set forth in RCW 50.22.020.
(b) With respect to claims that have an effective date on or after
the first Sunday of the calendar month immediately following the month
in which the commissioner finds that the state unemployment rate is six
and eight-tenths percent or less and before July 4, 2010, benefits
shall be payable to any eligible individual during the individual's
benefit year in a maximum amount equal to the lesser of twenty-six
times the weekly benefit amount, as determined in subsection (2) of
this section, or one-third of the individual's base year wages under
this title.
(c) With respect to claims that have an effective date on or after
July 4, 2010, benefits shall be payable to any eligible individual
during the individual's benefit year in a maximum amount equal to one-third of the individual's base year wages. In no case shall benefits
paid during the individual's benefit year be more than fifty thousand
dollars.
(2)(a) For claims with an effective date before January 4, 2004, an
individual's weekly benefit amount shall be an amount equal to one
twenty-fifth of the average quarterly wages of the individual's total
wages during the two quarters of the individual's base year in which
such total wages were highest.
(b) With respect to claims with an effective date on or after
January 4, 2004, and before January 2, 2005, an individual's weekly
benefit amount shall be an amount equal to one twenty-fifth of the
average quarterly wages of the individual's total wages during the
three quarters of the individual's base year in which such total wages
were highest.
(c)(i) With respect to claims with an effective date on or after
January 2, 2005, except as provided in (c)(ii) of this subsection, an
individual's weekly benefit amount shall be an amount equal to one
percent of the total wages paid in the individual's base year.
(ii) With respect to claims with an effective date on or after the
first Sunday following April 22, 2005, and before July 4, 2010, an
individual's weekly benefit amount shall be an amount equal to three
and eighty-five one-hundredths percent of the average quarterly wages
of the individual's total wages during the two quarters of the
individual's base year in which such total wages were highest.
(d) With respect to claims with an effective date on or after July
4, 2010, the weekly benefit amount for an individual with total wages
in the individual's base year of less than one hundred thousand dollars
shall be as follows:
(i) During the first nine weeks of benefits, the weekly benefit
amount shall be an amount equal to seven percent of the average
quarterly wages of the individual's total wages during the two quarters
of the individual's base year in which such total wages were highest.
(ii) During the nine weeks of benefits following the nine weeks of
benefits subject to (d)(i) of this subsection, the weekly benefit
amount shall be an amount equal to five percent of the average
quarterly wages of the individual's total wages during the two quarters
of the individual's base year in which such total wages were highest.
(iii) During the remaining eight weeks of benefits, the weekly
benefit amount shall be an amount equal to three percent of the average
quarterly wages of the individual's total wages during the two quarters
of the individual's base year in which such total wages were highest.
(e) With respect to claims with an effective date on or after July
4, 2010, the weekly benefit amount for an individual with total wages
in the individual's base year of more than one hundred thousand dollars
shall be as follows:
(i) During the first nine weeks of benefits, the weekly benefit
amount shall be an amount equal to five percent of the average
quarterly wages of the individual's total wages during the two quarters
of the individual's base year in which such total wages were highest.
(ii) During the nine weeks of benefits following the nine weeks of
benefits subject to (d)(i) of this subsection, the weekly benefit
amount shall be an amount equal to three percent of the average
quarterly wages of the individual's total wages during the two quarters
of the individual's base year in which such total wages were highest.
(iii) During the remaining eight weeks of benefits, the weekly
benefit amount shall be an amount equal to one percent of the average
quarterly wages of the individual's total wages during the two quarters
of the individual's base year in which such total wages were highest.
(3) The maximum and minimum amounts payable weekly shall be
determined as of each June 30th to apply to benefit years beginning in
the twelve-month period immediately following such June 30th.
(a)(i) With respect to claims that have an effective date before
January 4, 2004, the maximum amount payable weekly shall be seventy
percent of the "average weekly wage" for the calendar year preceding
such June 30th.
(ii) With respect to claims that have an effective date on or after
January 4, 2004, and before July 4, 2010, the maximum amount payable
weekly shall be either four hundred ninety-six dollars or sixty-three
percent of the "average weekly wage" for the calendar year preceding
such June 30th, whichever is greater.
(iii) With respect to claims that have an effective date on or
after July 4, 2010, the maximum amount payable weekly shall be: (A)
One thousand eight hundred seventy-five dollars during the first nine
weeks of benefits; (B) one thousand one hundred twenty-five dollars
during the nine weeks of benefits following the nine weeks of benefits
subject to subsection (2)(d)(i) of this section; and (C) one hundred
twenty-five percent of the federal poverty level for a family of four
as determined annually by the federal department of health and human
services.
(b)(i) With respect to claims that have an effective date before
July 4, 2010, the minimum amount payable weekly shall be fifteen
percent of the "average weekly wage" for the calendar year preceding
such June 30th.
(ii) With respect to claims that have an effective date on or after
July 4, 2010, the minimum amount payable weekly shall be one hundred
twenty-five percent of the federal poverty level as adjusted for family
size and determined annually by the federal department of health and
human services, but shall not exceed one hundred twenty-five percent of
the federal poverty level for a family of four.
(4) If any weekly benefit, maximum benefit, or minimum benefit
amount computed herein is not a multiple of one dollar, it shall be
reduced to the next lower multiple of one dollar.

Sec. 7 RCW 50.22.150 and 2002 c 149 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to availability of funds, training benefits are
available for an individual who is eligible for or has exhausted
entitlement to unemployment compensation benefits and who:
(a) Is a dislocated worker as defined in RCW 50.04.075;
(b) Except as provided under subsection (2) of this section, has
demonstrated, through a work history, sufficient tenure in an
occupation or in work with a particular skill set. This screening will
take place during the assessment process;
(c) Is, after assessment of demand for the individual's occupation
or skills in the individual's labor market, determined to need job-related training to find suitable employment in his or her labor
market. Beginning July 1, 2001, the assessment of demand for the
individual's occupation or skill sets must be substantially based on
declining occupation or skill sets identified in local labor market
areas by the local workforce development councils, in cooperation with
the employment security department and its labor market information
division, under subsection (10) of this section;
(d) Develops an individual training program that is submitted to
the commissioner for approval within ((sixty)) ninety days after the
individual is notified by the employment security department of the
requirements of this section;
(e) Enters the approved training program ((by ninety days after the
date of the notification, unless the employment security department
determines that the training is not available during the ninety-day
period, in which case the individual enters training)) as soon as it is
available, but not later than the academic term beginning after the
commissioner approves the individual training plan; and
(f) Is enrolled in training approved under this section on a full-time basis as determined by the educational institution, and is making
satisfactory progress in the training as certified by the educational
institution.
(2) Until June 30, 2002, the following individuals who meet the
requirements of subsection (1) of this section may, without regard to
the tenure requirements under subsection (1)(b) of this section,
receive training benefits as provided in this section:
(a) An exhaustee who has base year employment in the aerospace
industry assigned the standard industrial classification code "372" or
the North American industry classification system code "336411";
(b) An exhaustee who has base year employment in the forest
products industry, determined by the department, but including the
industries assigned the major group standard industrial classification
codes "24" and "26" or any equivalent codes in the North American
industry classification system code, and the industries involved in the
harvesting and management of logs, transportation of logs and wood
products, processing of wood products, and the manufacturing and
distribution of wood processing and logging equipment; or
(c) An exhaustee who has base year employment in the fishing
industry assigned the standard industrial classification code "0912" or
any equivalent codes in the North American industry classification
system code.
(3) An individual is not eligible for training benefits under this
section if he or she:
(a) Is a standby claimant who expects recall to his or her regular
employer;
(b) Has a definite recall date that is within six months of the
date he or she is laid off; or
(c) Is unemployed due to a regular seasonal layoff ((which
demonstrates a pattern of unemployment consistent with the provisions
of RCW 50.20.015)). Regular seasonal layoff does not include layoff
due to permanent structural downsizing or structural changes in the
individual's labor market.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Educational institution" means an institution of higher
education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 or an educational institution as
defined in RCW 28C.04.410, including equivalent educational
institutions in other states.
(b) "Sufficient tenure" means earning a plurality of wages in a
particular occupation or using a particular skill set during the base
year and at least two of the four twelve-month periods immediately
preceding the base year.
(c) "Training benefits" means additional benefits paid under this
section.
(d) "Training program" means:
(i) An education program determined to be necessary as a
prerequisite to vocational training after counseling at the educational
institution in which the individual enrolls under his or her approved
training program; or
(ii) A vocational training program at an educational institution:
(A) That is targeted to training for a high demand occupation.
Beginning July 1, 2001, the assessment of high demand occupations
authorized for training under this section must be substantially based
on labor market and employment information developed by local workforce
development councils, in cooperation with the employment security
department and its labor market information division, under subsection
(10) of this section;
(B) That is likely to enhance the individual's marketable skills
and earning power; and
(C) That meets the criteria for performance developed by the
workforce training and education coordinating board for the purpose of
determining those training programs eligible for funding under Title I
of P.L. 105-220.
"Training program" does not include any course of education
primarily intended to meet the requirements of a baccalaureate or
higher degree, unless the training meets specific requirements for
certification, licensing, or for specific skills necessary for the
occupation.
(5) Benefits shall be paid as follows:
(a)(i) Except as provided in (a)(iii) of this subsection, for
exhaustees who are eligible under subsection (1) of this section, the
total training benefit amount shall be fifty-two times the individual's
weekly benefit amount, reduced by the total amount of regular benefits
and extended benefits paid, or deemed paid, with respect to the benefit
year; or
(ii) For exhaustees who are eligible under subsection (2) of this
section, for claims filed before June 30, 2002, the total training
benefit amount shall be seventy-four times the individual's weekly
benefit amount, reduced by the total amount of regular benefits and
extended benefits paid, or deemed paid, with respect to the benefit
year; or
(iii) For exhaustees eligible under subsection (1) of this section
from industries listed under subsection (2)(a) of this section, for
claims filed on or after June 30, 2002, but before January 5, 2003, the
total training benefit amount shall be seventy-four times the
individual's weekly benefit amount, reduced by the total amount of
regular benefits and extended benefits paid, or deemed paid, with
respect to the benefit year.
(b) The weekly benefit amount shall be the same as the regular
weekly amount payable during the applicable benefit year and shall be
paid under the same terms and conditions as regular benefits. The
training benefits shall be paid before any extended benefits but not
before any similar federally funded program.
(c) Training benefits are not payable for weeks more than two years
beyond the end of the benefit year of the regular claim.
(6) The requirement under RCW 50.22.010(10) relating to exhausting
regular benefits does not apply to an individual otherwise eligible for
training benefits under this section when the individual's benefit year
ends before his or her training benefits are exhausted and the
individual is eligible for a new benefit year. These individuals will
have the option of remaining on the original claim or filing a new
claim.
(7)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, individuals
who receive training benefits under this section or under any previous
additional benefits program for training are not eligible for training
benefits under this section for five years from the last receipt of
training benefits under this section or under any previous additional
benefits program for training.
(b) With respect to claims that are filed before January 5, 2003,
an individual in the aerospace industry assigned the standard
industrial code "372" or the North American industry classification
system code "336411" who received training benefits under this section,
and who had been making satisfactory progress in a training program but
did not complete the program, is eligible, without regard to the five-year limitation of this section and without regard to the requirement
of subsection (1)(b) of this section, if applicable, to receive
training benefits under this section in order to complete that training
program. The total training benefit amount that applies to the
individual is seventy-four times the individual's weekly benefit
amount, reduced by the total amount of regular benefits paid, or deemed
paid, with respect to the benefit year in which the training program
resumed and, if applicable, reduced by the amount of training benefits
paid, or deemed paid, with respect to the benefit year in which the
training program commenced.
(8) An individual eligible to receive a trade readjustment
allowance under chapter 2 of Title II of the Trade Act of 1974, as
amended, shall not be eligible to receive benefits under this section
for each week the individual receives such trade readjustment
allowance. An individual eligible to receive emergency unemployment
compensation, so called, under any federal law, shall not be eligible
to receive benefits under this section for each week the individual
receives such compensation.
(9) All base year employers are interested parties to the approval
of training and the granting of training benefits.
(10) By July 1, 2001, each local workforce development council, in
cooperation with the employment security department and its labor
market information division, must identify occupations and skill sets
that are declining and occupations and skill sets that are in high
demand. For the purposes of RCW 50.22.130 through 50.22.150 and
section 9, chapter 2, Laws of 2000, "high demand" means demand for
employment that exceeds the supply of qualified workers for occupations
or skill sets in a labor market area. Local workforce development
councils must use state and locally developed labor market information.
Thereafter, each local workforce development council shall update this
information annually or more frequently if needed.
(11) The commissioner shall adopt rules as necessary to implement
this section.

PART II - FINANCING
Sec. 8 RCW 50.29.021 and 2008 c 323 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This section applies to benefits charged to the experience
rating accounts of employers for claims that have an effective date on
or after January 4, 2004.
(2)(a) An experience rating account shall be established and
maintained for each employer, except employers as described in RCW
50.44.010, 50.44.030, and 50.50.030 who have properly elected to make
payments in lieu of contributions, taxable local government employers
as described in RCW 50.44.035, and those employers who are required to
make payments in lieu of contributions, based on existing records of
the employment security department.
(b) Benefits paid to an eligible individual shall be charged to the
experience rating accounts of each of such individual's employers
during the individual's base year in the same ratio that the wages paid
by each employer to the individual during the base year bear to the
wages paid by all employers to that individual during that base year,
except as otherwise provided in this section.
(c) When the eligible individual's separating employer is a covered
contribution paying base year employer, benefits paid to the eligible
individual shall be charged to the experience rating account of only
the individual's separating employer if the individual qualifies for
benefits under:
(i) RCW 50.20.050(2)(b)(i), as applicable, and became unemployed
after having worked and earned wages in the bona fide work; or
(ii) RCW 50.20.050(2)(b) (v) through (x).
(3) The legislature finds that certain benefit payments, in whole
or in part, should not be charged to the experience rating accounts of
employers except those employers described in RCW 50.44.010, 50.44.030,
and 50.50.030 who have properly elected to make payments in lieu of
contributions, taxable local government employers described in RCW
50.44.035, and those employers who are required to make payments in
lieu of contributions, as follows:
(a) Benefits paid to any individual later determined to be
ineligible shall not be charged to the experience rating account of any
contribution paying employer. However, when a benefit claim becomes
invalid due to an amendment or adjustment of a report where the
employer failed to report or inaccurately reported hours worked or
remuneration paid, or both, all benefits paid will be charged to the
experience rating account of the contribution paying employer or
employers that originally filed the incomplete or inaccurate report or
reports. An employer who reimburses the trust fund for benefits paid
to workers and who fails to report or inaccurately reported hours
worked or remuneration paid, or both, shall reimburse the trust fund
for all benefits paid that are based on the originally filed incomplete
or inaccurate report or reports.
(b) Benefits paid to an individual filing under the provisions of
chapter 50.06 RCW shall not be charged to the experience rating account
of any contribution paying employer only if:
(i) The individual files under RCW 50.06.020(1) after receiving
crime victims' compensation for a disability resulting from a nonwork-related occurrence; or
(ii) The individual files under RCW 50.06.020(2).
(c) Benefits paid which represent the state's share of benefits
payable as extended benefits defined under RCW 50.22.010(6) shall not
be charged to the experience rating account of any contribution paying
employer.
(d) In the case of individuals who requalify for benefits under RCW
50.20.050 or 50.20.060, benefits based on wage credits earned prior to
the disqualifying separation shall not be charged to the experience
rating account of the contribution paying employer from whom that
separation took place.
(e) Benefits paid to an individual who qualifies for benefits under
RCW 50.20.050(2)(b) (iv) or (xi), as applicable, shall not be charged
to the experience rating account of any contribution paying employer.
(f) With respect to claims with an effective date on or after the
first Sunday following April 22, 2005, benefits paid that exceed the
benefits that would have been paid if the weekly benefit amount for the
claim had been determined as one percent of the total wages paid in the
individual's base year shall not be charged to the experience rating
account of any contribution paying employer. This subsection does not
apply with respect to the calculation of contribution rates for rate
year 2010 and thereafter.
(4)(a) A contribution paying base year employer, not otherwise
eligible for relief of charges for benefits under this section, may
receive such relief if the benefit charges result from payment to an
individual who:
(i) Last left the employ of such employer voluntarily for reasons
not attributable to the employer;
(ii) Was discharged for misconduct or gross misconduct connected
with his or her work not a result of inability to meet the minimum job
requirements;
(iii) Is unemployed as a result of closure or severe curtailment of
operation at the employer's plant, building, worksite, or other
facility. This closure must be for reasons directly attributable to a
catastrophic occurrence such as fire, flood, or other natural disaster;
or
(iv) Continues to be employed on a regularly scheduled permanent
part-time basis by a base year employer and who at some time during the
base year was concurrently employed and subsequently separated from at
least one other base year employer. Benefit charge relief ceases when
the employment relationship between the employer requesting relief and
the claimant is terminated. This subsection does not apply to shared
work employers under chapter 50.06 RCW.
(b) The employer requesting relief of charges under this subsection
must request relief in writing within thirty days following mailing to
the last known address of the notification of the valid initial
determination of such claim, stating the date and reason for the
separation or the circumstances of continued employment. The
commissioner, upon investigation of the request, shall determine
whether relief should be granted.

Sec. 9 RCW 50.29.025 and 2007 c 51 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
the contribution rate for each employer subject to contributions under
RCW 50.24.010 shall be determined under this subsection.
(a) A fund balance ratio shall be determined by dividing the
balance in the unemployment compensation fund as of the September 30th
immediately preceding the rate year by the total remuneration paid by
all employers subject to contributions during the second calendar year
preceding the rate year and reported to the department by the following
March 31st. The division shall be carried to the fourth decimal place
with the remaining fraction, if any, disregarded. The fund balance
ratio shall be expressed as a percentage.
(b) The interval of the fund balance ratio, expressed as a
percentage, shall determine which tax schedule in (e) of this
subsection shall be in effect for assigning tax rates for the rate
year. The intervals for determining the effective tax schedule shall
be:

Interval of the
Fund Balance Ratio
Expressed as a Percentage
Effective
Tax Schedule

2.90 and above AA

2.10 to 2.89 A

1.70 to 2.09 B

1.40 to 1.69 C

1.00 to 1.39 D

0.70 to 0.99 E

Less than 0.70 F

(c) An array shall be prepared, listing all qualified employers in
ascending order of their benefit ratios. The array shall show for each
qualified employer: (i) Identification number; (ii) benefit ratio;
(iii) taxable payrolls for the four calendar quarters immediately
preceding the computation date and reported to the department by the
cut-off date; (iv) a cumulative total of taxable payrolls consisting of
the employer's taxable payroll plus the taxable payrolls of all other
employers preceding him or her in the array; and (v) the percentage
equivalent of the cumulative total of taxable payrolls.
(d) Each employer in the array shall be assigned to one of twenty
rate classes according to the percentage intervals of cumulative
taxable payrolls set forth in (e) of this subsection: PROVIDED, That
if an employer's taxable payroll falls within two or more rate classes,
the employer and any other employer with the same benefit ratio shall
be assigned to the lowest rate class which includes any portion of the
employer's taxable payroll.
(e) Except as provided in RCW 50.29.026, the contribution rate for
each employer in the array shall be the rate specified in the following
tables for the rate class to which he or she has been assigned, as
determined under (d) of this subsection, within the tax schedule which
is to be in effect during the rate year:

Percent of
Cumulative
Taxable Payrolls
Schedules of Contributions Rates
for Effective Tax Schedule

From
To
Rate
Class
AA
A
B
C
D
E
F

0.00 5.00 1 0.47 0.47 0.57 0.97 1.47 1.87 2.47

5.01 10.00 2 0.47 0.47 0.77 1.17 1.67 2.07 2.67

10.01 15.00 3 0.57 0.57 0.97 1.37 1.77 2.27 2.87

15.01 20.00 4 0.57 0.73 1.11 1.51 1.90 2.40 2.98

20.01 25.00 5 0.72 0.92 1.30 1.70 2.09 2.59 3.08

25.01 30.00 6 0.91 1.11 1.49 1.89 2.29 2.69 3.18

30.01 35.00 7 1.00 1.29 1.69 2.08 2.48 2.88 3.27

35.01 40.00 8 1.19 1.48 1.88 2.27 2.67 3.07 3.47

40.01 45.00 9 1.37 1.67 2.07 2.47 2.87 3.27 3.66

45.01 50.00 10 1.56 1.86 2.26 2.66 3.06 3.46 3.86

50.01 55.00 11 1.84 2.14 2.45 2.85 3.25 3.66 3.95

55.01 60.00 12 2.03 2.33 2.64 3.04 3.44 3.85 4.15

60.01 65.00 13 2.22 2.52 2.83 3.23 3.64 4.04 4.34

65.01 70.00 14 2.40 2.71 3.02 3.43 3.83 4.24 4.54

70.01 75.00 15 2.68 2.90 3.21 3.62 4.02 4.43 4.63

75.01 80.00 16 2.87 3.09 3.42 3.81 4.22 4.53 4.73

80.01 85.00 17 3.27 3.47 3.77 4.17 4.57 4.87 4.97

85.01 90.00 18 3.67 3.87 4.17 4.57 4.87 4.97 5.17

90.01 95.00 19 4.07 4.27 4.57 4.97 5.07 5.17 5.37

95.01 100.00 20 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40

(f) The contribution rate for each employer not qualified to be in
the array shall be as follows:
(i) Employers who do not meet the definition of "qualified
employer" by reason of failure to pay contributions when due shall be
assigned a contribution rate two-tenths higher than that in rate class
20 for the applicable rate year, except employers who have an approved
agency-deferred payment contract by September 30 of the previous rate
year. If any employer with an approved agency-deferred payment
contract fails to make any one of the succeeding deferred payments or
fails to submit any succeeding tax report and payment in a timely
manner, the employer's tax rate shall immediately revert to a
contribution rate two-tenths higher than that in rate class 20 for the
applicable rate year; and
(ii) For all other employers not qualified to be in the array, the
contribution rate shall be a rate equal to the average industry rate as
determined by the commissioner; however, the rate may not be less than
one percent.
(2) ((Beginning with)) For contributions assessed for rate years
2005 through 2009, the contribution rate for each employer subject to
contributions under RCW 50.24.010 shall be the sum of the array
calculation factor rate and the graduated social cost factor rate
determined under this subsection, and the solvency surcharge determined
under RCW 50.29.041, if any.
(a) The array calculation factor rate shall be determined as
follows:
(i) An array shall be prepared, listing all qualified employers in
ascending order of their benefit ratios. The array shall show for each
qualified employer: (A) Identification number; (B) benefit ratio; and
(C) taxable payrolls for the four consecutive calendar quarters
immediately preceding the computation date and reported to the
employment security department by the cut-off date.
(ii) Each employer in the array shall be assigned to one of forty
rate classes according to his or her benefit ratio as follows, and,
except as provided in RCW 50.29.026, the array calculation factor rate
for each employer in the array shall be the rate specified in the rate
class to which the employer has been assigned:

Benefit Ratio Rate
Class Rate
(percent)

At least Less than

0.000001 1 0.00

0.000001 0.001250 2 0.13

0.001250 0.002500 3 0.25

0.002500 0.003750 4 0.38

0.003750 0.005000 5 0.50

0.005000 0.006250 6 0.63

0.006250 0.007500 7 0.75

0.007500 0.008750 8 0.88

0.008750 0.010000 9 1.00

0.010000 0.011250 10 1.15

0.011250 0.012500 11 1.30

0.012500 0.013750 12 1.45

0.013750 0.015000 13 1.60

0.015000 0.016250 14 1.75

0.016250 0.017500 15 1.90

0.017500 0.018750 16 2.05

0.018750 0.020000 17 2.20

0.020000 0.021250 18 2.35

0.021250 0.022500 19 2.50

0.022500 0.023750 20 2.65

0.023750 0.025000 21 2.80

0.025000 0.026250 22 2.95

0.026250 0.027500 23 3.10

0.027500 0.028750 24 3.25

0.028750 0.030000 25 3.40

0.030000 0.031250 26 3.55

0.031250 0.032500 27 3.70

0.032500 0.033750 28 3.85

0.033750 0.035000 29 4.00

0.035000 0.036250 30 4.15

0.036250 0.037500 31 4.30

0.037500 0.040000 32 4.45

0.040000 0.042500 33 4.60

0.042500 0.045000 34 4.75

0.045000 0.047500 35 4.90

0.047500 0.050000 36 5.05

0.050000 0.052500 37 5.20

0.052500 0.055000 38 5.30

0.055000 0.057500 39 5.35

0.057500 40 5.40

(b) The graduated social cost factor rate shall be determined as
follows:
(i)(A) Except as provided in (b)(i)(B) and (C) of this subsection,
the commissioner shall calculate the flat social cost factor for a rate
year by dividing the total social cost by the total taxable payroll.
The division shall be carried to the second decimal place with the
remaining fraction disregarded unless it amounts to five hundredths or
more, in which case the second decimal place shall be rounded to the
next higher digit. The flat social cost factor shall be expressed as
a percentage.
(B) If, on the cut-off date, the balance in the unemployment
compensation fund is determined by the commissioner to be an amount
that will provide more than ten months of unemployment benefits, the
commissioner shall calculate the flat social cost factor for the rate
year immediately following the cut-off date by reducing the total
social cost by the dollar amount that represents the number of months
for which the balance in the unemployment compensation fund on the cut-off date will provide benefits above ten months and dividing the result
by the total taxable payroll. However, the calculation under this
subsection (2)(b)(i)(B) for a rate year may not result in a flat social
cost factor that is more than four-tenths lower than the calculation
under (b)(i)(A) of this subsection for that rate year.
For the purposes of this subsection, the commissioner shall
determine the number of months of unemployment benefits in the
unemployment compensation fund using the benefit cost rate for the
average of the three highest calendar benefit cost rates in the twenty
consecutive completed calendar years immediately preceding the cut-off
date or a period of consecutive calendar years immediately preceding
the cut-off date that includes three recessions, if longer.
(C) The minimum flat social cost factor calculated under this
subsection (2)(b) shall be six-tenths of one percent, except that if
the balance in the unemployment compensation fund is determined by the
commissioner to be an amount that will provide:
(I) At least twelve months but less than fourteen months of
unemployment benefits, the minimum shall be five-tenths of one percent;
or
(II) At least fourteen months of unemployment benefits, the minimum
shall be five-tenths of one percent, except that, for employers in rate
class 1, the minimum shall be forty-five hundredths of one percent.
(ii)(A) Except as provided in (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection, the
graduated social cost factor rate for each employer in the array is the
flat social cost factor multiplied by the percentage specified as
follows for the rate class to which the employer has been assigned in
(a)(ii) of this subsection, except that the sum of an employer's array
calculation factor rate and the graduated social cost factor rate may
not exceed six and five-tenths percent or, for employers whose North
American industry classification system code is within "111," "112,"
"1141," "115," "3114," "3117," "42448," or "49312," may not exceed six
percent through rate year 2007 and may not exceed five and seven-tenths
percent for rate year 2008 and thereafter:
(I) Rate class 1 - 78 percent;
(II) Rate class 2 - 82 percent;
(III) Rate class 3 - 86 percent;
(IV) Rate class 4 - 90 percent;
(V) Rate class 5 - 94 percent;
(VI) Rate class 6 - 98 percent;
(VII) Rate class 7 - 102 percent;
(VIII) Rate class 8 - 106 percent;
(IX) Rate class 9 - 110 percent;
(X) Rate class 10 - 114 percent;
(XI) Rate class 11 - 118 percent; and
(XII) Rate classes 12 through 40 - 120 percent.
(B) For contributions assessed beginning July 1, 2005, through
December 31, 2007, for employers whose North American industry
classification system code is "111," "112," "1141," "115," "3114,"
"3117," "42448," or "49312," the graduated social cost factor rate is
zero.
(iii) For the purposes of this section:
(A) "Total social cost" means the amount calculated by subtracting
the array calculation factor contributions paid by all employers with
respect to the four consecutive calendar quarters immediately preceding
the computation date and paid to the employment security department by
the cut-off date from the total unemployment benefits paid to claimants
in the same four consecutive calendar quarters. To calculate the flat
social cost factor for rate year 2005, the commissioner shall calculate
the total social cost using the array calculation factor contributions
that would have been required to be paid by all employers in the
calculation period if (a) of this subsection had been in effect for the
relevant period.
(B) "Total taxable payroll" means the total amount of wages subject
to tax, as determined under RCW 50.24.010, for all employers in the
four consecutive calendar quarters immediately preceding the
computation date and reported to the employment security department by
the cut-off date.
(c) For employers who do not meet the definition of "qualified
employer" by reason of failure to pay contributions when due:
(i) The array calculation factor rate shall be two-tenths higher
than that in rate class 40, except employers who have an approved
agency-deferred payment contract by September 30th of the previous rate
year. If any employer with an approved agency-deferred payment
contract fails to make any one of the succeeding deferred payments or
fails to submit any succeeding tax report and payment in a timely
manner, the employer's tax rate shall immediately revert to an array
calculation factor rate two-tenths higher than that in rate class 40;
and
(ii) The social cost factor rate shall be the social cost factor
rate assigned to rate class 40 under (b)(ii) of this subsection.
(d) For all other employers not qualified to be in the array:
(i) For rate years 2005, 2006, and 2007:
(A) The array calculation factor rate shall be a rate equal to the
average industry array calculation factor rate as determined by the
commissioner, plus fifteen percent of that amount; however, the rate
may not be less than one percent or more than the array calculation
factor rate in rate class 40; and
(B) The social cost factor rate shall be a rate equal to the
average industry social cost factor rate as determined by the
commissioner, plus fifteen percent of that amount, but not more than
the social cost factor rate assigned to rate class 40 under (b)(ii) of
this subsection.
(ii) Beginning with contributions assessed for rate year 2008:
(A) The array calculation factor rate shall be a rate equal to the
average industry array calculation factor rate as determined by the
commissioner, multiplied by the history factor, but not less than one
percent or more than the array calculation factor rate in rate class
40;
(B) The social cost factor rate shall be a rate equal to the
average industry social cost factor rate as determined by the
commissioner, multiplied by the history factor, but not more than the
social cost factor rate assigned to rate class 40 under (b)(ii) of this
subsection; and
(C) The history factor shall be based on the total amounts of
benefits charged and contributions paid in the three fiscal years
ending prior to the computation date by employers not qualified to be
in the array, other than employers in (c) of this subsection, who were
first subject to contributions in the calendar year ending three years
prior to the computation date. The commissioner shall calculate the
history ratio by dividing the total amount of benefits charged by the
total amount of contributions paid in this three-year period by these
employers. The division shall be carried to the second decimal place
with the remaining fraction disregarded unless it amounts to five
one-hundredths or more, in which case the second decimal place shall be
rounded to the next higher digit. The commissioner shall determine the
history factor according to the history ratio as follows:

History
Ratio History
Factor
(percent)

At least Less than

(I) .95 90

(II) .95 1.05 100

(III) 1.05 115

(3) For contributions assessed for rate year 2010 and thereafter,
the contribution rate for each employer subject to contributions under
RCW 50.24.010 shall be the sum of the array calculation factor rate and
the solvency surcharge determined under RCW 50.29.041, if any.
(a) The array calculation factor rate shall be determined as
follows:
(i) An array shall be prepared, listing all qualified employers in
ascending order of their benefit ratios. The array shall show for each
qualified employer: (A) Identification number; (B) benefit ratio; and
(C) taxable payrolls for the four consecutive calendar quarters
immediately preceding the computation date and reported to the
employment security department by the cut-off date.
(ii) Each employer in the array shall be assigned to one of forty
rate classes according to his or her benefit ratio as follows, and,
except as provided in RCW 50.29.026, the array calculation factor rate
for each employer in the array shall be the rate specified in the rate
class to which the employer has been assigned:

Benefit Ratio Rate
Class Rate
(percent)

At least Less than

0.000001 1 0.00

0.000001 0.001250 2 0.09

0.001250 0.002500 3 0.18

0.002500 0.003750 4 0.28

0.003750 0.005000 5 0.37

0.005000 0.006250 6 0.46

0.006250 0.007500 7 0.55

0.007500 0.008750 8 0.64

0.008750 0.010000 9 0.74

0.010000 0.011250 10 0.83

0.011250 0.012500 11 0.92

0.012500 0.013750 12 1.01

0.013750 0.015000 13 1.11

0.015000 0.016250 14 1.20

0.016250 0.017500 15 1.29

0.017500 0.018750 16 1.38

0.018750 0.020000 17 1.47

0.020000 0.021250 18 1.57

0.021250 0.022500 19 1.66

0.022500 0.023750 20 1.75

0.023750 0.025000 21 1.84

0.025000 0.026250 22 1.93

0.026250 0.027500 23 2.03

0.027500 0.028750 24 2.12

0.028750 0.030000 25 2.21

0.030000 0.031250 26 2.30

0.031250 0.032500 27 2.39

0.032500 0.033750 28 2.49

0.033750 0.035000 29 2.58

0.035000 0.036250 30 2.67

0.036250 0.037500 31 2.76

0.037500 0.040000 32 2.86

0.040000 0.042500 33 2.95

0.042500 0.045000 34 3.04

0.045000 0.047500 35 3.13

0.047500 0.050000 36 3.22

0.050000 0.052500 37 3.32

0.052500 0.055000 38 3.41

0.055000 0.057500 39 3.50

0.057500 40 5.40

(iii) Each employer may deduct from the pay of each individual ten
percent of the amount of contributions that may be attributed to that
individual's employment.
(b) On the fifteenth day of the first month of each calendar
quarter, an amount equaling twenty-five percent of the total social
cost shall be transferred from the general fund into the unemployment
compensation fund. The maximum amount of the total social cost
transfer in any rate year shall be two and five-tenths percent of the
taxable wage base. Before January 1, 2011, adjustments to the maximum
amount of the total social cost transfer are prohibited, except as
specifically authorized upon the affirmative vote of sixty percent of
the members of each house of the legislature. For the purposes of this
section, "total social cost" means the amount calculated by subtracting
the array calculation factor contributions paid by all employers with
respect to the four consecutive calendar quarters immediately preceding
the computation date and paid to the employment security department by
the cut-off date from the total unemployment benefits paid to claimants
in the same four consecutive calendar quarters.
(c) For employers who do not meet the definition of "qualified
employer" by reason of failure to pay contributions when due, the array
calculation factor rate shall be two-tenths higher than that in rate
class 40, except employers who have an approved agency-deferred payment
contract by September 30th of the previous rate year. If any employer
with an approved agency-deferred payment contract fails to make any one
of the succeeding deferred payments or fails to submit any succeeding
tax report and payment in a timely manner, the employer's tax rate
shall immediately revert to an array calculation factor rate two-tenths
higher than that in rate class 40.
(d) For all other employers not qualified to be in the array, the
contribution rate shall be the contribution rate specified in this
subsection, but not less than one percent:
(i) In the first two consecutive rate years in which an employer is
not qualified, the array calculation factor rate shall be a rate equal
to fifty percent of the average industry array calculation factor rate
as determined by the commissioner; and
(ii) In the second two consecutive rate years in which an employer
is not qualified, the array calculation factor rate shall be a rate
equal to seventy-five percent of the average industry array calculation
factor rate as determined by the commissioner.
(4) Assignment of employers by the commissioner to industrial
classification, for purposes of this section, shall be in accordance
with established classification practices found ((in the "Standard
Industrial Classification Manual" issued by the federal office of
management and budget to the third digit provided in the standard
industrial classification code, or)) in the North American industry
classification system code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for eighty-five percent of contributions paid under chapter
50.24 RCW for the prior rate year.
(2) Credit under this section may be claimed against taxes due
under this chapter for any tax reporting period by the person claiming
credit under this section. The credit may not exceed the tax otherwise
due under this chapter for the tax reporting period. Unused credit may
be carried over and used in subsequent tax reporting periods. Refunds
shall not be granted for credits under this section.
(3) This section applies to tax reports due on or after January 1,
2011.

Sec. 11 RCW 50.29.062 and 2006 c 47 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 50.29.063, predecessor and successor
employer contribution rates shall be computed in the following manner:
(1) If the successor is an employer, as defined in RCW 50.04.080,
at the time of the transfer of a business, the following applies:
(a) The successor's contribution rate shall remain unchanged for
the remainder of the rate year in which the transfer occurs; and
(b) Beginning January 1st following the transfer, the successor's
contribution rate for each rate year shall be based on a combination of
the following:
(i) The successor's experience with payrolls and benefits; and
(ii) Any experience assigned to the predecessor involved in the
transfer. If only a portion of the business was transferred, then the
experience attributable to the acquired portion is assigned to the
successor.
(2) If the successor is not an employer at the time of the
transfer, the following applies:
(a) For transfers before January 1, 2005:
(i) Except as provided in (ii) of this subsection (2)(a), the
successor shall pay contributions at the lowest rate determined under
either of the following:
(A) The contribution rate of the rate class assigned to the
predecessor employer at the time of the transfer for the remainder of
that rate year. Any experience relating to the assignment of that rate
class attributable to the predecessor is transferred to the successor.
Beginning with the January 1st following the transfer, the successor's
contribution rate shall be based on a combination of the transferred
experience of the acquired business and the successor's experience
after the transfer; or
(B) The contribution rate equal to the average industry rate as
determined by the commissioner, but not less than one percent, and
continuing until the successor qualifies for a different rate in its
own right. Assignment of employers by the commissioner to industrial
classification, for purposes of this subsection, must be in accordance
with established classification practices found in the North American
industry classification system issued by the federal office of
management and budget to the fourth digit provided in the North
American industry classification system.
(ii) If the successor simultaneously acquires the business or a
portion of the business of two or more employers in different rate
classes, its rate from the date the transfer occurred until the end of
that rate year and until it qualifies in its own right for a new
rate((,)) shall be the rate of the highest rate class applicable at the
time of the acquisition to any predecessor employer who is a party to
the acquisition, but not less than one percent.
(b) For transfers on or after January 1, 2005:
(i) Except as provided in (ii) and (iii) of this subsection (2)(b),
the successor shall pay contributions:
(A) At the contribution rate assigned to the predecessor employer
at the time of the transfer and not the new employer rate for the
remainder of that rate year, so long as the successor retains at least
sixty percent of the predecessor's employees. Any experience
attributable to the predecessor relating to the assignment of the
predecessor's rate class is transferred to the successor.
(B) Beginning January 1st following the transfer, the successor's
contribution rate for each rate year shall be based on an array
calculation factor rate that is a combination of the following: The
successor's experience with payrolls and benefits; and any experience
assigned to the predecessor involved in the transfer. If only a
portion of the business was transferred, then the experience
attributable to the acquired portion is assigned to the successor if
qualified under RCW 50.29.010(6) by including the transferred
experience. If not qualified under RCW 50.29.010(6), the contribution
rate shall equal the sum of the rates determined by the commissioner
under RCW 50.29.025(2) (((c)(ii) and (d)(ii))) (d)(i), and 50.29.041,
if applicable, and continuing until the successor qualifies for a
different rate, including the transferred experience.
(ii) If there is a substantial continuity of ownership, control, or
management by the successor of the business of the predecessor, the
successor shall pay contributions at the contribution rate determined
for the predecessor employer at the time of the transfer for the
remainder of that rate year. Any experience attributable to the
predecessor relating to the assignment of the predecessor's rate class
is transferred to the successor. Beginning January 1st following the
transfer, the successor's array calculation factor rate shall be based
on a combination of the transferred experience of the acquired business
and the successor's experience after the transfer.
(iii) If the successor simultaneously acquires the business or a
portion of the business of two or more employers with different
contribution rates, the successor's rate from the date the transfer
occurred until the end of that rate year and until it qualifies in its
own right for a new rate, shall be the sum of the rates determined by
the commissioner under RCW 50.29.025(2) (a) and (b), and 50.29.041,
applicable at the time of the acquisition, to the predecessor employer
who, among the parties to the acquisition, had the largest total
payroll in the completed calendar quarter immediately preceding the
date of transfer, but not less than the sum of the rates determined by
the commissioner under RCW 50.29.025(2) (((c)(ii) and (d)(ii))) (d)(i),
and 50.29.041, if applicable.
(3) With respect to predecessor employers:
(a) The contribution rate on any payroll retained by a predecessor
employer shall remain unchanged for the remainder of the rate year in
which the transfer occurs.
(b) In all cases, beginning January 1st following the transfer, the
predecessor's contribution rate or the predecessor's array calculation
factor for each rate year shall be based on its experience with
payrolls and benefits as of the regular computation date for that rate
year excluding the experience of the transferred business or
transferred portion of business as that experience has transferred to
the successor: PROVIDED, That if all of the predecessor's business is
transferred to a successor or successors, the predecessor shall not be
a qualified employer until it satisfies the requirements of a
"qualified employer" as set forth in RCW 50.29.010.
(4) For purposes of this section, "transfer of a business" means
the same as RCW 50.29.063(4)(c).

Sec. 12 RCW 50.16.010 and 2008 c 329 s 915 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There shall be maintained as special funds, separate and apart
from all public moneys or funds of this state an unemployment
compensation fund, an administrative contingency fund, and a federal
interest payment fund, which shall be administered by the commissioner
exclusively for the purposes of this title, and to which RCW 43.01.050
shall not be applicable.
(2)(a) The unemployment compensation fund shall consist of:
(i) All contributions collected under RCW 50.24.010 and payments in
lieu of contributions collected pursuant to the provisions of this
title;
(ii) All amounts transferred from the general fund to the account
pursuant to RCW 50.29.025;
(iii) Any property or securities acquired through the use of moneys
belonging to the fund;
(((iii))) (iv) All earnings of such property or securities;
(((iv))) (v) Any moneys received from the federal unemployment
account in the unemployment trust fund in accordance with Title XII of
the social security act, as amended;
(((v))) (vi) All money recovered on official bonds for losses
sustained by the fund;
(((vi))) (vii) All money credited to this state's account in the
unemployment trust fund pursuant to section 903 of the social security
act, as amended;
(((vii))) (viii) All money received from the federal government as
reimbursement pursuant to section 204 of the federal-state extended
compensation act of 1970 (84 Stat. 708-712; 26 U.S.C. Sec. 3304); and
(((viii))) (ix) All moneys received for the fund from any other
source.
(b) All moneys in the unemployment compensation fund shall be
commingled and undivided.
(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the
administrative contingency fund shall consist of:
(i) All interest on delinquent contributions collected pursuant to
this title;
(ii) All fines and penalties collected pursuant to the provisions
of this title;
(iii) All sums recovered on official bonds for losses sustained by
the fund; and
(iv) Revenue received under RCW 50.24.014.
(b) All fees, fines, forfeitures, and penalties collected or
assessed by a district court because of the violation of this title or
rules adopted under this title shall be remitted as provided in chapter
3.62 RCW.
(c) During the 2007-2009 biennium, moneys available in the
administrative contingency fund, other than money in the special
account created under RCW 50.24.014(1)(a), shall be expended as
appropriated by the legislature for the (i) cost of the job skills
program at the community and technical colleges, and (ii) reemployment
services such as business and project development assistance, local
economic development capacity building, and local economic development
financial assistance at the department of community, trade, and
economic development, and the remaining appropriation upon the
direction of the commissioner, with the approval of the governor,
whenever it appears to him or her that such expenditure is necessary
solely for:
(i) The proper administration of this title and that insufficient
federal funds are available for the specific purpose to which such
expenditure is to be made, provided, the moneys are not substituted for
appropriations from federal funds which, in the absence of such moneys,
would be made available.
(ii) The proper administration of this title for which purpose
appropriations from federal funds have been requested but not yet
received, provided, the administrative contingency fund will be
reimbursed upon receipt of the requested federal appropriation.
(iii) The proper administration of this title for which compliance
and audit issues have been identified that establish federal claims
requiring the expenditure of state resources in resolution. Claims
must be resolved in the following priority: First priority is to
provide services to eligible participants within the state; second
priority is to provide substitute services or program support; and last
priority is the direct payment of funds to the federal government.
Money in the special account created under RCW 50.24.014(1)(a) may
only be expended, after appropriation, for the purposes specified in
this section and RCW 50.62.010, 50.62.020, 50.62.030, 50.24.014,
50.44.053, and 50.22.010.

PART III - RENT SUBSIDIES AND MORTGAGE ASSISTANCE
Sec. 13 RCW 43.185.050 and 2006 c 371 s 236 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall use moneys from the housing trust fund and
other legislative appropriations to finance in whole or in part any
loans or grant projects that will provide housing for persons and
families with special housing needs and with incomes at or below fifty
percent of the median family income for the county or standard
metropolitan statistical area where the project is located. At least
thirty percent of these moneys used in any given funding cycle shall be
for the benefit of projects located in rural areas of the state as
defined by the department. If the department determines that it has
not received an adequate number of suitable applications for rural
projects during any given funding cycle, the department may allocate
unused moneys for projects in nonrural areas of the state.
(2) Activities eligible for assistance from the housing trust fund
and other legislative appropriations include, but are not limited to:
(a) New construction, rehabilitation, or acquisition of low and
very low-income housing units;
(b) Rent subsidies, including rent subsidy programs that give
preference to individuals receiving unemployment benefits under Title
50 RCW, who earned wages in employment in not less than one thousand
three hundred hours of each of the past three calendar years, and whose
income is less than two hundred percent of the federal poverty level as
adjusted for family size and determined annually by the federal
department of health and human services;
(c) Matching funds for social services directly related to
providing housing for special-need tenants in assisted projects;
(d) Technical assistance, design and finance services and
consultation, and administrative costs for eligible nonprofit community
or neighborhood-based organizations;
(e) Administrative costs for housing assistance groups or
organizations when such grant or loan will substantially increase the
recipient's access to housing funds other than those available under
this chapter;
(f) Shelters and related services for the homeless, including
emergency shelters and overnight youth shelters;
(g) Mortgage subsidies, including temporary rental and mortgage
payment subsidies to prevent homelessness, and mortgage subsidy
programs that give preference to individuals receiving unemployment
benefits under Title 50 RCW, who earned wages in employment in not less
than one thousand three hundred hours of each of the past three
calendar years, and whose income is less than two hundred percent of
the federal poverty level as adjusted for family size and determined
annually by the federal department of health and human services;
(h) Mortgage insurance guarantee or payments for eligible projects;
(i) Down payment or closing cost assistance for eligible first-time
home buyers;
(j) Acquisition of housing units for the purpose of preservation as
low-income or very low-income housing;
(k) Projects making housing more accessible to families with
members who have disabilities; and
(l) During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, a manufactured/mobile
home landlord-tenant ombudsman conflict resolution and park
registration program.
(3) During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, revenues generated under
RCW 36.22.178 may be used for the development of affordable housing
projects and other activities funded in section 108, chapter 371, Laws
of 2006.
(4) Legislative appropriations from capital bond proceeds may be
used only for the costs of projects authorized under subsection (2)(a),
(i), and (j) of this section, and not for the administrative costs of
the department.
(5) Moneys from repayment of loans from appropriations from capital
bond proceeds may be used for all activities necessary for the proper
functioning of the housing assistance program except for activities
authorized under subsection (2)(b) and (c) of this section.
(6) Administrative costs of the department shall not exceed five
percent of the annual funds available for the housing assistance
program.

Sec. 14 RCW 43.185A.030 and 2005 c 518 s 1803 and 2005 c 219 s 3
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Using moneys specifically appropriated for such purpose, the
department shall finance in whole or in part projects that will provide
housing for low-income households.
(2) Activities eligible for assistance include, but are not limited
to:
(a) New construction, rehabilitation, or acquisition of housing for
low-income households;
(b) Rent subsidies in new construction or rehabilitated multifamily
units, including rent subsidy programs that give preference to
individuals receiving unemployment benefits under Title 50 RCW, who
earned wages in employment in not less than one thousand three hundred
hours of each of the past three calendar years, and whose income is
less than two hundred percent of the federal poverty level as adjusted
for family size and determined annually by the federal department of
health and human services;
(c) Down payment or closing costs assistance for first-time home
buyers;
(d) Mortgage subsidies for new construction or rehabilitation of
eligible multifamily units, including mortgage subsidy programs that
give preference to individuals receiving unemployment benefits under
Title 50 RCW, who earned wages in employment in not less than one
thousand three hundred hours of each of the past three calendar years,
and whose income is less than two hundred percent of the federal
poverty level as adjusted for family size and determined annually by
the federal department of health and human services; and
(e) Mortgage insurance guarantee or payments for eligible projects.
(3) Legislative appropriations from capital bond proceeds may be
used only for the costs of projects authorized under subsection (2)
(a), (c), (d), and (e) of this section, and not for the administrative
costs of the department.
(4) Moneys from repayment of loans from appropriations from capital
bond proceeds may be used for all activities necessary for the proper
functioning of the affordable housing program except for activities
authorized under subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(5) Administrative costs of the department shall not exceed five
percent of the annual funds available for the affordable housing
program.

PART IV - MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act
must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the
receipt of federal funds by the state or the granting of federal
unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 As used in this act, part headings
constitute no part of the law.

--- END ---