BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.21.747 and 1990 c 189 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In transferring real property to a public corporation,
commission, or authority under RCW 35.21.730, the city, town, or county
creating such public corporation, commission, or authority shall impose
appropriate deed restrictions necessary to ensure the continued use of
such property for the public purpose or purposes for which such
property is transferred.
(2) The city, town, or county that creates a public corporation,
commission, or authority under RCW 35.21.730 shall require of such
public corporation, commission, or authority thirty days' advance
written notice of any proposed sale ((or encumbrance)) of any real
property transferred by such city, town, or county to such public
corporation, commission, or authority pursuant to RCW 35.21.730(1). At
a minimum, such notice shall be provided by such public corporation,
commission, or authority to the chief executive or administrative
officer of such city, town, or county, and to all members of its
legislative body, and to each local newspaper of general circulation,
and to each local radio or television station or other news medium
which has on file with such corporation, commission, or authority a
written request to be notified.
(3) Any property transferred by the city, town, or county that
created such public corporation, commission, or authority may be sold
((or encumbered)) by such public corporation, commission, or authority
only after approval of such sale ((or encumbrance)) by the governing
body of the public corporation, commission, or authority at a public
meeting of which notice was provided pursuant to RCW 42.30.080.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the governing
body of the public corporation, commission, or authority from holding
an executive session during a regular or special meeting in accordance
with RCW 42.30.110(1)(c). In addition, the public corporation,
commission, or authority shall advertise notice of the meeting in a
local newspaper of general circulation at least twice no less than
seven days and no more than two weeks before the public meeting.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.21.750 and 1974 ex.s. c 37 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In the event of the insolvency or dissolution of a public
corporation, commission, or authority, the superior court of the county
in which the public corporation, commission, or authority is or was
operating shall have jurisdiction and authority to appoint trustees or
receivers of corporate property and assets and supervise such
trusteeship or receivership: PROVIDED, That all liabilities incurred
by such public corporation, commission, or authority shall be satisfied
exclusively from the assets and properties of such public corporation,
commission, or authority and no creditor or other person shall have any
right of action against the city, town, or county creating such
corporation, commission or authority on account of any debts,
obligations, or liabilities of such public corporation, commission, or
authority.
(2) If the public corporation is authorized to enter into long-term
leases by enabling ordinance or resolution, the city, town, or county
that created the public corporation shall take the place of the public
corporation by assuming any duties, liabilities, or assets of such
leases.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
A public corporation may lease all real and personal property owned
and controlled by it, for such purposes and upon such terms as the
public corporation deems proper.
No lease shall be for a period longer than fifty years with option
for extensions up to an additional thirty years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
Every lease of real and personal property of a public corporation
for a term of more than one year must have the rent secured by rental
insurance, bond, or other security satisfactory to the public
corporation, subject to the following provisions:
(1) Security must be the greater of one year's rent or one-sixth
the total rent, but the amount may not exceed the value of three years'
rent. However, nothing in this section prevents the public corporation
from requiring additional security for supplemental agreements or
leases;
(2) Evidence of the existence of the insurance, bonds, or security
must be on file with the public corporation at all times during the
term of the lease;
(3) If the required security is not maintained throughout the full
term of the lease, the lease must be considered in default. The public
corporation may waive the rent security requirement or lower the amount
of such requirement on the lease of either real or personal property
owned or controlled by the public corporation, or both; and
(4) Any security agreement may provide for termination on the
anniversary date of the agreement on not less than one year's written
notice to the public corporation if the lease is not in default at the
time of notice.

Sec. 5 RCW 35.21.745 and 2002 c 218 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any city, town, or county which shall create a public
corporation, commission, or authority pursuant to RCW 35.21.730 or
35.21.660, shall provide for its organization and operations and shall
control and oversee its operation and funds in order to correct any
deficiency and to assure that the purposes of each program undertaken
are reasonably accomplished.
(2) Any public corporation, commission, or authority created as
provided in RCW 35.21.730 may be empowered to own and sell real and
personal property; to contract with a city, town, or county to conduct
community renewal activities under chapter 35.81 RCW; to contract with
individuals, associations, and corporations, and the state and the
United States; to contract for public works under Title 39 RCW; to sue
and be sued; to loan and borrow funds and issue bonds and other
instruments evidencing indebtedness; transfer any funds, real or
personal property, property interests, or services; to do anything a
natural person may do; and to perform all manner and type of community
services. However, the public corporation, commission, or authority
shall have no power of eminent domain nor any power to levy taxes or
special assessments.

--- END ---