BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.28.030 and 2007 c 218 s 90 are each amended to read
as follows:
A state highway shall be constructed, altered, repaired, or
improved, and improvements located on property acquired for
right-of-way purposes may be repaired or renovated pending the use of
such right-of-way for highway purposes, by contract or state forces.
The work or portions thereof may be done by state forces when the
estimated costs thereof are less than fifty thousand dollars and
effective July 1, 2005, sixty thousand dollars, or less than one
hundred twenty thousand dollars for work performed on ferry vessels or
terminals: PROVIDED, That when delay of performance of such work would
jeopardize a state highway or constitute a danger to the traveling
public, the work may be done by state forces when the estimated cost
thereof is less than eighty thousand dollars and effective July 1,
2005, one hundred thousand dollars. When the department of
transportation determines to do the work by state forces, it shall
enter a statement upon its records to that effect, stating the reasons
therefor. To enable a larger number of small businesses, and minority,
and women contractors to effectively compete for department of
transportation contracts, the department may adopt rules providing for
bids and award of contracts for the performance of work, or furnishing
equipment, materials, supplies, or operating services whenever any work
is to be performed and the engineer's estimate indicates the cost of
the work would not exceed eighty thousand dollars and effective July 1,
2005, one hundred thousand dollars. The rules adopted under this
section:
(1) Shall provide for competitive bids to the extent that
competitive sources are available except when delay of performance
would jeopardize life or property or inconvenience the traveling
public; and
(2) Need not require the furnishing of a bid deposit nor a
performance bond, but if a performance bond is not required then
progress payments to the contractor may be required to be made based on
submittal of paid invoices to substantiate proof that disbursements
have been made to laborers, material suppliers, mechanics, and
subcontractors from the previous partial payment; and
(3) May establish prequalification standards and procedures as an
alternative to those set forth in RCW 47.28.070, but the
prequalification standards and procedures under RCW 47.28.070 shall
always be sufficient.
The department of transportation shall comply with such goals and
rules as may be adopted by the office of minority and women's business
enterprises to implement chapter 39.19 RCW with respect to contracts
entered into under this chapter. The department may adopt such rules
as may be necessary to comply with the rules adopted by the office of
minority and women's business enterprises under chapter 39.19 RCW.

--- END ---