BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.5249 and 1997 c 66 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A person is guilty of negligent driving in the first degree
if he or she operates a motor vehicle in a manner that is both
negligent and endangers or is likely to endanger any person or
property, and exhibits the effects of having consumed liquor or an
illegal drug.
(b) It is an affirmative defense to negligent driving in the first
degree by means of exhibiting the effects of having consumed an illegal
drug that must be proved by the defendant by a preponderance of the
evidence, that the driver has a valid prescription for the drug
consumed, and has been consuming it according to the prescription
directions and warnings.
(c) Negligent driving in the first degree is a misdemeanor.
(d) Upon the second violation of this section, a person must retake
and successfully pass the driver licensing examination in order to keep
his or her driver's license.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Negligent" means the failure to exercise ordinary care, and is
the doing of some act that a reasonably careful person would not do
under the same or similar circumstances or the failure to do something
that a reasonably careful person would do under the same or similar
circumstances.
(b) "Exhibiting the effects of having consumed liquor" means that
a person has the odor of liquor on his or her breath, or that by
speech, manner, appearance, behavior, lack of coordination, or
otherwise exhibits that he or she has consumed liquor, and either:
(i) Is in possession of or in close proximity to a container that
has or recently had liquor in it; or
(ii) Is shown by other evidence to have recently consumed liquor.
(c) "Exhibiting the effects of having consumed an illegal drug"
means that a person by speech, manner, appearance, behavior, lack of
coordination, or otherwise exhibits that he or she has consumed an
illegal drug and either:
(i) Is in possession of an illegal drug; or
(ii) Is shown by other evidence to have recently consumed an
illegal drug.
(d) "Illegal drug" means a controlled substance under chapter 69.50
RCW for which the driver does not have a valid prescription or that is
not being consumed in accordance with the prescription directions and
warnings, or a legend drug under chapter 69.41 RCW for which the driver
does not have a valid prescription or that is not being consumed in
accordance with the prescription directions and warnings.
(3) Any act prohibited by this section that also constitutes a
crime under any other law of this state may be the basis of prosecution
under such other law notwithstanding that it may also be the basis for
prosecution under this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.61.525 and 1997 c 66 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A person is guilty of negligent driving in the second degree
if, under circumstances not constituting negligent driving in the first
degree, he or she operates a motor vehicle in a manner that is both
negligent and endangers or is likely to endanger any person or
property.
(b) It is an affirmative defense to negligent driving in the second
degree that must be proved by the defendant by a preponderance of the
evidence, that the driver was operating the motor vehicle on private
property with the consent of the owner in a manner consistent with the
owner's consent.
(c) Negligent driving in the second degree is a traffic infraction
and is subject to a penalty of two hundred fifty dollars.
(d) Upon the third violation of this section, a person must retake
and successfully pass the driver licensing examination in order to keep
his or her driver's license.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "negligent" means the failure
to exercise ordinary care, and is the doing of some act that a
reasonably careful person would not do under the same or similar
circumstances or the failure to do something that a reasonably careful
person would do under the same or similar circumstances.
(3) Any act prohibited by this section that also constitutes a
crime under any other law of this state may be the basis of prosecution
under such other law notwithstanding that it may also be the basis for
prosecution under this section.

--- END ---