BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.43.030 and 1971 ex.s. c 116 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
This and the following chapters relating to municipal local
improvements shall supersede the provisions of the charter of any city
of the first class.
They shall apply to all incorporated cities and towns, including
unclassified cities and towns operating under special charters.
The council of each city and town shall pass such general ordinance
or ordinances as may be necessary to carry out their provisions and
thereafter all proceedings relating to local improvements shall be
conducted in accordance with this and the following chapters relating
to municipal local improvements and the ordinance or ordinances of such
city or town.
Cities or towns may form local improvement districts or utility
local improvement districts composed entirely or in part of
unincorporated territory outside of such city or town's corporate
limits in the manner provided in this chapter, or, upon approval by
resolution of the legislative authority of an adjoining city or town,
may form local improvement districts or utility local improvement
districts composed entirely or in part of territory within that
adjoining city or town.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.43.035 and 1989 c 84 s 30 are each amended to read
as follows:
The creation of a local improvement district in unincorporated
territory outside of the boundaries of a city or town to provide water
or sewer facilities may be subject to potential review by a boundary
review board under chapter 36.93 RCW.

--- END ---