BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 School districts own and are responsible for
public school buildings. The legislature has provided funding for
assisting school districts with the construction, renovation, and
modernization of school buildings through the school construction
assistance grant program, which requires that school capital projects
receiving state funding assistance be supported in part by a school
district bond issue. It is the intent of the legislature to provide
additional construction funding assistance through grants to school
districts that do not qualify for the existing grant program and have
low property valuation per student in relation to the state average,
and thus low capacity to submit and approve bond levies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.525
RCW to read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to
implement a school construction safety net grant program to assist
school districts that do not meet the existing grant program
requirements under RCW 28A.525.162. The superintendent of public
instruction shall adopt rules for the school construction safety net
grant program according to the following guidelines:
(1) The grant program must be developed, administered, and overseen
by a school construction safety net oversight committee, appointed by
the superintendent of public instruction. Committee membership
includes:
(a) One representative of the office of the superintendent of
public instruction;
(b) Three or more representatives of school districts or
educational service districts with expertise in the financing, design,
and construction of school facilities; and
(c) One representative of the office of financial management.
(2) School construction safety net grants must be awarded by the
school construction safety net oversight committee subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(a) The committee shall consider only projects not eligible for
funding from the state school construction assistance grant program.
In addition, before determining that the project is eligible for a
school construction safety net award, the committee shall confirm that
the school district making the application has aggressively pursued
funding from all other sources for the project before making the
application. The committee shall establish a maximum grant award
amount.
(b) To be eligible for funding, a school district must have an
assessed property value per student less than thirty percent of the
statewide average and must certify that it will match any award for at
least twenty-five percent of the total project cost estimate at the
time of application. This match may take the form of proceeds from a
locally authorized bond, a two-year to six-year capital project levy,
or any other source that is not otherwise obligated or restricted.
(c) The committee may grant an exception to a school district not
eligible for a school construction safety net award as a result of the
local match requirements in (b) of this subsection if the committee
determines that the school district has made a good faith effort to
acquire local matching funds for the project.
(d) For projects meeting the eligibility requirements of (a) or (b)
of this subsection, or the exception criteria in (c) of this
subsection, the committee shall develop criteria for project
eligibility and a method for ranking projects in priority order and
awarding school construction safety net grants. The criteria must be
favorably disposed toward projects that address: (i) Students in
portables; or (ii) significant facility deficiencies affecting student
health and safety or student learning. The criteria must also provide
that all projects awarded funds maximize the effective and efficient
use of local and state public resources.
(e) The first awards from the school construction safety net grant
program must be made no later than March 1, 2011. By September 1,
2010, the superintendent of public instruction shall provide a report
detailing the planned criteria and method for awarding school
construction safety net grants to the office of financial management
and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature. By February
1, 2011, the superintendent of public instruction shall provide a
report detailing the proposed awards for the school construction safety
net grant program to the office of financial management and the
appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
July 1, 2009, in the omnibus capital appropriations act, this act is
null and void.

--- END ---