BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Washington state in an effort to preserve,
protect, and improve the environmental and economic status of the state
must encourage a transportation system that is effective and efficient
in moving people and freight. One of the state's biggest industries is
the importing of petroleum products and exporting fuel by seaport,
motor carrier, and pipelines. The industry provides economic
stability, but also in the movement of exports brings the risk of harm
to Washington's environment, waterways, and roadways. The fuel tax
that is paid by the citizens of Washington should be matched by the
consumers from other states that are using the same refineries and
transportation methods to export the fuel from Washington. This
provides an opportunity for Washington to insure that the environment
and transportation system are protected, as well as provide funding for
identified mega-transportation projects that will keep people and
freight moving throughout the state.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.36.020 and 2007 c 515 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is hereby levied and imposed upon motor vehicle fuel
licensees, other than motor vehicle fuel distributors, a tax at the
rate computed in the manner provided in RCW 82.36.025 on each gallon of
motor vehicle fuel.
(2) The tax imposed by subsection (1) of this section is imposed
when any of the following occurs:
(a) Motor vehicle fuel is removed in this state from a terminal
((if the motor vehicle fuel is removed at the rack)) unless the removal
is to a licensed exporter for direct delivery to a destination outside
of the ((state)) United States;
(b) Motor vehicle fuel is removed in this state from a refinery if
either of the following applies:
(i) The removal is by bulk transfer and the refiner or the owner of
the motor vehicle fuel immediately before the removal is not a
licensee; or
(ii) The removal is at the refinery rack or by bulk transfer unless
the removal is to a licensed exporter for direct delivery to a
destination outside of the ((state)) United States;
(c) Motor vehicle fuel enters into this state if either of the
following applies:
(i) The entry is by bulk transfer and the importer is not a
licensee; or
(ii) The entry is not by bulk transfer;
(d) Motor vehicle fuel is sold or removed in this state to an
unlicensed entity unless there was a prior taxable removal, entry, or
sale of the motor vehicle fuel;
(e) Blended motor vehicle fuel is removed or sold in this state by
the blender of the fuel. The number of gallons of blended motor
vehicle fuel subject to the tax is the difference between the total
number of gallons of blended motor vehicle fuel removed or sold and the
number of gallons of previously taxed motor vehicle fuel used to
produce the blended motor vehicle fuel. Blended motor vehicle fuel
exported from this state to another state is taxed at the fuel tax rate
imposed by this chapter;
(f) Motor vehicle fuel is sold by a licensed motor vehicle fuel
supplier to a motor vehicle fuel distributor, motor vehicle fuel
importer, motor vehicle fuel exporter, motor vehicle fuel blender, or
international fuel tax agreement licensee and the motor vehicle fuel is
not removed from the bulk transfer-terminal system.
(3) The proceeds of the motor vehicle fuel excise tax shall be
distributed as provided in RCW 46.68.090.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.36.060 and 2007 c 515 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An application for a license issued under this chapter shall be
made to the department on forms to be furnished by the department and
shall contain such information as the department deems necessary.
(2) Every application for a license must contain the following
information to the extent it applies to the applicant:
(a) Proof as the department may require concerning the applicant's
identity, including but not limited to his or her fingerprints or those
of the officers of a corporation making the application;
(b) The applicant's form and place of organization including proof
that the individual, partnership, or corporation is licensed to do
business in this state;
(c) The qualification and business history of the applicant and any
partner, officer, or director;
(d) The applicant's financial condition or history including a bank
reference and whether the applicant or any partner, officer, or
director has ever been adjudged bankrupt or has an unsatisfied judgment
in a federal or state court;
(e) Whether the applicant has been adjudged guilty of a crime that
directly relates to the business for which the license is sought and
the time elapsed since the conviction is less than ten years, or has
suffered a judgment within the preceding five years in a civil action
involving fraud, misrepresentation, or conversion and in the case of a
corporation or partnership, all directors, officers, or partners.
(3) An applicant for a license as a motor vehicle fuel importer
must list on the application each state, province, or country from
which the applicant intends to import motor vehicle fuel and, if
required by the state, province, or country listed, must be licensed or
registered for motor vehicle fuel tax purposes in that state, province,
or country.
(4) An applicant for a license as a motor vehicle fuel exporter
must list on the application each state, province, or country to which
the exporter intends to export motor vehicle fuel received in this
state by means of a transfer outside of the bulk transfer-terminal
system and, if required by the state, province, or country listed, must
be licensed or registered for motor vehicle fuel tax purposes in that
state, province, or country.
(5) An applicant for a license as a motor vehicle fuel supplier
must have a federal certificate of registry that is issued under the
internal revenue code and authorizes the applicant to enter into
federal tax-free transactions on motor vehicle fuel in the terminal
transfer system.
(6) After receipt of an application for a license, the director may
conduct an investigation to determine whether the facts set forth are
true. The director shall require a fingerprint record check of the
applicant through the Washington state patrol criminal identification
system and the federal bureau of investigation before issuance of a
license. The results of the background investigation including
criminal history information may be released to authorized department
personnel as the director deems necessary. The department shall charge
a license holder or license applicant a fee of fifty dollars for each
background investigation conducted.
An applicant who makes a false statement of a material fact on the
application may be prosecuted for false swearing as defined by RCW
9A.72.040.
(7) Except as provided by subsection (8) of this section, before
granting any license issued under this chapter, the department shall
require applicant to file with the department, in such form as shall be
prescribed by the department, a corporate surety bond duly executed by
the applicant as principal, payable to the state and conditioned for
faithful performance of all the requirements of this chapter, including
the payment of all taxes, penalties, and other obligations arising out
of this chapter. The total amount of the bond or bonds shall be fixed
by the department and may be increased or reduced by the department at
any time subject to the limitations herein provided. In fixing the
total amount of the bond or bonds, the department shall require a bond
or bonds equivalent in total amount to twice the estimated monthly
excise tax determined in such manner as the department may deem proper.
If at any time the estimated excise tax to become due during the
succeeding month amounts to more than fifty percent of the established
bond, the department shall require additional bonds or securities to
maintain the marginal ratio herein specified or shall demand excise tax
payments to be made weekly or semimonthly to meet the requirements
hereof.
The total amount of the bond or bonds required of any licensee
shall never be less than five thousand dollars nor more than one
hundred thousand dollars.
No recoveries on any bond or the execution of any new bond shall
invalidate any bond and no revocation of any license shall effect the
validity of any bond but the total recoveries under any one bond shall
not exceed the amount of the bond.
In lieu of any such bond or bonds in total amount as herein fixed,
a licensee may deposit with the state treasurer, under such terms and
conditions as the department may prescribe, a like amount of lawful
money of the United States or bonds or other obligations of the United
States, the state, or any county of the state, of an actual market
value not less than the amount so fixed by the department.
Any surety on a bond furnished by a licensee as provided herein
shall be released and discharged from any and all liability to the
state accruing on such bond after the expiration of thirty days from
the date upon which such surety has lodged with the department a
written request to be released and discharged, but this provision shall
not operate to relieve, release, or discharge the surety from any
liability already accrued or which shall accrue before the expiration
of the thirty day period. The department shall promptly, upon
receiving any such request, notify the licensee who furnished the bond;
and unless the licensee, on or before the expiration of the thirty day
period, files a new bond, or makes a deposit in accordance with the
requirements of this section, the department shall forthwith cancel the
license. Whenever a new bond is furnished by a licensee, the
department shall cancel the old bond as soon as the department and the
attorney general are satisfied that all liability under the old bond
has been fully discharged.
The department may require a licensee to give a new or additional
surety bond or to deposit additional securities of the character
specified in this section if, in its opinion, the security of the
surety bond theretofore filed by such licensee, or the market value of
the properties deposited as security by the licensee, shall become
impaired or inadequate; and upon the failure of the licensee to give
such new or additional surety bond or to deposit additional securities
within thirty days after being requested so to do by the department,
the department shall forthwith cancel his or her license.
(8) The department may waive the requirements of subsection (7) of
this section for licensed distributors if, upon determination by the
department, the licensed distributor has sufficient resources, assets,
other financial instruments, or other means, to adequately make
payments on the estimated monthly motor vehicle fuel tax payments,
penalties, and interest arising out of this chapter. The department
shall adopt rules to administer this subsection.
(9) An application for an international fuel tax agreement license
must be made to the department. The application must be filed upon a
form prescribed by the department and contain such information as the
department may require. The department shall charge a fee of ten
dollars per set of international fuel tax agreement decals issued to
each applicant or licensee. The department shall transmit the fee to
the state treasurer for deposit in the motor vehicle fund.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.36.230 and 1998 c 176 s 34 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The provisions of this chapter requiring the payment of
taxes do not apply to motor vehicle fuel imported into the state in
interstate or foreign commerce and intended to be sold while in
interstate or foreign commerce, nor to motor vehicle fuel exported from
this state ((by a licensee nor)) to a destination outside the United
States to any motor vehicle fuel sold by a licensee to the armed forces
of the United States or to the national guard for use exclusively in
ships or for export from this state.
(b) A credit is provided to the motor vehicle fuel exporter of
record for motor vehicle fuel exported for use in interstate commerce,
where the credit is equal to the product of the motor vehicle fuel tax
rate of the state to which the fuel is exported and the amount of fuel
exported. No credit is granted if the importing state's fuel tax rate
is equal to or greater than the state of Washington's fuel tax rate.
(c) The licensee shall report such imports, exports to destinations
outside the United States to claim a credit for Washington state motor
vehicle fuel taxes paid, and sales to the department at such times, on
such forms, and in such detail as the department may require, otherwise
the exemption granted in this section is null and void, and all fuel
shall be considered distributed in this state fully subject to the
provisions of this chapter. Each invoice covering exempt sales shall
have the statement "Ex Washington Motor Vehicle Fuel Tax" clearly
marked thereon.
(2) To claim any exemption from taxes under this section on account
of sales by a licensee of motor vehicle fuel for export, the purchaser
shall obtain from the selling licensee, and such selling licensee must
furnish the purchaser, an invoice giving such details of the sale for
export as the department may require, copies of which shall be
furnished the department and the entity of the state or foreign
jurisdiction of destination which is charged by the laws of that state
or foreign jurisdiction with the control or monitoring, or both, of the
sales or movement of motor vehicle fuel in that state or foreign
jurisdiction. For the purposes of this section, motor vehicle fuel
distributed to a federally recognized Indian tribal reservation located
within the state of Washington is not considered exported outside this
state.
(3) To claim any refund of taxes previously paid on account of
sales of motor vehicle fuel to the armed forces of the United States or
to the national guard, the licensee shall be required to execute an
exemption certificate in such form as shall be furnished by the
department, containing a certified statement by an authorized officer
of the armed forces having actual knowledge of the purpose for which
the exemption is claimed. The provisions of this section exempting
motor vehicle fuel sold to the armed forces of the United States or to
the national guard from the tax imposed hereunder do not apply to any
motor vehicle fuel sold to contractors purchasing such fuel either for
their own account or as the agents of the United States or the national
guard for use in the performance of contracts with the armed forces of
the United States or the national guard.
(4) The department may at any time require of any licensee any
information the department deems necessary to determine the validity of
the claimed exemption, and failure to supply such data will constitute
a waiver of all right to the exemption claimed. The department is
hereby empowered with full authority to promulgate rules and
regulations and to prescribe forms to be used by licensees in reporting
to the department so as to prevent evasion of the tax imposed by this
chapter.
(5) Upon request from the officials to whom are entrusted the
enforcement of the motor vehicle fuel tax law of any other state, the
District of Columbia, the United States, its territories and
possessions, the provinces, or the Dominion of Canada, the department
may forward to such officials any information which the department may
have relative to the import or export of any motor vehicle fuel by any
licensee((: PROVIDED, That)). However, such governmental unit must
also furnish like information to this state.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.36.280 and 1998 c 176 s 36 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person who uses any motor vehicle fuel for the purpose of
operating any internal combustion engine not used on or in conjunction
with any motor vehicle licensed to be operated over and along any of
the public highways of this state, and as the motive power thereof,
upon which motor vehicle fuel excise tax has been paid, shall be
entitled to and shall receive a refund of the amount of the motor
vehicle fuel excise tax paid on each gallon of motor vehicle fuel so
used, whether such motor vehicle excise tax has been paid either
directly to the vendor from whom the motor vehicle fuel was purchased
or indirectly by adding the amount of such excise tax to the price of
such fuel. No refund shall be made for motor vehicle fuel consumed by
any motor vehicle as herein defined that is required to be registered
and licensed as provided in chapter 46.16 RCW; and is operated over and
along any public highway except that a refund shall be allowed for
motor vehicle fuel consumed:
(1) In a motor vehicle owned by the United States that is operated
off the public highways for official use; and
(2) By auxiliary equipment not used for motive power, provided such
consumption is accurately measured by a metering device that has been
specifically approved by the department or is established by either of
the following formulae:
(a) For fuel used in pumping fuel or heating oils by a power take-off unit on a delivery truck, refund shall be allowed claimant for tax
paid on fuel purchased at the rate of three-fourths of one gallon for
each one thousand gallons of fuel delivered: PROVIDED, That claimant
when presenting his or her claim to the department in accordance with
the provisions of this chapter, shall provide to said claim, invoices
of fuel oil delivered, or such other appropriate information as may be
required by the department to substantiate his or her claim; or
(b) For fuel used in operating a power take-off unit on a cement
mixer truck or load compactor on a garbage truck, claimant shall be
allowed a refund of twenty-five percent of the tax paid on all fuel
used in such a truck; and
(c) The department is authorized to establish by rule additional
formulae for determining fuel usage when operating other types of
equipment by means of power take-off units when direct measurement of
the fuel used is not feasible. The department is also authorized to
adopt rules regarding the usage of on board computers for the
production of records required by this chapter.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.36.300 and 1998 c 176 s 37 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every person who shall export any motor vehicle fuel for use
outside of ((this state)) the United States and who has paid the motor
vehicle fuel excise tax upon such motor vehicle fuel shall be entitled
to and shall receive a refund of the amount of the motor vehicle fuel
excise tax paid on each gallon of motor vehicle fuel so exported. For
the purposes of this section, motor vehicle fuel distributed to a
federally recognized Indian tribal reservation located within the state
of Washington is not considered exported outside this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 82.36 RCW
to read as follows:
Refunds, exemptions, and credits in this chapter are not applicable
to motor vehicle fuel or blended motor vehicle fuel exported within the
United States.

Sec. 8 RCW 82.38.030 and 2007 c 515 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is hereby levied and imposed upon special fuel licensees,
other than special fuel distributors, a tax at the rate of twenty-three
cents per gallon of special fuel, or each one hundred cubic feet of
compressed natural gas, measured at standard pressure and temperature.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2003, an additional and cumulative tax rate
of five cents per gallon of special fuel, or each one hundred cubic
feet of compressed natural gas, measured at standard pressure and
temperature shall be imposed on special fuel licensees, other than
special fuel distributors. This subsection (2) expires when the bonds
issued for transportation 2003 projects are retired.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2005, an additional and cumulative tax rate
of three cents per gallon of special fuel, or each one hundred cubic
feet of compressed natural gas, measured at standard pressure and
temperature shall be imposed on special fuel licensees, other than
special fuel distributors.
(4) Beginning July 1, 2006, an additional and cumulative tax rate
of three cents per gallon of special fuel, or each one hundred cubic
feet of compressed natural gas, measured at standard pressure and
temperature shall be imposed on special fuel licensees, other than
special fuel distributors.
(5) Beginning July 1, 2007, an additional and cumulative tax rate
of two cents per gallon of special fuel, or each one hundred cubic feet
of compressed natural gas, measured at standard pressure and
temperature shall be imposed on special fuel licensees, other than
special fuel distributors.
(6) Beginning July 1, 2008, an additional and cumulative tax rate
of one and one-half cents per gallon of special fuel, or each one
hundred cubic feet of compressed natural gas, measured at standard
pressure and temperature shall be imposed on special fuel licensees,
other than special fuel distributors.
(7) Taxes are imposed when:
(a) Special fuel is removed in this state from a terminal ((if the
special fuel is removed at the rack)) unless the removal is to a
licensed exporter for direct delivery to a destination outside of the
((state, or the removal is by)) United States or to a special fuel
supplier for direct delivery to an international fuel tax agreement
licensee under RCW 82.38.320;
(b) Special fuel is removed in this state from a refinery if either
of the following applies:
(i) The removal is by bulk transfer and the refiner or the owner of
the special fuel immediately before the removal is not a licensee; or
(ii) The removal is at the refinery rack ((unless the removal is to
a licensed exporter for direct delivery to a destination outside of the
state, or the removal is)) to a special fuel supplier for direct
delivery to an international fuel tax agreement licensee under RCW
82.38.320;
(c) Special fuel enters into this state for sale, consumption, use,
or storage, unless the fuel enters this state for direct delivery to an
international fuel tax agreement licensee under RCW 82.38.320, if
either of the following applies:
(i) The entry is by bulk transfer and the importer is not a
licensee; or
(ii) The entry is not by bulk transfer;
(d) Special fuel is removed at the refinery rack or by bulk
transfer unless the removal is to a licensed exporter for direct
delivery to a destination outside of the United States;
(e) Special fuel is sold or removed in this state to an unlicensed
entity unless there was a prior taxable removal, entry, or sale of the
special fuel;
(((e))) (f) Blended special fuel is removed or sold in this state
by the blender of the fuel. The number of gallons of blended special
fuel subject to tax is the difference between the total number of
gallons of blended special fuel removed or sold and the number of
gallons of previously taxed special fuel used to produce the blended
special fuel. Blended special fuel exported from this state to another
state is taxed at the fuel tax rate imposed by this chapter;
(((f))) (g) Dyed special fuel is used on a highway, as authorized
by the internal revenue code, unless the use is exempt from the special
fuel tax;
(((g))) (h) Dyed special fuel is held for sale, sold, used, or is
intended to be used in violation of this chapter;
(((h))) (i) Special fuel purchased by an international fuel tax
agreement licensee under RCW 82.38.320 is used on a highway; and
(((i))) (j) Special fuel is sold by a licensed special fuel
supplier to a special fuel distributor, special fuel importer, special
fuel exporter, or special fuel blender and the special fuel is not
removed from the bulk transfer-terminal system.
(8) Blended motor vehicle fuel exported from this state to another
is taxed at the fuel tax rate imposed by this chapter.

Sec. 9 RCW 82.38.080 and 2008 c 237 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is exempted from the tax imposed by this chapter, the use
of fuel for:
(a) Street and highway construction and maintenance purposes in
motor vehicles owned and operated by the state of Washington, or any
county or municipality;
(b) Publicly owned fire fighting equipment;
(c) Special mobile equipment as defined in RCW 46.04.552;
(d) Power pumping units or other power take-off equipment of any
motor vehicle which is accurately measured by metering devices that
have been specifically approved by the department or which is
established by any of the following formulae:
(i) Pumping propane, or fuel or heating oils or milk picked up from
a farm or dairy farm storage tank by a power take-off unit on a
delivery truck, at a rate determined by the department: PROVIDED, That
claimant when presenting his or her claim to the department in
accordance with this chapter, shall provide to the claim, invoices of
propane, or fuel or heating oil delivered, or such other appropriate
information as may be required by the department to substantiate his or
her claim;
(ii) Operating a power take-off unit on a cement mixer truck or a
load compactor on a garbage truck at the rate of twenty-five percent of
the total gallons of fuel used in such a truck; or
(iii) The department is authorized to establish by rule additional
formulae for determining fuel usage when operating other types of
equipment by means of power take-off units when direct measurement of
the fuel used is not feasible. The department is also authorized to
adopt rules regarding the usage of on board computers for the
production of records required by this chapter;
(e) Motor vehicles owned and operated by the United States
government;
(f) Heating purposes;
(g) Moving a motor vehicle on a public highway between two pieces
of private property when said moving is incidental to the primary use
of the motor vehicle;
(h) Transportation services for persons with special transportation
needs by a private, nonprofit transportation provider regulated under
chapter 81.66 RCW;
(i) Vehicle refrigeration units, mixing units, or other equipment
powered by separate motors from separate fuel tanks;
(j) The operation of a motor vehicle as a part of or incidental to
logging operations upon a highway under federal jurisdiction within the
boundaries of a federal area if the federal government requires a fee
for the privilege of operating the motor vehicle upon the highway, the
proceeds of which are reserved for constructing or maintaining roads in
the federal area, or requires maintenance or construction work to be
performed on the highway for the privilege of operating the motor
vehicle on the highway; ((and))
(k) Waste vegetable oil as defined under RCW 82.08.0205 if the oil
is used to manufacture biodiesel; and
(l) Special fuel exported for direct delivery to a destination
outside the United States.
(2) There is exempted from the tax imposed by this chapter the
removal or entry of special fuel under the following circumstances and
conditions:
(a) If it is the removal from a terminal or refinery of, or the
entry or sale of, a special fuel if all of the following apply:
(i) The person otherwise liable for the tax is a licensee other
than a dyed special fuel user or international fuel tax agreement
licensee;
(ii) For a removal from a terminal, the terminal is a licensed
terminal; and
(iii) The special fuel satisfies the dyeing and marking
requirements of this chapter;
(b) If it is an entry or removal from a terminal or refinery of
taxable special fuel transferred to a refinery or terminal within the
state and the persons involved, including the terminal operator, are
licensed; and
(c)(i) If it is a special fuel that, under contract of sale, is
shipped to a point outside ((this state)) the United States by a
supplier by means of any of the following:
(A) Facilities operated by the supplier;
(B) Delivery by the supplier to a carrier, customs broker, or
forwarding agent, whether hired by the purchaser or not, for shipment
to the out-of-((state)) country point;
(C) Delivery by the supplier to a vessel clearing from port of this
state for a port outside ((this state)) the United States and actually
exported from this state in the vessel.
(ii) For purposes of this subsection (2)(c):
(A) "Carrier" means a person or firm engaged in the business of
transporting for compensation property owned by other persons, and
includes both common and contract carriers; and
(B) "Forwarding agent" means a person or firm engaged in the
business of preparing property for shipment or arranging for its
shipment.
(d) A credit is provided to the special fuel exporter of record for
special fuel exported for use in interstate commerce, where the credit
is equal to the product of the motor vehicle fuel tax rate of the state
to which the fuel is exported and the amount of fuel exported. No
credit is granted if the importing state's fuel tax rate is equal to or
greater than the state of Washington's fuel tax rate.
(3) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, every
urban passenger transportation system and carriers as defined by
chapters 81.68 and 81.70 RCW shall be exempt from the provisions of
this chapter requiring the payment of special fuel taxes. For the
purposes of this section "urban passenger transportation system" means
every transportation system, publicly or privately owned, having as its
principal source of revenue the income from transporting persons for
compensation by means of motor vehicles and/or trackless trolleys, each
having a seating capacity for over fifteen persons over prescribed
routes in such a manner that the routes of such motor vehicles and/or
trackless trolleys, either alone or in conjunction with routes of other
such motor vehicles and/or trackless trolleys subject to routing by the
same transportation system, shall not extend for a distance exceeding
twenty-five road miles beyond the corporate limits of the county in
which the original starting points of such motor vehicles are located:
PROVIDED, That no refunds or credits shall be granted on special fuel
used by any urban transportation vehicle or vehicle operated pursuant
to chapters 81.68 and 81.70 RCW on any trip where any portion of said
trip is more than twenty-five road miles beyond the corporate limits of
the county in which said trip originated.

Sec. 10 RCW 82.38.180 and 2007 c 515 s 29 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person who has purchased special fuel on which tax has been
paid may file a claim with the department for a refund of the tax for:
(1) Taxes previously paid on special fuel used for purposes other
than for the propulsion of motor vehicles upon the public highways in
this state.
(2) Taxes previously paid on special fuel exported for use outside
of ((this state)) the United States. ((Special fuel carried from this
state in the fuel tank of a motor vehicle is deemed to be exported from
this state.)) Special fuel distributed to a federally recognized
Indian tribal reservation located within the state of Washington is not
considered exported outside this state.
(3) Tax, penalty, or interest erroneously or illegally collected or
paid.
(4) Taxes previously paid on all special fuel which is lost or
destroyed, while the licensee shall be the owner thereof, through fire,
lightning, flood, wind storm, or explosion.
(5) Taxes previously paid on all special fuel of five hundred
gallons or more which is lost or destroyed while the licensee shall be
the owner thereof, through leakage or other casualty except
evaporation, shrinkage, or unknown causes.
(6) Taxes previously paid on special fuel that is inadvertently
mixed with dyed special fuel.
Recovery for such loss or destruction under either subsection (4),
(5), or (6) of this section must be susceptible to positive proof
thereby enabling the department to conduct such investigation and
require such information as it may deem necessary. In the event that
the department is not satisfied that the fuel was lost, destroyed, or
contaminated as claimed because information or proof as required
hereunder is not sufficient to substantiate the accuracy of the claim,
it may deem such as sufficient cause to deny all right relating to the
refund or credit for the excise tax paid on special fuel alleged to be
lost or destroyed.
No refund or claim for credit shall be approved by the department
unless the gallons of special fuel claimed as nontaxable satisfy the
conditions specifically set forth in this section and the nontaxable
event or use occurred during the period covered by the refund claim.
Refunds or claims for credit shall not be allowed for anticipated
nontaxable use or events.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 82.38 RCW
to read as follows:
Refunds, exemptions, and credits in this chapter are not applicable
to special fuel or blended special fuel exported within the United
States.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act takes effect August 1, 2009.

--- END ---