BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.890 and 2006 c 151 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to
eligible persons of:
(a) Qualifying livestock nutrient management equipment;
(b) Labor and services rendered in respect to installing,
repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving qualifying livestock
nutrient management equipment; and
(c)(i) Labor and services rendered in respect to ((operating,))
repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving of qualifying livestock
nutrient management ((equipment and)) facilities, or to ((sales of))
tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or component of
((the equipment and)) qualifying livestock nutrient management
facilities in the course of repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving
of such facilities.
(ii) The exemption provided in this subsection (1)(c) does not
apply to the sale of or charge made for: (A) Labor and services
rendered in respect to the constructing of new, or replacing previously
existing, qualifying livestock nutrient management facilities; or (B)
tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or component of
qualifying livestock nutrient management facilities during the course
of constructing new, or replacing previously existing, qualifying
livestock nutrient management facilities.
(2)(((a) To be eligible, the equipment and facilities must be used
exclusively for activities necessary to maintain a livestock nutrient
management plan.
(b))) The exemption provided in subsection (1) of this section
applies to sales made after the livestock nutrient management plan is:
(((i))) (a) Certified under chapter 90.64 RCW; (((ii))) (b) approved as
part of the permit issued under chapter 90.48 RCW; or (((iii))) (c)
approved as required under subsection (4)(c)(iii) of this section.
(3)(a) The department of revenue must provide an exemption
certificate to an eligible person upon application by that person. The
department of agriculture must provide a list of eligible persons, as
defined in subsection (4)(c)(i) and (ii) of this section, to the
department of revenue. Conservation districts must maintain lists of
eligible persons as defined in subsection (4)(c)(iii) of this section
to allow the department of revenue to verify eligibility. The
application must be in a form and manner prescribed by the department
and must contain information regarding the location of the dairy or
animal feeding operation and other information the department may
require.
(b) A person claiming an exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section and
RCW 82.12.890 unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Animal feeding operation" means a lot or facility, other than
an aquatic animal production facility, where the following conditions
are met:
(i) Animals, other than aquatic animals, have been, are, or will be
stabled or confined and fed or maintained for a total of forty-five
days or more in any twelve-month period; and
(ii) Crops, vegetation, forage growth, or postharvest residues are
not sustained in the normal growing season over any portion of the lot
or facility.
(b) "Conservation district" means a subdivision of state government
organized under chapter 89.08 RCW.
(c) "Eligible person" means a person: (i) Licensed to produce milk
under chapter 15.36 RCW who has a certified dairy nutrient management
plan, as required by chapter 90.64 RCW; (ii) who owns an animal feeding
operation and has a permit issued under chapter 90.48 RCW; or (iii) who
owns an animal feeding operation and has a nutrient management plan
approved by a conservation district as meeting natural resource
conservation service field office technical guide standards and who
possesses an exemption certificate under RCW 82.08.855.
(d) (("Livestock nutrient management equipment and facilities"
means machinery, equipment, and structures used in the handling and
treatment of livestock manure, such as aerators, agitators, alley
scrapers, augers, dams, gutter cleaners, loaders, lagoons, pipes,
pumps, separators, and tanks. The term also includes tangible personal
property that becomes an ingredient or component of the equipment and
facilities, including repair and replacement parts.
(e))) "Handling and treatment of livestock manure" means the
activities of collecting, storing, moving, or transporting livestock
manure, separating livestock manure solids from liquids, or applying
livestock manure to the agricultural lands of an eligible person other
than through the use of pivot or linear type traveling irrigation
systems.
(e) "Permit" means either a state waste discharge permit or a
national pollutant discharge elimination system permit, or both.
(f) "Qualifying livestock nutrient management equipment" means the
following tangible personal property for exclusive use in the handling
and treatment of livestock manure, including repair and replacement
parts for such equipment: (i) Aerators; (ii) agitators; (iii) augers;
(iv) conveyers; (v) gutter cleaners; (vi) hard-hose reel traveler
irrigation systems; (vii) lagoon and pond liners and floating covers;
(viii) loaders; (ix) manure composting devices; (x) manure spreaders;
(xi) manure tank wagons; (xii) manure vacuum tanks; (xiii) poultry
house cleaners; (xiv) poultry house flame sterilizers; (xv) poultry
house washers; (xvi) poultry litter saver machines; (xvii) pipes;
(xviii) pumps; (xix) scrapers; (xx) separators; (xxi) slurry injectors
and hoses; and (xxii) wheelbarrows, shovels, and pitchforks.
(g) "Qualifying livestock nutrient management facilities" means the
following structures and facilities for exclusive use in the handling
and treatment of livestock manure: (i) Flush systems; (ii) lagoons;
(iii) liquid livestock manure storage structures, such as concrete
tanks or glass-lined steel tanks; and (iv) structures used solely for
the dry storage of manure, including roofed stacking facilities.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.12.890 and 2006 c 151 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use by an eligible person of ((tangible personal property that becomes
an ingredient or component of livestock nutrient management equipment
and facilities, as defined in RCW 82.08.890, or to labor and services
rendered in respect to repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving
eligible tangible personal property.)):
(a) Qualifying livestock nutrient management equipment;
(b) Labor and services rendered in respect to installing,
repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving qualifying livestock
nutrient management equipment; and
(c)(i) Tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or
component of qualifying livestock nutrient management facilities in the
course of repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving of such
facilities.
(ii) The exemption provided in this subsection (1)(c) does not
apply to the use of tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component of qualifying livestock nutrient management
facilities during the course of constructing new, or replacing
previously existing, qualifying livestock nutrient management
facilities.
(2)(((a) To be eligible, the equipment and facilities must be used
exclusively for activities necessary to maintain a livestock nutrient
management plan.
(b))) The exemption applies to the use of tangible personal
property ((or)) and labor and services made after the livestock
nutrient management plan is: (((i))) (a) Certified under chapter 90.64
RCW; (((ii))) (b) approved as part of the permit issued under chapter
90.48 RCW; or (((iii))) (c) approved as required under RCW
82.08.890(4)(c)(iii).
(3) The exemption certificate and recordkeeping requirements of RCW
82.08.890 apply to this section. The definitions in RCW 82.08.890
apply to this section.

--- END ---