BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act shall be known as the Eryk Woodruff
public safety act of 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The sentencing guidelines commission
shall review the crime of assault of a child in the first degree as it
relates to: The elements of the crime, sentencing under the sentencing
reform act grid, all provisions providing for exceptional sentences
both above and below the standard sentencing ranges, judicial
discretion in sentencing, earned early release, and community custody
requirements. As part of its review, the commission shall:
(a) Study the relevant provisions of the sentencing reform act
relating to assault of a child in the first degree;
(b) Consider the revision of the sentencing range for assault of a
child in the first degree which includes, but is not limited to, taking
into consideration the violence of the offense, the age of victims, the
criminal history of the offender, the mental health capacity of the
offender, and the risk of the offender reoffending in the community;
(c) Consider the use of advisory sentencing guidelines for assault
of a child in the first degree;
(d) Consider the modification of the mandatory minimum term of
confinement for an offender convicted of assault of a child in the
first degree;
(e) Consider altering the statutory provisions surrounding earned
early release for an offender convicted of assault of a child in the
first degree;
(f) Consider restructuring or adjusting the statutory community
custody conditions for offenders convicted of assault of a child in the
first degree;
(g) Consider the use of determinate plus sentencing that provides
for a minimum and a maximum term of confinement for an offender
convicted of assault of a child in the first degree; and
(h) Determine the fiscal impact of any proposed recommendations.
(2) The commission shall review and make recommendations regarding
the revision or modification of the sentences of offenders convicted of
the crime of assault of a child in the first degree.
(3) The commission shall submit its findings to the appropriate
committees of the legislature no later than December 31, 2009.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.703 and 2008 c 231 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
When a court sentences a person to a term of community custody, the
court shall impose conditions of community custody as provided in this
section.
(1) Mandatory conditions. As part of any term of community
custody, the court shall:
(a) Require the offender to inform the department of court-ordered
treatment upon request by the department;
(b) Require the offender to comply with any conditions imposed by
the department under RCW 9.94A.704;
(c) If the offender was sentenced under RCW ((9.94A.712)) 9.94A.507
for an offense listed in RCW ((9.94A.712)) 9.94A.507(1)(a), and the
victim of the offense was under eighteen years of age at the time of
the offense, prohibit the offender from residing in a community
protection zone;
(d) If the offender was sentenced under RCW 9A.36.120, prohibit the
offender from serving in any paid or volunteer capacity where he or she
has control or supervision of minors under the age of thirteen.
(2) Waivable conditions. Unless waived by the court, as part of
any term of community custody, the court shall order an offender to:
(a) Report to and be available for contact with the assigned
community corrections officer as directed;
(b) Work at department-approved education, employment, or community
restitution, or any combination thereof;
(c) Refrain from possessing or consuming controlled substances
except pursuant to lawfully issued prescriptions;
(d) Pay supervision fees as determined by the department; and
(e) Obtain prior approval of the department for the offender's
residence location and living arrangements.
(3) Discretionary conditions. As part of any term of community
custody, the court may order an offender to:
(a) Remain within, or outside of, a specified geographical
boundary;
(b) Refrain from direct or indirect contact with the victim of the
crime or a specified class of individuals;
(c) Participate in crime-related treatment or counseling services;
(d) Participate in rehabilitative programs or otherwise perform
affirmative conduct reasonably related to the circumstances of the
offense, the offender's risk of reoffending, or the safety of the
community;
(e) Refrain from consuming alcohol; or
(f) Comply with any crime-related prohibitions.
(4) Special conditions.
(a) In sentencing an offender convicted of a crime of domestic
violence, as defined in RCW 10.99.020, if the offender has a minor
child, or if the victim of the offense for which the offender was
convicted has a minor child, the court may order the offender to
participate in a domestic violence perpetrator program approved under
RCW 26.50.150.
(b)(i) In sentencing an offender convicted of an alcohol or drug-related traffic offense, the court shall require the offender to
complete a diagnostic evaluation by an alcohol or drug dependency
agency approved by the department of social and health services or a
qualified probation department, defined under RCW 46.61.516, that has
been approved by the department of social and health services. If the
offense was pursuant to chapter 46.61 RCW, the report shall be
forwarded to the department of licensing. If the offender is found to
have an alcohol or drug problem that requires treatment, the offender
shall complete treatment in a program approved by the department of
social and health services under chapter 70.96A RCW. If the offender
is found not to have an alcohol or drug problem that requires
treatment, the offender shall complete a course in an information
school approved by the department of social and health services under
chapter 70.96A RCW. The offender shall pay all costs for any
evaluation, education, or treatment required by this section, unless
the offender is eligible for an existing program offered or approved by
the department of social and health services.
(ii) For purposes of this section, "alcohol or drug-related traffic
offense" means the following: Driving while under the influence as
defined by RCW 46.61.502, actual physical control while under the
influence as defined by RCW 46.61.504, vehicular homicide as defined by
RCW 46.61.520(1)(a), vehicular assault as defined by RCW
46.61.522(1)(b), homicide by watercraft as defined by RCW 79A.60.050,
or assault by watercraft as defined by RCW 79A.60.060.
(iii) This subsection (4)(b) does not require the department of
social and health services to add new treatment or assessment
facilities nor affect its use of existing programs and facilities
authorized by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect August 1, 2009.

--- END ---