BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.46.533 and 2007 c 508 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of comparison, the department shall determine
the following during the rate-setting periods for fiscal years 2008 and
2009; and for nonurban county nursing care facilities only, for rate-setting periods commencing July 1, 2009:
(a) Each facility's June 30, 2007, combined rate for the direct
care, support services, therapy, and operations components, less the
quality maintenance fee; and
(b) Each facility's estimated rebased rates for the July 1, 2007,
and July 1, 2008, rate-setting periods, for the direct care, support
services, therapy, and operations rate components, less the quality
maintenance fee, adjusted for economic trends and conditions under the
2007-2009 biennial appropriations act; and
(c) Effective July 1, 2009, and for each rate-setting period
thereafter, each nonurban county facility's estimated rebased rates for
the direct care, support services, therapy, and operations rates
components, less the quality maintenance fee, adjusted for economic
trends and conditions under the current applicable biennial
appropriations act.
(2) For the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the department shall include
a "hold harmless" provision after rebasing to 2005 costs for the July
1, 2007, through June 30, 2008, rate-setting period and the July 1,
2008, through June 30, 2009, rate-setting period. Commencing with the
July 1, 2009, rate-setting period the department shall include a "hold
harmless" provision only for nonurban county nursing care facilities.
This "hold harmless" provision shall apply to facilities that meet both
of the following conditions:
(a) Facilities whose estimated rebased rates calculated under
subsection (1)(b) or (c) of this section are less than their June 30,
2007, rates calculated under subsection (1)(a) of this section; and
(b) Facilities whose combined adjusted costs per adjusted resident
day in the direct care, support services, therapy, and operations cost
centers were greater than the combined per resident day reimbursement
rates for these cost centers in either calendar years 2004 or 2005.
For those facilities that meet the conditions in this subsection,
the "hold harmless" provision shall ensure that for the July 1, 2007,
through June 30, 2008, rate-setting period and for the July 1, 2008,
through June 30, 2009, rate-setting period, the department shall set
each facility's component rates in direct care, support services,
therapy, and operations to the facility's June 30, 2007, rate, less the
quality maintenance fee, adjusted for economic trends and conditions
specified in the 2007-2009 biennial appropriations act. For nonurban
county nursing care facilities that meet the conditions in this
subsection, the "hold harmless" provision shall ensure that for the
July 1, 2009, and following period rate settings, the department shall
set each such facility's component rates in direct care, support
services, therapy, and operations to not less than the facility's June
30, 2007, rate, less the quality maintenance fee, adjusted additionally
for economic trends and conditions specified in the biennial
appropriations acts since June 30, 2007.

--- END ---