BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the requirements of this section, an exemption from
the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 is provided for sales to qualifying
businesses of: (a) Server equipment, to be installed, in an eligible
computer data center, and for sales of labor and services rendered in
respect to installing such server equipment; and (b) temperature and
climate control infrastructure and power infrastructure, including
labor and services rendered in respect to constructing, installing,
repairing, altering, or improving such infrastructure.
(2)(a) In order to claim the exemption under this section, a
qualifying business must submit an application to the department. The
application must include the information necessary, as required by the
department, to determine that the business qualifies for the exemption
under this section. The department must issue a decision on the
application within ninety days of receipt. If the department fails to
issue a decision, the application for the exemption is deemed to have
been approved.
(b) In the event that the person claiming the exemption did not
claim the exemption in advance of the first qualifying purchase and
paid the vendor the sales tax, the department must accept an
application after the purchase for purposes of refunding the sales tax
paid on the equipment and services described in subsection (1) of this
section. The department must issue a decision on the application
within ninety days of receipt. If the department fails to issue a
decision, the application for the exemption is deemed to have been
approved.
(3) A person who claims an exemption under this section must file
an annual report with the department as required under section 103,
chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1597), Laws of 2009.
(4) The exemption provided in this section is provided in the form
of a refund. Sellers must collect the tax on sales subject to this
exemption. The buyer must apply for a refund directly from the
department in a form and manner required by the department. The refund
is for fifty percent of state and local sales taxes. The fifty percent
of state sales tax not refunded under this section must be deposited in
the green industries jobs training account created in RCW 43.330.310.
The department may not refund more than twenty million dollars of state
sales and use taxes under this section or section 2 of this act. The
department may not provide refunds under this section before April 1,
2010. A refund may not be granted until the computer data center has
been granted a certificate of occupancy.
(5) A person who claims an exemption under this section must comply
with the prevailing wage requirements of chapter 39.12 RCW. A person
who claims an exemption under this section must also use apprentices
for no less than fifteen percent of the labor hours required for the
installing of server equipment, temperature and climate control
infrastructure, and power infrastructure.
(6) If a person fails to fulfill the requirements of this section,
the department must declare the amount of taxes exempted under this
section immediately due and payable. However, the department may not
declare the amount of taxes immediately due and payable if the failure
was the result of illness, death, natural disasters, or unforeseen
computer system failures. Excise taxes payable under this section are
subject to interest, as provided in chapter 82.32 RCW. Requirements
under this section exclusively include:
(a) The person must submit an annual report as required by
subsection (3) of this section.
(b) The person must increase employment in the state by a minimum
of thirty-five family wage jobs no later than six years after the
installation of equipment of the computer data center. For purposes of
the report required by this section, family wage jobs are new permanent
employment positions requiring forty hours of weekly work, or their
equivalent, on a full-time basis and paying a wage equivalent to or
greater than one hundred fifty percent of the per capita personal
income of the county in which the qualified project is located. The
person must provide health insurance coverage for the employee.
This requirement does not apply to existing computer data centers
if the equipment and services are those described in subsection (1) of
this section and are for the purpose of refreshing, maintaining, or
replacing existing equipment due to changes in technology,
obsolescence, or defect.
(c) No later than six years following the date the eligible
computer data center begins to provide commercial service, or the date
the installation of the equipment is final, the person must document
qualifying expenditures equal to or exceeding two hundred million
dollars.
(7) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Commercial service" means the point at which the equipment
described in subsection (1) of this section becomes operational for its
intended purposes and excludes testing or other activities in
preparation for the same to become operational.
(b) "Computer data center" means a facility comprised of one or
more buildings constructed or refurbished specifically, and used
primarily, to house servers and related equipment and support staff,
where the facility has the following characteristics:
(i) Uninterruptible power supplies, generator backup power, or
both;
(ii) Sophisticated fire suppression and prevention systems; and
(iii) Enhanced physical security, such as: (A) Restricted access
to the facility to selected personnel; (B) permanent security guards;
video camera surveillance; or an electronic system requiring passcodes,
keycards, or biometric scans, such as hand scans and retinal or
fingerprint recognition; or (C) security features similar to those in
(b)(iii)(A) and (B) of this subsection (7). A computer data center
includes, but is not limited to, a web search portal business.
(c) "Store or manage electronic data" includes, but is not limited
to: Providing data storage and backup services, providing computer
processing power, and hosting enterprise software applications. The
term also includes hosting web sites that provide free or subscription
services such as e-mail, web browsing and searching, media
applications, and other related online services.
(d) "Eligible computer data center" means a physical location in
the state consisting of a single parcel of real property or adjacent
parcels of real property owned by the same taxpayer, acquired or
improved after July 1, 2009, through the constructing or refurbishing
of a computer data center with at least twenty thousand square feet of
floor space dedicated to housing working servers and located in a rural
county as defined in RCW 82.14.370(5).
(e) "Installation of equipment" means when the first piece of
equipment described in subsection (1) of this section is installed at
the site and ordering the equipment, preparing the equipment for
installation, or other activities in preparation for the installation
of such equipment.
(f) "Power infrastructure" means all fixtures, equipment, and
facilities necessary for the transformation, distribution, or
management of electricity at an eligible data center. The term
includes, but is not limited to, exterior taxpayer-owned electrical
substations, generators, wiring, backup power generation systems,
battery systems, and related infrastructure and cogeneration equipment.
(g)(i) "Qualifying business" means a business entity that: Exists
for the primary purpose of engaging in commercial activity for profit;
and purchases server equipment, power infrastructure, or temperature
and climate control infrastructure for use in a computer data center.
(ii) For purposes of this subsection (7)(g), "business entity"
means a corporation, other than a municipal, quasi-municipal, and
public or other corporation created by the state or federal government,
tribal government, municipality, or political subdivision of the state;
association; limited liability company; partnership, including general
partnership, limited partnership, and limited liability partnership; or
other legal entity. Consistent with this subsection (7)(g), "business
entity" does not include the state or federal government or any of
their departments, agencies, and institutions; tribal governments; and
political subdivisions of this state.
(h) "Qualifying expenditure" means an investment in real and
personal property of two hundred million dollars for capital expenses
including, but not limited to, land acquisition, preparation, and
improvement, facility design, engineering and construction, and
installation of server equipment, temperature and climate control
infrastructure, and power infrastructure. Expenditures made prior to
July 1, 2011, are deemed qualifying expenditures for purposes of
determining eligibility of a computer data center for the exemption
offered under this section.
(i) "Server" includes:
(i) Blade or rack-mount servers and means a computer that is used
in a computer data center solely to store or manage electronic data, to
provide internet access, navigation, or search functions for the owner
or lessee of the computer data center, or for clients of the owner or
lessee of the computer data center, or both; or
(ii) Computers used for research and development to support
capabilities to store or manage electronic data or provide internet
access, navigation, or search functions.
(j) "Server equipment" means the server chassis and all computer
hardware and software contained within the server chassis. Consistent
with this subsection (7)(j), "server equipment" includes the racks upon
which the server chassis is installed, cables, and computer peripherals
such as keyboards, monitors, printers, mice, and other devices that
work outside of the computer.
(k) "Temperature and climate control infrastructure" means all
fixtures, equipment, and facilities necessary for controlling the
temperature and humidity at an eligible computer data center. The term
includes heating, ventilation, and air conditioning fixtures and
equipment; cooling systems; cooling towers; temperature sensors;
humidity sensors; fans; and perforated floor tiles.
(l) "Web search portal business" means an entity among whose
primary business is to provide a content and search portal to organize
information; to access, search, or navigate the internet, including
researching or developing technologies to support capabilities to
organize information; and to provide internet access, navigation, and
search functionalities.
(8) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall complete
a tax preference review under RCW 43.136.055 for this section and
section 2 of this act by January 1, 2011.
(9) This section expires July 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An exemption from the tax imposed by RCW 82.12.020 is provided
for sales to qualifying businesses of: (a) Server equipment, to be
installed, in an eligible computer data center, and to charges made for
labor and services rendered in respect to installing such server
equipment; and (b) temperature and climate control infrastructure and
power infrastructure, including labor and services rendered in respect
to constructing, installing, repairing, altering, or improving such
infrastructure.
(2) The exemption provided in this section does not apply if the
server equipment is withdrawn from an eligible computer data center and
not reused in an eligible computer data center. The property must be
taxed at its fair market value at the time of first taxable use in
Washington.
(3) In order to claim the exemption under this section, a
qualifying business must submit an application to the department. The
application must include the information necessary, as required by the
department, to determine that a business qualifies for the exemption
under this section. The department must issue a decision on the
application within ninety days of its receipt. If the department fails
to issue a decision, the application for the exemption is deemed to
have been approved.
(4) The definitions, limitations, and refund provisions in section
1 of this act apply to this section.
(5) If a person fails to fulfill the requirements of section 1 of
this act, all taxes exempt under this section become immediately due
and payable. Excise taxes payable under this section are subject to
interest, as provided under chapter 82.32 RCW.
(6) This section expires July 1, 2011.

--- END ---