BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.43.030 and 1971 ex.s. c 116 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
This and the following chapters relating to municipal local
improvements shall supersede the provisions of the charter of any city
of the first class.
They shall apply to all incorporated cities and towns, including
unclassified cities and towns operating under special charters.
The council of each city and town shall pass such general ordinance
or ordinances as may be necessary to carry out their provisions and
thereafter all proceedings relating to local improvements shall be
conducted in accordance with this and the following chapters relating
to municipal local improvements and the ordinance or ordinances of such
city or town.
Cities or towns may form local improvement districts or utility
local improvement districts composed entirely or in part of
unincorporated territory outside of such city or town's corporate
limits in the manner provided in this chapter, or, upon approval of the
legislative authority of an adjoining city or town, may form local
improvement districts or utility local improvement districts for
transportation and infrastructure purposes that are composed entirely
or in part of territory within that adjoining city or town.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---