BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there are
economic and environmental advantages to having state agencies switch
to one hundred percent recycled content paper and to reduce the amount
of paper used by the state.
Using one hundred percent recycled content paper will help create
jobs, as the paper is made locally in Washington state and that using
the paper is in tune with our duty to be good stewards of the land, as
it is a sustainable and renewable resource.
The legislature intends for three pilot programs within state
government to put programs in place to use one hundred percent recycled
paper, recycle the paper that they use, and set a goal of reducing
overall paper use by thirty percent through conservation efforts.
These programs will be used as an example for all state agencies and in
the future, if the pilot programs are successful, be a model for all
state agencies to follow. The model of recycling paper, using one
hundred percent recycled content paper, and setting a goal of reducing
overall paper use by thirty percent through conservation efforts will
not only lessen our environmental footprint, but cut the costs to our
state's taxpayers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.19A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By December 31, 2009, the department shall establish a pilot
program for three state agencies: One small agency with fewer than one
hundred employees, one medium agency with between one hundred and five
hundred employees, and one large agency with more than five hundred
employees.
(2) By July 1, 2010, the pilot program agencies shall:
(a) Purchase one hundred percent recycled content white printing
and copy paper. The pilot program agencies are encouraged to give
priority to purchasing from companies that produce paper in facilities
that generate energy from a renewable energy source;
(b) Develop and implement a paper conservation program. The pilot
program agencies shall endeavor to conserve paper by at least thirty
percent of their current paper use;
(c) Develop and implement a paper recycling program to help
encourage recycling of all paper products with a goal of recycling one
hundred percent of all copy and printing paper.
(3) The department shall submit a report to the legislature by
December 1, 2013, that contains the amount each pilot program agency
spent on paper and the amount of paper each agency utilized.

--- END ---