BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to modify the energy
freedom program and account in order to receive federal funds and other
sources of funding. Also, the legislature intends to expand the
mission of the energy freedom program to accelerate energy efficiency
improvements, renewable energy improvements, and deployment of
innovative energy technologies. Additionally, the legislature intends
to support, through the energy freedom program, research,
demonstration, and commercialization of energy efficiency improvements,
renewable energy improvements, and innovation energy technologies.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.325.010 and 2007 c 348 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Applicant" means the state and any political subdivision of
the state, including port districts, counties, cities, towns, special
purpose districts, and other municipal corporations or quasi-municipal
corporations. "Applicant" may also include federally recognized tribes
((and)), state institutions of higher education with appropriate
research capabilities, and any organization described in section
501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code.
(2) "Alternative fuel" means all products or energy sources used to
propel motor vehicles, other than conventional gasoline, diesel, or
reformulated gasoline. "Alternative fuel" includes, but is not limited
to, cellulose, liquefied petroleum gas, liquefied natural gas,
compressed natural gas, biofuels, biodiesel fuel, E85 motor fuel, fuels
containing seventy percent or more by volume of alcohol fuel, fuels
that are derived from biomass, hydrogen fuel, anhydrous ammonia fuel,
nonhazardous motor fuel, or electricity, excluding onboard electric
generation.
(3) "Assistance" includes loans, leases, product purchases, or
other forms of financial or technical assistance.
(4) "Biofuel" includes, but is not limited to, biodiesel, ethanol,
and ethanol blend fuels and renewable liquid natural gas or liquid
compressed natural gas made from biogas.
(5) "Biogas" includes waste gases derived from landfills and
wastewater treatment plants and dairy and farm wastes.
(6) "Cellulose" means lignocellulosic, hemicellulosic, or other
cellulosic matter that is available on a renewable or recurring basis,
including dedicated energy crops and trees, wood and wood residues,
plants, grasses, agricultural residues, fibers, animal wastes and other
waste materials, and municipal solid waste.
(7) "Coordinator" means the person appointed by the director of the
department of community, trade, and economic development.
(8) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(9) "Director" means the director of the department of community,
trade, and economic development.
(10) "Energy efficiency improvement" means an installation or
modification that is designed to reduce energy consumption. The term
includes, but is not limited to: Insulation; storm windows and doors;
automatic energy control systems; heating, ventilating, or air
conditioning and distribution system modifications or replacements in
buildings or central plants; caulking and weather stripping; energy
recovery systems; geothermal heat pumps; and day lighting systems.
(11) "Green highway zone" means an area in the state designated by
the department that is within reasonable proximity of state route
number 5, state route number 90, and state route number 82.
(((11))) (12) "Innovative energy technology" means, but is not
limited to, the following: Smart grid or smart metering; biogas from
landfills, wastewater treatment plants, anaerobic digesters, or other
processes; wave or tidal power; fuel cells; high efficiency
cogeneration; and energy storage systems.
(13) "Peer review committee" means a board, appointed by the
director, that includes bioenergy specialists, energy conservation
specialists, scientists, and individuals with specific recognized
expertise.
(((12))) (14) "Project" means the construction of facilities,
including the purchase of equipment, to convert farm products or wastes
into electricity or gaseous or liquid fuels or other coproducts
associated with such conversion. These specifically include fixed or
mobile facilities to generate electricity or methane from the anaerobic
digestion of organic matter, and fixed or mobile facilities for
extracting oils from canola, rape, mustard, and other oilseeds.
"Project" may also include the construction of facilities associated
with such conversion for the distribution and storage of such
feedstocks and fuels. The definition of project does not apply to
projects as described in RCW 43.325.020(5).
(15) "Renewable energy improvements" means a fixture, product,
system, device, or interacting group of devices that produces energy
from renewable resources. The term includes, but is not limited to:
Photovoltaic systems; solar thermal systems; small wind systems;
biomass systems; and geothermal systems.
(((13))) (16) "Refueling project" means the construction of new
alternative fuel refueling facilities, as well as upgrades and
expansion of existing refueling facilities, that will enable these
facilities to offer alternative fuels to the public.
(((14))) (17) "Research and development project" means research and
development, by an institution of higher education as defined in
subsection (1) of this section, relating to:
(a) Bioenergy sources including but not limited to biomass and
associated gases; or
(b) The development of markets for bioenergy coproducts.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.325.020 and 2007 c 348 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The energy freedom program is established within the
department. The director may establish policies and procedures
necessary for processing, reviewing, and approving applications made
under this chapter.
(2) When reviewing applications submitted under this program, the
director shall consult with those agencies and other public entities
having expertise and knowledge to assess the technical and business
feasibility of the project and probability of success. These agencies
may include, but are not limited to, Washington State University, the
University of Washington, the department of ecology, the department of
natural resources, the department of agriculture, the department of
general administration, local clean air authorities, and the Washington
state conservation commission.
(3) Except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section,
the director, in cooperation with the department of agriculture, may
approve an application only if the director finds:
(a) The project will convert farm products, wastes, cellulose, or
biogas directly into electricity or biofuel or other coproducts
associated with such conversion;
(b) The project demonstrates technical feasibility and directly
assists in moving a commercially viable project into the marketplace
for use by Washington state citizens;
(c) The facility will produce long-term economic benefits to the
state, a region of the state, or a particular community in the state;
(d) The project does not require continuing state support;
(e) The assistance will result in new jobs, job retention, or
higher incomes for citizens of the state;
(f) The state is provided an option under the assistance agreement
to purchase a portion of the fuel or feedstock to be produced by the
project, exercisable by the department of general administration;
(g) The project will increase energy independence or diversity for
the state;
(h) The project will use feedstocks produced in the state, if
feasible, except this criterion does not apply to the construction of
facilities used to distribute and store fuels that are produced from
farm products or wastes;
(i) Any product produced by the project will be suitable for its
intended use, will meet accepted national or state standards, and will
be stored and distributed in a safe and environmentally sound manner;
(j) The application provides for adequate reporting or disclosure
of financial and employment data to the director, and permits the
director to require an annual or other periodic audit of the project
books; and
(k) For research and development projects, the application has been
independently reviewed by a peer review committee as defined in RCW
43.325.010 and the findings delivered to the director.
(4) When reviewing an application for a refueling project, the
coordinator may award a grant or a loan to an applicant if the director
finds:
(a) The project will offer alternative fuels to the motoring
public;
(b) The project does not require continued state support;
(c) The project is located within a green highway zone as defined
in RCW 43.325.010;
(d) The project will contribute towards an efficient and adequately
spaced alternative fuel refueling network along the green highways
designated in RCW 47.17.020, 47.17.135, and 47.17.140; and
(e) The project will result in increased access to alternative
fueling infrastructure for the motoring public along the green highways
designated in RCW 47.17.020, 47.17.135, and 47.17.140.
(5) When reviewing an application for energy efficiency
improvements, renewable energy improvements, or innovative energy
technology, the director may award a grant or a loan to an applicant if
the director finds:
(a) The project or program will result in increased access for the
public, state and local governments, and businesses to energy
efficiency improvements, renewable energy improvements, or innovative
energy technologies;
(b) The project or program demonstrates technical feasibility and
directly assists in moving a commercially viable project into the
marketplace for use by Washington state citizens;
(c) The project or program does not require continued state
support; or
(d) The federal government has provided funds with a limited time
frame for use for energy independence and security, energy efficiency,
renewable energy, innovative energy technologies, or conservation.
(6)(a) The director may approve a project application for
assistance under subsection (3) of this section up to five million
dollars. In no circumstances shall this assistance constitute more
than fifty percent of the total project cost.
(b) The director may approve a refueling project application for a
grant or a loan under subsection (4) of this section up to fifty
thousand dollars. In no circumstances shall a grant or a loan award
constitute more than fifty percent of the total project cost.
(((6))) (7) The director shall enter into agreements with approved
applicants to fix the terms and rates of the assistance to minimize the
costs to the applicants, and to encourage establishment of a viable
bioenergy or biofuel industry, or a viable energy efficiency, renewable
energy, or innovative energy technology industry. The agreement shall
include provisions to protect the state's investment, including a
requirement that a successful applicant enter into contracts with any
partners that may be involved in the use of any assistance provided
under this program, including services, facilities, infrastructure, or
equipment. Contracts with any partners shall become part of the
application record.
(((7))) (8) The director may defer any payments for up to twenty-four months or until the project starts to receive revenue from
operations, whichever is sooner.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.325.030 and 2007 c 348 s 205 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director of the department shall appoint a coordinator that is
responsible for:
(1) Managing, directing, inventorying, and coordinating state
efforts to promote, develop, and encourage ((a)) biofuel((s)) and
energy efficiency, renewable energy, and innovative energy technology
markets in Washington;
(2) Developing, coordinating, and overseeing the implementation of
a plan, or series of plans, for the production, transport,
distribution, and delivery of biofuels produced predominantly from
recycled products or Washington feedstocks;
(3) Working with the departments of transportation and general
administration, and other applicable state and local governmental
entities and the private sector, to ensure the development of biofuel
fueling stations for use by state and local governmental motor vehicle
fleets, and to provide greater availability of public biofuel fueling
stations for use by state and local governmental motor vehicle fleets;
(4) Coordinating with the Western Washington University alternative
automobile program for opportunities to support new Washington state
technology for conversion of fossil fuel fleets to biofuel, hybrid, or
alternative fuel propulsion;
(5) Coordinating with the University of Washington's college of
forest management and the Olympic natural resources center for the
identification of barriers to using the state's forest resources for
fuel production, including the economic and transportation barriers of
physically bringing forest biomass to the market;
(6) Coordinating with the department of agriculture and Washington
State University for the identification of other barriers for future
biofuels development and development of strategies for furthering the
penetration of the Washington state fossil fuel market with Washington
produced biofuels, particularly among public entities.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.325.040 and 2007 c 348 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The energy freedom account is created in the state treasury.
All receipts from appropriations made to the account ((and)), any loan
payments of principal and interest derived from loans made under this
chapter, and moneys provided by the federal government for energy
independence and security, innovative energy technologies, energy
efficiency, renewable energy, and conservation must be deposited into
the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
assistance for projects consistent with this chapter or otherwise
authorized by the legislature.
(a) Repayments of principal and interest from loans made to
projects defined in RCW 43.325.010(14) must be used only for financial
assistance to further funding of projects defined under that section.
(b) Repayments of principal and interest from loans made to energy
efficiency improvement, renewable energy improvement, and innovative
energy technology projects as defined in RCW 43.325.010 must be used
only for financial assistance to further funding of projects defined
under that section.
(2) The green energy incentive account is created in the state
treasury as a subaccount of the energy freedom account. All receipts
from appropriations made to the green energy incentive account shall be
deposited into the account, and may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for:
(a) Refueling projects awarded under this chapter;
(b) Pilot projects for plug-in hybrids, including grants provided
for the electrification program set forth in RCW 43.325.110; and
(c) Demonstration projects developed with state universities as
defined in RCW 28B.10.016 and local governments that result in the
design and building of a hydrogen vehicle fueling station.
(3) The nonstate funding energy account is created in the state
treasury as a subaccount of the energy freedom account. All receipts
from appropriations made to the nonstate energy funding account shall
be deposited into the account, and may be spent only after
appropriation.
(4) Any state agency receiving funding from the energy freedom
account is prohibited from retaining greater than three percent of any
funding provided from the energy freedom account for administrative
overhead or other deductions not directly associated with conducting
the research, projects, or other end products that the funding is
designed to produce unless this provision is waived in writing by the
director.
(((4))) (5) Any university, institute, or other entity that is not
a state agency receiving funding from the energy freedom account is
prohibited from retaining greater than fifteen percent of any funding
provided from the energy freedom account for administrative overhead or
other deductions not directly associated with conducting the research,
projects, or other end products that the funding is designed to
produce.
(((5))) (6) Subsections (2) through (((4))) (5) of this section do
not apply to assistance awarded for projects under RCW 43.325.020(3).

Sec. 6 RCW 43.325.070 and 2007 c 348 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If the total requested dollar amount of assistance awarded for
projects under RCW 43.325.020(3) exceeds the amount available in the
energy freedom account created in RCW 43.325.040, the applications must
be prioritized based upon the following criteria:
(a) The extent to which the project will help reduce dependence on
petroleum fuels and imported energy either directly or indirectly;
(b) The extent to which the project will reduce air and water
pollution either directly or indirectly;
(c) The extent to which the project will establish a viable
bioenergy or biofuel production capacity in Washington;
(d) The benefits to Washington's agricultural producers;
(e) The benefits to the health of Washington's forests;
(f) The beneficial uses of biogas; and
(g) The number and quality of jobs and economic benefits created by
the project.
(2) This section does not apply to grants or loans awarded for
refueling projects under RCW 43.325.020 (4) and (5).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 2, 3, 5, and 6 of this act expire
June 30, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---