BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature intends that the nursing
facility medicaid payment system be structured to promote quality care
and quality of life for residents. The legislature also intends that
the nursing facility medicaid payment system is efficient to
administer, accountable to the public and to the legislature, and
transparent to taxpayers and providers. The legislature finds that the
current statute governing the nursing facility medicaid payment system
is overly complex in contrast to Washington state's statutes governing
reimbursement systems for hospitals, physicians, boarding homes, and
other vendors, and that this complexity has made it difficult to focus
on systemic improvements in the nursing facility medicaid payment
system and in other long-term care policies.
(2) The legislature intends to simplify the existing nursing
facility medicaid payment system so that it is fair and predictable.
The legislature further intends that, effective July 1, 2010, the
essential structure of this simplified nursing facility medicaid
payment system will be described in statute, and the details of the
system will be described in rules reviewed by the nursing facility
medicaid payment advisory council and adopted by the department of
social and health services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.46 RCW
to read as follows:
The nursing facility medicaid payment system shall have the
following structure:
(1) Nursing facility medicaid payment rate allocations must be
cost-based and facility-specific and have at least four components:
Direct care, including therapy; support services; indirect care; and
capital costs. Additional noncapital components may be considered if
the entire nursing facility medicaid payment system is budget-neutral
in comparison to the statewide weighted average payment rate that would
have been calculated as of July 1, 2010, using the nursing facility
medicaid payment system in place before that date.
(2) The direct care component shall use a case mix system.
(3) Noncapital components shall be subject to limits based upon a
determination of the median of facilities' costs with respect to a
particular component.
(4) Noncapital rates must be determined from annual cost reports
filed by facilities, with costs rebased every two years. The capital
rate component shall be determined July 1st of each year, based on cost
reports filed by facilities for the preceding year.
(5) Facilities must be separated into peer groups, based on
location.
(6) Payments must be subject to a settlement procedure that
compares costs to rates received and recovers unspent moneys as
appropriate.
(7) An occupancy adjustment must be applied to the indirect and
capital cost centers.
(8) A statewide weighted average payment rate and adjustments to
medicaid rate components for economic trends and conditions shall be
specified in the biennial appropriations act and may adjust payments if
necessary to ensure compliance.
(9) The department of social and health services must ensure that
nursing facility medicaid payment rates, in the aggregate for all
participating nursing facilities, comply with the biennial
appropriations act.
(10) Capital spending on nursing facilities subject to the
requirement of a certificate of capital authorization must be limited
by annual authorization amounts specified by the legislature pursuant
to RCW 74.46.807.
(11) The department is authorized within funds appropriated in the
operating budget to establish payments linked to performance measures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.46 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning July 1, 2009, the economic trends and conditions factor
or factors defined in the biennial appropriations act shall not be
compounded with the economic trends and conditions factor or factors
defined in any other biennial appropriations acts before applying it to
the component rate allocations established in accordance with this
chapter. When no economic trends and conditions factor for either
fiscal year is defined in a biennial appropriations act, no economic
trends and conditions factor or factors defined in any earlier biennial
appropriations act shall be applied solely or compounded to the
component rate allocations established in accordance with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 74.46 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning July 1, 2009, the department shall implement minimum data
set 3.0 under the authority of this section. The department will
notify nursing home contractors twenty-eight days in advance of the
date of implementation of minimum data set 3.0. In the notification,
the department must identify for all quarterly rate settings following
the date of minimum data set 3.0 implementation a previously
established quarterly case mix adjustment established for the quarterly
rate settings to be used for quarterly case mix calculations in direct
care until minimum data set 3.0 is fully implemented. After the
department has fully implemented minimum data set 3.0, it will adjust
any quarter in which it used the previously established quarterly case
mix adjustment using the new minimum data set 3.0 data.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 74.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The nursing facility medicaid payment advisory council is
established, composed of nine members who are residents of the state of
Washington.
(a) The governor shall appoint the members of the council as
follows:
(i) A representative of an association that primarily includes
operators of for-profit nursing facilities;
(ii) A representative of an association that primarily includes
operators of not-for-profit nursing facilities;
(iii) A representative of an organization that provides a wide
variety of health care services in various care settings, including
nursing facilities;
(iv) A representative of a union that represents employees of
nursing facilities;
(v) A nursing home administrator licensed under chapter 18.52 RCW
who has practiced continuously in Washington in long-term care for
three years immediately preceding appointment;
(vi) A director of nursing services of a Washington nursing
facility who has practiced continuously in Washington for at least
three years immediately preceding appointment;
(vii) A representative of a senior advocacy organization;
(viii) A representative from the office of financial management;
(ix) A representative of an independent nursing facility not a
member of an industry association;
(x) A long-term care ombudsman;
(xi) A consumer advocate for developmental disabilities; and
(xii) A consumer advocate for long-term care.
(b) The governor shall appoint a chairperson for the council from
the council's membership for a term of one year or until a successor is
appointed.
(2) The term of office of each member shall be three years or until
a successor has been appointed and confirmed.
(3) Members of the council shall receive no compensation for their
services but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(4) The council shall:
(a) Act in an advisory capacity to the department of social and
health services on matters pertaining to the nursing facility medicaid
payment system;
(b) Elect a secretary from among its members, who shall hold office
for one year or until a successor is elected;
(c) Hold an annual meeting and hold other meetings at such times
and places as the department of social and health services or the
chairperson of the council may direct;
(d) In its discretion, invite other representatives to its meetings
in addition to its members, depending on the topics to be discussed;
and
(e) Keep a record of its proceedings that is open to inspection at
all times.
(5) The department of social and health services shall provide
administrative support to the council.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 74.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services shall submit to
the nursing facility medicaid payment advisory council any proposed
rule implementing the nursing facility medicaid payment system, for the
council's review and comment.
(2) After review of any proposed rule submitted to the council
under subsection (1) of this section, the council shall comment
publicly on it. The council's comments shall be made part of the
official rule-making file of any rule proposed by the department. All
other relevant laws shall continue to apply to the department's
consideration and adoption of rules.

Sec. 7 RCW 74.46.421 and 2008 c 263 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The purpose of ((part E of)) this chapter is to determine
nursing facility medicaid payment rates that, in the aggregate for all
participating nursing facilities, are in accordance with the biennial
appropriations act.
(2)(a) The department shall use the nursing facility medicaid
payment rate methodologies described in this chapter and in rules
adopted by the department to determine initial component rate
allocations for each medicaid nursing facility.
(b) The initial component rate allocations shall be subject to
adjustment as provided in this section in order to assure that the
statewide weighted average payment rate to nursing facilities is less
than or equal to the statewide weighted average payment rate specified
in the biennial appropriations act.
(3) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as creating a legal
right or entitlement to any payment that (a) has not been adjusted
under this section or (b) would cause the statewide weighted average
payment rate to exceed the statewide weighted average payment rate
specified in the biennial appropriations act.
(4)(a) The statewide weighted average payment rate for any state
fiscal year under the nursing facility medicaid payment system,
weighted by patient days, shall not exceed the annual statewide
weighted average nursing facility payment rate identified for that
fiscal year in the biennial appropriations act.
(b) If the department determines that the weighted average nursing
facility payment rate calculated in accordance with this chapter is
likely to exceed the weighted average nursing facility payment rate
identified in the biennial appropriations act, then the department
shall adjust all nursing facility payment rates proportional to the
amount by which the weighted average rate allocations would otherwise
exceed the budgeted rate amount. Any such adjustments for the current
fiscal year shall only be made prospectively, not retrospectively, and
shall be applied proportionately to each component rate allocation for
each facility.
(c) If any final order or final judgment, including a final order
or final judgment resulting from an adjudicative proceeding or judicial
review permitted by chapter 34.05 RCW, would result in an increase to
a nursing facility's payment rate for a prior fiscal year or years, the
department shall consider whether the increased rate for that facility
would result in the statewide weighted average payment rate for all
facilities for such fiscal year or years to be exceeded. If the
increased rate would result in the statewide weighted average payment
rate for such year or years being exceeded, the department shall
increase that nursing facility's payment rate to meet the final order
or judgment only to the extent that it does not result in an increase
to the statewide weighted average payment rate for all facilities.

Sec. 8 RCW 74.46.800 and 1998 c 322 s 42 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Consistent with the principles and provisions described in
section 2 of this act, the department shall have authority to adopt,
amend, and rescind such administrative rules and definitions as it
deems necessary to carry out the policies and purposes of this chapter,
to administer the nursing facility medicaid payment system, to audit
nursing facilities, and to resolve issues and develop procedures that
it deems necessary to implement, update, and improve the case mix
elements of the nursing facility medicaid payment system. In adopting
rules, the department may consider the potential impact of the payment
system on the level and quality of services received by nursing
facility residents; the anticipated impact of the system on private pay
clients and on populations in other parts of the long-term care system;
and the special circumstances presented by changes of ownership of
nursing facilities, bed banking, exceptional care needs of residents,
addition or deletion of licensed beds, facilities located in nonurban
areas, closure of facilities, and facilities with low-occupancy levels,
as well as other concerns.
(2) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require the
department to adopt or employ any calculations, steps, tests,
methodologies, alternate methodologies, indexes, formulas, mathematical
or statistical models, concepts, or procedures for medicaid rate
setting or payment that are not expressly called for in this chapter.
(3) By December 31, 2009, the department must adopt comprehensive
rules to describe and administer the nursing facility medicaid payment
system, to be effective July 1, 2010. The system described in such
rules must be budget-neutral in comparison to the statewide weighted
average payment rate that would have been calculated as of July 1,
2010, using the nursing facility medicaid payment system in place
before that date.

Sec. 9 RCW 74.46.431 and 2008 c 263 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Effective July 1, 1999, nursing facility medicaid payment rate
allocations shall be facility-specific and shall have seven components:
Direct care, therapy care, support services, operations, property,
financing allowance, and variable return. The department shall
establish and adjust each of these components, as provided in this
section and elsewhere in this chapter, for each medicaid nursing
facility in this state.
(2) Component rate allocations in therapy care, support services,
variable return, operations, property, and financing allowance for
essential community providers as defined in this chapter shall be based
upon a minimum facility occupancy of eighty-five percent of licensed
beds, regardless of how many beds are set up or in use. For all
facilities other than essential community providers, effective July 1,
2001, component rate allocations in direct care, therapy care, support
services, and variable return shall be based upon a minimum facility
occupancy of eighty-five percent of licensed beds. For all facilities
other than essential community providers, effective July 1, 2002, the
component rate allocations in operations, property, and financing
allowance shall be based upon a minimum facility occupancy of ninety
percent of licensed beds, regardless of how many beds are set up or in
use. For all facilities, effective July 1, 2006, the component rate
allocation in direct care shall be based upon actual facility
occupancy. The median cost limits used to set component rate
allocations shall be based on the applicable minimum occupancy
percentage. In determining each facility's therapy care component rate
allocation under RCW 74.46.511, the department shall apply the
applicable minimum facility occupancy adjustment before creating the
array of facilities' adjusted therapy costs per adjusted resident day.
In determining each facility's support services component rate
allocation under RCW 74.46.515(3), the department shall apply the
applicable minimum facility occupancy adjustment before creating the
array of facilities' adjusted support services costs per adjusted
resident day. In determining each facility's operations component rate
allocation under RCW 74.46.521(3), the department shall apply the
minimum facility occupancy adjustment before creating the array of
facilities' adjusted general operations costs per adjusted resident
day.
(3) Information and data sources used in determining medicaid
payment rate allocations, including formulas, procedures, cost report
periods, resident assessment instrument formats, resident assessment
methodologies, and resident classification and case mix weighting
methodologies, may be substituted or altered from time to time as
determined by the department.
(4)(a) Direct care component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months. Adjusted
cost report data from 1996 will be used for October 1, 1998, through
June 30, 2001, direct care component rate allocations; adjusted cost
report data from 1999 will be used for July 1, 2001, through June 30,
2006, direct care component rate allocations. Adjusted cost report
data from 2003 will be used for July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007,
direct care component rate allocations. Adjusted cost report data from
2005 will be used for July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2009, direct care
component rate allocations. Effective July 1, 2009, the direct care
component rate allocation shall be rebased biennially, and thereafter
for each odd-numbered year beginning July 1st, using the adjusted cost
report data for the calendar year two years immediately preceding the
rate rebase period, so that adjusted cost report data for calendar year
2007 is used for July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011, and so forth.
(b) Direct care component rate allocations based on 1996 cost
report data shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial
appropriations act for facilities whose direct care component rate is
set equal to their adjusted June 30, 1998, rate, as provided in RCW
74.46.506(5)(i).
(c) Direct care component rate allocations based on 1999 cost
report data shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial
appropriations act for facilities whose direct care component rate is
set equal to their adjusted June 30, 1998, rate, as provided in RCW
74.46.506(5)(i).
(d) Direct care component rate allocations based on 2003 cost
report data shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial
appropriations act for facilities whose direct care component rate is
set equal to their adjusted June 30, 2006, rate, as provided in RCW
74.46.506(5)(i).
(e) Direct care component rate allocations established in
accordance with this chapter shall be adjusted annually for economic
trends and conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. The economic trends and conditions factor or
factors defined in the biennial appropriations act shall not be
compounded with the economic trends and conditions factor or factors
defined in any other biennial appropriations acts before applying it to
the direct care component rate allocation established in accordance
with this chapter. When no economic trends and conditions factor or
factors for either fiscal year are defined in a biennial appropriations
act, no economic trends and conditions factor or factors defined in any
earlier biennial appropriations act shall be applied solely or
compounded to the direct care component rate allocation established in
accordance with this chapter.
(5)(a) Therapy care component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months. Adjusted
cost report data from 1996 will be used for October 1, 1998, through
June 30, 2001, therapy care component rate allocations; adjusted cost
report data from 1999 will be used for July 1, 2001, through June 30,
2005, therapy care component rate allocations. Adjusted cost report
data from 1999 will continue to be used for July 1, 2005, through June
30, 2007, therapy care component rate allocations. Adjusted cost
report data from 2005 will be used for July 1, 2007, through June 30,
2009, therapy care component rate allocations. Effective July 1, 2009,
and thereafter for each odd-numbered year beginning July 1st, the
therapy care component rate allocation shall be cost rebased
biennially, using the adjusted cost report data for the calendar year
two years immediately preceding the rate rebase period, so that
adjusted cost report data for calendar year 2007 is used for July 1,
2009, through June 30, 2011, and so forth.
(b) Therapy care component rate allocations established in
accordance with this chapter shall be adjusted annually for economic
trends and conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. The economic trends and conditions factor or
factors defined in the biennial appropriations act shall not be
compounded with the economic trends and conditions factor or factors
defined in any other biennial appropriations acts before applying it to
the therapy care component rate allocation established in accordance
with this chapter. When no economic trends and conditions factor or
factors for either fiscal year are defined in a biennial appropriations
act, no economic trends and conditions factor or factors defined in any
earlier biennial appropriations act shall be applied solely or
compounded to the therapy care component rate allocation established in
accordance with this chapter.
(6)(a) Support services component rate allocations shall be
established using adjusted cost report data covering at least six
months. Adjusted cost report data from 1996 shall be used for October
1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, support services component rate
allocations; adjusted cost report data from 1999 shall be used for July
1, 2001, through June 30, 2005, support services component rate
allocations. Adjusted cost report data from 1999 will continue to be
used for July 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007, support services
component rate allocations. Adjusted cost report data from 2005 will
be used for July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2009, support services
component rate allocations. Effective July 1, 2009, and thereafter for
each odd-numbered year beginning July 1st, the support services
component rate allocation shall be cost rebased biennially, using the
adjusted cost report data for the calendar year two years immediately
preceding the rate rebase period, so that adjusted cost report data for
calendar year 2007 is used for July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011, and
so forth.
(b) Support services component rate allocations established in
accordance with this chapter shall be adjusted annually for economic
trends and conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. The economic trends and conditions factor or
factors defined in the biennial appropriations act shall not be
compounded with the economic trends and conditions factor or factors
defined in any other biennial appropriations acts before applying it to
the support services component rate allocation established in
accordance with this chapter. When no economic trends and conditions
factor or factors for either fiscal year are defined in a biennial
appropriations act, no economic trends and conditions factor or factors
defined in any earlier biennial appropriations act shall be applied
solely or compounded to the support services component rate allocation
established in accordance with this chapter.
(7)(a) Operations component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months. Adjusted
cost report data from 1996 shall be used for October 1, 1998, through
June 30, 2001, operations component rate allocations; adjusted cost
report data from 1999 shall be used for July 1, 2001, through June 30,
2006, operations component rate allocations. Adjusted cost report data
from 2003 will be used for July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007,
operations component rate allocations. Adjusted cost report data from
2005 will be used for July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2009, operations
component rate allocations. Effective July 1, 2009, and thereafter for
each odd-numbered year beginning July 1st, the operations component
rate allocation shall be cost rebased biennially, using the adjusted
cost report data for the calendar year two years immediately preceding
the rate rebase period, so that adjusted cost report data for calendar
year 2007 is used for July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011, and so
forth.
(b) Operations component rate allocations established in accordance
with this chapter shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. The economic trends and conditions factor or
factors defined in the biennial appropriations act shall not be
compounded with the economic trends and conditions factor or factors
defined in any other biennial appropriations acts before applying it to
the operations component rate allocation established in accordance with
this chapter. When no economic trends and conditions factor or factors
for either fiscal year are defined in a biennial appropriations act, no
economic trends and conditions factor or factors defined in any earlier
biennial appropriations act shall be applied solely or compounded to
the operations component rate allocation established in accordance with
this chapter. A different economic trends and conditions adjustment
factor or factors may be defined in the biennial appropriations act for
facilities whose operations component rate is set equal to their
adjusted June 30, 2006, rate, as provided in RCW 74.46.521(4).
(8) For July 1, 1998, through September 30, 1998, a facility's
property and return on investment component rates shall be the
facility's June 30, 1998, property and return on investment component
rates, without increase. For October 1, 1998, through June 30, 1999,
a facility's property and return on investment component rates shall be
rebased utilizing 1997 adjusted cost report data covering at least six
months of data.
(9) Total payment rates under the nursing facility medicaid payment
system shall not exceed facility rates charged to the general public
for comparable services.
(10) Medicaid contractors shall pay to all facility staff a minimum
wage of the greater of the state minimum wage or the federal minimum
wage.
(11) The department shall establish in rule procedures, principles,
and conditions for determining component rate allocations for
facilities in circumstances not directly addressed by this chapter,
including but not limited to: The need to prorate inflation for
partial-period cost report data, newly constructed facilities, existing
facilities entering the medicaid program for the first time or after a
period of absence from the program, existing facilities with expanded
new bed capacity, existing medicaid facilities following a change of
ownership of the nursing facility business, facilities banking beds or
converting beds back into service, facilities temporarily reducing the
number of set-up beds during a remodel, facilities having less than six
months of either resident assessment, cost report data, or both, under
the current contractor prior to rate setting, and other circumstances.
(12) The department shall establish in rule procedures, principles,
and conditions, including necessary threshold costs, for adjusting
rates to reflect capital improvements or new requirements imposed by
the department or the federal government. Any such rate adjustments
are subject to the provisions of RCW 74.46.421.
(13) Effective July 1, 2001, medicaid rates shall continue to be
revised downward in all components, in accordance with department
rules, for facilities converting banked beds to active service under
chapter 70.38 RCW, by using the facility's increased licensed bed
capacity to recalculate minimum occupancy for rate setting. However,
for facilities other than essential community providers which bank beds
under chapter 70.38 RCW, after May 25, 2001, medicaid rates shall be
revised upward, in accordance with department rules, in direct care,
therapy care, support services, and variable return components only, by
using the facility's decreased licensed bed capacity to recalculate
minimum occupancy for rate setting, but no upward revision shall be
made to operations, property, or financing allowance component rates.
The direct care component rate allocation shall be adjusted, without
using the minimum occupancy assumption, for facilities that convert
banked beds to active service, under chapter 70.38 RCW, beginning on
July 1, 2006. Effective July 1, 2007, component rate allocations for
direct care shall be based on actual patient days regardless of whether
a facility has converted banked beds to active service.
(14) Facilities obtaining a certificate of need or a certificate of
need exemption under chapter 70.38 RCW after June 30, 2001, must have
a certificate of capital authorization in order for (a) the
depreciation resulting from the capitalized addition to be included in
calculation of the facility's property component rate allocation; and
(b) the net invested funds associated with the capitalized addition to
be included in calculation of the facility's financing allowance rate
allocation.

Sec. 10 RCW 74.46.485 and 1998 c 322 s 22 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall:
(a) Employ the resource utilization group III case mix
classification methodology. The department shall use the forty-four
group index maximizing model for the resource utilization group III
grouper version 5.10, but the department may revise or update the
classification methodology to reflect advances or refinements in
resident assessment or classification, subject to federal requirements;
and
(b) Implement minimum data set 3.0 under the authority of this
section and RCW 74.46.431(3). The department must notify nursing home
contractors twenty-eight days in advance the date of implementation of
the minimum data set 3.0. In the notification, the department must
identify for all quarterly rate settings following the date of minimum
data set 3.0 implementation a previously established quarterly case mix
adjustment established for the quarterly rate settings that will be
used for quarterly case mix calculations in direct care until minimum
data set 3.0 is fully implemented. After the department has fully
implemented minimum data set 3.0, it must adjust any quarter in which
it used the previously established quarterly case mix adjustment using
the new minimum data set 3.0 data.
(2) A default case mix group shall be established for cases in
which the resident dies or is discharged for any purpose prior to
completion of the resident's initial assessment. The default case mix
group and case mix weight for these cases shall be designated by the
department.
(3) A default case mix group may also be established for cases in
which there is an untimely assessment for the resident. The default
case mix group and case mix weight for these cases shall be designated
by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The following acts or parts of acts, as now
existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed:
(1) RCW 74.46.010 (Short title -- Purpose) and 1998 c 322 s 1 & 1980
c 177 s 1;
(2) RCW 74.46.020 (Definitions) and 2007 c 508 s 7, 2006 c 258 s 1,
2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 1, 1999 c 353 s 1, 1998 c 322 s 2, 1995 1st sp.s.
c 18 s 90, 1993 sp.s. c 13 s 1, 1991 sp.s. c 8 s 11, 1989 c 372 s 17,
1987 c 476 s 6, 1985 c 361 s 16, 1982 c 117 s 1, & 1980 c 177 s 2;
(3) RCW 74.46.030 (Principles of reporting requirements) and 1980
c 177 s 3;
(4) RCW 74.46.040 (Due dates for cost reports) and 1998 c 322 s 3,
1985 c 361 s 4, 1983 1st ex.s. c 67 s 1, & 1980 c 177 s 4;
(5) RCW 74.46.050 (Improperly completed or late cost report--Fines -- Adverse rate actions -- Rules) and 1998 c 322 s 4, 1985 c 361 s 5,
& 1980 c 177 s 5;
(6) RCW 74.46.060 (Completing cost reports and maintaining records)
and 1998 c 322 s 5, 1985 c 361 s 6, 1983 1st ex.s. c 67 s 2, & 1980 c
177 s 6;
(7) RCW 74.46.080 (Requirements for retention of records by the
contractor) and 1998 c 322 s 6, 1985 c 361 s 7, 1983 1st ex.s. c 67 s
3, & 1980 c 177 s 8;
(8) RCW 74.46.090 (Retention of cost reports and resident
assessment information by the department) and 1998 c 322 s 7, 1985 c
361 s 8, & 1980 c 177 s 9;
(9) RCW 74.46.100 (Purposes of department audits--Examination--Incomplete or incorrect reports -- Contractor's duties -- Access to
facility -- Fines -- Adverse rate actions) and 1998 c 322 s 8, 1985 c 361
s 9, 1983 1st ex.s. c 67 s 4, & 1980 c 177 s 10;
(10) RCW 74.46.155 (Reconciliation of medicaid resident days to
billed days and medicaid payments -- Payments due -- Accrued interest--Withholding funds) and 1998 c 322 s 9;
(11) RCW 74.46.165 (Proposed settlement report -- Payment refunds--Overpayments -- Determination of unused rate funds -- Total and component
payment rates) and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 2 & 1998 c 322 s 10;
(12) RCW 74.46.190 (Principles of allowable costs) and 1998 c 322
s 11, 1995 1st sp.s. c 18 s 96, 1983 1st ex.s. c 67 s 12, & 1980 c 177
s 19;
(13) RCW 74.46.200 (Offset of miscellaneous revenues) and 1980 c
177 s 20;
(14) RCW 74.46.220 (Payments to related organizations -- Limits--Documentation) and 1998 c 322 s 12 & 1980 c 177 s 22;
(15) RCW 74.46.230 (Initial cost of operation) and 1998 c 322 s 13,
1993 sp.s. c 13 s 3, & 1980 c 177 s 23;
(16) RCW 74.46.240 (Education and training) and 1980 c 177 s 24;
(17) RCW 74.46.250 (Owner or relative -- Compensation) and 1980 c 177
s 25;
(18) RCW 74.46.270 (Disclosure and approval or rejection of cost
allocation) and 1998 c 322 s 14, 1983 1st ex.s. c 67 s 13, & 1980 c 177
s 27;
(19) RCW 74.46.280 (Management fees, agreements -- Limitation on
scope of services) and 1998 c 322 s 15, 1993 sp.s. c 13 s 4, & 1980 c
177 s 28;
(20) RCW 74.46.290 (Expense for construction interest) and 1980 c
177 s 29;
(21) RCW 74.46.300 (Operating leases of office equipment--Rules)
and 1998 c 322 s 16 & 1980 c 177 s 30;
(22) RCW 74.46.310 (Capitalization) and 1983 1st ex.s. c 67 s 16 &
1980 c 177 s 31;
(23) RCW 74.46.320 (Depreciation expense) and 1980 c 177 s 32;
(24) RCW 74.46.330 (Depreciable assets) and 1980 c 177 s 33;
(25) RCW 74.46.340 (Land, improvements -- Depreciation) and 1980 c
177 s 34;
(26) RCW 74.46.350 (Methods of depreciation) and 1999 c 353 s 13 &
1980 c 177 s 35;
(27) RCW 74.46.360 (Cost basis of land and depreciation base of
depreciable assets) and 1999 c 353 s 2, 1997 c 277 s 1, 1991 sp.s. c 8
s 18, & 1989 c 372 s 14;
(28) RCW 74.46.370 (Lives of assets) and 1999 c 353 s 14, 1997 c
277 s 2, & 1980 c 177 s 37;
(29) RCW 74.46.380 (Depreciable assets) and 1993 sp.s. c 13 s 5,
1991 sp.s. c 8 s 12, & 1980 c 177 s 38;
(30) RCW 74.46.390 (Gains and losses upon replacement of
depreciable assets) and 1980 c 177 s 39;
(31) RCW 74.46.410 (Unallowable costs) and 2007 c 508 s 1, 2001 1st
sp.s. c 8 s 3, 1998 c 322 s 17, 1995 1st sp.s. c 18 s 97, 1993 sp.s. c
13 s 6, 1991 sp.s. c 8 s 15, 1989 c 372 s 2, 1986 c 175 s 3, 1983 1st
ex.s. c 67 s 17, & 1980 c 177 s 41;
(32) RCW 74.46.431 (Nursing facility medicaid payment rate
allocations -- Components -- Minimum wage -- Rules) and 2008 c 263 s 2, 2007
c 508 s 2, 2006 c 258 s 2, 2005 c 518 s 944, 2004 c 276 s 913, 2001 1st
sp.s. c 8 s 5, 1999 c 353 s 4, & 1998 c 322 s 19;
(33) RCW 74.46.433 (Variable return component rate allocation) and
2006 c 258 s 3, 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 6, & 1999 c 353 s 9;
(34) RCW 74.46.435 (Property component rate allocation) and 2001
1st sp.s. c 8 s 7, 1999 c 353 s 10, & 1998 c 322 s 29;
(35) RCW 74.46.437 (Financing allowance component rate allocation)
and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 8 & 1999 c 353 s 11;
(36) RCW 74.46.439 (Facilities leased in arm's-length agreements--Recomputation of financing allowance -- Reimbursement for annualized
lease payments -- Rate adjustment) and 1999 c 353 s 12;
(37) RCW 74.46.441 (Public disclosure of rate-setting information)
and 1998 c 322 s 20;
(38) RCW 74.46.445 (Contractors -- Rate adjustments) and 1999 c 353
s 15;
(39) RCW 74.46.475 (Submitted cost report -- Analysis and adjustment
by department) and 1998 c 322 s 21, 1985 c 361 s 13, & 1983 1st ex.s.
c 67 s 23;
(40) RCW 74.46.485 (Case mix classification methodology) and 1998
c 322 s 22;
(41) RCW 74.46.496 (Case mix weights -- Determination -- Revisions) and
2006 c 258 s 4 & 1998 c 322 s 23;
(42) RCW 74.46.501 (Average case mix indexes determined quarterly--Facility average case mix index -- Medicaid average case mix index) and
2006 c 258 s 5, 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 9, & 1998 c 322 s 24;
(43) RCW 74.46.506 (Direct care component rate allocations--Determination -- Quarterly updates -- Fines) and 2007 c 508 s 3, 2006 c 258
s 6, & 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 10;
(44) RCW 74.46.508 (Direct care component rate allocation--Increases -- Rules) and 2003 1st sp.s. c 6 s 1 & 1999 c 181 s 2;
(45) RCW 74.46.511 (Therapy care component rate allocation--Determination) and 2008 c 263 s 3, 2007 c 508 s 4, & 2001 1st sp.s. c
8 s 11;
(46) RCW 74.46.515 (Support services component rate allocation--Determination -- Emergency situations) and 2008 c 263 s 4, 2001 1st sp.s.
c 8 s 12, 1999 c 353 s 7, & 1998 c 322 s 27;
(47) RCW 74.46.521 (Operations component rate allocation--Determination) and 2007 c 508 s 5, 2006 c 258 s 7, 2001 1st sp.s. c 8
s 13, 1999 c 353 s 8, & 1998 c 322 s 28;
(48) RCW 74.46.531 (Department may adjust component rates--Contractor may request -- Errors or omissions) and 1998 c 322 s 31;
(49) RCW 74.46.533 (Combined and estimated rebased rates--Determination -- Hold harmless provision) and 2007 c 508 s 6;
(50) RCW 74.46.600 (Billing period) and 1980 c 177 s 60;
(51) RCW 74.46.610 (Billing procedure -- Rules) and 1998 c 322 s 32,
1983 1st ex.s. c 67 s 33, & 1980 c 177 s 61;
(52) RCW 74.46.620 (Payment) and 1998 c 322 s 33 & 1980 c 177 s 62;
(53) RCW 74.46.625 (Supplemental payments) and 1999 c 392 s 1;
(54) RCW 74.46.630 (Charges to patients) and 1998 c 322 s 34 & 1980
c 177 s 63;
(55) RCW 74.46.640 (Suspension of payments) and 1998 c 322 s 35,
1995 1st sp.s. c 18 s 112, 1983 1st ex.s. c 67 s 34, & 1980 c 177 s 64;
(56) RCW 74.46.650 (Termination of payments) and 1998 c 322 s 36 &
1980 c 177 s 65;
(57) RCW 74.46.660 (Conditions of participation) and 1998 c 322 s
37, 1992 c 215 s 1, 1991 sp.s. c 8 s 13, & 1980 c 177 s 66;
(58) RCW 74.46.680 (Change of ownership -- Assignment of department's
contract) and 1998 c 322 s 38, 1985 c 361 s 2, & 1980 c 177 s 68;
(59) RCW 74.46.690 (Change of ownership -- Final reports -- Settlement)
and 1998 c 322 s 39, 1995 1st sp.s. c 18 s 113, 1985 c 361 s 3, 1983
1st ex.s. c 67 s 36, & 1980 c 177 s 69;
(60) RCW 74.46.700 (Resident personal funds -- Records -- Rules) and
1991 sp.s. c 8 s 19 & 1980 c 177 s 70;
(61) RCW 74.46.711 (Resident personal funds -- Conveyance upon death
of resident) and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 14 & 1995 1st sp.s. c 18 s 69;
(62) RCW 74.46.770 (Contractor appeals -- Challenges of laws, rules,
or contract provisions -- Challenge based on federal law) and 1998 c 322
s 40, 1995 1st sp.s. c 18 s 114, 1983 1st ex.s. c 67 s 39, & 1980 c 177
s 77;
(63) RCW 74.46.780 (Appeals or exception procedure) and 1998 c 322
s 41, 1995 1st sp.s. c 18 s 115, 1989 c 175 s 159, 1983 1st ex.s. c 67
s 40, & 1980 c 177 s 78;
(64) RCW 74.46.790 (Denial, suspension, or revocation of license or
provisional license -- Penalties) and 1980 c 177 s 79;
(65) RCW 74.46.820 (Public disclosure) and 2005 c 274 s 356, 1998
c 322 s 43, 1985 c 361 s 14, 1983 1st ex.s. c 67 s 41, & 1980 c 177 s
82;
(66) RCW 74.46.835 (AIDS pilot nursing facility -- Payment for direct
care) and 1998 c 322 s 46;
(67) RCW 74.46.900 (Severability -- 1980 c 177) and 1980 c 177 s 93;
(68) RCW 74.46.901 (Effective dates -- 1983 1st ex.s. c 67; 1980 c
177) and 1983 1st ex.s. c 67 s 49, 1981 1st ex.s. c 2 s 10, & 1980 c
177 s 94;
(69) RCW 74.46.902 (Section captions -- 1980 c 177) and 1980 c 177 s
89;
(70) RCW 74.46.905 (Severability -- 1983 1st ex.s. c 67) and 1983 1st
ex.s. c 67 s 43;
(71) RCW 74.46.906 (Effective date -- 1998 c 322 §§ 1-37, 40-49, and
52-54) and 1998 c 322 s 55; and
(72) RCW 74.46.907 (Severability -- 1998 c 322) and 1998 c 322 s 56.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 74.46 RCW
to read as follows:
Rates under the nursing facility medicaid payment system for care
provided during the period before July 1, 2010, shall continue to be
calculated and settled on the basis of the statutes and rules in effect
during that period.

Sec. 13 RCW 74.46.835 and 1998 c 322 s 46 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Payment for direct care at the pilot nursing facility in King
county designed to meet the service needs of residents living with
AIDS, as defined in RCW 70.24.017, and as specifically authorized for
this purpose under chapter 9, Laws of 1989 1st ex. sess., shall be
exempt from case mix methods of rate determination set forth in this
chapter and shall be exempt from ((the)) a direct care metropolitan
statistical area peer group cost limitation ((set forth in this
chapter)).
(2) Direct care component rates at the AIDS pilot facility shall be
based on direct care reported costs at the pilot facility, ((utilizing
the same three-year, rate-setting cycle prescribed for other nursing
facilities, and)) as supported by a staffing benchmark based upon a
department-approved acuity measurement system.
(3) The provisions of RCW 74.46.421 and all other rate-setting
principles, cost lids, and limits, including settlement ((as provided
in RCW 74.46.165)), shall apply to the AIDS pilot facility.
(4) This section applies only to the AIDS pilot nursing facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Sections 2 through 4 and 11 of this act
take effect July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Sections 5 through 10 and 12 through 13 of
this act take effect July 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---