BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.20A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt a rule specifying the number and
geographic boundaries of the department's regional service delivery
system.
(2) Each departmental administration and division shall reorganize
its delivery system to be consistent with the department's regional
boundaries.
(3) The department shall achieve at least the same percentage of
administrative savings at the regional and headquarters level as
realized through the reduction in regional support networks as provided
in section 3 of this act.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.20A.090 and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 515 are each amended
to read as follows:
The secretary shall appoint a deputy secretary, a department
personnel director, and such assistant secretaries as shall be needed
to administer the department. The deputy secretary shall have charge
and general supervision of the department in the absence or disability
of the secretary, and in case of a vacancy in the office of secretary,
shall continue in charge of the department until a successor is
appointed and qualified, or until the governor shall appoint an acting
secretary. ((The secretary shall appoint an assistant secretary to
administer the juvenile rehabilitation responsibilities required of the
department by chapters 13.04, 13.40, and 13.50 RCW.)) The officers
appointed under this section, and exempt from the provisions of the
state civil service law ((by the terms of RCW 41.06.076)), shall be
paid salaries to be fixed by the governor in accordance with the
procedure established by law for the fixing of salaries for officers
exempt from the operation of the state civil service law.

Sec. 3 RCW 71.24.360 and 2005 c 504 s 805 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department may establish new regional support network
boundaries in any part of the state where more than one network chooses
not to respond to, or is unable to substantially meet the requirements
of, the request for qualifications under section 4, chapter 503, Laws
of 2005 or where a regional support network is subject to reprocurement
under section 6, chapter 503, Laws of 2005. The department may
establish no fewer than ((eight)) three and no more than ((fourteen))
six regional support networks under this chapter. ((No entity shall be
responsible for more than three regional support networks.))

--- END ---