BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.70.125 and 2007 c 279 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The federal government requires Washington health care
facilities to be certified in order to receive federal health care
program reimbursement. The department receives funding from the
federal government to perform the ((certifications and
recertifications)) initial medicare certification surveys of these
health care facilities. When the federal government does not provide
sufficient funding to cover all ((certifications and recertifications))
applicant requests for initial medicare certification surveys, the
secretary ((may)) must assess fees on ((certification and
recertification)) the applicants to fund the ((certifications and
recertifications)) initial medicare certification surveys, as provided
in this section.
(2)(a) When informed by the department that the centers for
medicare and medicaid services did not provide adequate federal funding
to do initial medicare certification surveys, an applicant for a survey
may pay the department a fee to conduct the survey as follows:

Ambulatory surgery center $1,575

Critical access hospital $1,750

End-stage renal disease
facility $850

Home health agency $1,985

Hospice agency $1,985

Hospital $1,750

Rehabilitation facility $450

Rural health clinic $600

Transplant hospital $850

(b) If the applicant does not pay the fee, the department has no
obligation to conduct the initial medicare certification surveys.
(3) Nothing in this section precludes an applicant from obtaining
an initial medicare certification survey from a national accreditation
organization recognized for this purpose by the centers for medicare
and medicaid services.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "initial medicare
certification survey" means an on-site visit conducted by department
staff for the purpose of determining compliance with medicare
regulations. This survey is required before a health care facility can
receive medicare or medicaid reimbursement.

--- END ---