BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 67.40 RCW
to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Convention place station expansion" means the expansion of the
state convention and trade center authorized in this chapter to be
located in the city of Seattle primarily in airspace above the
convention place metro transit station between Boren Avenue, Olive Way,
9th Avenue, and Pine Street, with connection to the existing state
convention and trade center facilities.
(2) "Long-term financing" means any type of financing authorized by
the legislature for the long-term financing of the convention place
station expansion and may include but not be limited to bonds, notes,
and other evidences of indebtedness of the state subject to chapter
39.42 RCW, and a financing contract subject to chapter 39.94 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 67.40 RCW
to read as follows:
The corporation may proceed with convention place station expansion
including the planning, environmental studies, design, preparation of
construction plans and specifications, exploration of potential
codevelopment, bidding and contingent construction contracting,
acquisition of options in real and personal property, and other
activities for the expansion. In anticipation of a request from the
corporation for long-term financing, the corporation shall provide an
interim report to the house of representatives committee on capital
budget and the senate committee on ways and means on or before October
15, 2009, and a final report to the house of representatives committee
on capital budget and the senate committee on ways and means on or
before January 1, 2010, outlining anticipated costs to construct and
equip the proposed convention place station expansion. The corporation
may proceed with long-term financing for the purpose of paying costs of
constructing and equipping the expansion project only upon
authorization by the legislature of the long-term financing.

--- END ---