BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.17.420 and 2007 c 27 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall establish, by rule, a crane certification
program for cranes used in construction. In establishing rules, the
department shall consult nationally recognized crane standards.
(2) The crane certification program must include, at a minimum, the
following:
(a) The department shall establish certification requirements for
crane inspectors, including an experience requirement, an education
requirement, a training requirement, and other necessary requirements
determined by the director;
(b) The department shall establish a process for certified crane
inspectors to issue temporary certificates of operation for a crane and
the department to issue a final certificate of operation for a crane
after a certified crane inspector determines that the crane meets
safety or health standards, including meeting or exceeding national
periodic inspection requirements recognized by the department;
(c) Crane owners must ensure that cranes are inspected and load
proof tested by a certified crane inspector at least annually and after
any significant modification or significant repairs of structural
parts. If the use of weights for a unit proof load test is not
possible or reasonable, other recording test equipment may be used. In
adopting rules implementing this requirement, the department may
consider similar standards and practices used by the federal
government;
(d) Tower cranes and tower crane assembly parts must be inspected
by a certified crane inspector both prior to assembly and following
erection of a tower crane;
(e) Before installation of a nonstandard tower crane base, the
engineering design of the nonstandard base shall be reviewed and
acknowledged as acceptable by an independent professional engineer;
(f) A certified crane inspector must notify the department and the
crane owner if, after inspection, the certified crane inspector finds
that the crane does not meet safety or health standards. A certified
crane inspector shall not attest that a crane meets safety or health
standards until any deficiencies are corrected and the correction is
verified by the certified crane inspector; ((and))
(g) A certified crane inspector employed by a crane owner, repair
facility, dealer, lessor, or end user may not conduct the inspection
and load proof testing of any crane that has been modified, altered, or
repaired by the employer of the certified crane inspector; and
(h) Inspection reports including all information and documentation
obtained from a crane inspection shall be made available or provided to
the department by a certified crane inspector upon request.
(3) Except as provided in RCW 49.17.410(2), any crane operated in
the state must have a valid temporary or final certificate of operation
issued by the certified crane inspector or department posted in the
operator's cab or station.
(4) Certificates of operation issued by the department under the
crane certification program established in this section are valid for
one year from the effective date of the temporary operating certificate
issued by the certified crane inspector.
(5) This section does not apply to maritime cranes regulated by the
department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2010.

--- END ---