BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A comprehensive plan, development regulation, or amendment to
a comprehensive plan or development regulation is effective when
approved by the department.
(2) Upon receiving a comprehensive plan, development regulation, or
amendment to a comprehensive plan or development regulation adopted by
a county or city, the department shall:
(a) Provide notice to and an opportunity for written comment by all
interested parties of record as a part of the local government review
process for the proposal and to all persons, groups, and agencies that
have requested in writing notice of proposed comprehensive plans,
development regulations, or amendments to comprehensive plans or
development regulations generally or for a specific area, subject
matter, or issue. The comment period must be at least thirty days,
unless the department determines that the level of complexity or
controversy involved supports a shorter period;
(b) In the department's discretion, conduct a public hearing during
the thirty-day comment period in the jurisdiction proposing the
comprehensive plan, development regulation, or amendment to a
comprehensive plan or development regulation;
(c) Within fifteen days after the close of public comment, request
the local government to review the issues identified by the public,
interested parties, groups, and agencies and provide a written response
as to how the proposal addresses the identified issues;
(d) Within thirty days after receipt of the local government
response required under (c) of this subsection, make written findings
and conclusions regarding the consistency of the proposal with the
goals and requirements of this chapter, provide a response to the
issues identified in (c) of this subsection, and either approve the
proposal as submitted, recommend specific changes necessary to make the
proposal approvable, or deny approval of the proposal in those
instances where no alteration of the proposal appears likely to be
consistent with the goals and requirements of this chapter. The
written findings and conclusions shall be provided to the local
government, all interested persons, parties, groups, and agencies of
record on the proposal;
(e) If the department recommends changes to the comprehensive plan,
development regulation, or amendment to a comprehensive plan or
development regulation, within thirty days after the department mails
the written findings and conclusions to the local government, the local
government may:
(i) Agree to the proposed changes. The receipt by the department
of the written notice of agreement constitutes final action by the
department approving the amendment; or
(ii) Submit an alternative proposal. If, in the opinion of the
department, the alternative is consistent with the purpose and intent
of the changes originally submitted by the department and with this
chapter, the department shall approve the changes and provide written
notice to all recipients of the written findings and conclusions. If
the department determines the proposal is not consistent with the
purpose and intent of the changes proposed by the department, the
department may resubmit the proposal for public and agency review
pursuant to this section or reject the proposal.
(3) The department shall approve the comprehensive plan,
development regulation, or amendment to a comprehensive plan or
development regulation unless it determines that the submittals are not
consistent with the goals and requirements of this chapter.
(4) A comprehensive plan, development regulation, or amendment to
a comprehensive plan or development regulation takes effect when and in
such form as approved or adopted by the department.
(5) Comprehensive plans, development regulations, or amendments to
comprehensive plans or development regulations adopted before the
effective date of this section do not require review and approval by
the department under this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.290 and 1997 c 429 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All requests for review to a growth management hearings board
shall be initiated by filing a petition that includes a detailed
statement of issues presented for resolution by the board. The board
shall render written decisions articulating the basis for its holdings.
The board shall not issue advisory opinions on issues not presented to
the board in the statement of issues, as modified by any prehearing
order.
(2) All petitions relating to whether or not an adopted
comprehensive plan, development regulation, or permanent amendment
thereto, is in compliance with the goals and requirements of this
chapter or chapter 90.58 or 43.21C RCW must be filed within sixty days
after publication by the ((legislative bodies of the)) county or city
as required by this section.
(a) ((Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, the date of
publication for a city shall be the date the city publishes the
ordinance, or summary of the ordinance, adopting the comprehensive plan
or development regulations, or amendment thereto, as is required to be
published.
(b) Promptly after adoption, a county shall publish a notice that
it has adopted the comprehensive plan or development regulations, or
amendment thereto.
Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, for purposes of this
section the date of publication for a county shall be the date the
county publishes the notice that it has adopted the comprehensive plan
or development regulations, or amendment thereto.
(c))) Promptly after approval or disapproval of a local
government's comprehensive plan, development regulation, or amendment
to a comprehensive plan or development regulation as provided in
section 1 of this act, the local government shall publish a notice that
the comprehensive plan, development regulation, or amendment to a
comprehensive plan or development regulation has been approved or
disapproved by the department.
(b) For local governments planning under RCW 36.70A.040, promptly
after approval or disapproval of a local government's shoreline master
program or amendment thereto by the department of ecology as provided
in RCW 90.58.090, the local government shall publish a notice that the
shoreline master program or amendment thereto has been approved or
disapproved by the department of ecology. For purposes of this
section, the date of publication for the adoption or amendment of a
shoreline master program is the date the local government publishes
notice that the shoreline master program or amendment thereto has been
approved or disapproved by the department of ecology.
(3) Unless the board dismisses the petition as frivolous or finds
that the person filing the petition lacks standing, or the parties have
filed an agreement to have the case heard in superior court as provided
in RCW 36.70A.295, the board shall, within ten days of receipt of the
petition, set a time for hearing the matter.
(4) The board shall base its decision on the record developed by
the city, county, or the state and supplemented with additional
evidence if the board determines that such additional evidence would be
necessary or of substantial assistance to the board in reaching its
decision.
(5) The board, shall consolidate, when appropriate, all petitions
involving the review of the same comprehensive plan or the same
development regulation or regulations.

--- END ---