BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 7.69A.030 and 2004 c 120 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to the rights of victims and witnesses provided for in
RCW 7.69.030, there shall be every reasonable effort made by law
enforcement agencies, prosecutors, and judges to assure that child
victims and witnesses are afforded the rights enumerated in this
section. Except as provided in RCW 7.69A.050 regarding child victims
or child witnesses of violent crimes, sex crimes, or child abuse, the
enumeration of rights shall not be construed to create substantive
rights and duties, and the application of an enumerated right in an
individual case is subject to the discretion of the law enforcement
agency, prosecutor, or judge. However, in all cases, the exercise of
discretion shall be informed by the rights enumerated in this section.
Child victims and witnesses have the following rights, which apply to
any criminal court and/or juvenile court proceeding:
(1) To have explained in language easily understood by the child,
all legal proceedings and/or police investigations in which the child
may be involved.
(2) Subject to constitutional limitations in criminal cases, to
have prosecutorial and defense interviews conducted in a manner that is
appropriate to the child's age and level of development, considering
such factors as the duration of the interview and limitations on the
number of interviewers and the number of repetitive questions. In all
cases, a child witness must be treated with dignity and respect and
shall not be subject to threatening or intimidating conduct. For
purposes of pretrial defense interviews, a prosecutor may assert a
child's statutory privacy interests.
(3) With respect to child victims of sex or violent crimes or child
abuse, to have a crime victim advocate from a crime victim/witness
program, or any other support person of the victim's choosing, present
at any prosecutorial or defense interviews with the child victim. This
subsection applies if practical and if the presence of the crime victim
advocate or support person does not cause any unnecessary delay in the
investigation or prosecution of the case. The role of the crime victim
advocate is to provide emotional support to the child victim and to
promote the child's feelings of security and safety.
(((3))) (4) To be provided, whenever possible, a secure waiting
area during court proceedings and to have an advocate or support person
remain with the child prior to and during any court proceedings.
(((4))) (5) To not have the names, addresses, nor photographs of
the living child victim or witness disclosed by any law enforcement
agency, prosecutor's office, or state agency without the permission of
the child victim, child witness, parents, or legal guardians to anyone
except another law enforcement agency, prosecutor, defense counsel, or
private or governmental agency that provides services to the child
victim or witness.
(((5))) (6) To allow an advocate to make recommendations to the
prosecuting attorney about the ability of the child to cooperate with
prosecution and the potential effect of the proceedings on the child.
(((6))) (7) To allow an advocate to provide information to the
court concerning the child's ability to understand the nature of the
proceedings.
(((7))) (8) To be provided information or appropriate referrals to
social service agencies to assist the child and/or the child's family
with the emotional impact of the crime, the subsequent investigation,
and judicial proceedings in which the child is involved.
(((8))) (9) To allow an advocate to be present in court while the
child testifies in order to provide emotional support to the child.
(((9))) (10) To provide information to the court as to the need for
the presence of other supportive persons at the court proceedings while
the child testifies in order to promote the child's feelings of
security and safety.
(((10))) (11) To allow law enforcement agencies the opportunity to
enlist the assistance of other professional personnel such as child
protection services, victim advocates or prosecutorial staff trained in
the interviewing of the child victim.
(((11))) (12) With respect to child victims of violent or sex
crimes or child abuse, to receive either directly or through the
child's parent or guardian if appropriate, at the time of reporting the
crime to law enforcement officials, a written statement of the rights
of child victims as provided in this chapter. The written statement
shall include the name, address, and telephone number of a county or
local crime victim/witness program, if such a crime victim/witness
program exists in the county.

--- END ---