BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 67.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As authorized in RCW 67.70.040(1)(f), the commission shall,
subject to approval of the legislature, conduct an online keno game in
which the drawing or selection of winning tickets occurs more
frequently than once every twenty-four hours. The frequency of
drawings for the keno online game may not be less than every four
minutes. The authorized online keno game may not require interaction
between a player and any device or terminal otherwise prohibited by RCW
67.70.040(1)(a).
(2) A license to operate the online keno game may, in the
commission's discretion, be provided to any of the lottery's existing
lottery sales agents and to other persons as defined in RCW 67.70.070.
A license to operate the online keno game may not be issued to any
person, business, corporation, or other entity, except as provided
herein.
(3) The winning numbers must be displayed on television monitors
located in establishments licensed under RCW 66.24.320, 66.24.420,
66.24.425, or 66.24.440.
(4) An online keno game account is created as a separate account
outside the state treasury. The commission shall manage, maintain, and
control the account which must consist of all revenues received from
the sale of online keno game tickets. Revenues in the account must be
allotted according to chapter 43.88 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 67.70.320 and 1987 c 511 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director of financial management shall select a certified
public accountant to verify that:
(((1))) (a) The manner of selecting the winning tickets or shares
is consistent with this chapter; and
(((2))) (b) The manner and time of payment of prizes to the holder
of winning tickets or shares is consistent with this chapter. The cost
of these services shall be paid from moneys placed within the lottery
administrative account created in RCW 67.70.260.
(2) The requirement for winning number verification by a certified
public accountant does not apply when numbers are drawn from a
certified random number generator and without human intervention.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 67.70 RCW
to read as follows:
The commission shall transfer, from revenue derived from the online
keno game account, to the problem gambling account created in RCW
43.20A.892, an amount equal to one-twentieth of one percent of net
receipts. For purposes of this section, "net receipts" means the
difference between (1) revenue received from the sale of lottery
tickets or shares and revenue received from the sale of shared game
lottery tickets or shares; and (2) the sum of payments made to winners.
The remaining revenues must be transferred to the state wildlife
account created in RCW 77.12.170.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.12.170 and 2005 c 418 s 3, 2005 c 225 s 4, 2005 c
224 s 4, and 2005 c 42 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) There is established in the state treasury the state wildlife
account which consists of moneys received from:
(a) Rentals or concessions of the department;
(b) The sale of real or personal property held for department
purposes;
(c) The assessment of administrative penalties, and the sale of
licenses, permits, tags, and stamps required by chapter 77.32 RCW and
RCW 77.65.490, except annual resident adult saltwater and all annual
razor clam and shellfish licenses, which shall be deposited into the
state general fund;
(d) Fees for informational materials published by the department;
(e) Fees for personalized vehicle, Wild on Washington, and
Endangered Wildlife license plates and Washington's Wildlife license
plate collection as provided in chapter 46.16 RCW;
(f) Articles or wildlife sold by the director under this title;
(g) Compensation for damage to department property or wildlife
losses or contributions, gifts, or grants received under RCW 77.12.320;
(h) Excise tax on anadromous game fish collected under chapter
82.27 RCW;
(i) The sale of personal property seized by the department for
fish, shellfish, or wildlife violations;
(j) The department's share of revenues from auctions and raffles
authorized by the commission; ((and))
(k) The sale of watchable wildlife decals under RCW 77.32.560; and
(l) Proceeds from the online keno game account, as authorized in
section 3 of this act.
(2) State and county officers receiving any moneys listed in
subsection (1) of this section shall deposit them in the state treasury
to be credited to the state wildlife account.

--- END ---