BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that providing access
to a high-quality postsecondary education is a duty of the state and
that providing and promoting that access is a shared responsibility
among the state, students, and the public colleges and universities.
However, access and affordability for middle-income students have
eroded in recent years; therefore, the higher education system must
fundamentally change and improve to better meet the needs of students.
The legislature finds that despite current financial aid programs,
the rapid rise in the cost of textbooks, tuition, fees, living
expenses, transportation, and other expenses combine to put the total
cost of attendance out of reach for many middle and lower-income
students and families.
The legislature further finds that under the current system middle-income families are running out of options and are forced to either
shoulder these costs themselves or be priced out of higher education
entirely. As a result, middle-income debt loads are surging, causing
families to make painful career and family choices in order to ensure
access to educational opportunity.
The legislature recognizes that states with higher tuition rates
have been shown to effectively use those resources to provide
substantial and incremental financial aid to lower and middle-income
students.
State taxes currently subsidize all students attending Washington
public colleges and universities. As a result, upper-income families
view the institution as a relative bargain among premier public and
private universities around the world. On the other hand, the total
cost of attendance has become unaffordable in the context of middle-income families' means. Compounding this crisis is the lack of
available financial aid outside of loans specifically targeted to the
middle class.
It is for these reasons that the legislature intends to design a
college affordability program that systemically addresses these issues
for middle-income families to afford a college education. The
legislature intends to empower the four-year institutions of higher
education to raise tuition during a six-year period and target a
portion of the new revenue to those middle-income students who would
not otherwise qualify for state financial aid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The University of Washington opportunity grant program is
hereby established at the University of Washington.
(2) The program shall be administered by the University of
Washington.
(3) Eligibility for the program shall be limited to resident
undergraduate students with family incomes of up to one hundred twenty-five percent of the state median family income, adjusted for family
size.
(4) The University of Washington opportunity grant program is
supplemental to the state need grant program, as defined in chapter
28B.92 RCW, and intended to provide financial assistance to middle-income students with incomes up to one hundred twenty-five percent of
state median family income adjusted for family size.
(5) In administering the program, the university shall:
(a) Adopt necessary rules and guidelines;
(b) Establish eligibility requirements and select program
participants;
(c) Base award amounts on the assessment of the student's ability
to pay the cost of attendance using the federal student financial aid
needs assessment process and such other evaluation procedures and
criteria the university may adopt. Award amounts shall be prorated as
family income increases, based on a percentage of the maximum base
grant award amount of the state need grant, as determined by the higher
education coordinating board for the state universities.
(i) Students with a family income that exceeds the income
eligibility criteria for state need grant and is less than or equal to
one hundred percent of state median family income shall receive forty
percent of the maximum state need grant award amount;
(ii) Students with a family income between one hundred one and one
hundred twenty-five percent of state median family income shall receive
twenty-five percent of the maximum state need grant award amount;
(d) Publicize the program; and
(e) Solicit and accept grants, gifts, and donations from public and
private sources for the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.30 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington State University opportunity grant program is
hereby established at Washington State University.
(2) The program shall be administered by Washington State
University.
(3) Eligibility for the program shall be limited to resident
undergraduate students with family incomes of up to one hundred twenty-five percent of the state median family income, adjusted for family
size.
(4) The Washington State University opportunity grant program is
supplemental to the state need grant program, as defined in chapter
28B.92 RCW, and intended to provide financial assistance to middle-income students with incomes up to one hundred twenty-five percent of
state median family income adjusted for family size.
(5) In administering the program, the university shall:
(a) Adopt necessary rules and guidelines;
(b) Establish eligibility requirements and select program
participants;
(c) Base award amounts on the assessment of the student's ability
to pay the cost of attendance using the federal student financial aid
needs assessment process and such other evaluation procedures and
criteria the university may adopt. Award amounts shall be prorated as
family income increases, based on a percentage of the maximum base
grant award amount of the state need grant, as determined by the higher
education coordinating board for the state universities.
(i) Students with a family income that exceeds the income
eligibility criteria for state need grant and is less than or equal to
one hundred percent of state median family income shall receive forty
percent of the maximum state need grant award amount;
(ii) Students with a family income between one hundred one and one
hundred twenty-five percent of state median family income shall receive
twenty-five percent of the maximum state need grant award amount;
(d) Publicize the program; and
(e) Solicit and accept grants, gifts, and donations from public and
private sources for the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28B.35 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The Central Washington University opportunity grant program
is hereby established at Central Washington University.
(b) The Eastern Washington University opportunity grant program is
hereby established at Eastern Washington University.
(c) The Western Washington University opportunity grant program is
hereby established at Western Washington University.
(2) The programs shall be administered by the respective
universities.
(3) Eligibility for the programs shall be limited to resident
undergraduate students with family incomes of up to one hundred twenty-
five percent of the state median family income, adjusted for family
size.
(4) Each opportunity grant program is supplemental to the state
need grant program, as defined in chapter 28B.92 RCW, and intended to
provide financial assistance to middle-income students with incomes up
to one hundred twenty-five percent of state median family income
adjusted for family size.
(5) In administering the program, each university shall:
(a) Adopt necessary rules and guidelines;
(b) Establish eligibility requirements and select program
participants;
(c) Base award amounts on the assessment of the student's ability
to pay the cost of attendance using the federal student financial aid
needs assessment process and such other evaluation procedures and
criteria each university may adopt. Award amounts shall be prorated as
family income increases, based on a percentage of the maximum base
grant award amount of the state need grant, as determined by the higher
education coordinating board for the regional institutions.
(i) Students with a family income that exceeds the income
eligibility criteria for state need grant and is less than or equal to
one hundred percent of state median family income shall receive forty
percent of the maximum state need grant award amount;
(ii) Students with a family income between one hundred one and one
hundred twenty-five percent of state median family income shall receive
twenty-five percent of the maximum state need grant award amount;
(d) Publicize the program; and
(e) Solicit and accept grants, gifts, and donations from public and
private sources for the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28B.40 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Evergreen State College opportunity grant program is hereby
established at The Evergreen State College.
(2) The program shall be administered by The Evergreen State
College.
(3) Eligibility for the program shall be limited to resident
undergraduate students with family incomes of up to one hundred twenty-
five percent of the state median family income, adjusted for family
size.
(4) The Evergreen State College opportunity grant program is
supplemental to the state need grant program, as defined in chapter
28B.92 RCW, and intended to provide financial assistance to middle-income students with incomes up to one hundred twenty-five percent of
state median family income adjusted for family size.
(5) In administering the program, the college shall:
(a) Adopt necessary rules and guidelines;
(b) Establish eligibility requirements and select program
participants;
(c) Base award amounts on the assessment of the student's ability
to pay the cost of attendance using the federal student financial aid
needs assessment process and such other evaluation procedures and
criteria the college may adopt. Award amounts shall be prorated as
family income increases, based on a percentage of the maximum base
grant award amount of the state need grant, as determined by the higher
education coordinating board for The Evergreen State College.
(i) Students with a family income that exceeds the income
eligibility criteria for state need grant and is less than or equal to
one hundred percent of state median family income shall receive forty
percent of the maximum state need grant award amount;
(ii) Students with a family income between one hundred one and one
hundred twenty-five percent of state median family income shall receive
twenty-five percent of the maximum state need grant award amount;
(d) Publicize the program; and
(e) Solicit and accept grants, gifts, and donations from public and
private sources for the program.

Sec. 6 RCW 28B.15.067 and 2007 c 355 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Tuition fees shall be established under the provisions of this
chapter.
(2) Beginning with the ((2003-04)) 2009-10 academic year and ending
with the ((2008-09)) 2014-15 academic year, reductions or increases in
full-time tuition fees for ((resident undergraduates)) all students
shall be ((as provided in the omnibus appropriations act)) determined
by the governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College.
(3) Beginning with the 2009-10 academic year and ending with the
2014-15 academic year, reductions or increases in full-time tuition
fees for resident undergraduates attending community or technical
colleges shall be as provided in the omnibus appropriations act.
(4) Beginning with the ((2003-04)) 2009-10 academic year and ending
with the ((2008-09)) 2014-15 academic year, ((the governing boards of
the state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State
College, and)) the state board for community and technical colleges may
reduce or increase full-time tuition fees for all students other than
resident undergraduates, including summer school students and students
in other self-supporting degree programs. Percentage increases in
full-time tuition fees may exceed the fiscal growth factor. Reductions
or increases may be made for all or portions of an institution's
programs, campuses, courses, or students.
(((4))) (5) Academic year tuition for full-time students at the
state's institutions of higher education beginning with ((2009-10))
2015-16, other than summer term, shall be as charged during the ((2008-09)) 2014-15 academic year unless different rates are adopted by the
legislature.
(((5))) (6) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall
not apply to high school students enrolling in participating
institutions of higher education under RCW 28A.600.300 through
28A.600.400.
(((6))) (7) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall
not apply to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical
college under RCW 28C.04.610.
(((7))) (8) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall
not apply to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical
college participating in the pilot program under RCW 28B.50.534 for the
purpose of obtaining a high school diploma.
(((8))) (9) For the academic years ((2003-04)) 2009-10 through
((2008-09)) 2014-15, the University of Washington shall use an amount
equivalent to ten percent of all revenues received as a result of law
school tuition increases beginning in academic year ((2000-01)) 2009-10
through academic year ((2008-09)) 2014-15 to assist needy low and
middle income resident law students.
(((9))) (10) For the academic years ((2003-04)) 2009-10 through
((2008-09)) 2014-15, institutions of higher education shall use an
amount equivalent to ten percent of all revenues received as a result
of graduate academic school tuition increases beginning in academic
year ((2003-04)) 2009-10 through academic year ((2008-09)) 2014-15 to
assist needy low and middle-income resident graduate academic students.

Sec. 7 RCW 28B.15.068 and 2007 c 151 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 2007-08 academic year and ending with the
2016-17 academic year, tuition fees charged to full-time resident
undergraduate students may increase no greater than ((seven)) twelve
percent over the previous academic year in any institution of higher
education. ((Annual reductions or increases in full-time tuition fees
for resident undergraduate students shall be as provided in the omnibus
appropriations act, within the seven percent increase limit established
in this section.)) To the extent that state appropriations combined
with tuition and fee revenues are insufficient to achieve the total
per-student funding goals established in subsection (2) of this
section, the legislature may revisit state appropriations, authorized
enrollment levels, and changes in tuition fees for any given fiscal
year.
(2) The state shall adopt as its goal total per-student funding
levels, from state appropriations plus tuition and fees, of at least
the sixtieth percentile of total per-student funding at similar public
institutions of higher education in the global challenge states. In
defining comparable per-student funding levels, the office of financial
management shall adjust for regional cost-of-living differences; for
differences in program offerings and in the relative mix of lower
division, upper division, and graduate students; and for accounting and
reporting differences among the comparison institutions. The office of
financial management shall develop a funding trajectory for each four-year institution of higher education and for the community and
technical college system as a whole that when combined with tuition and
fees revenue allows the state to achieve its funding goal for each
four-year institution and the community and technical college system as
a whole no later than fiscal year 2017. The state shall not reduce
enrollment levels below fiscal year 2007 budgeted levels in order to
improve or alter the per-student funding amount at any four-year
institution of higher education or the community and technical college
system as a whole. The state recognizes that each four-year
institution of higher education and the community and technical college
system as a whole have different funding requirements to achieve
desired performance levels, and that increases to the total per-student
funding amount may need to exceed the minimum funding goal.
(3) By September 1st of each year beginning (([in])) in 2008, the
office of financial management shall report to the governor, the higher
education coordinating board, and appropriate committees of the
legislature with updated estimates of the total per-student funding
level that represents the sixtieth percentile of funding for comparable
institutions of higher education in the global challenge states, and
the progress toward that goal that was made for each of the public
institutions of higher education.
(4) As used in this section, "global challenge states" are the top
performing states on the new economy index published by the progressive
policy institute as of July 22, 2007. The new economy index ranks
states on indicators of their potential to compete in the new economy.
At least once every five years, the office of financial management
shall determine if changes to the list of global challenge states are
appropriate. The office of financial management shall report its
findings to the governor and the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The Washington state institute for public
policy shall evaluate the effects of this change in tuition policy and
financial aid created by this act, recommend alternatives for the
guaranteed education tuition program, and deliver its findings to the
governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by December
2012.

--- END ---