BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that the
aerospace industry is a significant part of Washington's economy. The
aerospace industry is the state's largest manufacturing employer. For
every aerospace job created, another one and one-half jobs are produced
in other economic sectors. In addition, aerospace companies are
present in many of the counties throughout the state. The legislature
finds that Washington state leads the nation in cutting-edge training,
education, research, and development, related to the aerospace
industry. However, the legislature also finds that these programs
could be better coordinated and distributed statewide through the
community and technical college system and the research institutions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) There is created in the office of the
governor the Washington council on aerospace. The purpose of the
council is to: Emulate national and international best practices that
will: (a) Improve coordination and responsiveness of the state's
aerospace training, education, research, and development programs to
meet industry needs; (b) enhance the state's economic climate for the
industry; and (c) ensure that Washington remains the best place in the
world to design and manufacture aircraft and grow jobs in the aerospace
industry.
(2) The council shall be composed of thirteen members representing
the public and private sectors, as follows:
(a) The nine public sector members of the council are:
(i) The director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development, or its successor agency, who shall be the chair;
(ii) The executive director of the state board for community and
technical colleges;
(iii) The executive director of the higher education coordinating
board;
(iv) The president of the University of Washington;
(v) The president of Washington State University;
(vi) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house
of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives; and
(vii) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the
senate, appointed by the president of the senate.
(b) The governor shall appoint each of the following four members
to four-year terms as private sector representatives on the council:
(i) One member representing a labor organization of aerospace
machinists;
(ii) One member representing a labor organization of aerospace
engineers;
(iii) One member representing the state's largest aerospace
manufacturer; and
(iv) One member representing aerospace employers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The council shall:
(a) Provide counsel and advice to the governor and the legislature
on public policies that will strengthen the aerospace industry and
support its job growth in Washington; and
(b) Take joint action to integrate training and education with
research and development.
(2) With the oversight and guidance of the council as a whole, its
public sector members are charged with the following lead
responsibilities, respectively:
(a) The executive director of the state board for community and
technical colleges must ensure coordination of all aerospace training
and apprenticeship programs under its authority;
(b) The executive director of the higher education coordinating
board must ensure that all degree programs of interest to the aerospace
industry are provided by and coordinated among the state's four-year
institutions of higher education;
(c) The presidents of the University of Washington and Washington
State University must coordinate all aerospace-related research and
development activities available through their institutions, and ensure
that these activities are responsive to the industry's needs; and
(d) The director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development, or its successor agency, must carry out the
state's activities to retain, attract, and grow aerospace companies and
jobs.
(3) The council may consult, as necessary, with the director of
labor and industries, the commissioner of the employment security
department, or the superintendent of public instruction to assist in
the development of policies to carry out the purposes of this chapter.
(4) The council shall meet with the governor at least twice
annually.
(5) Staffing for the council shall be provided by the department of
community, trade, and economic development, or its successor agency.
(6) Beginning on January 1, 2010, and annually thereafter, the
council shall report to the governor and legislature on the state of
the state's aerospace industry and the activities and accomplishments
of the council in the previous calendar year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The council or the organizations
represented by its members shall apply for and may receive public and
private grants and donations for training, education, research,
development, and other activities relevant to the council's
responsibilities under this chapter. State and nonstate moneys
received by the council for these purposes must be deposited in the
Washington aerospace council account created in section 5 of this act.
(2) For fiscal years 2009 through 2011, increased training,
education, research, or development activities, approved by the
council, shall be supported by federal workforce investment act funds
or other discretionary funds administered by the governor. These funds
may be invested independently to support these activities or may be
used as match to leverage additional investments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The Washington aerospace council account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. Only the governor or
the council chair may authorize expenditures from the account.
Expenditures from the account may be made only for purposes of this
chapter. Administrative expenses of the council, including staff
support, may be paid from the account. Revenues to the account consist
of moneys received from grants and donations, funds administered under
the governor's discretion that are deposited into the account, and
moneys received pursuant to legislative appropriations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act may be known and cited as the
aerospace competitiveness act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---