BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commission on safe and healthful food is established
composed of sixteen members as follows:
(a) Nine members appointed by the governor as follows:
(i) Two members representing food producers;
(ii) Two members representing food processors;
(iii) Two members representing product retailers;
(iv) Two members representing consumers; and
(v) One member to serve as chairperson;
(b) Two members representing the house of representatives,
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, with one
representative chosen from each of the two largest caucuses of the
house of representatives;
(c) Two members representing the senate, appointed by the president
of the senate, with one representative chosen from each of the two
largest caucuses of the senate;
(d) The director of the department of agriculture, or the
director's designee;
(e) The director of the department of health, or the director's
designee; and
(f) One member representing local health districts.
(2) Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner that the original
appointments were made.
(3) A majority of the members of the commission shall constitute a
quorum for the transaction of business.
(4) Members of the commission shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(5) The commission must:
(a) Identify current issues relating to foodborne illness outbreaks
and the ways state oversight and regulation may help prevent and
mitigate the effects of the outbreaks;
(b) Identify best practices for notifying consumers of food product
recalls;
(c) Identify state and federal efforts to enforce labeling and
inspection laws and determine if additional resources are necessary;
(d) Recommend and prioritize actions that may be taken by the state
to provide disclosure to consumers on food products for the following:
(i) Irradiated foods;
(ii) Genetically engineered food;
(iii) Modified atmosphere packaging;
(iv) Organic labeling;
(v) Needling meat; and
(vi) Location of packaging and date packaged; and
(e) Serve as a forum for discussion and resolution of issues on
healthy food and safe food.
(6) Recommendations based on the priorities established by the
commission must be reported to appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1st of each year.

--- END ---