BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.52.330 and 2003 c 111 s 1311 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Subject to the availability of funds appropriated specifically
for that purpose,)) The secretary of state shall publish notice of the
proposed constitutional amendments ((and other state measures)) that
are to be submitted to the people at a state general election up to
four times during the four weeks immediately preceding that election in
every legal newspaper in the state. ((The secretary of state shall
supplement this publication with an equivalent amount of radio and
television advertisements.))

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.52.340 and 2003 c 111 s 1312 are each amended to
read as follows:
The newspaper ((and broadcast)) notice required by Article XXIII,
section 1, of the state Constitution and RCW 29A.52.330 may set forth
all or some of the following information:
(1) A legal identification of the ((state measure)) proposed
constitutional amendment to be voted upon.
(2) The official ballot title of such ((state measure)) proposed
constitutional amendment.
(3) A brief statement explaining the constitutional provision ((or
state law)) as it presently exists.
(4) A brief statement explaining the effect of the ((state
measure)) proposed constitutional amendment should it be approved.
(5) The total number of votes cast for and against the measure in
both the state senate and house of representatives.
No individual candidate or incumbent public official may be
referred to or identified in these notices or advertisements.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.78.030 and 1994 c 82 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The public printer shall print and bind the session laws, the
journals of the two houses of the legislature, all bills, resolutions,
documents, and other printing and binding of either the senate or
house, as the same may be ordered by the legislature; and such forms,
blanks, record books, and printing and binding of every description as
may be ordered by all state officers, boards, commissions, and
institutions, and the supreme court, and the court of appeals and
officers thereof, as the same may be ordered on requisition, from time
to time, by the proper authorities. This section shall not apply to
the printing of the supreme court and the court of appeals reports, to
the printing of bond certificates or bond offering disclosure
documents, to the printing of educational publications of the state
historical societies, to voters' pamphlets printed by the secretary of
state, or to any printing done or contracted for by institutions of
higher education: PROVIDED, That institutions of higher education, in
consultation with the public printer, develop vendor selection
procedures comparable to those used by the public printer for
contracted printing jobs. Where any institution or institution of
higher learning of the state is or may become equipped with facilities
for doing such work, it may do any printing: (1) For itself, or (2)
for any other state institution when such printing is done as part of
a course of study relative to the profession of printer. Any printing
and binding of whatever description as may be needed by any institution
or agency of the state department of social and health services not at
Olympia, or the supreme court or the court of appeals or any officer
thereof, the estimated cost of which shall not exceed one thousand
dollars, may be done by any private printing company in the general
vicinity within the state of Washington so ordering, if in the judgment
of the officer of the agency so ordering, the saving in time and
processing justifies the award to such local private printing concern.
Beginning on July 1, 1989, and on July 1 of each succeeding odd-numbered year, the dollar limit specified in this section shall be
adjusted as follows: The office of financial management shall
calculate such limit by adjusting the previous biennium's limit by an
appropriate federal inflationary index reflecting the rate of inflation
for the previous biennium. Such amounts shall be rounded to the
nearest fifty dollars.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.32.031 and 2008 c 1 s 12 (Initiative Measure No.
960) are each amended to read as follows:
The voters' pamphlet must contain:
(1) Information about each measure for an advisory vote of the
people and each ballot measure initiated by or referred to the voters
for their approval or rejection as required by RCW 29A.32.070;
(2) In even-numbered years, statements, if submitted, advocating
the candidacies of nominees for the office of president and vice
president of the United States, United States senator, United States
representative, governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state,
state treasurer, state auditor, attorney general, commissioner of
public lands, superintendent of public instruction, insurance
commissioner, state senator, state representative, justice of the
supreme court, judge of the court of appeals, or judge of the superior
court. Candidates may also submit a campaign mailing address and
telephone number and a photograph not more than five years old and of
a size and quality that the secretary of state determines to be
suitable for reproduction in the voters' pamphlet;
(3) In odd-numbered years, if any office voted upon statewide
appears on the ballot due to a vacancy, then statements and photographs
for candidates for any vacant office listed in subsection (2) of this
section must appear;
(4) In even-numbered years, a section explaining how voters may
participate in the election campaign process; the address and telephone
number of the public disclosure commission established under RCW
42.17.350; and a summary of the disclosure requirements that apply when
contributions are made to candidates and political committees;
(5) In even-numbered years the name, address, and telephone number
of each political party with nominees listed in the pamphlet, if filed
with the secretary of state by the state committee of a major political
party or the presiding officer of the convention of a minor political
party;
(6) In each odd-numbered year immediately before a year in which a
president of the United States is to be nominated and elected,
information explaining the precinct caucus and convention process used
by each major political party to elect delegates to its national
presidential candidate nominating convention. The pamphlet must also
provide a description of the statutory procedures by which minor
political parties are formed and the statutory methods used by the
parties to nominate candidates for president;
(7) ((An application form for an absentee ballot;
(8))) A brief statement explaining the deletion and addition of
language for proposed measures under RCW 29A.32.080; and
(((9))) (8) Any additional information pertaining to elections as
may be required by law or in the judgment of the secretary of state is
deemed informative to the voters.

Sec. 5 RCW 29A.32.040 and 2003 c 111 s 804 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Explanatory statements prepared by the attorney general under
RCW 29A.32.070 (3) and (4) must be written in clear and concise
language not exceeding five hundred words, avoiding legal and technical
terms when possible, and filed with the secretary of state no later
than the first day of August.
(2) When the explanatory statement for a measure initiated by
petition is filed with the secretary of state, the secretary of state
shall immediately provide the text of the explanatory statement to the
person proposing the measure and any others who have made written
request for notification of the exact language of the explanatory
statement. When the explanatory statement for a measure referred to
the ballot by the legislature is filed with the secretary of state, the
secretary of state shall immediately provide the text of the
explanatory statement to the presiding officer of the senate and the
presiding officer of the house of representatives and any others who
have made written request for notification of the exact language of the
explanatory statement.
(3) A person dissatisfied with the explanatory statement may appeal
to the superior court of Thurston County within five days of the filing
date. A copy of the petition and a notice of the appeal must be served
on the secretary of state and the attorney general. The court shall
examine the measure, the explanatory statement, and objections, and may
hear arguments. The court shall render its decision and certify to and
file with the secretary of state an explanatory statement it determines
will meet the requirements of this chapter.
The decision of the superior court is final, and its explanatory
statement is the established explanatory statement. The appeal must be
heard without costs to either party.

Sec. 6 RCW 29A.32.050 and 2003 c 111 s 805 are each amended to
read as follows:
The attorney general shall, by the first day of ((July)) August
preceding each general election, prepare the explanatory statements
required ((in)) under RCW ((29A.52.340)) 29A.32.070 (3) and (4). Such
statements shall be prepared in clear and concise language not
exceeding five hundred words, and shall avoid the use of legal and
other technical terms insofar as possible. Any person dissatisfied
with the explanatory statement so prepared may at any time within ten
days from the filing thereof in the office of the secretary of state
appeal to the superior court of Thurston county by petition setting
forth the proposed state measure, the explanatory statement prepared by
the attorney general, and his or her objection thereto and praying for
the amendment thereof. A copy of the petition and a notice of such
appeal shall be served on the secretary of state and the attorney
general. The court shall, upon filing of the petition, examine the
proposed state measure, the explanatory statement, and the objections
thereto and may hear argument thereon and shall, as soon as possible,
render its decision and certify to and file with the secretary of state
such explanatory statement as it determines will meet the requirement
of RCW 29A.52.330, 29A.52.340, and this section. The decision of the
superior court shall be final and its explanatory statement shall be
the established explanatory statement. Such appeal shall be heard
without costs to either party.

Sec. 7 RCW 29A.32.121 and 2004 c 271 s 168 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The maximum number of words for statements submitted by
candidates is as follows: ((State representative, one hundred words;
state senator, judge of the superior court, judge of the court of
appeals, justice of the supreme court, and all state offices voted upon
throughout the state, except that of governor, two hundred words;
president and vice president, United States senator, United States
representative, and governor, three hundred words))
(a) One hundred words for United States representative, state
representative, state senator, court of appeals judge, and superior
court judge;
(b) Two hundred words for all statewide offices.
(2) Arguments written by committees under RCW 29A.32.060 may not
exceed two hundred fifty words in length.
(3) Rebuttal arguments written by committees may not exceed
seventy-five words in length.
(4) The secretary of state shall allocate space in the pamphlet
based on the number of candidates or nominees for each office.

Sec. 8 RCW 29A.72.025 and 2004 c 266 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The office of financial management, in consultation with the
secretary of state, the attorney general, and any other appropriate
state or local agency, shall prepare a fiscal impact statement for each
of the following state ballot measures: (1) An initiative to the
people that is certified to the ballot; (2) an initiative to the
legislature that will appear on the ballot; (3) an alternative measure
appearing on the ballot that the legislature proposes to an initiative
to the legislature; (4) a referendum bill referred to voters by the
legislature; and (5) a referendum measure appearing on the ballot.
Fiscal impact statements must be written in clear and concise language
((and)), avoid legal and technical terms when possible, and be filed
with the secretary of state no later than the first day of August.
Fiscal impact statements may include easily understood graphics.
A fiscal impact statement must describe any projected increase or
decrease in revenues, costs, expenditures, or indebtedness that the
state or local governments will experience if the ballot measure were
approved by state voters. Where appropriate, a fiscal impact statement
may include both estimated dollar amounts and a description placing the
estimated dollar amounts into context. A fiscal impact statement must
not exceed five hundred words and must include both a summary ((of not
to exceed one hundred words)), and a more detailed statement that
includes the assumptions that were made to develop the fiscal impacts.
Fiscal impact statements must be available online from the
secretary of state's web site and included in the state voters'
pamphlet. Additional information may be posted on the web site of the
office of financial management.

Sec. 9 RCW 29A.04.530 and 2006 c 206 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary of state shall:
(1) Establish and operate, or provide by contract, training and
certification programs for state and county elections administration
officials and personnel, including training on election laws, the
various types of election law violations, and discrimination((, and
training programs for political party observers which conform to the
rules for such programs established under RCW 29A.04.630));
(2) Administer tests for state and county officials and personnel
who have received such training and issue certificates to those who
have successfully completed the training and passed such tests; and
(3) Maintain a record of those individuals who have received such
training and certificates((; and
(4) Provide the staffing and support services required by the board
created under RCW 29A.04.510)).

Sec. 10 RCW 29A.04.540 and 2003 c 111 s 152 are each amended to
read as follows:
A person having responsibility for the administration or conduct of
elections, other than precinct election officers, shall, within
eighteen months of undertaking those responsibilities, receive general
training regarding the conduct of elections and specific training
regarding their responsibilities and duties as prescribed by this title
or by rules adopted by the secretary of state under this title.
Included among those persons for whom such training is mandatory are
the following:
(1) Secretary of state elections division personnel;
(2) County elections administrators under RCW 36.22.220; and
(3) ((County canvassing board members;
(4) Persons officially designated by each major political party as
elections observers; and
(5))) Any other person or group charged with election
administration responsibilities if the person or group is designated by
rule adopted by the secretary of state as requiring the training.
((The secretary of state shall reimburse election observers in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 for travel expenses
incurred to receive training required under subsection (4) of this
section.))
Neither this section nor RCW 29A.04.530 may be construed as
requiring an elected official to receive training or a certificate of
training as a condition for seeking or holding elective office or as a
condition for carrying out constitutional duties.

Sec. 11 RCW 29A.04.550 and 2003 c 111 s 153 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A decision of the secretary of state to deny certification
under RCW 29A.04.530 must be entered in the manner specified for orders
under the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW. Such a
decision is not effective for a period of twenty days following the
date of the decision, during which time the person denied certification
may file a petition with the secretary of state requesting the
secretary to reconsider the decision and to grant certification. The
petitioner shall include in the petition, an explanation of the reasons
why the initial decision is incorrect and certification should be
granted, and may include a request for a hearing on the matter. The
secretary of state shall reconsider the matter if the petition is filed
in a proper and timely manner. If a hearing is requested, the
secretary of state shall conduct the hearing within sixty days after
the date on which the petition is filed. The secretary of state shall
render a final decision on the matter within ninety days after the date
on which the petition is filed.
(2) Within twenty days after the date on which the secretary of
state makes a final decision denying a petition under this section, the
petitioner may appeal the denial to ((the)) a board ((created in RCW
29A.04.510)) of county auditors organized for this purpose by the
Washington state association of county officials. In deciding appeals,
the board shall restrict its review to the record established when the
matter was before the secretary of state. The board shall affirm the
decision if it finds that the record supports the decision and that the
decision is not inconsistent with other decisions of the secretary of
state in which the same standards were applied and certification was
granted. Similarly, the board shall reverse the decision and recommend
to the secretary of state that certification be granted if the board
finds that such support is lacking or that such inconsistency exists.
(3) Judicial review of certification decisions will be as
prescribed under RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598, but is limited to the
review of board decisions denying certification.

Sec. 12 RCW 29A.04.570 and 2005 c 240 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The election review staff of the office of the secretary of
state shall conduct a review of election-related policies, procedures,
and practices in an affected county or counties:
(i) If the unofficial returns of a primary or general election for
a position in the state legislature indicate that a mandatory recount
is likely for that position; or
(ii) If unofficial returns indicate a mandatory recount is likely
in a statewide election or an election for federal office.
Reviews conducted under (a)(ii) of this subsection shall be
performed in as many selected counties as time and staffing permit.
Reviews conducted as a result of mandatory recounts shall be performed
between the time the unofficial returns are complete and the time the
recount is to take place, if possible.
(b) In addition to conducting reviews under (a) of this subsection,
the election review staff shall also conduct such a review in a county
at least once ((in each three-year period)) every five years, in
conjunction with a county primary or special or general election, at
the direction of the secretary of state or at the request of the county
auditor. If staffing or budget levels do not permit a ((three)) five-year election cycle for reviews, then reviews must be done as often as
possible. If any resident of this state believes that an aspect of a
primary or election has been conducted inappropriately in a county, the
resident may file a complaint with the secretary of state. The
secretary shall consider such complaints in scheduling periodic reviews
under this section.
(c) Before an election review is conducted in a county, the
secretary of state shall provide the county auditor of the affected
county and the chair of the state central committee of each major
political party with notice that the review is to be conducted. When
a periodic review is to be conducted in a county at the direction of
the secretary of state under (b) of this subsection, the secretary
shall provide the affected county auditor not less than thirty days'
notice.
(2) ((Reviews shall be conducted in conformance with rules adopted
under RCW 29A.04.630.)) In performing a review in a county under this
chapter, the election review staff shall evaluate the policies and
procedures established for conducting the primary or election in the
county and the practices of those conducting it. As part of the
review, the election review staff shall issue to the county auditor and
the members of the county canvassing board a report of its findings and
recommendations regarding such policies, procedures, and practices. A
review conducted under this chapter shall not include any evaluation,
finding, or recommendation regarding the validity of the outcome of a
primary or election or the validity of any canvass of returns nor does
the election review staff have any jurisdiction to make such an
evaluation, finding, or recommendation under this title.
(3) The county auditor or the county canvassing board shall respond
to the review report in writing, listing the steps that will be taken
to correct any problems listed in the report. Within one year of
issuance of the response provided by the county auditor or county
canvassing board, the secretary of state shall ((visit the county
before the next state primary or general election to)) verify that the
county has taken the steps ((they listed)) to correct the problems
noted in the report.
(4) The county auditor of the county in which a review is conducted
under this section or a member of the canvassing board of the county
may appeal the findings or recommendations of the election review staff
regarding the review by filing an appeal with ((the)) a board ((created
under RCW 29A.04.510)) of county auditors organized for this purpose by
the Washington state association of county officials.

Sec. 13 RCW 29A.04.570 and 2005 c 240 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The election review staff of the office of the secretary of
state shall conduct a review of election-related policies, procedures,
and practices in an affected county or counties:
(i) If the unofficial returns of a primary or general election for
a position in the state legislature indicate that a mandatory recount
is likely for that position; or
(ii) If unofficial returns indicate a mandatory recount is likely
in a statewide election or an election for federal office.
Reviews conducted under (a)(ii) of this subsection shall be
performed in as many selected counties as time and staffing permit.
Reviews conducted as a result of mandatory recounts shall be performed
between the time the unofficial returns are complete and the time the
recount is to take place, if possible.
(b) In addition to conducting reviews under (a) of this subsection,
the election review staff shall also conduct such a review in a county
at least once in each three-year period, in conjunction with a county
primary or special or general election, at the direction of the
secretary of state or at the request of the county auditor. If
staffing or budget levels do not permit a three-year election cycle for
reviews, then reviews must be done as often as possible. If any
resident of this state believes that an aspect of a primary or election
has been conducted inappropriately in a county, the resident may file
a complaint with the secretary of state. The secretary shall consider
such complaints in scheduling periodic reviews under this section.
(c) Before an election review is conducted in a county, the
secretary of state shall provide the county auditor of the affected
county and the chair of the state central committee of each major
political party with notice that the review is to be conducted. When
a periodic review is to be conducted in a county at the direction of
the secretary of state under (b) of this subsection, the secretary
shall provide the affected county auditor not less than thirty days'
notice.
(2) ((Reviews shall be conducted in conformance with rules adopted
under RCW 29A.04.630.)) In performing a review in a county under this
chapter, the election review staff shall evaluate the policies and
procedures established for conducting the primary or election in the
county and the practices of those conducting it. As part of the
review, the election review staff shall issue to the county auditor and
the members of the county canvassing board a report of its findings and
recommendations regarding such policies, procedures, and practices. A
review conducted under this chapter shall not include any evaluation,
finding, or recommendation regarding the validity of the outcome of a
primary or election or the validity of any canvass of returns nor does
the election review staff have any jurisdiction to make such an
evaluation, finding, or recommendation under this title.
(3) The county auditor or the county canvassing board shall respond
to the review report in writing, listing the steps that will be taken
to correct any problems listed in the report. Within one year of
issuance of the response provided by the county auditor or county
canvassing board, the secretary of state shall ((visit the county
before the next state primary or general election to)) verify that the
county has taken the steps ((they listed)) to correct the problems
noted in the report.
(4) The county auditor of the county in which a review is conducted
under this section or a member of the canvassing board of the county
may appeal the findings or recommendations of the election review staff
regarding the review by filing an appeal with ((the)) a board ((created
under RCW 29A.04.510)) of county auditors organized for this purpose by
the Washington state association of county officials.

Sec. 14 RCW 29A.04.611 and 2006 c 207 s 1 and 2006 c 206 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The secretary of state as chief election officer shall make
reasonable rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW not inconsistent
with the federal and state election laws to effectuate any provision of
this title and to facilitate the execution of its provisions in an
orderly, timely, and uniform manner relating to any federal, state,
county, city, town, and district elections. To that end the secretary
shall assist local election officers by devising uniform forms and
procedures.
In addition to the rule-making authority granted otherwise by this
section, the secretary of state shall make rules governing the
following provisions:
(1) The maintenance of voter registration records;
(2) The preparation, maintenance, distribution, review, and filing
of precinct maps;
(3) Standards for the design, layout, and production of ballots;
(4) The examination and testing of voting systems for
certification;
(5) The source and scope of independent evaluations of voting
systems that may be relied upon in certifying voting systems for use in
this state;
(6) Standards and procedures for the acceptance testing of voting
systems by counties;
(7) Standards and procedures for testing the programming of vote
tallying software for specific primaries and elections;
(8) Standards and procedures for the preparation and use of each
type of certified voting system including procedures for the operation
of counting centers where vote tallying systems are used;
(9) Standards and procedures to ensure the accurate tabulation and
canvassing of ballots;
(10) Consistency among the counties of the state in the preparation
of ballots, the operation of vote tallying systems, and the canvassing
of primaries and elections;
(11) Procedures to ensure the secrecy of a voter's ballot when a
small number of ballots are counted at the polls or at a counting
center;
(12) The use of substitute devices or means of voting when a voting
device at the polling place is found to be defective, the counting of
votes cast on the defective device, the counting of votes cast on the
substitute device, and the documentation that must be submitted to the
county auditor regarding such circumstances;
(13) Procedures for the transportation of sealed containers of
voted ballots or sealed voting devices;
(14) The acceptance and filing of documents via electronic
facsimile;
(15) Voter registration applications and records;
(16) The use of voter registration information in the conduct of
elections;
(17) The coordination, delivery, and processing of voter
registration records accepted by driver licensing agents or the
department of licensing;
(18) The coordination, delivery, and processing of voter
registration records accepted by agencies designated by the governor to
provide voter registration services;
(19) Procedures to receive and distribute voter registration
applications by mail;
(20) Procedures for a voter to change his or her voter registration
address within a county by telephone;
(21) Procedures for a voter to change the name under which he or
she is registered to vote;
(22) Procedures for canceling dual voter registration records and
for maintaining records of persons whose voter registrations have been
canceled;
(23) Procedures for the electronic transfer of voter registration
records between county auditors and the office of the secretary of
state;
(24) Procedures and forms for declarations of candidacy;
(25) Procedures and requirements for the acceptance and filing of
declarations of candidacy by electronic means;
(26) Procedures for the circumstance in which two or more
candidates have a name similar in sound or spelling so as to cause
confusion for the voter;
(27) Filing for office;
(28) The order of positions and offices on a ballot;
(29) Sample ballots;
(30) Independent evaluations of voting systems;
(31) The testing, approval, and certification of voting systems;
(32) The testing of vote tallying software programming;
(33) Standards and procedures to prevent fraud and to facilitate
the accurate processing and canvassing of absentee ballots and mail
ballots, including standards for the approval and implementation of
hardware and software for automated signature verification systems;
(34) Standards and procedures to guarantee the secrecy of absentee
ballots and mail ballots;
(35) Uniformity among the counties of the state in the conduct of
absentee voting and mail ballot elections;
(36) Standards and procedures to accommodate out-of-state voters,
overseas voters, and service voters;
(37) The tabulation of paper ballots before the close of the polls;
(38) The accessibility of polling places and registration
facilities that are accessible to elderly and disabled persons;
(39) The aggregation of precinct results if reporting the results
of a single precinct could jeopardize the secrecy of a person's ballot;
(40) Procedures for conducting a statutory recount;
(41) Procedures for filling vacancies in congressional offices if
the general statutory time requirements for availability of absentee
ballots, certification, canvassing, and related procedures cannot be
met;
(42) Procedures for the statistical sampling of signatures for
purposes of verifying and canvassing signatures on initiative,
referendum, and recall election petitions;
(43) Standards and deadlines for submitting material to the office
of the secretary of state for the voters' pamphlet;
(44) Deadlines for the filing of ballot titles for referendum bills
and constitutional amendments if none have been provided by the
legislature;
(45) Procedures for the publication of a state voters' pamphlet;
(46) Procedures for conducting special elections regarding nuclear
waste sites if the general statutory time requirements for availability
of absentee ballots, certification, canvassing, and related procedures
cannot be met;
(47) Procedures for conducting partisan primary elections;
(48) Standards and procedures for the proper conduct of voting
during the early voting period to provide accessability for the blind
or visually impaired;
(49) Standards for voting technology and systems used by the state
or any political subdivision to be accessible for individuals with
disabilities, including nonvisual accessibility for the blind and
visually impaired, in a manner that provides the same opportunity for
access and participation, including privacy and independence, as other
voters;
(50) All data formats for transferring voter registration data on
electronic or machine-readable media for the purpose of administering
the statewide voter registration list required by the Help America Vote
Act (P.L. 107-252);
(51) Defining the interaction of electronic voter registration
election management systems employed by each county auditor to maintain
a local copy of each county's portion of the official state list of
registered voters;
(52) Provisions and procedures to implement the state-based
administrative complaint procedure as required by the Help America Vote
Act (P.L. 107-252);
(53) Facilitating the payment of local government grants to local
government election officers or vendors; ((and))
(54) Standards for the verification of signatures on absentee,
mail, and provisional ballot envelopes;
(55) The training and certification of election administration
officials and personnel; and
(56) The policies and procedures for conducting election reviews
under RCW 29A.04.570.

Sec. 15 RCW 43.07.310 and 2003 c 111 s 2303 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of state, through the division of elections, is
responsible for the following duties, as prescribed by Title 29A RCW:
(1) The filing, verification of signatures, and certification of
state initiative, referendum, and recall petitions;
(2) The production and distribution of a state voters' pamphlet;
(3) The examination, testing, and certification of voting
equipment, voting devices, and vote-tallying systems;
(4) The administration, canvassing, and certification of the
presidential primary, state primaries, and state general elections;
(5) The administration of motor voter and other voter registration
and voter outreach programs;
(6) The training, testing, and certification of state and local
elections personnel as established in RCW 29A.04.530;
(7) ((The training of state and local party observers required by
RCW 29A.04.540;
(8))) The conduct of ((postelection)) reviews as established in RCW
29A.04.570; and
(((9))) (8) Other duties that may be prescribed by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 29A.04.236 (Manual of election laws and rules) and 2005 c
244 s 1;
(2) RCW 29A.04.245 (Voter guide) and 2003 c 111 s 140 & 2001 c 41
s 4;
(3) RCW 29A.04.510 (Election administration and certification
board -- Generally) and 2003 c 111 s 149 & 1992 c 163 s 3;
(4) RCW 29A.04.520 (Appeals) and 2003 c 111 s 150;
(5) RCW 29A.04.630 (Joint powers and duties with board) and 2003 c
111 s 163 & 1992 c 163 s 4; and
(6) RCW 29A.40.150 (Overseas, service voters) and 2006 c 206 s 7,
2005 c 245 s 1, 2003 c 111 s 1015, 1993 c 417 s 7, 1987 c 346 s 19, &
1983 1st ex.s. c 71 s 8.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Sections 7 and 12 of this act expire June
30, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Section 13 of this act takes effect June
30, 2011.

--- END ---