BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 29A.52.330 (Constitutional amendments and state measures--Notice method) and 2003 c 111 s 1311; and
(2) RCW 29A.52.340 (Constitutional amendments and state measures--Notice contents) and 2003 c 111 s 1312.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect if the proposed
amendment to Article XXIII, section 1 of the state Constitution
repealing legal notices for proposed constitutional amendments (Z-0729/09) is validly submitted to and is approved and ratified by the
voters at the next general election. If the proposed amendment is not
approved and ratified, this act is void in its entirety.

--- END ---