BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16.162 and 2006 c 337 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The owner of a farm vehicle licensed under RCW 46.16.090
purchasing a monthly license under RCW 46.16.135 may, as an alternative
to the first partial month of the license registration, secure and
operate the vehicle under authority of a farm vehicle trip permit
issued by this state. The licensed gross weight may not exceed eighty
thousand pounds for a combination of vehicles nor forty thousand pounds
for a single unit vehicle with three or more axles.
(2) If a monthly license previously issued has expired, the owner
of a farm vehicle may, as an alternative to purchasing a full monthly
license, secure and operate the vehicle under authority of a farm
vehicle trip permit issued by this state. The licensed gross weight
may not exceed eighty thousand pounds for a combination of vehicles nor
forty thousand pounds for a single unit vehicle with three or more
axles.
(3) Each farm vehicle trip permit shall authorize the operation of
a single vehicle at the maximum legal weight limit for the vehicle for
((the period remaining in the first month of monthly license)) thirty
days, commencing with the day of first use. No more than four such
permits may be used for any one vehicle in any twelve-month period.
Every permit shall identify, as the department may require, the vehicle
for which it is issued and shall be completed in its entirety and
signed by the operator before operation of the vehicle on the public
highways of this state. Correction of data on the permit such as
dates, license number, or vehicle identification number invalidates the
permit. The farm vehicle trip permit shall be displayed on the vehicle
to which it is issued as prescribed by the department.
(4) Vehicles operating under authority of farm vehicle trip permits
are subject to all laws, rules, and regulations affecting the operation
of like vehicles in this state.
(5) Farm vehicle trip permits may be obtained from the department
of licensing or agents and subagents appointed by the department. The
fee for each farm vehicle trip permit is six dollars and twenty-five
cents. Farm vehicle trip permits sold by the department's agents or
subagents are subject to fees specified in RCW 46.01.140 (4)(a),
(5)(b), or (6).
(6) The proceeds from farm vehicle trip permits received by the
director shall be forwarded to the state treasurer to be distributed as
provided in RCW 46.68.035(2).
(7) No exchange, credits, or refunds may be given for farm vehicle
trip permits after they have been purchased.
(8) The department of licensing may adopt rules as it deems
necessary to administer this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.44.095 and 1993 c 102 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When a combination of vehicles has been licensed to a total
gross weight of 80,000 pounds or when a three or more axle single unit
vehicle has been licensed to a total gross weight of 40,000 pounds, a
temporary additional tonnage permit to haul loads in excess of these
limits may be issued. This permit is valid for periods of not less
than five days at two dollars and eighty cents per day for each two
thousand pounds or fraction thereof. The fee may not be prorated. The
permits shall authorize the movement of loads not exceeding the weight
limits set forth in RCW 46.44.041 and 46.44.042.
(2) Permits purchased under this section are valid for thirty days,
commencing with the day of first use.

--- END ---