BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A ferry partnership advisory committee must be created by
September 1, 2009, to recommend annually ferry fare schedules to the
commission. The executive committee of the Washington state ferry
users shall make recommendations for appointments to the committee.
The commission shall appoint nine members to the committee, all of whom
must be permanent residents of ferry-served communities. Members of
the committee shall serve without receiving compensation.
(2) Appointments to the ferry partnership advisory committee must
include:
(a) Two ferry riders;
(b) Two representatives of local governments;
(c) Two representatives of commercial users;
(d) Two ferry system employees who work aboard the ferries; and
(e) One representative of the United States navy.
(3) Members of the ferry partnership advisory committee shall serve
three-year terms; however, the initial terms of members may be shorter
to stagger the expiration of terms.
(4) The ferry partnership advisory committee shall serve in an
advisory capacity to the commission on all matters related to the
development of ferry fares including, but not limited to: (a) Pricing
and service strategies; (b) the cost-effectiveness of ferry system
operations as it affects fare schedules; and (c) fare and service
innovations that may help control system costs and fares.
(5) Meetings of the ferry partnership advisory committee must be
public and must be timed to allow for ample public input into the ferry
fare setting cycle.
(6) Staff support, to include the provision of data and analysis of
ferry system fares, usage, and costs, must be provided to the ferry
partnership advisory committee by the department in conjunction with
the commission.
(7) In setting ferry fares, the commission shall consider
recommendations of the ferry partnership advisory committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act may be known and cited as the
Washington ferry system accountability act.

--- END ---