BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17.230 and 1987 c 201 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person required to register as a lobbyist under this chapter
shall also have the following obligations, the violation of which shall
constitute cause for revocation of his registration, and may subject
such person, and such person's employer, if such employer aids, abets,
ratifies, or confirms any such act, to other civil liabilities, as
provided by this chapter:
(1) Such persons shall obtain and preserve all accounts, bills,
receipts, books, papers, and documents necessary to substantiate the
financial reports required to be made under this chapter for a period
of at least five years from the date of the filing of the statement
containing such items, which accounts, bills, receipts, books, papers,
and documents shall be made available for inspection by the commission
at any time: PROVIDED, That if a lobbyist is required under the terms
of his employment contract to turn any records over to his employer,
responsibility for the preservation of such records under this
subsection shall rest with such employer.
(2) In addition, a person required to register as a lobbyist shall
not:
(a) Engage in any activity as a lobbyist before registering as
such;
(b) Knowingly deceive or attempt to deceive any legislator as to
any fact pertaining to any pending or proposed legislation;
(c) Cause or influence the introduction of any bill or amendment
thereto for the purpose of thereafter being employed to secure its
defeat;
(d) Knowingly represent an interest adverse to any of his employers
without first obtaining such employer's written consent thereto after
full disclosure to such employer of such adverse interest;
(e) Exercise any undue influence, extortion, or unlawful
retaliation upon any legislator by reason of such legislator's position
with respect to, or his vote upon, any pending or proposed legislation;
(f) Enter into any agreement, arrangement, or understanding
according to which his or her compensation, or any portion thereof, is
or will be contingent upon the success of any attempt to influence
legislation;
(g) Threaten any legislator, or any government official, with the
relocation of manufacturing jobs including, but not limited to, jobs
involving commercial airplane manufacturing, based upon the outcome of
any pending or proposed legislation.

--- END ---