BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The aerospace industry is critically
important to the economic vitality of Washington. Present throughout
the state, the aerospace industry accounts for over thirty-six billion
dollars in economic value to Washington. With forty-four aerospace
jobs per one thousand workers in Washington, the state is the highest
per capita aerospace employer. A highly skilled and highly educated
workforce is a key ingredient to the continued vitality and growth of
the technology-driven aerospace industry throughout the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The Washington institute of aerospace
technology and advanced manufacturing is created to improve the state's
aerospace training, education, research, and development programs by
coordinating, providing, and developing curriculum for a statewide
consortium of schools and programs that provide aerospace workforce
education and training.
(2) The institute shall be operated and administered as a
multidimensional education, training, and certification center
specifically designed to:
(a) Integrate cutting edge research and development into the
training and education of a skilled workforce;
(b) Foster the creation and retention of family wage jobs in the
aerospace industry; and
(c) Facilitate growth and innovation in the aerospace industry
throughout the state.
(3) The institute shall emphasize public-private partnerships and
provide a forum for effective interaction, collaboration, and
partnership between and among the state's aerospace industry, labor,
institutions of higher education, workforce training and education
coordinating board, innovation partnership zones, and other public and
private entities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The institute shall be headquartered in
Snohomish county and initially administered by the board of trustees of
Edmonds Community College.
(2) By January 1, 2010, the institute, jointly with the agency or
entity designated by the governor, shall submit a preliminary report to
the governor and the legislature. The report shall identify:
(a) The current existence and statewide distribution of education
at the two and four-year colleges and universities, research, and job
skills programs that relate to the needs of the aerospace industry and
its workers;
(b) Existing programs that should be consolidated or expanded;
(c) New, innovative, and cutting edge programs that should be
commenced;
(d) Interested industry, labor, and education partners;
(e) Funding for operation of the institute; and
(f) A recommended governance structure.
(3) The institute and the agency or entity designated by the
governor shall jointly submit a final report by September 1, 2010,
which includes recommended legislation and budget requests that will
enable the institute to initiate its work in the 2011-2013 biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to Title 43 RCW to
read as follows:
(1) The Washington aerospace futures account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. The governor may authorize
expenditures from the account. Expenditures from the account may be
made only for purposes of statewide aerospace workforce and industry
development, including programs and activities related to workforce
training and education, research and development, and aerospace
industry retention and expansion. Administrative expenses, including
staff support, may be paid from the account. Revenues to the account
consist of moneys received from grants and donations, funds
administered under the governor's discretion that are deposited into
the account, and moneys received pursuant to legislative
appropriations.
(2) For fiscal years 2009 through 2011, such programs and
activities shall be supported by federal workforce investment act funds
or other discretionary funds administered by the governor. These funds
may be invested independently to support such programs and activities
or may be used as match to leverage additional investments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

--- END ---