BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to fifty percent
of the selling price of propane fuel sold to a farm fuel user for
nonhighway use. Fuel used for space or water heating for human
habitation is not exempt under this section.
(2) The exemption under this section is in the form of a refund.
Sellers shall collect tax on sales subject to this exemption. The
buyer must apply for a refund directly from the department in a form
and manner prescribed by the department. A buyer must apply for a
refund within three months of the purchase of the propane fuel.
(3) "Farm fuel user" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
82.08.865.
(4) The amount of credit claimed under this section and section 2
of this act may not exceed one million dollars in any fiscal year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to
fifty percent of the value of propane fuel for nonhighway use by a farm
fuel user. Fuel used for space or water heating for human habitation
is not exempt under this section.
(2) Sellers obligated to collect use tax must collect tax on sales
subject to the exemption under this section. The buyer must apply for
a refund directly from the department in a form and manner prescribed
by the department. A buyer must apply for a refund within three months
of the use of the propane fuel.
(3) "Farm fuel user" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
82.08.865.
(4) The amount of credit claimed under this section and section 1
of this act may not exceed one million dollars in any fiscal year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect August 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act expires July 1, 2015.

--- END ---