BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In order to provide funds necessary for the
location, design, right-of-way, and construction of the state route
number 520 corridor projects, there shall be issued and sold upon the
request of the state toll agency a total of one billion nine hundred
fifty million dollars of general obligation bonds of the state of
Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Upon the request of the state toll agency,
the state finance committee shall supervise and provide for the
issuance, sale, and retirement of the bonds authorized by this act in
accordance with chapter 39.42 RCW. Bonds authorized by this act shall
be sold in the manner, at time or times, in amounts, and at the price
as the state finance committee shall determine. No bonds may be
offered for sale without prior legislative appropriation of the net
proceeds of the sale of the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized by this act shall be deposited in the state route number 520
corridor account created under section 4, chapter . . . (House Bill No.
2211), Laws of 2009, and shall be available only for the purposes
enumerated in section 1 of this act, for the payment of bond
anticipation notes or other interim financing, if any, capitalizing
interest on the bonds, and for the payment of bond issuance costs,
including the costs of underwriting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The toll facility bond retirement account is
created in the state treasury for the purpose of payment of the
principal of and interest and premium on bonds. Both principal of and
interest on the bonds issued for the purposes of this act shall be
payable from the toll facility bond retirement account. The state
finance committee may provide that special subaccounts be created in
the account to facilitate payment of the principal of and interest on
the bonds. The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th
of each year, certify to the state treasurer the amount required for
principal and interest on the bonds in accordance with the bond
proceedings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Bonds issued under the authority of this
section and sections 1, 6, and 7 of this act shall distinctly state
that they are a general obligation of the state of Washington, shall
pledge the full faith and credit of the state to the payment of the
principal thereof and the interest thereon, and shall contain an
unconditional promise to pay such principal and interest as the same
shall become due. The principal of and interest on the bonds shall be
first payable in the manner provided in this section and sections 1, 6,
and 7 of this act from toll revenue and then from proceeds of excise
taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels to the extent toll revenue is
not available for that purpose. Toll revenue and the state excise
taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels imposed by chapters 82.36 and
82.38 RCW are hereby pledged to the payment of any bonds and the
interest thereon issued under the authority of this section and
sections 1, 6, and 7 of this act, and the legislature agrees to
continue to impose these toll charges on the state route number 520
corridor, and on any other eligible toll facility designated by the
legislature and on which the imposition of tolls is authorized by the
legislature in respect of the bonds, and excise taxes on motor vehicle
and special fuels in amounts sufficient to pay, when due, the principal
and interest on all bonds issued under the authority of this section
and sections 1, 6, and 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 For bonds issued under the authority of this
section and sections 1, 5, and 7 of this act, the state treasurer shall
first withdraw toll revenue from the state route number 520 corridor
account created under section 4, chapter . . . (House Bill No. 2211),
Laws of 2009, and, to the extent toll revenue is not available, excise
taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels in the motor vehicle fund and
deposit in the toll facility bond retirement account, or a special
subaccount in the account, such amounts, and at such times, as are
required by the bond proceedings.
Any excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels required for
bond retirement or interest on the bonds authorized by this section and
sections 1, 5, and 7 of this act shall be taken from that portion of
the motor vehicle fund that results from the imposition of excise taxes
on motor vehicle and special fuels and which is, or may be,
appropriated to the department for state highway purposes. Funds
required shall never constitute a charge against any other allocations
of motor vehicle fuel and special fuel tax revenues to the state,
counties, cities, and towns unless the amount arising from excise taxes
on motor vehicle and special fuels distributed to the state in the
motor vehicle fund proves insufficient to meet the requirements for
bond retirement or interest on any such bonds.
Any payments for bond retirement or interest on the bonds taken
from other revenues from the motor vehicle fuel or special fuel taxes
that are distributable to the state, counties, cities, and towns shall
be repaid from available toll revenue in the manner provided in the
bond proceedings or, if toll revenue is not available for that purpose,
from the first excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels
distributed to the motor vehicle fund not required for bond retirement
or interest on the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Bonds issued under the authority of sections
1, 5, and 6 of this act and this section and any other general
obligation bonds of the state of Washington that have been or that may
be authorized and that pledge motor vehicle and special fuels excise
taxes for the payment of principal and interest thereon shall be an
equal charge against the revenues from such motor vehicle and special
fuels excise taxes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The tolling authority shall fix and adjust
toll rates in respect of eligible toll facilities in amounts, together
with other available toll revenue, sufficient to provide for payment of
operating and maintenance costs of eligible toll facilities, for timely
payment of debt service on bonds and to secure bonds issued for
eligible toll facilities, to comply with all financial and other
covenants made by the state in the bond proceedings, for reimbursement
of the motor vehicle fund for excise taxes on motor vehicle and special
fuels applied to the payment of bonds, and for construction costs of
any projects or portions thereof not financed with proceeds of bonds.
In fixing and adjusting toll rates under this section, the only toll
revenue to be taken into account shall be toll revenue pledged to bonds
that includes toll receipts, and the only debt service requirements to
be taken into account shall be debt service on bonds payable from and
secured by toll revenue that includes toll receipts. The legislature
pledges to appropriate toll revenue as necessary to carry out the
foregoing purposes. The legislature further agrees for the benefit of
the owners of outstanding bonds issued by the state for eligible toll
facilities to continue in effect and not to impair or withdraw the
authorization of the tolling authority to fix and adjust tolls as
provided in this act. The state finance committee shall pledge the
state's obligation to impose and maintain tolls, together with the
application of toll revenue as described in this section, to the owners
of any bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If and to the extent that the state finance
committee determines, in consultation with the state toll agency and
the tolling authority, that it will be beneficial for the state to
issue any bonds authorized in sections 1 and 5 through 7 of this act as
toll revenue bonds rather than as general obligation bonds, the state
finance committee is authorized to issue and sell, upon the request of
the state toll agency, such bonds as toll revenue bonds and not as
general obligation bonds. Notwithstanding section 5 of this act, each
such bond shall contain a recital that payment or redemption of the
bond and payment of the interest and any premium thereon is payable
solely from and secured solely by a direct pledge, charge, and lien
upon toll revenue and is not a general obligation of the state to which
the full faith and credit of the state is pledged.
Toll revenue is hereby pledged to the payment of any bonds and the
interest thereon issued under the authority of this section, and the
legislature agrees to continue to impose these toll charges on the
state route number 520 corridor, and on any other eligible toll
facility designated by the legislature and on which the imposition of
tolls is authorized by the legislature in respect of the bonds, in
amounts sufficient to pay, when due, the principal and interest on all
bonds issued under the authority of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The state finance committee may determine
and include in any resolution authorizing the issuance of any bonds
under this act, such terms, provisions, covenants, and conditions as it
may deem appropriate in order to assist with the marketing and sale of
the bonds, confer rights upon the owners of bonds, and safeguard rights
of the owners of bonds including, among other things:
(1) Provisions regarding the maintenance and operation of eligible
toll facilities;
(2) The pledges, uses, and priorities of application of toll
revenue;
(3) Provisions that bonds shall be payable from and secured solely
by toll revenue as provided by section 9 of this act, or shall be
payable from and secured by both toll revenue and by a pledge of excise
taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels and the full faith and credit
of the state as provided in sections 1 and 5 through 7 of this act;
(4) In consultation with the state toll agency and the tolling
authority, financial covenants requiring that the eligible toll
facilities must produce specified coverage ratios of toll revenue to
debt service on bonds;
(5) The purposes and conditions that must be satisfied prior to the
issuance of any additional bonds that are to be payable from and
secured by any toll revenue on an equal basis with previously issued
and outstanding bonds payable from and secured by toll revenue;
(6) Provisions that bonds for which any toll revenue are pledged,
or for which a pledge of any toll revenue may be reserved, may be
structured on a senior, parity, subordinate, or special lien basis in
relation to any other bonds for which toll revenue is pledged, with
respect to toll revenue only; and
(7) Provisions regarding reserves, credit enhancement, liquidity
facilities, and payment agreements with respect to bonds.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, covenants and conditions detailing
the character of management, maintenance, and operation of eligible
toll facilities, insurance for eligible toll facilities, financial
management of toll revenue, and disposition of eligible toll facilities
must first be approved by the state toll agency.
The owner of any bond may by mandamus or other appropriate
proceeding require and compel performance of any duties imposed upon
the tolling authority and the state toll agency and their respective
officials, including any duties imposed upon or undertaken by them or
by their respective officers, agents, and employees, in connection with
the construction, maintenance, and operation of eligible toll
facilities and in connection with the collection, deposit, investment,
application, and disbursement of the proceeds of the bonds and toll
revenue.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 For the purposes of this act, "toll
revenue" means all toll receipts, all interest income derived from the
investment of toll receipts, and any gifts, grants, or other funds
received for the benefit of eligible toll facilities. However, for the
purpose of any pledge of toll revenue to the payment of particular
bonds issued under this act, "toll revenue" means and includes only
such toll revenue or portion thereof that is pledged to the payment of
those bonds in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds.
Toll revenue constitutes "fees and revenues derived from the ownership
or operation of any undertaking, facility, or project" as that phrase
is used in Article VIII, section 1(c)(1) of the state Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 1 through 11 of this act are each
added to chapter 47.10 RCW.

--- END ---