BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Claim" includes any request or demand for state funds made to
any employee, officer, or agent of the state, or to any contractor,
grantee, or other recipient, whether under contract or not.
(2) "Employer" includes any natural person, corporation, firm,
association, organization, partnership, business, trust, or state-affiliated entity involved in a nongovernmental function, including
state universities and state hospitals.
(3)(a) "Knowing" and "knowingly" means that a person, with respect
to information, does any of the following:
(i) Has actual knowledge of the information;
(ii) Acts in deliberate ignorance of the truth or falsity of the
information;
(iii) Acts in reckless disregard of the truth or falsity of the
information.
(b) Proof of specific intent to defraud is not required.
(4) "Person" includes any natural person, corporation, firm,
association, organization, partnership, business, or trust.
(5) "State funds" means money, property, or services, if any
portion of the money, property, or services issued from, or was
provided by, the state, or if the state will reimburse a contractor,
grantee, or other recipient for any portion of the money, property, or
services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Any person who commits any of the
following acts shall be liable to the state for three times the amount
of damages that the state sustains because of the act of that person.
A person who commits any of the following acts shall also be liable
to the state for the costs of a civil action brought to recover any of
those penalties or damages, and shall be liable to the state for a
civil penalty of not less than five thousand dollars and not more than
ten thousand dollars for each violation:
(a) Knowingly presenting or causing to be presented to any
employee, officer, or agent of the state, or to any contractor,
grantee, or other recipient of state funds, a false or fraudulent claim
for payment or approval;
(b) Knowingly making, using, or causing to be made or used, a false
record or statement to get a false or fraudulent claim paid or
approved;
(c) Conspiring to defraud the state by getting a false claim
allowed or paid, or conspiring to defraud the state by knowingly
making, using, or causing to be made or used, a false record or
statement to conceal, avoid, or decrease an obligation to pay or
transmit money or property to the state;
(d) Possession, custody, or control of public property or money
used or to be used by the state and knowingly delivering or causing to
be delivered less property than the amount for which the person
receives a certificate or receipt;
(e) Being authorized to make or deliver a document certifying
receipt of property used or to be used by the state and knowingly
making or delivering a receipt that falsely represents the property
used or to be used;
(f) Knowingly buying, or receiving as a pledge of an obligation or
debt, public property from any person who lawfully may not sell or
pledge the property;
(g) Knowingly making, using, or causing to be made or used, a false
or incomplete record or statement to conceal, avoid, or decrease an
obligation to pay or transmit money or property to the state;
(h) being a beneficiary of an inadvertent submission of a false
claim to any employee, officer, or agent of the state, or to any
contractor, grantee, or other recipient of state funds, subsequently
discovering the falsity of the claim, and failing to disclose the false
claim to the state within a reasonable time after discovery of the
false claim.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the court may
assess not less than two times the amount of damages that the state
sustains because of the act of the person described in subsection (1)
of this section, and no civil penalty, if the court finds all of the
following:
(a) The person committing the violation furnished officials of the
state who are responsible for investigating false claims violations
with all information known to that person about the violation within
thirty days after the date on which the person first obtained the
information;
(b) The person fully cooperated with any investigation by the
state;
(c) At the time the person furnished the state with information
about the violation, no criminal prosecution, civil action, or
administrative action had commenced with respect to the violation, and
the person did not have actual knowledge of the existence of an
investigation into the violation.
(3) This section does not apply to claims, records, or statements
made under Title 82, 83, or 84 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The attorney general diligently shall
investigate a violation under section 2 of this act. If the attorney
general finds that a person has violated or is violating section 2 of
this act, the attorney general may bring a civil action under this
section against that person.
(2)(a) A person may bring a civil action for a violation of section
2 of this act for the person and for the state in the name of the
state. The person bringing the action shall be referred to as the qui
tam plaintiff. Once filed, the action may be dismissed only with the
written consent of the court, taking into account the best interest of
the parties involved and the public purposes behind this chapter.
(b) A copy of the complaint and written disclosure of substantially
all material evidence and information the person possesses shall be
served on the attorney general. The complaint shall also be filed in
camera, shall remain under seal for at least sixty days, and shall not
be served on the defendant until the court so orders. The state may
elect to intervene and proceed with the action within sixty days after
it receives both the complaint and the material evidence and the
information.
(c) The state may, for good cause shown, move the court for
extensions of the time during which the complaint remains under seal
under (b) of this subsection. Any such motions may be supported by
affidavits or other submissions in camera. The defendant shall not be
required to respond to any complaint filed under this section until
after the complaint is unsealed and served upon the defendant pursuant
to the rules of civil procedure.
(d) Before the expiration of the sixty-day period or any extensions
obtained under (c) of this subsection, the state shall:
(i) Proceed with the action, in which case the action shall be
conducted by the state; or
(ii) Notify the court that it declines to take over the action, in
which case the person bringing the action shall have the right to
conduct the action.
(e) When a person brings a valid action under this subsection, no
person other than the state may intervene or bring a related action
based on the facts underlying the pending action.
(3)(a) If the state proceeds with the action, it shall have the
primary responsibility for prosecuting the action, and shall not be
bound by an act of the person bringing the action. Such person shall
have the right to continue as a party to the action, subject to the
limitations set forth in (b) of this subsection.
(b)(i) The state may seek to dismiss the action for good cause
notwithstanding the objections of the qui tam plaintiff if the qui tam
plaintiff has been notified by the state of the filing of the motion
and the court has provided the qui tam plaintiff with an opportunity to
oppose the motion and present evidence at a hearing.
(ii) The state may settle the action with the defendant
notwithstanding the objections of the qui tam plaintiff if the court
determines, after a hearing providing the qui tam plaintiff an
opportunity to present evidence, that the proposed settlement is fair,
adequate, and reasonable under all of the circumstances.
(iii) Upon a showing by the state that unrestricted participation
during the course of the litigation by the person initiating the action
would interfere with or unduly delay the state's prosecution of the
case, or would be repetitious, irrelevant, or for purposes of
harassment, the court may, in its discretion, impose limitations on the
person's participation, such as:
(A) Limiting the number of witnesses the person may call;
(B) Limiting the length of the testimony of such witnesses;
(C) Limiting the person's cross-examination of witnesses; or
(D) Otherwise limiting the participation by the person in the
litigation.
(iv) Upon a showing by the defendant that unrestricted
participation during the course of the litigation by the person
initiating the action would be for purposes of harassment or would
cause the defendant undue burden or unnecessary expense, the court may
limit the participation by the person in the litigation.
(c) If the state elects not to proceed with the action, the person
who initiated the action shall have the right to conduct the action.
If the state so requests, it shall be served with copies of all
pleadings filed in the action and shall be supplied with copies of all
deposition transcripts, at the state's expense. When a person proceeds
with the action, the court, without limiting the status and rights of
the person initiating the action, may nevertheless permit the state to
intervene at a later date upon a showing of good cause.
(d) Whether or not the state proceeds with the action, upon a
showing by the state that certain actions of discovery by the person
initiating the action would interfere with the state's investigation or
prosecution of a criminal or civil matter arising out of the same
facts, the court may stay such discovery for a period of not more than
sixty days. Such a showing shall be conducted in camera. The court
may extend the sixty-day period upon a further showing in camera that
the state has pursued the criminal or civil investigation or
proceedings with reasonable diligence and any proposed discovery in the
civil action will interfere with the ongoing criminal or civil
investigation or proceedings.
(e) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, the state may
elect to pursue its claim through any alternate remedy available to the
state, including any administrative proceeding to determine a civil
money penalty. If any such alternate remedy is pursued in another
proceeding, the person initiating the action shall have the same rights
in such proceeding as such person would have had if the action had
continued under this section. Any finding of fact or conclusion of law
made in such other proceeding that has become final shall be conclusive
on all parties to an action under this section.
For purposes of this subsection (3)(e), a finding or conclusion is
final if it has been finally determined on appeal to the appropriate
court of the state, if all time for filing such an appeal with respect
to the finding or conclusion has expired, or if the finding or
conclusion is not subject to judicial review.
(4)(a)(i)(A) If the state proceeds with an action brought by a
person under subsection (2) of this section, such person shall, subject
to the limitations in (a)(i)(B) of this subsection, receive at least
fifteen percent but not more than twenty-five percent of the proceeds
of the action or settlement of the claim, which includes damages, civil
penalties, payments for costs of compliance, and any other economic
benefit realized by the government as a result of the action, depending
upon the extent to which the person and/or his or her counsel
substantially contributed to the prosecution of the action.
(B) Where the action is one which the court finds to be based
primarily on disclosures of specific information, other than
information provided by the person bringing the action, relating to
allegations or transactions specifically in a criminal, civil, or
administrative hearing, or in a legislative or administrative report,
hearing, audit, or investigation, or from the news media, the court may
award such sums as it considers appropriate, but in no case more than
ten percent of the proceeds, taking into account the significance of
the information and the role of the person bringing the action in
advancing the case to litigation.
(ii) Any payment to a person under (a)(i) of this subsection shall
be made from the proceeds. Any such person shall also receive an
amount for reasonable expenses which the appropriate state court judge
finds to have been necessarily incurred, plus reasonable attorneys'
fees and costs. All such expenses, fees, and costs shall be awarded
against the defendant.
(b) If the state does not proceed with an action under this
section, the person bringing the action or settling the claim shall
receive an amount that the court decides is reasonable for collecting
the civil penalty and damages. The amount shall be not less than
twenty-five percent and not more than thirty percent of the proceeds of
the action or settlement and shall be paid out of such proceeds, which
includes damages, civil penalties, payments for costs of compliance,
and any other economic benefit realized by the government as a result
of the action. Such person shall also receive an amount for reasonable
expenses that the court finds to have been necessarily incurred, plus
reasonable attorneys' fees and costs. All such expenses, fees, and
costs shall be awarded against the defendant.
(c) Whether or not the state proceeds with the action, if the court
finds that the action was brought by a person who planned and initiated
the violation of section (2) of this act upon which the action was
brought, then the court may, to the extent the court considers
appropriate, reduce the share of the proceeds of the action which the
person would otherwise receive under (a) or (b) of this subsection,
taking into account the role of that person in advancing the case to
litigation and any relevant circumstances pertaining to the violation.
If the person bringing the action is convicted of criminal conduct
arising from his or her role in the violation of section 2 of this act,
that person shall be dismissed from the civil action and shall not
receive any share of the proceeds of the action. Such dismissal shall
not prejudice the right of the state to continue the action.
(d) If the state does not proceed with the action and the person
bringing the action conducts the action, the court may award to the
defendant its reasonable attorneys' fees and expenses if the defendant
prevails in the action and the court finds that the claim of the person
bringing the action was clearly frivolous, clearly vexatious, or
brought primarily for purposes of harassment.
(5)(a) No court shall have jurisdiction over an action brought
under subsection (2) of this section against a member of the state
legislative branch, a member of the judiciary, or a senior executive
branch official if the action is based on evidence or information known
to the state when the action was brought.
(b) In no event may a person bring an action under subsection (2)
of this section that is based upon allegations or transactions which
are the subject of a civil suit or an administrative civil money
penalty proceeding in which the state is already a party.
(c) Upon motion of the attorney general, the court may, in
consideration of all the equities, dismiss a relator if the elements of
the actionable false claims alleged in the qui tam complaint have been
publicly disclosed specifically in the news media or in a publicly
disseminated governmental report, at the time the complaint is filed.
(6) The state is not liable for expenses that a person incurs in
bringing an action under this section.
(7) Any employee who is discharged, demoted, suspended, threatened,
harassed, or in any other manner discriminated against in the terms and
conditions of employment by his or her employer because of lawful acts
done by the employee on behalf of the employee or others in furtherance
of an action under this section, including investigation for,
initiation of, testimony for, or assistance in an action filed or to be
filed under this section, shall be entitled to all relief necessary to
make the employee whole. Such relief shall include reinstatement with
the same seniority status such employee would have had but for the
discrimination, two times the amount of back pay, interest on the back
pay, and compensation for any special damages sustained as a result of
the discrimination, including litigation costs and reasonable
attorneys' fees. An employee may bring an action in the appropriate
court of the state for the relief provided in this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A civil action under section 3 of this
act may not be brought more than ten years after the date on which the
violation was committed.
(2) A civil action under section 3 of this act may be brought for
activity prior to the effective date of this section if the limitations
period set in subsection (1) of this section has not lapsed.
(3) In any action brought under section 3 of this act, the state or
the qui tam plaintiff shall be required to prove all essential elements
of the cause of action, including damages, by a preponderance of the
evidence.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a guilty verdict
rendered in a criminal proceeding charging false statements or fraud,
whether upon a verdict after trial or upon a plea of guilty or nolo
contendere, shall estop the defendant from denying the essential
elements of the offense in any action that involves the same
transaction as in the criminal proceeding and that is brought under
section (3) (1), (2), or (3) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The provisions of this chapter are not
exclusive, and the remedies provided for in this chapter shall be in
addition to any other remedies provided for in any other law or
available under common law.
(2) If any provision of this act or its application to any person
or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the
application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not
affected.
(3) This chapter shall be liberally construed and applied to
promote the public interest. This chapter also adopts the
congressional intent behind the federal false claims act (31 U.S.C.
Secs. 3729–3733), including the legislative history underlying the 1986
amendments to the federal false claims act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 7 RCW.

--- END ---