BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the citizens of
the state of Washington benefit from the efficient and effective
resolution of claims for benefits under health plans administered, in
whole or in part, by the state. The legislature recognizes a public
interest in injured citizens' certainty in determining whether and to
what extent their treatment is covered by various insurers. The
legislature further recognizes the public's interest in the state's
administration of programs that is as efficient as possible, in light
of technological advances.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) For the purpose of determining the eligibility of persons
claiming benefits under medicaid, the department of social and health
services or its agent shall send automated eligibility inquiry messages
to insurers providing health insurance or health care coverage, workers
compensation, auto insurance, or homeowner's insurance to persons
residing in the state.
(b) The department of social and health services or its agent is
authorized to transmit, and shall transmit, automated eligibility
inquiries to insurers to resolve the primacy of claims for benefits
under health plans administered, in whole or in part, by the state.
The eligibility inquiries may include the minimum human identifiers in
ANSI X.12 270, such as the name, gender, and date of birth of a person.
(2) In addition to their obligations under RCW 74.09A.030, insurers
must respond within twenty-four hours to the department's eligibility
inquiry messages or upload to a centralized database information on
coverage and benefits, as required by the state of Washington.
(3) Before January 1, 2010, the department of social and health
services shall:
(a) Examine all medicaid claims paid after January 1, 2004, and
before July 1, 2009;
(b) Determine which of those claims were eligible for payment by a
third party other than medicaid; and
(c) Recover the costs associated with the claims that were eligible
for payment by a third party other than medicaid.
(4) The department of social and health services is authorized to
enforce this section against an insurer that fails to comply with the
requirements of this section.
(a) In a case in which an insurer fails to comply with the
requirements of this section, the attorney general shall:
(i) Subpoena the enrollment data of the insurer;
(ii) Commence a complaint under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1320(d) for
administrative sanctions under the health insurance portability and
accountability act;
(iii) Commence a prosecution under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 1035; or
(iv) Commence an action in state court to enjoin the insurer from
nonperformance of its duty under this section.
(b)(i) A court may order injunctive relief and costs, including
attorney fees; or
(ii) A court may order damages, including penalties of up to one
thousand dollars for each eligibility inquiry message to which the
insurer has failed or refused to respond. An attempt to impose data
elements or other burdens not expressly authorized by this statute upon
the content, terms, or execution of the response must be construed as
a failure or refusal to comply.
(c) The insurance commissioner may suspend, revoke, or refuse to
renew an insurer's certificate of authority, based upon failure or
refusal to comply with this section.
(5) For purposes of this section, "insurer" has the same meaning as
in RCW 48.01.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) For the purpose of determining the eligibility of persons
claiming benefits under the public employees' benefits board, the basic
health plan, or the health insurance partnership, the administrator of
the Washington state health care authority or his or her agent may send
automated eligibility inquiry messages to insurers providing health
insurance or health care coverage, workers compensation, auto
insurance, or homeowner's insurance to persons residing in the state.
(b) The administrator or his or her agent is authorized to transmit
automated eligibility inquiries to insurers to resolve the primacy of
claims for benefits under health plans administered, in whole or in
part, by the state. The eligibility inquiries may include the minimum
human identifiers in ANSI X.12 270, such as the name, gender, and date
of birth of a person.
(2) In addition to their obligations under RCW 74.09A.030, insurers
must respond within twenty-four hours to the administrator's
eligibility inquiry messages or upload to a centralized database
information on coverage and benefits, as required by the state of
Washington.
(3) The administrator may:
(a) Examine any claims paid;
(b) Determine which of those claims were eligible for payment by a
third party other than those programs administered by the
administrator; and
(c) Recover the costs associated with the claims that were eligible
for payment by a third party other than those programs administered by
the administrator.
(4) The administrator is authorized to enforce this section against
an insurer that fails to comply with the requirements of this section.
(a) In a case in which an insurer fails to comply with the
requirements of this section, the attorney general shall:
(i) Subpoena the enrollment data of the insurer;
(ii) Commence a complaint under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1320(d) for
administrative sanctions under the health insurance portability and
accountability act;
(iii) Commence a prosecution under applicable law; or
(iv) Commence an action in state court to enjoin the insurer from
nonperformance of its duty under this section.
(b)(i) A court may order injunctive relief and costs, including
attorney fees; or
(ii) A court may order damages, including penalties of up to one
thousand dollars for each eligibility inquiry message to which the
insurer has failed or refused to respond. An attempt to impose data
elements or other burdens not expressly authorized by this statute upon
the content, terms, or execution of the response must be construed as
a failure or refusal to comply.
(c) The insurance commissioner may suspend, revoke, or refuse to
renew an insurer's certificate of authority, based upon failure or
refusal to comply with this section.
(5) For purposes of this section, "insurer" has the same meaning as
in RCW 48.01.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 48.05 RCW
to read as follows:
Eligibility, coverage, employment, and income data that is shared
under this act in the process of determining primacy must be construed
as an element of data used in the process of billing for medical
services rendered and is expressly exempt from the privacy and
confidentiality provisions of 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1320 and state law. A
person receiving data for that purpose may not use the data for any
other purpose.

--- END ---