BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.22.179 and 2007 c 427 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the surcharge authorized in RCW 36.22.178, and
except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, an additional
surcharge of ((ten)) thirty dollars shall be charged by the county
auditor for each document recorded, which will be in addition to any
other charge allowed by law. The funds collected pursuant to this
section are to be distributed and used as follows:
(a) The auditor shall retain two percent for collection of the fee,
and of the remainder shall remit sixty percent to the county to be
deposited into a fund that must be used by the county and its cities
and towns to accomplish the purposes of ((this)) chapter 484, Laws of
2005, six percent of which may be used by the county for administrative
costs related to its homeless housing plan, and the remainder for
programs which directly accomplish the goals of the county's local
homeless housing plan, except that for each city in the county which
elects as authorized in RCW 43.185C.080 to operate its own local
homeless housing program, a percentage of the surcharge assessed under
this section equal to the percentage of the city's local portion of the
real estate excise tax collected by the county shall be transmitted at
least quarterly to the city treasurer, without any deduction for county
administrative costs, for use by the city for program costs which
directly contribute to the goals of the city's local homeless housing
plan; of the funds received by the city, it may use six percent for
administrative costs for its homeless housing program.
(b) The auditor shall remit the remaining funds to the state
treasurer for deposit in the home security fund account. The
department may use twelve and one-half percent of this amount for
administration of the program established in RCW 43.185C.020, including
the costs of creating the statewide homeless housing strategic plan,
measuring performance, providing technical assistance to local
governments, and managing the homeless housing grant program. The
remaining eighty-seven and one-half percent is to be used by the
department to:
(i) Provide housing and shelter for homeless people including, but
not limited to: Grants to operate, repair, and staff shelters; grants
to operate transitional housing; partial payments for rental
assistance; consolidated emergency assistance; overnight youth
shelters; and emergency shelter assistance; and
(ii) Fund the homeless housing grant program.
(2) The surcharge imposed in this section does not apply to
assignments or substitutions of previously recorded deeds of trust.

--- END ---