BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 79A.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commission shall attempt to recruit and maintain volunteers
to serve as park hosts in all state parks. It is the goal of the
commission to have volunteer park hosts available at each state park
for at least eight hours of every day that the park is open. The
commission shall report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by the end of each odd-numbered year regarding the state
parks where this goal was not met and a summary of recruiting efforts
conducted by the commission to meet the goal.
(2) Volunteer park hosts have the following responsibilities and
duties:
(a) Solicit voluntary donations from park guests, including the
provision of any pertinent information regarding the tax benefits of
donations to state parks;
(b) Assist with visitor services, such as greeting guests,
answering questions, and dispensing information;
(c) Conduct minor concessions at the park; and
(d) Perform minor maintenance of the park facilities.
(3) The commission shall, in state parks that are not staffed by
volunteer park hosts, utilize unmanned donation collection boxes to
solicit voluntary donations from park guests. The commission may use
unmanned voluntary collection boxes in state parks staffed by volunteer
park hosts.
(4) All donations collected under this section must be deposited
into the state parks renewal and stewardship account established in RCW
79A.05.215.
(5) The commission shall not charge volunteer park hosts for
camping, boat moorage, utility hookups, or other fees charged for the
use of state parks and state parks facilities. The commission may
establish minimum hourly commitments necessary for volunteer park hosts
to qualify for fee waivers.

Sec. 2 RCW 79A.05.030 and 2005 c 373 s 1 and 2005 c 360 s 5 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The commission shall:
(1) Have the care, charge, control, and supervision of all parks
and parkways acquired or set aside by the state for park or parkway
purposes.
(2) Adopt policies, and adopt, issue, and enforce rules pertaining
to the use, care, and administration of state parks and parkways. The
commission shall cause a copy of the rules to be kept posted in a
conspicuous place in every state park to which they are applicable, but
failure to post or keep any rule posted shall be no defense to any
prosecution for the violation thereof.
(3) Permit the use of state parks and parkways by the public under
such rules as shall be adopted.
(4) Clear, drain, grade, seed, and otherwise improve or beautify
parks and parkways, and erect structures, buildings, fireplaces, and
comfort stations and build and maintain paths, trails, and roadways
through or on parks and parkways.
(5) Grant concessions or leases in state parks and parkways, upon
such rentals, fees, or percentage of income or profits and for such
terms, in no event longer than fifty years, and upon such conditions as
shall be approved by the commission: PROVIDED, That leases exceeding
a twenty-year term shall require a unanimous vote of the commission:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That if, during the term of any concession or lease,
it is the opinion of the commission that it would be in the best
interest of the state, the commission may, with the consent of the
concessionaire or lessee, alter and amend the terms and conditions of
such concession or lease: PROVIDED FURTHER, That television station
leases shall be subject to the provisions of RCW 79A.05.085, only:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That the rates of such concessions or leases shall be
renegotiated at five-year intervals. No concession shall be granted
which will prevent the public from having free access to the scenic
attractions of any park or parkway.
(6) Employ such assistance as it deems necessary and recruit
volunteer assistance as required by section 1 of this act. Commission
expenses relating to its use of volunteer assistance shall be limited
to premiums or assessments for the insurance of volunteers by the
department of labor and industries, compensation of staff who assist
volunteers, materials and equipment used in authorized volunteer
projects, training, reimbursement of volunteer travel as provided in
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, and other reasonable expenses relating to
volunteer recognition. The commission((, at its discretion, may))
shall waive commission fees ((otherwise applicable to volunteers)) for
volunteer park hosts recruited under section 1 of this act and may
waive fees for other park volunteers. The commission shall not use
volunteers, other than volunteer park hosts recruited under section 1
of this act, to replace or supplant classified positions. The use of
volunteers, other than volunteer park hosts recruited under section 1
of this act, may not lead to the elimination of any employees or
permanent positions in the bargaining unit.
(7) By majority vote of its authorized membership select and
purchase or obtain options upon, lease, or otherwise acquire for and in
the name of the state such tracts of land, including shore and tide
lands, for park and parkway purposes as it deems proper. If the
commission cannot acquire any tract at a price it deems reasonable, it
may, by majority vote of its authorized membership, obtain title
thereto, or any part thereof, by condemnation proceedings conducted by
the attorney general as provided for the condemnation of rights-of-way
for state highways. Option agreements executed under authority of this
subsection shall be valid only if:
(a) The cost of the option agreement does not exceed one dollar;
and
(b) Moneys used for the purchase of the option agreement are from
(i) funds appropriated therefor, or (ii) funds appropriated for
undesignated land acquisitions, or (iii) funds deemed by the commission
to be in excess of the amount necessary for the purposes for which they
were appropriated; and
(c) The maximum amount payable for the property upon exercise of
the option does not exceed the appraised value of the property.
(8) Cooperate with the United States, or any county or city of this
state, in any matter pertaining to the acquisition, development,
redevelopment, renovation, care, control, or supervision of any park or
parkway, and enter into contracts in writing to that end. All parks or
parkways, to which the state contributed or in whose care, control, or
supervision the state participated pursuant to the provisions of this
section, shall be governed by the provisions hereof.
(9) Within allowable resources, maintain policies that increase the
number of people who have access to free or low-cost recreational
opportunities for physical activity, including noncompetitive physical
activity.
(10) Adopt rules establishing the requirements for a criminal
history record information search for the following: Job applicants,
volunteer park hosts and other park volunteers, and independent
contractors who have unsupervised access to children or vulnerable
adults, or who will be responsible for collecting or disbursing cash or
processing credit/debit card transactions. These background checks
will be done through the Washington state patrol criminal
identification section and may include a national check from the
federal bureau of investigation, which shall be through the submission
of fingerprints. A permanent employee of the commission, employed as
of July 24, 2005, is exempt from the provisions of this subsection.

Sec. 3 RCW 79A.05.215 and 2007 c 340 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state parks renewal and stewardship account is created in the
state treasury. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all
receipts from user fees, concessions, leases, donations collected under
RCW 46.16.076 and section 1 of this act, and other state park-based
activities shall be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the
account may be used for operating state parks, developing and
renovating park facilities, undertaking deferred maintenance, enhancing
park stewardship, and other state park purposes. Expenditures from the
account may be made only after appropriation by the legislature.

--- END ---