BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
impose tolls simultaneously on the state route number 520 floating
bridge and the Interstate 90 floating bridge to help finance
construction of critical safety projects, including increasing capacity
in the east-west corridor across Lake Washington with the replacement
of the state route number 520 floating bridge, to generate additional
funds to help finance associated projects in the state route number 520
corridor program, and to guarantee travel time, speed, and reliability
for individuals crossing Lake Washington by way of either state route
number 520 or Interstate 90. The associated projects on state route
number 520 include connections from Interstate 5 to the floating
bridge, and from the east end of the floating bridge to state route
number 202.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.56 RCW
under the subchapter heading "toll facilities created after July 1,
2008" to read as follows:
(1)(a) The imposition of tolls on the state route number 520
corridor is authorized, the state route number 520 corridor is
designated an eligible toll facility, and toll revenue generated in the
corridor must only be expended as allowed under RCW 47.56.820. The
tolls imposed on the state route number 520 corridor must only be
collected on the state route number 520 floating bridge.
(b) The imposition of tolls on the Interstate 90 corridor is
authorized, the Interstate 90 corridor is designated an eligible toll
facility, and toll revenue generated in the corridor must only be
expended as allowed under RCW 47.56.820. The tolls imposed on the
Interstate 90 corridor must only be collected on the Interstate 90
floating bridge.
(2) The Lake Washington transportation corridor consists of that
portion of state route number 520 between Interstate 5 and state route
number 202 and that portion of Interstate 90 between Interstate 5 and
Interstate 405.
(3)(a) In setting the toll rates for the state route number 520
corridor and the Interstate 90 corridor pursuant to RCW 47.56.850, the
tolling authority shall set a variable schedule of toll rates to
maintain travel time, speed, and reliability on the corridor and
generate the necessary revenue as required under (b) of this
subsection.
(b) The tolling authority shall set the variable schedules of toll
rates for the state route number 520 corridor and the Interstate 90
corridor, which the tolling authority may adjust at least annually to
reflect inflation as measured by the consumer price index, to generate
revenue sufficient to provide for:
(i) The issuance of up to one billion two hundred million dollars
in motor vehicle tax general obligation bonds; and
(ii) Costs associated with the project designated in subsection (4)
of this section that are eligible under RCW 47.56.820.
(4) The proceeds of the bonds designated in subsection (3)(b)(i) of
this section must be used only to fund:
(a) The construction of a replacement state route number 520
floating bridge; and
(b) The construction of other projects on the state route number
520 corridor.
(5) The state toll agency may carry out the construction and
improvements designated in subsection (4) of this section and
administer the tolling program on the state route number 520 corridor
and the Interstate 90 corridor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 47.56 RCW
under the subchapter heading "toll facilities created after July 1,
2008" to read as follows:
(1) Unless otherwise delegated, the department is the state toll
agency with the authority to administer tolling programs on eligible
toll facilities, including the state route number 520 corridor and the
Interstate 90 floating bridge. The state toll agency may adopt and
amend rules to govern operations, collections, and enforcement on each
eligible toll facility. In implementing tolling programs, the state
toll agency may (a) collect and retain any toll charges and penalties
imposed, (b) issue toll bills and notices of infraction, (c) use
available resources to collect unpaid toll charges, including
forwarding unpaid infractions to the department of licensing pursuant
to RCW 46.20.270(3) and assigning the unpaid infractions to collection
agencies under RCW 19.16.500, (d) allocate administrative fees and
infraction charges to the toll facilities on which the fees and charges
were incurred, (e) resolve disputes involving toll charges, and (f)
procure and sell transponders or enter into contracts and license
agreements to procure and sell transponders as necessary for the
operation of electronic toll collection systems on eligible toll
facilities.
(2) Prior to executing any contracts under this section, the
department shall submit the contracts to the commission for review.
The department shall not execute any such contracts until the contracts
are approved as to form by the commission. The commission shall
approve or reject in writing any such contract within forty-five days
of the submission of the contract by the department. The written
rejection of a contract must also include a detailed list of the
reasons for the rejection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 47.56 RCW
under the subchapter heading "toll facilities created after July 1,
2008" to read as follows:
A special account to be known as the Lake Washington transportation
corridor account is created in the state treasury.
(1) Deposits to the account must include:
(a) All proceeds of bonds issued for construction of the state
route number 520 corridor, including any capitalized interest;
(b) All of the tolls and other revenues received from the operation
of the state route number 520 corridor as a toll facility, to be
deposited at least monthly;
(c) All of the tolls and other revenues received from the operation
of the Interstate 90 corridor as a toll facility, to be deposited at
least monthly;
(d) Any interest that may be earned from the deposit or investment
of those revenues;
(e) Notwithstanding RCW 47.12.063, proceeds from the sale of any
surplus real property acquired for the purpose of building the
replacement state route number 520 floating bridge or the construction
of other projects on the state route number 520 corridor; and
(f) All damages, liquidated or otherwise, collected under any
contract involving the construction of projects on the state route
number 520 corridor.
(2) Toll charges, other revenues, and interest may be used to:
(a) Pay any required costs allowed under RCW 47.56.820; and
(b) Repay amounts to the motor vehicle fund as required.
(3) When repaying the motor vehicle fund, the state treasurer shall
transfer funds from the Lake Washington transportation corridor account
to the motor vehicle fund on or before each debt service date for bonds
issued for the replacement state route number 520 floating bridge
project or the construction of other projects on the state route number
520 corridor in an amount sufficient to repay the motor vehicle fund
for amounts transferred from that fund to the highway bond retirement
fund to provide for any bond principal and interest due on that date.
The state treasurer may establish subaccounts for the purpose of
segregating toll charges, bond sale proceeds, and other revenues.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.84.092 and 2008 c 128 s 19 and 2008 c 106 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate
share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily
balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search
and rescue account, the budget stabilization account, the capitol
building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia
river basin water supply development account, the common school
construction fund, the county arterial preservation account, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of licensing services
account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the
developmental disabilities community trust account, the drinking water
assistance account, the drinking water assistance administrative
account, the drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern
Washington University capital projects account, the education
construction fund, the education legacy trust account, the election
account, the energy freedom account, the essential rail assistance
account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the
federal forest revolving account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
freight congestion relief account, the freight mobility investment
account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing
protective fund, the health services account, the public health
services account, the health system capacity account, the personal
health services account, the high capacity transportation account, the
state higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway
infrastructure account, the highway safety account, the high occupancy
toll lanes operations account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
Lake Washington transportation corridor account, the local leasehold
excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local
sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home
park relocation fund, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety
education account, the multimodal transportation account, the municipal
criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account, the natural resources deposit account, the oyster
reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the
perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities
construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public
health supplemental account, the public transportation systems account,
the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital
construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the
Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real estate appraiser
commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional
mobility grant program account, the resource management cost account,
the rural arterial trust account, the rural Washington loan fund, the
safety and education account, the site closure account, the small city
pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the
special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the
state employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment board
expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund
accounts, the state patrol highway account, the supplemental pension
account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership
account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tuition recovery trust
fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University
of Washington building account, the urban arterial trust account, the
volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account, the
Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety
employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the
state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect August 1, 2009.

--- END ---