BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.260 and 1994 c 249 s 30 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each growth management hearings board shall consist of three
members qualified by experience or training in matters pertaining to
land use planning and, except as provided in RCW 36.70A.270(4),
residing within the jurisdictional boundaries of the applicable board.
At least one member of each board must be admitted to practice law in
this state and at least one member must have been a city or county
elected official. Each board shall be appointed by the governor and
not more than two members at the time of appointment or during their
term shall be members of the same political party. No more than two
members at the time of appointment or during their term shall reside in
the same county.
(2) Each member of a board shall be appointed for a term of six
years. A vacancy shall be filled by appointment by the governor for
the unexpired portion of the term in which the vacancy occurs. ((The
terms of the first three members of a board shall be staggered so that
one member is appointed to serve until July 1, 1994, one member until
July 1, 1996, and one member until July 1, 1998.))

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.270 and 1997 c 429 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each growth management hearings board shall be governed by the
following rules on conduct and procedure:
(1) Any board member may be removed for inefficiency, malfeasance,
and misfeasance in office, under specific written charges filed by the
governor. The governor shall transmit such written charges to the
member accused and the chief justice of the supreme court. The chief
justice shall thereupon designate a tribunal composed of three judges
of the superior court to hear and adjudicate the charges. Removal of
any member of a board by the tribunal shall disqualify such member for
reappointment.
(2) Each board member shall receive reimbursement for travel
expenses incurred in the discharge of his or her duties in accordance
with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060((. If it is determined that the
review boards shall operate on a full-time basis, each member shall
receive an annual salary to be determined by the governor pursuant to
RCW 43.03.040. If it is determined that a review board shall operate
on a part-time basis, each member shall receive compensation pursuant
to RCW 43.03.250, provided such amount shall not exceed the amount that
would be set if they were a full-time board member. The principal
office of each board shall be located by the governor within the
jurisdictional boundaries of each board. The boards shall operate on
either a part-time or full-time basis, as determined by the governor)),
and each board member shall receive compensation in accordance with RCW
43.03.040.
(3) Each board member shall not: (a) Be a candidate for or hold
any other public office or trust; (b) engage in any occupation or
business interfering with or inconsistent with his or her duty as a
board member; and (c) for a period of one year after the termination of
his or her board membership, act in a representative capacity before
the board on any matter.
(4) A majority of each board shall constitute a quorum for making
orders or decisions, adopting rules necessary for the conduct of its
powers and duties, or transacting other official business, and may act
even though one position of the board is vacant. One or more members
may hold hearings and take testimony to be reported for action by the
board when authorized by rule or order of the board. If, due to
vacancy, disqualification, illness, injury, workload imbalances, or
budgetary constraints, only two members are available to render a
decision on a case, the two remaining members may select a member from
a different board to substitute for the unavailable member and render
a decision on that case only. In selecting a substitute member, the
selecting board must attempt to maintain the applicable compositional
requirements of RCW 36.70A.260(1). The board shall perform all the
powers and duties specified in this chapter or as otherwise provided by
law.
(5) The board may appoint one or more hearing examiners to assist
the board in its hearing function, to make conclusions of law and
findings of fact and, if requested by the board, to make
recommendations to the board for decisions in cases before the board.
Such hearing examiners must have demonstrated knowledge of land use
planning and law. The boards shall specify in their joint rules of
practice and procedure, as required by subsection (7) of this section,
the procedure and criteria to be employed for designating hearing
examiners as a presiding officer. Hearing examiners selected by a
board shall meet the requirements of subsection (3) of this section.
The findings and conclusions of the hearing examiner shall not become
final until they have been formally approved by the board. This
authorization to use hearing examiners does not waive the requirement
of RCW 36.70A.300 that final orders be issued within one hundred eighty
days of board receipt of a petition.
(6) Each board shall make findings of fact and prepare a written
decision in each case decided by it, and such findings and decision
shall be effective upon being signed by two or more board members who
participated in deciding the matter of the board, and upon being filed
at the board's principal office((, and)) or, after June 30, 2009, at
the office of growth management hearings boards. Filed decisions shall
be open for public inspection at all reasonable times.
(7) All proceedings before the board, any of its members, or a
hearing examiner appointed by the board shall be conducted in
accordance with such administrative rules of practice and procedure as
the boards jointly prescribe. All three boards shall jointly meet to
develop and adopt joint rules of practice and procedure, including
rules regarding expeditious and summary disposition of appeals. The
boards shall publish such rules and decisions they render and arrange
for the reasonable distribution of the rules and decisions. Except as
it conflicts with specific provisions of this chapter, the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, and specifically
including the provisions of RCW 34.05.455 governing ex parte
communications, shall govern the practice and procedure of the boards.
(8) A board member or hearing examiner is subject to
disqualification under chapter 34.05 RCW. The joint rules of practice
of the boards shall establish procedures by which a party to a hearing
conducted before the board may file with the board a motion to
disqualify, with supporting affidavit, against a board member or
hearing examiner assigned to preside at the hearing.
(9) The members of the boards shall meet jointly on at least an
annual basis with the objective of sharing information that promotes
the goals and purposes of this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.70A.290 and 1997 c 429 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All requests for review to a growth management hearings board
shall be initiated by filing a petition to the office of growth
management hearings boards that includes a detailed statement of issues
presented for resolution by the applicable board. The board shall
render written decisions articulating the basis for its holdings. The
board shall not issue advisory opinions on issues not presented to the
board in the statement of issues, as modified by any prehearing order.
(2) All petitions relating to whether or not an adopted
comprehensive plan, development regulation, or permanent amendment
thereto, is in compliance with the goals and requirements of this
chapter or chapter 90.58 or 43.21C RCW must be filed within sixty days
after publication by the legislative bodies of the county or city.
(a) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, the date of
publication for a city shall be the date the city publishes the
ordinance, or summary of the ordinance, adopting the comprehensive plan
or development regulations, or amendment thereto, as is required to be
published.
(b) Promptly after adoption, a county shall publish a notice that
it has adopted the comprehensive plan or development regulations, or
amendment thereto.
Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, for purposes of this
section the date of publication for a county shall be the date the
county publishes the notice that it has adopted the comprehensive plan
or development regulations, or amendment thereto.
(c) For local governments planning under RCW 36.70A.040, promptly
after approval or disapproval of a local government's shoreline master
program or amendment thereto by the department of ecology as provided
in RCW 90.58.090, the local government shall publish a notice that the
shoreline master program or amendment thereto has been approved or
disapproved by the department of ecology. For purposes of this
section, the date of publication for the adoption or amendment of a
shoreline master program is the date the local government publishes
notice that the shoreline master program or amendment thereto has been
approved or disapproved by the department of ecology.
(3) Unless the board dismisses the petition as frivolous or finds
that the person filing the petition lacks standing, or the parties have
filed an agreement to have the case heard in superior court as provided
in RCW 36.70A.295, the board shall, within ten days of receipt of the
petition, set a time for hearing the matter.
(4) The board shall base its decision on the record developed by
the city, county, or the state and supplemented with additional
evidence if the board determines that such additional evidence would be
necessary or of substantial assistance to the board in reaching its
decision.
(5) The board, shall consolidate, when appropriate, all petitions
involving the review of the same comprehensive plan or the same
development regulation or regulations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The office of growth management hearings
boards is created. The office of growth management hearings boards
consists of the three growth management hearings boards established in
RCW 36.70A.250.
(2) The administrative offices of each board shall only be located
in the office of growth management hearings boards. The office of the
western Washington growth management hearings board shall serve as the
initial location of the office of growth management hearings boards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 In accordance with section 4 of this act,
the following shall govern the creation of the office of growth
management hearings boards, an office that is an administrative
consolidation of the growth management hearings boards established in
RCW 36.70A.250:
(1) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers,
or written material in the possession of the growth management hearings
boards shall be delivered to the custody of the office of growth
management hearings boards. All office furnishings, office equipment,
motor vehicles, and other tangible property in the possession of the
growth management hearings boards shall be made available to the office
of growth management hearings boards;
(2) All funds, credits, or other assets held by the growth
management hearings boards shall, on the effective date of this
section, be transferred to the office of growth management hearings
boards. Any appropriations made to the growth management hearings
boards shall, on the effective date of this section, be transferred and
credited to the office of growth management hearings boards;
(3) All employees of the growth management hearings boards are
transferred to the office of growth management hearings boards. All
employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service
law, are assigned to the office of growth management hearings boards to
perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any
loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate
thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil
service;
(4) This section may not be construed to alter any existing
collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing collective
bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or until the
bargaining unit has been modified by action of the public employment
relations commission as provided by law;
(5) All rules and pending business before the growth management
hearings boards shall be continued and acted upon by the appropriate
growth management hearings board of the office of growth management
hearings boards. All existing contracts and obligations remain in full
force and shall be performed by the office of growth management
hearings boards; and
(6) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the growth management hearings boards to the office of growth
management hearings boards does not affect the validity of any act
performed before the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Subject to the availability of amounts
appropriated for this specific purpose, the joint legislative audit and
review committee shall examine the administration and operations of the
growth management hearings boards or any successor agency. The
examination shall include an evaluation of: (1) How to improve the
effectiveness of the growth management act dispute resolution system;
(2) the boards' organizational structure, workload, and work processes;
(3) potential benefits associated with establishing three member
regional panels; (4) potential opportunities to colocate or become part
of the environmental hearings office; (5) technological opportunities
to improve efficiency and decrease travel expenses; and (6) additional
methods of improving compliance with the growth management act that may
reduce costs to all parties. The committee shall report its findings
and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of
the house of representatives and the senate by December 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 4 and 5 of this act are each added
to chapter 36.70A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 and 2 of this act are necessary
for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety,
or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 3 through 5 of this act are
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health,
or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect July 1, 2009.

--- END ---