BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16.076 and 2007 c 340 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the department
shall ((provide an opportunity for)) collect from the owners of
vehicles registered under RCW 46.16.0621 and vehicles licensed under
RCW 46.16.070 with a declared gross weight of ten thousand pounds or
less((, to make)) a voluntary donation of five dollars at the time of
initial or renewal registration. The donation must be deposited in the
state parks renewal and stewardship account established in RCW
79A.05.215 to be used for the operation and maintenance of state parks.
(b) The donation required under this section may not be collected
from any vehicle owner actively opting not to participate in the
donation program. The department shall ensure that the opt-out
donation under this section shall be clear, visible, and prominently
displayed in both paper and online vehicle registration renewals.
Notification of intent to not participate in the donation program must
be provided annually at the time of vehicle registration renewal.
(2) This section applies to registrations due or to become due on
or after ((January 1, 2008)) September 1, 2009.

--- END ---