BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The universal vaccine purchase account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. Receipts from private and public
sources for the purpose of increasing access to vaccines for children
must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account must
be used for the purchase of vaccines, at no cost to health care
providers in Washington, to administer to children under nineteen years
old who are not eligible to receive vaccines at no cost through federal
programs. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.
(2) The department shall determine which vaccines shall be
purchased with funds available in the universal vaccine purchase
account. The selection of vaccines shall be based on the sufficiency
of amounts available in the account, the significance of the vaccine to
the health of children receiving the vaccine and those who may not be
vaccinated, and any recommendations of state or federal immunization
expert committees.
(3) The department shall coordinate purchasing decisions through
federal programs that receive discounts for the purchase of large
quantities of vaccines.

--- END ---