BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.15.068 and 2007 c 151 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 2007-08 academic year and ending with the
2016-17 academic year, tuition fees charged to full-time resident
undergraduate students, except in academic years 2009-10 and 2010-11,
may increase no greater than seven percent over the previous academic
year in any institution of higher education. Annual reductions or
increases in full-time tuition fees for resident undergraduate students
shall be as provided in the omnibus appropriations act, within the
seven percent increase limit established in this section. For academic
years 2009-10 and 2010-11 the omnibus appropriations act may provide
tuition increases greater than seven percent. To the extent that state
appropriations combined with tuition and fee revenues are insufficient
to achieve the total per-student funding goals established in
subsection (2) of this section, the legislature may revisit state
appropriations, authorized enrollment levels, and changes in tuition
fees for any given fiscal year.
(2) The state shall adopt as its goal total per-student funding
levels, from state appropriations plus tuition and fees, of at least
the sixtieth percentile of total per-student funding at similar public
institutions of higher education in the global challenge states. In
defining comparable per-student funding levels, the office of financial
management shall adjust for regional cost-of-living differences; for
differences in program offerings and in the relative mix of lower
division, upper division, and graduate students; and for accounting and
reporting differences among the comparison institutions. The office of
financial management shall develop a funding trajectory for each four-year institution of higher education and for the community and
technical college system as a whole that when combined with tuition and
fees revenue allows the state to achieve its funding goal for each
four-year institution and the community and technical college system as
a whole no later than fiscal year 2017. The state shall not reduce
enrollment levels below fiscal year 2007 budgeted levels in order to
improve or alter the per-student funding amount at any four-year
institution of higher education or the community and technical college
system as a whole. The state recognizes that each four-year
institution of higher education and the community and technical college
system as a whole have different funding requirements to achieve
desired performance levels, and that increases to the total per-student
funding amount may need to exceed the minimum funding goal.
(3) By September 1st of each year beginning (([in])) in 2008, the
office of financial management shall report to the governor, the higher
education coordinating board, and appropriate committees of the
legislature with updated estimates of the total per-student funding
level that represents the sixtieth percentile of funding for comparable
institutions of higher education in the global challenge states, and
the progress toward that goal that was made for each of the public
institutions of higher education.
(4) As used in this section, "global challenge states" are the top
performing states on the new economy index published by the progressive
policy institute as of July 22, 2007. The new economy index ranks
states on indicators of their potential to compete in the new economy.
At least once every five years, the office of financial management
shall determine if changes to the list of global challenge states are
appropriate. The office of financial management shall report its
findings to the governor and the legislature.
(5) During the 2009-10 and the 2010-11 academic years, institutions
of higher education shall include information on their billing
statements notifying students of tax credits available through the
American opportunity tax credit provided in the American recovery and
reinvestment act of 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The higher education coordinating board, in coordination with
higher education stakeholders, shall review options and make
recommendations on a tuition policy that allows flexibility,
accessibility, and differentiation among Washington's various public
baccalaureate tuition rates. Recommendations shall support the
implementation of the strategic master plan for higher education
including consideration of policies that address student access,
equity, and academic quality.
(2) The board shall examine policies that couple higher tuition
with higher institutional need-based financial aid; differential
tuition rates based on family income; differential tuition rates based
on institutional mission, campus, credit hours, academic program, and
delivery method; and policies that encourage collaboration and
coordination among institutions of higher education and that facilitate
coenrollment among multiple institutions, including enrollment in
online learning courses.
(3) Each option shall be assessed in terms of administrative
feasibility, interactions with and implications for state and federal
financial aid tuition programs, and impacts on students of different
income levels.
(4) The board shall report its findings and recommendations to the
governor and to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
November 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Within existing resources, the joint
legislative audit and review committee shall complete a systemic
performance audit of the state universities, regional universities, and
The Evergreen State College. The purpose of the audit is to create a
transparent link between revenues, expenditures, and performance
outcomes as outlined in the performance agreements developed under RCW
28B.10.920 and the strategic master plan for higher education as
adopted by the legislature. The study shall:
(a) Identify standardized categories of costs that will allow
comparison across various administrative, student support, and academic
functions;
(b) Based on available management data, estimate current annual
costs at each institution for the various cost categories;
(c) Based on available management data, identify fund sources that
support the cost categories at each institution; and
(d) Identify barriers or gaps in data linking revenues,
expenditures, and performance agreement outcome measures.
(2) The auditor shall report findings and recommendations to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2010. The
report shall include, but is not limited to, the following elements as
they relate to the purpose of the audit:
(a) The identification of cost savings and programs or services
that could be eliminated;
(b) Analysis of gaps or overlaps in programs or services and
recommendations to correct gaps or overlaps;
(c) Feasibility of pooling technology systems or elements of
technology systems pursuant to chapter __ RCW (Second Substitute House
Bill No. 1946), Laws of 2009;
(d) Recommendations for statutory or regulatory changes that may be
necessary for the state universities, regional universities, and The
Evergreen State College to meet performance agreement objectives
mutually agreed upon pursuant to RCW 28B.10.922; and
(e) Recommendations on the development of a uniform higher
education performance, budgeting, accounting and reporting system.

--- END ---