BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.13.032 and 1998 c 296 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Within funding appropriated for this purpose, the department
shall establish, by contracts with private or public vendors, including
licensed private group care facilities, regional crisis residential
centers ((with)) consisting of secure and semi-secure facilities as
defined in RCW 13.32A.030. These facilities shall be structured group
care facilities licensed under rules adopted by the department ((and
shall have an average of at least four adult staff members and in no
event less than three adult staff members to every eight children)).
(2) ((Within available funds appropriated for this purpose, the
department shall establish, by contracts with private or public
vendors, regional crisis residential centers with secure facilities.
These facilities shall be facilities licensed under rules adopted by
the department. These centers may also include semi-secure facilities
and to such extent shall be subject to subsection (1) of this
section.)) The department shall adopt rules for referral to and the
operation of crisis residential centers with the goal of maximizing the
utilization of beds, resources, and staff to meet the needs of youth
and their families as expressed in RCW 13.32A.010. Rules shall:
(a) Require a minimum of two staff persons in each facility when
youth are present; and
(b) Establish additional minimum staff-to-youth ratios to ensure
safety, reflect actual utilization patterns in crisis residential
centers, and allow for flexibility as bed usage increases or decreases.
(3) ((The department shall, in addition to the facilities
established under subsections (1) and (2) of this section, establish
additional crisis residential centers pursuant to contract with
licensed private group care facilities.
(4))) The staff at the facilities established under this section
shall be trained so that they may effectively counsel ((juveniles
admitted to the centers,)) and provide treatment, supervision, and
structure to ((the juveniles that recognize)) youth admitted to the
center, recognizing the need for support and the varying circumstances
that cause children to leave their families, and carry out the
responsibilities stated in RCW 13.32A.090. The responsibilities stated
in RCW 13.32A.090 may, in any of the centers, be carried out by the
department.
(((5))) (4) The secure ((facilities located within)) facility
crisis residential centers shall be operated to conform with the
definition in RCW 13.32A.030. ((The facilities shall have an average
of no less than one adult staff member to every ten children. The
staffing ratio shall continue to ensure the safety of the children.
(6) If a secure crisis residential center is located in or adjacent
to a secure juvenile detention facility, the center shall be operated
in a manner that prevents in-person contact between the residents of
the center and the persons held in such facility.))
(5) Services or programs authorized or required to be provided by
the department under this section shall be provided to the extent
funding is appropriated in the omnibus appropriations act or otherwise
available to the department for such specific services and programs.
The department has no responsibility to provide specific services or
programs under this section if funds are not specifically appropriated
or available.

Sec. 2 RCW 13.32A.030 and 2000 c 123 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Abuse or neglect" means the injury, sexual abuse, sexual
exploitation, negligent treatment, or maltreatment of a child by any
person under circumstances which indicate that the child's health,
welfare, and safety is harmed, excluding conduct permitted under RCW
9A.16.100. An abused child is a child who has been subjected to child
abuse or neglect as defined in this section.
(2) "Administrator" means the individual who has the daily
administrative responsibility of a crisis residential center, or his or
her designee.
(3) "At-risk youth" means a juvenile:
(a) Who is absent from home for at least seventy-two consecutive
hours without consent of his or her parent;
(b) Who is beyond the control of his or her parent such that the
child's behavior endangers the health, safety, or welfare of the child
or any other person; or
(c) Who has a substance abuse problem for which there are no
pending criminal charges related to the substance abuse.
(4) "Child," "juvenile," and "youth" mean any unemancipated
individual who is under the chronological age of eighteen years.
(5) "Child in need of services" means a juvenile:
(a) Who is beyond the control of his or her parent such that the
child's behavior endangers the health, safety, or welfare of the child
or other person;
(b) Who has been reported to law enforcement as absent without
consent for at least twenty-four consecutive hours on two or more
separate occasions from the home of either parent, a crisis residential
center, an out-of-home placement, or a court-ordered placement; and
(i) Has exhibited a serious substance abuse problem; or
(ii) Has exhibited behaviors that create a serious risk of harm to
the health, safety, or welfare of the child or any other person; or
(c)(i) Who is in need of: (A) Necessary services, including food,
shelter, health care, clothing, or education; or (B) services designed
to maintain or reunite the family;
(ii) Who lacks access to, or has declined to utilize, these
services; and
(iii) Whose parents have evidenced continuing but unsuccessful
efforts to maintain the family structure or are unable or unwilling to
continue efforts to maintain the family structure.
(6) "Child in need of services petition" means a petition filed in
juvenile court by a parent, child, or the department seeking
adjudication of placement of the child.
(7) "Crisis residential center" means a secure or semi-secure
facility established pursuant to chapter 74.13 RCW.
(8) "Custodian" means the person or entity who has the legal right
to the custody of the child.
(9) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(10) "Extended family member" means an adult who is a grandparent,
brother, sister, stepbrother, stepsister, uncle, aunt, or first cousin
with whom the child has a relationship and is comfortable, and who is
willing and available to care for the child.
(11) "Guardian" means that person or agency that (a) has been
appointed as the guardian of a child in a legal proceeding other than
a proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW, and (b) has the right to legal
custody of the child pursuant to such appointment. The term "guardian"
does not include a "dependency guardian" appointed pursuant to a
proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW.
(12) "Multidisciplinary team" means a group formed to provide
assistance and support to a child who is an at-risk youth or a child in
need of services and his or her parent. The team shall include the
parent, a department case worker, a local government representative
when authorized by the local government, and when appropriate, members
from the mental health and substance abuse disciplines. The team may
also include, but is not limited to, the following persons: Educators,
law enforcement personnel, probation officers, employers, church
persons, tribal members, therapists, medical personnel, social service
providers, placement providers, and extended family members. The team
members shall be volunteers who do not receive compensation while
acting in a capacity as a team member, unless the member's employer
chooses to provide compensation or the member is a state employee.
(13) "Out-of-home placement" means a placement in a foster family
home or group care facility licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW or
placement in a home, other than that of the child's parent, guardian,
or legal custodian, not required to be licensed pursuant to chapter
74.15 RCW.
(14) "Parent" means the parent or parents who have the legal right
to custody of the child. "Parent" includes custodian or guardian.
(15) "Secure facility" means a crisis residential center((, or
portion thereof,)) that:
(a) Is located in or adjacent to a secure juvenile detention
facility;
(b) Has locking doors, locking windows, or a secured perimeter,
designed and operated to prevent a child from leaving without
permission of the facility staff; and
(c) Is operated in a manner that prevents in-person contact between
the youth admitted to the center and the juveniles being held in the
detention facility.
(16) "Semi-secure facility" means any facility, including but not
limited to crisis residential centers or specialized foster family
homes, operated in a manner to reasonably assure that youth placed
there will not run away. Pursuant to rules established by the
department, the facility administrator shall establish reasonable hours
for residents to come and go from the facility such that no residents
are free to come and go at all hours of the day and night. To prevent
residents from taking unreasonable actions, the facility administrator,
where appropriate, may condition a resident's leaving the facility upon
the resident being accompanied by the administrator or the
administrator's designee and the resident may be required to notify the
administrator or the administrator's designee of any intent to leave,
his or her intended destination, and the probable time of his or her
return to the center.
(17) "Staff secure facility" means a structured group care facility
licensed under rules adopted by the department with a ratio of at least
one adult staff member to every two children.
(18) "Temporary out-of-home placement" means an out-of-home
placement of not more than fourteen days ordered by the court at a
fact-finding hearing on a child in need of services petition.

Sec. 3 RCW 13.32A.130 and 2000 c 162 s 13 and 2000 c 123 s 15 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A child admitted to a secure facility shall remain in the
facility for at least twenty-four hours after admission but for not
more than five consecutive days. ((If the child admitted under this
section is transferred between secure and semi-secure facilities, the
aggregate length of time spent in all such centers or facilities may
not exceed five)) A child admitted to a semi-secure facility may remain
for not more than fifteen consecutive days. If a child is transferred
between a secure facility and a semi-secure facility, the aggregate
length of time spent in both facilities may not exceed fifteen
consecutive days per admission.
(2)(a)(i) The facility administrator shall determine within twenty-four hours after a child's admission to a secure facility whether the
child is likely to remain in a semi-secure facility and may transfer
the child to a semi-secure facility or release the child to the
department. The determination shall be based on: (A) The need for
continued assessment, protection, and treatment of the child in a
secure facility; and (B) the likelihood the child would remain at a
semi-secure facility until his or her parents can take the child home
or a petition can be filed under this title.
(ii) In making the determination the administrator shall consider
the following information if known: (A) The child's age and maturity;
(B) the child's condition upon arrival at the center; (C) the
circumstances that led to the child's being taken to the center; (D)
whether the child's behavior endangers the health, safety, or welfare
of the child or any other person; (E) the child's history of running
away; and (F) the child's willingness to cooperate in the assessment.
(b) If the administrator of a secure facility determines the child
is unlikely to remain in a semi-secure facility, the administrator
shall keep the child in the secure facility pursuant to this chapter
and in order to provide for space for the child may transfer another
child who has been in the facility for at least seventy-two hours to a
semi-secure facility. The administrator shall only make a transfer of
a child after determining that the child who may be transferred is
likely to remain at the semi-secure facility.
(c) A crisis residential center administrator is authorized to
transfer a child to a crisis residential center in the area where the
child's parents reside or where the child's lawfully prescribed
residence is located.
(d) An administrator may transfer a child from a semi-secure
facility to a secure facility whenever he or she reasonably believes
that the child is likely to leave the semi-secure facility and not
return and after full consideration of all factors in (a)(i) and (ii)
of this subsection.
(3) If no parent is available or willing to remove the child during
the first seventy-two hours following admission, the department shall
consider the filing of a petition under RCW 13.32A.140.
(4) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this
section, the parents may remove the child at any time ((during the
five-day period)) unless the staff of the crisis residential center has
reasonable cause to believe that the child is absent from the home
because he or she is abused or neglected or if allegations of abuse or
neglect have been made against the parents. The department or any
agency legally charged with the supervision of a child may remove a
child from a crisis residential center at any time after the first
twenty-four-hour period after admission has elapsed and only after full
consideration by all parties of the factors in subsection (2)(a) of
this section.
(5) Crisis residential center staff shall make reasonable efforts
to protect the child and achieve a reconciliation of the family. If a
reconciliation and voluntary return of the child has not been achieved
within forty-eight hours from the time of admission, and if the
administrator of the center does not consider it likely that
reconciliation will be achieved within ((the five-day period)) five
days of the child being admitted to the center, then the administrator
shall inform the parent and child of: (a) The availability of
counseling services; (b) the right to file a child in need of services
petition for an out-of-home placement, the right of a parent to file an
at-risk youth petition, and the right of the parent and child to obtain
assistance in filing the petition; (c) the right to request the
facility administrator or his or her designee to form a
multidisciplinary team; (d) the right to request a review of any out-of-home placement; (e) the right to request a mental health or chemical
dependency evaluation by a county-designated professional or a private
treatment facility; and (f) the right to request treatment in a program
to address the child's at-risk behavior under RCW 13.32A.197.
(6) At no time shall information regarding a parent's or child's
rights be withheld. The department shall develop and distribute to all
law enforcement agencies and to each crisis residential center
administrator a written statement delineating the services and rights.
The administrator of the facility or his or her designee shall provide
every resident and parent with a copy of the statement.
(7) A crisis residential center and any person employed at the
center acting in good faith in carrying out the provisions of this
section are immune from criminal or civil liability for such actions.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.13.0321 and 1995 c 312 s 61 are each amended to
read as follows:
No contract may provide reimbursement or compensation to:
(1) A secure facility crisis residential ((center's secure
facility)) center for any service delivered or provided to a resident
child after five consecutive days of residence; or
(2) A semi-secure facility crisis residential center for any
service delivered or provided to a resident child after fifteen
consecutive days of residence.

Sec. 5 RCW 74.13.033 and 2000 c 162 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a resident child of a crisis residential center becomes by
his or her behavior disruptive to the facility's program, such
((resident)) child may be immediately removed to a separate area within
the facility and counseled on an individual basis until such time as
the child regains his or her composure. The department may set rules
((and regulations)) establishing additional procedures for dealing with
severely disruptive children on the premises.
(2) When the ((juvenile)) child resides in ((this)) a crisis
residential facility, all services deemed necessary to the
((juvenile's)) child's reentry to ((normal)) family life shall be made
available to the ((juvenile)) child as required by chapter 13.32A RCW.
In assessing the child and providing these services, the ((facility))
center staff shall:
(a) Interview the ((juvenile)) child as soon as possible;
(b) Contact the ((juvenile's)) child's parents and arrange for a
counseling interview with the ((juvenile)) child and his or her parents
as soon as possible;
(c) Conduct counseling interviews with the ((juvenile)) child and
his or her parents, to the end that resolution of the child/parent
conflict is attained and the child is returned home as soon as
possible;
(d) Provide additional crisis counseling as needed, to the end that
placement of the child in the crisis residential center will be
required for the shortest time possible, but not to exceed five
consecutive days if the child resides at a secure facility crisis
residential center; and
(e) Convene, when appropriate, a multidisciplinary team.
(3) Based on the assessments done under subsection (2) of this
section the ((facility)) center staff may refer any child who, as the
result of a mental or emotional disorder, or intoxication by alcohol or
other drugs, is suicidal, seriously assaultive, or seriously
destructive toward others, or otherwise similarly evidences an
immediate need for emergency medical evaluation and possible care, for
evaluation pursuant to chapter 71.34 RCW, to a mental health
professional pursuant to chapter 71.05 RCW, or to a chemical dependency
specialist pursuant to chapter 70.96A RCW whenever such action is
deemed appropriate and consistent with law.
(4) A ((juvenile)) child taking unauthorized leave from a
((facility)) center shall be apprehended and returned to it by law
enforcement officers or other persons designated as having this
authority as provided in RCW 13.32A.050. If returned to the facility
after having taken unauthorized leave for a period of more than twenty-four hours a ((juvenile)) child shall be supervised by ((such a
facility)) staff at the center for ((a)) an appropriate period,
((pursuant to this chapter, which, unless where otherwise provided,))
except that supervision may not exceed five consecutive days ((on the
premises)) in a secure facility or fifteen consecutive days in a semi-
secure facility. Costs of housing ((juveniles)) children admitted to
crisis residential centers shall be assumed by the department ((for a
period not to exceed five consecutive days)).

Sec. 6 RCW 74.13.034 and 2000 c 162 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A child taken into custody and taken to a crisis residential
center established pursuant to RCW 74.13.032 may, if the center is
unable to provide appropriate treatment, supervision, and structure to
the child, be taken at department expense to another crisis residential
center((, the nearest regional secure crisis residential center, or a
secure facility with which it is collocated under RCW 74.13.032)).
Placement in both locations shall not exceed ((five)) fifteen
consecutive days from the point of intake as provided in RCW
13.32A.130.
(2) A child taken into custody and taken to a semi-secure crisis
residential center established by this chapter may be placed physically
by the department or the department's designee and, at departmental
expense and approval, in a secure juvenile detention facility operated
by the county in which the center is located for a maximum of forty-eight hours, including Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, if the child
has taken unauthorized leave from the semi-secure center and the
((person in charge)) administrator of the center determines that the
center cannot provide supervision and structure adequate to ensure that
the child will not again take unauthorized leave. ((Juveniles)) Youth
placed in such a facility pursuant to this section may not, to the
extent possible, come in contact with alleged, adjudicated, or
convicted juvenile or adult offenders being held in the detention
facility.
(3) Any child placed in secure detention pursuant to this section
shall, during the period of confinement, be provided with appropriate
treatment by the department or the department's designee, which shall
include the services defined in RCW 74.13.033(2). If the child placed
in secure detention is not returned home or if an alternative living
arrangement agreeable to the parent and the child is not made within
twenty-four hours after the child's admission, the child shall be taken
at the department's expense to a crisis residential center. Placement
in ((the)) a secure facility crisis residential center ((or centers))
plus placement in juvenile detention under this section shall not
exceed five consecutive days from the point of intake as provided in
RCW 13.32A.130.
(4) Juvenile detention facilities used pursuant to this section
shall first be certified by the department to ensure that ((juveniles))
youth placed in the facility pursuant to this section are provided with
living conditions suitable to the safety and well-being of the child.
Where space is available, juvenile courts, when certified by the
department to do so, shall provide secure placement for ((juveniles))
youth pursuant to this section, at department expense.

--- END ---