BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.13.118 and 1995 c 270 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((At least once every five years, the secretary shall review the
need of any adoptive parent or parents receiving continuing support
pursuant to RCW 26.33.320 and 74.13.100 through 74.13.145, or the need
of any parent who is to receive more than one lump sum payment where
such payments are to be spaced more than one year apart.
At the time of such review and at other times when changed
conditions, including variations in medical opinions, prognosis and
costs, are deemed by the secretary to warrant such action, appropriate
adjustments in payments shall be made based upon changes in the needs
of the child, in the adoptive parents' income, resources, and expenses
for the care of such child or other members of the family, including
medical and/or hospitalization expense not otherwise covered by or
subject to reimbursement from insurance or other sources of financial
assistance.))
(1) Any parent who is a party to ((such)) an agreement under RCW
74.13.100 through 74.13.145 may at any time, in writing, request, for
reasons set forth in such request, a review of the amount of any
payment or the level of continuing payments. ((Such)) The review shall
((be begun)) begin not later than thirty days from the receipt of such
request. Any adjustment may be made retroactive to the date such
request was received by the secretary. If such request is not acted on
within thirty days after it has been received by the secretary, such
parent may invoke his rights under the hearing provisions set forth in
RCW 74.13.127.
(2) The secretary may make adjustments in payments at the time of
the review, or at other times, if the secretary finds that
circumstances have changed and warrant an adjustment in payments.
Changes in circumstances may include, but are not limited to,
variations in medical opinions, prognosis, and costs. Appropriate
adjustments in payments shall be made based upon changes in the needs
of the child and/or changes in the adoptive parents' income, resources,
and expenses for the care of such child or other members of the family,
including medical and/or hospitalization expense not otherwise covered
by or subject to reimbursement from insurance or other sources of
financial assistance.

--- END ---