BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.58.107 and 2007 c 200 s 2 and 2007 c 91 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The department of health shall charge a fee of twenty dollars for
certified copies of records and for copies or information provided for
research, statistical, or administrative purposes, and eight dollars
for a search of the files or records when no copy is made. The
department shall prescribe by regulation fees to be paid for preparing
sealed files and for opening sealed files.
No fee or surcharge may be demanded or required for furnishing
certified copies of a birth, death, fetal death, marriage, divorce,
annulment, or legal separation record for use in connection with a
claim for compensation or pension pending before the veterans
administration. No fee or surcharge may be demanded or required for
furnishing certified copies of a death certificate of a sex offender
for use by a law enforcement agency in maintaining a registered sex
offender database, or that of any offender requested by a county clerk
or court in the state of Washington for purposes of extinguishing the
offender's legal financial obligation.
The department shall keep a true and correct account of all fees
received and transmit the fees to the state treasurer on a weekly
basis.
Local registrars shall charge the same fees as the state as
hereinabove provided and as prescribed by department regulation except
in cases where payment is made by credit card, charge card, debit card,
smart card, stored value card, federal wire, automatic clearinghouse
system, or other electronic communication. Payment by these electronic
methods may be subject to an additional fee consistent with the
requirements established by RCW 36.29.190. All such fees collected,
except for seven dollars of each fee collected for the issuance of
birth certificates and first copies of death certificates and fourteen
dollars of each fee collected for additional copies of the same death
certificate ordered at the same time as the first copy, shall be paid
to the jurisdictional health department.
All local registrars in cities and counties shall keep a true and
correct account of all fees received under this section for the
issuance of certified copies and shall transmit seven dollars of the
fees collected for birth certificates and first copies of death
certificates and fourteen dollars of the fee collected for additional
copies of death certificates to the state treasurer on or before the
first day of January, April, July, and October. All but five dollars
of the fees turned over to the state treasurer by local registrars
shall be paid to the department of health for the purpose of developing
and maintaining the state vital records systems, including a web-based
electronic death registration system.
Eight dollars of each fee imposed for the issuance of certified
copies, except for copies suitable for display issued under RCW
70.58.085, at both the state and local levels shall be held by the
state treasurer in the death investigations' account established by RCW
43.79.445.
A surcharge of eight dollars shall be charged to each transaction
related to the purchase of certified copies of birth and death
certificates. Amounts received by the department or any local
registrar shall be deposited into the public health services account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act expires June 30, 2011.

--- END ---