BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.09.730 and 1991 sp.s. c 9 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
In establishing Title XIX payments for inpatient hospital services:
(1) To the extent funds are appropriated specifically for this
purpose, and subject to any conditions placed on appropriations made
for this purpose, the department of social and health services shall
provide a disproportionate share hospital adjustment considering the
following components:
(a) A low-income care component based on a hospital's medicaid
utilization rate, its low-income utilization rate, its provision of
obstetric services, and other factors authorized by federal law;
(b) A medical indigency care component based on a hospital's
services to persons who are medically indigent; and
(c) A state-only component, to be paid from available state funds
to hospitals that do not qualify for federal payments under (b) of this
subsection, based on a hospital's services to persons who are medically
indigent;
(2) The payment methodology for disproportionate share hospitals
shall be specified by the department in regulation.

--- END ---