BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.46.010 and 1996 c 101 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The public policy of the state of Washington on gambling is to keep
the criminal element out of gambling and to promote the social welfare
of the people by limiting the nature and scope of gambling activities
and by strict regulation and control.
It is hereby declared to be the policy of the legislature,
recognizing the close relationship between professional gambling and
organized crime, to restrain all persons from seeking profit from
professional gambling activities in this state; to restrain all persons
from patronizing such professional gambling activities; to safeguard
the public against the evils induced by common gamblers and common
gambling houses engaged in professional gambling; and at the same time,
both to preserve the freedom of the press and to avoid restricting
participation by individuals in activities and social pastimes, which
activities and social pastimes are more for amusement rather than for
profit, do not maliciously affect the public, and do not breach the
peace.
The legislature further declares that the fines and forfeitures
related to enforcement of activities proscribed in this chapter provide
resources to law enforcement and the court system to assist in the
regulation and control of gambling.
The legislature further declares that the raising of funds for the
promotion of bona fide charitable or nonprofit organizations is in the
public interest as is participation in such activities and social
pastimes as are hereinafter in this chapter authorized.
The legislature further declares that the conducting of bingo,
raffles, and amusement games and the operation of punchboards, pull-tabs, card games and other social pastimes, when conducted pursuant to
the provisions of this chapter and any rules and regulations adopted
pursuant thereto, are hereby authorized, as are only such lotteries for
which no valuable consideration has been paid or agreed to be paid as
hereinafter in this chapter provided.
The legislature further declares that fishing derbies shall not
constitute any form of gambling and shall not be considered as a
lottery, a raffle, or an amusement game and shall not be subject to the
provisions of this chapter or any rules and regulations adopted
hereunder.
The legislature further declares that raffles authorized by the
fish and wildlife commission involving hunting big game animals or wild
turkeys shall not be subject to the provisions of this chapter or any
rules and regulations adopted hereunder, with the exception of this
section and RCW 9.46.400.
All factors incident to the activities authorized in this chapter
shall be closely controlled, and the provisions of this chapter shall
be liberally construed to achieve such end.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.46.0237 and 2005 c 351 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Gambling," as used in this chapter, means conditionally or
unconditionally staking or risking something of value upon the outcome
of a contest of chance or a future contingent event not under the
person's control or influence, upon an agreement or understanding,
which may be either conditional or unconditional, that the person or
someone else will or may receive something of value in the event of a
certain outcome. Gambling does not include fishing derbies as defined
by this chapter, parimutuel betting and handicapping contests as
authorized by chapter 67.16 RCW, bona fide business transactions valid
under the law of contracts, including, but not limited to, contracts
for the purchase or sale at a future date of securities or commodities,
and agreements to compensate for loss caused by the happening of
chance, including, but not limited to, contracts of indemnity or
guarantee and life, health, or accident insurance. In addition, a
contest of chance which is specifically excluded from the definition of
lottery under this chapter shall not constitute gambling.

--- END ---