BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.505.220 and 2009 c 4 s 901 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Total distributions from the student achievement fund to each
school district shall be based upon the average number of full-time
equivalent students in the school district during the previous school
year as reported to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction by August 31st of the previous school year. The
superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that moneys generated
by skill center students are returned to skill centers.
(2) The allocation rate per full-time equivalent student shall be
three hundred dollars in the 2005-06 school year, three hundred
seventy-five dollars in the 2006-07 school year, and four hundred fifty
dollars in the 2007-08 school year. For each subsequent school year,
the amount allocated per full-time equivalent student shall be adjusted
for inflation ((as defined in RCW 43.135.025(8))) by the implicit price
deflator as published by the federal bureau of labor statistics.
However, for the 2009-10 and 2010-11 school years, the amount allocated
per full-time equivalent student shall be as specified in the omnibus
appropriations act. For the 2011-12 school year and thereafter,
amounts allocated shall be further adjusted so that the allocations are
equal to what they would have been if allocations had not been reduced
for the 2009-10 and 2010-11 school years. These allocations per full-time equivalent student from the student achievement fund shall be
supported from the following sources:
(a) Distributions from state property tax proceeds deposited into
the student achievement fund under RCW 84.52.068; and
(b) Distributions from the education legacy trust account created
in RCW 83.100.230.
(3) Any funds deposited in the student achievement fund under RCW
43.135.045 shall be allocated to school districts on a one-time basis
using a rate per full-time equivalent student. These funds are
provided in addition to any amounts allocated in subsection (2) of this
section.
(4) The school district annual amounts as defined in subsection (2)
of this section shall be distributed on the monthly apportionment
schedule as defined in RCW 28A.510.250.
(5) However, during the 2008-09 school year, the school district
annual amounts as defined in this section shall be distributed as
follows:
September: 9.0 percent;
October: 9.0 percent;
November: 5.5 percent;
December: 9.0 percent;
January: 9.0 percent;
February: 9.0 percent;
March: 9.0 percent;
April: 9.0 percent;
May: 5.5 percent;
June: 4.2 percent;
July: 11.8 percent; and
August: 10.0 percent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2009.

--- END ---