BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.46.010 and 1998 c 322 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
This chapter may be known and cited as the "nursing facility
medicaid payment system."
The purposes of this chapter are to specify the manner by which
legislative appropriations for medicaid nursing facility services are
to be allocated as payment rates among nursing facilities, and to set
forth auditing, billing, and other administrative standards associated
with payments to nursing home facilities.
It is the intent and belief of the legislature that: (a) The
payment rates calculated pursuant to this chapter bear a reasonable
relationship to the costs incurred by facilities that are efficiently
and economically operated and that provide quality services and (b) the
annual cost reports that facilities must submit to the department, as
reviewed and audited by the department, constitute reliable data upon
which to determine the payment rates.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.46.431 and 2008 c 263 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Effective July 1, 1999, nursing facility medicaid payment rate
allocations shall be facility-specific and shall have seven components:
Direct care, therapy care, support services, operations, property,
financing allowance, and variable return. The department shall
establish and adjust each of these components, as provided in this
section and elsewhere in this chapter, for each medicaid nursing
facility in this state.
(2) Component rate allocations in therapy care, support services,
variable return, operations, property, and financing allowance for
essential community providers as defined in this chapter shall be based
upon a minimum facility occupancy of eighty-five percent of licensed
beds, regardless of how many beds are set up or in use. For all
facilities other than essential community providers, effective July 1,
2001, component rate allocations in direct care, therapy care, support
services, and variable return shall be based upon a minimum facility
occupancy of eighty-five percent of licensed beds. For all facilities
other than essential community providers, effective July 1, 2002, the
component rate allocations in operations, property, and financing
allowance shall be based upon a minimum facility occupancy of ninety
percent of licensed beds, regardless of how many beds are set up or in
use. For all facilities, effective July 1, 2006, the component rate
allocation in direct care shall be based upon actual facility
occupancy. The median cost limits used to set component rate
allocations shall be based on the applicable minimum occupancy
percentage. In determining each facility's therapy care component rate
allocation under RCW 74.46.511, the department shall apply the
applicable minimum facility occupancy adjustment before creating the
array of facilities' adjusted therapy costs per adjusted resident day.
In determining each facility's support services component rate
allocation under RCW 74.46.515(3), the department shall apply the
applicable minimum facility occupancy adjustment before creating the
array of facilities' adjusted support services costs per adjusted
resident day. In determining each facility's operations component rate
allocation under RCW 74.46.521(3), the department shall apply the
minimum facility occupancy adjustment before creating the array of
facilities' adjusted general operations costs per adjusted resident
day.
(3) Information and data sources used in determining medicaid
payment rate allocations, including formulas, procedures, cost report
periods, resident assessment instrument formats, resident assessment
methodologies, and resident classification and case mix weighting
methodologies, may be substituted or altered from time to time as
determined by the department.
(4)(a) Direct care component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months. Adjusted
cost report data from 1996 will be used for October 1, 1998, through
June 30, 2001, direct care component rate allocations; adjusted cost
report data from 1999 will be used for July 1, 2001, through June 30,
2006, direct care component rate allocations. Adjusted cost report
data from 2003 will be used for July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007,
direct care component rate allocations. Adjusted cost report data from
2005 will be used for July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2009, direct care
component rate allocations. Effective July 1, 2009, the direct care
component rate allocation shall be rebased biennially, and thereafter
for each odd-numbered year beginning July 1st, using the adjusted cost
report data for the calendar year two years immediately preceding the
rate rebase period, so that adjusted cost report data for calendar year
2007 is used for July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011, and so forth.
(b) Direct care component rate allocations based on 1996 cost
report data shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial
appropriations act for facilities whose direct care component rate is
set equal to their adjusted June 30, 1998, rate, as provided in RCW
74.46.506(5)(i).
(c) Direct care component rate allocations based on 1999 cost
report data shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial
appropriations act for facilities whose direct care component rate is
set equal to their adjusted June 30, 1998, rate, as provided in RCW
74.46.506(5)(i).
(d) Direct care component rate allocations based on 2003 cost
report data shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial
appropriations act for facilities whose direct care component rate is
set equal to their adjusted June 30, 2006, rate, as provided in RCW
74.46.506(5)(i).
(e) Direct care component rate allocations established in
accordance with this chapter shall be adjusted annually for economic
trends and conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. The economic trends and conditions factor or
factors defined in the biennial appropriations act shall not be
compounded with the economic trends and conditions factor or factors
defined in any other biennial appropriations acts before applying it to
the direct care component rate allocation established in accordance
with this chapter. When no economic trends and conditions factor or
factors for either fiscal year are defined in a biennial appropriations
act, no economic trends and conditions factor or factors defined in any
earlier biennial appropriations act shall be applied solely or
compounded to the direct care component rate allocation established in
accordance with this chapter.
(5)(a) Therapy care component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months. Adjusted
cost report data from 1996 will be used for October 1, 1998, through
June 30, 2001, therapy care component rate allocations; adjusted cost
report data from 1999 will be used for July 1, 2001, through June 30,
2005, therapy care component rate allocations. Adjusted cost report
data from 1999 will continue to be used for July 1, 2005, through June
30, 2007, therapy care component rate allocations. Adjusted cost
report data from 2005 will be used for July 1, 2007, through June 30,
2009, therapy care component rate allocations. Effective July 1, 2009,
and thereafter for each odd-numbered year beginning July 1st, the
therapy care component rate allocation shall be cost rebased
biennially, using the adjusted cost report data for the calendar year
two years immediately preceding the rate rebase period, so that
adjusted cost report data for calendar year 2007 is used for July 1,
2009, through June 30, 2011, and so forth.
(b) Therapy care component rate allocations established in
accordance with this chapter shall be adjusted annually for economic
trends and conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. The economic trends and conditions factor or
factors defined in the biennial appropriations act shall not be
compounded with the economic trends and conditions factor or factors
defined in any other biennial appropriations acts before applying it to
the therapy care component rate allocation established in accordance
with this chapter. When no economic trends and conditions factor or
factors for either fiscal year are defined in a biennial appropriations
act, no economic trends and conditions factor or factors defined in any
earlier biennial appropriations act shall be applied solely or
compounded to the therapy care component rate allocation established in
accordance with this chapter.
(6)(a) Support services component rate allocations shall be
established using adjusted cost report data covering at least six
months. Adjusted cost report data from 1996 shall be used for October
1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, support services component rate
allocations; adjusted cost report data from 1999 shall be used for July
1, 2001, through June 30, 2005, support services component rate
allocations. Adjusted cost report data from 1999 will continue to be
used for July 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007, support services
component rate allocations. Adjusted cost report data from 2005 will
be used for July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2009, support services
component rate allocations. Effective July 1, 2009, and thereafter for
each odd-numbered year beginning July 1st, the support services
component rate allocation shall be cost rebased biennially, using the
adjusted cost report data for the calendar year two years immediately
preceding the rate rebase period, so that adjusted cost report data for
calendar year 2007 is used for July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011, and
so forth.
(b) Support services component rate allocations established in
accordance with this chapter shall be adjusted annually for economic
trends and conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. The economic trends and conditions factor or
factors defined in the biennial appropriations act shall not be
compounded with the economic trends and conditions factor or factors
defined in any other biennial appropriations acts before applying it to
the support services component rate allocation established in
accordance with this chapter. When no economic trends and conditions
factor or factors for either fiscal year are defined in a biennial
appropriations act, no economic trends and conditions factor or factors
defined in any earlier biennial appropriations act shall be applied
solely or compounded to the support services component rate allocation
established in accordance with this chapter.
(7)(a) Operations component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months. Adjusted
cost report data from 1996 shall be used for October 1, 1998, through
June 30, 2001, operations component rate allocations; adjusted cost
report data from 1999 shall be used for July 1, 2001, through June 30,
2006, operations component rate allocations. Adjusted cost report data
from 2003 will be used for July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007,
operations component rate allocations. Adjusted cost report data from
2005 will be used for July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2009, operations
component rate allocations. Effective July 1, 2009, and thereafter for
each odd-numbered year beginning July 1st, the operations component
rate allocation shall be cost rebased biennially, using the adjusted
cost report data for the calendar year two years immediately preceding
the rate rebase period, so that adjusted cost report data for calendar
year 2007 is used for July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011, and so
forth.
(b) Operations component rate allocations established in accordance
with this chapter shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. The economic trends and conditions factor or
factors defined in the biennial appropriations act shall not be
compounded with the economic trends and conditions factor or factors
defined in any other biennial appropriations acts before applying it to
the operations component rate allocation established in accordance with
this chapter. When no economic trends and conditions factor or factors
for either fiscal year are defined in a biennial appropriations act, no
economic trends and conditions factor or factors defined in any earlier
biennial appropriations act shall be applied solely or compounded to
the operations component rate allocation established in accordance with
this chapter. A different economic trends and conditions adjustment
factor or factors may be defined in the biennial appropriations act for
facilities whose operations component rate is set equal to their
adjusted June 30, 2006, rate, as provided in RCW 74.46.521(4).
(8) For July 1, 1998, through September 30, 1998, a facility's
property and return on investment component rates shall be the
facility's June 30, 1998, property and return on investment component
rates, without increase. For October 1, 1998, through June 30, 1999,
a facility's property and return on investment component rates shall be
rebased utilizing 1997 adjusted cost report data covering at least six
months of data.
(9) Total payment rates under the nursing facility medicaid payment
system shall not exceed facility rates charged to the general public
for comparable services.
(10) Medicaid contractors shall pay to all facility staff a minimum
wage of the greater of the state minimum wage or the federal minimum
wage.
(11) The department shall establish in rule procedures, principles,
and conditions for determining component rate allocations for
facilities in circumstances not directly addressed by this chapter,
including but not limited to: The need to prorate inflation for
partial-period cost report data, newly constructed facilities, existing
facilities entering the medicaid program for the first time or after a
period of absence from the program, existing facilities with expanded
new bed capacity, existing medicaid facilities following a change of
ownership of the nursing facility business, facilities banking beds or
converting beds back into service, facilities temporarily reducing the
number of set-up beds during a remodel, facilities having less than six
months of either resident assessment, cost report data, or both, under
the current contractor prior to rate setting, and other circumstances.
(12) The department shall establish in rule procedures, principles,
and conditions, including necessary threshold costs, for adjusting
rates to reflect capital improvements or new requirements imposed by
the department or the federal government. Any such rate adjustments
are subject to the provisions of RCW 74.46.421.
(13) Effective July 1, 2001, medicaid rates shall continue to be
revised downward in all components, in accordance with department
rules, for facilities converting banked beds to active service under
chapter 70.38 RCW, by using the facility's increased licensed bed
capacity to recalculate minimum occupancy for rate setting. However,
for facilities other than essential community providers which bank beds
under chapter 70.38 RCW, after May 25, 2001, medicaid rates shall be
revised upward, in accordance with department rules, in direct care,
therapy care, support services, and variable return components only, by
using the facility's decreased licensed bed capacity to recalculate
minimum occupancy for rate setting, but no upward revision shall be
made to operations, property, or financing allowance component rates.
The direct care component rate allocation shall be adjusted, without
using the minimum occupancy assumption, for facilities that convert
banked beds to active service, under chapter 70.38 RCW, beginning on
July 1, 2006. Effective July 1, 2007, component rate allocations for
direct care shall be based on actual patient days regardless of whether
a facility has converted banked beds to active service.
(14) Facilities obtaining a certificate of need or a certificate of
need exemption under chapter 70.38 RCW after June 30, 2001, must have
a certificate of capital authorization in order for (a) the
depreciation resulting from the capitalized addition to be included in
calculation of the facility's property component rate allocation; and
(b) the net invested funds associated with the capitalized addition to
be included in calculation of the facility's financing allowance rate
allocation.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.46.485 and 1998 c 322 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall:
(a) Employ the resource utilization group III case mix
classification methodology. The department shall use the forty-four
group index maximizing model for the resource utilization group III
grouper version 5.10, but the department may revise or update the
classification methodology to reflect advances or refinements in
resident assessment or classification, subject to federal requirements;
and
(b) Implement minimum data set 3.0 under the authority of this
section and RCW 74.46.431(3). The department must notify nursing home
contractors twenty-eight days in advance the date of implementation of
the minimum data set 3.0. In the notification, the department must
identify for all quarterly rate settings following the date of minimum
data set 3.0 implementation a previously established quarterly case mix
adjustment established for the quarterly rate settings that will be
used for quarterly case mix calculations in direct care until minimum
data set 3.0 is fully implemented. After the department has fully
implemented minimum data set 3.0, it must adjust any quarter in which
it used the previously established quarterly case mix adjustment using
the new minimum data set 3.0 data.
(2) A default case mix group shall be established for cases in
which the resident dies or is discharged for any purpose prior to
completion of the resident's initial assessment. The default case mix
group and case mix weight for these cases shall be designated by the
department.
(3) A default case mix group may also be established for cases in
which there is an untimely assessment for the resident. The default
case mix group and case mix weight for these cases shall be designated
by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---