BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.39A.330 and 2007 c 361 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Long-term care workers shall be offered on-the-job training or peer
mentorship for at least one hour per week in the first ninety days of
work from a long-term care worker who has completed at least twelve
hours of mentor training and is mentoring no more than ten other
workers at any given time. This requirement applies to long-term care
workers who begin work on or after ((January 1, 2010)) July 1, 2011.

--- END ---