BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 90.56.120 (Oil spill advisory council--Meetings--Travel
expenses and compensation) and 2006 c 372 s 907 & 2005 c 304 s 2; and
(2) RCW 90.56.130 (Council--Duties--Work plan--Reports) and 2005 c
304 s 3.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.56.005 and 2005 c 304 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature declares that water borne transportation as a
source of supply for oil and hazardous substances poses special concern
for the state of Washington. Each year billions of gallons of crude
oil and refined petroleum products are transported as cargo and fuel by
vessels on the navigable waters of the state. These shipments are
expected to increase in the coming years. Vessels transporting oil
into Washington travel on some of the most unique and special marine
environments in the United States. These marine environments are a
source of natural beauty, recreation, and economic livelihood for many
residents of this state. As a result, the state has an obligation to
ensure the citizens of the state that the waters of the state will be
protected from oil spills.
(2) The legislature finds that prevention is the best method to
protect the unique and special marine environments in this state. The
technology for containing and cleaning up a spill of oil or hazardous
substances is at best only partially effective. Preventing spills is
more protective of the environment and more cost-effective when all the
response and damage costs associated with responding to a spill are
considered. Therefore, the legislature finds that the primary
objective of the state is to achieve a zero spills strategy to prevent
any oil or hazardous substances from entering waters of the state.
(3) The legislature also finds that:
(a) Recent accidents in Washington, Alaska, southern California,
Texas, Pennsylvania, and other parts of the nation have shown that the
transportation, transfer, and storage of oil have caused significant
damage to the marine environment;
(b) Even with the best efforts, it is nearly impossible to remove
all oil that is spilled into the water, and average removal rates are
only fourteen percent;
(c) Washington's navigable waters are treasured environmental and
economic resources that the state cannot afford to place at undue risk
from an oil spill;
(d) The state has a fundamental responsibility, as the trustee of
the state's natural resources and the protector of public health and
the environment to prevent the spill of oil; and
(e) In section 5002 of the federal oil pollution act of 1990, the
United States congress found that many people believed that complacency
on the part of industry and government was one of the contributing
factors to the Exxon Valdez spill and, further, that one method to
combat this complacency is to involve local citizens in the monitoring
and oversight of oil spill plans. Congress also found that a mechanism
should be established that fosters the long-term partnership of
industry, government, and local communities in overseeing compliance
with environmental concerns in the operation of crude oil terminals.
Moreover, congress concluded that, in addition to Alaska, a program of
citizen monitoring and oversight should be established in other major
crude oil terminals in the United States because recent oil spills
indicate that the safe transportation of oil is a national problem.
(4) In order to establish a comprehensive prevention and response
program to protect Washington's waters and natural resources from
spills of oil, it is the purpose of this chapter:
(a) To establish state agency expertise in marine safety and to
centralize state activities in spill prevention and response
activities;
(b) To prevent spills of oil and to promote programs that reduce
the risk of both catastrophic and small chronic spills;
(c) To ensure that responsible parties are liable, and have the
resources and ability, to respond to spills and provide compensation
for all costs and damages;
(d) To provide for state spill response and wildlife rescue
planning and implementation;
(e) To support and complement the federal oil pollution act of 1990
and other federal law, especially those provisions relating to the
national contingency plan for cleanup of oil spills and discharges,
including provisions relating to the responsibilities of state agencies
designated as natural resource trustees. The legislature intends this
chapter to be interpreted and implemented in a manner consistent with
federal law;
(f) To provide broad powers of regulation to the department of
ecology relating to spill prevention and response;
(g) To provide for ((an)) independent ((oil spill advisory council
to)) review, on an ongoing basis, of the adequacy of oil spill
prevention, preparedness, and response activities in this state; and
(h) To provide an adequate funding source for state response and
prevention programs.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.56.060 and 2005 c 304 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall prepare and annually update a statewide
master oil and hazardous substance spill prevention and contingency
plan. In preparing the plan, the department shall consult with an
advisory committee representing diverse interests concerned with oil
and hazardous substance spills, including the United States coast
guard, the federal environmental protection agency, state agencies,
local governments, port districts, private facilities, environmental
organizations, oil companies, shipping companies, containment and
cleanup contractors, tow companies, and hazardous substance
manufacturers((, and with the oil spill advisory council)).
(2) The state master plan prepared under this section shall at a
minimum:
(a) Take into consideration the elements of oil spill prevention
and contingency plans approved or submitted for approval pursuant to
this chapter and chapter 88.46 RCW and oil and hazardous substance
spill contingency plans prepared pursuant to other state or federal law
or prepared by federal agencies and regional entities;
(b) State the respective responsibilities as established by
relevant statutes and rules of each of the following in the prevention
of and the assessment, containment, and cleanup of a worst case spill
of oil or hazardous substances into the environment of the state: (i)
State agencies; (ii) local governments; (iii) appropriate federal
agencies; (iv) facility operators; (v) property owners whose land or
other property may be affected by the oil or hazardous substance spill;
and (vi) other parties identified by the department as having an
interest in or the resources to assist in the containment and cleanup
of an oil or hazardous substance spill;
(c) State the respective responsibilities of the parties identified
in (b) of this subsection in an emergency response;
(d) Identify actions necessary to reduce the likelihood of spills
of oil and hazardous substances;
(e) Identify and obtain mapping of environmentally sensitive areas
at particular risk to oil and hazardous substance spills;
(f) Establish an incident command system for responding to oil and
hazardous substances spills; and
(g) Establish a process for immediately notifying affected tribes
of any oil spill.
(3) In preparing and updating the state master plan, the department
shall:
(a) Consult with federal, provincial, municipal, and community
officials, other state agencies, the state of Oregon, and with
representatives of affected regional organizations;
(b) Submit the draft plan to the public for review and comment;
(c) Submit to the appropriate standing committees of the
legislature for review, not later than November 1st of each year, the
plan and any annual revision of the plan; and
(d) Require or schedule unannounced oil spill drills as required by
RCW 90.56.260 to test the sufficiency of oil spill contingency plans
approved under RCW 90.56.210.
(4) The department shall evaluate the functions of advisory
committees created by the department regarding oil spill prevention,
preparedness, and response programs, and shall revise or eliminate
those functions which are no longer necessary.

--- END ---