BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that: (1) The
enactment of Initiative Measure No. 1029 by the people in November 2008
established important quality standards for qualifications, training,
and certification of long-term care workers; (2) these standards, which
are intended to improve the quality of care provided to vulnerable
elderly persons and persons with disabilities, must be implemented in
a cost-effective and efficient manner that will lead to a more stable
and qualified long-term care workforce; and (3) these goals are best
achieved through phased and measured implementation over time, with due
regard to the best use of available resources.

--- END ---