BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.57 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, an
osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under this chapter may not
perform a surgical procedure on a patient unless the patient has been
tested for methicillin-resistant staphylococcus aureus at least two
weeks, but no earlier than three weeks, prior to the surgery. The test
must be performed by, or at the direction of, a physician licensed
under chapter 18.71 RCW or an osteopathic physician and surgeon
licensed under this chapter.
(2) The osteopathic physician and surgeon responsible for
performing the surgery shall, prior to the surgery:
(a) Inform the patient of the results of the test required under
subsection (1) of this section; and
(b) Require the patient to be decolonized of methicillin-resistant
staphylococcus aureus, as appropriate.
(3) This section does not apply to a patient receiving emergency
surgery or a patient in a hospital's intensive care unit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.71 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a
physician licensed under this chapter may not perform a surgical
procedure on a patient unless the patient has been tested for
methicillin-resistant staphylococcus aureus at least two weeks, but no
earlier than three weeks, prior to the surgery. The test must be
performed by, or at the direction of, an osteopathic physician and
surgeon licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW or a physician licensed under
this chapter.
(2) The physician responsible for performing the surgery shall,
prior to the surgery:
(a) Inform the patient of the results of the test required under
subsection (1) of this section; and
(b) Require the patient to be decolonized of methicillin-resistant
staphylococcus aureus, as appropriate.
(3) This section does not apply to a patient receiving emergency
surgery or a patient in a hospital's intensive care unit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a
hospital licensed under this chapter shall verify that any surgical
patient in the hospital has been tested for methicillin-resistant
staphylococcus aureus under section 1 or 2 of this act. The hospital
may not allow a surgical patient to undergo surgery in the hospital
unless the testing has occurred.
(2) This section does not apply to a patient receiving emergency
surgery or a patient in the hospital's intensive care unit.

--- END ---