BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 INTENT. An unprecedented shortfall in state
general fund revenues has threatened the state's ability to fund vital
health services and has harmed working families. For this reason, the
legislature is asking the voters to approve temporary tax increases in
order to fund health care and to support working families during this
time of revenue shortfalls.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW
to read as follows:
HEALTH CARE TRUST ACCOUNT. (1) The health care trust account is
created in the state treasury. The portion of the receipts from the
temporary increase in the retail sales tax as authorized in RCW
82.08.020(4) must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account
may be spent only after appropriation. The legislature may appropriate
from the account only to fund the basic health plan, public health
services, health care, mental health care, hospitals, and long-term
care nursing homes.
(2) This section expires January 1, 2013.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.08.020 and 2006 c 1 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
TEMPORARY SALES TAX INCREASE. (1) There is levied and there shall
be collected a tax on each retail sale in this state equal to six and
five-tenths percent of the selling price.
(2) There is levied and there shall be collected an additional tax
on each retail car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is
licensed in this state, equal to five and nine-tenths percent of the
selling price. The revenue collected under this subsection shall be
deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW
47.66.070.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2003, there is levied and collected an
additional tax of three-tenths of one percent of the selling price on
each retail sale of a motor vehicle in this state, other than retail
car rentals taxed under subsection (2) of this section. The revenue
collected under this subsection shall be deposited in the multimodal
transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.
(4) From January 1, 2010, through December 31, 2012, there is
levied and there shall be collected an additional tax of three-tenths
of one percent of the selling price on each retail sale in this state.
Of the revenue collected under this subsection:
(a) 13.2 percent of the revenue for fiscal years 2010 and 2011, and
twenty-two percent of the revenue for fiscal year 2012 shall be
deposited in the general fund and used to fund the working families'
tax rebate for low-income persons created in RCW 82.08.0206.
(b) The remainder shall be deposited in the health care trust
account created in section 2 of this act.
(5) For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, "motor vehicle"
has the meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320, but does not include farm
tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and 46.04.181,
off-road and nonhighway vehicles as defined in RCW 46.09.020, and
snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.10.010.
(((5))) (6) Beginning on December 8, 2005, 0.16 percent of the
taxes collected under subsection (1) of this section shall be dedicated
to funding comprehensive performance audits required under RCW
43.09.470. The revenue identified in this subsection shall be
deposited in the performance audits of government account created in
RCW 43.09.475.
(((6))) (7) The taxes imposed under this chapter shall apply to
successive retail sales of the same property.
(((7))) (8) The rates provided in this section apply to taxes
imposed under chapter 82.12 RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
TAX EXPIRATION DATE. The tax increases authorized in RCW
82.08.020(4) are temporary in nature and expire on December 31, 2012.
This expiration date may not be repealed or extended without a two-thirds vote of both houses of the legislature or a vote of the people.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
USE TAX DEDICATION. (1) From January 1, 2010, through December 31,
2012, use taxes collected on the rate provided in RCW 82.08.020(4)
shall be deposited in the general fund and the health care trust
account in the same proportions established in RCW 82.08.020(4).
(2) This section expires January 1, 2013.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.08.064 and 2003 c 361 s 304 and 2003 c 168 s 205
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
SALES TAX ADMINISTRATION. (1) A sales and use tax rate change
under this chapter or chapter 82.12 RCW shall be imposed (a) no sooner
than seventy-five days after its enactment into law and (b) only on the
first day of January, April, July, or October.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to the tax rate
change in section 301, chapter 361, Laws of 2003, and section 3,
chapter . . ., Laws of 2009 (section 3 of this act).
(3)(a) A sales and use tax rate increase under this chapter or
chapter 82.12 RCW imposed on services applies to the first billing
period starting on or after the effective date of the increase.
(b) A sales and use tax rate decrease under this chapter or chapter
82.12 RCW imposed on services applies to bills rendered on or after the
effective date of the decrease.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (3), "services" means
retail services such as installing and constructing and retail services
such as telecommunications, but does not include services such as
tattooing.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.135.035 and 2008 c 1 s 5 (Initiative Measure No.
960) and 2007 c 484 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
EXPENDITURE LIMIT. (1) After July 1, 1995, any action or
combination of actions by the legislature that raises taxes may be
taken only if approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the
legislature, and then only if state expenditures in any fiscal year,
including the new revenue, will not exceed the state expenditure limits
established under this chapter. Pursuant to the referendum power set
forth in Article II, section 1(b) of the state Constitution, tax
increases may be referred to the voters for their approval or rejection
at an election.
(2)(a) If the legislative action under subsection (1) of this
section will result in expenditures in excess of the state expenditure
limit, then the action of the legislature shall not take effect until
approved by a vote of the people at a November general election. The
state expenditure limit committee shall adjust the state expenditure
limit by the amount of additional revenue approved by the voters under
this section. This adjustment shall not exceed the amount of revenue
generated by the legislative action during the first full fiscal year
in which it is in effect. The state expenditure limit shall be
adjusted downward upon expiration or repeal of the legislative action.
(b) The ballot title for any vote of the people required under this
section shall be substantially as follows:

"Shall taxes be imposed on . . . . . . . in order to allow a
spending increase above last year's authorized spending adjusted for
personal income growth?"

(3)(a) The state expenditure limit may be exceeded upon declaration
of an emergency for a period not to exceed twenty-four months by a law
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and
signed by the governor. The law shall set forth the nature of the
emergency, which is limited to natural disasters that require immediate
government action to alleviate human suffering and provide humanitarian
assistance. The state expenditure limit may be exceeded for no more
than twenty-four months following the declaration of the emergency and
only for the purposes contained in the emergency declaration.
(b) Additional taxes required for an emergency under this section
may be imposed only until thirty days following the next general
election, unless an extension is approved at that general election.
The additional taxes shall expire upon expiration of the declaration of
emergency. The legislature shall not impose additional taxes for
emergency purposes under this subsection unless funds in the education
construction fund have been exhausted.
(c) The state or any political subdivision of the state shall not
impose any tax on intangible property listed in RCW 84.36.070 as that
statute exists on January 1, 1993.
(4) If the cost of any state program or function is shifted from
the state general fund or a related fund to another source of funding,
or if moneys are transferred from the state general fund or a related
fund to another fund or account, the state expenditure limit committee,
acting pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5), shall lower the state expenditure
limit to reflect the shift. For the purposes of this section, a
transfer of money from the state general fund or a related fund to
another fund or account includes any state legislative action taken
that has the effect of reducing revenues from a particular source,
where such revenues would otherwise be deposited into the state general
fund or a related fund, while increasing the revenues from that
particular source to another state or local government account. This
subsection does not apply to: (a) The dedication or use of lottery
revenues under RCW 67.70.240(3) or property taxes under RCW 84.52.068,
in support of education or education expenditures; (b) a transfer of
moneys to, or an expenditure from, the budget stabilization account; or
(c) expenditures from the health care trust account created in section
2 of this act.
(5) If the cost of any state program or function and the ongoing
revenue necessary to fund the program or function are shifted to the
state general fund or a related fund on or after January 1, 2007, the
state expenditure limit committee, acting pursuant to RCW
43.135.025(5), shall increase the state expenditure limit to reflect
the shift unless the shifted revenue had previously been shifted from
the general fund or a related fund.
(6) For the purposes of chapter 1, Laws of 2008, "raises taxes"
means any action or combination of actions by the legislature that
increases state tax revenue deposited in any fund, budget, or account,
regardless of whether the revenues are deposited into the general fund.

Sec. 8 RCW 82.08.0206 and 2008 c 325 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A working families' tax ((exemption)) rebate, in the form of a
remittance of tax due under this chapter and chapter 82.12 RCW, is
provided to eligible low-income persons for sales taxes paid under this
chapter ((after January 1, 2008)).
(2) For purposes of the ((exemption)) rebate in this section, an
eligible low-income person is:
(a) An individual, or an individual and that individual's spouse if
they file a federal joint income tax return;
(b) (([An individual who])) An individual who is eligible for, and
is granted, the credit provided in Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 32; and
(c) (([An individual who])) An individual who properly files a
federal income tax return as a Washington resident, and has been a
resident of the state of Washington more than one hundred eighty days
of the year for which the ((exemption)) rebate is claimed.
(3) For remittances made in ((2009 and 2010)) calendar years 2010
and 2011, the working families' tax ((exemption for the prior year is
a retail sales tax exemption)) rebate is equal to the greater of five
percent of the credit granted as a result of Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 32
((in the most recent year for which data is available)) or twenty-five
dollars. For ((2011)) calendar year 2012 and thereafter, the working
families' tax ((exemption for the prior year)) rebate is equal to the
greater of ten percent of the credit granted as a result of Title 26
U.S.C. Sec. 32 ((in the most recent year for which data is available))
or fifty dollars.
(4) For any fiscal ((period)) year, the working families' tax
((exemption)) rebate authorized under this section shall be approved by
the legislature in the state omnibus appropriations act before persons
may claim the ((exemption)) rebate during the fiscal ((period)) year.
(5) The working families' tax ((exemption)) rebate shall be
administered as provided in this subsection.
(a) An eligible low-income person claiming ((an exemption)) a
rebate under this section must pay the tax imposed under chapters
82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW in the year for which the ((exemption))
rebate is claimed. The eligible low-income person may then apply to
the department for ((the remittance as calculated under subsection (3)
of this section)) a rebate the following calendar year.
(b) Application shall be made to the department in a form and
manner determined by the department, but the department must provide
alternative filing methods for applicants who do not have access to
electronic filing.
(c) Application for the ((exemption remittance)) rebate under this
section ((must be made in the year following the year for which the
federal return was filed, but in no case may any remittance be provided
for any period before January 1, 2008. The department may use the best
available data to process the exemption remittance)) is based on the
earned income tax credit granted for the year prior to the application
year. The department shall begin accepting applications ((October 1,
2009)) July 1, 2010. Applications may be accepted on January 1, 2011,
and January 1st every year thereafter for rebates approved by the
legislature under subsection (4) of this section.
(d) The department shall review the application and determine
eligibility for the working families' tax ((exemption)) rebate based on
information provided by the applicant and through audit and other
administrative records, including, when it deems it necessary,
verification through internal revenue service data.
(e) The department shall remit the ((exempted)) rebated amounts to
eligible low-income persons who submitted applications. Remittances
may be made by electronic funds transfer or other means.
(f) The department may, in conjunction with other agencies or
organizations, design and implement a public information campaign to
inform potentially eligible persons of the existence of and
requirements for this ((exemption)) rebate.
(g) The department may contact persons who appear to be eligible
low-income persons as a result of information received from the
internal revenue service under such conditions and requirements as the
internal revenue service may by law require.
(6) The provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW apply to the ((exemption))
rebate in this section.
(7) The department may adopt rules necessary to implement this
section.
(((8) The department shall limit its costs for the exemption
program to the initial start-up costs to implement the program. The
state omnibus appropriations act shall specify funding to be used for
the ongoing administrative costs of the program. These ongoing
administrative costs include, but are not limited to, costs for: The
processing of internet and mail applications, verification of
application claims, compliance and collections, additional full-time
employees at the department's call center, processing warrants,
updating printed materials and web information, media advertising, and
support and maintenance of computer systems.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 AUTHORIZATION FOR THE WORKING FAMILIES' TAX
REBATE. (1) The department of revenue is authorized to implement the
working families' tax rebate for fiscal years 2010 and 2011. The
department may not accept applications until July 1, 2010.
(2) The sum of $68,500,000 for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2011, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the
state general fund to the department of revenue for payments under the
working families' tax rebate pursuant to RCW 82.08.0206.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 APPROPRIATIONS FOR THE BASIC HEALTH PLAN.
The sum of $187,352,000 dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2011, from
the health care trust account to the health care authority for the
purposes of restoring basic health plan enrollment beyond the level
appropriated in the 2009-11 biennial operating budget.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 APPROPRIATIONS FOR LONG-TERM CARE AND
NURSING HOMES. The sum of $77,250,000 dollars, or as much thereof as
may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium ending June 30,
2011, from the health care trust account to the department of social
and health services aging and disability services administration solely
for the purpose of providing long-term care, including in-home care,
adult day health care, adult family homes, boarding homes, and nursing
homes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 APPROPRIATIONS FOR HOSPITALS. The sum of
$75,000,000 dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2011, from the health
care trust account to the department of social and health services
medical assistance program for the purposes of hospital payments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 APPROPRIATIONS FOR MENTAL HEALTH CARE. The
sum of $28,214,000 dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2011, from the health
care trust account to the department of social and health services
mental health division solely for the purpose of providing community
mental health services and critical services at state hospitals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 APPROPRIATIONS FOR HEALTH CARE FOR
CHILDREN. The sum of $13,350,000 dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2011, from
the health care trust account to the department of social and health
services medical assistance program for the purposes of reimbursing
providers of health care for children.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 APPROPRIATIONS FOR THE HEALTHY OPTIONS
HEALTH CARE PROGRAM. The sum of $19,200,000 dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium ending
June 30, 2011, from the health care trust account to the department of
social and health services medical assistance program for the purposes
of providing health care through managed health care systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 APPROPRIATIONS FOR PUBLIC HEALTH SERVICES.
The sum of $10,100,000 dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary,
is appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2011, from the health
care trust account to the department of health for the purposes of
tobacco prevention activities and for distribution to local health
jurisdictions to spend on core public health functions of statewide
significance as defined in RCW 43.70.514.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 APPROPRIATIONS FOR VISION AND HEARING
SERVICES. The sum of $5,400,000 dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2011, from
the health care trust account to the department of social and health
services medical assistance program for the purposes of providing
vision and hearing services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 EXPENDITURES. Pursuant to RCW
43.88.260(2)(b), the office of financial management is authorized to
take necessary steps to ensure that expenditures of appropriations from
the health care trust account in sections 10 through 17 of this act
begin as soon as possible after the appropriations take effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 FEDERAL FUNDS. The department of social
and health services and the office of financial management shall seek
matching federal matching funds for appropriations from the health care
trust account in sections 10 through 17 of this act to the maximum
extent permitted by federal law. Upon receipt, such revenues may be
expended as permitted by RCW 43.79.270.

Sec. 20 RCW 36.100.040 and 2008 c 137 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
CONFORMING AMENDMENT. (1) A public facilities district may impose
an excise tax on the sale of or charge made for the furnishing of
lodging that is subject to tax under chapter 82.08 RCW, except that no
such tax may be levied on any premises having fewer than forty lodging
units. However, if a public facilities district has not imposed such
an excise tax prior to December 31, 1995, the public facilities
district may only impose the excise tax if a ballot proposition
authorizing the imposition of the tax has been approved by a simple
majority vote of voters of the public facilities district voting on the
proposition.
(2) The rate of the tax shall not exceed two percent and the
proceeds of the tax shall only be used for the acquisition, design,
construction, remodeling, maintenance, equipping, reequipping,
repairing, and operation of its public facilities. This excise tax
shall not be imposed until the district has approved the proposal to
acquire, design, and construct the public facilities.
(3) A public facilities district may not impose the tax authorized
in this section if, after the tax authorized in this section was
imposed, the effective combined rate of state and local excise taxes,
including sales and use taxes and excise taxes on lodging, imposed on
the sale of or charge made for furnishing of lodging in any
jurisdiction in the public facilities district exceeds eleven and one-half percent. In determining the effective combined rate of tax, the
tax rate under RCW 82.08.020(4) is not included.
(4) The tax imposed in this section does not apply to sales of
temporary medical housing exempt under RCW 82.08.997.

Sec. 21 RCW 67.28.181 and 2004 c 79 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
CONFORMING AMENDMENT. (1) The legislative body of any municipality
may impose an excise tax on the sale of or charge made for the
furnishing of lodging that is subject to tax under chapter 82.08 RCW.
The rate of tax shall not exceed the lesser of two percent or a rate
that, when combined with all other taxes imposed upon sales of lodging
within the municipality under this chapter and chapters 36.100, 67.40,
82.08, and 82.14 RCW, equals twelve percent. A tax under this chapter
shall not be imposed in increments smaller than tenths of a percent.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section:
(a) If a municipality was authorized to impose taxes under this
chapter or RCW 67.40.100 or both with a total rate exceeding four
percent before July 27, 1997, such total authorization shall continue
through January 31, 1999, and thereafter the municipality may impose a
tax under this section at a rate not exceeding the rate actually
imposed by the municipality on January 31, 1999.
(b) If a city or town, other than a municipality imposing a tax
under (a) of this subsection, is located in a county that imposed taxes
under this chapter with a total rate of four percent or more on January
1, 1997, the city or town may not impose a tax under this section.
(c) If a city has a population of four hundred thousand or more and
is located in a county with a population of one million or more, the
rate of tax imposed under this chapter by the city shall not exceed the
lesser of four percent or a rate that, when combined with all other
taxes imposed upon sales of lodging in the municipality under this
chapter and chapters 36.100, 67.40, 82.08, and 82.14 RCW, equals
fifteen and two-tenths percent.
(d) If a municipality was authorized to impose taxes under this
chapter or RCW 67.40.100, or both, at a rate equal to six percent
before January 1, 1998, the municipality may impose a tax under this
section at a rate not exceeding the rate actually imposed by the
municipality on January 1, 1998.
(3) Any county ordinance or resolution adopted under this section
shall contain a provision allowing a credit against the county tax for
the full amount of any city or town tax imposed under this section upon
the same taxable event.
(4) In determining the combined rate of tax for the purpose of a
combined tax rate limitation under this section, the tax rate under RCW
82.08.020(4) is not included.

Sec. 22 RCW 82.14.410 and 2001 c 6 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
CONFORMING AMENDMENT. (1) A local sales and use tax change adopted
after December 1, 2000, must provide an exemption for those sales of
lodging for which, but for the exemption, the total sales tax rate
imposed on sales of lodging would exceed the greater of:
(a) Twelve percent; or
(b) The total sales tax rate that would have applied to the sale of
lodging if the sale were made on December 1, 2000.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Local sales and use tax change" is defined as provided in RCW
82.14.055.
(b) "Sale of lodging" means the sale of or charge made for the
furnishing of lodging and all other services by a hotel, rooming house,
tourist court, motel, trailer camp, and the granting of any similar
license to use real property.
(c) "Total sales tax rate" means the combined rates of all state
and local taxes imposed under this chapter and chapters 36.100, 67.28,
67.40, and 82.08 RCW, and any other tax authorized after March 29,
2001, if the tax is in the nature of a sales tax collected from the
buyer, but excluding taxes imposed under RCW 81.104.170 before December
1, 2000, and taxes imposed under RCW 82.08.020(4).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 REFERRAL TO VOTERS FOR APPROVAL--BALLOT
TITLE. (1) The secretary of state shall submit sections 1 through 7 of
this act to the people for their adoption and ratification, or
rejection, at the next general election to be held in this state, in
accordance with Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and the
laws adopted to facilitate its operation.
(2) Pursuant to RCW 29A.72.050, the statement of subject and
concise description for the ballot title shall be as follows:

"The legislature has passed House Bill . . . [this act], concerning
funding for health care and the working families' tax rebate. This
bill would fund working families' tax rebate and health care trust for
basic health plan, nursing homes, hospitals, and health services
through a temporary 0.3% sales tax increase expiring December 31,
2012."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 This act takes effect upon approval of
sections 1 through 7 of this act by the voters by December 15, 2009, as
provided in section 23 of this act. If sections 1 through 7 of this
act are not approved by the voters by December 15, 2009, as provided in
section 23 of this act, this act is null and void in its entirety.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 As used in this act, captions constitute no
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---