BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that the
maritime heritage of the state of Washington is worthy of preservation,
both through the restoration and preservation of historic vessels and
the maintaining of historic vessels still in use.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 27.34 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington state historical society, after consultation
with maritime heritage stakeholders, must establish a competitive grant
program and process to solicit proposals for a maritime historic vessel
restoration and preservation program for funding from the maritime
historic restoration and preservation account established in RCW
88.02.053.
(2) The Washington state historical society must adopt policies
governing project eligibility and evaluation criteria.
(3) Application for funding of specific projects may be made to the
Washington state historical society by local governments, public
development authorities, nonprofit corporations, tribal governments,
and other entities, as determined by the Washington state historical
society.
(4) The Washington state historical society must evaluate and rank
applications in consultation with a citizen advisory committee using
objective criteria, and must establish a ranked biennial project list.
The list must include a description of each project, the amount of
recommended state funding, and documentation of nonstate funds to be
used for the project.
(5) The Washington state historical society must also establish
policies for funding of emergent needs as identified by the United
States coast guard and may establish a level of reserves that will be
held to meet such emergent needs.
(6) The Washington state historical society may not sign contracts
or otherwise financially obligate funds under this section until the
legislature has appropriated funds specifically for the program. In
contracts for grants authorized under this section, the Washington
state historical society must include provisions requiring that capital
improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time
appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for
the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of
compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee must repay to
the maritime historic restoration and preservation account the
principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of
interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most
closely to the date of authorization of the grant.
(7) The amount of state funding may not exceed fifty percent of the
total cost of the project. The nonstate portion of the total project
cost may include cash, the value of real property when acquired solely
for the purpose of the project, and in-kind contributions.
(8) The total amount of recommended state funding for projects on
a biennial project list may not exceed the biennial balance of the
maritime historic restoration and preservation account.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.49.010 and 2000 c 229 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An excise tax is imposed for the privilege of using a vessel
upon the waters of this state, except vessels exempt under RCW
82.49.020. Except for historic vessels, the annual amount of the
excise tax is one-half of one percent of fair market value, as
determined under this chapter, or five dollars, whichever is greater.
The annual amount of the excise tax for any historic vessel as defined
in RCW 88.02.010 is one-quarter of one percent of fair market value, as
determined under this chapter, or five dollars, whichever is greater.
Violation of this subsection is a misdemeanor.
(2) Persons who are required under chapter 88.02 RCW to register a
vessel in this state and who register the vessel in another state or
foreign country and avoid the Washington watercraft excise tax are
guilty of a gross misdemeanor and are liable for such unpaid excise
tax. The department of revenue may assess and collect the unpaid
excise tax under chapter 82.32 RCW, including the penalties and
interest provided in chapter 82.32 RCW.
(3) The excise tax upon a vessel registered for the first time in
this state shall be imposed for a twelve-month period, including the
month in which the vessel is registered, unless the director of
licensing extends or diminishes vessel registration periods for the
purpose of staggered renewal periods under RCW 88.02.050. A vessel is
registered for the first time in this state when the vessel was not
registered in this state for the immediately preceding registration
year, or when the vessel was registered in another jurisdiction for the
immediately preceding year. The excise tax on vessels required to be
registered in this state on June 30, 1983, shall be paid by June 30,
1983.

Sec. 4 RCW 88.02.010 and 1983 c 7 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) (("Vessel" means every watercraft used or capable of being used
as a means of transportation on the water, other than a seaplane.
(2) "Owner" means a person who has a lawful right to possession of
a vessel by purchase, exchange, gift, lease, inheritance, or legal
action whether or not the vessel is subject to a security interest.
(3))) "Collector" means the owner of one or more vessels who
collects, purchases, acquires, trades, or disposes of the vessels or
their parts for the collector's personal use, to preserve, restore, and
maintain the boat for hobby or historical purposes.
(2) "Dealer" means a person, partnership, association, or
corporation engaged in the business of selling vessels at wholesale or
retail in this state.
(((4))) (3) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(4) "Historic vessel" means any vessel that is at least sixty years
old and is only being used for participation in club activities,
exhibitions, tours, parades, and occasional pleasure boating, but does
not include vessels that are used for commercial or rental purposes.
(5) "Owner" means a person who has a lawful right to possession of
a vessel by purchase, exchange, gift, lease, inheritance, or legal
action whether or not the vessel is subject to a security interest.
(6) "Vessel" means every watercraft used or capable of being used
as a means of transportation on the water, other than a seaplane.

Sec. 5 RCW 88.02.053 and 1996 c 3 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) The maritime historic restoration and preservation account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. ((All receipts from the
voluntary donations made simultaneously with the registration of
vessels under chapter 88.02 RCW shall be deposited into this account.
These deposits are not public funds and are not subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.)) Moneys in the account may be
spent only after appropriation and only for the purposes of the Grays
Harbor historical seaport or its corporate successor, the Steamer
Virginia V foundation or its corporate successor, or the maritime
historic vessel restoration and preservation program created in section
2 of this act.
(2) At the end of each fiscal year, the state treasurer shall pay
from this account to the department of licensing an amount equal to the
reasonable administrative expenses of that agency for that fiscal year
for collecting the voluntary donations and transmitting them to the
state treasurer and shall pay to the state treasurer an amount equal to
the reasonable administrative expenses of that agency for that fiscal
year for maintaining the account and disbursing funds from the account.
(3) At the end of each fiscal year, the Washington state
((treasurer)) historical society shall pay one-half of the balance of
the funds in the account ((after payment of the administrative costs
provided in subsection (2) of this section,)) from donations made
pursuant to RCW 88.02.052 to the Grays Harbor historical seaport or its
corporate successor and the remainder of the funds in the account from
the donations made pursuant to RCW 88.02.050 to the Steamer Virginia V
foundation or its corporate successor.
(4) If either the Grays Harbor historical seaport and its corporate
successors or the Steamer Virginia V foundation and its corporate
successors legally ceases to exist, the ((state treasurer shall, at the
end of each fiscal year, pay the balance of the funds in the account to
the remaining organization)) Washington state historical society shall
retain those funds that would have been transferred.
(5) If both the Grays Harbor historical seaport and its corporate
successors and the Steamer Virginia V foundation and its corporate
successors legally cease to exist, the ((department of licensing shall
discontinue the collection of the voluntary donations in conjunction
with the registration of vessels under RCW 88.02.052, and the balance
of the funds in the account escheat to the state. If funds in the
account escheat to the state, one-half of the fund balance shall be
provided to the office of archaeology and historic preservation and the
remainder shall be deposited into the parks renewal and stewardship
account.
(6) The secretary of state, the directors of the state historical
societies, the director of the office of archaeology and historic
preservation within the department of community, trade, and economic
development, and two members representing the recreational boating
community appointed by the secretary of state, shall review the success
of the voluntary donation program for maritime historic restoration and
preservation established under RCW 88.02.052 and report their findings
to the appropriate legislative committees by January 31, 1998. The
findings must include the progress of the program and the potential to
expand the voluntary funding to other historic vessels)) entire account
balance will be available for the maritime historic vessel preservation
and restoration program established in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 88.02 RCW
to read as follows:
A historic vessel registered under RCW 88.02.050 may only be used
for participation in club activities, exhibitions, tours, parades, and
occasional pleasure boating.

--- END ---