BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.26 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that use of wholesale price as the measure of
tobacco products tax on moist snuff makes fair and consistent
administration more difficult, because of the numerous and complex ways
moist snuff can be valued before it is sold to consumers. The
legislature further finds that wholesale price as the measure of tax
does not provide a stable revenue stream, because proliferation of low-cost product reduces the tax base. The legislature further finds that
such proliferation of low-cost product makes moist snuff more
accessible, especially to the young, contrary to state policy regarding
tobacco products.
It is the intent of the legislature to establish weight, rather
than wholesale price, as the measure of tobacco products tax on moist
snuff, and impose the tax at a rate that is equivalent to cigarette
tax, with a specified minimum of tax on each consumer-sized package.
It is further the intent of the legislature to dedicate any new revenue
attributable to this act to the health services account, to the extent
possible, while keeping other accounts whole.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.26.010 and 2005 c 180 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Tobacco products" means cigars, cheroots, stogies, periques,
granulated, plug cut, crimp cut, ready rubbed, and other smoking
tobacco, snuff, snuff flour, cavendish, plug and twist tobacco, fine-cut and other chewing tobaccos, shorts, refuse scraps, clippings,
cuttings and sweepings of tobacco, and other kinds and forms of
tobacco, prepared in such manner as to be suitable for chewing or
smoking in a pipe or otherwise, or both for chewing and smoking, and
any other product, regardless of form, that contains tobacco and is
intended for human consumption or placement in the oral or nasal cavity
or absorption into the human body by any other means, but shall not
include cigarettes as defined in RCW 82.24.010.
(2) "Manufacturer" means a person who manufactures and sells
tobacco products.
(3) "Distributor" means (a) any person engaged in the business of
selling tobacco products in this state who brings, or causes to be
brought, into this state from without the state any tobacco products
for sale, (b) any person who makes, manufactures, fabricates, or stores
tobacco products in this state for sale in this state, (c) any person
engaged in the business of selling tobacco products without this state
who ships or transports tobacco products to retailers in this state, to
be sold by those retailers, (d) any person engaged in the business of
selling tobacco products in this state who handles for sale any tobacco
products that are within this state but upon which tax has not been
imposed.
(4) "Retailer" means any person engaged in the business of selling
tobacco products to ultimate consumers.
(5)(a) "Sale" means any transfer, exchange, or barter, in any
manner or by any means whatsoever, for a consideration, and includes
and means all sales made by any person.
(b) The term "sale" includes a gift by a person engaged in the
business of selling tobacco products, for advertising, promoting, or as
a means of evading the provisions of this chapter.
(6) "Business" means any trade, occupation, activity, or enterprise
engaged in for the purpose of selling or distributing tobacco products
in this state.
(7) "Place of business" means any place where tobacco products are
sold or where tobacco products are manufactured, stored, or kept for
the purpose of sale, including any vessel, vehicle, airplane, train, or
vending machine.
(8) "Retail outlet" means each place of business from which tobacco
products are sold to consumers.
(9) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(10) "Person" means any individual, receiver, administrator,
executor, assignee, trustee in bankruptcy, trust, estate, firm,
copartnership, joint venture, club, company, joint stock company,
business trust, municipal corporation, the state and its departments
and institutions, political subdivision of the state of Washington,
corporation, limited liability company, association, society, any group
of individuals acting as a unit, whether mutual, cooperative,
fraternal, nonprofit, or otherwise. The term excludes any person
immune from state taxation, including the United States or its
instrumentalities, and federally recognized Indian tribes and enrolled
tribal members, conducting business within Indian country.
(11) "Indian country" means the same as defined in chapter 82.24
RCW.
(12) "Actual price" means the total amount of consideration for
which tobacco products are sold, valued in money, whether received in
money or otherwise, including any charges by the seller necessary to
complete the sale such as charges for delivery, freight,
transportation, or handling.
(13) "Affiliated" means related in any way by virtue of any form or
amount of common ownership, control, operation, or management.
(14) "Board" means the liquor control board.
(15) "Cigar" means a roll for smoking that is of any size or shape
and that is made wholly or in part of tobacco, irrespective of whether
the tobacco is pure or flavored, adulterated or mixed with any other
ingredient, if the roll has a wrapper made wholly or in greater part of
tobacco. "Cigar" does not include a cigarette.
(16) "Cigarette" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.24.010.
(17) "Manufacturer's representative" means a person hired by a
manufacturer to sell or distribute the manufacturer's tobacco products,
and includes employees and independent contractors.
(18)(a) "Taxable sales price" means:
(i) In the case of a taxpayer that is not affiliated with the
manufacturer, distributor, or other person from whom the taxpayer
purchased tobacco products, the actual price for which the taxpayer
purchased the tobacco products;
(ii) In the case of a taxpayer that purchases tobacco products from
an affiliated manufacturer, affiliated distributor, or other affiliated
person, and that sells those tobacco products to unaffiliated
distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or ultimate consumers, the actual
price for which that taxpayer sells those tobacco products to
unaffiliated distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or ultimate
consumers;
(iii) In the case of a taxpayer that sells tobacco products only to
affiliated distributors or affiliated retailers, the price, determined
as nearly as possible according to the actual price, that other
distributors sell similar tobacco products of like quality and
character to unaffiliated distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or
ultimate consumers;
(iv) In the case of a taxpayer that is a manufacturer selling
tobacco products directly to ultimate consumers, the actual price for
which the taxpayer sells those tobacco products to ultimate consumers;
(v) In the case of a taxpayer that has acquired tobacco products
under a sale as defined in subsection (5)(b) of this section, the
price, determined as nearly as possible according to the actual price,
that the taxpayer or other distributors sell the same tobacco products
or similar tobacco products of like quality and character to
unaffiliated distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or ultimate
consumers; or
(vi) In any case where (a)(i) through (v) of this subsection do not
apply, the price, determined as nearly as possible according to the
actual price, that the taxpayer or other distributors sell the same
tobacco products or similar tobacco products of like quality and
character to unaffiliated distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or
ultimate consumers.
(b) For purposes of (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection only,
"person" includes both persons as defined in subsection (10) of this
section and any person immune from state taxation, including the United
States or its instrumentalities, and federally recognized Indian tribes
and enrolled tribal members, conducting business within Indian country.
(c) The department may adopt rules regarding the determination of
taxable sales price under this subsection.
(19) "Taxpayer" means a person liable for the tax imposed by this
chapter.
(20) "Unaffiliated distributor" means a distributor that is not
affiliated with the manufacturer, distributor, or other person from
whom the distributor has purchased tobacco products.
(21) "Unaffiliated retailer" means a retailer that is not
affiliated with the manufacturer, distributor, or other person from
whom the retailer has purchased tobacco products.
(22) "Moist snuff" means tobacco that is finely cut, ground, or
powdered; is not for smoking; and is intended to be placed in the oral,
but not the nasal, cavity.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.26.020 and 2005 c 180 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is levied and there shall be collected a tax upon the
sale, handling, or distribution of all tobacco products in this state
at the following rate:
(a) Until October 1, 2009:
(i) Seventy-five percent of the taxable sales price of cigars, not
to exceed fifty cents per cigar; or
(((b))) (ii) Seventy-five percent of the taxable sales price of all
tobacco products that are not cigars.
(b) As of October 1, 2009:
(i) For cigars, seventy-five percent of the taxable sales price of
cigars, not to exceed fifty cents per cigar;
(ii) For all tobacco products that are not cigars or moist snuff,
seventy-five percent of the taxable sales price; or
(iii) For moist snuff, as established in this subsection
(1)(b)(iii) and computed on the net weight listed by the manufacturer:
(A) On each single unit consumer-sized can or package whose net
weight is one and two-tenths ounces or less, a rate that is equal to
2.025 dollars per single unit; or
(B) On each single unit consumer-sized can whose net weight is more
than one and two-tenths ounces, a proportionate tax at the rate
established in (b)(iii)(A) of this subsection (1) on each ounce or
fractional part of an ounce.
(2) Taxes under this section shall be imposed at the time the
distributor (a) brings, or causes to be brought, into this state from
without the state tobacco products for sale, (b) makes, manufactures,
fabricates, or stores tobacco products in this state for sale in this
state, (c) ships or transports tobacco products to retailers in this
state, to be sold by those retailers, or (d) handles for sale any
tobacco products that are within this state but upon which tax has not
been imposed.
(3) The moneys collected under this section shall be deposited as
follows:
(a) Until January 1, 2010:
(i) Thirty-seven percent in the general fund; and
(((b))) (ii) Fifty percent in the health services account created
under RCW 43.72.900;
(b) As of January 1, 2010:
(i) Twenty-nine percent in the general fund; and
(ii) Fifty-eight percent in the health services account created
under RCW 43.72.900; and
(c) Thirteen percent in the water quality account under RCW
70.146.030 for the period beginning July 1, 2005, through June 30,
2021, and in the general fund for the period beginning July 1, 2021.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.26.030 and 2005 c 180 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the intent and purpose of this chapter to levy a tax on all
tobacco products sold, used, consumed, handled, or distributed within
this state and to collect the tax from the distributor as defined in
RCW 82.26.010. It is the further intent and purpose of this chapter to
impose the tax once, and only once, on all tobacco products for sale in
this state, but nothing in this chapter shall be construed to exempt
any person taxable under any other law or under any other tax imposed
under Title 82 RCW. It is the further intent and purpose of this
chapter that the distributor who first possesses the tobacco product in
this state shall be the distributor liable for the tax and that (1) for
moist snuff the tax will be based on the net weight listed by the
manufacturer and (2) in most other instances the tax will be based on
the actual price that the distributor paid for the tobacco product,
unless the distributor is affiliated with the seller.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 82.26 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section, "tobacco product code" means a
code that is required on the label of a tobacco product for purposes of
tracking or tracing the product through the distribution system under
final regulations adopted by the secretary of the United States
department of health and human services.
(2)(a) Within one year following the date on which the requirement
for a tobacco product code is effective, payment of, or exemption from,
the tax imposed in RCW 82.26.020 must be verifiable on each single unit
consumer-sized can or package of moist snuff, as provided in (b) of
this subsection.
(b) Within thirty days following the date on which notice of
proposed rule making to require a tobacco product code is published in
the federal register, the department shall commence to develop a method
for using a tobacco product code to verify payment of, or exemption
from, the tax imposed in RCW 82.26.020; to develop and implement a
pilot project to test the method; and to develop a plan for adoption of
rules to implement the method. The department must report to the
legislature on its progress annually by December 1st through the year
following the year in which the method is implemented.
(3) If notice of proposed rule making to require a tobacco product
code is not published in the federal register by July 1, 2011, the
department must determine and recommend to the legislature by November
1, 2014, a method to verify payment of, or exemption from, the tax
imposed in RCW 82.26.020, by means of stamping, use of manufacturers'
digitally readable product identifiers, or any other method, and shall
complete and present to the legislature a study of compliance with the
tax imposed in RCW 82.26.020, the effect of noncompliance on state
revenue, and the effect of adopting a method to verify payment of, or
exemption from, the tax.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The legislature recognizes the role that tax
policy plays in the levels of consumption of moist snuff by youth due
to impacts on price. Discouraging youth access to moist snuff and
youth consumption is an important state policy. The legislature
directs the department of health, with the assistance of the department
of revenue and the office of financial management, to study this issue.
The study must examine the historic, current, and future trends and
data, including but not limited to which products are consumed, by
which age group, and how the products were acquired. The study should
cover the period beginning with the year 2000, if possible. The
department of health must report to the appropriate fiscal and health
care committees of the legislature by December 1, 2010. The department
of health may consult with academics, other experts, and industry
representatives in studying this issue and preparing any reports
required under this section.

--- END ---