BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.405.415 and 2008 c 175 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Certificated instructional staff who have attained
certification from the national board for professional teaching
standards shall receive a bonus each year in which they maintain the
certification. The bonus shall be calculated as follows: The annual
bonus shall be five thousand dollars in the 2007-08 school year.
Thereafter, the annual bonus shall increase by inflation.
(b) Beginning in the 2011-12 school year, educational staff
associates certified as a school speech-language pathologist,
audiologist, psychologist, occupational therapist, physical therapist,
social worker, or school nurse who have attained a national certificate
within their respective profession shall receive a bonus each year in
which they maintain the certification. The bonus shall be calculated
as follows: The annual bonus is five thousand dollars, increased by
inflation beginning with the 2007-08 school year.
(2) Certificated instructional staff who have attained
certification from the national board for professional teaching
standards shall be eligible for bonuses in addition to that provided by
subsection (1) of this section if the individual is in an instructional
assignment in a school in which at least seventy percent of the
students qualify for the free and reduced-price lunch program.
Beginning in the 2011-12 school year, educational staff associates
certified as a school speech-language pathologist, audiologist,
psychologist, occupational therapist, physical therapist, social
worker, or school nurse who have attained a national certificate within
their respective profession and are in an assignment in a school in
which at least seventy percent of the students qualify for the free and
reduced-price lunch program are eligible for bonuses in addition to
that provided by subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The amount of the additional bonus under subsection (2) of this
section for those meeting the qualifications of subsection (2) of this
section is five thousand dollars.
(4) The bonuses provided under this section are in addition to
compensation received under a district's salary schedule adopted in
accordance with RCW 28A.405.200 and shall not be included in
calculations of a district's average salary and associated salary
limitations under RCW 28A.400.200.
(5) The bonuses provided under this section shall be paid in a lump
sum amount.

--- END ---