BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.20.050 and 2008 c 323 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((With respect to claims that have an effective date before
January 4, 2004:
(a) An individual shall be disqualified from benefits beginning
with the first day of the calendar week in which he or she has left
work voluntarily without good cause and thereafter for seven calendar
weeks and until he or she has obtained bona fide work in employment
covered by this title and earned wages in that employment equal to
seven times his or her weekly benefit amount.
The disqualification shall continue if the work obtained is a mere
sham to qualify for benefits and is not bona fide work. In determining
whether work is of a bona fide nature, the commissioner shall consider
factors including but not limited to the following:
(i) The duration of the work;
(ii) The extent of direction and control by the employer over the
work; and
(iii) The level of skill required for the work in light of the
individual's training and experience.
(b) An individual shall not be considered to have left work
voluntarily without good cause when:
(i) He or she has left work to accept a bona fide offer of bona
fide work as described in (a) of this subsection;
(ii) The separation was because of the illness or disability of the
claimant or the death, illness, or disability of a member of the
claimant's immediate family if the claimant took all reasonable
precautions, in accordance with any regulations that the commissioner
may prescribe, to protect his or her employment status by having
promptly notified the employer of the reason for the absence and by
having promptly requested reemployment when again able to assume
employment: PROVIDED, That these precautions need not have been taken
when they would have been a futile act, including those instances when
the futility of the act was a result of a recognized labor/management
dispatch system;
(iii) He or she has left work to relocate for the spouse's
employment that is due to an employer-initiated mandatory transfer that
is outside the existing labor market area if the claimant remained
employed as long as was reasonable prior to the move; or
(iv) The separation was necessary to protect the claimant or the
claimant's immediate family members from domestic violence, as defined
in RCW 26.50.010, or stalking, as defined in RCW 9A.46.110.
(c) In determining under this subsection whether an individual has
left work voluntarily without good cause, the commissioner shall only
consider work-connected factors such as the degree of risk involved to
the individual's health, safety, and morals, the individual's physical
fitness for the work, the individual's ability to perform the work, and
such other work connected factors as the commissioner may deem
pertinent, including state and national emergencies. Good cause shall
not be established for voluntarily leaving work because of its distance
from an individual's residence where the distance was known to the
individual at the time he or she accepted the employment and where, in
the judgment of the department, the distance is customarily traveled by
workers in the individual's job classification and labor market, nor
because of any other significant work factor which was generally known
and present at the time he or she accepted employment, unless the
related circumstances have so changed as to amount to a substantial
involuntary deterioration of the work factor or unless the commissioner
determines that other related circumstances would work an unreasonable
hardship on the individual were he or she required to continue in the
employment.
(d) Subsection (1)(a) and (c) of this section shall not apply to an
individual whose marital status or domestic responsibilities cause him
or her to leave employment. Such an individual shall not be eligible
for unemployment insurance benefits beginning with the first day of the
calendar week in which he or she left work and thereafter for seven
calendar weeks and until he or she has requalified, either by obtaining
bona fide work in employment covered by this title and earning wages in
that employment equal to seven times his or her weekly benefit amount
or by reporting in person to the department during ten different
calendar weeks and certifying on each occasion that he or she is ready,
able, and willing to immediately accept any suitable work which may be
offered, is actively seeking work pursuant to customary trade
practices, and is utilizing such employment counseling and placement
services as are available through the department. This subsection does
not apply to individuals covered by (b)(ii) or (iii) of this
subsection.
(2))) With respect to claims that have an effective date on or
after January 4, 2004, and separations that occur before September 6,
2009:
(a) An individual shall be disqualified from benefits beginning
with the first day of the calendar week in which he or she has left
work voluntarily without good cause and thereafter for seven calendar
weeks and until he or she has obtained bona fide work in employment
covered by this title and earned wages in that employment equal to
seven times his or her weekly benefit amount.
The disqualification shall continue if the work obtained is a mere
sham to qualify for benefits and is not bona fide work. In determining
whether work is of a bona fide nature, the commissioner shall consider
factors including but not limited to the following:
(i) The duration of the work;
(ii) The extent of direction and control by the employer over the
work; and
(iii) The level of skill required for the work in light of the
individual's training and experience.
(b) An individual is not disqualified from benefits under (a) of
this subsection when:
(i) He or she has left work to accept a bona fide offer of bona
fide work as described in (a) of this subsection;
(ii) The separation was necessary because of the illness or
disability of the claimant or the death, illness, or disability of a
member of the claimant's immediate family if:
(A) The claimant pursued all reasonable alternatives to preserve
his or her employment status by requesting a leave of absence, by
having promptly notified the employer of the reason for the absence,
and by having promptly requested reemployment when again able to assume
employment. These alternatives need not be pursued, however, when they
would have been a futile act, including those instances when the
futility of the act was a result of a recognized labor/management
dispatch system; and
(B) The claimant terminated his or her employment status, and is
not entitled to be reinstated to the same position or a comparable or
similar position;
(iii)(A) With respect to claims that have an effective date before
July 2, 2006, he or she: (I) Left work to relocate for the spouse's
employment that, due to a mandatory military transfer: (1) Is outside
the existing labor market area; and (2) is in Washington or another
state that, pursuant to statute, does not consider such an individual
to have left work voluntarily without good cause; and (II) remained
employed as long as was reasonable prior to the move;
(B) With respect to claims that have an effective date on or after
July 2, 2006, he or she: (I) Left work to relocate for the spouse's
employment that, due to a mandatory military transfer, is outside the
existing labor market area; and (II) remained employed as long as was
reasonable prior to the move;
(iv) The separation was necessary to protect the claimant or the
claimant's immediate family members from domestic violence, as defined
in RCW 26.50.010, or stalking, as defined in RCW 9A.46.110;
(v) The individual's usual compensation was reduced by twenty-five
percent or more;
(vi) The individual's usual hours were reduced by twenty-five
percent or more;
(vii) The individual's worksite changed, such change caused a
material increase in distance or difficulty of travel, and, after the
change, the commute was greater than is customary for workers in the
individual's job classification and labor market;
(viii) The individual's worksite safety deteriorated, the
individual reported such safety deterioration to the employer, and the
employer failed to correct the hazards within a reasonable period of
time;
(ix) The individual left work because of illegal activities in the
individual's worksite, the individual reported such activities to the
employer, and the employer failed to end such activities within a
reasonable period of time;
(x) The individual's usual work was changed to work that violates
the individual's religious convictions or sincere moral beliefs; or
(xi) The individual left work to enter an apprenticeship program
approved by the Washington state apprenticeship training council.
Benefits are payable beginning Sunday of the week prior to the week in
which the individual begins active participation in the apprenticeship
program.
(2) With respect to separations that occur on or after September 6,
2009:
(a) An individual shall be disqualified from benefits beginning
with the first day of the calendar week in which he or she has left
work voluntarily without good cause and thereafter for seven calendar
weeks and until he or she has obtained bona fide work in employment
covered by this title and earned wages in that employment equal to
seven times his or her weekly benefit amount.
The disqualification shall continue if the work obtained is a mere
sham to qualify for benefits and is not bona fide work. In determining
whether work is of a bona fide nature, the commissioner shall consider
factors including but not limited to the following:
(i) The duration of the work;
(ii) The extent of direction and control by the employer over the
work; and
(iii) The level of skill required for the work in light of the
individual's training and experience.
(b) An individual has good cause and is not disqualified from
benefits under (a) of this subsection only under the following
circumstances:
(i) He or she has left work to accept a bona fide offer of bona
fide work as described in (a) of this subsection;
(ii) The separation was necessary because of the illness or
disability of the claimant or the death, illness, or disability of a
member of the claimant's immediate family if:
(A) The claimant pursued all reasonable alternatives to preserve
his or her employment status by requesting a leave of absence, by
having promptly notified the employer of the reason for the absence,
and by having promptly requested reemployment when again able to assume
employment. These alternatives need not be pursued, however, when they
would have been a futile act, including those instances when the
futility of the act was a result of a recognized labor/management
dispatch system; and
(B) The claimant terminated his or her employment status, and is
not entitled to be reinstated to the same position or a comparable or
similar position;
(iii) The claimant: (A) Left work to relocate for the employment
of a spouse or domestic partner that is outside the existing labor
market area; and (B) remained employed as long as was reasonable prior
to the move;
(iv) The separation was necessary to protect the claimant or the
claimant's immediate family members from domestic violence, as defined
in RCW 26.50.010, or stalking, as defined in RCW 9A.46.110;
(v) The individual's usual compensation was reduced by twenty-five
percent or more;
(vi) The individual's usual hours were reduced by twenty-five
percent or more;
(vii) The individual's worksite changed, the change caused a
material increase in distance or difficulty of travel, and, after the
change, the commute was greater than is customary for workers in the
individual's job classification and labor market;
(viii) The individual's worksite safety deteriorated, the
individual reported the safety deterioration to the employer, and the
employer failed to correct the hazards within a reasonable period of
time;
(ix) The individual left work because of illegal activities in the
individual's worksite, the individual reported such activities to the
employer, and the employer failed to end the activities within a
reasonable period of time;
(x) The individual's usual work was changed to work that violates
the individual's religious convictions or sincere moral beliefs;
(xi) The individual left work to enter an apprenticeship program
approved by the Washington state apprenticeship training council.
Benefits are payable beginning Sunday of the week prior to the week in
which the individual begins active participation in the apprenticeship
program; or
(xii) The individual left work because continuing in employment
would work an unreasonable hardship on the individual. "Unreasonable
hardship" means a result not due to the individual's voluntary action
that would cause a reasonable person to leave that employment. The
circumstances must be based on existing facts, not conjecture, and the
reasons for leaving work must be significant. An individual seeking to
demonstrate unreasonable hardship must show that:
(A) The individual left work primarily for reasons connected with
his or her employment;
(B) The work-connected reasons were of such a compelling nature
they would have caused a reasonably prudent person to leave work; and
(C) The individual first exhausted all reasonable alternatives
before leaving work, unless pursuing reasonable alternatives would have
been futile.

Sec. 2 RCW 50.20.100 and 2006 c 13 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Suitable work for an individual is employment in an occupation
in keeping with the individual's prior work experience, education, or
training and if the individual has no prior work experience, special
education, or training for employment available in the general area,
then employment which the individual would have the physical and mental
ability to perform. In determining whether work is suitable for an
individual, the commissioner shall also consider the degree of risk
involved to the individual's health, safety, and morals, the
individual's physical fitness, the individual's length of unemployment
and prospects for securing local work in the individual's customary
occupation, the distance of the available work from the individual's
residence, and such other factors as the commissioner may deem
pertinent, including state and national emergencies.
(2) For individuals with base year work experience in agricultural
labor, any agricultural labor available from any employer shall be
deemed suitable unless it meets conditions in RCW 50.20.110 or the
commissioner finds elements of specific work opportunity unsuitable for
a particular individual.
(3) ((For part-time workers as defined in RCW 50.20.119, suitable
work includes suitable work under subsection (1) of this section that
is for seventeen or fewer hours per week.
(4))) For individuals who have qualified for unemployment
compensation benefits under RCW 50.20.050 (1)(b)(iv) or (2)(b)(iv), as
applicable, an evaluation of the suitability of the work must consider
the individual's need to address the physical, psychological, legal,
and other effects of domestic violence or stalking.

Sec. 3 RCW 50.20.119 and 2006 c 13 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((With respect to claims that have an effective date on or
after January 2, 2005,)) An otherwise eligible individual may not be
denied benefits for any week because the individual is a part-time
worker and is available for, seeks, applies for, or accepts only part-time work ((of seventeen or fewer hours per week)) by reason of the
application of RCW 50.20.010(1)(c), 50.20.080, or 50.22.020(1) relating
to availability for work and active search for work, or failure to
apply for or refusal to accept suitable work.
(2) For purposes of this section, "part-time worker" means an
individual who((: (a))) earned wages in part-time "employment" in ((at
least forty)) a majority of the weeks in the individual's base year((;
and (b) did not earn wages in "employment" in more than seventeen hours
per week in any weeks in the individual's base year)).

Sec. 4 RCW 50.20.120 and 2009 c 3 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
Except as provided in RCW 50.20.--- (section 2, chapter 3, Laws of
2009), benefits shall be payable as provided in this section.
(1)(a) For claims with an effective date on or after April 4, 2004,
and before January 3, 2010, benefits shall be payable to any eligible
individual during the individual's benefit year in a maximum amount
equal to the lesser of twenty-six times the weekly benefit amount, as
determined in subsection (2) of this section, or one-third of the
individual's base year wages under this title.
(b) For claims with an effective date on or after January 3, 2010,
benefits shall be payable to any eligible individual during the
individual's benefit year in a maximum amount equal to the lesser of
thirty times the weekly benefit amount, as determined in subsection (2)
of this section, or one-third of the individual's base year wages under
this title.
(2)(a) For claims with an effective date on or after April 24,
2005, and before January 3, 2010, an individual's weekly benefit amount
shall be an amount equal to three and eighty-five one-hundredths
percent of the average quarterly wages of the individual's total wages
during the two quarters of the individual's base year in which such
total wages were highest.
(b) For claims with an effective date on or after January 3, 2010,
an individual's weekly benefit amount shall be an amount equal to four
percent of the average quarterly wages of the individual's total wages
during the two quarters of the individual's base year in which such
total wages were highest.
(3)(a) For claims with an effective date on or after January 3,
2010, in addition to the amount payable weekly under subsection (2) of
this section, an individual shall be paid a dependent allowance of five
dollars weekly for: (i) Each child who is a dependent of the
individual for federal income tax exemptions; and (ii) each child for
whom the individual owes child support obligations and for whom no
other person is receiving dependent allowances under this subsection.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection:
(i) "Child" means a biological, adopted, or foster child, a
stepchild, a legal ward, or a child of a person standing in loco
parentis who is: (A) Under eighteen years of age; (B) eighteen years
of age or older and incapable of self-care because of a mental or
physical disability; or (C) under twenty-four years of age, enrolled as
a student, and regularly attending classes, or is between two
successive academic years or terms, at an institution of higher
education.
(ii) "Institution of higher education" means an educational
institution that: (A) Admits as regular students only individuals
having a certificate of graduation from a high school, or the
recognized equivalent of such a certificate; (B) is legally authorized
to provide a program of education beyond high school; (C) provides an
educational program for which it awards a bachelor's or higher degree,
or provides a program which is acceptable for full credit toward such
a degree, or offers a program of training to prepare students for
gainful employment in a recognized occupation; and (D) is a public or
other nonprofit institution.
(4) The maximum and minimum amounts payable weekly shall be
determined as of each June 30th to apply to benefit years beginning in
the twelve-month period immediately following such June 30th.
(a)(i) For claims with an effective date before January 3, 2010,
the maximum amount payable weekly shall be either four hundred ninety-six dollars or sixty-three percent of the "average weekly wage" for the
calendar year preceding such June 30th, whichever is greater.
(ii) For claims with an effective date on or after January 3, 2010,
the maximum amount payable weekly shall be seventy percent of the
"average weekly wage" for the calendar year preceding such June 30th,
whichever is greater.
(b) The minimum amount payable weekly shall be fifteen percent of
the "average weekly wage" for the calendar year preceding such June
30th.
(((4))) (5) If any weekly benefit, maximum benefit, or minimum
benefit amount computed herein is not a multiple of one dollar, it
shall be reduced to the next lower multiple of one dollar.

--- END ---