BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that public participation in the legislative
process improves the quality of proposed legislation by allowing the
opportunity for its detailed review by interested parties. The
opportunity for a detailed review by the public prior to hearings or
votes on legislation helps increase public trust in government and
enhances respect for the legislature by ensuring that its operation is
conducted with the openness, order, and dignity benefiting Washington
state. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to prohibit
hearings or votes on appropriation and/or revenue-related bills until
seventy-two hours after the bill's public introduction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply to sections 1 and 3 of this
act:
(1) "Amendment" means any proposed change to a bill.
(2) "Appropriation-related bill" means any bill authorizing an
appropriation of funds for state operating, capital, or transportation
expenditures.
(3) "Publicly available" means posting a bill on the legislature's
web site and its publication in a bill report, committee report, or
conference report.
(4) "Revenue-related bill" means any bill raising revenue for
operating, capital, or transportation expenditures.
(5) "Striking amendment" means any amendment removing everything
after the enacting clause of a bill and inserting new language.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Hearings or votes on an appropriation-related bill or revenue-related bill are prohibited until seventy-two hours after the bill is
made publicly available. The seventy-two hour time period excludes
Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays except when the legislature is in
session on such a day.
(2) Amendments offered to an appropriation-related bill or revenue-related bill may not be considered in order unless made publicly
available twenty-four hours prior to any vote. The twenty-four hour
time period excludes Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays except when the
legislature is in session on such a day.
(3) Striking amendments may not be considered in order unless made
publicly available forty-eight hours prior to any vote. The forty-eight hour time period excludes Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays except
when the legislature is in session on such a day.
(4) The time periods specified in this section may be waived only
with a two-thirds vote of the full committee or legislative body
considering the appropriation-related bill or revenue-related bill.
(5) Whenever the time periods specified in this section are waived
pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, the following section must
be added to the text of the bill and the bill report:

"NEW SECTION. Sec. (insert appropriate section number). The
(insert name of full committee or legislative body) has waived the
people's right for a detailed review of this bill as required by the
seventy-two hour budget review act."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act may be known and cited as the
seventy-two hour budget review act.

--- END ---