BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that public health is
a core function of state government. The local health jurisdictions in
Washington state's decentralized public health system depend on a
combination of federal, state, and local funding. This funding system
can make public health funding unstable on the local level and can
adversely affect the public health services available to the citizens
of the state. It is therefore the intent of the legislature to help
provide local health jurisdictions with a more stable dedicated funding
system by providing a dedicated state revenue stream and creating a
single account through which all state funding for public health will
be distributed. The legislature further intends that local health
jurisdictions receiving state funds be held accountable for the use of
those funds based on the minimum standards of public health protection
in the state's public health improvement plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The public health improvement account is created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, during
the month of January 2011, and every January thereafter, the state
treasurer shall distribute the account's annual receipts to each local
health jurisdiction in the state to be used for core public health
functions of statewide significance. The state treasurer must
distribute the moneys required under this subsection as follows:
(a) To the extent available, each local health jurisdiction must
receive a base level of funding of one hundred thousand dollars.
(b) The remainder of the funds to be distributed under this
subsection (2) must be distributed among the jurisdictions on a per
capita basis.
(3) The state treasurer may not distribute funds to a local health
jurisdiction under subsection (2)(a) of this section if he or she
receives notice from the secretary of health, under RCW 43.70.516, that
the jurisdiction is not in substantial compliance with the minimum
standards for public health protection established under RCW 43.70.520.
The state treasurer must retain funds withheld under this subsection
until he or she receives notification from the secretary, under RCW
43.70.516, that the jurisdiction has achieved substantial compliance.
(4) A local health jurisdiction may use funds provided under this
section to supplant other funding sources for public health programs.
(5) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Per capita basis" means the amount multiplied by the
proportion of the population of the jurisdiction in the previous
calendar year to the population of the state in the previous calendar
year.
(b) "Population" means the number of persons as last determined by
the office of financial management. If the jurisdiction is comprised
of a single county, "population" means the number of persons in that
county. If the jurisdiction is comprised of two or more counties,
"population" means the number of persons in all counties of which the
jurisdiction is comprised.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The secretary must establish a review process for determining
whether a local health jurisdiction is in substantial compliance with
the minimum standards for public health protection established under
RCW 43.70.520.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the
secretary must use the process established in subsection (1) of this
section to review each local health jurisdiction in the state at least
once every three years.
(3)(a) If the secretary finds that a local health jurisdiction is
not in substantial compliance with the minimum standards for public
health protection, he or she must notify the local health jurisdiction
in writing.
(b) A local health jurisdiction receiving written notice under this
subsection must submit a plan of correction within sixty days. The
plan of correction must explain the measures that the jurisdiction will
undertake to achieve substantial compliance with the standards within
one hundred eighty days.
(c) If the secretary determines that the plan of correction is
likely to bring the jurisdiction into substantial compliance within one
hundred eighty days, he or she must provide technical assistance to the
jurisdiction to help it to successfully complete the plan of
correction. If the secretary determines that the plan of correction is
not likely to bring the jurisdiction into substantial compliance within
one hundred eighty days, he or she must reject the plan of correction
and allow the jurisdiction to revise and resubmit the plan within
fifteen days. If the secretary finds that the revised plan of
correction is not likely to bring the jurisdiction into substantial
compliance within one hundred eighty days, or if the jurisdiction does
not resubmit a revised plan within fifteen days, he or she shall send
notice to the state treasurer that the jurisdiction is out of
substantial compliance under subsection (4) of this section.
(d) The secretary must review a local health jurisdiction with an
approved plan of correction one hundred eighty days after the approved
plan's submission. If the secretary finds that the jurisdiction
remains out of substantial compliance after the review required by this
subsection (3)(d), he or she must send notice to the state treasurer
that the jurisdiction is out of substantial compliance under subsection
(4) of this section.
(4)(a) The secretary must notify the state treasurer when the
secretary finds, under subsections (3)(c) or (d) of this section, that
a local health jurisdiction is out of substantial compliance
established under RCW 43.70.520. Upon notification under this
subsection, the state treasurer must suspend any distributions made to
the jurisdiction under section 2 of this act until the secretary sends
notice that the jurisdiction is back in substantial compliance.
(b) The secretary must review, using the process established under
subsection (1) of this section, a jurisdiction subject to suspension
under (a) of this subsection no sooner than one hundred eighty days
after notice of suspension was sent to the state treasurer. If the
secretary finds that the jurisdiction remains out of substantial
compliance, the secretary must continue the suspension and review the
jurisdiction at intervals of at least one hundred eighty days until the
secretary finds that the jurisdiction is in substantial compliance.
Once the secretary finds that the jurisdiction is in substantial
compliance after a review under this subsection, he or she must notify
the state treasurer, who must immediately resume the distributions
required under section 2 of this act and distribute any moneys the
jurisdiction should have received during the period of suspension.
(5) The secretary may exempt a local health jurisdiction from the
review process required by this section if the jurisdiction is
accredited by an organization whose accreditation standards meet or
exceed the minimum standards for public health protection established
under RCW 43.70.520.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.70.514 and 2007 c 259 s 61 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout ((sections 60
through 65 of this act)) this section and RCW 43.70.516 unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Core public health functions of statewide significance" or
"public health functions" means health services that:
(a) Address: Communicable disease prevention and response;
preparation for, and response to, public health emergencies caused by
pandemic disease, earthquake, flood, or terrorism; prevention and
management of chronic diseases and disabilities; promotion of healthy
families and the development of children; assessment of local health
conditions, risks, and trends, and evaluation of the effectiveness of
intervention efforts; and environmental health concerns;
(b) Promote uniformity in the public health activities conducted by
all local health jurisdictions in the public health system, increase
the overall strength of the public health system, or apply to broad
public health efforts; and
(c) If left neglected or inadequately addressed, are reasonably
likely to have a significant adverse impact on counties beyond the
borders of the local health jurisdiction.
(2) "Local health jurisdiction" or "jurisdiction" means a county
board of health organized under chapter 70.05 RCW, a health district
organized under chapter 70.46 RCW, or a combined city and county health
department organized under chapter 70.08 RCW.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.70.516 and 2007 c 259 s 62 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The department shall accomplish the tasks included in
subsection (2) of this section by utilizing the expertise of varied
interests, as provided in this subsection.
(a) In addition to the perspectives of local health jurisdictions,
the state board of health, the Washington health foundation, and
department staff that are currently engaged in development of the
public health services improvement plan under RCW 43.70.520, the
secretary shall actively engage:
(i) Individuals or entities with expertise in the development of
performance measures, accountability and systems management, such as
the University of Washington school of public health and community
medicine, and experts in the development of evidence-based medical
guidelines or public health practice guidelines; and
(ii) Individuals or entities who will be impacted by performance
measures developed under this section and have relevant expertise, such
as community clinics, public health nurses, large employers, tribal
health providers, family planning providers, and physicians.
(b) In developing the performance measures, consideration shall be
given to levels of performance necessary to promote uniformity in core
public health functions of statewide significance among all local
health jurisdictions, best scientific evidence, national standards of
performance, and innovations in public health practice. The
performance measures shall be developed to meet the goals and outcomes
in RCW 43.70.512. The office of the state auditor shall provide advice
and consultation to the committee to assist in the development of
effective performance measures and health status indicators.
(c) On or before November 1, 2007, the experts assembled under this
section shall provide recommendations to the secretary related to the
activities and services that qualify as core public health functions of
statewide significance and performance measures. The secretary shall
provide written justification for any departure from the
recommendations.
(2))) By January 1, 2008, the department shall((:
(a))) adopt a prioritized list of activities and services performed
by local health jurisdictions that qualify as core public health
functions of statewide significance as defined in RCW 43.70.514((; and
(b) Adopt appropriate performance measures with the intent of
improving health status indicators applicable to the core public health
functions of statewide significance that local health jurisdictions
must provide)).
(((3))) (2) The secretary may revise the list of activities ((and
the performance measures)) in future years as appropriate. Prior to
modifying ((either)) the list ((or the performance measures)), the
secretary must provide a written explanation of the rationale for such
changes.
(((4) The department and the local health jurisdictions shall abide
by the prioritized list of activities and services and the performance
measures developed pursuant to this section.
(5) The department, in consultation with representatives of county
governments, shall provide local jurisdictions with financial
incentives to encourage and increase local investments in core public
health functions. The local jurisdictions shall not supplant existing
local funding with such state-incented resources.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 43.70.512 (Public health -- Required measurable outcomes) and
2007 c 259 s 60; and
(2) RCW 43.70.522 (Public health performance measures -- Assessing
the use of funds -- Secretary's duties) and 2007 c 259 s 65.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.08.0293 and 2009 c 483 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 ((shall)) does not apply to
sales of food and food ingredients. "Food and food ingredients" means
substances, whether in liquid, concentrated, solid, frozen, dried, or
dehydrated form, that are sold for ingestion or chewing by humans and
are consumed for their taste or nutritional value. "Food and food
ingredients" does not include:
(a) "Alcoholic beverages," which means beverages that are suitable
for human consumption and contain one-half of one percent or more of
alcohol by volume; and
(b) "Tobacco," which means cigarettes, cigars, chewing or pipe
tobacco, or any other item that contains tobacco.
(2) The exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided for in
subsection (1) of this section ((shall)) does not apply to prepared
food, soft drinks, candy, or dietary supplements.
(a) "Prepared food" means:
(i) Food sold in a heated state or heated by the seller;
(ii) Food sold with eating utensils provided by the seller,
including plates, knives, forks, spoons, glasses, cups, napkins, or
straws. A plate does not include a container or packaging used to
transport the food; or
(iii) Two or more food ingredients mixed or combined by the seller
for sale as a single item, except:
(A) Food that is only cut, repackaged, or pasteurized by the
seller; or
(B) Raw eggs, fish, meat, poultry, and foods containing these raw
animal foods requiring cooking by the consumer as recommended by the
federal food and drug administration in chapter 3, part 401.11 of The
Food Code, published by the food and drug administration, as amended or
renumbered as of January 1, 2003, so as to prevent foodborne illness.
(b) "Prepared food" does not include the following food or food
ingredients, if the food or food ingredients are sold without eating
utensils provided by the seller:
(i) Food sold by a seller whose proper primary North American
industry classification system (NAICS) classification is manufacturing
in sector 311, except subsector 3118 (bakeries), as provided in the
"North American industry classification system -- United States, 2002";
(ii) Food sold in an unheated state by weight or volume as a single
item; or
(iii) Bakery items. The term "bakery items" includes bread, rolls,
buns, biscuits, bagels, croissants, pastries, donuts, Danish, cakes,
tortes, pies, tarts, muffins, bars, cookies, or tortillas.
(c) "Soft drinks" means nonalcoholic beverages that contain natural
or artificial sweeteners. Soft drinks do not include beverages that
contain: Milk or milk products; soy, rice, or similar milk
substitutes; or greater than fifty percent of vegetable or fruit juice
by volume.
(d) "Dietary supplement" means any product, other than tobacco,
intended to supplement the diet that:
(i) Contains one or more of the following dietary ingredients:
(A) A vitamin;
(B) A mineral;
(C) An herb or other botanical;
(D) An amino acid;
(E) A dietary substance for use by humans to supplement the diet by
increasing the total dietary intake; or
(F) A concentrate, metabolite, constituent, extract, or combination
of any ingredient described in this subsection;
(ii) Is intended for ingestion in tablet, capsule, powder, softgel,
gelcap, or liquid form, or if not intended for ingestion in such form,
is not represented as conventional food and is not represented for use
as a sole item of a meal or of the diet; and
(iii) Is required to be labeled as a dietary supplement,
identifiable by the "supplement facts" box found on the label as
required pursuant to 21 C.F.R. Sec. 101.36, as amended or renumbered as
of January 1, 2003.
(e) "Candy" means a preparation of sugar, honey, or other natural
or artificial sweeteners in combination with chocolate, fruits, nuts,
or other ingredients or flavorings in the form of bars, drops, or
pieces. "Candy" does not include any preparation containing flour and
does not require refrigeration.
(3) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the
exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided in this section shall
apply to food and food ingredients that are furnished, prepared, or
served as meals:
(a) Under a state administered nutrition program for the aged as
provided for in the older Americans act (P.L. 95-478 Title III) and RCW
74.38.040(6);
(b) That are provided to senior citizens, individuals with
disabilities, or low-income persons by a not-for-profit organization
organized under chapter 24.03 or 24.12 RCW; or
(c) That are provided to residents, sixty-two years of age or
older, of a qualified low-income senior housing facility by the lessor
or operator of the facility. The sale of a meal that is billed to both
spouses of a marital community or both domestic partners of a domestic
partnership meets the age requirement in this subsection (3)(c) if at
least one of the spouses or domestic partners is at least sixty-two
years of age. For purposes of this subsection, "qualified low-income
senior housing facility" means a facility:
(i) That meets the definition of a qualified low-income housing
project under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 42 of the federal internal revenue
code, as existing on August 1, 2009;
(ii) That has been partially funded under Title 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1485
of the federal internal revenue code; and
(iii) For which the lessor or operator has at any time been
entitled to claim a federal income tax credit under Title 26 U.S.C.
Sec. 42 of the federal internal revenue code.
(4)(a) Subsection (1) of this section notwithstanding, the retail
sale of food and food ingredients is subject to sales tax under RCW
82.08.020 if the food and food ingredients are sold through a vending
machine, and in this case the selling price for purposes of RCW
82.08.020 is fifty-seven percent of the gross receipts.
(b) This subsection (4) does not apply to hot prepared food and
food ingredients, other than food and food ingredients which are heated
after they have been dispensed from the vending machine.
(c) For tax collected under this subsection (4), the requirements
that the tax be collected from the buyer and that the amount of tax be
stated as a separate item are waived.

Sec. 8 RCW 82.12.0293 and 2009 c 483 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter ((shall)) do not apply in
respect to the use of food and food ingredients for human consumption.
"Food and food ingredients" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.0293.
(2) The exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided for in
subsection (1) of this section ((shall)) does not apply to prepared
food, soft drinks, candy, or dietary supplements. "Prepared food,"
"soft drinks," ((and)) "dietary supplements," and "candy" have the same
meanings as in RCW 82.08.0293.
(3) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the
exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided in this section shall
apply to food and food ingredients which are furnished, prepared, or
served as meals:
(a) Under a state administered nutrition program for the aged as
provided for in the older Americans act (P.L. 95-478 Title III) and RCW
74.38.040(6);
(b) Which are provided to senior citizens, individuals with
disabilities, or low-income persons by a not-for-profit organization
organized under chapter 24.03 or 24.12 RCW; or
(c) That are provided to residents, sixty-two years of age or
older, of a qualified low-income senior housing facility by the lessor
or operator of the facility. The sale of a meal that is billed to both
spouses of a marital community or both domestic partners of a domestic
partnership meets the age requirement in this subsection (3)(c) if at
least one of the spouses or domestic partners is at least sixty-two
years of age. For purposes of this subsection, "qualified low-income
senior housing facility" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.0293.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By December 1, 2010, and by December 1st for each year
thereafter, the state treasurer must transfer from the general fund to
the public health improvement account created in section 2 of this act
the amount specified by the department as required under subsection (2)
of this section.
(2) By November 1, 2010, and by November 1st for each year
thereafter, the department must notify the state treasurer of the
estimated amount of state sales and use taxes that will be collected
during the current calendar year resulting from the elimination of the
sales and use tax exemption on candy in section 7 of this act.

--- END ---