BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.103 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The council shall develop minimum standards for facilities used
to perform autopsies in order to ensure that such facilities are
designed and equipped in a manner that promotes accurate and efficient
autopsies. The minimum standards shall include, but not be limited to,
standards in the following areas:
(a) Equipment;
(b) Sanitation;
(c) Lighting; and
(d) Ventilation and other environmental systems.
(2) The council shall also:
(a) Develop a written methodology for determining whether a
facility is in compliance with the minimum standards; and
(b) Make recommendations regarding:
(i) An inspection mechanism that could be used by a certifying body
to determine whether a facility is in compliance with the minimum
standards; and
(ii) Other methods through which the minimum standards could be
implemented on a statewide basis.
(3) The council shall report the minimum standards, the
methodology, and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the legislature no later than December 1, 2011.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.103.040 and 1995 c 398 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The council shall consist of ((twelve)) thirteen members who shall
be selected as follows: One county coroner; one county prosecutor; one
county prosecutor who also serves as ex officio county coroner; one
county medical examiner from a county with a population of over six
hundred thousand; one county medical examiner from a county with a
population of under five hundred thousand; one county sheriff; one
chief of police; the chief of the state patrol; two members of a county
legislative authority; one pathologist who is currently in private
practice; and two members of a city legislative authority.
The governor shall appoint members to the council from among the
nominees submitted for each position as follows: The Washington
association of county officials shall submit two nominees each for the
coroner position and the medical examiner positions; the Washington
state association of counties shall submit two nominees each for the
two county legislative authority positions; the association of
Washington cities shall submit two nominees each for the two city
legislative authority positions; the Washington association of
prosecuting attorneys shall submit two nominees each for the county
prosecutor-ex officio county coroner and for the county prosecutor
position; the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs
shall submit two nominees each for the county sheriff position and the
chief of police position; and the Washington association of
pathologists shall submit two nominees for the private pathologist
position.

--- END ---