BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.4282 and 1994 c 124 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax
amounts derived from bona fide (((1))) (a) initiation fees, (((2))) (b)
dues, (((3))) (c) contributions, (((4))) (d) donations, (((5))) (e)
tuition fees, (((6))) (f) charges made by a nonprofit trade or
professional organization for attending or occupying space at a trade
show, convention, or educational seminar sponsored by the nonprofit
trade or professional organization, which trade show, convention, or
educational seminar is not open to the general public, (((7))) (g)
charges made for operation of privately operated kindergartens, and
(((8))) (h) endowment funds. This section shall not be construed to
exempt any person, association, or society from tax liability upon
selling tangible personal property or upon providing facilities or
services for which a special charge is made to members or others. If
dues are in exchange for any significant amount of goods or services
rendered by the recipient thereof to members without any additional
charge to the member, or if the dues are graduated upon the amount of
goods or services rendered, the value of such goods or services shall
not be considered as a deduction under this section.
(2) A person may not claim a deduction provided in subsection
(1)(a) or (b) of this section unless the person is organized as a
nonprofit organization, association, or corporation under Title 24 RCW.

--- END ---