BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.130 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By November 15, 2010, the secretary shall, by rule, develop
criteria for approving pain management education programs for purposes
of section 2 of this act.
(2) Annually, beginning January 1, 2011, the secretary shall use
the criteria developed under subsection (1) of this section to publish
a list of approved pain management education programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.130 RCW
to read as follows:
A license holder who is authorized by law to prescribe a Schedule
II controlled substance shall complete one pain management education
program approved by the secretary under section 1 of this act as part
of his or her continuing education requirements. The license holder
shall complete the education program:
(1) Within twenty-four months of the effective date of this section
if the license holder was licensed prior to the effective date of this
section; or
(2) Prior to renewing his or her license if the license holder was
licensed on or after the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 2 of this act takes effect January
1, 2011.

--- END ---