BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.400.332 and 2009 c 224 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No school district employee may employ or use any person,
money, or property under the employee's official control or direction,
in his or her official custody, without authorization, for the private
benefit or gain of the employee or another.
(((2))) (a) This ((section)) subsection does not prohibit the use
of public resources to benefit others as part of the employee's
official duties.
(((3))) (b) Each school district board of directors may adopt
policies providing exceptions to this ((section)) subsection for
occasional use of the employee, of de minimis cost and value, if the
activity does not result in interference with the proper performance of
public duties.
(((4))) (2) No school district officer or employee may use or
authorize the use of public resources for the purpose of supporting or
opposing a teachers' strike.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
adopt disciplinary guidelines for violations of this section.

--- END ---