BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Indian tribe" means any federally recognized Indian tribe
whose traditional lands and territories included parts of Washington.
(2) "State agency" means an agency, department, office, or the
office of a statewide elected official, of the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 In establishing a government-to-government
relationship with Indian tribes, state agencies must:
(1) Make reasonable efforts to collaborate with Indian tribes in
the development of policies, agreements, and program implementation
that directly affect Indian tribes and develop a consultation process
that is used by the agency for issues involving specific Indian tribes;
(2) Designate a tribal liaison who reports directly to the head of
the state agency;
(3) Ensure that tribal liaisons who interact with Indian tribes and
the executive directors of state agencies receive training as described
in section 4 of this act; and
(4) Submit an annual report to the governor on activities of the
state agency involving Indian tribes and on implementation of this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The position of tribal liaison within a
state agency is responsible for:
(1) Assisting the state agency in developing and implementing state
and agency policies that promote effective communication and
collaboration between the state agency and tribal governments;
(2) Serving as a contact person with tribal governments and
maintaining communication between the state agency and affected tribal
governments; and
(3) Coordinating training of state agency employees in government-to-government relations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Training required under section 2 of this
act for state agency employees must include at a minimum:
(1) Effective communication and collaboration between state
agencies and Indian tribes;
(2) Cultural competency in providing effective services to tribal
governments and tribal members; and
(3) Use of training services such as those provided through the
governor's office of Indian affairs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) At least once a year, the governor and
other statewide elected officials shall meet with leaders of Indian
tribes to address issues of mutual concern.
(2) The governor must maintain for public reference an updated list
of the names and contact information for the individuals designated as
tribal liaisons and the names and contact information for tribal
leadership as submitted by an Indian tribe.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Nothing in this chapter creates a right of
action against a state agency or a right of review of an action by a
state agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---