BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 77.110.010 (Declaration) and 1985 c 1 s 1;
(2) RCW 77.110.020 (Petition to congress) and 1985 c 1 s 2;
(3) RCW 77.110.030 (Management of natural resources -- State policy)
and 1985 c 1 s 3;
(4) RCW 77.110.040 (Declaration -- Denial of rights based on race,
sex, origin, or cultural heritage) and 1985 c 1 s 4;
(5) RCW 77.110.900 (Transmittal of act to president and congress--1985 c 1) and 1985 c 1 s 5; and
(6) RCW 77.110.901 (Severability -- 1985 c 1) and 1985 c 1 s 6.

--- END ---