BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) In 2006, the governor's emergency medical services and trauma
care steering committee charged the emergency cardiac and stroke work
group with assessing the burden of acute coronary syndrome, otherwise
known as heart attack, cardiac arrest, and stroke and the care that
people receive for these acute cardiovascular events in Washington.
(b) The work group's report found that:
(i) Despite falling death rates, heart disease and stroke were
still the second and third leading causes of death in 2005. All
cardiovascular diseases accounted for thirty-four percent of deaths,
surpassing all other causes of death.
(ii) Cardiovascular diseases have a substantial social and economic
impact on individuals and families, as well as the state's health and
long-term care systems. Although many people who survive acute cardiac
and stroke events have significant physical and cognitive disability,
early evidence-based treatments can help more people return to their
productive lives.
(iii) Heart disease and stroke are among the most costly medical
conditions at nearly four billion dollars per year for hospitalization
and long-term care alone.
(iv) The age group at highest risk for heart disease or stroke,
people sixty-five and older, is projected to double by 2030,
potentially doubling the social and economic impact of heart disease
and stroke in Washington. Early recognition is important, as
Washington demographics indicate a significant occurrence of acute
coronary syndromes by the age of fifty-five.
(c) The assessment of emergency cardiac and stroke care found:
(i) Many cardiac and stroke patients are not receiving evidence-based treatments;
(ii) Access to diagnostic and treatment resources varies greatly,
especially for rural parts of the state;
(iii) Training, protocols, procedures, and resources in dispatch
services, emergency medical services, and hospitals vary significantly;
(iv) Cardiac mortality rates vary widely depending on hospital and
regional resources; and
(v) Advances in technology and streamlined approaches to care can
significantly improve emergency cardiac and stroke care, but many
people do not get the benefit of these treatments.
(d) Time is critical throughout the chain of survival, from
dispatch of emergency medical services, to transport, to the emergency
room, for emergency cardiac and stroke patients. The minutes after the
onset of heart attack, cardiac arrest, and stroke are as important as
the "golden hour" in trauma. When treatment is delayed, more brain or
heart tissue dies. Timely treatment can mean the difference between
returning to work or becoming permanently disabled, living at home, or
living in a nursing home. It can be the difference between life and
death. Ensuring most patients will get life saving care in time
requires preplanning and an organized system of care.
(e) Many other states have improved systems of care to respond to
and treat acute cardiac and stroke events, similar to improvements in
trauma care in Washington.
(f) Some areas of Washington have deployed local systems to respond
to and treat acute cardiac and stroke events.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to support efforts to
improve emergency cardiac and stroke care in Washington through an
evidence-based coordinated system of care.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.168.015 and 1990 c 269 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Cardiac" means acute coronary syndrome, an umbrella term used
to cover any group of clinical symptoms compatible with acute
myocardial ischemia, which is chest discomfort or other symptoms due to
insufficient blood supply to the heart muscle resulting from coronary
artery disease. "Cardiac" also includes out-of-hospital cardiac
arrest, which is the cessation of mechanical heart activity as assessed
by emergency medical services personnel, or other acute heart
conditions.
(2) "Communications system" means a radio and landline network
which provides rapid public access, coordinated central dispatching of
services, and coordination of personnel, equipment, and facilities in
an emergency medical services and trauma care system.
(((2))) (3) "Emergency medical service" means medical treatment and
care that may be rendered at the scene of any medical emergency or
while transporting any patient in an ambulance to an appropriate
medical facility, including ambulance transportation between medical
facilities.
(((3))) (4) "Emergency medical services medical program director"
means a person who is an approved program director as defined by RCW
18.71.205(4).
(((4))) (5) "Department" means the department of health.
(((5))) (6) "Designation" means a formal determination by the
department that hospitals or health care facilities are capable of
providing designated trauma care services as authorized in RCW
70.168.070.
(((6))) (7) "Designated trauma care service" means a level I, II,
III, IV, or V trauma care service or level I, II, or III pediatric
trauma care service or level I, I-pediatric, II, or III trauma-related
rehabilitative service.
(((7))) (8) "Emergency medical services and trauma care system
plan" means a statewide plan that identifies statewide emergency
medical services and trauma care objectives and priorities and
identifies equipment, facility, personnel, training, and other needs
required to create and maintain a statewide emergency medical services
and trauma care system. The plan also includes a plan of
implementation that identifies the state, regional, and local
activities that will create, operate, maintain, and enhance the system.
The plan is formulated by incorporating the regional emergency medical
services and trauma care plans required under this chapter. The plan
shall be updated every two years and shall be made available to the
state board of health in sufficient time to be considered in
preparation of the biennial state health report required in RCW
43.20.050.
(((8))) (9) "Emergency medical services and trauma care planning
and service regions" means geographic areas established by the
department under this chapter.
(((9))) (10) "Facility patient care protocols" means the written
procedures adopted by the medical staff that direct the care of the
patient. These procedures shall be based upon the assessment of the
patients' medical needs. The procedures shall follow minimum statewide
standards for trauma care services.
(((10))) (11) "Hospital" means a facility licensed under chapter
70.41 RCW, or comparable health care facility operated by the federal
government or located and licensed in another state.
(((11))) (12) "Level I pediatric trauma care services" means
pediatric trauma care services as established in RCW 70.168.060.
Hospitals providing level I services shall provide definitive,
comprehensive, specialized care for pediatric trauma patients and shall
also provide ongoing research and health care professional education in
pediatric trauma care.
(((12))) (13) "Level II pediatric trauma care services" means
pediatric trauma care services as established in RCW 70.168.060.
Hospitals providing level II services shall provide initial
stabilization and evaluation of pediatric trauma patients and provide
comprehensive general medicine and surgical care to pediatric patients
who can be maintained in a stable or improving condition without the
specialized care available in the level I hospital. Complex surgeries
and research and health care professional education in pediatric trauma
care activities are not required.
(((13))) (14) "Level III pediatric trauma care services" means
pediatric trauma care services as established in RCW 70.168.060.
Hospitals providing level III services shall provide initial evaluation
and stabilization of patients. The range of pediatric trauma care
services provided in level III hospitals are not as comprehensive as
level I and II hospitals.
(((14))) (15) "Level I rehabilitative services" means
rehabilitative services as established in RCW 70.168.060. Facilities
providing level I rehabilitative services provide rehabilitative
treatment to patients with traumatic brain injuries, spinal cord
injuries, complicated amputations, and other diagnoses resulting in
functional impairment, with moderate to severe impairment or
complexity. These facilities serve as referral facilities for
facilities authorized to provide level II and III rehabilitative
services.
(((15))) (16) "Level I-pediatric rehabilitative services" means
rehabilitative services as established in RCW 70.168.060. Facilities
providing level I-pediatric rehabilitative services provide the same
services as facilities authorized to provide level I rehabilitative
services except these services are exclusively for children under the
age of fifteen years.
(((16))) (17) "Level II rehabilitative services" means
rehabilitative services as established in RCW 70.168.060. Facilities
providing level II rehabilitative services treat individuals with
musculoskeletal trauma, peripheral nerve lesions, lower extremity
amputations, and other diagnoses resulting in functional impairment in
more than one functional area, with moderate to severe impairment or
complexity.
(((17))) (18) "Level III rehabilitative services" means
rehabilitative services as established in RCW 70.168.060. Facilities
providing level III rehabilitative services provide treatment to
individuals with musculoskeletal injuries, peripheral nerve injuries,
uncomplicated lower extremity amputations, and other diagnoses
resulting in functional impairment in more than one functional area but
with minimal to moderate impairment or complexity.
(((18))) (19) "Level I trauma care services" means trauma care
services as established in RCW 70.168.060. Hospitals providing level
I services shall have specialized trauma care teams and provide ongoing
research and health care professional education in trauma care.
(((19))) (20) "Level II trauma care services" means trauma care
services as established in RCW 70.168.060. Hospitals providing level
II services shall be similar to those provided by level I hospitals,
although complex surgeries and research and health care professional
education activities are not required to be provided.
(((20))) (21) "Level III trauma care services" means trauma care
services as established in RCW 70.168.060. The range of trauma care
services provided by level III hospitals are not as comprehensive as
level I and II hospitals.
(((21))) (22) "Level IV trauma care services" means trauma care
services as established in RCW 70.168.060.
(((22))) (23) "Level V trauma care services" means trauma care
services as established in RCW 70.168.060. Facilities providing level
V services shall provide stabilization and transfer of all patients
with potentially life-threatening injuries.
(((23))) (24) "Patient care procedures" means written operating
guidelines adopted by the regional emergency medical services and
trauma care council, in consultation with local emergency medical
services and trauma care councils, emergency communication centers, and
the emergency medical services medical program director, in accordance
with minimum statewide standards. The patient care procedures shall
identify the level of medical care personnel to be dispatched to an
emergency scene, procedures for triage of patients, the level of trauma
care facility to first receive the patient, and the name and location
of other trauma care facilities to receive the patient should an
interfacility transfer be necessary. Procedures on interfacility
transfer of patients shall be consistent with the transfer procedures
required in chapter 70.170 RCW.
(((24))) (25) "Pediatric trauma patient" means trauma patients
known or estimated to be less than fifteen years of age.
(((25))) (26) "Prehospital" means emergency medical care or
transportation rendered to patients prior to hospital admission or
during interfacility transfer by licensed ambulance or aid service
under chapter 18.73 RCW, by personnel certified to provide emergency
medical care under chapters 18.71 and 18.73 RCW, or by facilities
providing level V trauma care services as provided for in this chapter.
(((26))) (27) "Prehospital patient care protocols" means the
written procedures adopted by the emergency medical services medical
program director that direct the out-of-hospital emergency care of the
emergency patient which includes the trauma patient. These procedures
shall be based upon the assessment of the patients' medical needs and
the treatment to be provided for serious conditions. The procedures
shall meet or exceed statewide minimum standards for trauma and other
prehospital care services.
(((27))) (28) "Rehabilitative services" means a formal program of
multidisciplinary, coordinated, and integrated services for evaluation,
treatment, education, and training to help individuals with disabling
impairments achieve and maintain optimal functional independence in
physical, psychosocial, social, vocational, and avocational realms.
Rehabilitation is indicated for the trauma patient who has sustained
neurologic or musculoskeletal injury and who needs physical or
cognitive intervention to return to home, work, or society.
(((28))) (29) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of
health.
(((29))) (30) "Trauma" means a major single or multisystem injury
requiring immediate medical or surgical intervention or treatment to
prevent death or permanent disability.
(((30))) (31) "Trauma care system" means an organized approach to
providing care to trauma patients that provides personnel, facilities,
and equipment for effective and coordinated trauma care. The trauma
care system shall: Identify facilities with specific capabilities to
provide care, triage trauma victims at the scene, and require that all
trauma victims be sent to an appropriate trauma facility. The trauma
care system includes prevention, prehospital care, hospital care, and
rehabilitation.
(((31))) (32) "Triage" means the sorting of patients in terms of
disposition, destination, or priority. Triage of prehospital trauma
victims requires identifying injury severity so that the appropriate
care level can be readily assessed according to patient care
guidelines.
(((32))) (33) "Verification" means the identification of
prehospital providers who are capable of providing verified trauma care
services and shall be a part of the licensure process required in
chapter 18.73 RCW.
(((33))) (34) "Verified trauma care service" means prehospital
service as provided for in RCW 70.168.080, and identified in the
regional emergency medical services and trauma care plan as required by
RCW 70.168.100.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.168 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By January 1, 2011, the department shall endeavor to enhance
and support an emergency cardiac and stroke care system through:
(a) Encouraging hospitals to voluntarily self-identify cardiac and
stroke capabilities, indicating which level of cardiac and stroke
service the facility provides. Hospital levels must be defined by the
previous work of the emergency cardiac and stroke technical advisory
committee and must follow the guiding principles and recommendations of
the emergency cardiac and stroke work group report;
(b) Giving a hospital "deemed status" and designating it as a
primary stroke center if it has received a certification of distinction
for primary stroke centers issued by the nonprofit organization known
as the joint commission. When available, a hospital shall demonstrate
its cardiac or stroke level through external, national certifying
organizations, including, but not limited to, primary stroke center
certification by the joint commission; and
(c) Within the current authority of the department, adopting
cardiac and stroke prehospital patient care protocols, patient care
procedures, and triage tools, consistent with the guiding principles
and recommendations of the emergency cardiac and stroke work group
report.
(2) A hospital that voluntarily participates in the system:
(a) Shall participate in internal, as well as regional, quality
improvement activities;
(b) Shall participate in a national, state, or local data
collection system that measures cardiac and stroke system performance
from patient onset of symptoms to treatment or intervention, and
includes, at a minimum, the nationally recognized consensus measures
for stroke; and
(c) May advertise participation in the system, but may not claim a
verified certification level unless verified by an external, nationally
recognized, evidence-based certifying body as provided in subsection
(1)(b) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.168 RCW
to read as follows:
By December 1, 2012, the department shall share with the
legislature the department's report, which was funded by the centers
for disease control and prevention, concerning emergency cardiac and
stroke care.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.168.090 and 2005 c 274 s 344 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By July 1991, the department shall establish a statewide data
registry to collect and analyze data on the incidence, severity, and
causes of trauma, including traumatic brain injury. The department
shall collect additional data on traumatic brain injury should
additional data requirements be enacted by the legislature. The
registry shall be used to improve the availability and delivery of
prehospital and hospital trauma care services. Specific data elements
of the registry shall be defined by rule by the department. To the
extent possible, the department shall coordinate data collection from
hospitals for the trauma registry with the health care data system
authorized in chapter 70.170 RCW. Every hospital, facility, or health
care provider authorized to provide level I, II, III, IV, or V trauma
care services, level I, II, or III pediatric trauma care services,
level I, level I-pediatric, II, or III trauma-related rehabilitative
services, and prehospital trauma-related services in the state shall
furnish data to the registry. All other hospitals and prehospital
providers shall furnish trauma data as required by the department by
rule.
The department may respond to requests for data and other
information from the registry for special studies and analysis
consistent with requirements for confidentiality of patient and quality
assurance records. The department may require requestors to pay any or
all of the reasonable costs associated with such requests that might be
approved.
(2) ((By January 1994,)) In each emergency medical services and
trauma care planning and service region, a regional emergency medical
services and trauma care systems quality assurance program shall be
established by those facilities authorized to provide levels I, II, and
III trauma care services. The systems quality assurance program shall
evaluate trauma care delivery, patient care outcomes, and compliance
with the requirements of this chapter. The systems quality assurance
program may also evaluate emergency cardiac and stroke care delivery.
The emergency medical services medical program director and all other
health care providers and facilities who provide trauma and emergency
cardiac and stroke care services within the region shall be invited to
participate in the regional emergency medical services and trauma care
quality assurance program.
(3) Data elements related to the identification of individual
patient's, provider's and facility's care outcomes shall be
confidential, shall be exempt from RCW 42.56.030 through 42.56.570 and
42.17.350 through 42.17.450, and shall not be subject to discovery by
subpoena or admissible as evidence.
(4) Patient care quality assurance proceedings, records, and
reports developed pursuant to this section are confidential, exempt
from chapter 42.56 RCW, and are not subject to discovery by subpoena or
admissible as evidence. In any civil action, except, after in camera
review, pursuant to a court order which provides for the protection of
sensitive information of interested parties including the department:
(a) In actions arising out of the department's designation of a
hospital or health care facility pursuant to RCW 70.168.070; (b) in
actions arising out of the department's revocation or suspension of
designation status of a hospital or health care facility under RCW
70.168.070; or (c) in actions arising out of the restriction or
revocation of the clinical or staff privileges of a health care
provider as defined in RCW 7.70.020 (1) and (2), subject to any further
restrictions on disclosure in RCW 4.24.250 that may apply. Information
that identifies individual patients shall not be publicly disclosed
without the patient's consent.

Sec. 6 RCW 42.56.360 and 2009 c 1 s 24 (Initiative Measure No.
1000) and 2008 c 136 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) The following health care information is exempt from disclosure
under this chapter:
(a) Information obtained by the board of pharmacy as provided in
RCW 69.45.090;
(b) Information obtained by the board of pharmacy or the department
of health and its representatives as provided in RCW 69.41.044,
69.41.280, and 18.64.420;
(c) Information and documents created specifically for, and
collected and maintained by a quality improvement committee under RCW
43.70.510, 70.230.080, or 70.41.200, or by a peer review committee
under RCW 4.24.250, or by a quality assurance committee pursuant to RCW
74.42.640 or 18.20.390, or by a hospital, as defined in RCW 43.70.056,
for reporting of health care-associated infections under RCW 43.70.056,
a notification of an incident under RCW 70.56.040(5), and reports
regarding adverse events under RCW 70.56.020(2)(b), regardless of which
agency is in possession of the information and documents;
(d)(i) Proprietary financial and commercial information that the
submitting entity, with review by the department of health,
specifically identifies at the time it is submitted and that is
provided to or obtained by the department of health in connection with
an application for, or the supervision of, an antitrust exemption
sought by the submitting entity under RCW 43.72.310;
(ii) If a request for such information is received, the submitting
entity must be notified of the request. Within ten business days of
receipt of the notice, the submitting entity shall provide a written
statement of the continuing need for confidentiality, which shall be
provided to the requester. Upon receipt of such notice, the department
of health shall continue to treat information designated under this
subsection (1)(d) as exempt from disclosure;
(iii) If the requester initiates an action to compel disclosure
under this chapter, the submitting entity must be joined as a party to
demonstrate the continuing need for confidentiality;
(e) Records of the entity obtained in an action under RCW 18.71.300
through 18.71.340;
(f) Except for published statistical compilations and reports
relating to the infant mortality review studies that do not identify
individual cases and sources of information, any records or documents
obtained, prepared, or maintained by the local health department for
the purposes of an infant mortality review conducted by the department
of health under RCW 70.05.170;
(g) Complaints filed under chapter 18.130 RCW after July 27, 1997,
to the extent provided in RCW 18.130.095(1);
(h) Information obtained by the department of health under chapter
70.225 RCW; ((and))
(i) Information collected by the department of health under chapter
70.245 RCW except as provided in RCW 70.245.150; and
(j) Cardiac and stroke system performance data submitted to
national, state, or local data collection systems under section 3(2)(b)
of this act.
(2) Chapter 70.02 RCW applies to public inspection and copying of
health care information of patients.

--- END ---