BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29A.72 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any
person who is gathering signatures for an initiative measure or
referendum filed with the secretary of state is prohibited within a
presumptively reasonable minimum distance of fifteen feet from
entrances and exits that serve stand alone stores or retail stores that
are located in commercial retail complexes.
(2) The property owner of a stand alone store or retail store
located in a commercial retail complex may grant a person who is
gathering signatures for an initiative measure or referendum filed with
the secretary of state permission to be closer than fifteen feet from
entrances and exits.

--- END ---