BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.08.140 and 2009 c 369 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In order to vote in any primary, special election, or general
election, a person who is not registered to vote in Washington must:
(a) Submit a registration application no later than twenty-nine
days before the day of the primary, special election, or general
election; or
(b) Register in person at the county auditor's office in his or her
county of residence no later than eight days before the day of the
primary, special election, or general election. A person registering
under this subsection will be issued an absentee ballot.
(2) A person who is already registered to vote in Washington may
update his or her registration no later than twenty-nine days before
the day of the primary, special election, or general election to be in
effect for that primary, special election, or general election. A
registered voter who fails to transfer his or her residential address
by this deadline may vote according to his or her previous registration
address.
(((3) Prior to each primary and general election, the county
auditor shall give notice of the registration deadlines by one
publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county at
least thirty-five days before the primary or general election.))

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.32.260 and 2003 c 111 s 818 are each amended to
read as follows:
As soon as practicable before the primary, special election, or
general election, the county auditor, or if applicable, the city clerk
of a first-class or code city, as appropriate, shall mail the local
voters' pamphlet to every residence in each jurisdiction that has
included information in the pamphlet. The county auditor or city
clerk, as appropriate, may choose to mail the pamphlet to each
registered voter in each jurisdiction that has included information in
the pamphlet, if in his or her judgment, a more economical and
effective distribution of the pamphlet would result. ((If the county
or city chooses to mail the pamphlet to each residence, no notice of
election otherwise required by RCW 29A.52.350 need be published.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 29A.52 RCW
to read as follows:
Notice for any state, county, district, or municipal primary or
election, whether special or general, must be given not more than
fifteen nor less than five days prior to the date of closing of the
registration roles to online or mail-in registrations by the county
auditor or the officer conducting the election as the case may be.
Notice must be published in one or more newspapers of general
circulation and must contain, at a minimum, the last date to register
online or through the mail, the last date to transfer or update an
existing registration, the last date to register in-person for first
time voters, information on where a person can register, the type of
election, the date of the election, whether the election will be
conducted entirely by mail or with polling places, a list of all
jurisdictions involved in the election including positions and short
titles for ballot measures appearing on the ballot, and the times and
dates of any public meetings associated with the election. The notice
shall also include where additional information regarding the election
may be obtained. This is the only notice required for a state, county,
district, or municipal primary or special or general election. If the
county or city chooses to mail a local voters' pamphlet as described in
RCW 29A.32.210 to each residence, the notice required in this section
need only include the last date to register online or through the mail,
the last date to transfer or update an existing registration, the last
date to register in-person for first time voters, information on where
a person can register, and the times and dates of any public meetings
associated with the election.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 29A.52.311 (Notice of primary) and 2004 c 271 s 145; and
(2) RCW 29A.52.351 (Notice of election) and 2004 c 271 s 175.

--- END ---