BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 81.77.040 and 2007 c 234 s 66 are each amended to read
as follows:
A solid waste collection company shall not operate for the hauling
of solid waste for compensation without first having obtained from the
commission a certificate declaring that public convenience and
necessity require such operation. Operating for the hauling of solid
waste for compensation includes advertising, soliciting, offering, or
entering into an agreement to provide that service. To operate a solid
waste collection company in the unincorporated areas of a county, the
company must comply with the solid waste management plan prepared under
chapter 70.95 RCW in the company's franchise area.
Issuance of the certificate of necessity must be determined on, but
not limited to, the following factors: The present service and the
cost thereof for the contemplated area to be served; an estimate of the
cost of the facilities to be utilized in the plant for solid waste
collection and disposal, set out in an affidavit or declaration; a
statement of the assets on hand of the person, firm, association, or
corporation that will be expended on the purported plant for solid
waste collection and disposal, set out in an affidavit or declaration;
a statement of prior experience, if any, in such field by the
petitioner, set out in an affidavit or declaration; and sentiment in
the community contemplated to be served as to the necessity for such a
service.
When an applicant requests a certificate to operate in a territory
already served by a certificate holder under this chapter, the
commission may, after notice and an opportunity for a hearing, issue
the certificate only if the existing solid waste collection company or
companies serving the territory will not provide service to the
satisfaction of the commission or if the existing solid waste
collection company does not object.
In all other cases, the commission may, with or without hearing,
issue certificates, or for good cause shown refuse to issue them, or
issue them for the partial exercise only of the privilege sought, and
may attach to the exercise of the rights granted such terms and
conditions as, in its judgment, the public convenience and necessity
may require.
Any right, privilege, certificate held, owned, or obtained by a
solid waste collection company may be sold, assigned, leased,
transferred, or inherited as other property, only if authorized by the
commission.
For purposes of issuing certificates under this chapter, the
commission may adopt categories of solid wastes as follows: Garbage,
refuse, recyclable materials, and demolition debris. A certificate may
be issued for one or more categories of solid waste. Certificates
issued on or before July 23, 1989, shall not be expanded or restricted
by operation of this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 81.77.090 and 1961 c 295 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every person who violates or fails to comply with, or who
procures, aids, or abets in the violation of any provisions of this
chapter, or who fails to obey, or comply with any order, decision,
rule, regulation, direction, demand, or requirement of the commission,
or any part or provision thereof, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(2) Each advertisement reproduced, broadcast, or displayed via a
particular medium constitutes a separate violation under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---