BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.36A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created the board of naturopathy consisting of
seven members appointed by the governor to four-year terms. The
governor shall consider naturopathic members who are recommended for
appointment by the appropriate professional associations in the state.
Five members of the board shall be persons licensed under this chapter
and two shall be members of the public. No member may serve more than
two consecutive full terms. Members hold office until their successors
are appointed. The governor may appoint the initial members of the
board to staggered terms from one to four years. Thereafter, all
members shall be appointed to full four-year terms.
(2) The public members of the board may not (a) be a member of any
other health care licensing board or commission, (b) have a fiduciary
obligation to a facility rendering services regulated under this
chapter, or (c) have a material or financial interest in the rendering
of services regulated under this chapter.
(3) The board shall meet at least twice each year and may hold
additional meetings as called by the chair. The board shall elect
officers each year. Meetings of the board are open to the public,
except that the board may hold executive sessions to the extent
permitted by chapter 42.30 RCW. The department shall provide
secretarial, clerical, and other assistance as required by the board.
(4) Each member of the board shall be compensated in accordance
with RCW 43.03.265. Members shall be reimbursed for travel expenses
incurred in the actual performance of their duties, as provided in RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(5) A majority of the board members appointed and serving
constitutes a quorum for the transaction of board business. The
affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the board is required to
carry a motion or resolution, to adopt a rule, or to pass a measure.
(6) The board may appoint members to panels of at least three
members. A quorum for transaction of any business by a panel is a
minimum of three members. A majority vote of a quorum of the panel is
required to transact business delegated to it by the board.
(7) The board may adopt such rules as are consistent with this
chapter, as may be deemed necessary and proper to carry out the
purposes of this chapter.
(8) The governor may remove a member of the board for neglect of
duty, misconduct, or malfeasance or misfeasance in office, or upon
written request of two-thirds of the physicians licensed under this
chapter and in active practice in the state. Whenever the governor is
satisfied that a member of the board has been guilty of neglect of
duty, misconduct, or malfeasance or misfeasance in office, he or she
shall file with the secretary of state a statement of the cause for and
the order of removal from office, and the secretary shall forthwith
send a certified copy of the order of removal and statement of causes
by certified mail to the last known post office address of the member.
If a vacancy occurs on the board, the governor shall appoint a
replacement to fill the remainder of the unexpired term.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.36A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to any other authority provided by law, the board
shall:
(a) Adopt rules, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, necessary to
implement this chapter;
(b) Determine the minimum education and experience requirements for
licensure in conformance with RCW 18.36A.090, including but not limited
to approval of educational programs;
(c) Prepare and administer, or approve the preparation and
administration of, examinations for licensure;
(d) Establish by rule the procedures for an appeal of examination
failure;
(e) Determine whether alternative methods of training are
equivalent to formal education, and establish forms, procedures, and
criteria for evaluation of an applicant's equivalent alternative
training to determine the applicant's eligibility to take the
examination; and
(f) Adopt rules implementing a continuing competency program.
(2) The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs
unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses, and the
discipline of licensees under this chapter. The board shall be the
disciplining authority under this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.36A.020 and 2005 c 158 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Department" means the department of health.
(2) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.
(3) "Naturopath" means an individual licensed under this chapter.
(4) (("Committee" means the Washington state naturopathic practice
advisory committee.)) "Board" means the board of naturopathy.
(5) "Educational program" means an accredited program preparing
persons for the practice of naturopathic medicine.
(6) "Nutrition and food science" means the prevention and treatment
of disease or other human conditions through the use of foods, water,
herbs, roots, bark, or natural food elements.
(7) "Manual manipulation" or "mechanotherapy" means manipulation of
a part or the whole of the body by hand or by mechanical means.
(8) "Physical modalities" means use of physical, chemical,
electrical, and other noninvasive modalities, including but not limited
to heat, cold, air, light, water in any of its forms, sound, massage,
and therapeutic exercise.
(9) "Homeopathy" means a system of medicine based on the use of
infinitesimal doses of medicines capable of producing symptoms similar
to those of the disease treated, as listed in the homeopathic
pharmacopeia of the United States.
(10) "Naturopathic medicines" means vitamins; minerals; botanical
medicines; homeopathic medicines; hormones; and those legend drugs and
controlled substances consistent with naturopathic medical practice in
accordance with rules established by the ((secretary)) board.
Controlled substances are limited to codeine and testosterone products
that are contained in Schedules III, IV, and V in chapter 69.50 RCW.
(11) "Hygiene and immunization" means the use of such preventative
techniques as personal hygiene, asepsis, public health, and
immunizations, to the extent allowed by rule.
(12) "Minor office procedures" means care and procedures incident
thereto of superficial lacerations, lesions, and abrasions, and the
removal of foreign bodies located in superficial structures, not to
include the eye; and the use of antiseptics and topical or local
anesthetics in connection therewith. "Minor office procedures" also
includes intramuscular, intravenous, subcutaneous, and intradermal
injections of substances consistent with the practice of naturopathic
medicine and in accordance with rules established by the ((secretary))
board.
(13) "Common diagnostic procedures" means the use of venipuncture
consistent with the practice of naturopathic medicine, commonly used
diagnostic modalities consistent with naturopathic practice, health
history taking, physical examination, radiography, examination of body
orifices excluding endoscopy, laboratory medicine, and obtaining
samples of human tissues, but excluding incision or excision beyond
that which is authorized as a minor office procedure.
(14) "Suggestion" means techniques including but not limited to
counseling, biofeedback, and hypnosis.
(15) "Radiography" means the ordering, but not the interpretation,
of radiographic diagnostic and other imaging studies and the taking and
interpretation of standard radiographs.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.36A.060 and 1991 c 3 s 91 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) In addition to any other authority provided by law, the
secretary may:
(((a) Adopt rules, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, necessary
to implement this chapter;
(b))) (1) Set all license, examination, and renewal fees in
accordance with RCW 43.70.250;
(((c))) (2) Establish forms and procedures necessary to administer
this chapter;
(((d) Determine the minimum education and experience requirements
for licensure in conformance with RCW 18.36A.090, including but not
limited to approval of educational programs;
(e) Prepare and administer or approve the preparation and
administration of examinations for licensure;
(f))) (3) Issue a license to any applicant who has met the
education, training, and examination requirements for licensure and
deny a license to applicants who do not meet the minimum qualifications
for licensure; except that denial of licenses based on unprofessional
conduct or impaired practice shall be governed by the uniform
disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW;
(((g))) (4) Hire clerical, administrative, and investigative staff
as needed to implement and administer this chapter and to hire
individuals, including those licensed under this chapter, to serve as
examiners or consultants as necessary to implement and administer this
chapter;
(((h))) (5) Maintain the official department record of all
applicants and licensees; and
(((i) Determine whether alternative methods of training are
equivalent to formal education, and establish forms, procedures, and
criteria for evaluation of an applicant's equivalent alternative
training to determine the applicant's eligibility to take the
examination;
(j) Establish by rule the procedures for an appeal of examination
failure;
(k))) (6) Conduct a hearing on an appeal of a denial of a license
based on the applicant's failure to meet the minimum qualifications for
licensure. The hearing shall be conducted pursuant to chapter 34.05
RCW((; and
(l) Adopt rules implementing a continuing competency program.
(2) The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs
unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses and the
discipline of licensees under this chapter. The secretary shall be the
disciplining authority under this chapter)).

Sec. 5 RCW 18.36A.080 and 1991 c 3 s 93 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary, members of the ((committee)) board, or individuals
acting on their behalf, are immune from suit in any civil action based
on any act performed in the course of their duties.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.36A.090 and 1991 c 3 s 94 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall issue a license to any applicant who meets the
following requirements:
(1) Successful completion of an educational program approved by the
((secretary)) board, the minimum standard of which shall be the
successful completion of a doctorate degree program in naturopathy
which includes a minimum of two hundred post-graduate hours in the
study of mechanotherapy from an approved educational program, or
successful completion of equivalent alternate training that meets the
criteria established by the ((secretary)) board. The requirement for
two hundred post-graduate hours in the study of mechanotherapy shall
expire June 30, 1989;
(2) Successful completion of any equivalent experience requirement
established by the ((secretary)) board;
(3) Successful completion of an examination administered or
approved by the ((secretary)) board;
(4) Good moral character; and
(5) Not having engaged in unprofessional conduct or being unable to
practice with reasonable skill and safety as a result of a physical or
mental impairment.
The ((secretary)) board shall establish what constitutes adequate
proof of meeting the above requirements. Any person holding a valid
license to practice drugless therapeutics under chapter 18.36 RCW upon
January 1, 1988, shall be deemed licensed pursuant to this chapter.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.36A.100 and 1991 c 3 s 95 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ((secretary)) board shall establish by rule the standards
for approval of educational programs and alternate training and may
contract with individuals or organizations having expertise in the
profession and/or in education to report to the ((secretary)) board the
information necessary for the ((secretary)) board to evaluate the
educational programs. The standards for approval shall be based on the
minimal competencies necessary for safe practice. The standards and
procedures for approval shall apply equally to educational programs and
equivalent alternate training within the United States and those in
foreign jurisdictions. ((The secretary may establish a fee for
educational program evaluation. The fee shall be determined by the))
(2) Each educational program requesting approval shall pay all
administrative costs for the educational program evaluation, including,
but not limited to, costs for site evaluation.

Sec. 8 RCW 18.36A.110 and 1991 c 3 s 96 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The date and location of the examination shall be established
by the ((secretary)) board. Applicants who have been found to meet the
education and experience requirements for licensure shall be scheduled
for the next examination following the filing of the application. The
((secretary)) board shall establish by rule the examination application
deadline.
(2) The examination shall contain subjects appropriate to the
standards of competency and scope of practice.
(3) The ((secretary)) board shall establish by rule the
requirements for a reexamination if the applicant has failed the
examination.
(4) The ((committee)) board may ((recommend to the secretary))
approve an examination prepared or administered, or both, by a private
testing agency or association of licensing boards.

Sec. 9 RCW 18.36A.120 and 1991 c 3 s 97 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((secretary)) board shall establish by rule the standards for
licensure of applicants licensed in another jurisdiction. However, the
standards for reciprocity of licensure shall not be less than required
for licensure in the state of Washington.

Sec. 10 RCW 18.130.040 and 2009 c 302 s 14, 2009 c 301 s 8, and
2009 c 52 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) This chapter applies only to the secretary and the boards and
commissions having jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed
under the chapters specified in this section. This chapter does not
apply to any business or profession not licensed under the chapters
specified in this section.
(2)(a) The secretary has authority under this chapter in relation
to the following professions:
(i) Dispensing opticians licensed and designated apprentices under
chapter 18.34 RCW;
(ii) ((Naturopaths licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW;
(iii))) Midwives licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW;
(((iv))) (iii) Ocularists licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;
(((v))) (iv) Massage operators and businesses licensed under
chapter 18.108 RCW;
(((vi))) (v) Dental hygienists licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;
(((vii))) (vi) Acupuncturists licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW;
(((viii))) (vii) Radiologic technologists certified and X-ray
technicians registered under chapter 18.84 RCW;
(((ix))) (viii) Respiratory care practitioners licensed under
chapter 18.89 RCW;
(((x))) (ix) Hypnotherapists and agency affiliated counselors
registered and advisors and counselors certified under chapter 18.19
RCW;
(((xi))) (x) Persons licensed as mental health counselors, mental
health counselor associates, marriage and family therapists, marriage
and family therapist associates, social workers, social work
associates -- advanced, and social work associates -- independent clinical
under chapter 18.225 RCW;
(((xii))) (xi) Persons registered as nursing pool operators under
chapter 18.52C RCW;
(((xiii))) (xii) Nursing assistants registered or certified under
chapter 18.88A RCW;
(((xiv))) (xiii) Health care assistants certified under chapter
18.135 RCW;
(((xv))) (xiv) Dietitians and nutritionists certified under chapter
18.138 RCW;
(((xvi))) (xv) Chemical dependency professionals and chemical
dependency professional trainees certified under chapter 18.205 RCW;
(((xvii))) (xvi) Sex offender treatment providers and certified
affiliate sex offender treatment providers certified under chapter
18.155 RCW;
(((xviii))) (xvii) Persons licensed and certified under chapter
18.73 RCW or RCW 18.71.205;
(((xix))) (xviii) Denturists licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW;
(((xx))) (xix) Orthotists and prosthetists licensed under chapter
18.200 RCW;
(((xxi))) (xx) Surgical technologists registered under chapter
18.215 RCW;
(((xxii))) (xxi) Recreational therapists;
(((xxiii))) (xxii) Animal massage practitioners certified under
chapter 18.240 RCW;
(((xxiv))) (xxiii) Athletic trainers licensed under chapter 18.250
RCW;
(((xxv))) (xxiv) Home care aides certified under chapter 18.88B
RCW;
(((xxvi))) (xxv) Speech-language pathology assistants certified
under chapter 18.35 RCW; and
(((xxvii))) (xxvi) Genetic counselors licensed under chapter 18.290
RCW.
(b) The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter
are as follows:
(i) The podiatric medical board as established in chapter 18.22
RCW;
(ii) The chiropractic quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.25 RCW;
(iii) The dental quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.32 RCW governing licenses issued under chapter 18.32 RCW and
licenses and registrations issued under chapter 18.260 RCW;
(iv) The board of hearing and speech as established in chapter
18.35 RCW;
(v) The board of examiners for nursing home administrators as
established in chapter 18.52 RCW;
(vi) The optometry board as established in chapter 18.54 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapter 18.53 RCW;
(vii) The board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as established
in chapter 18.57 RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.57 and
18.57A RCW;
(viii) The board of pharmacy as established in chapter 18.64 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW;
(ix) The medical quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.71 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW;
(x) The board of physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74
RCW;
(xi) The board of occupational therapy practice as established in
chapter 18.59 RCW;
(xii) The nursing care quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.79 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
that chapter;
(xiii) The examining board of psychology and its disciplinary
committee as established in chapter 18.83 RCW; ((and))
(xiv) The veterinary board of governors as established in chapter
18.92 RCW; and
(xv) The board of naturopathy as established in chapter 18.36A RCW.
(3) In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the
disciplining authority has the authority to grant or deny licenses.
The disciplining authority may also grant a license subject to
conditions.
(4) All disciplining authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure
substantially consistent application of this chapter, the Uniform
Disciplinary Act, among the disciplining authorities listed in
subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 RCW 18.36A.070 (Naturopathic advisory
committee) and 1991 c 3 s 92 & 1987 c 447 s 7 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Section 10 of this act takes effect August
1, 2010.

--- END ---