BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 38.40.060 and 2008 c 71 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every officer and employee of the state or of any county, city, or
other political subdivision thereof who is a member of the Washington
national guard or of the army, navy, air force, coast guard, or marine
corps reserve of the United States, or of any organized reserve or
armed forces of the United States shall be entitled to and shall be
granted military leave of absence from such employment for a period not
exceeding twenty-one days during each year beginning October 1st and
ending the following September 30th((. Such leave shall be granted))
in order that the person may report for ((active)) required military
duty, ((when called, or take part in active training duty in such
manner and at such time as he or she may be ordered to active duty or
active training duty)) training, or drills including those in the
national guard under Title 10 U.S.C., Title 32 U.S.C., or state active
status. Such military leave of absence shall be in addition to any
vacation or sick leave to which the officer or employee might otherwise
be entitled, and shall not involve any loss of efficiency rating,
privileges, or pay. During the period of military leave, the officer
or employee shall receive from the state, or the county, city, or other
political subdivision, his or her normal pay. The officer or employee
shall be charged military leave only for days that he or she is
scheduled to work for the state or the county, city, or other political
subdivision.

--- END ---