BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.36.090 and 2003 c 111 s 909 are each amended to
read as follows:
If any persons are dissatisfied with the ballot title for a local
ballot measure that was formulated by the city attorney or prosecuting
attorney preparing the same, they may at any time within ten days from
the ((time of the filing of the ballot title)) deadline for filing
ballot measures, not including Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays,
appeal to the superior court of the county where the question is to
appear on the ballot, by petition setting forth the measure, the ballot
title objected to, their objections to it, and praying for amendment of
it. ((The time of the filing of the ballot title, as used in this
section in determining the time for appeal, is the time the ballot
title is first filed with the county auditor.))
A copy of the petition on appeal together with a notice that an
appeal has been taken shall be served upon the county auditor and the
official preparing the ballot title. Upon the filing of the petition
on appeal, the court shall immediately, or at the time to which a
hearing may be adjourned by consent of the appellants, examine the
proposed measure, the ballot title filed, and the objections to it and
may hear arguments on it, and shall as soon as possible render its
decision and certify to and file with the county auditor a ballot title
that it determines will meet the requirements of this chapter. The
decision of the superior court is final, and the ballot title or
statement so certified will be the established ballot title. The
appeal must be heard without cost to either party.

--- END ---