BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
Any city or town that is considering a proposal to rezone private
property must ensure that, prior to the adoption of any rezone, notice
of the initial proposal is provided to the owners of the real property
for which the rezone would apply.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW
to read as follows:
Any city that is considering a proposal to rezone private property
must ensure that, prior to the adoption of any rezone, notice of the
initial proposal is provided to the owners of the real property for
which the rezone would apply.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 36.70 RCW
to read as follows:
Any county that is considering a proposal to rezone private
property must ensure that, prior to the adoption of any rezone, notice
of the initial proposal is provided to the owners of the real property
for which the rezone would apply.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
Any county, city, or town that is considering a proposal to rezone
private property must ensure that, prior to the adoption of any rezone,
notice of the initial proposal is provided to the owners of the real
property for which the rezone would apply.

--- END ---