BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.16.010 and 2009 c 535 s 1110 and 2009 c 469 s 701
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter, unless otherwise required by the
context:
(1) "Eligible renewable resource" means the same as the term is
defined under RCW 19.285.030.
(2) "Express business" means the business of carrying property for
public hire on the line of any common carrier operated in this state,
when such common carrier is not owned or leased by the person engaging
in such business.
(((2))) (3) "Fully unbundled renewable energy credit" means a
tradable certificate of proof of the nonpower attributes associated
with at least one megawatt-hour of electricity generated from an
eligible renewable resource, and the certificate is verified by a
renewable energy credit tracking system determined by the department of
commerce as required under chapter 19.285 RCW.
(4) "Gas distribution business" means the business of operating a
plant or system for the production or distribution for hire or sale of
gas, whether manufactured or natural.
(((3))) (5) "Gross income" means the value proceeding or accruing
from the performance of the particular public service or transportation
business involved, including operations incidental thereto, but without
any deduction on account of the cost of the commodity furnished or
sold, the cost of materials used, labor costs, interest, discount,
delivery costs, taxes, or any other expense whatsoever paid or accrued
and without any deduction on account of losses.
(((4))) (6) "Light and power business" means the business of
operating a plant or system for the generation, production or
distribution of electrical energy for hire or sale and/or for the
wheeling of electricity for others.
(((5))) (7) "Log transportation business" means the business of
transporting logs by truck, other than exclusively upon private roads.
(((6))) (8) "Motor transportation business" means the business
(except urban transportation business) of operating any motor propelled
vehicle by which persons or property of others are conveyed for hire,
and includes, but is not limited to, the operation of any motor
propelled vehicle as an auto transportation company (except urban
transportation business), common carrier, or contract carrier as
defined by RCW 81.68.010 and 81.80.010. However, "motor transportation
business" does not mean or include: (a) A log transportation business;
or (b) the transportation of logs or other forest products exclusively
upon private roads or private highways.
(((7))) (9)(a) "Public service business" means any of the
businesses defined in subsections (((1), (2), (4), (6), (8), (9), (10),
(12))) (2), (4), (6), (8), (10), (11), (13), (15), and (((13))) (16) of
this section or any business subject to control by the state, or having
the powers of eminent domain and the duties incident thereto, or any
business hereafter declared by the legislature to be of a public
service nature, except telephone business and low-level radioactive
waste site operating companies as redefined in RCW 81.04.010. It
includes, among others, without limiting the scope hereof: Airplane
transportation, boom, dock, ferry, pipe line, toll bridge, toll logging
road, water transportation and wharf businesses.
(b) The definitions in this subsection (((7))) (9)(b) apply
throughout this subsection (((7))) (9).
(i) "Competitive telephone service" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.04.065.
(ii) "Network telephone service" means the providing by any person
of access to a telephone network, telephone network switching service,
toll service, or coin telephone services, or the providing of
telephonic, video, data, or similar communication or transmission for
hire, via a telephone network, toll line or channel, cable, microwave,
or similar communication or transmission system. "Network telephone
service" includes the provision of transmission to and from the site of
an internet provider via a telephone network, toll line or channel,
cable, microwave, or similar communication or transmission system.
"Network telephone service" does not include the providing of
competitive telephone service, the providing of cable television
service, the providing of broadcast services by radio or television
stations, nor the provision of internet access as defined in RCW
82.04.297, including the reception of dial-in connection, provided at
the site of the internet service provider.
(iii) "Telephone business" means the business of providing network
telephone service. It includes cooperative or farmer line telephone
companies or associations operating an exchange.
(iv) "Telephone service" means competitive telephone service or
network telephone service, or both, as defined in (b)(i) and (ii) of
this subsection.
(((8))) (10) "Railroad business" means the business of operating
any railroad, by whatever power operated, for public use in the
conveyance of persons or property for hire. It shall not, however,
include any business herein defined as an urban transportation
business.
(((9))) (11) "Railroad car business" means the business of
operating stock cars, furniture cars, refrigerator cars, fruit cars,
poultry cars, tank cars, sleeping cars, parlor cars, buffet cars,
tourist cars, or any other kinds of cars used for transportation of
property or persons upon the line of any railroad operated in this
state when such railroad is not owned or leased by the person engaging
in such business.
(((10))) (12) "Renewable energy credits selling business" means the
business of selling fully unbundled renewable energy credits.
(13) "Telegraph business" means the business of affording
telegraphic communication for hire.
(((11))) (14) "Tugboat business" means the business of operating
tugboats, towboats, wharf boats or similar vessels in the towing or
pushing of vessels, barges or rafts for hire.
(((12))) (15) "Urban transportation business" means the business of
operating any vehicle for public use in the conveyance of persons or
property for hire, insofar as (a) operating entirely within the
corporate limits of any city or town, or within five miles of the
corporate limits thereof, or (b) operating entirely within and between
cities and towns whose corporate limits are not more than five miles
apart or within five miles of the corporate limits of either thereof.
Included herein, but without limiting the scope hereof, is the business
of operating passenger vehicles of every type and also the business of
operating cartage, pickup, or delivery services, including in such
services the collection and distribution of property arriving from or
destined to a point within or without the state, whether or not such
collection or distribution be made by the person performing a local or
interstate line-haul of such property.
(((13))) (16) "Water distribution business" means the business of
operating a plant or system for the distribution of water for hire or
sale.
(((14))) (17) The meaning attributed, in chapter 82.04 RCW, to the
term "tax year," "person," "value proceeding or accruing," "business,"
"engaging in business," "in this state," "within this state," "cash
discount" and "successor" shall apply equally in the provisions of this
chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.16.010 and 2009 c 535 s 1110 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter, unless otherwise required by the
context:
(1) "Eligible renewable resource" means the same as the term is
defined under RCW 19.285.030.
(2) "Express business" means the business of carrying property for
public hire on the line of any common carrier operated in this state,
when such common carrier is not owned or leased by the person engaging
in such business.
(((2))) (3) "Fully unbundled renewable energy credit" means a
tradable certificate of proof of the nonpower attributes associated
with at least one megawatt-hour of electricity generated from an
eligible renewable resource, and the certificate is verified by a
renewable energy credit tracking system determined by the department of
commerce as required under chapter 19.285 RCW.
(4) "Gas distribution business" means the business of operating a
plant or system for the production or distribution for hire or sale of
gas, whether manufactured or natural.
(((3))) (5) "Gross income" means the value proceeding or accruing
from the performance of the particular public service or transportation
business involved, including operations incidental thereto, but without
any deduction on account of the cost of the commodity furnished or
sold, the cost of materials used, labor costs, interest, discount,
delivery costs, taxes, or any other expense whatsoever paid or accrued
and without any deduction on account of losses.
(((4))) (6) "Light and power business" means the business of
operating a plant or system for the generation, production or
distribution of electrical energy for hire or sale and/or for the
wheeling of electricity for others.
(((5))) (7) "Motor transportation business" means the business
(except urban transportation business) of operating any motor propelled
vehicle by which persons or property of others are conveyed for hire,
and includes, but is not limited to, the operation of any motor
propelled vehicle as an auto transportation company (except urban
transportation business), common carrier, or contract carrier as
defined by RCW 81.68.010 and 81.80.010. However, "motor transportation
business" does not mean or include the transportation of logs or other
forest products exclusively upon private roads or private highways.
(((6))) (8)(a) "Public service business" means any of the
businesses defined in subsections (((1), (2), (4), (5), (7), (8), (9),
(11))) (2), (4), (6), (7), (9), (10), (11), (14), and (((12))) (15) of
this section or any business subject to control by the state, or having
the powers of eminent domain and the duties incident thereto, or any
business hereafter declared by the legislature to be of a public
service nature, except telephone business and low-level radioactive
waste site operating companies as redefined in RCW 81.04.010. It
includes, among others, without limiting the scope hereof: Airplane
transportation, boom, dock, ferry, pipe line, toll bridge, toll logging
road, water transportation and wharf businesses.
(b) The definitions in this subsection (((6))) (8)(b) apply
throughout this subsection (((6))) (8).
(i) "Competitive telephone service" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.04.065.
(ii) "Network telephone service" means the providing by any person
of access to a telephone network, telephone network switching service,
toll service, or coin telephone services, or the providing of
telephonic, video, data, or similar communication or transmission for
hire, via a telephone network, toll line or channel, cable, microwave,
or similar communication or transmission system. "Network telephone
service" includes the provision of transmission to and from the site of
an internet provider via a telephone network, toll line or channel,
cable, microwave, or similar communication or transmission system.
"Network telephone service" does not include the providing of
competitive telephone service, the providing of cable television
service, the providing of broadcast services by radio or television
stations, nor the provision of internet access as defined in RCW
82.04.297, including the reception of dial-in connection, provided at
the site of the internet service provider.
(iii) "Telephone business" means the business of providing network
telephone service. It includes cooperative or farmer line telephone
companies or associations operating an exchange.
(iv) "Telephone service" means competitive telephone service or
network telephone service, or both, as defined in (b)(i) and (ii) of
this subsection.
(((7))) (9) "Railroad business" means the business of operating any
railroad, by whatever power operated, for public use in the conveyance
of persons or property for hire. It shall not, however, include any
business herein defined as an urban transportation business.
(((8))) (10) "Railroad car business" means the business of
operating stock cars, furniture cars, refrigerator cars, fruit cars,
poultry cars, tank cars, sleeping cars, parlor cars, buffet cars,
tourist cars, or any other kinds of cars used for transportation of
property or persons upon the line of any railroad operated in this
state when such railroad is not owned or leased by the person engaging
in such business.
(((9))) (11) "Telegraph business" means the business of affording
telegraphic communication for hire.
(((10))) (12) "Renewable energy credits selling business" means the
business of selling fully unbundled renewable energy credits.
(13) "Tugboat business" means the business of operating tugboats,
towboats, wharf boats or similar vessels in the towing or pushing of
vessels, barges or rafts for hire.
(((11))) (14) "Urban transportation business" means the business of
operating any vehicle for public use in the conveyance of persons or
property for hire, insofar as (a) operating entirely within the
corporate limits of any city or town, or within five miles of the
corporate limits thereof, or (b) operating entirely within and between
cities and towns whose corporate limits are not more than five miles
apart or within five miles of the corporate limits of either thereof.
Included herein, but without limiting the scope hereof, is the business
of operating passenger vehicles of every type and also the business of
operating cartage, pickup, or delivery services, including in such
services the collection and distribution of property arriving from or
destined to a point within or without the state, whether or not such
collection or distribution be made by the person performing a local or
interstate line-haul of such property.
(((12))) (15) "Water distribution business" means the business of
operating a plant or system for the distribution of water for hire or
sale.
(((13))) (16) The meaning attributed, in chapter 82.04 RCW, to the
term "tax year," "person," "value proceeding or accruing," "business,"
"engaging in business," "in this state," "within this state," "cash
discount" and "successor" shall apply equally in the provisions of this
chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.16.020 and 2009 c 469 s 702 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is levied and there shall be collected from every person
a tax for the act or privilege of engaging within this state in any one
or more of the businesses herein mentioned. The tax shall be equal to
the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate set out after
the business, as follows:
(a) Express, sewerage collection, and telegraph businesses: Three
and six-tenths percent;
(b) Light and power business: Three and sixty-two one-hundredths
percent;
(c) Gas distribution business: Three and six-tenths percent;
(d) Urban transportation business: Six-tenths of one percent;
(e) Vessels under sixty-five feet in length, except tugboats,
operating upon the waters within the state: Six-tenths of one percent;
(f) Motor transportation, railroad, railroad car, and tugboat
businesses, and all public service businesses other than ones mentioned
above: One and eight-tenths of one percent;
(g) Water distribution business: Four and seven-tenths percent;
(h) Log transportation business: One and twenty-eight one-hundredths percent;
(i) Renewable energy credits selling business: Fifty percent.
(2) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW
82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) Twenty percent of the moneys collected under subsection (1) of
this section on water distribution businesses and sixty percent of the
moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section on sewerage
collection businesses shall be deposited in the public works assistance
account created in RCW 43.155.050.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.16.020 and 1996 c 150 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is levied and there shall be collected from every person
a tax for the act or privilege of engaging within this state in any one
or more of the businesses herein mentioned. The tax shall be equal to
the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate set out after
the business, as follows:
(a) Express, sewerage collection, and telegraph businesses: Three
and six-tenths percent;
(b) Light and power business: Three and sixty-two one-hundredths
percent;
(c) Gas distribution business: Three and six-tenths percent;
(d) Urban transportation business: Six-tenths of one percent;
(e) Vessels under sixty-five feet in length, except tugboats,
operating upon the waters within the state: Six-tenths of one percent;
(f) Motor transportation, railroad, railroad car, and tugboat
businesses, and all public service businesses other than ones mentioned
above: One and eight-tenths of one percent;
(g) Water distribution business: Four and seven-tenths percent;
(h) Renewable energy credits selling business: Fifty percent.
(2) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW
82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) Twenty percent of the moneys collected under subsection (1) of
this section on water distribution businesses and sixty percent of the
moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section on sewerage
collection businesses shall be deposited in the public works assistance
account created in RCW 43.155.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 and 3 of this act expire June 30,
2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 2 and 4 of this act take effect
June 30, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Except for sections 2 and 4 of this act,
this act takes effect January 1, 2011.

--- END ---