BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that it is in the
best interest of the state to support and enhance the critical economic
and environmental role that Washington's forest products industry plays
in the state. These roles not only provide a wide range of services
and goods both to Washingtonians and people around the world, but also
are vital to the well-being and lifestyle of the people of the state of
Washington.
(2) The legislature further finds that the state's forest practices
are sustainably managed according to some of the most stringent
riparian growing and harvest rules of any state in the nation or in the
world, and that the state of Washington has received fifty year
assurances from the federal government that the state's forest
practices satisfy the requirements of the federal endangered species
act for aquatic species. As part of their environmental stewardship,
forest landowners in Washington have repaired or removed nearly three
thousand fish passage barriers, returned nearly twenty-five hundred
miles of forest roads to their natural condition, and opened up nearly
fifteen hundred miles of riparian salmonid habitat.
(3) The legislature further finds that Washington's forests
naturally create habitat for fish and wildlife, clean water, and carbon
storage; all environmental benefits that are lost when land is
converted out of working forestry into another use. In recognition of
forestry's benefits, the international panel on climate change has
reported that a sustainable forest management strategy aimed at
maintaining or increasing forest carbon stocks, while producing an
annual sustained yield of timber, fiber, wood products, or energy from
the forest, will generate the largest sustained carbon mitigation
benefit.
(4) The legislature further finds that the forest products industry
is a seventeen billion dollar industry, making it Washington's second
largest manufacturing industry. The forest products industry alone
provides nearly forty-five thousand direct jobs and one hundred sixty-two thousand indirect jobs, many located in rural areas.
(5) The legislature further finds that working forests help
generate wealth through recreation and tourism, the retention and
creation of green jobs, and through the production of wood products and
energy; a finding supported by the United States secretary of
agriculture.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.330.310 and 2008 c 14 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature establishes a comprehensive green economy jobs
growth initiative based on the goal of, by 2020, increasing the number
of green economy jobs to twenty-five thousand from the eight thousand
four hundred green economy jobs the state had in 2004.
(2) The department, in consultation with the employment security
department, the state workforce training and education coordinating
board, the state board ((of [for])) for community and technical
colleges, and the higher education coordinating board, shall develop a
defined list of terms, consistent with current workforce and economic
development terms, associated with green economy industries and jobs.
(3)(a) The employment security department, in consultation with the
department, the state workforce training and education coordinating
board, the state board for community and technical colleges, the higher
education coordinating board, Washington State University small
business development center, and the Washington State University
extension energy program, shall conduct labor market research to
analyze the current labor market and projected job growth in the green
economy, the current and projected recruitment and skill requirement of
green economy industry employers, the wage and benefits ranges of jobs
within green economy industries, and the education and training
requirements of entry-level and incumbent workers in those industries.
(i) The employment security department shall conduct an analysis of
occupations in the forest products industry to determine key growth
factors, employment projections, and to define the education and skill
standards required for current and emerging green occupations.
(ii) The term "forest products industry" must be given a broad
interpretation when implementing this section and include, at a
minimum, businesses that grow, manage, harvest, transport, and process
forest, wood, and paper products.
(b) The University of Washington business and economic development
center shall: Analyze the current opportunities for and participation
in the green economy by minority and women-owned business enterprises
in Washington; identify existing barriers to their successful
participation in the green economy; and develop strategies with
specific policy recommendations to improve their successful
participation in the green economy. The research may be informed by
the research of the Puget Sound regional council prosperity
partnership, as well as other entities. The University of Washington
business and economic development center shall report to the
appropriate committees of the house of representatives and the senate
on their research, analysis, and recommendations by December 1, 2008.
(4) Based on the findings from subsection (3) of this section, the
employment security department, in consultation with the department and
taking into account the requirements and goals of chapter 14, Laws of
2008 and other state clean energy and energy efficiency policies, shall
propose which industries will be considered high-demand green
industries, based on current and projected job creation and their
strategic importance to the development of the state's green economy.
The employment security department and the department shall take into
account which jobs within green economy industries will be considered
high-wage occupations and occupations that are part of career pathways
to the same, based on family-sustaining wage and benefits ranges.
These designations, and the results of the employment security
department's broader labor market research, shall inform the planning
and strategic direction of the department, the state workforce training
and education coordinating board, the state board for community and
technical colleges, and the higher education coordinating board.
(5) The department shall identify emerging technologies and
innovations that are likely to contribute to advancements in the green
economy, including the activities in designated innovation partnership
zones established in RCW 43.330.270.
(6) The department, consistent with the priorities established by
the state economic development commission, shall:
(a) Develop targeting criteria for existing investments, and make
recommendations for new or expanded financial incentives and
comprehensive strategies, to recruit, retain, and expand green economy
industries and small businesses; and
(b) Make recommendations for new or expanded financial incentives
and comprehensive strategies to stimulate research and development of
green technology and innovation, including designating innovation
partnership zones linked to the green economy.
(7) For the purposes of this section, "target populations" means
(a) entry-level or incumbent workers in high-demand green industries
who are in, or are preparing for, high-wage occupations; (b) dislocated
workers in declining industries who may be retrained for high-wage
occupations in high-demand green industries; (c) dislocated
agriculture, timber, or energy sector workers who may be retrained for
high-wage occupations in high-demand green industries; (d) eligible
veterans or national guard members; (e) disadvantaged populations; or
(f) anyone eligible to participate in the state opportunity grant
program under RCW 28B.50.271.
(8) The legislature directs the state workforce training and
education coordinating board to create and pilot green industry skill
panels. These panels shall consist of business representatives from:
Industry sectors related to clean energy, including energy derived from
wood biomass, liquid biofuels, or bio-based products; labor unions
representing workers in those industries or labor affiliates
administering state-approved, joint apprenticeship programs or labor-
management partnership programs that train workers for these
industries((,)); state and local veterans agencies((,)); employer
associations((,)); educational institutions((, and)); local workforce
development councils within the region that the panels propose to
operate((,)); and other key stakeholders as determined by the
applicant. Any of these stakeholder organizations are eligible to
receive grants under this section and serve as the intermediary that
convenes and leads the panel. Panel applicants must provide labor
market and industry analysis that demonstrates high demand, or demand
of strategic importance to the development of the state's clean energy
economy as identified in this section, for high-wage occupations, or
occupations that are part of career pathways to the same, within the
relevant industry sector. The panel shall:
(a) Conduct labor market and industry analyses, in consultation
with the employment security department, and drawing on the findings of
its research when available;
(b) Plan strategies to meet the recruitment and training needs of
the industry and small businesses; and
(c) Leverage and align other public and private funding sources.
(9) The green industries jobs training account is created in the
state treasury. Moneys from the account must be utilized to supplement
the state opportunity grant program established under RCW 28B.50.271.
All receipts from appropriations directed to the account must be
deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used
only for the activities identified in this subsection. The state board
for community and technical colleges, in consultation with the state
workforce training and education coordinating board, informed by the
research of the employment security department and the strategies
developed in this section, may authorize expenditures from the account.
The state board for community and technical colleges must distribute
grants from the account on a competitive basis.
(a)(i) Allowable uses of these grant funds, which should be used
when other public or private funds are insufficient or unavailable, may
include:
(A) Curriculum development;
(B) Transitional jobs strategies for dislocated workers in
declining industries who may be retrained for high-wage occupations in
green industries;
(C) Workforce education to target populations; and
(D) Adult basic and remedial education as necessary linked to
occupation skills training.
(ii) Allowable uses of these grant funds do not include student
assistance and support services available through the state opportunity
grant program under RCW 28B.50.271.
(b) Applicants eligible to receive these grants may be any
organization or a partnership of organizations that has demonstrated
expertise in:
(i) Implementing effective education and training programs that
meet industry demand; and
(ii) Recruiting and supporting, to successful completion of those
training programs carried out under these grants, the target
populations of workers.
(c) In awarding grants from the green industries jobs training
account, the state board for community and technical colleges shall
give priority to applicants that demonstrate the ability to:
(i) Use labor market and industry analysis developed by the
employment security department and green industry skill panels in the
design and delivery of the relevant education and training program, and
otherwise utilize strategies developed by green industry ((skills
[skill])) skill panels;
(ii) Leverage and align existing public programs and resources and
private resources toward the goal of recruiting, supporting, educating,
and training target populations of workers;
(iii) Work collaboratively with other relevant stakeholders in the
regional economy;
(iv) Link adult basic and remedial education, where necessary, with
occupation skills training;
(v) Involve employers and, where applicable, labor unions in the
determination of relevant skills and competencies and, where relevant,
the validation of career pathways; and
(vi) Ensure that supportive services, where necessary, are
integrated with education and training and are delivered by
organizations with direct access to and experience with the targeted
population of workers.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.330.375 and 2009 c 536 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department and the workforce board, in consultation with
the leadership team, must:
(a) Coordinate efforts across the state to ensure that federal
training and education funds are captured and deployed in a focused and
effective manner in order to support green economy projects and
accomplish the goals of the evergreen jobs initiative;
(b) Accelerate and coordinate efforts by state and local
organizations to identify, apply for, and secure all sources of funds,
particularly those created by the 2009 American recovery and
reinvestment act, and to ensure that distributions of funding to local
organizations are allocated in a manner that is time-efficient and
user-friendly for the local organizations. Local organizations
eligible to receive support include but are not limited to:
(i) Associate development organizations;
(ii) Workforce development councils;
(iii) Public utility districts; and
(iv) Community action agencies;
(c) Support green economy projects at both the state and local
level by developing a process and a framework to provide, at a minimum:
(i) Administrative and technical assistance;
(ii) Assistance with and expediting of permit processes; and
(iii) Priority consideration of opportunities leading to exportable
green economy goods and services, including renewable energy
technology;
(d) Coordinate local and state implementation of projects using
federal funds to ensure implementation is time-efficient and user-friendly for local organizations;
(e) Emphasize through both support and outreach efforts, projects
that:
(i) Have a strong and lasting economic or environmental impact;
(ii) Lead to a domestically or internationally exportable good or
service, including renewable energy technology;
(iii) Create training programs leading to a credential,
certificate, or degree in a green economy field;
(iv) Strengthen the state's competitiveness in a particular sector
or cluster of the green economy;
(v) Create employment opportunities for veterans, members of the
national guard, and low-income and disadvantaged populations;
(vi) Comply with prevailing wage provisions of chapter 39.12 RCW;
(vii) Ensure at least fifteen percent of labor hours are performed
by apprentices;
(f) Identify emerging technologies and innovations that are likely
to contribute to advancements in the green economy, including the
activities in designated innovation partnership zones established in
RCW 43.330.270;
(g) Identify barriers to the growth of green jobs in traditional
industries;
(h) Identify statewide performance metrics for projects receiving
agency assistance. Such metrics may include:
(i) The number of new green jobs created each year, their wage
levels, and, to the extent determinable, the percentage of new green
jobs filled by veterans, members of the national guard, and low-income
and disadvantaged populations;
(ii) The total amount of new federal funding secured, the
respective amounts allocated to the state and local levels, and the
timeliness of deployment of new funding by state agencies to the local
level;
(iii) The timeliness of state deployment of funds and support to
local organizations; and
(iv) If available, the completion rates, time to completion, and
training-related placement rates for green economy postsecondary
training programs;
(((h))) (i) Identify strategies to allocate existing and new
funding streams for green economy workforce training programs and
education to emphasize those leading to a credential, certificate, or
degree in a green economy field;
(((i))) (j) Identify and implement strategies to allocate existing
and new funding streams for workforce development councils and
associate development organizations to increase their effectiveness and
efficiency and increase local capacity to respond rapidly and
comprehensively to opportunities to attract green jobs to local
communities;
(((j))) (k) Develop targeting criteria for existing investments
that are consistent with the economic development commission's economic
development strategy and the goals of this section and RCW 28C.18.170,
28B.50.281, and 49.04.200; and
(((k))) (l) Make and support outreach efforts so that residents of
Washington, particularly members of target populations, become aware of
educational and employment opportunities identified and funded through
the evergreen jobs act.
(2) The department and the workforce board, in consultation with
the leadership team, must provide semiannual performance reports to the
governor and appropriate committees of the legislature on:
(a) Actual statewide performance based on the performance measures
identified in subsection (1)(((g))) (h) of this section;
(b) How the state is emphasizing and supporting projects that lead
to a domestically or internationally exportable good or service,
including renewable energy technology;
(c) A list of projects supported, created, or funded in furtherance
of the goals of the evergreen jobs initiative and the actions taken by
state and local organizations, including the effectiveness of state
agency support provided to local organizations as directed in
subsection (1)(b) and (c) of this section;
(d) Recommendations for new or expanded financial incentives and
comprehensive strategies to:
(i) Recruit, retain, and expand green economy industries and small
businesses; and
(ii) Stimulate research and development of green technology and
innovation, which may include designating innovation partnership zones
linked to the green economy;
(e) Any information that associate development organizations and
workforce development councils choose to provide to appropriate
legislative committees regarding the effectiveness, timeliness, and
coordination of support provided by state agencies under this section
and RCW 28C.18.170, 28B.50.281, and 49.04.200; and
(f) Any recommended statutory changes necessary to increase the
effectiveness of the evergreen jobs initiative and state responsiveness
to local agencies and organizations.
(3) The definitions, designations, and results of the employment
security department's broader labor market research under RCW
43.330.010 shall inform the planning and strategic direction of the
department, the state workforce training and education coordinating
board, the state board for community and technical colleges, and the
higher education coordinating board.

--- END ---