BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.77.165 and 1993 c 31 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In the event of an escape by a person committed under this
chapter from a state ((institution)) facility or the disappearance of
such a person on conditional release ((to the department of social and
health services, the superintendent, or in the event of a disappearance
of such a person on conditional release to the department of
corrections, the community corrections officer)) or other authorized
absence, the superintendent shall provide notification of the person's
escape or disappearance for the public's safety or to assist in the
apprehension of the person.
(a) The superintendent shall((, as appropriate,)) notify:
(i) State and local law enforcement officers((,)) located in the
city and county where the person escaped;
(ii) Other appropriate governmental agencies((,)); and
(iii) The person's relatives((, and)).
(b) The superintendent shall provide the same notification as
required by (a) of this subsection to the following, if such notice has
been requested in writing about a specific person committed under this
chapter:
(i) The victim of the crime for which the person was convicted or
the victim's next of kin if the crime was a homicide;
(ii) Any witnesses who testified against the person in any court
proceedings if the person was charged with a violent offense; and
(iii) Any other appropriate persons ((about information necessary
for the public safety or to assist in the apprehension of the person)).
(2) Information regarding victims, next of kin, or witnesses
requesting the notice, information regarding any other person specified
in writing by the prosecuting attorney to receive the notice, and the
notice are confidential and shall not be available to the person
committed under this chapter.
(3) The notice provisions of this section are in addition to those
provided in RCW 10.77.205.

--- END ---