BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the substantial
and great impact upon society, families, children, and the victims of
offenses occurring between cohabitants. The legislature recognizes the
continuing nature of domestic violence, and the lasting psychological
trauma caused by such violence. The legislature finds that the
prevention of domestic violence, and the proper punishment for such
offenses, is a compelling state interest that has not been met under
current sentencing provisions. Toward this end, this act is necessary
to ensure that domestic violence offenders are punished accordingly and
that an end to domestic violence can be achieved.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.030 and 2009 c 375 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the indeterminate sentence review board created
under chapter 9.95 RCW.
(2) "Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit," or
"collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department,
means that the department, either directly or through a collection
agreement authorized by RCW 9.94A.760, is responsible for monitoring
and enforcing the offender's sentence with regard to the legal
financial obligation, receiving payment thereof from the offender, and,
consistent with current law, delivering daily the entire payment to the
superior court clerk without depositing it in a departmental account.
(3) "Commission" means the sentencing guidelines commission.
(4) "Community corrections officer" means an employee of the
department who is responsible for carrying out specific duties in
supervision of sentenced offenders and monitoring of sentence
conditions.
(5) "Community custody" means that portion of an offender's
sentence of confinement in lieu of earned release time or imposed as
part of a sentence under this chapter and served in the community
subject to controls placed on the offender's movement and activities by
the department.
(6) "Community protection zone" means the area within eight hundred
eighty feet of the facilities and grounds of a public or private
school.
(7) "Community restitution" means compulsory service, without
compensation, performed for the benefit of the community by the
offender.
(8) "Confinement" means total or partial confinement.
(9) "Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant to Title
10 or 13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of guilty, and
acceptance of a plea of guilty.
(10) "Crime-related prohibition" means an order of a court
prohibiting conduct that directly relates to the circumstances of the
crime for which the offender has been convicted, and shall not be
construed to mean orders directing an offender affirmatively to
participate in rehabilitative programs or to otherwise perform
affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts necessary to monitor
compliance with the order of a court may be required by the department.
(11) "Criminal history" means the list of a defendant's prior
convictions and juvenile adjudications, whether in this state, in
federal court, or elsewhere.
(a) The history shall include, where known, for each conviction (i)
whether the defendant has been placed on probation and the length and
terms thereof; and (ii) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and
the length of incarceration.
(b) A conviction may be removed from a defendant's criminal history
only if it is vacated pursuant to RCW 9.96.060, 9.94A.640, 9.95.240, or
a similar out-of-state statute, or if the conviction has been vacated
pursuant to a governor's pardon.
(c) The determination of a defendant's criminal history is distinct
from the determination of an offender score. A prior conviction that
was not included in an offender score calculated pursuant to a former
version of the sentencing reform act remains part of the defendant's
criminal history.
(12) "Criminal street gang" means any ongoing organization,
association, or group of three or more persons, whether formal or
informal, having a common name or common identifying sign or symbol,
having as one of its primary activities the commission of criminal
acts, and whose members or associates individually or collectively
engage in or have engaged in a pattern of criminal street gang
activity. This definition does not apply to employees engaged in
concerted activities for their mutual aid and protection, or to the
activities of labor and bona fide nonprofit organizations or their
members or agents.
(13) "Criminal street gang associate or member" means any person
who actively participates in any criminal street gang and who
intentionally promotes, furthers, or assists in any criminal act by the
criminal street gang.
(14) "Criminal street gang-related offense" means any felony or
misdemeanor offense, whether in this state or elsewhere, that is
committed for the benefit of, at the direction of, or in association
with any criminal street gang, or is committed with the intent to
promote, further, or assist in any criminal conduct by the gang, or is
committed for one or more of the following reasons:
(a) To gain admission, prestige, or promotion within the gang;
(b) To increase or maintain the gang's size, membership, prestige,
dominance, or control in any geographical area;
(c) To exact revenge or retribution for the gang or any member of
the gang;
(d) To obstruct justice, or intimidate or eliminate any witness
against the gang or any member of the gang;
(e) To directly or indirectly cause any benefit, aggrandizement,
gain, profit, or other advantage for the gang, its reputation,
influence, or membership; or
(f) To provide the gang with any advantage in, or any control or
dominance over any criminal market sector, including, but not limited
to, manufacturing, delivering, or selling any controlled substance
(chapter 69.50 RCW); arson (chapter 9A.48 RCW); trafficking in stolen
property (chapter 9A.82 RCW); promoting prostitution (chapter 9A.88
RCW); human trafficking (RCW 9A.40.100); or promoting pornography
(chapter 9.68 RCW).
(15) "Day fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing court that
equals the difference between the offender's net daily income and the
reasonable obligations that the offender has for the support of the
offender and any dependents.
(16) "Day reporting" means a program of enhanced supervision
designed to monitor the offender's daily activities and compliance with
sentence conditions, and in which the offender is required to report
daily to a specific location designated by the department or the
sentencing court.
(17) "Department" means the department of corrections.
(18) "Determinate sentence" means a sentence that states with
exactitude the number of actual years, months, or days of total
confinement, of partial confinement, of community custody, the number
of actual hours or days of community restitution work, or dollars or
terms of a legal financial obligation. The fact that an offender
through earned release can reduce the actual period of confinement
shall not affect the classification of the sentence as a determinate
sentence.
(19) "Disposable earnings" means that part of the earnings of an
offender remaining after the deduction from those earnings of any
amount required by law to be withheld. For the purposes of this
definition, "earnings" means compensation paid or payable for personal
services, whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonuses, or
otherwise, and, notwithstanding any other provision of law making the
payments exempt from garnishment, attachment, or other process to
satisfy a court-ordered legal financial obligation, specifically
includes periodic payments pursuant to pension or retirement programs,
or insurance policies of any type, but does not include payments made
under Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020 and 50.40.050,
or Title 74 RCW.
(20) "Domestic violence" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
10.99.020 and 26.50.010.
(21) "Drug offender sentencing alternative" is a sentencing option
available to persons convicted of a felony offense other than a violent
offense or a sex offense and who are eligible for the option under RCW
9.94A.660.
(((21))) (22) "Drug offense" means:
(a) Any felony violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of
a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.4013) or forged prescription for a
controlled substance (RCW 69.50.403);
(b) Any offense defined as a felony under federal law that relates
to the possession, manufacture, distribution, or transportation of a
controlled substance; or
(c) Any out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws
of this state would be a felony classified as a drug offense under (a)
of this subsection.
(((22))) (23) "Earned release" means earned release from
confinement as provided in RCW 9.94A.728.
(((23))) (24) "Escape" means:
(a) Sexually violent predator escape (RCW 9A.76.115), escape in the
first degree (RCW 9A.76.110), escape in the second degree (RCW
9A.76.120), willful failure to return from furlough (RCW 72.66.060),
willful failure to return from work release (RCW 72.65.070), or willful
failure to be available for supervision by the department while in
community custody (RCW 72.09.310); or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as an escape
under (a) of this subsection.
(((24))) (25) "Felony traffic offense" means:
(a) Vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW
46.61.522), eluding a police officer (RCW 46.61.024), felony hit-and-run injury-accident (RCW 46.52.020(4)), felony driving while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502(6)), or
felony physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504(6)); or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a felony
traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.
(((25))) (26) "Fine" means a specific sum of money ordered by the
sentencing court to be paid by the offender to the court over a
specific period of time.
(((26))) (27) "First-time offender" means any person who has no
prior convictions for a felony and is eligible for the first-time
offender waiver under RCW 9.94A.650.
(((27))) (28) "Home detention" means a program of partial
confinement available to offenders wherein the offender is confined in
a private residence subject to electronic surveillance.
(((28))) (29) "Legal financial obligation" means a sum of money
that is ordered by a superior court of the state of Washington for
legal financial obligations which may include restitution to the
victim, statutorily imposed crime victims' compensation fees as
assessed pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, court costs, county or interlocal
drug funds, court-appointed attorneys' fees, and costs of defense,
fines, and any other financial obligation that is assessed to the
offender as a result of a felony conviction. Upon conviction for
vehicular assault while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, RCW 46.61.522(1)(b), or vehicular homicide while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a),
legal financial obligations may also include payment to a public agency
of the expense of an emergency response to the incident resulting in
the conviction, subject to RCW 38.52.430.
(((29))) (30) "Most serious offense" means any of the following
felonies or a felony attempt to commit any of the following felonies:
(a) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or
criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A
felony;
(b) Assault in the second degree;
(c) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(d) Child molestation in the second degree;
(e) Controlled substance homicide;
(f) Extortion in the first degree;
(g) Incest when committed against a child under age fourteen;
(h) Indecent liberties;
(i) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(j) Leading organized crime;
(k) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(l) Manslaughter in the second degree;
(m) Promoting prostitution in the first degree;
(n) Rape in the third degree;
(o) Robbery in the second degree;
(p) Sexual exploitation;
(q) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving of
a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner;
(r) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of
any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of
any vehicle in a reckless manner;
(s) Any other class B felony offense with a finding of sexual
motivation;
(t) Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW
9.94A.825;
(u) Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to December 2,
1993, that is comparable to a most serious offense under this
subsection, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense
that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a
most serious offense under this subsection;
(v)(i) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW
9A.88.100(1) (a), (b), and (c), chapter 260, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess.
as it existed until July 1, 1979, RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c) as
it existed from July 1, 1979, until June 11, 1986, and RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(a), (b), and (d) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988;
(ii) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988,
if: (A) The crime was committed against a child under the age of
fourteen; or (B) the relationship between the victim and perpetrator is
included in the definition of indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through July 27, 1997,
or RCW 9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993,
through July 27, 1997;
(w) Any out-of-state conviction for a felony offense with a finding
of sexual motivation if the minimum sentence imposed was ten years or
more; provided that the out-of-state felony offense must be comparable
to a felony offense under Title 9 or 9A RCW and the out-of-state
definition of sexual motivation must be comparable to the definition of
sexual motivation contained in this section.
(((30))) (31) "Nonviolent offense" means an offense which is not a
violent offense.
(((31))) (32) "Offender" means a person who has committed a felony
established by state law and is eighteen years of age or older or is
less than eighteen years of age but whose case is under superior court
jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030 or has been transferred by the
appropriate juvenile court to a criminal court pursuant to RCW
13.40.110. In addition, for the purpose of community custody
requirements under this chapter, "offender" also means a misdemeanor or
gross misdemeanor probationer convicted of an offense included in RCW
9.94A.501(1) and ordered by a superior court to probation under the
supervision of the department pursuant to RCW 9.92.060, 9.95.204, or
9.95.210. Throughout this chapter, the terms "offender" and
"defendant" are used interchangeably.
(((32))) (33) "Partial confinement" means confinement for no more
than one year in a facility or institution operated or utilized under
contract by the state or any other unit of government, or, if home
detention or work crew has been ordered by the court, in an approved
residence, for a substantial portion of each day with the balance of
the day spent in the community. Partial confinement includes work
release, home detention, work crew, and a combination of work crew and
home detention.
(((33))) (34) "Pattern of criminal street gang activity" means:
(a) The commission, attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation of, or any
prior juvenile adjudication of or adult conviction of, two or more of
the following criminal street gang-related offenses:
(i) Any "serious violent" felony offense as defined in this
section, excluding Homicide by Abuse (RCW 9A.32.055) and Assault of a
Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120);
(ii) Any "violent" offense as defined by this section, excluding
Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130);
(iii) Deliver or Possession with Intent to Deliver a Controlled
Substance (chapter 69.50 RCW);
(iv) Any violation of the firearms and dangerous weapon act
(chapter 9.41 RCW);
(v) Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300);
(vi) Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310);
(vii) Malicious Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080);
(viii) Harassment where a subsequent violation or deadly threat is
made (RCW 9A.46.020(2)(b));
(ix) Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120);
(x) Any felony conviction by a person eighteen years of age or
older with a special finding of involving a juvenile in a felony
offense under RCW 9.94A.833;
(xi) Residential Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025);
(xii) Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030);
(xiii) Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070);
(xiv) Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080);
(xv) Theft of a Motor Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.065);
(xvi) Possession of a Stolen Motor Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.068);
(xvii) Taking a Motor Vehicle Without Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070);
(xviii) Taking a Motor Vehicle Without Permission 2 (RCW
9A.56.075);
(xix) Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120);
(xx) Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130);
(xxi) Intimidating a Witness (RCW 9A.72.110);
(xxii) Tampering with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120);
(xxiii) Reckless Endangerment (RCW 9A.36.050);
(xxiv) Coercion (RCW 9A.36.070);
(xxv) Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020); or
(xxvi) Malicious Mischief 3 (RCW 9A.48.090);
(b) That at least one of the offenses listed in (a) of this
subsection shall have occurred after July 1, 2008;
(c) That the most recent committed offense listed in (a) of this
subsection occurred within three years of a prior offense listed in (a)
of this subsection; and
(d) Of the offenses that were committed in (a) of this subsection,
the offenses occurred on separate occasions or were committed by two or
more persons.
(((34))) (35) "Persistent offender" is an offender who:
(a)(i) Has been convicted in this state of any felony considered a
most serious offense; and
(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (a) of this
subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least two separate
occasions, whether in this state or elsewhere, of felonies that under
the laws of this state would be considered most serious offenses and
would be included in the offender score under RCW 9.94A.525; provided
that of the two or more previous convictions, at least one conviction
must have occurred before the commission of any of the other most
serious offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or
(b)(i) Has been convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape
of a child in the first degree, child molestation in the first degree,
rape in the second degree, rape of a child in the second degree, or
indecent liberties by forcible compulsion; (B) any of the following
offenses with a finding of sexual motivation: Murder in the first
degree, murder in the second degree, homicide by abuse, kidnapping in
the first degree, kidnapping in the second degree, assault in the first
degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the first
degree, assault of a child in the second degree, or burglary in the
first degree; or (C) an attempt to commit any crime listed in this
subsection (((34))) (35)(b)(i); and
(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this
subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least one occasion,
whether in this state or elsewhere, of an offense listed in (b)(i) of
this subsection or any federal or out-of-state offense or offense under
prior Washington law that is comparable to the offenses listed in
(b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for rape of a child in the
first degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection
only when the offender was sixteen years of age or older when the
offender committed the offense. A conviction for rape of a child in
the second degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this
subsection only when the offender was eighteen years of age or older
when the offender committed the offense.
(((35))) (36) "Predatory" means: (a) The perpetrator of the crime
was a stranger to the victim, as defined in this section; (b) the
perpetrator established or promoted a relationship with the victim
prior to the offense and the victimization of the victim was a
significant reason the perpetrator established or promoted the
relationship; or (c) the perpetrator was: (i) A teacher, counselor,
volunteer, or other person in authority in any public or private school
and the victim was a student of the school under his or her authority
or supervision. For purposes of this subsection, "school" does not
include home-based instruction as defined in RCW 28A.225.010; (ii) a
coach, trainer, volunteer, or other person in authority in any
recreational activity and the victim was a participant in the activity
under his or her authority or supervision; or (iii) a pastor, elder,
volunteer, or other person in authority in any church or religious
organization, and the victim was a member or participant of the
organization under his or her authority.
(((36))) (37) "Private school" means a school regulated under
chapter 28A.195 or 28A.205 RCW.
(((37))) (38) "Public school" has the same meaning as in RCW
28A.150.010.
(((38))) (39) "Repetitive domestic violence offense" means any:
(a)(i) Domestic violence assault that is not a felony offense under
RCW 9A.36.041;
(ii) Domestic violence violation of a no contact order under
chapter 10.99 RCW that is not a felony offense;
(iii) Domestic violence violation of a protection order under
chapter 26.09, 26.10, 26.26, or 26.50 RCW, that is not a felony
offense;
(iv) Domestic violence harassment offense under RCW 9A.46.020 that
is not a felony offense; or
(v) Domestic violence stalking offense under RCW 9A.46.110 that is
not a felony offense; or
(b) Any federal, out-of-state, tribal court, military, county, or
municipal conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state
would be classified as a repetitive domestic violence offense under (a)
of this subsection.
(40) "Restitution" means a specific sum of money ordered by the
sentencing court to be paid by the offender to the court over a
specified period of time as payment of damages. The sum may include
both public and private costs.
(((39))) (41) "Risk assessment" means the application of the risk
instrument recommended to the department by the Washington state
institute for public policy as having the highest degree of predictive
accuracy for assessing an offender's risk of reoffense.
(((40))) (42) "Serious traffic offense" means:
(a) Nonfelony driving while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502), nonfelony actual physical control
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.504), reckless driving (RCW 46.61.500), or hit-and-run an
attended vehicle (RCW 46.52.020(5)); or
(b) Any federal, out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for
an offense that under the laws of this state would be classified as a
serious traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.
(((41))) (43) "Serious violent offense" is a subcategory of violent
offense and means:
(a)(i) Murder in the first degree;
(ii) Homicide by abuse;
(iii) Murder in the second degree;
(iv) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(v) Assault in the first degree;
(vi) Kidnapping in the first degree;
(vii) Rape in the first degree;
(viii) Assault of a child in the first degree; or
(ix) An attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to
commit one of these felonies; or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a serious
violent offense under (a) of this subsection.
(((42))) (44) "Sex offense" means:
(a)(i) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW other than
RCW 9A.44.130(12);
(ii) A violation of RCW 9A.64.020;
(iii) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9.68A RCW other than
RCW 9.68A.080; or
(iv) A felony that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt,
criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit such crimes;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a sex
offense in (a) of this subsection;
(c) A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW
9.94A.835 or 13.40.135; or
(d) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a sex
offense under (a) of this subsection.
(((43))) (45) "Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes
for which the defendant committed the crime was for the purpose of his
or her sexual gratification.
(((44))) (46) "Standard sentence range" means the sentencing
court's discretionary range in imposing a nonappealable sentence.
(((45))) (47) "Statutory maximum sentence" means the maximum length
of time for which an offender may be confined as punishment for a crime
as prescribed in chapter 9A.20 RCW, RCW 9.92.010, the statute defining
the crime, or other statute defining the maximum penalty for a crime.
(((46))) (48) "Stranger" means that the victim did not know the
offender twenty-four hours before the offense.
(((47))) (49) "Total confinement" means confinement inside the
physical boundaries of a facility or institution operated or utilized
under contract by the state or any other unit of government for twenty-four hours a day, or pursuant to RCW 72.64.050 and 72.64.060.
(((48))) (50) "Transition training" means written and verbal
instructions and assistance provided by the department to the offender
during the two weeks prior to the offender's successful completion of
the work ethic camp program. The transition training shall include
instructions in the offender's requirements and obligations during the
offender's period of community custody.
(((49))) (51) "Victim" means any person who has sustained
emotional, psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or
property as a direct result of the crime charged.
(((50))) (52) "Violent offense" means:
(a) Any of the following felonies:
(i) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an
attempt to commit a class A felony;
(ii) Criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a
class A felony;
(iii) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(iv) Manslaughter in the second degree;
(v) Indecent liberties if committed by forcible compulsion;
(vi) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(vii) Arson in the second degree;
(viii) Assault in the second degree;
(ix) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(x) Extortion in the first degree;
(xi) Robbery in the second degree;
(xii) Drive-by shooting;
(xiii) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving
of a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a
reckless manner; and
(xiv) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of
any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of
any vehicle in a reckless manner;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a violent
offense in (a) of this subsection; and
(c) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a violent
offense under (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(((51))) (53) "Work crew" means a program of partial confinement
consisting of civic improvement tasks for the benefit of the community
that complies with RCW 9.94A.725.
(((52))) (54) "Work ethic camp" means an alternative incarceration
program as provided in RCW 9.94A.690 designed to reduce recidivism and
lower the cost of corrections by requiring offenders to complete a
comprehensive array of real-world job and vocational experiences,
character-building work ethics training, life management skills
development, substance abuse rehabilitation, counseling, literacy
training, and basic adult education.
(((53))) (55) "Work release" means a program of partial confinement
available to offenders who are employed or engaged as a student in a
regular course of study at school.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.525 and 2008 c 231 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The offender score is measured on the horizontal axis of the
sentencing grid. The offender score rules are as follows:
The offender score is the sum of points accrued under this section
rounded down to the nearest whole number.
(1) A prior conviction is a conviction which exists before the date
of sentencing for the offense for which the offender score is being
computed. Convictions entered or sentenced on the same date as the
conviction for which the offender score is being computed shall be
deemed "other current offenses" within the meaning of RCW 9.94A.589.
(2)(a) Class A and sex prior felony convictions shall always be
included in the offender score.
(b) Class B prior felony convictions other than sex offenses shall
not be included in the offender score, if since the last date of
release from confinement (including full-time residential treatment)
pursuant to a felony conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and
sentence, the offender had spent ten consecutive years in the community
without committing any crime that subsequently results in a conviction.
(c) Except as provided in (e) of this subsection, class C prior
felony convictions other than sex offenses shall not be included in the
offender score if, since the last date of release from confinement
(including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to a felony
conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and sentence, the offender had
spent five consecutive years in the community without committing any
crime that subsequently results in a conviction.
(d) Except as provided in (e) of this subsection, serious traffic
convictions shall not be included in the offender score if, since the
last date of release from confinement (including full-time residential
treatment) pursuant to a felony conviction, if any, or entry of
judgment and sentence, the offender spent five years in the community
without committing any crime that subsequently results in a conviction.
(e) If the present conviction is felony driving while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502(6)) or
felony physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504(6)), prior convictions
of felony driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, felony physical control of a vehicle while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, and serious traffic
offenses shall be included in the offender score if: (i) The prior
convictions were committed within five years since the last date of
release from confinement (including full-time residential treatment) or
entry of judgment and sentence; or (ii) the prior convictions would be
considered "prior offenses within ten years" as defined in RCW
46.61.5055.
(f) Repetitive domestic violence convictions shall not be included
in the offender score if, since the last date of release from
confinement or entry of judgment and sentence, the offender spent ten
years in the community without committing any crime that subsequently
results in a conviction.
(g) This subsection applies to both adult and juvenile prior
convictions.
(3) Out-of-state convictions for offenses shall be classified
according to the comparable offense definitions and sentences provided
by Washington law. Federal convictions for offenses shall be
classified according to the comparable offense definitions and
sentences provided by Washington law. If there is no clearly
comparable offense under Washington law or the offense is one that is
usually considered subject to exclusive federal jurisdiction, the
offense shall be scored as a class C felony equivalent if it was a
felony under the relevant federal statute.
(4) Score prior convictions for felony anticipatory offenses
(attempts, criminal solicitations, and criminal conspiracies) the same
as if they were convictions for completed offenses.
(5)(a) In the case of multiple prior convictions, for the purpose
of computing the offender score, count all convictions separately,
except:
(i) Prior offenses which were found, under RCW 9.94A.589(1)(a), to
encompass the same criminal conduct, shall be counted as one offense,
the offense that yields the highest offender score. The current
sentencing court shall determine with respect to other prior adult
offenses for which sentences were served concurrently or prior juvenile
offenses for which sentences were served consecutively, whether those
offenses shall be counted as one offense or as separate offenses using
the "same criminal conduct" analysis found in RCW 9.94A.589(1)(a), and
if the court finds that they shall be counted as one offense, then the
offense that yields the highest offender score shall be used. The
current sentencing court may presume that such other prior offenses
were not the same criminal conduct from sentences imposed on separate
dates, or in separate counties or jurisdictions, or in separate
complaints, indictments, or informations;
(ii) In the case of multiple prior convictions for offenses
committed before July 1, 1986, for the purpose of computing the
offender score, count all adult convictions served concurrently as one
offense, and count all juvenile convictions entered on the same date as
one offense. Use the conviction for the offense that yields the
highest offender score.
(b) As used in this subsection (5), "served concurrently" means
that: (i) The latter sentence was imposed with specific reference to
the former; (ii) the concurrent relationship of the sentences was
judicially imposed; and (iii) the concurrent timing of the sentences
was not the result of a probation or parole revocation on the former
offense.
(6) If the present conviction is one of the anticipatory offenses
of criminal attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy, count each prior
conviction as if the present conviction were for a completed offense.
When these convictions are used as criminal history, score them the
same as a completed crime.
(7) If the present conviction is for a nonviolent offense and not
covered by subsection (11), (12), or (13) of this section, count one
point for each adult prior felony conviction and one point for each
juvenile prior violent felony conviction and 1/2 point for each
juvenile prior nonviolent felony conviction.
(8) If the present conviction is for a violent offense and not
covered in subsection (9), (10), (11), (12), or (13) of this section,
count two points for each prior adult and juvenile violent felony
conviction, one point for each prior adult nonviolent felony
conviction, and 1/2 point for each prior juvenile nonviolent felony
conviction.
(9) If the present conviction is for a serious violent offense,
count three points for prior adult and juvenile convictions for crimes
in this category, two points for each prior adult and juvenile violent
conviction (not already counted), one point for each prior adult
nonviolent felony conviction, and 1/2 point for each prior juvenile
nonviolent felony conviction.
(10) If the present conviction is for Burglary 1, count prior
convictions as in subsection (8) of this section; however count two
points for each prior adult Burglary 2 or residential burglary
conviction, and one point for each prior juvenile Burglary 2 or
residential burglary conviction.
(11) If the present conviction is for a felony traffic offense
count two points for each adult or juvenile prior conviction for
Vehicular Homicide or Vehicular Assault; for each felony offense count
one point for each adult and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior
conviction; for each serious traffic offense, other than those used for
an enhancement pursuant to RCW 46.61.520(2), count one point for each
adult and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior conviction; count one point
for each adult and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior conviction for
operation of a vessel while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug.
(12) If the present conviction is for homicide by watercraft or
assault by watercraft count two points for each adult or juvenile prior
conviction for homicide by watercraft or assault by watercraft; for
each felony offense count one point for each adult and 1/2 point for
each juvenile prior conviction; count one point for each adult and 1/2
point for each juvenile prior conviction for driving under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, actual physical control
of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, or operation of a vessel while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug.
(13) If the present conviction is for manufacture of
methamphetamine count three points for each adult prior manufacture of
methamphetamine conviction and two points for each juvenile manufacture
of methamphetamine offense. If the present conviction is for a drug
offense and the offender has a criminal history that includes a sex
offense or serious violent offense, count three points for each adult
prior felony drug offense conviction and two points for each juvenile
drug offense. All other adult and juvenile felonies are scored as in
subsection (8) of this section if the current drug offense is violent,
or as in subsection (7) of this section if the current drug offense is
nonviolent.
(14) If the present conviction is for Escape from Community
Custody, RCW 72.09.310, count only prior escape convictions in the
offender score. Count adult prior escape convictions as one point and
juvenile prior escape convictions as 1/2 point.
(15) If the present conviction is for Escape 1, RCW 9A.76.110, or
Escape 2, RCW 9A.76.120, count adult prior convictions as one point and
juvenile prior convictions as 1/2 point.
(16) If the present conviction is for Burglary 2 or residential
burglary, count priors as in subsection (7) of this section; however,
count two points for each adult and juvenile prior Burglary 1
conviction, two points for each adult prior Burglary 2 or residential
burglary conviction, and one point for each juvenile prior Burglary 2
or residential burglary conviction.
(17) If the present conviction is for a sex offense, count priors
as in subsections (7) through (11) and (13) through (16) of this
section; however count three points for each adult and juvenile prior
sex offense conviction.
(18) If the present conviction is for failure to register as a sex
offender under RCW 9A.44.130(11), count priors as in subsections (7)
through (11) and (13) through (16) of this section; however count three
points for each adult and juvenile prior sex offense conviction,
excluding prior convictions for failure to register as a sex offender
under RCW 9A.44.130(11), which shall count as one point.
(19) If the present conviction is for an offense committed while
the offender was under community custody, add one point. For purposes
of this subsection, community custody includes community placement or
postrelease supervision, as defined in chapter 9.94B RCW.
(20) If the present conviction is for Theft of a Motor Vehicle,
Possession of a Stolen Vehicle, Taking a Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 1, or Taking a Motor Vehicle Without Permission 2, count
priors as in subsections (7) through (18) of this section; however
count one point for prior convictions of Vehicle Prowling 2, and three
points for each adult and juvenile prior Theft 1 (of a motor vehicle),
Theft 2 (of a motor vehicle), Possession of Stolen Property 1 (of a
motor vehicle), Possession of Stolen Property 2 (of a motor vehicle),
Theft of a Motor Vehicle, Possession of a Stolen Vehicle, Taking a
Motor Vehicle Without Permission 1, or Taking a Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 2 conviction.
(21) If the present conviction is for a felony domestic violence
offense where domestic violence as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 was plead
and proven, count priors as in subsections (7) through (20) of this
section; however, count points as follows:
(a) Count two points for each adult and juvenile prior conviction
where domestic violence as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, was plead and
proven after August 1, 2011, for the following offenses: A violation
of a no contact order that is a felony offense, a violation of a
protection order that is a felony offense, a felony domestic violence
harassment offense, a felony domestic violence stalking offense, a
domestic violence Burglary 1 offense, a domestic violence Kidnapping 1
offense, a domestic violence Kidnapping 2 offense, a domestic violence
unlawful imprisonment offense, a domestic violence Robbery 1 offense,
a domestic violence Robbery 2 offense, a domestic violence Assault 1
offense, a domestic violence Assault 2 offense, a domestic violence
Assault 3 offense, a domestic violence Arson 1 offense, or a domestic
violence Arson 2 offense; and
(b) Count one point for each adult and juvenile prior conviction
for a repetitive domestic violence offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030,
where domestic violence as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, was plead and
proven after August 1, 2011.
(22) The fact that a prior conviction was not included in an
offender's offender score or criminal history at a previous sentencing
shall have no bearing on whether it is included in the criminal history
or offender score for the current offense. Prior convictions that were
not counted in the offender score or included in criminal history under
repealed or previous versions of the sentencing reform act shall be
included in criminal history and shall count in the offender score if
the current version of the sentencing reform act requires including or
counting those convictions. Prior convictions that were not included
in criminal history or in the offender score shall be included upon any
resentencing to ensure imposition of an accurate sentence.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.94A.535 and 2008 c 276 s 303 and 2008 c 233 s 9 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The court may impose a sentence outside the standard sentence range
for an offense if it finds, considering the purpose of this chapter,
that there are substantial and compelling reasons justifying an
exceptional sentence. Facts supporting aggravated sentences, other
than the fact of a prior conviction, shall be determined pursuant to
the provisions of RCW 9.94A.537.
Whenever a sentence outside the standard sentence range is imposed,
the court shall set forth the reasons for its decision in written
findings of fact and conclusions of law. A sentence outside the
standard sentence range shall be a determinate sentence.
If the sentencing court finds that an exceptional sentence outside
the standard sentence range should be imposed, the sentence is subject
to review only as provided for in RCW 9.94A.585(4).
A departure from the standards in RCW 9.94A.589 (1) and (2)
governing whether sentences are to be served consecutively or
concurrently is an exceptional sentence subject to the limitations in
this section, and may be appealed by the offender or the state as set
forth in RCW 9.94A.585 (2) through (6).
(1) Mitigating Circumstances - Court to Consider
The court may impose an exceptional sentence below the standard
range if it finds that mitigating circumstances are established by a
preponderance of the evidence. The following are illustrative only and
are not intended to be exclusive reasons for exceptional sentences.
(a) To a significant degree, the victim was an initiator, willing
participant, aggressor, or provoker of the incident.
(b) Before detection, the defendant compensated, or made a good
faith effort to compensate, the victim of the criminal conduct for any
damage or injury sustained.
(c) The defendant committed the crime under duress, coercion,
threat, or compulsion insufficient to constitute a complete defense but
which significantly affected his or her conduct.
(d) The defendant, with no apparent predisposition to do so, was
induced by others to participate in the crime.
(e) The defendant's capacity to appreciate the wrongfulness of his
or her conduct, or to conform his or her conduct to the requirements of
the law, was significantly impaired. Voluntary use of drugs or alcohol
is excluded.
(f) The offense was principally accomplished by another person and
the defendant manifested extreme caution or sincere concern for the
safety or well-being of the victim.
(g) The operation of the multiple offense policy of RCW 9.94A.589
results in a presumptive sentence that is clearly excessive in light of
the purpose of this chapter, as expressed in RCW 9.94A.010.
(h) The defendant or the defendant's children suffered a continuing
pattern of physical or sexual abuse by the victim of the offense and
the offense is a response to that abuse.
(2) Aggravating Circumstances - Considered and Imposed by the Court
The trial court may impose an aggravated exceptional sentence
without a finding of fact by a jury under the following circumstances:
(a) The defendant and the state both stipulate that justice is best
served by the imposition of an exceptional sentence outside the
standard range, and the court finds the exceptional sentence to be
consistent with and in furtherance of the interests of justice and the
purposes of the sentencing reform act.
(b) The defendant's prior unscored misdemeanor or prior unscored
foreign criminal history results in a presumptive sentence that is
clearly too lenient in light of the purpose of this chapter, as
expressed in RCW 9.94A.010.
(c) The defendant has committed multiple current offenses and the
defendant's high offender score results in some of the current offenses
going unpunished.
(d) The failure to consider the defendant's prior criminal history
which was omitted from the offender score calculation pursuant to RCW
9.94A.525 results in a presumptive sentence that is clearly too
lenient.
(3) Aggravating Circumstances - Considered by a Jury -Imposed by
the Court
Except for circumstances listed in subsection (2) of this section,
the following circumstances are an exclusive list of factors that can
support a sentence above the standard range. Such facts should be
determined by procedures specified in RCW 9.94A.537.
(a) The defendant's conduct during the commission of the current
offense manifested deliberate cruelty to the victim.
(b) The defendant knew or should have known that the victim of the
current offense was particularly vulnerable or incapable of resistance.
(c) The current offense was a violent offense, and the defendant
knew that the victim of the current offense was pregnant.
(d) The current offense was a major economic offense or series of
offenses, so identified by a consideration of any of the following
factors:
(i) The current offense involved multiple victims or multiple
incidents per victim;
(ii) The current offense involved attempted or actual monetary loss
substantially greater than typical for the offense;
(iii) The current offense involved a high degree of sophistication
or planning or occurred over a lengthy period of time; or
(iv) The defendant used his or her position of trust, confidence,
or fiduciary responsibility to facilitate the commission of the current
offense.
(e) The current offense was a major violation of the Uniform
Controlled Substances Act, chapter 69.50 RCW (VUCSA), related to
trafficking in controlled substances, which was more onerous than the
typical offense of its statutory definition: The presence of ANY of
the following may identify a current offense as a major VUCSA:
(i) The current offense involved at least three separate
transactions in which controlled substances were sold, transferred, or
possessed with intent to do so;
(ii) The current offense involved an attempted or actual sale or
transfer of controlled substances in quantities substantially larger
than for personal use;
(iii) The current offense involved the manufacture of controlled
substances for use by other parties;
(iv) The circumstances of the current offense reveal the offender
to have occupied a high position in the drug distribution hierarchy;
(v) The current offense involved a high degree of sophistication or
planning, occurred over a lengthy period of time, or involved a broad
geographic area of disbursement; or
(vi) The offender used his or her position or status to facilitate
the commission of the current offense, including positions of trust,
confidence or fiduciary responsibility (e.g., pharmacist, physician, or
other medical professional).
(f) The current offense included a finding of sexual motivation
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.835.
(g) The offense was part of an ongoing pattern of sexual abuse of
the same victim under the age of eighteen years manifested by multiple
incidents over a prolonged period of time.
(h) The current offense involved domestic violence, as defined in
RCW 10.99.020, and one or more of the following was present:
(i) The offense was part of an ongoing pattern of psychological,
physical, or sexual abuse of ((the)) a victim or multiple victims
manifested by multiple incidents over a prolonged period of time;
(ii) The offense occurred within sight or sound of the victim's or
the offender's minor children under the age of eighteen years; or
(iii) The offender's conduct during the commission of the current
offense manifested deliberate cruelty or intimidation of the victim.
(i) The offense resulted in the pregnancy of a child victim of
rape.
(j) The defendant knew that the victim of the current offense was
a youth who was not residing with a legal custodian and the defendant
established or promoted the relationship for the primary purpose of
victimization.
(k) The offense was committed with the intent to obstruct or impair
human or animal health care or agricultural or forestry research or
commercial production.
(l) The current offense is trafficking in the first degree or
trafficking in the second degree and any victim was a minor at the time
of the offense.
(m) The offense involved a high degree of sophistication or
planning.
(n) The defendant used his or her position of trust, confidence, or
fiduciary responsibility to facilitate the commission of the current
offense.
(o) The defendant committed a current sex offense, has a history of
sex offenses, and is not amenable to treatment.
(p) The offense involved an invasion of the victim's privacy.
(q) The defendant demonstrated or displayed an egregious lack of
remorse.
(r) The offense involved a destructive and foreseeable impact on
persons other than the victim.
(s) The defendant committed the offense to obtain or maintain his
or her membership or to advance his or her position in the hierarchy of
an organization, association, or identifiable group.
(t) The defendant committed the current offense shortly after being
released from incarceration.
(u) The current offense is a burglary and the victim of the
burglary was present in the building or residence when the crime was
committed.
(v) The offense was committed against a law enforcement officer who
was performing his or her official duties at the time of the offense,
the offender knew that the victim was a law enforcement officer, and
the victim's status as a law enforcement officer is not an element of
the offense.
(w) The defendant committed the offense against a victim who was
acting as a good samaritan.
(x) The defendant committed the offense against a public official
or officer of the court in retaliation of the public official's
performance of his or her duty to the criminal justice system.
(y) The victim's injuries substantially exceed the level of bodily
harm necessary to satisfy the elements of the offense. This aggravator
is not an exception to RCW 9.94A.530(2).
(z)(i)(A) The current offense is theft in the first degree, theft
in the second degree, possession of stolen property in the first
degree, or possession of stolen property in the second degree; (B) the
stolen property involved is metal property; and (C) the property damage
to the victim caused in the course of the theft of metal property is
more than three times the value of the stolen metal property, or the
theft of the metal property creates a public hazard.
(ii) For purposes of this subsection, "metal property" means
commercial metal property, private metal property, or nonferrous metal
property, as defined in RCW 19.290.010.
(aa) The defendant committed the offense with the intent to
directly or indirectly cause any benefit, aggrandizement, gain, profit,
or other advantage to or for a criminal street gang as defined in RCW
9.94A.030, its reputation, influence, or membership.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect August 1, 2011.

--- END ---