BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 63.29.020 and 2005 c 502 s 3 and 2005 c 367 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, all intangible
property, including any income or increment derived therefrom, less any
lawful charges, that is held, issued, or owing in the ordinary course
of the holder's business and has remained unclaimed by the owner for
more than three years after it became payable or distributable is
presumed abandoned.
(2) Property, with the exception of unredeemed Washington state
lottery tickets and unpresented winning parimutuel tickets, is payable
and distributable for the purpose of this chapter notwithstanding the
owner's failure to make demand or to present any instrument or document
required to receive payment.
(3) This chapter does not apply to claims drafts issued by
insurance companies representing offers to settle claims unliquidated
in amount or settled by subsequent drafts or other means.
(4) This chapter does not apply to property covered by chapter
63.26 RCW.
(5) This chapter does not apply to used clothing, umbrellas, bags,
luggage, or other used personal effects if such property is disposed of
by the holder as follows:
(a) In the case of personal effects of negligible value, the
property is destroyed; or
(b) The property is donated to a bona fide charity.
(6) This chapter does not apply to a gift certificate subject to
the prohibition against expiration dates under RCW 19.240.020 or to a
gift certificate subject to RCW 19.240.030 through 19.240.060.
However, this chapter applies to gift certificates presumed abandoned
under RCW 63.29.110.
(7) Except as provided in RCW 63.29.350, this chapter does not
apply to excess proceeds held by counties, cities, towns, and other
municipal or quasi-municipal corporations from foreclosures for
delinquent property taxes, assessments, or other liens.

Sec. 2 RCW 63.29.350 and 1983 c 179 s 35 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person to seek or receive from any
person or contract with any person for any fee or compensation for
locating or purporting to locate any property which he knows has been
reported or paid or delivered to the department of revenue pursuant to
this chapter, or funds held by a county that are proceeds from a
foreclosure for delinquent property taxes, assessments, or other liens,
or, funds that are otherwise held by a county because of a person's
failure to claim funds held as reimbursement for unowed taxes, fees, or
other government charges, in excess of five percent of the value
thereof returned to such owner. Any person violating this section is
guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not less than the amount of
the fee or charge he has sought or received or contracted for, and not
more than ten times such amount, or imprisoned for not more than thirty
days, or both.
(2) The legislature finds that the practices covered by this
section are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the
purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.
Any violation of this section is not reasonable in relation to the
development and preservation of business. It is an unfair or deceptive
act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the
purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.
Remedies provided by chapter 19.86 RCW are cumulative and not
exclusive.

--- END ---