BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.118.061 and 2009 c 351 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A manufacturer ((shall be)) is prohibited from reselling any
motor vehicle determined or adjudicated as having a serious safety
defect unless the serious safety defect has been corrected and the
manufacturer warrants upon the first subsequent resale that the defect
has been corrected.
(2) Before any sale or transfer of a motor vehicle that has been
replaced or repurchased by the manufacturer after a determination,
adjudication, or settlement of a claim under this chapter, the
manufacturer ((shall)) must:
(a) Notify the attorney general upon receipt of the motor vehicle;
((and))
(b) Submit a title application to the department of licensing in
this state for title to the motor vehicle in the name of the
manufacturer within sixty days;
(((b) Attach a resale disclosure notice to the vehicle in a manner
and form to be specified by the attorney general. Only the retail
purchaser may remove the resale disclosure notice after execution of
the disclosure form required under subsection (3) of this section;))
and
(c) Notify the attorney general and the department of licensing if
the nonconformity in the motor vehicle is corrected.
(3) ((Upon)) Before the first subsequent resale, either at
wholesale or retail, or transfer of title of a motor vehicle ((and
which was)) previously returned after a final determination,
adjudication, or settlement under this chapter or under a similar
statute of any other state, the manufacturer, its agent, or ((the new))
a motor vehicle dealer, as defined in RCW 46.70.011(4), who has actual
knowledge of said final determination, adjudication, or settlement((,
shall)) must:
(a) Obtain from the attorney general and attach to the motor
vehicle a resale window display disclosure notice. Only the retail
purchaser may remove the resale window display disclosure notice after
execution of the resale disclosure form required under this subsection;
and
(b) Obtain from the attorney general, execute, and deliver to the
buyer before sale ((an instrument in writing)) or other transfer of
title a resale disclosure form setting forth information identifying
the nonconformity ((in a manner to be specified by the attorney
general, and the department of licensing shall place on the certificate
of title information indicating the vehicle was returned under this
chapter)) and a title brand.
(4)(a) When a manufacturer reacquires a vehicle under this chapter,
the department of licensing must issue a new title with a title brand
indicating the motor vehicle was returned under this chapter and
information that the nonconformity has not been corrected.
(b) Upon receipt of the manufacturer's notification under
subsection (2) of this section that the nonconformity has been
corrected and the manufacturer's application for title in the name of
the manufacturer under this section, the department of licensing
((shall)) must issue a new title with a title brand indicating the
motor vehicle was returned under this chapter and information that the
nonconformity has been corrected. Upon the first subsequent resale,
either at wholesale or retail, or transfer of title of a motor vehicle,
as provided under this section, the manufacturer shall warrant upon the
resale that the nonconformity has been corrected((, and the
manufacturer, its agent, or the new motor vehicle dealer who has actual
knowledge of the corrected nonconformity, shall execute and deliver to
the buyer before sale an instrument in writing setting forth
information identifying the nonconformity and indicating that it has
been corrected in a manner to be specified by the attorney general)).
(c) When the department of licensing receives a title application
that complies with the department's requirements and procedures for a
motor vehicle previously titled in another state and that has a title
brand or other documentation indicating the motor vehicle was
reacquired by a manufacturer under a similar law, the department of
licensing must issue a new title with a title brand indicating the
motor vehicle was returned under a similar law of another state.
(5) After ((repurchase or replacement and following)) a
manufacturer's receipt of a motor vehicle under this ((section))
chapter and prior to a motor vehicle's first subsequent retail transfer
by resale or lease, any intervening transferor of a motor vehicle
subject to the requirements of this section who has received the resale
disclosure((, correction and warranty documents, as specified by the
attorney general and required under this chapter, shall deliver the
documents)) form and resale window display disclosure notice provided
by the attorney general under this section must deliver the resale
disclosure form and resale window display disclosure notice with the
motor vehicle to the next transferor, purchaser, or lessee to ensure
proper and timely notice and disclosure. Any intervening transferor
who fails to comply with this subsection ((shall)) must, at the option
of the subsequent transferor or first subsequent retail purchaser or
lessee: (a) Indemnify any subsequent transferor or first subsequent
retail purchaser for all damages caused by such violation; or (b)
repurchase the motor vehicle at the full purchase price including all
fees, taxes, and costs incurred for goods and services which were
included in the subsequent transaction.

--- END ---