BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.84.020 and 2008 c 246 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of health.
(2) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.
(3) "Licensed practitioner" means any licensed health care
practitioner performing services within the person's authorized scope
of practice.
(4) "Radiologic technologist" means an individual certified under
this chapter, other than a licensed practitioner, who practices
radiologic technology as a:
(a) Diagnostic radiologic technologist, who is a person who
actually handles X-ray equipment in the process of applying radiation
on a human being for diagnostic purposes at the direction of a licensed
practitioner, this includes parenteral procedures related to radiologic
technology when performed under the direct supervision of a physician
licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW;
(b) Therapeutic radiologic technologist, who is a person who uses
radiation-generating equipment for therapeutic purposes on human
subjects at the direction of a licensed practitioner, this includes
parenteral procedures related to radiologic technology when performed
under the direct supervision of a physician licensed under chapter
18.71 or 18.57 RCW;
(c) Nuclear medicine technologist, who is a person who prepares
radiopharmaceuticals and administers them to human beings for
diagnostic and therapeutic purposes and who performs in vivo and in
vitro detection and measurement of radioactivity for medical purposes
at the direction of a licensed practitioner; ((or))
(d) Radiologist assistant, who is an advanced-level certified
diagnostic radiologic technologist who assists radiologists by
performing advanced diagnostic imaging procedures as determined by rule
under levels of supervision defined by the secretary, this includes but
is not limited to enteral and parenteral procedures when performed
under the direction of the supervising radiologist, and that these
procedures may include injecting diagnostic agents to sites other than
intravenous, performing diagnostic aspirations and localizations, and
assisting radiologists with other invasive procedures; or
(e) Cardiovascular invasive specialist, who is a person who assists
in cardiac or vascular catheterization procedures under the personal
supervision of a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW.
This includes parenteral procedures related to cardiac or vascular
catheterization including, but not limited to, parenteral procedures
involving arteries and veins.
(5) "Approved school of radiologic technology" means a school of
radiologic technology, cardiovascular invasive specialist program, or
radiologist assistant program approved by the secretary or a school
found to maintain the equivalent of such a course of study as
determined by the department. Such school may be operated by a medical
or educational institution, and for the purpose of providing ((the))
any requisite clinical experience, shall be affiliated with one or more
general hospitals.
(6) "Approved cardiovascular invasive specialist program" or
"approved radiologist assistant program" means a school approved by the
secretary. The secretary may recognize other organizations that
establish standards for radiologist assistant programs or
cardiovascular invasive specialist programs and designate schools that
meet the organization's standards as approved.
(7) "Radiologic technology" means the use of ionizing radiation
upon a human being for diagnostic or therapeutic purposes.
(8) "Radiologist" means a physician certified by the American board
of radiology or the American osteopathic board of radiology.
(9) "Registered X-ray technician" means a person who is registered
with the department, and who applies ionizing radiation at the
direction of a licensed practitioner and who does not perform
parenteral procedures.
(10) "Cardiac or vascular catheterization" means all anatomic or
physiological studies of intervention in which the heart, coronary
arteries, or vascular system are entered via a systemic vein or artery
using a catheter that is manipulated under fluoroscopic visualization.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.84.080 and 2008 c 246 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary shall issue a certificate to any applicant who
demonstrates to the secretary's satisfaction, that the following
requirements have been met to practice as:
(a) A diagnostic radiologic technologist, therapeutic radiologic
technologist, or nuclear medicine technologist:
(i) Graduation from an approved school or successful completion of
alternate training that meets the criteria established by the
secretary;
(ii) Satisfactory completion of a radiologic technologist
examination approved by the secretary; and
(iii) Good moral character; ((or))
(b) A radiologist assistant:
(i) Satisfactory completion of an approved radiologist assistant
program;
(ii) Satisfactory completion of a radiologist assistant examination
approved by the secretary; and
(iii) Good moral character; or
(c) A cardiovascular invasive specialist:
(i) Satisfactory completion of a cardiovascular invasive specialist
program or alternate training approved by the secretary. The secretary
may only approve a cardiovascular invasive specialist program that
includes training in the following subjects: Cardiovascular anatomy
and physiology, pharmacology, radiation physics and safety, radiation
imaging and positioning, medical recordkeeping, and multicultural
health as required by RCW 43.70.615(3);
(ii) Satisfactory completion of a cardiovascular invasive
specialist examination approved by the secretary. For purposes of this
subsection (1)(c)(ii), the secretary may approve an examination
administered by a national credentialing organization for
cardiovascular invasive specialists; and
(iii) Good moral character.
(2) Applicants shall be subject to the grounds for denial or
issuance of a conditional license under chapter 18.130 RCW.
(3) The secretary shall establish by rule what constitutes adequate
proof of meeting the requirements for certification and for designation
of certification in a particular field of radiologic technology.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.84 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Until July 1, 2012, the secretary shall, in addition to
certificates issued under RCW 18.84.080, issue a cardiovascular
invasive specialist certificate to any person who:
(a) Has held a health care credential in good standing issued by
the department for at least five years; and
(b) Has at least five years, with at least one thousand hours per
year, of prior experience in cardiac or vascular catheterization during
the period of time the person held the health care credential under (a)
of this subsection.
(2) A person certified as a cardiovascular invasive specialist
under this section is subject to the same renewal requirements as all
other certified cardiovascular invasive specialists, but shall not be
subject to the education and examination requirements, unless he or she
allows his or her certification to expire without renewal for more than
one year. If the person allows his or her certification to expire
without renewal for more than one year, he or she must meet the same
education and examination requirements as all other certified
cardiovascular invasive specialists before being issued a new
certification.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 18.84 RCW
to read as follows:
Nothing in this chapter may be construed to prohibit or restrict
practice by a regularly enrolled student in a cardiovascular invasive
specialist program approved by the secretary whose practice is pursuant
to a regular course of instruction or assignments. Persons practicing
under this section must be clearly identified as students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Nothing in this act shall be interpreted to
alter the scope of practice of any other credentialed health profession
or to limit the ability of any other credentialed health professional
to assist in cardiac or vascular catheterization if such assistance is
within the professional's scope of practice.

--- END ---