BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that a critical factor in the eventual
successful outcome of a K-12 education is for students to begin school
ready, both intellectually and socially, to learn. The legislature
also finds that, due to a variety of factors, disadvantaged young
children need supplemental instruction in preschool to assure that they
have the opportunity to meaningfully participate and reach the
necessary levels of achievement in the regular program of basic
education. Therefore the legislature intends to establish a program of
early learning for at-risk children and intends to include this program
within the overall program of basic education.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, with
the support and assistance from the department of early learning, shall
convene a working group to develop the basic education program of early
learning. The early learning working group shall be composed of
representatives from head start and early childhood education and
assistance program providers, school districts, thrive by five
Washington, and other stakeholders with expertise in early learning.
The working group may convene advisory subgroups on specific topics as
necessary to assure participation and input from a broad array of
diverse stakeholders.
(3) The early learning working group shall continue the preliminary
work of the department of early learning under RCW 43.215.125 to
develop a proposal for a statewide Washington head start program. The
working group shall:
(a) Recommend student eligibility criteria that focus on children
age three and four considered most at-risk;
(b) Develop options for a service delivery system that includes
school districts, educational service districts, community and
technical colleges, and public and private nonsectarian organizations;
(c) Develop options for shared governance that include the
superintendent of public instruction and the department of early
learning each with appropriate supervisory and administrative
responsibilities;
(d) Develop recommended parameters and minimum standards for the
program; and
(e) Continue development of a statewide kindergarten assessment
process.
(4) The early learning working group shall be monitored and
overseen by the quality education council established in RCW
28A.290.010 and shall submit progress reports to the council by
September 1, 2010, and September 1, 2011, with a final report by
September 1, 2012.

--- END ---