BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any person who is a male citizen or noncitizen of the United
States, who applies for an original, the renewal of, or a replacement
instruction permit, intermediate license, driver's license, or
identicard under this chapter, and who is under the age of twenty-six,
must be given the opportunity to register as required by the military
selective service act (62 Stat. 604; 50 App. U.S.C. Sec. 451 et seq.),
as amended.
(2) The submission of an application by an applicant under
subsection (1) of this section indicates that:
(a) The applicant has already registered with the selective service
system;
(b) The applicant authorizes the department to forward to the
selective service system the necessary personal information required
for registration into the system; or
(c) The applicant declines registration for purposes of the
military selective service act (62 Stat. 604; 50 App. U.S.C. Sec. 451
et seq.), as amended, in conjunction with the submission of an
application under subsection (1) of this section.
(3)(a) The department shall forward electronically any necessary
personal information of the applicant to the selective service system
within ten days of receipt of the application, as authorized under
subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(b) When applicable, the department shall notify the applicant at
the time of application submission that, by submitting the application,
the applicant authorizes the department to register the applicant with
the selective service system. If the applicant is under the age of
eighteen at the time of application, the department shall notify the
applicant that he will be registered with the selective service system
as required by federal law. When providing notice under this
subsection (3)(b), the department shall provide the applicant with
materials containing the following statement:

"By submitting this application, I am consenting to registration
with the Selective Service System, if so required by federal law. If
under age 18, I understand that I will be registered as required by
federal law when I attain age 18."

(4) The department may not deny the issuance of an instruction
permit, intermediate license, driver's license, or identicard if the
applicant declines to register with the selective service system,
provided that the applicant meets all other requirements of this
chapter.
(5) The department may provide selective service system
registration information to applicants who choose to decline the
opportunity to register with the selective service system.
(6) The department may adopt rules as necessary to implement this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2010, in the omnibus transportation appropriations act, this
act is null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect January 1, 2011.

--- END ---