BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.51A.040 and 2007 c 371 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a law enforcement officer determines that marijuana is being
possessed lawfully under the medical marijuana law, the officer may
document the amount of marijuana, take a representative sample that is
large enough to test, but not seize the marijuana. A law enforcement
officer or agency shall not be held civilly liable for failure to seize
marijuana in this circumstance.
(2) If charged with a violation of state law relating to marijuana,
any qualifying patient who is engaged in the medical use of marijuana,
or any designated provider who assists a qualifying patient in the
medical use of marijuana, will be deemed to have established an
affirmative defense to such charges by proof of his or her compliance
with the requirements provided in this chapter. Any person meeting the
requirements appropriate to his or her status under this chapter shall
be considered to have engaged in activities permitted by this chapter
and shall not be penalized in any manner, or denied any right or
privilege, for such actions.
(3) A qualifying patient, if eighteen years of age or older, or a
designated provider shall:
(a) Meet all criteria for status as a qualifying patient or
designated provider;
(b) Possess no more marijuana than is necessary for the patient's
personal, medical use, not exceeding the amount necessary for a sixty-day supply; and
(c) Present his or her valid documentation to any law enforcement
official who questions the patient or provider regarding his or her
medical use of marijuana.
(4) A qualifying patient, if under eighteen years of age at the
time he or she is alleged to have committed the offense, shall
demonstrate compliance with subsection (3)(a) and (c) of this section.
However, any possession under subsection (3)(b) of this section, as
well as any production, acquisition, and decision as to dosage and
frequency of use, shall be the responsibility of the parent or legal
guardian of the qualifying patient.
(5) The affirmative defense established in subsection (2) of this
section shall not be available to a qualifying patient if:
(a) Marijuana is listed as a Schedule I controlled substance under
state or federal law; or
(b) The marijuana in question was not produced in compliance with
all applicable state and federal product safety laws.

--- END ---