BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.78.010 and 2006 c 59 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that the demands of the workplace and of
families need to be balanced to promote family stability and economic
security. Workplace leave policies are desirable to accommodate
changes in the workforce such as rising numbers of dual-career couples,
working single parents, and an aging population. In addition, given
the mobility of American society, many people no longer have available
community or family support networks and therefore need additional
flexibility in the workplace. The legislature declares it to be in the
public interest to provide reasonable leave for medical reasons, for
the birth or placement of a child, ((and)) for the care of a family
member who has a serious health condition, and for participating in a
child's educational activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 49.78 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to other leave to which an employee is entitled
under this chapter or federal law, an employee is entitled to a total
of four hours of unpaid leave during any twelve-month period to attend
or otherwise participate in a child's educational activities.
(2) Leave under this section is subject to the following
conditions:
(a) The time of the leave must be mutually agreed upon by the
employer and the employee;
(b) An employer may require an employee to provide the employer
with a written request for leave at least forty-eight hours before the
anticipated time of the leave;
(c) An employer may require an employee to furnish written
verification from the child's school that the employee attended or
otherwise participated in the child's educational activities during the
time of the leave; and
(d) An employee is limited to a total of four hours of unpaid leave
during any twelve-month period for the purpose specified in subsection
(1) of this section, regardless of whether the employee has one or more
children.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) "Employee" means any person who is employed by an employer.
(b) "Employer" means: (i) Any person, firm, corporation,
partnership, business trust, legal representative, or other business
entity that engages in any business, industry, profession, or activity
in this state; (ii) the state, state institutions, and state agencies;
and (iii) any unit of local government.
(c) "School" means any: (i) Public school; (ii) private school;
(iii) preschool; and (iv) child care center licensed under chapter
43.215 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---