BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.12.037 and 2000 c 107 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the commission
may acquire by gift, easement, purchase, lease, or condemnation lands,
buildings, water rights, rights-of-way, or other necessary property,
and construct and maintain necessary facilities for purposes consistent
with this title. The commission may authorize the director to acquire
property ((under)) consistent with this section, but the power of
condemnation may only be exercised by the director when an
appropriation has been made by the legislature for the acquisition of
a specific property, except to clear title and acquire access
rights-of-way.
(2) The commission may sell, lease, convey, or grant concessions
upon real or personal property under the control of the department.
(3)(a) The authority of the commission to purchase undeveloped real
property is limited to instances when, prior to assuming title to the
property, the department has developed a long-term noxious weed
management plan for the property in question. If an initial long-term
noxious weed management plan, completed consistent with this section,
is not approved by the commission before the closing date of the sale
in question, no agency of state government may release any funds
required to complete the real estate transaction.
(b) Any long-term noxious weed management plan adopted by the
department under this section must include the identification of a
dedicated funding source to allow for the execution of the management
plan. The department may identify a bond or other financial guarantee
as a qualifying dedicated funding source. However, the dedicated
funding source must not be contingent on future legislative
appropriations. The department may seek out and accept dedicated
funding from the federal government or a local government or charitable
donations from nonprofit organizations, citizens, or private sector
businesses to support any financial guarantees identified in the weed
management plan.

--- END ---