BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.51 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A nursing home licensed under this chapter shall notify the
department of health of any known invasive infection caused by
methicillin-resistant staphylococcus aureus occurring within the
facility.
(2) The department of health shall adopt rules requiring nursing
homes to submit the information in subsection (1) of this section in
the same manner as other conditions of which nursing homes are required
to notify the department of health.

--- END ---