BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.64.044 and 2005 c 388 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A shopkeeper registered as provided in this section may sell
nonprescription drugs, if such drugs are sold in the original package
of the manufacturer.
(2) Every shopkeeper not a licensed pharmacist, desiring to secure
the benefits and privileges of this section, is hereby required to
register as a shopkeeper through the master license system, and he or
she shall pay the fee determined by the secretary for registration, and
on a date to be determined by the secretary thereafter the fee
determined by the secretary for renewal of the registration; and shall
at all times keep said registration or the current renewal thereof
conspicuously exposed in the location to which it applies. In event
such shopkeeper's registration is not renewed by the master license
expiration date, no renewal or new registration shall be issued except
upon payment of the registration renewal fee and the master license
delinquency fee under chapter 19.02 RCW. This registration fee shall
not authorize the sale of legend drugs or controlled substances.
(3) The registration fees determined by the secretary under
subsection (2) of this section shall not exceed the cost of registering
the shopkeeper.
(4) Any shopkeeper who shall vend or sell, or offer to sell to the
public any such nonprescription drug or preparation without having
registered to do so as provided in this section, shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor and each sale or offer to sell shall constitute a separate
offense.
(5) A shopkeeper ((who is not)) must be a licensed pharmacy ((may))
to purchase products containing any detectable quantity of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or
salts of isomers, only from a wholesaler licensed by the department
under RCW 18.64.046 or from a manufacturer licensed by the department
under RCW 18.64.045. The board shall issue a warning to a shopkeeper
who violates this subsection, and may suspend or revoke the
registration of the shopkeeper for a subsequent violation.
(6) A shopkeeper with a valid pharmacy license who has purchased
products containing any detectable quantity of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or
salts of isomers, in a suspicious transaction as defined in RCW
69.43.035, is subject to the following requirements:
(a) The shopkeeper may not sell any quantity of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or
salts of isomers, if the total monthly sales of these products exceed
ten percent of the shopkeeper's total prior monthly sales of
nonprescription drugs in March through October. In November through
February, the shopkeeper may not sell any quantity of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or
salts of isomers, if the total monthly sales of these products exceed
twenty percent of the shopkeeper's total prior monthly sales of
nonprescription drugs. For purposes of this section, "monthly sales"
means total dollars paid by buyers. The board may suspend or revoke
the registration of a shopkeeper who violates this subsection.
(b) The shopkeeper shall maintain inventory records of the receipt
and disposition of nonprescription drugs, utilizing existing inventory
controls if an auditor or investigator can determine compliance with
(a) of this subsection, and otherwise in the form and manner required
by the board. The records must be available for inspection by the
board or any law enforcement agency and must be maintained for two
years. The board may suspend or revoke the registration of a
shopkeeper who violates this subsection. For purposes of this
subsection, "disposition" means the return of product to the wholesaler
or distributor.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.64.046 and 2005 c 388 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The owner of each place of business which sells legend drugs
and nonprescription drugs, or nonprescription drugs at wholesale shall
pay a license fee to be determined by the secretary, and thereafter, on
or before a date to be determined by the secretary as provided in RCW
43.70.250 and 43.70.280, a like fee to be determined by the secretary,
for which the owner shall receive a license of location from the
department, which shall entitle such owner to either sell legend drugs
and nonprescription drugs or nonprescription drugs at wholesale at the
location specified for the period ending on a date to be determined by
the secretary, and each such owner shall at the time of payment of such
fee file with the department, on a blank therefor provided, a
declaration of ownership and location, which declaration of ownership
and location so filed as aforesaid shall be deemed presumptive evidence
of the ownership of such place of business mentioned therein. It shall
be the duty of the owner to notify immediately the department of any
change of location and ownership and to keep the license of location or
the renewal thereof properly exhibited in such place of business.
(2) Failure to conform with this section is a misdemeanor, and each
day that the failure continues is a separate offense.
(3) In event the license fee remains unpaid on the date due, no
renewal or new license shall be issued except upon compliance with
administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees
determined as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.
(4) No wholesaler may sell any quantity of drug products containing
ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or their salts,
isomers, or salts of isomers, if the total monthly sales of these
products to persons within the state of Washington exceed five percent
of the wholesaler's total prior monthly sales of nonprescription drugs
to persons within the state in March through October. In November
through February, no wholesaler may sell any quantity of drug products
containing ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their
salts, isomers, or salts of isomers if the total monthly sales of these
products to persons within the state of Washington exceed ten percent
of the wholesaler's total prior monthly sales of nonprescription drugs
to persons within the state. For purposes of this section, monthly
sales means total dollars paid by buyers. The board may suspend or
revoke the license of any wholesaler that violates this section.
(5) The board may exempt a wholesaler from the limitations of
subsection (4) of this section if it finds that the wholesaler
distributes nonprescription drugs only through transactions between
divisions, subsidiaries, or related companies when the wholesaler and
the retailer are related by common ownership, and that neither the
wholesaler nor the retailer has a history of suspicious transactions in
precursor drugs as defined in RCW 69.43.035.
(6) The requirements for a license apply to all persons, in
Washington and outside of Washington, who sell both legend drugs and
nonprescription drugs and to those who sell only nonprescription drugs,
at wholesale to pharmacies, practitioners, and shopkeepers in
Washington.
(7)(a) No wholesaler may sell any product containing any detectable
quantity of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or their
salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, to any person in Washington other
than a pharmacy licensed under this chapter((, a shopkeeper or
itinerant vendor registered under this chapter,)) or a practitioner as
defined in RCW 18.64.011((, or a traditional Chinese herbal
practitioner as defined in RCW 69.43.105)).
(b) A violation of this subsection is punishable as a class C
felony according to chapter 9A.20 RCW, and each sale in violation of
this subsection constitutes a separate offense.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.64.047 and 2005 c 388 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any itinerant vendor or any peddler of any nonprescription drug
or preparation for the treatment of disease or injury, shall pay a
registration fee determined by the secretary on a date to be determined
by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. The
department may issue a registration to such vendor on an approved
application made to the department.
(2) Any itinerant vendor or peddler who shall vend or sell, or
offer to sell to the public any such nonprescription drug or
preparation without having registered to do so as provided in this
section, is guilty of a misdemeanor and each sale or offer to sell
shall constitute a separate offense.
(3) In event the registration fee remains unpaid on the date due,
no renewal or new registration shall be issued except upon compliance
with administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees
determined as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. This
registration shall not authorize the sale of legend drugs or controlled
substances.
(((4) An itinerant vendor may purchase products containing any
detectable quantity of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers only
from a wholesaler licensed by the department under RCW 18.64.046 or
from a manufacturer licensed by the department under RCW 18.64.045.
The board shall issue a warning to an itinerant vendor who violates
this subsection, and may suspend or revoke the registration of the
vendor for a subsequent violation.
(5) An itinerant vendor who has purchased products containing any
detectable quantity of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, in
a suspicious transaction as defined in RCW 69.43.035, is subject to the
following requirements:
(a) The itinerant vendor may not sell any quantity of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or
salts of isomers, if the total monthly sales of these products exceed
ten percent of the vendor's total prior monthly sales of
nonprescription drugs in March through October. In November through
February, the vendor may not sell any quantity of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or
salts of isomers, if the total monthly sales of these products exceed
twenty percent of the vendor's total prior monthly sales of
nonprescription drugs. For purposes of this section, "monthly sales"
means total dollars paid by buyers. The board may suspend or revoke
the registration of an itinerant vendor who violates this subsection.
(b) The itinerant vendor shall maintain inventory records of the
receipt and disposition of nonprescription drugs, utilizing existing
inventory controls if an auditor or investigator can determine
compliance with (a) of this subsection, and otherwise in the form and
manner required by the board. The records must be available for
inspection by the board or any law enforcement agency and must be
maintained for two years. The board may suspend or revoke the
registration of an itinerant vendor who violates this subsection. For
purposes of this subsection, "disposition" means the return of product
to the wholesaler or distributor.))

Sec. 4 RCW 69.43.043 and 2001 c 96 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any manufacturer or wholesaler who sells, transfers, or
otherwise furnishes any substance specified in RCW 69.43.010(1) to any
person shall maintain a record of each such sale or transfer. The
records must contain:
(a) The name of the substance;
(b) The quantity of the substance sold, transferred, or furnished;
(c) The date the substance was sold, transferred, or furnished;
(d) The name and address of the person buying or receiving the
substance; and
(e) The method of and amount of payment for the substance.
(2) The records of sales and transfers required by this section
shall be available for inspection by the state board of pharmacy
((and)), its authorized representatives, and law enforcement agencies,
and shall be maintained for two years.
(3) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 5 RCW 69.43.090 and 2001 c 96 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any manufacturer, wholesaler, retailer, or other person who
sells, transfers, or otherwise furnishes any substance specified in RCW
69.43.010 to any person or who receives from a source outside of the
state any substance specified in RCW 69.43.010 shall obtain a permit
for the conduct of that business from the state board of pharmacy.
((However, a permit shall not be required of any manufacturer,
wholesaler, retailer, or other person for the sale, transfer,
furnishing, or receipt of any drug that contains ephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or of any cosmetic that
contains a substance specified in RCW 69.43.010(1), if such drug or
cosmetic is lawfully sold, transferred, or furnished over the counter
without a prescription or by a prescription under chapter 69.04 or
69.41 RCW.))
(2) Applications for permits shall be filed with the department in
writing and signed by the applicant, and shall set forth the name of
the applicant, the business in which the applicant is engaged, the
business address of the applicant, and a full description of any
substance sold, transferred, or otherwise furnished, or received.
(3) The board may grant permits on forms prescribed by it. The
permits shall be effective for not more than one year from the date of
issuance.
(4) Each applicant shall pay at the time of filing an application
for a permit a fee determined by the department.
(5) A permit granted under this chapter may be renewed on a date to
be determined by the board, and annually thereafter, upon the filing of
a renewal application and the payment of a permit renewal fee
determined by the department.
(6) Permit fees charged by the department shall not exceed the
costs incurred by the department in administering this chapter.
(7) Selling, transferring, or otherwise furnishing, or receiving
any substance specified in RCW 69.43.010 without a required permit, is
a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 69.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board shall adopt rules to take effect on January 1, 2011,
to classify ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, and phenylpropanolamine as
legend drugs and Schedule III controlled substances.
(2)(a) This section does not apply to products that the board, upon
application of a manufacturer, exempts by rule because the product is
formulated to effectively prevent conversion of the active ingredient
into methamphetamine or its salts or precursors. The board shall
collaborate with the forensic laboratory services bureau of the
Washington state patrol during the rule-making process.
(b) Upon notification of the forensic laboratory services bureau of
the Washington state patrol that it has probable cause to believe that
a product exempted under (a) of this subsection does not effectively
prevent conversion of the active ingredient into methamphetamine or its
salts or precursors, the board may issue a summary suspension of the
exemption for the product pending the completion of the rule-making
process to permanently revoke the exemption.
(3) Records of transactions involving products containing
ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine are subject to
inspection by the board and law enforcement agencies. A person
required to make or maintain records of transactions involving products
containing ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine shall
forward the records to a law enforcement agency if directed to do so by
that agency.

Sec. 7 RCW 69.50.4013 and 2003 c 53 s 334 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person to possess a controlled substance
unless the substance was obtained directly from, or pursuant to, a
valid prescription or order of a practitioner while acting in the
course of his or her professional practice, or except as otherwise
authorized by this chapter.
(2) It is an affirmative defense that the defendant must prove by
a preponderance of the evidence to a charge of violating subsection (1)
of this section by unlawfully possessing ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine that the person:
(a) Obtained the ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine
lawfully prior to January 1, 2011;
(b) Possessed no more than six grams of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine,
or phenylpropanolamine, the salts, isomers, or salts of isomers of
ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or a combination of
any of these substances; and
(c) Possessed the ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine under circumstances that are consistent with
typical medicinal or household use, as indicated by factors that
include, but are not limited to, storage location, purchase date,
possession of the products in a variety of strengths, brands, types, or
purposes, and expiration dates.
(3) Except as provided in RCW 69.50.4014, any person who violates
this section is guilty of a class C felony punishable under chapter
9A.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 69.43.105 (Ephedrine, pseudoephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine -- Sales restrictions--Exceptions -- Penalty) and 2005
c 388 s 2;
(2) RCW 69.43.110 (Ephedrine, pseudoephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine -- Sales restrictions -- Penalty) and 2005 c 388 s 4,
2004 c 52 s 5, & 2001 c 96 s 9;
(3) RCW 69.43.120 (Ephedrine, pseudoephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine -- Possession of more than fifteen grams -- Penalty--Exceptions) and 2001 c 96 s 10;
(4) RCW 69.43.130 (Exemptions--Pediatric products--Products
exempted by the state board of pharmacy) and 2004 c 52 s 7 & 2001 c 96
s 11; and
(5) RCW 69.43.170 (Ephedrine, pseudoephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine -- Pilot project to record retail transactions--Penalty) and 2005 c 388 s 8.

--- END ---