BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Sexual abuse is one of the most
difficult crimes to detect and prosecute, in large part because there
often are no witnesses except the victim. A defendant generally has
the right, under the Sixth Amendment, to demand the physical presence,
at trial, of accusatory witnesses. Courts have held that this right is
not absolute and that in some cases, the defendant's right may be
outweighed where necessary to further an important public policy and
only where the reliability of the testimony is otherwise assured.
Courts have held that a state's interest in the physical and
psychological well-being of child abuse victims may be sufficiently
important to outweigh, at least in some cases, a defendant's right to
face his or her accusers in court.
(2) A defendant also has a right to represent himself or herself in
criminal proceedings. The right to appear pro se exists to affirm the
dignity and autonomy of the accused and to allow the presentation of
what may be the accused's best possible defense. Courts have held that
the right to self-representation is not infringed when the defendant
has a fair chance to present his or her case in the defendant's own way
and to make his or her voice heard. The right to self-representation
is also not an absolute right and courts have required the assistance
of standby counsel in some situations. In addition, courts are
entitled to control the mode of witness interrogation so as to more
effectively ascertain the truth and to protect the witness from
harassment or undue embarrassment to the extent the defendant's rights
are not violated.
(3) The legislature declares that the state has a compelling
interest in the physical and psychological well-being of victims of sex
offenses. The legislature intends to help protect victims of sex
offenses during the questioning of the victim by pro se defendants in
criminal proceedings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) When a defendant has waived his or her
right to counsel and is representing himself or herself in a criminal
trial, the court, on a motion by the prosecuting attorney and pursuant
to this section, may restrict the defendant from directly questioning
a victim and instead require that the defendant question the victim
through a court-appointed attorney.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section applies when:
(a) The proceeding is a criminal prosecution for a sex offense, as
defined in this chapter, allegedly committed by the defendant or
committed at the direction of the defendant against the victim;
(b) The victim's testimony will describe an act or attempted act of
sexual contact or sexual intercourse performed with or on the victim by
the defendant or performed with or on the victim by another person at
the defendant's direction; and
(c) The court finds by substantial evidence, in a hearing conducted
outside the presence of the jury, that requiring the victim to be
questioned directly by the defendant will cause the victim to suffer
serious emotional or mental distress that will prevent the victim from
reasonably communicating at the trial.
(3) The court shall enter its findings under subsection (2) of this
section in writing.
(4) The court shall allow the defendant to prepare the questions to
be asked and prepare any follow-up questions. Subject to court
procedures and rules of evidence, the court-appointed attorney shall
ask the victim witness the questions as prepared by the defendant.
(5) The court shall allow the defendant to communicate with the
court-appointed attorney during the questioning of the victim and allow
for follow up questions to be provided by the defendant to the court-appointed attorney.
(6) If a court-appointed attorney is used for the purpose of
questioning the victim under this section, the defendant is still
deemed to be acting pro se during that portion of the proceeding for
the purposes of applying RCW 9A.44.150.
(7) If a court-appointed attorney is used for the purpose of
questioning the victim under this section, the court shall explain to
the jury that the defendant is continuing to represent himself or
herself and that the defendant composed the questions asked by the
court-appointed attorney.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) If the court does not appoint an
attorney for the purposes of questioning a victim witness because
section 2(2)(c) of this act has not been met, the court may impose
reasonable procedures upon the parties for conducting the questioning
to avoid trauma to the victim.
(2) Reasonable procedures may include, but are not limited to,
prohibiting the defendant from approaching the victim during the
defendant's questioning or ordering that the defendant remain seated
the entire time the defendant is questioning the victim.
(3) Nothing in this section or section 2 of this act limits the
authority of the court to exercise reasonable control over the mode and
order of interrogating witnesses and presenting evidence in any
proceeding and to maintain order in the court room.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 2 and 3 of this act are each added
to chapter 9A.44 RCW.

--- END ---