BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.34.010 and 1957 c 43 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing in this chapter shall:
(1) Be construed to limit or restrict a duly licensed physician or
optometrist or employees working under the personal supervision of a
duly licensed physician or optometrist from the practices enumerated in
this chapter, and each such licensed physician and optometrist shall
have all the rights and privileges which may accrue under this chapter
to dispensing opticians licensed hereunder;
(2) Be construed to prohibit or restrict practice by a regularly
enrolled student in a prescribed course in opticianry in a college or
university approved by the secretary whose performance of services is
pursuant to a regular course of instruction or assignments from an
instructor and under the supervision of a licensed dispensing optician,
optometrist, or ophthalmologist: PROVIDED, That persons practicing
under this section must be clearly identified as students;
(3) Be construed to prohibit an unlicensed person from performing
mechanical work upon inert matter in an optical office, laboratory or
shop;
(((3))) (4) Be construed to prohibit an unlicensed person from
engaging in the sale of spectacles, eyeglasses, magnifying glasses,
goggles, sunglasses, telescopes, binoculars, or any such articles which
are completely preassembled and sold only as merchandise;
(((4))) (5) Be construed to authorize or permit a licensee
hereunder to hold himself out as being able to, or to offer to, or to
undertake to attempt, by any manner of means, to examine or exercise
eyes, diagnose, treat, correct, relieve, operate or prescribe for any
human ailment, deficiency, deformity, disease or injury.

--- END ---