BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.212 and 2007 c 83 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The driver of any motor vehicle, upon approaching an emergency
zone, which is defined as the adjacent lanes of the roadway two hundred
feet before and after (a) a stationary authorized emergency vehicle
that is making use of audible and/or visual signals meeting the
requirements of RCW 46.37.190, (b) a tow truck that is making use of
visual red lights meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.196, (c) other
vehicles providing roadside assistance that are making use of warning
lights with three hundred sixty degree visibility, or (d) a police
vehicle properly and lawfully displaying a flashing, blinking, or
alternating emergency light or lights, shall:
(((1))) (i) On a highway having four or more lanes, at least two of
which are intended for traffic proceeding in the same direction as the
approaching vehicle, proceed with caution and, if reasonable, with due
regard for safety and traffic conditions, yield the right-of-way by
making a lane change or moving away from the lane or shoulder occupied
by the stationary authorized emergency vehicle or police vehicle;
(((2))) (ii) On a highway having less than four lanes, proceed with
caution, reduce the speed of the vehicle, and, if reasonable, with due
regard for safety and traffic conditions, and under the rules of this
chapter, yield the right-of-way by passing to the left at a safe
distance and simultaneously yield the right-of-way to all vehicles
traveling in the proper direction upon the highway; or
(((3))) (iii) If changing lanes or moving away would be
unreasonable or unsafe, proceed with due caution and reduce the speed
of the vehicle.
(2) A person may not drive a vehicle in an emergency zone at a
speed greater than the posted speed limit.
(3) A person found to be in violation of this section, or any
infraction relating to speed restrictions in an emergency zone, must be
assessed a monetary penalty equal to twice the penalty assessed under
RCW 46.63.110. This penalty may not be waived, reduced, or suspended.
(4) A person who drives a vehicle in an emergency zone in such a
manner as to endanger or be likely to endanger any emergency zone
worker or property is guilty of reckless endangerment of emergency zone
workers. A violation of this subsection is a gross misdemeanor
punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(5) The department shall suspend for sixty days the driver's
license, permit to drive, or nonresident driving privilege of a person
convicted of reckless endangerment of emergency zone workers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The state patrol and the department of
transportation shall conduct education and outreach efforts regarding
emergency zones, including drivers' obligations in emergency zones and
the penalties for violating these obligations, for at least ninety days
after the effective date of this act. The education and outreach
efforts must include the use of department of transportation variable
message signs.
(2) This section expires June 30, 2011.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.63.020 and 2009 c 485 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Failure to perform any act required or the performance of any act
prohibited by this title or an equivalent administrative regulation or
local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution relating to traffic
including parking, standing, stopping, and pedestrian offenses, is
designated as a traffic infraction and may not be classified as a
criminal offense, except for an offense contained in the following
provisions of this title or a violation of an equivalent administrative
regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution:
(1) RCW 46.09.120(2) relating to the operation of a nonhighway
vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a
controlled substance;
(2) RCW 46.09.130 relating to operation of nonhighway vehicles;
(3) RCW 46.10.090(2) relating to the operation of a snowmobile
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or narcotics or habit-forming drugs or in a manner endangering the person of another;
(4) RCW 46.10.130 relating to the operation of snowmobiles;
(5) Chapter 46.12 RCW relating to certificates of ownership and
registration and markings indicating that a vehicle has been destroyed
or declared a total loss;
(6) RCW 46.16.010 relating to the nonpayment of taxes and fees by
failure to register a vehicle and falsifying residency when registering
a motor vehicle;
(7) RCW 46.16.011 relating to permitting unauthorized persons to
drive;
(8) RCW 46.16.160 relating to vehicle trip permits;
(9) RCW 46.16.381(2) relating to knowingly providing false
information in conjunction with an application for a special placard or
license plate for disabled persons' parking;
(10) RCW 46.20.005 relating to driving without a valid driver's
license;
(11) RCW 46.20.091 relating to false statements regarding a
driver's license or instruction permit;
(12) RCW 46.20.0921 relating to the unlawful possession and use of
a driver's license;
(13) RCW 46.20.342 relating to driving with a suspended or revoked
license or status;
(14) RCW 46.20.345 relating to the operation of a motor vehicle
with a suspended or revoked license;
(15) RCW 46.20.410 relating to the violation of restrictions of an
occupational driver's license, temporary restricted driver's license,
or ignition interlock driver's license;
(16) RCW 46.20.740 relating to operation of a motor vehicle without
an ignition interlock device in violation of a license notation that
the device is required;
(17) RCW 46.20.750 relating to circumventing an ignition interlock
device;
(18) RCW 46.25.170 relating to commercial driver's licenses;
(19) Chapter 46.29 RCW relating to financial responsibility;
(20) RCW 46.30.040 relating to providing false evidence of
financial responsibility;
(21) RCW 46.37.435 relating to wrongful installation of
sunscreening material;
(22) RCW 46.37.650 relating to the sale, resale, distribution, or
installation of a previously deployed air bag;
(23) RCW 46.37.671 through 46.37.675 relating to signal preemption
devices;
(24) RCW 46.44.180 relating to operation of mobile home pilot
vehicles;
(25) RCW 46.48.175 relating to the transportation of dangerous
articles;
(26) RCW 46.52.010 relating to duty on striking an unattended car
or other property;
(27) RCW 46.52.020 relating to duty in case of injury to or death
of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;
(28) RCW 46.52.090 relating to reports by repairmen, storagemen,
and appraisers;
(29) RCW 46.52.130 relating to confidentiality of the driving
record to be furnished to an insurance company, an employer, and an
alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agency;
(30) RCW 46.55.020 relating to engaging in the activities of a
registered tow truck operator without a registration certificate;
(31) RCW 46.55.035 relating to prohibited practices by tow truck
operators;
(32) RCW 46.55.300 relating to vehicle immobilization;
(33) RCW 46.61.015 relating to obedience to police officers,
flaggers, or firefighters;
(34) RCW 46.61.020 relating to refusal to give information to or
cooperate with an officer;
(35) RCW 46.61.022 relating to failure to stop and give
identification to an officer;
(36) RCW 46.61.024 relating to attempting to elude pursuing police
vehicles;
(37) RCW 46.61.212(4) relating to reckless endangerment of
emergency zone workers;
(38) RCW 46.61.500 relating to reckless driving;
(((38))) (39) RCW 46.61.502 and 46.61.504 relating to persons under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;
(((39))) (40) RCW 46.61.503 relating to a person under age twenty-one driving a motor vehicle after consuming alcohol;
(((40))) (41) RCW 46.61.520 relating to vehicular homicide by motor
vehicle;
(((41))) (42) RCW 46.61.522 relating to vehicular assault;
(((42))) (43) RCW 46.61.5249 relating to first degree negligent
driving;
(((43))) (44) RCW 46.61.527(4) relating to reckless endangerment of
roadway workers;
(((44))) (45) RCW 46.61.530 relating to racing of vehicles on
highways;
(((45))) (46) RCW 46.61.655(7) (a) and (b) relating to failure to
secure a load;
(((46))) (47) RCW 46.61.685 relating to leaving children in an
unattended vehicle with the motor running;
(((47))) (48) RCW 46.61.740 relating to theft of motor vehicle
fuel;
(((48))) (49) RCW 46.64.010 relating to unlawful cancellation of or
attempt to cancel a traffic citation;
(((49))) (50) RCW 46.64.048 relating to attempting, aiding,
abetting, coercing, and committing crimes;
(((50))) (51) Chapter 46.65 RCW relating to habitual traffic
offenders;
(((51))) (52) RCW 46.68.010 relating to false statements made to
obtain a refund;
(((52))) (53) RCW 46.35.030 relating to recording device
information;
(((53))) (54) Chapter 46.70 RCW relating to unfair motor vehicle
business practices, except where that chapter provides for the
assessment of monetary penalties of a civil nature;
(((54))) (55) Chapter 46.72 RCW relating to the transportation of
passengers in for hire vehicles;
(((55))) (56) RCW 46.72A.060 relating to limousine carrier
insurance;
(((56))) (57) RCW 46.72A.070 relating to operation of a limousine
without a vehicle certificate;
(((57))) (58) RCW 46.72A.080 relating to false advertising by a
limousine carrier;
(((58))) (59) Chapter 46.80 RCW relating to motor vehicle wreckers;
(((59))) (60) Chapter 46.82 RCW relating to driver's training
schools;
(((60))) (61) RCW 46.87.260 relating to alteration or forgery of a
cab card, letter of authority, or other temporary authority issued
under chapter 46.87 RCW;
(((61))) (62) RCW 46.87.290 relating to operation of an
unregistered or unlicensed vehicle under chapter 46.87 RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.20.342 and 2008 c 282 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person to drive a motor vehicle in this
state while that person is in a suspended or revoked status or when his
or her privilege to drive is suspended or revoked in this or any other
state. Any person who has a valid Washington driver's license is not
guilty of a violation of this section.
(a) A person found to be an habitual offender under chapter 46.65
RCW, who violates this section while an order of revocation issued
under chapter 46.65 RCW prohibiting such operation is in effect, is
guilty of driving while license suspended or revoked in the first
degree, a gross misdemeanor. Upon the first such conviction, the
person shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than ten days.
Upon the second conviction, the person shall be punished by
imprisonment for not less than ninety days. Upon the third or
subsequent conviction, the person shall be punished by imprisonment for
not less than one hundred eighty days. If the person is also convicted
of the offense defined in RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, when both
convictions arise from the same event, the minimum sentence of
confinement shall be not less than ninety days. The minimum sentence
of confinement required shall not be suspended or deferred. A
conviction under this subsection does not prevent a person from
petitioning for reinstatement as provided by RCW 46.65.080.
(b) A person who violates this section while an order of suspension
or revocation prohibiting such operation is in effect and while the
person is not eligible to reinstate his or her driver's license or
driving privilege, other than for a suspension for the reasons
described in (c) of this subsection, is guilty of driving while license
suspended or revoked in the second degree, a gross misdemeanor. This
subsection applies when a person's driver's license or driving
privilege has been suspended or revoked by reason of:
(i) A conviction of a felony in the commission of which a motor
vehicle was used;
(ii) A previous conviction under this section;
(iii) A notice received by the department from a court or diversion
unit as provided by RCW 46.20.265, relating to a minor who has
committed, or who has entered a diversion unit concerning an offense
relating to alcohol, legend drugs, controlled substances, or imitation
controlled substances;
(iv) A conviction of RCW 46.20.410, relating to the violation of
restrictions of an occupational driver's license, a temporary
restricted driver's license, or an ignition interlock driver's license;
(v) A conviction of RCW 46.20.345, relating to the operation of a
motor vehicle with a suspended or revoked license;
(vi) A conviction of RCW 46.52.020, relating to duty in case of
injury to or death of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;
(vii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.024, relating to attempting to
elude pursuing police vehicles;
(viii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.212(4), relating to reckless
endangerment of emergency zone workers;
(ix) A conviction of RCW 46.61.500, relating to reckless driving;
(((ix))) (x) A conviction of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, relating
to a person under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;
(((x))) (xi) A conviction of RCW 46.61.520, relating to vehicular
homicide;
(((xi))) (xii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.522, relating to vehicular
assault;
(((xii))) (xiii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.527(4), relating to
reckless endangerment of roadway workers;
(((xiii))) (xiv) A conviction of RCW 46.61.530, relating to racing
of vehicles on highways;
(((xiv))) (xv) A conviction of RCW 46.61.685, relating to leaving
children in an unattended vehicle with motor running;
(((xv))) (xvi) A conviction of RCW 46.61.740, relating to theft of
motor vehicle fuel;
(((xvi))) (xvii) A conviction of RCW 46.64.048, relating to
attempting, aiding, abetting, coercing, and committing crimes;
(((xvii))) (xviii) An administrative action taken by the department
under chapter 46.20 RCW; or
(((xviii))) (xix) A conviction of a local law, ordinance,
regulation, or resolution of a political subdivision of this state, the
federal government, or any other state, of an offense substantially
similar to a violation included in this subsection.
(c) A person who violates this section when his or her driver's
license or driving privilege is, at the time of the violation,
suspended or revoked solely because (i) the person must furnish proof
of satisfactory progress in a required alcoholism or drug treatment
program, (ii) the person must furnish proof of financial responsibility
for the future as provided by chapter 46.29 RCW, (iii) the person has
failed to comply with the provisions of chapter 46.29 RCW relating to
uninsured accidents, (iv) the person has failed to respond to a notice
of traffic infraction, failed to appear at a requested hearing,
violated a written promise to appear in court, or has failed to comply
with the terms of a notice of traffic infraction or citation, as
provided in RCW 46.20.289, (v) the person has committed an offense in
another state that, if committed in this state, would not be grounds
for the suspension or revocation of the person's driver's license, (vi)
the person has been suspended or revoked by reason of one or more of
the items listed in (b) of this subsection, but was eligible to
reinstate his or her driver's license or driving privilege at the time
of the violation, or (vii) the person has received traffic citations or
notices of traffic infraction that have resulted in a suspension under
RCW 46.20.267 relating to intermediate drivers' licenses, or any
combination of (c)(i) through (vii) of this subsection, is guilty of
driving while license suspended or revoked in the third degree, a
misdemeanor.
(2) Upon receiving a record of conviction of any person or upon
receiving an order by any juvenile court or any duly authorized court
officer of the conviction of any juvenile under this section, the
department shall:
(a) For a conviction of driving while suspended or revoked in the
first degree, as provided by subsection (1)(a) of this section, extend
the period of administrative revocation imposed under chapter 46.65 RCW
for an additional period of one year from and after the date the person
would otherwise have been entitled to apply for a new license or have
his or her driving privilege restored; or
(b) For a conviction of driving while suspended or revoked in the
second degree, as provided by subsection (1)(b) of this section, not
issue a new license or restore the driving privilege for an additional
period of one year from and after the date the person would otherwise
have been entitled to apply for a new license or have his or her
driving privilege restored; or
(c) Not extend the period of suspension or revocation if the
conviction was under subsection (1)(c) of this section. If the
conviction was under subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section and the
court recommends against the extension and the convicted person has
obtained a valid driver's license, the period of suspension or
revocation shall not be extended.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.63.110 and 2009 c 479 s 39 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be
assessed a monetary penalty. No penalty may exceed two hundred and
fifty dollars for each offense unless authorized by this chapter or
title.
(2) The monetary penalty for a violation of (a) RCW 46.55.105(2) is
two hundred fifty dollars for each offense; (b) RCW 46.61.210(1) is
five hundred dollars for each offense. No penalty assessed under this
subsection (2) may be reduced.
(3) The supreme court shall prescribe by rule a schedule of
monetary penalties for designated traffic infractions. This rule shall
also specify the conditions under which local courts may exercise
discretion in assessing fines and penalties for traffic infractions.
The legislature respectfully requests the supreme court to adjust this
schedule every two years for inflation.
(4) There shall be a penalty of twenty-five dollars for failure to
respond to a notice of traffic infraction except where the infraction
relates to parking as defined by local law, ordinance, regulation, or
resolution or failure to pay a monetary penalty imposed pursuant to
this chapter. A local legislative body may set a monetary penalty not
to exceed twenty-five dollars for failure to respond to a notice of
traffic infraction relating to parking as defined by local law,
ordinance, regulation, or resolution. The local court, whether a
municipal, police, or district court, shall impose the monetary penalty
set by the local legislative body.
(5) Monetary penalties provided for in chapter 46.70 RCW which are
civil in nature and penalties which may be assessed for violations of
chapter 46.44 RCW relating to size, weight, and load of motor vehicles
are not subject to the limitation on the amount of monetary penalties
which may be imposed pursuant to this chapter.
(6) Whenever a monetary penalty, fee, cost, assessment, or other
monetary obligation is imposed by a court under this chapter it is
immediately payable. If the court determines, in its discretion, that
a person is not able to pay a monetary obligation in full, and not more
than one year has passed since the later of July 1, 2005, or the date
the monetary obligation initially became due and payable, the court
shall enter into a payment plan with the person, unless the person has
previously been granted a payment plan with respect to the same
monetary obligation, or unless the person is in noncompliance of any
existing or prior payment plan, in which case the court may, at its
discretion, implement a payment plan. If the court has notified the
department that the person has failed to pay or comply and the person
has subsequently entered into a payment plan and made an initial
payment, the court shall notify the department that the infraction has
been adjudicated, and the department shall rescind any suspension of
the person's driver's license or driver's privilege based on failure to
respond to that infraction. "Payment plan," as used in this section,
means a plan that requires reasonable payments based on the financial
ability of the person to pay. The person may voluntarily pay an amount
at any time in addition to the payments required under the payment
plan.
(a) If a payment required to be made under the payment plan is
delinquent or the person fails to complete a community restitution
program on or before the time established under the payment plan,
unless the court determines good cause therefor and adjusts the payment
plan or the community restitution plan accordingly, the court shall
notify the department of the person's failure to meet the conditions of
the plan, and the department shall suspend the person's driver's
license or driving privilege until all monetary obligations, including
those imposed under subsections (3) and (4) of this section, have been
paid, and court authorized community restitution has been completed, or
until the department has been notified that the court has entered into
a new time payment or community restitution agreement with the person.
(b) If a person has not entered into a payment plan with the court
and has not paid the monetary obligation in full on or before the time
established for payment, the court shall notify the department of the
delinquency. The department shall suspend the person's driver's
license or driving privilege until all monetary obligations have been
paid, including those imposed under subsections (3) and (4) of this
section, or until the person has entered into a payment plan under this
section.
(c) If the payment plan is to be administered by the court, the
court may assess the person a reasonable administrative fee to be
wholly retained by the city or county with jurisdiction. The
administrative fee shall not exceed ten dollars per infraction or
twenty-five dollars per payment plan, whichever is less.
(d) Nothing in this section precludes a court from contracting with
outside entities to administer its payment plan system. When outside
entities are used for the administration of a payment plan, the court
may assess the person a reasonable fee for such administrative
services, which fee may be calculated on a periodic, percentage, or
other basis.
(e) If a court authorized community restitution program for
offenders is available in the jurisdiction, the court may allow
conversion of all or part of the monetary obligations due under this
section to court authorized community restitution in lieu of time
payments if the person is unable to make reasonable time payments.
(7) In addition to any other penalties imposed under this section
and not subject to the limitation of subsection (1) of this section, a
person found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be assessed:
(a) A fee of five dollars per infraction. Under no circumstances
shall this fee be reduced or waived. Revenue from this fee shall be
forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the emergency medical
services and trauma care system trust account under RCW 70.168.040;
(b) A fee of ten dollars per infraction. Under no circumstances
shall this fee be reduced or waived. Revenue from this fee shall be
forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the Washington auto
theft prevention authority account; and
(c) A fee of two dollars per infraction. Revenue from this fee
shall be forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the traumatic
brain injury account established in RCW 74.31.060.
(8)(a) In addition to any other penalties imposed under this
section and not subject to the limitation of subsection (1) of this
section, a person found to have committed a traffic infraction other
than of RCW 46.61.527 or 46.61.212 shall be assessed an additional
penalty of twenty dollars. The court may not reduce, waive, or suspend
the additional penalty unless the court finds the offender to be
indigent. If a court authorized community restitution program for
offenders is available in the jurisdiction, the court shall allow
offenders to offset all or a part of the penalty due under this
subsection (8) by participation in the court authorized community
restitution program.
(b) Eight dollars and fifty cents of the additional penalty under
(a) of this subsection shall be remitted to the state treasurer. The
remaining revenue from the additional penalty must be remitted under
chapters 2.08, 3.46, 3.50, 3.62, 10.82, and 35.20 RCW. Money remitted
under this subsection to the state treasurer must be deposited in the
state general fund. The balance of the revenue received by the county
or city treasurer under this subsection must be deposited into the
county or city current expense fund. Moneys retained by the city or
county under this subsection shall constitute reimbursement for any
liabilities under RCW 43.135.060.
(9) If a legal proceeding, such as garnishment, has commenced to
collect any delinquent amount owed by the person for any penalty
imposed by the court under this section, the court may, at its
discretion, enter into a payment plan.
(10) The monetary penalty for violating RCW 46.37.395 is: (a) Two
hundred fifty dollars for the first violation; (b) five hundred dollars
for the second violation; and (c) seven hundred fifty dollars for each
violation thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect January 1, 2011.

--- END ---