BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.506 and 2004 c 68 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon the trial of any civil or criminal action or proceeding
arising out of acts alleged to have been committed by any person while
driving or in actual physical control of a vehicle while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, if the person's alcohol
concentration is less than 0.08, it is evidence that may be considered
with other competent evidence in determining whether the person was
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug.
(2) The breath analysis shall be based upon grams of alcohol per
two hundred ten liters of breath. The foregoing provisions of this
section shall not be construed as limiting the introduction of any
other competent evidence bearing upon the question whether the person
was under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug.
(3) Analysis of the person's blood or breath to be considered valid
under the provisions of this section or RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504
shall have been performed according to methods approved by the state
toxicologist and by an individual possessing a valid permit issued by
the state toxicologist for this purpose. The state toxicologist is
directed to approve satisfactory techniques or methods, to supervise
the examination of individuals to ascertain their qualifications and
competence to conduct such analyses, and to issue permits which shall
be subject to termination or revocation at the discretion of the state
toxicologist.
(4)(a) A breath test performed by any instrument approved by the
state toxicologist shall be admissible at trial or in an administrative
proceeding if the prosecution or department produces prima facie
evidence of the following:
(i) The person who performed the test was authorized to perform
such test by the state toxicologist;
(ii) The person being tested did not vomit or have anything to eat,
drink, or smoke for at least fifteen minutes prior to administration of
the test;
(iii) The person being tested did not have any foreign substances,
not to include dental work, fixed or removable, in his or her mouth at
the beginning of the fifteen-minute observation period;
(iv) Prior to the start of the test, the temperature of ((the)) any
liquid simulator solution utilized as an external standard, as measured
by a thermometer approved of by the state toxicologist was thirty-four
degrees centigrade plus or minus 0.3 degrees centigrade;
(v) The internal standard test resulted in the message "verified";
(vi) The two breath samples agree to within plus or minus ten
percent of their mean to be determined by the method approved by the
state toxicologist;
(vii) The result of the test of the liquid simulator solution
external standard or dry gas external standard result did lie between
.072 to .088 inclusive; and
(viii) All blank tests gave results of .000.
(b) For purposes of this section, "prima facie evidence" is
evidence of sufficient circumstances that would support a logical and
reasonable inference of the facts sought to be proved. In assessing
whether there is sufficient evidence of the foundational facts, the
court or administrative tribunal is to assume the truth of the
prosecution's or department's evidence and all reasonable inferences
from it in a light most favorable to the prosecution or department.
(c) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to prevent the subject
of the test from challenging the reliability or accuracy of the test,
the reliability or functioning of the instrument, or any maintenance
procedures. Such challenges, however, shall not preclude the
admissibility of the test once the prosecution or department has made
a prima facie showing of the requirements contained in (a) of this
subsection. Instead, such challenges may be considered by the trier of
fact in determining what weight to give to the test result.
(5) When a blood test is administered under the provisions of RCW
46.20.308, the withdrawal of blood for the purpose of determining its
alcoholic or drug content may be performed only by a physician, a
registered nurse, a licensed practical nurse, a nursing assistant as
defined in chapter 18.88A RCW, a physician assistant as defined in
chapter 18.71A RCW, a first responder as defined in chapter 18.73 RCW,
an emergency medical technician as defined in chapter 18.73 RCW, a
health care assistant as defined in chapter 18.135 RCW, or any
technician trained in withdrawing blood. This limitation shall not
apply to the taking of breath specimens.
(6) The person tested may have a physician, or a qualified
technician, chemist, registered nurse, or other qualified person of his
or her own choosing administer one or more tests in addition to any
administered at the direction of a law enforcement officer. The test
will be admissible if the person establishes the general acceptability
of the testing technique or method. The failure or inability to obtain
an additional test by a person shall not preclude the admission of
evidence relating to the test or tests taken at the direction of a law
enforcement officer.
(7) Upon the request of the person who shall submit to a test or
tests at the request of a law enforcement officer, full information
concerning the test or tests shall be made available to him or her or
his or her attorney.

--- END ---