BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may not require withdrawals of groundwater to be
metered or measured for wells authorized under the provisions of RCW
90.44.050 constructed prior to the effective date of this section for
single or group domestic uses that do not exceed withdrawing five
thousand gallons a day.
(2) This section does not apply to wells the department has
required to be metered or measured as of the effective date of this
section.

--- END ---