BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there is a lack
of uniformity among landlords concerning access to their tenants by
political candidates or their agents or those advocating for or against
ballot measures. While landlords are under no obligation to allow
physical access to their premises by commercial solicitors, the
legislature finds that political free speech enjoys heightened
protection under the law. The ability of tenants to be full
participants in the political process should not be unreasonably
infringed by a landlord, unless the tenant is aware of such
restrictions at the time of signing his or her rental agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 59.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a
landlord may not unreasonably limit access to his or her premises,
during daylight hours, by political candidates or their agents or those
advocating for or against ballot measures, who seek to have the same
interaction with tenants as they would with residential homeowners.
(2) A written rental agreement that permits the landlord to limit
access to his or her premises by political candidates or their agents
or those advocating for or against ballot measures is valid and
enforceable.
(3) This section may not be construed to allow political candidates
or their agents or those advocating for or against ballot measures
access to the landlord's premises without the consent of the tenant.

--- END ---