BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 80.60.010 and 2007 c 323 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly ((indicates)) requires otherwise.
(1) "Commission" means the utilities and transportation commission.
(2) "Customer-generator" means either: (a) A user of a net
metering system located on the premises of a customer-generator; or (b)
a customer of an electric utility with an assigned fraction of a
virtual net metering system.
(3) "Electrical company" means a company owned by investors that
meets the definition of RCW 80.04.010.
(4) "Electric cooperative" means a cooperative or association
organized under chapter 23.86 or 24.06 RCW.
(5) "Electric utility" means any electrical company, public utility
district, irrigation district, port district, electric cooperative, or
municipal electric utility that is engaged in the business of
distributing electricity to retail electric customers in the state.
(6) "Irrigation district" means an irrigation district under
chapter 87.03 RCW.
(7) "Meter aggregation" means the administrative combination of
readings from and billing for all meters, regardless of the rate class,
on premises owned or leased by a customer-generator located within the
service territory of a single electric utility.
(8) "Municipal electric utility" means a city or town that owns or
operates an electric utility authorized by chapter 35.92 RCW.
(9) "Net metering" means measuring the difference between the
electricity supplied by an electric utility and the electricity
generated by a customer-generator over the applicable billing period.
(10) "Net metering system" means a fuel cell, a facility that
produces electricity and used and useful thermal energy from a common
fuel source, or a facility for the production of electrical energy that
generates renewable energy, and that:
(a)(i) For electric utilities that are not full requirements
customers, has an electrical generating capacity of not more than one
((hundred kilowatts)) megawatt; or
(ii) For electric utilities that are full requirements customers,
either: (A) Has an electrical generating capacity of no more than one
hundred ninety-nine kilowatts and is metered by one meter; or (B) has
an electrical generating capacity of up to one megawatt and is metered
by multiple meters with no meter measuring more than one hundred
ninety-nine kilowatts in electrical generating capacity;
(b) Is located on the customer-generator's premises or, for virtual
net metering, is located within the same electric distribution system
of the customer-generator;
(c) Operates in parallel with the electric utility's transmission
and distribution facilities; and
(d) Is intended primarily to offset part or all of the customer-generator's requirements for electricity.
(11) "Premises" means any residential property, commercial real
estate, or lands, owned or leased by a customer-generator within the
service area of a single electric utility.
(12) "Port district" means a port district within which an
industrial development district has been established as authorized by
Title 53 RCW.
(13) "Public utility district" means a district authorized by
chapter 54.04 RCW.
(14) "Renewable energy" means energy generated by a facility that
uses water, wind, solar energy, biomass, or biogas from animal waste as
a fuel.
(15) "Virtual net metering" means the administrative combination of
readings from the production meter from a single net metering system
and billing for multiple meters, regardless of class, from a group of
customer-generators according to an assigned fraction of that net
metering system for each customer-generator as contracted with a
virtual net metering aggregator. The net metering system and the group
of customer-generators must all be within the same electric
distribution system.
(16) "Virtual net metering aggregator" means an entity that:
(a) Is responsible for professionally managing the net metering
system for the life of the project;
(b) Acts as the sole point of contact with the electric utility,
responsible for maintaining and communicating to the electric utility
a list of assigned fractions and operating fractions of the electrical
output of a net metering system; and
(c) Registers the net metering system with the western renewable
energy generation information system and accounts for all renewable
energy credit transactions on that system.
(17) "Assigned fraction" means the percentage of kilowatt-hours
generated by a net metering system deducted from the electrical
consumption of a customer-generator. Unless there is a voluntary
agreement for smaller fractions, an assigned fraction may not be
smaller than:
(a) One-tenth of a percent (1/1000) and on average produce no less
than one thousand kilowatt-hours annually for utilities with more than
twenty-five thousand ratepayers; or
(b) One percent (1/100) and on average produce no less than two
thousand kilowatt-hours annually for utilities with less than twenty-five thousand ratepayers.
(18) "Operating fraction" means the percentage of kilowatt-hours
generated by a net metering system that is:
(a) Specified by the net metering aggregator;
(b) Not assigned to a customer-generator for virtual net metering;
and
(c) Sold by the virtual net metering aggregator to the utility at
the rates, terms, and conditions that would otherwise apply to a
renewable energy generation system of the same size as the net metering
system.
(19) "Distribution system" means all of the distribution lines,
substations, switches, and other distribution hardware contiguously
connected at voltages below ninety kilovolts that are:
(a) Owned and operated by a single utility; or
(b) Owned and operated by two or more utilities with adjoining
distribution systems agreeing to combine their distribution systems for
the purpose of virtual net metering.
(20) "Full requirements customer" has the same meaning as defined
in RCW 19.280.020.

Sec. 2 RCW 80.60.020 and 2007 c 323 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An electric utility:
(a) Shall offer to make net metering available to eligible
customers-generators on a first-come, first-served basis until the
cumulative generating capacity of net metering systems equals 0.25
percent of the utility's peak demand during 1996. On January 1, 2014,
the cumulative generating capacity available to net metering systems
will equal 0.5 percent of the utility's peak demand during 1996. Not
less than one-half of the utility's 1996 peak demand available for net
metering systems shall be reserved for the cumulative generating
capacity attributable to net metering systems that generate renewable
energy;
(b) Shall allow net metering systems to be interconnected using a
standard kilowatt-hour meter capable of registering the flow of
electricity in two directions, unless the commission, in the case of an
electrical company, or the appropriate governing body, in the case of
other electric utilities, determines, after appropriate notice and
opportunity for comment:
(i) That the use of additional metering equipment to monitor the
flow of electricity in each direction is necessary and appropriate for
the interconnection of net metering systems, after taking into account
the benefits and costs of purchasing and installing additional metering
equipment; and
(ii) How the cost of purchasing and installing an additional meter
is to be allocated between the customer-generator and the utility;
(c) Shall charge the customer-generator a minimum monthly fee that
is the same as other customers of the electric utility in the same rate
class, but shall not charge the customer-generator any additional
standby, capacity, interconnection, or other fee or charge unless the
commission, in the case of an electrical company, or the appropriate
governing body, in the case of other electric utilities, determines,
after appropriate notice and opportunity for comment that:
(i) The electric utility will incur direct costs associated with
interconnecting or administering net metering systems that exceed any
offsetting benefits associated with these systems; and
(ii) Public policy is best served by imposing these costs on the
customer-generator rather than allocating these costs among the
utility's entire customer base;
(d) Shall buy an operating fraction of the net metering aggregator
of the net metering system using rates, tariffs, contracts, and
conditions as would otherwise apply to the utility buying power from a
comparable renewable energy generator.
(2) If a production meter ((and)), software, and associated
interconnection equipment is required by the electric utility to
provide meter aggregation under RCW 80.60.030(4), ((the))
customer-generators ((is)) are responsible for the purchase of the
production meter ((and)), software, and associated interconnection
equipment. If an electric utility chooses to update its billing
software to accommodate meter aggregation, the customer-generator may
not be required to purchase software.
(3) A net metering aggregator shall submit an updated list of
assigned fractions and operating fractions to the electric utility no
more than once per quarter on a date determined by the electric
utility. A net metering aggregator must provide information to the
electric utility demonstrating that the assigned fractions and
operating fractions equal one hundred percent.

Sec. 3 RCW 80.60.030 and 2007 c 323 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Consistent with the other provisions of this chapter, the net
energy measurement must be calculated in the following manner:
(1) The electric utility shall measure the net electricity produced
or consumed during the billing period, in accordance with normal
metering practices.
(2) If the electricity supplied by the electric utility exceeds the
electricity generated by the customer-generator and fed back to the
electric utility during the billing period, the customer-generator
shall be billed for the net electricity supplied by the electric
utility, in accordance with normal metering practices.
(3) If electricity generated by the customer-generator exceeds the
electricity supplied by the electric utility, the customer-generator:
(a) Shall be billed for the appropriate customer charges for that
billing period, in accordance with RCW 80.60.020; and
(b) Shall be credited for the excess kilowatt-hours generated
during the billing period, with this kilowatt-hour credit appearing on
the bill for the following billing period.
(4) If a customer-generator requests, an electric utility shall
provide meter aggregation.
(a) For customer-generators participating in meter aggregation,
kilowatt-hours credits earned by a net metering system during the
billing period first shall be used to offset electricity supplied by
the electric utility.
(b) Not more than a total of one ((hundred kilowatts)) megawatt
shall be aggregated among all customer-generators participating in a
((generating facility)) net metering system under this subsection.
(c) Excess kilowatt-hours credits earned by the net metering
system, during the same billing period, shall be either: (i) Credited
equally by the electric utility to remaining meters located on all
premises of a customer-generator at the designated rate of each meter;
or (ii) in the case of virtual net metering, credited by the virtual
net metering aggregator to remaining meters in proportion to the
contracted specified fraction for each customer-generator. An assigned
fraction shall be directly proportional to each meter's share of the
net consumption or generation at its rate class as related to the total
of all aggregated meters of a virtual net metering aggregator.
(d) Meters so aggregated shall not change rate classes due to meter
aggregation under this section.
(5) On April 30th of each calendar year, any remaining unused
kilowatt-hour credit accumulated during the previous year shall be
granted to the electric utility, without any compensation to the
customer-generator.
(6)(a) All renewable energy credits produced as a result of the
generation of electricity from a net metering system shall be the
property of the customer-generator.
(b) For renewable energy credits generated through virtual net
metering, an assigned fraction of the renewable energy credit shall be
assigned to the customer-generator by the virtual net metering
aggregator.

--- END ---