BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.36.037 and 2006 c 305 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Real or personal property owned by a nonprofit organization,
association, or corporation in connection with the operation of a
public assembly hall ((or)), meeting place, or community center is
exempt from taxation. The area exempt under this section includes the
building or buildings, the land under the buildings, and an additional
area necessary for parking, not exceeding a total of one acre. When
property for which exemption is sought is essentially unimproved except
for restroom facilities and structures and this property has been used
primarily for annual community celebration events for at least ten
years, the exempt property shall not exceed twenty-nine acres.
(2) To qualify for this exemption the property must be used
exclusively for public gatherings or activities consistent with a
community center and must be available to all organizations or persons
desiring to use the property, but the owner may impose conditions and
restrictions which are necessary for the safekeeping of the property
and promote the purposes of this exemption. Membership shall not be a
prerequisite for the use of the property.
(3) The use of the property for pecuniary gain or for business
activities, except as provided in this section, nullifies the exemption
otherwise available for the property for the assessment year. The
exemption is not nullified by:
(a) The collection of rent or donations if all funds collected are
used for capital improvements to the exempt property, maintenance and
operation of the exempt property, or for exempt purposes.
(b) Fund-raising activities conducted by a nonprofit organization.
(c)(i) Except as provided in (c)(ii) of this subsection, the use of
the property for pecuniary gain, for business activities for periods of
not more than fifteen days each assessment year so long as all income
received from rental or use of the exempt property is used for capital
improvements to the exempt property, maintenance and operation of the
exempt property, or for exempt purposes.
(ii) For nonprofit organizations, associations, or corporations
owning a community center, the use of the property for pecuniary gain
or for business activities as long as all income received from rental
or use of the exempt property is used for capital improvements to the
exempt property, maintenance and operation of the exempt property, or
for exempt purposes.
(d) In a county with a population of less than twenty thousand, the
use of the property to promote the following business activities:
Dance lessons, art classes, or music lessons.
(e) An inadvertent use of the property in a manner inconsistent
with the purpose for which exemption is granted, if the inadvertent use
is not part of a pattern of use. A pattern of use is presumed when an
inadvertent use is repeated in the same assessment year or in two or
more successive assessment years.
(4) The department of revenue ((shall)) must narrowly construe this
exemption.
(5) For the purpose of this section, "community center" means a
building previously owned by a school district, and made available to
businesses, individuals, or other parties through the loan or rental of
the building, or portions thereof, for: Public gatherings; office
space; qualifying farmers markets as defined in RCW 66.24.170; home and
garden showings; art gallery openings; meetings; classes; and lectures.
Notwithstanding subsection (4) of this section, the definition of
"community center" must be broadly construed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2011 and thereafter.

--- END ---