BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 39.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The requirement to pay prevailing wages under this chapter does not
apply to participants in Americorps-affiliated nonprofit conservation
corps programs if:
(1) The program's management and administrative headquarters are in
Washington state;
(2) The program participants either:
(a) Are members of Americorps who receive a living allowance that
is specified in federal or state law; or
(b) Perform service work in the same capacity as Americorps members
and receive a similar living allowance;
(3) The participants in the program primarily engage in
environmental restoration and trail construction work; and
(4) At least ten percent of the participant's time in the program
is devoted to education and training

--- END ---