BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
A mute swan (Cygnus olor) may not be designated as deleterious
exotic wildlife under this chapter if all of the following criteria are
met:
(1) The mute swan is both sexually altered and pinioned;
(2) The mute swan is located on private property that contains
water bodies totaling no more than twenty acres; and
(3) There are no more than two mute swans located on each property.

--- END ---