BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person who sells, delivers, or otherwise transfers, at a gun
show or event, a firearm to any person whom a criminal background check
in accordance with RCW 9.41.090 and 18 U.S.C. Sec. 921 et seq. would
have revealed was ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 to possess a firearm,
is strictly liable for damages for the injury or death of another
person that results from the criminal use of that firearm by any
person.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "gun show or event" means a
place or event, a gun trade show, gun collectors' show, flea market, or
auction, other than a permanent retail store, at which three or more
individuals assemble to display, sell, lease, or transfer new or used
firearms or firearm components to the public and that is not exempt
from collecting sales tax under RCW 82.08.0251. "Gun show or event"
includes the entire premises provided for the gun show or event,
including parking areas near the gun show or event that the sponsor
knows or should reasonably know will be used for parking for the gun
show or event.

--- END ---