BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.15.380 and 2005 c 249 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the conditions in (a) through (c) of this subsection
and the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the
community and technical colleges, state universities, the regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College ((may exempt the
following students from the payment of all or a portion of tuition fees
and services and activities fees:)) shall waive all tuition and fees
for children of any law enforcement officer or firefighter who lost his
or her life or became totally disabled in the line of duty while
employed by any public law enforcement agency or full-time or volunteer
fire department in this state((: PROVIDED, That such persons may
receive the exemption only if they)).
(a) Recipients must begin their course of study at a state-supported college or university within ten years of their graduation
from high school.
(b) Each recipient's continued participation is subject to the
school's satisfactory progress policy.
(c) A recipient may attend full time or part time. Total credits
earned using the waiver may not exceed two hundred quarter credits, or
the equivalent of semester credits.
(2) Tuition waivers for graduate students are not required for
those who qualify under subsection (1) of this section but are
encouraged.
(3) Private vocational schools and private higher education
institutions are encouraged to provide waivers consistent with
subsection (1) of this section.
(4) The following definitions apply throughout this section:
(a) "Children" means biological children, adopted children, or
stepchildren.
(b) "Fees" means all assessments for costs incurred as a condition
to a student's full participation in coursework and related activities
at an institution of higher education.
(c) "Totally disabled" means a person who has become totally and
permanently disabled for life by bodily injury or disease, and is
thereby prevented from performing any occupation or gainful pursuit.
(5) The governing boards of the community and technical colleges,
the state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen
State College shall report to the higher education committees of the
legislature by November 15, 2012, and every two years thereafter,
regarding the status of implementation of the waivers under this
section. The reports must include the following data and information:
(a) Total number of waivers;
(b) Total amount of tuition waived;
(c) Total amount of fees waived;
(d) Average amount of tuition and fees waived per recipient;
(e) Recipient demographic data that is disaggregated by distinct
ethnic categories within racial subgroups; and
(f) Recipient income level, to the extent possible.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.15.520 and 2007 c 355 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards
of the community colleges may:
(1) Waive all or a portion of tuition fees and services and
activities fees for((:
(a))) students nineteen years of age or older who are eligible for
resident tuition and fee rates as defined in RCW 28B.15.012 through
28B.15.015, who enroll in a course of study or program which will
enable them to finish their high school education and obtain a high
school diploma or certificate, but who are not eligible students as
defined by RCW 28A.600.405; and
(((b) Children of any law enforcement officer or firefighter who
lost his or her life or became totally disabled in the line of duty
while employed by any public law enforcement agency or full time or
volunteer fire department in this state: PROVIDED, That such persons
may receive the waiver only if they begin their course of study at a
community college within ten years of their graduation from high
school;))
(2) Waive all or a portion of the nonresident tuition fees
differential for:
(a) Nonresident students enrolled in a community college course of
study or program which will enable them to finish their high school
education and obtain a high school diploma or certificate but who are
not eligible students as defined by RCW 28A.600.405. The waiver shall
be in effect only for those courses which lead to a high school diploma
or certificate; and
(b) Up to forty percent of the students enrolled in the regional
education program for deaf students, subject to federal funding of such
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 28B.15.385 ("Totally disabled" defined
for certain purposes) and 2008 c 188 s 2, 2007 c 450 s 3, & 1973 1st
ex.s. c 191 s 5 are each repealed.

--- END ---