BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the members
of the sustainable recreation work group created in chapter 195, Laws
of 2008 volunteered numerous hours and dedicated considerable personal
resources and knowledge to aid the legislature with the development of
recommendations aimed at improving recreational opportunities on land
managed by the department of natural resources. Their dedication and
contributions deserve the respect and appreciation of everyone who
enjoys recreating in Washington's great outdoor spaces.
(2) The legislature further finds that the input and expertise of
these volunteers, which was presented to the legislature in a final
report dated December 2009, has created an invaluable document that
deserves consideration by state policymakers both today and into the
future.
(3) It is the intent of this act to adopt certain policy
recommendations developed by the sustainable recreation work group that
are capable of being implemented in the near term and that may provide
near-term benefits to sustainable recreation or additional information
that may be used to improve recreational activities in Washington.

Sec. 2 RCW 79.10.140 and 2007 c 241 s 23 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department is authorized:
(1)(a) To construct, operate, and maintain primitive outdoor
recreation and conservation facilities on lands under its jurisdiction
which are of primitive character when deemed necessary by the
department to achieve maximum effective development of such lands and
resources consistent with the purposes for which the lands are held.
((This))
(b) The authority provided by this section shall be exercised only
after review by the recreation and conservation funding board and
determination by the recreation and conservation funding board that the
department is the most appropriate agency to undertake such
construction, operation, and maintenance. Such review is not required
for campgrounds designated and prepared or approved by the department;
(2) To acquire right-of-way and develop public access to lands
under the jurisdiction of the department and suitable for public
outdoor recreation and conservation purposes;
(3) To receive and expend funds from federal and state outdoor
recreation funding measures for the purposes of this section and RCW
79A.50.110;
(4)(a) To assess use charges on individuals for the privilege of
accessing certain specific improved, dedicated recreation sites
identified by the department or assess an operation fee on individuals
or organizations hosting specific events located on public lands. The
department may only require use charges to access specific recreation
sites if the department determines that the use charge revenue would be
critical given the expenses required to maintain access to the site,
the amount of public access pressure on the site is significant, or
that the site is likely to otherwise be closed to public access due to
lack of financial resources.
(b) For any recreation site subject to an access use charge, the
department must allow the use charge requirement to be satisfied by one
of the following methods:
(i) Purchase of a one-day only parking and access fee at
trailheads, campgrounds, or other parking areas in the amount of five
dollars;
(ii) Purchase of an annual parking and access pass in the amount of
twenty dollars;
(iii) Purchase of a one-night campsite fee for overnight camping at
a designated camping facility, in the amount of ten dollars; or
(iv) Display of a department of fish and wildlife lands vehicle use
permit obtained under RCW 77.32.380.
(c) For any specific event located on public lands, the department
must allow the operation fee requirement to be satisfied by the payment
of a flat administrative fee set at two hundred dollars, plus the
greater of either ten percent of entrance fees collected by the host or
ten percent of the host's total commercial operations.
(d) A violation of the use charge or operation fee requirements of
this section is punishable as a natural resources infraction under
chapter 7.84 RCW.
(e) Except for annual parking and access passes, all revenues
collected through use charges under this section must be reinvested by
the department into the management of, and the provision of
recreational opportunities at, the site where the use charge was
collected.
(f) In recognition of the financial support provided to the
department under RCW 46.09.170 through the payment of the motor vehicle
fuel tax, the department may not require the payment of a use charge
under this section to access ORV recreation facilities, as that term is
defined in RCW 46.09.020.
(g)(i) The department may allow a noncommercial organization to
host an event on public lands without having to pay an otherwise
required operation fee if the organization has recorded at least one
thousand cumulative hours of recorded volunteer time with the
department in the previous fiscal year. The department may allow each
unit of one thousand recorded cumulative volunteer hours to entitle the
organization to host one event without paying an operation fee.
(ii) The department may allow any individual volunteering at least
fifty hours with the department in any one fiscal year to receive one
free annual parking and access pass.
(h)(i) Any annual parking and access passes provided by the
department must be available at the department's Olympia headquarters
and at the department's regional offices.
(ii) The department may enter into agreements with the department
of fish and wildlife or the United States forest service to allow the
department-issued annual parking and access pass to authorize the
holder access to recreational lands managed by either agency.

Sec. 3 RCW 4.24.210 and 2006 c 212 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) or (4) of this
section, any public or private landowners or others in lawful
possession and control of any lands whether designated resource, rural,
or urban, or water areas or channels and lands adjacent to such areas
or channels, who allow members of the public to use them for the
purposes of outdoor recreation, which term includes, but is not limited
to, the cutting, gathering, and removing of firewood by private persons
for their personal use without purchasing the firewood from the
landowner, hunting, fishing, camping, picnicking, swimming, hiking,
bicycling, skateboarding or other nonmotorized wheel-based activities,
hanggliding, paragliding, rock climbing, the riding of horses or other
animals, clam digging, pleasure driving of off-road vehicles,
snowmobiles, and other vehicles, boating, nature study, winter or water
sports, viewing or enjoying historical, archaeological, scenic, or
scientific sites, without charging a fee of any kind therefor, shall
not be liable for unintentional injuries to such users.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) or (4) of this
section, any public or private landowner or others in lawful possession
and control of any lands whether rural or urban, or water areas or
channels and lands adjacent to such areas or channels, who offer or
allow such land to be used for purposes of a fish or wildlife
cooperative project, or allow access to such land for cleanup of litter
or other solid waste, shall not be liable for unintentional injuries to
any volunteer group or to any other users.
(3) Any public or private landowner, or others in lawful possession
and control of the land, may charge an administrative fee of up to
twenty-five dollars for the cutting, gathering, and removing of
firewood from the land.
(4) Nothing in this section shall prevent the liability of a
landowner or others in lawful possession and control for injuries
sustained to users by reason of a known dangerous artificial latent
condition for which warning signs have not been conspicuously posted.
A fixed anchor used in rock climbing and put in place by someone other
than a landowner is not a known dangerous artificial latent condition
and a landowner under subsection (1) of this section shall not be
liable for unintentional injuries resulting from the condition or use
of such an anchor. Nothing in RCW 4.24.200 and this section limits or
expands in any way the doctrine of attractive nuisance. Usage by
members of the public, volunteer groups, or other users is permissive
and does not support any claim of adverse possession.
(5) For purposes of this section, the following are not fees:
(a) A license or permit issued for statewide use under the
authority of chapter 79A.05 RCW or Title 77 RCW; ((and))
(b) A use charge issued under the authority of RCW 79.10.140; and
(c) A daily charge not to exceed twenty dollars per person, per
day, for access to a publicly owned ORV sports park, as defined in RCW
46.09.020, or other public facility accessed by a highway, street, or
nonhighway road for the purposes of off-road vehicle use.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.32.010 and 2009 c 564 s 956 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a recreational
license issued by the director is required to hunt for or take wild
animals or wild birds, fish for, take, or harvest fish, shellfish, and
seaweed. A recreational fishing or shellfish license is not required
for carp, smelt, and crawfish, and a hunting license is not required
for bullfrogs.
(2) A permit issued by the department, or a department of natural
resources annual parking and access pass issued under RCW 79.10.140, is
required to park a motor vehicle upon improved department access
facilities.
(3) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium to enable the
implementation of the pilot project established in section 307, chapter
329, Laws of 2008, a fishing permit issued to a nontribal member by the
Colville Tribes shall satisfy the license requirements in subsection
(1) of this section on the waters of Lake Rufus Woods and on the north
shore of Lake Rufus Woods, and a Colville Tribes tribal member
identification card shall satisfy the license requirements in
subsection (1) of this section on all waters of Lake Rufus Woods.

--- END ---