BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.60.090 and 2009 c 521 s 72 are each amended to read
as follows:
A legal union of two persons of the same sex((, other than a
marriage,)) that was validly formed in another jurisdiction, and that
is substantially equivalent to a domestic partnership under this
chapter, shall be recognized as a valid domestic partnership in this
state and shall be treated the same as a domestic partnership
registered in this state regardless of whether it bears the name
domestic partnership.

--- END ---