BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 59.18.200 and 2008 c 113 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) When premises are rented for an indefinite time, with
monthly or other periodic rent reserved, such tenancy shall be
construed to be a tenancy from month to month, or from period to period
on which rent is payable, and shall be terminated by written notice of
((twenty)) thirty days or more, preceding the end of any of the months
or periods of tenancy, given by either party to the other.
(b) Any tenant who has been served with a thirty-day written notice
under RCW 59.18.140 announcing a new rule of tenancy, including a
change in the amount of rent, may terminate a rental agreement by
written notice of twenty days or more, preceding the effective date of
the new rule.
(c) Any tenant who is a member of the armed forces, including the
national guard and armed forces reserves, or that tenant's spouse or
dependant, may terminate a rental agreement with less than ((twenty))
thirty days' notice if the tenant receives reassignment or deployment
orders that do not allow a ((twenty-day)) thirty-day notice.
(2)(a) Whenever a landlord plans to change to a policy of excluding
children, the landlord shall give a written notice to a tenant at least
ninety days before termination of the tenancy to effectuate such change
in policy. Such ninety-day notice shall be in lieu of the notice
required by subsection (1)(a) of this section. However, if after
giving the ninety-day notice the change in policy is delayed, the
notice requirements of subsection (1)(a) of this section shall apply
unless waived by the tenant.
(b) Whenever a landlord plans to change any apartment or apartments
to a condominium form of ownership, the landlord shall provide a
written notice to a tenant at least one hundred twenty days before
termination of the tenancy, in compliance with RCW 64.34.440(1), to
effectuate such change. The one hundred twenty-day notice is in lieu
of the notice required in subsection (1)(a) of this section. However,
if after providing the one hundred twenty-day notice the change to a
condominium form of ownership is delayed, the notice requirements in
subsection (1)(a) of this section apply unless waived by the tenant.

--- END ---