BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall seek to minimize any disproportionate
geographic impacts when planning to acquire any new real estate to be
owned in fee by the department or managed directly by the department.
This duty applies to all land purchases not otherwise exempted by this
section regardless of the source of funding, including state, private,
and federal money.
(2) The duty to minimize disproportionate geographic impacts is
considered fulfilled if, in any five-year period, an average of no more
than ten percent of the total acres purchased by the department is
located in any one county. The department may only pursue a land
acquisition strategy that will result in an average of more than ten
percent of the total acres purchased by the department in any five-year
period being located in any one county if the legislative authority of
the affected county has adopted a resolution granting permission for
the department to pursue real estate acquisitions that may result in
more than ten percent of the department's purchased acres being located
in that county. Any permission granted under this subsection is
applicable for the time period during which the county resolution is
effective.
(3) This section only applies to the purchase of privately owned
parcels of land in excess of five contiguous acres, or multiple parcels
that together exceed five contiguous acres in size, and does not affect
the ability of the department to enter into a long-term lease or a
temporally-limited easement.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.12.037 and 2000 c 107 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Consistent with section 1 of this act, the commission may
acquire by gift, easement, purchase, lease, or condemnation lands,
buildings, water rights, rights-of-way, or other necessary property,
and construct and maintain necessary facilities for purposes consistent
with this title. The commission may authorize the director to acquire
property ((under)) consistent with section 1 of this act and this
section, but the power of condemnation may only be exercised by the
director when an appropriation has been made by the legislature for the
acquisition of a specific property, except to clear title and acquire
access rights-of-way.
(2) The commission may sell, lease, convey, or grant concessions
upon real or personal property under the control of the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2011.

--- END ---