BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.43.7541 and 2008 c 97 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every sentence imposed ((under chapter 9.94A RCW)) for a crime
specified in RCW 43.43.754 must include a fee of one hundred dollars.
The fee is a court-ordered legal financial obligation as defined in RCW
9.94A.030((,)) and other applicable law. For a sentence imposed under
chapter 9.94A RCW, the fee is payable by the offender after payment of
all other legal financial obligations included in the sentence has been
completed. For all other sentences, the fee is payable by the offender
in the same manner as other assessments imposed. The clerk of the
court shall transmit eighty percent of the fee collected to the state
treasurer for deposit in the state DNA database account created under
RCW 43.43.7532, and shall transmit twenty percent of the fee collected
to the agency responsible for collection of a biological sample from
the offender as required under RCW 43.43.754.

--- END ---