BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.01.160 and 2008 c 318 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The court may require a defendant to pay costs. Costs may be
imposed only upon a convicted defendant, except for costs imposed upon
a defendant's entry into a deferred prosecution program, costs imposed
upon a defendant for pretrial supervision, or costs imposed upon a
defendant for preparing and serving a warrant for failure to appear.
(2) Costs shall be limited to expenses specially incurred by the
state in prosecuting the defendant or in administering the deferred
prosecution program under chapter 10.05 RCW or pretrial supervision.
They cannot include expenses inherent in providing a constitutionally
guaranteed jury trial or expenditures in connection with the
maintenance and operation of government agencies that must be made by
the public irrespective of specific violations of law. Expenses
incurred for serving of warrants for failure to appear and jury fees
under RCW 10.46.190 may be included in costs the court may require a
defendant to pay. Costs for administering a deferred prosecution
((or)) may not exceed two hundred fifty dollars. Costs for
administering a pretrial supervision may not exceed one hundred fifty
dollars. Costs for preparing and serving a warrant for failure to
appear may not exceed one hundred dollars. Costs of incarceration
imposed on a defendant convicted of a misdemeanor or a gross
misdemeanor may not exceed the actual cost of incarceration. In no
case may the court require the offender to pay more than one hundred
dollars per day for the cost of incarceration. Payment of other court-ordered financial obligations, including all legal financial
obligations and costs of supervision take precedence over the payment
of the cost of incarceration ordered by the court. All funds received
from defendants for the cost of incarceration in the county or city
jail must be remitted for criminal justice purposes to the county or
city that is responsible for the defendant's jail costs. Costs imposed
constitute a judgment against a defendant and survive a dismissal of
the underlying action against the defendant. However, if the defendant
is acquitted on the underlying action, the costs for preparing and
serving a warrant for failure to appear do not survive the acquittal,
and the judgment that such costs would otherwise constitute shall be
vacated.
(3) The court shall not order a defendant to pay costs unless the
defendant is or will be able to pay them. In determining the amount
and method of payment of costs, the court shall take account of the
financial resources of the defendant and the nature of the burden that
payment of costs will impose.
(4) A defendant who has been ordered to pay costs and who is not in
contumacious default in the payment thereof may at any time petition
the sentencing court for remission of the payment of costs or of any
unpaid portion thereof. If it appears to the satisfaction of the court
that payment of the amount due will impose manifest hardship on the
defendant or the defendant's immediate family, the court may remit all
or part of the amount due in costs, or modify the method of payment
under RCW 10.01.170.
(5) Except for direct costs relating to evaluating and reporting to
the court, prosecutor, or defense counsel regarding a defendant's
competency to stand trial as provided in RCW 10.77.060, this section
shall not apply to costs related to medical or mental health treatment
or services a defendant receives while in custody of the secretary of
the department of social and health services or other governmental
units. This section shall not prevent the secretary of the department
of social and health services or other governmental units from imposing
liability and seeking reimbursement from a defendant committed to an
appropriate facility as provided in RCW 10.77.084 while criminal
proceedings are stayed. This section shall also not prevent
governmental units from imposing liability on defendants for costs
related to providing medical or mental health treatment while the
defendant is in the governmental unit's custody. Medical or mental
health treatment and services a defendant receives at a state hospital
or other facility are not a cost of prosecution and shall be
recoverable under RCW 10.77.250 and 70.48.130, chapter 43.20B RCW, and
any other applicable statute.

--- END ---