BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The application for a quick title of a vehicle must be
submitted by the owner or the owner's representative to the department,
participating county auditor, or other agent appointed by the director
on a form furnished or approved by the department and must contain:
(a) A description of the vehicle, including make, model, vehicle
identification number, type of body, and the odometer reading at the
time of delivery of the vehicle, when required;
(b) The name and address of the person who is to be the registered
owner of the vehicle and, if the vehicle is subject to a security
interest, the name and address of the secured party; and
(c) Other information as may be required by the department.
(2) The application for a quick title must be signed by the person
applying to be the registered owner and be sworn to by that person in
the manner described under RCW 9A.72.085. The department must keep a
copy of the application.
(3) The application for a quick title must be accompanied by:
(a) All fees and taxes due for an application for a certificate of
ownership, including a quick title service fee of twenty-five dollars
to be distributed under section 2 of this act; and
(b) The most recent certificate of ownership or other satisfactory
evidence of ownership.
(4) All applications for quick title must meet the requirements
established by the department.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "quick title" means a
certificate of ownership printed at the time of application.
(6) The quick title process authorized under this section may not
be used to obtain the first title issued to a vehicle previously
designated as a salvage vehicle as defined in RCW 46.12.005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The quick title service fee of twenty-five dollars imposed
under section 1 of this act must be distributed as follows:
(a) If the fee is paid to the director, the fee must be deposited
to the motor vehicle fund established under RCW 46.68.070.
(b) If the fee is paid to the participating county auditor or other
agent appointed by the director twelve dollars and fifty cents must be
deposited to the motor vehicle fund established under RCW 46.68.070.
The remainder must be retained by the county treasurer in the same
manner as other fees collected by the county auditor.
(2) For the purposes of this section "quick title" has the same
meaning as provided in section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 88.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The application for a quick title of a vessel must be made by
the owner or the owner's representative to the department or
participating county auditor or other agent appointed by the director
on a form furnished or approved by the department and must contain:
(a) A description of the vessel, including make, model, hull
identification number, series, and body;
(b) The name and address of the person who is to be the registered
owner of the vessel and, if the vessel is subject to a security
interest, the name and address of the secured party; and
(c) Other information as may be required by the department.
(2) The application for a quick title must be signed by the person
applying to be the registered owner and be sworn to by that person in
the manner described under RCW 9A.72.085. The department must keep a
copy of the application.
(3) The application for a quick title must be accompanied by:
(a) All fees and taxes due for an application for a certificate of
ownership, including a quick title service fee of twenty-five dollars
to be distributed as provided under section 4 of this act; and
(b) The most recent certificate of ownership or other satisfactory
evidence of ownership.
(4) All applications for quick title must meet the requirements
established by the department.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "quick title" means a
certificate of ownership printed at the time of application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 88.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The quick title service fee of twenty-five dollars imposed
under section 3 of this act must be distributed as follows:
(a) If the fee is paid to the director, the fee must be deposited
to the general fund.
(b) If the fee is paid to the participating county auditor or other
agent appointed by the director twelve dollars and fifty cents must be
deposited to the general fund. The remainder must be retained by the
county treasurer in the same manner as other fees collected by the
county auditor.
(2) For the purposes of this section "quick title" has the same
meaning as provided in section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act applies to quick title transactions
processed on and after September 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect September 1, 2010.

--- END ---