BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.26 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A member in receipt of employer-authorized shared leave after
the effective date of this section shall receive the same treatment in
respect to service credit and final average salary that the member
would normally receive if using accrued annual leave or sick leave.
(2) For purposes of this section shared leave includes, but is not
limited to:
(a) Direct transfers of annual leave, sick leave, or other leave
from one employee to another;
(b) Indirect transfers of annual leave, sick leave, or other leave
via leave banks or a similar pool of donated leave; or
(c) Shift trades or employees working shifts on behalf of a member.
(3) Shared leave that has been reported to the department prior to
the effective date of this section, and for which contributions have
been made, remains creditable for service credit and final average
salary.

--- END ---