BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The purchase or construction of public facilities in a one
hundred year floodplain may only be authorized through the following
actions by the applicable county or city legislative authority: The
adoption of findings declaring the need and reasoning for purchasing or
constructing the facility in a one hundred year floodplain; and an
affirmative vote authorizing the purchase or construction activity.
For purposes of this section, "one hundred year floodplain" means the
same as "special flood hazard area" as set forth in WAC 173-158-040 as
it exists on July 26, 2009.
(2) This section applies to the purchase or construction of county
or city owned public facilities in counties and cities located west of
the crest of the Cascade mountain range, but does not apply to: Roads,
streets, and other transportation facilities; public safety facilities;
storm water facilities; flood control facilities; or underground
conveyances.

--- END ---