BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.40.110 and 2009 c 369 s 40 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The opening and subsequent processing of return envelopes for
any primary or election may begin upon receipt. The tabulation of
absentee ballots ((must not)) may commence ((until after)) at 8:00
((p.m.)) a.m. on the Monday immediately before the day of the primary
or election. Tabulation results must be held in secrecy, as provided
in RCW 29A.84.730, until after 8:00 p.m. on the day of the primary or
election.
(2) All received absentee return envelopes must be placed in secure
locations from the time of delivery to the county auditor until their
subsequent opening. After opening the return envelopes, the county
canvassing board shall place all of the ballots in secure storage until
((after 8:00 p.m. of the day of the primary or election)) tabulation.
Absentee ballots that are to be tabulated on an electronic vote
tallying system may be taken from the inner envelopes and all the
normal procedural steps may be performed to prepare these ballots for
tabulation.
(3) Before opening a returned absentee ballot, the canvassing
board, or its designated representatives, shall examine the postmark,
statement, and signature on the return envelope that contains the
security envelope and absentee ballot. All personnel assigned to
verify signatures must receive training on statewide standards for
signature verification. Personnel shall verify that the voter's
signature on the return envelope is the same as the signature of that
voter in the registration files of the county. Verification may be
conducted by an automated verification system approved by the secretary
of state. For any absentee ballot, a variation between the signature
of the voter on the return envelope and the signature of that voter in
the registration files due to the substitution of initials or the use
of common nicknames is permitted so long as the surname and handwriting
are clearly the same.
(4) For registered voters casting absentee ballots, the date on the
return envelope to which the voter has attested determines the
validity, as to the time of voting for that absentee ballot if the
postmark is missing or is illegible. For overseas voters and service
voters, the date on the return envelope to which the voter has attested
determines the validity as to the time of voting for that absentee
ballot.

--- END ---