BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71A.20.100 and 1988 c 176 s 710 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary shall serve as custodian without compensation of
personal property of a resident of a residential habilitation center
that is located at the residential habilitation center, including
moneys deposited with the secretary for the benefit of the resident.
As custodian, the secretary shall have authority to disburse moneys
from the resident's fund for the following purposes and subject to the
following limitations:
(1) Subject to specific instructions by a donor of money to the
secretary for the benefit of a resident, the secretary may disburse any
of the funds belonging to a resident for such personal needs of the
resident as the secretary may deem proper and necessary.
(2) The secretary may pay to the department as reimbursement for
the costs of care, support, maintenance, treatment, hospitalization,
medical care, and habilitation of a resident from the resident's fund
when such fund exceeds a sum as established by rule of the department,
to the extent of any notice and finding of financial responsibility
served upon the secretary after such findings shall have become final.
((If the resident does not have a guardian, parent, spouse, or other
person acting in a representative capacity, upon whom notice and
findings of financial responsibility have been served, then the
secretary shall not make payments to the department as provided in this
subsection, until a guardian has been appointed by the court, and the
time for the appeal of findings of financial responsibility as provided
in RCW 43.20B.430 shall not commence to run until the appointment of
such guardian and the service upon the guardian of notice and findings
of financial responsibility.))
(3) When services to a person are changed from a residential center
to another setting, the secretary shall deliver to the person, or to
the parent, guardian, or agency legally responsible for the person, all
or such portion of the funds of which the secretary is custodian as
defined in this section, or other property belonging to the person, as
the secretary may deem necessary to the person's welfare, and the
secretary may deliver to the person such additional property or funds
belonging to the person as the secretary may from time to time deem
proper, so long as the person continues to receive service under this
title. When the resident no longer receives any services under this
title, the secretary shall deliver to the person, or to the parent,
person, or agency legally responsible for the person, all funds or
other property belonging to the person remaining in the secretary's
possession as custodian.
(4) All funds held by the secretary as custodian may be deposited
in a single fund, the receipts and expenditures from the fund to be
accurately accounted for by the secretary. All interest accruing from,
or as a result of the deposit of such moneys in a single fund shall be
credited to the personal accounts of the residents. All expenditures
under this section shall be subject to the duty of accounting provided
for in this section.
(5) The appointment of a guardian for the estate of a resident
shall terminate the secretary's authority as custodian of any funds of
the resident which may be subject to the control of the guardianship,
upon receipt by the secretary of a certified copy of letters of
guardianship. Upon the guardian's request, the secretary shall
immediately forward to the guardian any funds subject to the control of
the guardianship or other property of the resident remaining in the
secretary's possession, together with a full and final accounting of
all receipts and expenditures made.
(6) Upon receipt of a written request from the secretary stating
that a designated individual is a resident of the residential
habilitation center and that such resident has no legally appointed
guardian of his or her estate, any person, bank, corporation, or agency
having possession of any money, bank accounts, or choses in action
owned by such resident, shall, if the amount does not exceed two
hundred dollars, deliver the same to the secretary as custodian and
mail written notice of the delivery to such resident at the residential
habilitation center. The receipt by the secretary shall constitute
full and complete acquittance for such payment and the person, bank,
corporation, or agency making such payment shall not be liable to the
resident or his or her legal representative. All funds so received by
the secretary shall be duly deposited by the secretary as custodian in
the resident's fund to the personal account of the resident. If any
proceeding is brought in any court to recover property so delivered,
the attorney general shall defend the lawsuit without cost to the
person, bank, corporation, or agency that delivered the property to the
secretary, and the state shall indemnify such person, bank,
corporation, or agency against any judgment rendered as a result of
such proceeding.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.20B.415 and 1971 ex.s. c 118 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
The estates of all ((mentally or physically deficient)) persons
with developmental disabilities who have been admitted to the ((state
residential schools listed)) residential habilitation centers
identified in RCW ((72.33.030 either by application of their parents or
guardian or by commitment of court)) 71A.20.020, or who may hereafter
be admitted ((or committed)) to such institutions, shall be liable for
their per capita costs of care, support and treatment: PROVIDED, That
the estate funds may not be reduced as a result of such liability below
an amount as set forth in RCW ((72.33.180)) 71A.20.100.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.20B.430 and 1989 c 175 s 99 are each amended to
read as follows:
In all cases where a determination is made that the estate of a
resident of a residential habilitation center is able to pay all or any
portion of the charges, ((a)) an initial notice and finding of
responsibility shall be served on the guardian of the resident's
estate, or if no guardian has been appointed then to the resident, the
resident's spouse, or other person acting in a representative capacity
and having property in his or her possession belonging to a resident.
The notice shall set forth the amount the department has determined
that such estate is able to pay, not to exceed the charge as fixed in
accordance with RCW 43.20B.420((, and)). The responsibility for
payment to the department shall commence twenty-eight days after
personal service of such notice and finding of responsibility. The
finding of responsibility applies to the resident's cost of care from
the date of his or her admission to the residential habilitation center
to the end of his or her stay, subject to the modification or vacation
of the finding in accordance with this chapter. Service shall be in
the manner prescribed for the service of a summons in a civil action or
may be served by certified mail, return receipt requested. The return
receipt signed by addressee only is prima facie evidence of service.
An application for an adjudicative proceeding from the determination of
responsibility may be made to the secretary by ((the guardian of the
resident's estate, or if no guardian has been appointed then by the
resident, the resident's spouse, or other person acting in a)) the
resident or his or her representative ((capacity and having property in
his or her possession belonging to a resident of a state school)),
within such twenty-eight day period. The application must be written
and served on the secretary by registered or certified mail, or by
personal service. If no application is filed, the notice and finding
of responsibility shall become final. If an application is filed, the
execution of notice and finding of responsibility shall be stayed
pending the final adjudicative order. The hearing shall be conducted
in a local department office or other location in Washington convenient
to the appellant. The proceeding is governed by the Administrative
Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.20B.435 and 1979 c 141 s 240 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary, upon application of the guardian of the estate of
the resident, and after investigation, or upon investigation without
application, may, if satisfied of the financial ability or inability of
such person to make payments in accordance with the original finding of
responsibility, modify or vacate such original finding of
responsibility, and enter a new finding of responsibility. Notice of
the secretary's determination to modify or vacate findings of
responsibility shall be ((served and be)) provided in writing to the
guardian of the resident's estate, or if no guardian has been
appointed, then to the resident, the resident's spouse, or other
persons acting in a representative capacity and having property in his
or her possession belonging to a resident. Modified or vacated
findings or responsibility are appealable in the same manner and in
accordance with the same procedure for appeals of original findings of
responsibility.

--- END ---