BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.74.340 and 1970 ex.s. c 72 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
Quantities of small arms smokeless propellant (class B) in shipping
containers approved by the federal department of transportation not in
excess of fifty pounds may be transported in a private vehicle.
Quantities in excess of twenty-five pounds but not to exceed fifty
pounds in a private passenger vehicle shall be transported in an
approved magazine as specified by the department of labor and
industries rules and regulations.
Transportation of quantities in excess of fifty pounds is
prohibited in passenger vehicles: PROVIDED, That this requirement
shall not apply to duly licensed dealers.
Transportation of quantities in excess of fifty pounds shall be in
accordance with federal department of transportation regulations.
Small arms smokeless propellant intended for personal use in
quantities not to exceed twenty-five pounds may be stored without
restriction in residences; quantities over twenty-five pounds but not
to exceed fifty pounds shall be stored in a strong box or cabinet
constructed with three-fourths inch plywood (minimum), or equivalent,
on all sides, top, and bottom.
Black powder as used in muzzle loading firearms may be (1)
transported in a private vehicle in quantities not to exceed fifty
pounds when a placard is displayed under rules adopted by the
department of labor and industries, (2) stored in a secure explosives
storage container in private residences in quantities not to exceed
twenty pounds, or (3) stored without restriction in private residences
in quantities not to exceed five pounds.
Not more than seventy-five pounds of small arms smokeless
propellant, in containers of one pound maximum capacity may be
displayed in commercial establishments.
Not more than twenty-five pounds of black powder as used in muzzle
loading firearms may be stored in commercial establishments of which
not more than four pounds in containers of one pound maximum capacity
may be displayed.
Quantities in excess of one hundred fifty pounds of smokeless
propellant or twenty-five pounds of black powder as used in muzzle
loading firearms shall be stored in magazines constructed as specified
in the rules and regulations for construction of magazines, and located
in compliance with this chapter.
All small arms smokeless propellant when stored shall be packed in
federal department of transportation approved containers.

--- END ---