BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.30.205 and 2003 c 334 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall consist of six members:
(a) The governor or the governor's designee((,));
(b) The superintendent of public instruction((,));
(c) The commissioner ((of public lands, the dean of the college of
forest resources of the University of Washington, the dean of the
college of agriculture of Washington State University,));
(d) The president of the University of Washington or the
president's designee;
(e) The president of Washington State University or the president's
designee; and
(f) A representative of those counties that contain state forest
lands acquired or transferred under RCW 79.22.010, 79.22.040, and
79.22.020.
(2)(a) The county representative on the board shall be selected by
the legislative authorities of those counties that contain state forest
lands acquired or transferred under RCW 79.22.010, 79.22.040, and
79.22.020. The eligible counties shall utilize a private statewide
association representing the interests of the legislative authorities
and executives of Washington counties to coordinate selection of the
county representative. In the selection of the county representative,
each participating county shall have one vote. ((The Washington state
association of counties shall conduct a meeting for the purpose of
making the selection and shall notify the board of the selection.))
(b) The county representative ((shall)) must be a duly elected
member of a county legislative authority who shall serve a term of four
years unless the representative should leave office for any reason.
The initial term shall begin on July 1, 1986.

--- END ---