BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that providing for
long-term stewardship of nonindustrial forests and woodlands in
projected growth areas and rural areas is an important factor in
maintaining Washington's special character and quality of life.
(2) The legislature further finds that in order to encourage and
maintain nonindustrial forests and woodlands for their present and
future benefit to all citizens, Washington's nonindustrial forest and
woodland owners' long-term commitments to stewardship of forest
resources must be recognized and supported by the citizens of
Washington.
(3) The legislature further finds that the adoption of forest
practices rules consistent with the forests and fish report, as defined
in RCW 76.09.020, has imposed substantial financial burdens on small
forest landowners.
(4) The legislature further finds that forest practices rules
adopted since the forests and fish report have not provided small
forest landowners with the alternate plan processes or alternate
harvest restrictions that were intended by the legislature to lower the
overall cost of regulation to small forest landowners while meeting the
public resource protection standard set forth in RCW 76.09.370(3).
(5) The legislature further finds that in order to maintain the
economic viability of eighty-nine thousand family forest owners
managing five million acres of forestland across the state, small
forest landowners must be provided with incentives to keep their land
in long-term forestry. The legislature intends to provide regulatory
certainty and remove disincentives in order to encourage ownership
tenure for generations to come.

Sec. 2 RCW 76.13.130 and 1999 sp.s. c 4 s 505 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) On parcels of twenty contiguous acres or less, forest
landowners ((with a total parcel ownership of less than eighty acres))
shall not be required to leave riparian buffers adjacent to streams
according to forest practices rules adopted under the forests and fish
report, as defined in RCW 76.09.020, if the forest landowner has not,
from his or her own land or from the land of another under a right or
license granted by lease or contract, either directly or by contracting
with others for the necessary labor or mechanical services, fell, cut,
or taken timber for sale or for commercial or industrial use in an
amount exceeding two million board feet during any three-year period.
((These))
(b) Landowners who qualify under this subsection shall be subject
to the permanent forest practices rules in effect as of January 1,
1999, but may additionally be required to:
(i) Comply with administrative rules adopted by the forest
practices board relating to the size and timing of even-aged harvests;
and
(ii) Leave timber adjacent to streams that is equivalent to no
greater than fifteen percent of a volume of timber contained in a stand
of well managed fifty-year old commercial timber covering the harvest
area. The additional fifteen percent leave tree level shall be
computed as a rotating stand volume and shall be regulated through
flexible forest practices as the stream buffer is managed over time to
meet riparian functions.
((On parcels of twenty contiguous acres or less)) (2) The small
forest landowner office shall work with small forest landowners ((with
a total parcel ownership of less than eighty acres)), as defined in RCW
76.13.120, to develop alternative management plans for riparian
buffers. Such alternative plans shall provide for the removal of leave
trees as other new trees grow in order to ensure the most effective
protection of critical riparian function. The office may recommend
reasonable modifications in alternative management plans of such
landowners to further reduce risks to public resources and endangered
species so long as the anticipated operating costs are not unreasonably
increased and the landowner is not required to leave a greater volume
than the threshold level. ((To qualify for the provisions of this
section, parcels must be twenty acres or less in contiguous ownership,
and owners cannot have ownership interests in a total of more than
eighty acres of forest lands within the state.))

--- END ---