BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 6.17.160 and 2007 c 37 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
The sheriff to whom the writ is directed and delivered shall
execute the same without delay as follows:
(1) Real property, including a vendee's interests under a real
estate contract, shall be levied on by recording a copy of the writ,
together with a description of the property attached, with the
recording officer of the county in which the real estate is situated.
(2) Personal property, capable of manual delivery, shall be levied
on by taking into custody. If the property or any part of it may be
concealed in a building or enclosure, the sheriff may publicly demand
delivery of the property. If the property is not delivered and if the
order of execution so directs, the sheriff may cause the building or
enclosure to be broken open and take possession of the property.
(3) Shares of stock and other investment securities shall be levied
on in accordance with the requirements of RCW ((62A.8-317)) 62A.8-112.
(4) A fund in court shall be levied on by leaving a copy of the
writ with the clerk of the court with notice in writing specifying the
fund.
(5) A franchise granted by a public or quasi-public corporation
shall be levied on by (a) serving a copy of the writ on, or mailing it
to, the judgment debtor as required by RCW 6.17.130 and (b) filing a
copy of the writ in the office of the auditor of the county in which
the franchise was granted together with a notice in writing that the
franchise has been levied on to be sold, specifying the time and place
of sale, the name of the owner, the amount of the judgment for which
the franchise is to be sold, and the name of the judgment creditor.
(6) A vendor's interest under a real estate contract shall be
levied on by (a) recording a copy of the writ, with descriptions of the
contract and of the real property covered by the contract, with the
recording officer of the county in which the real estate is located and
(b) serving a copy of the writ, with a copy of the descriptions, on, or
mailing the same to, the judgment debtor and the vendee under the
contract in the manner as described in RCW 6.17.130.
(7) Other intangible personal property may be levied on by serving
a copy of the writ on, or mailing it to, the judgment debtor in the
manner as required by RCW 6.17.130, together with a description of the
property. If the property is a claim on which suit has been commenced,
a copy of the writ and of the description shall also be filed with the
clerk of the court in which the suit is pending.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.728 and 2009 c 455 s 2, 2009 c 441 s 1, and 2009
c 399 s 1 are each reenacted to read as follows:
No person serving a sentence imposed pursuant to this chapter and
committed to the custody of the department shall leave the confines of
the correctional facility or be released prior to the expiration of the
sentence except as follows:
(1) An offender may earn early release time as authorized by RCW
9.94A.729;
(2) An offender may leave a correctional facility pursuant to an
authorized furlough or leave of absence. In addition, offenders may
leave a correctional facility when in the custody of a corrections
officer or officers;
(3)(a) The secretary may authorize an extraordinary medical
placement for an offender when all of the following conditions exist:
(i) The offender has a medical condition that is serious and is
expected to require costly care or treatment;
(ii) The offender poses a low risk to the community because he or
she is currently physically incapacitated due to age or the medical
condition or is expected to be so at the time of release; and
(iii) It is expected that granting the extraordinary medical
placement will result in a cost savings to the state.
(b) An offender sentenced to death or to life imprisonment without
the possibility of release or parole is not eligible for an
extraordinary medical placement.
(c) The secretary shall require electronic monitoring for all
offenders in extraordinary medical placement unless the electronic
monitoring equipment interferes with the function of the offender's
medical equipment or results in the loss of funding for the offender's
medical care, in which case, an alternative type of monitoring shall be
utilized. The secretary shall specify who shall provide the monitoring
services and the terms under which the monitoring shall be performed.
(d) The secretary may revoke an extraordinary medical placement
under this subsection at any time.
(e) Persistent offenders are not eligible for extraordinary medical
placement;
(4) The governor, upon recommendation from the clemency and pardons
board, may grant an extraordinary release for reasons of serious health
problems, senility, advanced age, extraordinary meritorious acts, or
other extraordinary circumstances;
(5) No more than the final six months of the offender's term of
confinement may be served in partial confinement designed to aid the
offender in finding work and reestablishing himself or herself in the
community. This is in addition to that period of earned early release
time that may be exchanged for partial confinement pursuant to RCW
9.94A.729(5)(d);
(6) The governor may pardon any offender;
(7) The department may release an offender from confinement any
time within ten days before a release date calculated under this
section;
(8) An offender may leave a correctional facility prior to
completion of his or her sentence if the sentence has been reduced as
provided in RCW 9.94A.870; and
(9) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, an
offender sentenced for a felony crime listed in RCW 9.94A.540 as
subject to a mandatory minimum sentence of total confinement shall not
be released from total confinement before the completion of the listed
mandatory minimum sentence for that felony crime of conviction unless
allowed under RCW 9.94A.540.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.729 and 2009 c 455 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The term of the sentence of an offender committed to a
correctional facility operated by the department may be reduced by
earned release time in accordance with procedures that shall be
developed and adopted by the correctional agency having jurisdiction in
which the offender is confined. The earned release time shall be for
good behavior and good performance, as determined by the correctional
agency having jurisdiction. The correctional agency shall not credit
the offender with earned release credits in advance of the offender
actually earning the credits.
(b) Any program established pursuant to this section shall allow
an offender to earn early release credits for presentence
incarceration. If an offender is transferred from a county jail to the
department, the administrator of a county jail facility shall certify
to the department the amount of time spent in custody at the facility
and the amount of earned release time. The department may approve a
jail certification from a correctional agency that calculates earned
release time based on the actual amount of confinement time served by
the offender before sentencing when an erroneous calculation of
confinement time served by the offender before sentencing appears on
the judgment and sentence.
(2) An offender who has been convicted of a felony committed after
July 23, 1995, that involves any applicable deadly weapon enhancements
under RCW 9.94A.533 (3) or (4), or both, shall not receive any good
time credits or earned release time for that portion of his or her
sentence that results from any deadly weapon enhancements.
(3) An offender may earn early release time as follows:
(a) In the case of an offender convicted of a serious violent
offense, or a sex offense that is a class A felony, committed on or
after July 1, 1990, and before July 1, 2003, the aggregate earned
release time may not exceed fifteen percent of the sentence.
(b) In the case of an offender convicted of a serious violent
offense, or a sex offense that is a class A felony, committed on or
after July 1, 2003, the aggregate earned release time may not exceed
ten percent of the sentence.
(c) An offender is qualified to earn up to fifty percent of
aggregate earned release time if he or she:
(i) Is not classified as an offender who is at a high risk to
reoffend as provided in subsection (4) of this section;
(ii) Is not confined pursuant to a sentence for:
(A) A sex offense;
(B) A violent offense;
(C) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(D) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020;
(E) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(F) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(G) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor);
(iii) Has no prior conviction for the offenses listed in (c)(ii) of
this subsection;
(iv) Participates in programming or activities as directed by the
offender's individual reentry plan as provided under RCW 72.09.270 to
the extent that such programming or activities are made available by
the department; and
(v) Has not committed a new felony after July 22, 2007, while under
community custody.
(d) In no other case shall the aggregate earned release time exceed
one-third of the total sentence.
(4) The department shall perform a risk assessment of each offender
who may qualify for earned early release under subsection (3)(c) of
this section utilizing the risk assessment tool recommended by the
Washington state institute for public policy. Subsection (3)(c) of
this section does not apply to offenders convicted after July 1, 2010.
(5)(a) A person who is eligible for earned early release as
provided in this section and who is convicted of a sex offense, a
violent offense, any crime against persons under RCW 9.94A.411(2), or
a felony offense under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, shall be transferred
to community custody in lieu of earned release time;
(b) The department shall, as a part of its program for release to
the community in lieu of earned release, require the offender to
propose a release plan that includes an approved residence and living
arrangement. All offenders with community custody terms eligible for
release to community custody in lieu of earned release shall provide an
approved residence and living arrangement prior to release to the
community;
(c) The department may deny transfer to community custody in lieu
of earned release time if the department determines an offender's
release plan, including proposed residence location and living
arrangements, may violate the conditions of the sentence or conditions
of supervision, place the offender at risk to violate the conditions of
the sentence, place the offender at risk to reoffend, or present a risk
to victim safety or community safety. The department's authority under
this section is independent of any court-ordered condition of sentence
or statutory provision regarding conditions for community custody;
(d) If the department is unable to approve the offender's release
plan, the department may do one or more of the following:
(i) Transfer an offender to partial confinement in lieu of earned
early release for a period not to exceed three months. The three
months in partial confinement is in addition to that portion of the
offender's term of confinement that may be served in partial
confinement as provided in RCW 9.94A.728(5);
(ii) Provide rental vouchers to the offender for a period not to
exceed three months if rental assistance will result in an approved
release plan. The voucher must be provided in conjunction with
additional transition support programming or services that enable an
offender to participate in services including, but not limited to,
substance abuse treatment, mental health treatment, sex offender
treatment, educational programming, or employment programming;
(e) For each offender who is the recipient of a rental voucher, the
department shall include, concurrent with the data that the department
otherwise obtains and records, the housing status of the offender for
the duration of the offender's supervision.
(6) An offender serving a term of confinement imposed under RCW
9.94A.670(5)(a) is not eligible for earned release credits under this
section.

Sec. 4 RCW 24.55.075 and 2009 c 436 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the electronic
signatures in global and national commerce act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001 et
seq.), but does not modify, limit, or supersede 15 U.S.C. Sec.
7001(((a))) (c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices
described in 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7003(b).

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.30.530 and 2009 c 486 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board of regents of Washington State University shall
establish the Washington State University small business development
center.
(2) The center shall provide management and technical assistance
including but not limited to training, counseling, and research
services to small businesses throughout the state. The center shall
work with the department of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce, the state board for community and technical
colleges, the higher education coordinating board, the workforce
training and education coordinating board, the employment security
department, the Washington state economic development commission,
associate development organizations, and workforce development councils
to:
(a) Integrate small business development centers with other state
and local economic development and workforce development programs;
(b) Target the centers' services to small businesses;
(c) Tailor outreach and services at each center to the needs and
demographics of entrepreneurs and small businesses located within the
service area;
(d) Establish and expand small business development center
satellite offices when financially feasible; and
(e) Coordinate delivery of services to avoid duplication.
(3) The administrator of the center may contract with other public
or private entities for the provision of specialized services.
(4) The small business development center may accept and disburse
federal grants or federal matching funds or other funds or donations
from any source when made, granted, or donated to carry out the
center's purposes. When drawing on funds from the business assistance
account created in RCW ((30.60.010)) 28B.30.531, the center must first
use the funds to make increased management and technical assistance
available to small and start-up businesses at satellite offices. The
funds may also be used to develop and expand assistance programs such
as small business planning workshops and small business counseling.
(5) The legislature directs the small business development center
to request United States small business administration approval of a
special emphasis initiative, as permitted under 13 C.F.R. 130.340(c) as
of April 1, 2009, to target assistance to Washington state's smaller
businesses. This initiative would be negotiated and included in the
first cooperative agreement application process that occurs after July
26, 2009.
(6) By December 1, 2009, and December 1, 2010, respectively, the
center shall provide a written progress report and a final report to
the appropriate committees of the legislature with respect to the
requirements in subsections (2) and (5) of this section and the amount
and use of funding received through the business assistance account.
The reports must also include data on the number, location, staffing,
and budget levels of satellite offices; affiliations with community
colleges, associate development organizations or other local
organizations; the number, size, and type of small businesses assisted;
and the types of services provided. The reports must also include
information on the outcomes achieved, such as jobs created or retained,
private capital invested, and return on the investment of state and
federal dollars.

Sec. 6 RCW 28B.67.030 and 2009 c 296 s 2 and 2009 c 564 s 1804
are each reenacted to read as follows:
(1) All payments received from a participant in the Washington
customized employment training program created in RCW 28B.67.020 shall
be deposited into the employment training finance account, which is
hereby created in the custody of the state treasurer. Only the state
board for community and technical colleges may authorize expenditures
from the account and no appropriation is required for expenditures.
The money in the account must be used solely for training allowances
under the Washington customized employment training program created in
RCW 28B.67.020 and for providing up to seventy-five thousand dollars
per year for training, marketing, and facilitation services to increase
the use of the program. The deposit of payments under this section
from a participant shall cease when the board specifies that the
participant has met the monetary obligations of the program. During
the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the
employment training finance account to the state general fund such
amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the account.
(2) All revenue solicited and received under the provisions of RCW
28B.67.020(4) shall be deposited into the employment training finance
account to provide training allowances.
(3) The definitions in RCW 28B.67.010 apply to this section.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2012.

Sec. 7 RCW 36.16.050 and 1991 c 363 s 49 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every county official before he or she enters upon the duties of
his or her office shall furnish a bond conditioned that he or she will
faithfully perform the duties of his or her office and account for and
pay over all money which may come into his or her hands by virtue of
his or her office, and that he or she, or his or her executors or
administrators, will deliver to his or her successor safe and undefaced
all books, records, papers, seals, equipment, and furniture belonging
to his or her office. Bonds of elective county officers shall be as
follows:
(1) Assessor: Amount to be fixed and sureties to be approved by
proper county legislative authority;
(2) Auditor: Amount to be fixed at not less than ten thousand
dollars and sureties to be approved by the proper county legislative
authority;
(3) Clerk: Amount to be fixed in a penal sum not less than double
the amount of money liable to come into his or her hands and sureties
to be approved by the judge or a majority of the judges presiding over
the court of which he or she is clerk: PROVIDED, That the maximum bond
fixed for the clerk shall not exceed in amount that required for the
treasurer in ((a)) the same county ((of that class));
(4) Coroner: Amount to be fixed at not less than five thousand
dollars with sureties to be approved by the proper county legislative
authority;
(5) Members of the proper county legislative authority: Sureties
to be approved by the county clerk and the amounts to be:
(a) In each county with a population of one hundred twenty-five
thousand or more, twenty-five thousand dollars;
(b) In each county with a population of from seventy thousand to
less than one hundred twenty-five thousand, twenty-two thousand five
hundred dollars;
(c) In each county with a population of from forty (([thousand]))
thousand to less than seventy thousand, twenty thousand dollars;
(d) In each county with a population of from eighteen thousand to
less than forty thousand, fifteen thousand dollars;
(e) In each county with a population of from twelve thousand to
less than eighteen thousand, ten thousand dollars;
(f) In each county with a population of from eight thousand to less
than twelve thousand, seven thousand five hundred dollars;
(g) In all other counties, five thousand dollars;
(6) Prosecuting attorney: In the amount of five thousand dollars
with sureties to be approved by the proper county legislative
authority;
(7) Sheriff: Amount to be fixed and bond approved by the proper
county legislative authority at not less than five thousand nor more
than fifty thousand dollars; surety to be a surety company authorized
to do business in this state;
(8) Treasurer: Sureties to be approved by the proper county
legislative authority and the amounts to be fixed by the proper county
legislative authority at double the amount liable to come into the
treasurer's hands during his or her term, the maximum amount of the
bond, however, not to exceed:
(a) In each county with a population of two hundred ten thousand or
more, two hundred fifty thousand dollars;
(b) In each county with a population of from one hundred twenty-five thousand to less than two hundred ten thousand, two hundred
thousand dollars;
(c) In each county with a population of from eighteen thousand to
less than one hundred twenty-five thousand, one hundred fifty thousand
dollars;
(d) In all other counties, one hundred thousand dollars.
The treasurer's bond shall be conditioned that all moneys received
by him or her for the use of the county shall be paid as the proper
county legislative authority shall from time to time direct, except
where special provision is made by law for the payment of such moneys,
by order of any court, or otherwise, and for the faithful discharge of
his or her duties.
Bonds for other than elective officials, if deemed necessary by the
proper county legislative authority, shall be in such amount and form
as such legislative authority shall determine.
In the approval of official bonds, the chair may act for the county
legislative authority if it is not in session.

Sec. 8 RCW 36.70A.070 and 2005 c 360 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The comprehensive plan of a county or city that is required or
chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall consist of a map or maps,
and descriptive text covering objectives, principles, and standards
used to develop the comprehensive plan. The plan shall be an
internally consistent document and all elements shall be consistent
with the future land use map. A comprehensive plan shall be adopted
and amended with public participation as provided in RCW 36.70A.140.
Each comprehensive plan shall include a plan, scheme, or design for
each of the following:
(1) A land use element designating the proposed general
distribution and general location and extent of the uses of land, where
appropriate, for agriculture, timber production, housing, commerce,
industry, recreation, open spaces, general aviation airports, public
utilities, public facilities, and other land uses. The land use
element shall include population densities, building intensities, and
estimates of future population growth. The land use element shall
provide for protection of the quality and quantity of groundwater used
for public water supplies. Wherever possible, the land use element
should consider utilizing urban planning approaches that promote
physical activity. Where applicable, the land use element shall review
drainage, flooding, and storm water run-off in the area and nearby
jurisdictions and provide guidance for corrective actions to mitigate
or cleanse those discharges that pollute waters of the state, including
Puget Sound or waters entering Puget Sound.
(2) A housing element ensuring the vitality and character of
established residential neighborhoods that: (a) Includes an inventory
and analysis of existing and projected housing needs that identifies
the number of housing units necessary to manage projected growth; (b)
includes a statement of goals, policies, objectives, and mandatory
provisions for the preservation, improvement, and development of
housing, including single-family residences; (c) identifies sufficient
land for housing, including, but not limited to, government-assisted
housing, housing for low-income families, manufactured housing,
multifamily housing, and group homes and foster care facilities; and
(d) makes adequate provisions for existing and projected needs of all
economic segments of the community.
(3) A capital facilities plan element consisting of: (a) An
inventory of existing capital facilities owned by public entities,
showing the locations and capacities of the capital facilities; (b) a
forecast of the future needs for such capital facilities; (c) the
proposed locations and capacities of expanded or new capital
facilities; (d) at least a six-year plan that will finance such capital
facilities within projected funding capacities and clearly identifies
sources of public money for such purposes; and (e) a requirement to
reassess the land use element if probable funding falls short of
meeting existing needs and to ensure that the land use element, capital
facilities plan element, and financing plan within the capital
facilities plan element are coordinated and consistent. Park and
recreation facilities shall be included in the capital facilities plan
element.
(4) A utilities element consisting of the general location,
proposed location, and capacity of all existing and proposed utilities,
including, but not limited to, electrical lines, telecommunication
lines, and natural gas lines.
(5) Rural element. Counties shall include a rural element
including lands that are not designated for urban growth, agriculture,
forest, or mineral resources. The following provisions shall apply to
the rural element:
(a) Growth management act goals and local circumstances. Because
circumstances vary from county to county, in establishing patterns of
rural densities and uses, a county may consider local circumstances,
but shall develop a written record explaining how the rural element
harmonizes the planning goals in RCW 36.70A.020 and meets the
requirements of this chapter.
(b) Rural development. The rural element shall permit rural
development, forestry, and agriculture in rural areas. The rural
element shall provide for a variety of rural densities, uses, essential
public facilities, and rural governmental services needed to serve the
permitted densities and uses. To achieve a variety of rural densities
and uses, counties may provide for clustering, density transfer, design
guidelines, conservation easements, and other innovative techniques
that will accommodate appropriate rural densities and uses that are not
characterized by urban growth and that are consistent with rural
character.
(c) Measures governing rural development. The rural element shall
include measures that apply to rural development and protect the rural
character of the area, as established by the county, by:
(i) Containing or otherwise controlling rural development;
(ii) Assuring visual compatibility of rural development with the
surrounding rural area;
(iii) Reducing the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land
into sprawling, low-density development in the rural area;
(iv) Protecting critical areas, as provided in RCW 36.70A.060, and
surface water and groundwater resources; and
(v) Protecting against conflicts with the use of agricultural,
forest, and mineral resource lands designated under RCW 36.70A.170.
(d) Limited areas of more intensive rural development. Subject to
the requirements of this subsection and except as otherwise
specifically provided in this subsection (5)(d), the rural element may
allow for limited areas of more intensive rural development, including
necessary public facilities and public services to serve the limited
area as follows:
(i) Rural development consisting of the infill, development, or
redevelopment of existing commercial, industrial, residential, or
mixed-use areas, whether characterized as shoreline development,
villages, hamlets, rural activity centers, or crossroads developments.
(A) A commercial, industrial, residential, shoreline, or mixed-use
area shall be subject to the requirements of (d)(iv) of this
subsection, but shall not be subject to the requirements of (c)(ii) and
(iii) of this subsection.
(B) Any development or redevelopment other than an industrial area
or an industrial use within a mixed-use area or an industrial area
under this subsection (5)(d)(i) must be principally designed to serve
the existing and projected rural population.
(C) Any development or redevelopment in terms of building size,
scale, use, or intensity shall be consistent with the character of the
existing areas. Development and redevelopment may include changes in
use from vacant land or a previously existing use so long as the new
use conforms to the requirements of this subsection (5);
(ii) The intensification of development on lots containing, or new
development of, small-scale recreational or tourist uses, including
commercial facilities to serve those recreational or tourist uses, that
rely on a rural location and setting, but that do not include new
residential development. A small-scale recreation or tourist use is
not required to be principally designed to serve the existing and
projected rural population. Public services and public facilities
shall be limited to those necessary to serve the recreation or tourist
use and shall be provided in a manner that does not permit low-density
sprawl;
(iii) The intensification of development on lots containing
isolated nonresidential uses or new development of isolated cottage
industries and isolated small-scale businesses that are not principally
designed to serve the existing and projected rural population and
nonresidential uses, but do provide job opportunities for rural
residents. Rural counties may allow the expansion of small-scale
businesses as long as those small-scale businesses conform with the
rural character of the area as defined by the local government
according to RCW 36.70A.030(((14))) (15). Rural counties may also
allow new small-scale businesses to utilize a site previously occupied
by an existing business as long as the new small-scale business
conforms to the rural character of the area as defined by the local
government according to RCW 36.70A.030(((14))) (15). Public services
and public facilities shall be limited to those necessary to serve the
isolated nonresidential use and shall be provided in a manner that does
not permit low-density sprawl;
(iv) A county shall adopt measures to minimize and contain the
existing areas or uses of more intensive rural development, as
appropriate, authorized under this subsection. Lands included in such
existing areas or uses shall not extend beyond the logical outer
boundary of the existing area or use, thereby allowing a new pattern of
low-density sprawl. Existing areas are those that are clearly
identifiable and contained and where there is a logical boundary
delineated predominately by the built environment, but that may also
include undeveloped lands if limited as provided in this subsection.
The county shall establish the logical outer boundary of an area of
more intensive rural development. In establishing the logical outer
boundary, the county shall address (A) the need to preserve the
character of existing natural neighborhoods and communities, (B)
physical boundaries, such as bodies of water, streets and highways, and
land forms and contours, (C) the prevention of abnormally irregular
boundaries, and (D) the ability to provide public facilities and public
services in a manner that does not permit low-density sprawl;
(v) For purposes of (d) of this subsection, an existing area or
existing use is one that was in existence:
(A) On July 1, 1990, in a county that was initially required to
plan under all of the provisions of this chapter;
(B) On the date the county adopted a resolution under RCW
36.70A.040(2), in a county that is planning under all of the provisions
of this chapter under RCW 36.70A.040(2); or
(C) On the date the office of financial management certifies the
county's population as provided in RCW 36.70A.040(5), in a county that
is planning under all of the provisions of this chapter pursuant to RCW
36.70A.040(5).
(e) Exception. This subsection shall not be interpreted to permit
in the rural area a major industrial development or a master planned
resort unless otherwise specifically permitted under RCW 36.70A.360 and
36.70A.365.
(6) A transportation element that implements, and is consistent
with, the land use element.
(a) The transportation element shall include the following
subelements:
(i) Land use assumptions used in estimating travel;
(ii) Estimated traffic impacts to state-owned transportation
facilities resulting from land use assumptions to assist the department
of transportation in monitoring the performance of state facilities, to
plan improvements for the facilities, and to assess the impact of land-use decisions on state-owned transportation facilities;
(iii) Facilities and services needs, including:
(A) An inventory of air, water, and ground transportation
facilities and services, including transit alignments and general
aviation airport facilities, to define existing capital facilities and
travel levels as a basis for future planning. This inventory must
include state-owned transportation facilities within the city or
county's jurisdictional boundaries;
(B) Level of service standards for all locally owned arterials and
transit routes to serve as a gauge to judge performance of the system.
These standards should be regionally coordinated;
(C) For state-owned transportation facilities, level of service
standards for highways, as prescribed in chapters 47.06 and 47.80 RCW,
to gauge the performance of the system. The purposes of reflecting
level of service standards for state highways in the local
comprehensive plan are to monitor the performance of the system, to
evaluate improvement strategies, and to facilitate coordination between
the county's or city's six-year street, road, or transit program and
the ((department of transportation's six-year)) office of financial
management's ten-year investment program. The concurrency requirements
of (b) of this subsection do not apply to transportation facilities and
services of statewide significance except for counties consisting of
islands whose only connection to the mainland are state highways or
ferry routes. In these island counties, state highways and ferry route
capacity must be a factor in meeting the concurrency requirements in
(b) of this subsection;
(D) Specific actions and requirements for bringing into compliance
locally owned transportation facilities or services that are below an
established level of service standard;
(E) Forecasts of traffic for at least ten years based on the
adopted land use plan to provide information on the location, timing,
and capacity needs of future growth;
(F) Identification of state and local system needs to meet current
and future demands. Identified needs on state-owned transportation
facilities must be consistent with the statewide multimodal
transportation plan required under chapter 47.06 RCW;
(iv) Finance, including:
(A) An analysis of funding capability to judge needs against
probable funding resources;
(B) A multiyear financing plan based on the needs identified in the
comprehensive plan, the appropriate parts of which shall serve as the
basis for the six-year street, road, or transit program required by RCW
35.77.010 for cities, RCW 36.81.121 for counties, and RCW 35.58.2795
for public transportation systems. The multiyear financing plan should
be coordinated with the ((six-year improvement)) ten-year investment
program developed by the ((department of transportation)) office of
financial management as required by RCW 47.05.030;
(C) If probable funding falls short of meeting identified needs, a
discussion of how additional funding will be raised, or how land use
assumptions will be reassessed to ensure that level of service
standards will be met;
(v) Intergovernmental coordination efforts, including an assessment
of the impacts of the transportation plan and land use assumptions on
the transportation systems of adjacent jurisdictions;
(vi) Demand-management strategies;
(vii) Pedestrian and bicycle component to include collaborative
efforts to identify and designate planned improvements for pedestrian
and bicycle facilities and corridors that address and encourage
enhanced community access and promote healthy lifestyles.
(b) After adoption of the comprehensive plan by jurisdictions
required to plan or who choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, local
jurisdictions must adopt and enforce ordinances which prohibit
development approval if the development causes the level of service on
a locally owned transportation facility to decline below the standards
adopted in the transportation element of the comprehensive plan, unless
transportation improvements or strategies to accommodate the impacts of
development are made concurrent with the development. These strategies
may include increased public transportation service, ride sharing
programs, demand management, and other transportation systems
management strategies. For the purposes of this subsection (6),
"concurrent with the development" ((shall)) means that improvements or
strategies are in place at the time of development, or that a financial
commitment is in place to complete the improvements or strategies
within six years.
(c) The transportation element described in this subsection (6),
((and)) the six-year plans required by RCW 35.77.010 for cities, RCW
36.81.121 for counties, and RCW 35.58.2795 for public transportation
systems, and the ten-year investment program required by RCW 47.05.030
for the state, must be consistent.
(7) An economic development element establishing local goals,
policies, objectives, and provisions for economic growth and vitality
and a high quality of life. The element shall include: (a) A summary
of the local economy such as population, employment, payroll, sectors,
businesses, sales, and other information as appropriate; (b) a summary
of the strengths and weaknesses of the local economy defined as the
commercial and industrial sectors and supporting factors such as land
use, transportation, utilities, education, workforce, housing, and
natural/cultural resources; and (c) an identification of policies,
programs, and projects to foster economic growth and development and to
address future needs. A city that has chosen to be a residential
community is exempt from the economic development element requirement
of this subsection.
(8) A park and recreation element that implements, and is
consistent with, the capital facilities plan element as it relates to
park and recreation facilities. The element shall include: (a)
Estimates of park and recreation demand for at least a ten-year period;
(b) an evaluation of facilities and service needs; and (c) an
evaluation of intergovernmental coordination opportunities to provide
regional approaches for meeting park and recreational demand.
(9) It is the intent that new or amended elements required after
January 1, 2002, be adopted concurrent with the scheduled update
provided in RCW 36.70A.130. Requirements to incorporate any such new
or amended elements shall be null and void until funds sufficient to
cover applicable local government costs are appropriated and
distributed by the state at least two years before local government
must update comprehensive plans as required in RCW 36.70A.130.

Sec. 9 RCW 41.45.150 and 2009 c 561 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2009, and ending June 30, 2015, maximum
annual contribution rates are established for the portion of the
employer contribution rate for the public employees' retirement system
and the public safety employees' retirement system that is used for the
sole purpose of amortizing that portion of the unfunded actuarial
accrued liability in the public employees' retirement system plan 1
that excludes any amounts required to amortize plan 1 benefit
improvements effective after June 30, 2009. The maximum rates are:

Fiscal Year ending:

2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015

1.25% 1.25% 3.75% 4.50% 5.25% 6.00%

(2) Beginning September 1, 2009, and ending August 31, 2015,
maximum annual contribution rates are established for the portion of
the employer contribution rate for the school employees' retirement
system that is used for the sole purpose of amortizing that portion of
the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 that excludes any amounts required to amortize
plan 1 benefit improvements effective after June 30, 2009. The maximum
rates are:

Fiscal Year ending:

2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015

1.25% 1.25% 3.75% 4.50% 5.25% 6.00%

(3) Beginning September 1, 2009, and ending August 31, 2015,
maximum annual contribution rates are established for the portion of
the employer contribution rate for the teachers' retirement system that
is used for the sole purpose of amortizing that portion of the unfunded
actuarial accrued liability in the teachers' retirement system plan 1
that excludes any amounts required to amortize plan 1 benefit
improvements effective after June 30, 2009. The maximum rates are:

Fiscal Year ending:

2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015

2.04% 2.04% 6.50% 7.50% 8.50% 9.50%

(4) Beginning July 1, 2015, a minimum 5.25 percent contribution is
established as part of the basic employer contribution rate for the
public employees' retirement system and the public safety employees'
retirement system, to be used for the sole purpose of amortizing that
portion of the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 that excludes any amounts required
to amortize plan 1 benefit improvements effective after June 30, 2009.
This minimum contribution rate shall remain effective until the
actuarial value of assets in plan 1 of the public employees' retirement
system equals one hundred ((twenty-five)) percent of the actuarial
accrued liability.
(5) Beginning September 1, 2015, a minimum 5.25 percent
contribution is established as part of the basic employer contribution
rate for the school employees' retirement system, to be used for the
sole purpose of amortizing that portion of the unfunded actuarial
accrued liability in the public employees' retirement system plan 1
that excludes any amounts required to amortize plan 1 benefit
improvements effective after June 30, 2009. This minimum contribution
rate shall remain effective until the actuarial value of assets in plan
1 of the public employees' retirement system equals one hundred percent
of the actuarial accrued liability.
(6) Beginning September 1, 2015, a minimum 8.00 percent
contribution is established as part of the basic employer contribution
rate for the teachers' retirement system, to be used for the sole
purpose of amortizing that portion of the unfunded actuarial accrued
liability in the teachers' retirement system plan 1 that excludes any
amounts required to amortize plan 1 benefit improvements effective
after June 30, 2009. This minimum contribution rate shall remain
effective until the actuarial value of assets in plan 1 of the
teachers' retirement system equals one hundred percent of the actuarial
accrued liability.
(7) Upon completion of each biennial actuarial valuation, the state
actuary shall review the appropriateness of the minimum contribution
rates and recommend to the council any adjustments as may be needed due
to material changes in benefits or actuarial assumptions, methods, or
experience. Any changes adopted by the council shall be subject to
revision by the legislature.

Sec. 10 RCW 47.01.402 and 2009 c 458 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the replacement of the vulnerable
state route number 99 Alaskan Way viaduct is a matter of urgency for
the safety of Washington's traveling public and the needs of the
transportation system in central Puget Sound. The state route number
99 Alaskan Way viaduct is susceptible to damage, closure, or
catastrophic failure from earthquakes and tsunamis. Additionally, the
viaduct serves as a vital route for freight and passenger vehicles
through downtown Seattle.
Since 2001, the department has undertaken an extensive evaluation
of multiple options to replace the Alaskan Way viaduct, including an
initial evaluation of seventy-six conceptual alternatives and a more
detailed analysis of five alternatives in 2004. In addition to a
substantial technical review, the department has also undertaken
considerable public outreach, which included consultation with a
stakeholder advisory committee that met sixteen times over a thirteen-month period.
Therefore, it is the conclusion of the legislature that time is of
the essence, and that Washington state cannot wait for a disaster to
make it fully appreciate the urgency of the need to replace this
vulnerable structure. The state shall take the necessary steps to
expedite the environmental review and design processes to replace the
Alaskan Way viaduct with a deep bore tunnel under First Avenue from the
vicinity of the sports stadiums in Seattle to Aurora Avenue north of
the Battery Street tunnel. The tunnel must include four general
purpose lanes in a stacked formation.
(2) The state route number 99 Alaskan Way viaduct replacement
project finance plan must include state funding not to exceed two
billion four hundred million dollars and must also include no more than
four hundred million dollars in toll revenue. These funds must be used
solely to build a replacement tunnel, as described in subsection (1) of
this section, and to remove the existing state route number 99 Alaskan
Way viaduct. All costs associated with city utility relocations for
state work as described in this section must be borne by the city of
Seattle and provided in a manner that meets project construction
schedule requirements as determined by the department. State funding
is not authorized for any utility relocation costs, or for central
seawall or waterfront promenade improvements.
(3) The department shall provide updated cost estimates for
construction of the ((bored)) deep bore tunnel and also for the full
Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project to the legislature and governor
by January 1, 2010. The department must also consult with independent
tunnel engineering experts to review the estimates and risk
assumptions. The department shall not enter into a design-build
contract for construction of the ((bored)) deep bore tunnel until the
report in this section has been submitted.
(4) Any contract the department enters into related to construction
of the deep ((bored)) bore tunnel must include incentives and penalties
to encourage on-time completion of the project and to minimize the
potential for cost overruns.
(5) It is important that the public and policymakers have accurate
and timely access to information related to the Alaskan Way viaduct
replacement project as it proceeds to, and during, construction of all
aspects of the project, specifically including, but not limited to,
information regarding costs, schedules, contracts, project status, and
neighborhood impacts. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature
that the state, city, and county departments of transportation
establish a single source of accountability for integration,
coordination, tracking, and information of all requisite components of
the replacement project, which must include, at minimum:
(a) A master schedule of all subprojects included in the full
replacement project or program; and
(b) A single point of contact for the public, media, stakeholders,
and other interested parties.
(6)(a) The city and county departments of transportation shall be
responsible for the cost, delivery, and associated risks of the project
components for which each department is responsible, as outlined in the
January 13, 2009, letter of agreement signed by the governor, city, and
county.
(b) The state's contribution shall not exceed two billion four
hundred million dollars. If costs exceed two billion four hundred
million dollars, no more than four hundred million (([dollars]))
dollars of the additional costs shall be financed with toll revenue.
Any costs in excess of two billion eight hundred million dollars shall
be borne by property owners in the Seattle area who benefit from
replacement of the existing viaduct with the deep bore tunnel.
(7) Compression brakes may be used by authorized motor vehicles in
the deep bore tunnel in a manner consistent with the requirements of
RCW 46.37.395.

Sec. 11 RCW 46.68.080 and 2006 c 337 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Motor vehicle license fees collected under RCW 46.16.0621 and
46.16.070 and fuel taxes collected under RCW 82.36.025(1) and
82.38.030(1) and directly or indirectly paid by the residents of those
counties composed entirely of islands and which have neither a fixed
physical connection with the mainland nor any state highways on any of
the islands of which they are composed, shall be paid into the motor
vehicle fund of the state of Washington and shall monthly, as they
accrue, and after deducting therefrom the expenses of issuing such
licenses and the cost of collecting such vehicle fuel tax, be paid to
the county treasurer of each such county to be by him or her disbursed
as hereinafter provided.
(2) One-half of the motor vehicle license fees collected under RCW
46.16.0621 and 46.16.070 and one-half of the fuel taxes collected under
RCW 82.36.025(1) and 82.38.030(1) and directly or indirectly paid by
the residents of those counties composed entirely of islands and which
have either a fixed physical connection with the mainland or state
highways on any of the islands of which they are composed, shall be
paid into the motor vehicle fund of the state of Washington and shall
monthly, as they accrue, and after deducting therefrom the expenses of
issuing such licenses and the cost of collecting such motor vehicle
fuel tax, be paid to the county treasurer of each such county to be by
him or her disbursed as hereinafter provided.
(3) All funds paid to the county treasurer of the counties ((of
either class)) referred to in subsections (1) and (2) of this section,
shall be by such county treasurer distributed and credited to the
several road districts of each such county and paid to the city
treasurer of each incorporated city and town within each such county,
in the direct proportion that the assessed valuation of each such road
district and incorporated city and town shall bear to the total
assessed valuation of each such county.
(4) The amount of motor vehicle fuel tax paid by the residents of
those counties composed entirely of islands shall, for the purposes of
this section, be that percentage of the total amount of motor vehicle
fuel tax collected in the state that the motor vehicle license fees
paid by the residents of counties composed entirely of islands bears to
the total motor vehicle license fees paid by the residents of the
state.
(5)(a) An amount of fuel taxes shall be deposited into the Puget
Sound ferry operations account. This amount shall equal the difference
between the total amount of fuel taxes collected in the state under RCW
82.36.020 and 82.38.030 less the total amount of fuel taxes collected
in the state under RCW 82.36.020(1) and 82.38.030(1) and be multiplied
by a fraction. The fraction shall equal the amount of motor vehicle
license fees collected under RCW 46.16.0621 and 46.16.070 from counties
described in subsection (1) of this section divided by the total amount
of motor vehicle license fees collected in the state under RCW
46.16.0621 and 46.16.070.
(b) An additional amount of fuel taxes shall be deposited into the
Puget Sound ferry operations account. This amount shall equal the
difference between the total amount of fuel taxes collected in the
state under RCW 82.36.020 and 82.38.030 less the total amount of fuel
taxes collected in the state under RCW 82.36.020(1) and 82.38.030(1)
and be multiplied by a fraction. The fraction shall equal the amount
of motor vehicle license fees collected under RCW 46.16.0621 and
46.16.070 from counties described in subsection (2) of this section
divided by the total amount of motor vehicle license fees collected in
the state under RCW 46.16.0621 and 46.16.070, and this shall be
multiplied by one-half.

Sec. 12 RCW 67.28.180 and 2007 c 189 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the conditions set forth in subsections (2) and (3)
of this section, the legislative body of any county or any city, is
authorized to levy and collect a special excise tax of not to exceed
two percent on the sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging
that is subject to tax under chapter 82.08 RCW.
(2) Any levy authorized by this section shall be subject to the
following:
(a) Any county ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to this
section shall contain, in addition to all other provisions required to
conform to this chapter, a provision allowing a credit against the
county tax for the full amount of any city tax imposed pursuant to this
section upon the same taxable event.
(b) In the event that any county has levied the tax authorized by
this section and has, prior to June 26, 1975, either pledged the tax
revenues for payment of principal and interest on city revenue or
general obligation bonds authorized and issued pursuant to RCW
67.28.150 through 67.28.160 or has authorized and issued revenue or
general obligation bonds pursuant to the provisions of RCW 67.28.150
through 67.28.160, such county shall be exempt from the provisions of
(a) of this subsection, to the extent that the tax revenues are pledged
for payment of principal and interest on bonds issued at any time
pursuant to the provisions of RCW 67.28.150 through 67.28.160:
PROVIDED, That so much of such pledged tax revenues, together with any
investment earnings thereon, not immediately necessary for actual
payment of principal and interest on such bonds may be used: (i) In
any county with a population of one million or more, for repayment
either of limited tax levy general obligation bonds or of any county
fund or account from which a loan was made, the proceeds from the bonds
or loan being used to pay for constructing, installing, improving, and
equipping stadium capital improvement projects, and to pay for any
engineering, planning, financial, legal and professional services
incident to the development of such stadium capital improvement
projects, regardless of the date the debt for such capital improvement
projects was or may be incurred; (ii) in any county with a population
of one million or more, for repayment or refinancing of bonded
indebtedness incurred prior to January 1, 1997, for any purpose
authorized by this section or relating to stadium repairs or
rehabilitation, including but not limited to the cost of settling legal
claims, reimbursing operating funds, interest payments on short-term
loans, and any other purpose for which such debt has been incurred if
the county has created a public stadium authority to develop a stadium
and exhibition center under RCW 36.102.030; or (iii) in other counties,
for county-owned facilities for agricultural promotion until January 1,
2009, and thereafter for any purpose authorized in this chapter.
A county is exempt under this subsection with respect to city
revenue or general obligation bonds issued after April 1, 1991, only if
such bonds mature before January 1, 2013. If any county located east
of the crest of the Cascade mountains has levied the tax authorized by
this section and has, prior to June 26, 1975, pledged the tax revenue
for payment of principal and interest on city revenue or general
obligation bonds, the county is exempt under this subsection with
respect to revenue or general obligation bonds issued after January 1,
2007, only if the bonds mature before January 1, 2021. Such a county
may only use funds under this subsection (2)(b) for constructing or
improving facilities authorized under this chapter, including county-owned facilities for agricultural promotion, and must perform an annual
financial audit of organizations receiving funding on the use of the
funds.
As used in this subsection (2)(b), "capital improvement projects"
may include, but not be limited to a stadium restaurant facility,
restroom facilities, artificial turf system, seating facilities,
parking facilities and scoreboard and information system adjacent to or
within a county owned stadium, together with equipment, utilities,
accessories and appurtenances necessary thereto. The stadium
restaurant authorized by this subsection (2)(b) shall be operated by a
private concessionaire under a contract with the county.
(c)(i) No city within a county exempt under subsection (2)(b) of
this section may levy the tax authorized by this section so long as
said county is so exempt.
(ii) If bonds have been issued under RCW 43.99N.020 and any
necessary property transfers have been made under RCW 36.102.100, no
city within a county with a population of one million or more may levy
the tax authorized by this section before January 1, 2021.
(iii) However, in the event that any city in a county described in
(i) or (ii) of this subsection (2)(c) has levied the tax authorized by
this section and has, prior to June 26, 1975, authorized and issued
revenue or general obligation bonds pursuant to the provisions of RCW
67.28.150 through 67.28.160, such city may levy the tax so long as the
tax revenues are pledged for payment of principal and interest on bonds
issued at any time pursuant to the provisions of RCW 67.28.150 through
67.28.160.
(3) Any levy authorized by this section by a county that has levied
the tax authorized by this section and has, prior to June 26, 1975,
either pledged the tax revenues for payment of principal and interest
on city revenue or general obligation bonds authorized and issued
pursuant to RCW 67.28.150 through 67.28.160 or has authorized and
issued revenue or general obligation bonds pursuant to the provisions
of RCW 67.28.150 through 67.28.160 shall be subject to the following:
(a) Taxes collected under this section in any calendar year before
2013 in excess of five million three hundred thousand dollars shall
only be used as follows:
(i) Seventy-five percent from January 1, 1992, through December 31,
2000, and seventy percent from January 1, 2001, through December 31,
2012, for art museums, cultural museums, heritage museums, the arts,
and the performing arts. Moneys spent under this subsection (3)(a)(i)
shall be used for the purposes of this subsection (3)(a)(i) in all
parts of the county.
(ii) Twenty-five percent from January 1, 1992, through December 31,
2000, and thirty percent from January 1, 2001, through December 31,
2012, for the following purposes and in a manner reflecting the
following order of priority: Stadium purposes as authorized under
subsection (2)(b) of this section; acquisition of open space lands;
youth sports activities; and tourism promotion. If all or part of the
debt on the stadium is refinanced, all revenues under this subsection
(3)(a)(ii) shall be used to retire the debt.
(b) From January 1, 2013, through December 31, 2015, in a county
with a population of one million or more, all revenues under this
section shall be used to retire the debt on the stadium, or deposited
in the stadium and exhibition center account under RCW 43.99N.060 after
the debt on the stadium is retired.
(c) From January 1, 2016, through December 31, 2020, in a county
with a population of one million or more, all revenues under this
section shall be deposited in the stadium and exhibition center account
under RCW 43.99N.060.
(d) At least seventy percent of moneys spent under (a)(i) of this
subsection for the period January 1, 1992, through December 31, 2000,
shall be used only for the purchase, design, construction, and
remodeling of performing arts, visual arts, heritage, and cultural
facilities, and for the purchase of fixed assets that will benefit art,
heritage, and cultural organizations. For purposes of this subsection,
fixed assets are tangible objects such as machinery and other equipment
intended to be held or used for ten years or more. Moneys received
under this subsection (3)(d) may be used for payment of principal and
interest on bonds issued for capital projects. Qualifying
organizations receiving moneys under this subsection (3)(d) must be
financially stable and have at least the following:
(i) A legally constituted and working board of directors;
(ii) A record of artistic, heritage, or cultural accomplishments;
(iii) Been in existence and operating for at least two years;
(iv) Demonstrated ability to maintain net current liabilities at
less than thirty percent of general operating expenses;
(v) Demonstrated ability to sustain operational capacity subsequent
to completion of projects or purchase of machinery and equipment; and
(vi) Evidence that there has been independent financial review of
the organization.
(e) At least forty percent of the revenues distributed pursuant to
(a)(i) of this subsection for the period January 1, 2001, through
December 31, 2012, shall be deposited in an account and shall be used
to establish an endowment. Principal in the account shall remain
permanent and irreducible. The earnings from investments of balances
in the account may only be used for the purposes of (a)(i) of this
subsection.
(f) School districts and schools shall not receive revenues
distributed pursuant to (a)(i) of this subsection.
(g) Moneys distributed to art museums, cultural museums, heritage
museums, the arts, and the performing arts, and moneys distributed for
tourism promotion shall be in addition to and may not be used to
replace or supplant any other funding by the legislative body of the
county.
(h) As used in this section, "tourism promotion" includes
activities intended to attract visitors for overnight stays, arts,
heritage, and cultural events, and recreational, professional, and
amateur sports events. Moneys allocated to tourism promotion in a
((class AA)) county with a population of one million or more shall be
allocated to nonprofit organizations formed for the express purpose of
tourism promotion in the county. Such organizations shall use moneys
from the taxes to promote events in all parts of the ((class AA))
county.
(i) No taxes collected under this section may be used for the
operation or maintenance of a public stadium that is financed directly
or indirectly by bonds to which the tax is pledged. Expenditures for
operation or maintenance include all expenditures other than
expenditures that directly result in new fixed assets or that directly
increase the capacity, life span, or operating economy of existing
fixed assets.
(j) No ad valorem property taxes may be used for debt service on
bonds issued for a public stadium that is financed by bonds to which
the tax is pledged, unless the taxes collected under this section are
or are projected to be insufficient to meet debt service requirements
on such bonds.
(k) If a substantial part of the operation and management of a
public stadium that is financed directly or indirectly by bonds to
which the tax is pledged is performed by a nonpublic entity or if a
public stadium is sold that is financed directly or indirectly by bonds
to which the tax is pledged, any bonds to which the tax is pledged
shall be retired. This subsection (3)(k) does not apply in respect to
a public stadium under chapter 36.102 RCW transferred to, owned by, or
constructed by a public facilities district under chapter 36.100 RCW or
a stadium and exhibition center.
(l) The county shall not lease a public stadium that is financed
directly or indirectly by bonds to which the tax is pledged to, or
authorize the use of the public stadium by, a professional major league
sports franchise unless the sports franchise gives the right of first
refusal to purchase the sports franchise, upon its sale, to local
government. This subsection (3)(l) does not apply to contracts in
existence on April 1, 1986.
If a court of competent jurisdiction declares any provision of this
subsection (3) invalid, then that invalid provision shall be null and
void and the remainder of this section is not affected.

Sec. 13 RCW 82.45.180 and 2009 c 308 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) For taxes collected by the county under this chapter, the
county treasurer shall collect a five-dollar fee on all transactions
required by this chapter where the transaction does not require the
payment of tax. A total of five dollars shall be collected in the form
of a tax and fee, where the calculated tax payment is less than five
dollars. Through June 30, 2006, the county treasurer shall place one
percent of the taxes collected by the county under this chapter and the
treasurer's fee in the county current expense fund to defray costs of
collection. After June 30, 2006, the county treasurer shall place one
and three-tenths percent of the taxes collected by the county under
this chapter and the treasurer's fee in the county current expense fund
to defray costs of collection. For taxes collected by the county under
this chapter before July 1, 2006, the county treasurer shall pay over
to the state treasurer and account to the department of revenue for the
proceeds at the same time the county treasurer remits funds to the
state under RCW 84.56.280. For taxes collected by the county under
this chapter after June 30, 2006, on a monthly basis the county
treasurer shall pay over to the state treasurer the month's
transmittal. The month's transmittal must be received by the state
treasurer by 12:00 p.m. on the last working day of each month. The
county treasurer shall account to the department for the month's
transmittal by the twentieth day of the month following the month in
which the month's transmittal was paid over to the state treasurer.
The state treasurer shall deposit the proceeds in the general fund.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, the definitions in this
subsection apply.
(i) "Close of business" means the time when the county treasurer
makes his or her daily deposit of proceeds.
(ii) "Month's transmittal" means all proceeds deposited by the
county through the close of business of the day that is two working
days before the last working day of the month. This definition of
"month's transmittal" shall not be construed as requiring any change in
a county's practices regarding the timing of its daily deposits of
proceeds.
(iii) "Proceeds" means moneys collected and receipted by the county
from the taxes imposed by this chapter, less the county's share of the
proceeds used to defray the county's costs of collection allowable in
(a) of this subsection.
(iv) "Working day" means a calendar day, except Saturdays, Sundays,
and all legal holidays as provided in RCW 1.16.050.
(2) For taxes collected by the department of revenue under this
chapter, the department shall remit the tax to the state treasurer who
shall deposit the proceeds of any state tax in the general fund. The
state treasurer shall deposit the proceeds of any local taxes imposed
under chapter 82.46 RCW in the local real estate excise tax account
hereby created in the state treasury. Moneys in the local real estate
excise tax account may be spent only for distribution to counties,
cities, and towns imposing a tax under chapter 82.46 RCW. Except as
provided in RCW 43.08.190, all earnings of investments of balances in
the local real estate excise tax account shall be credited to the local
real estate excise tax account and distributed to the counties, cities,
and towns monthly. Monthly the state treasurer shall make distribution
from the local real estate excise tax account to the counties, cities,
and towns the amount of tax collected on behalf of each taxing
authority. The state treasurer shall make the distribution under this
subsection without appropriation.
(3)(a) The real estate excise tax electronic technology account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. An appropriation is not
required for expenditures and the account is not subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.
(b) Through June 30, 2010, the county treasurer shall collect an
additional five-dollar fee on all transactions required by this
chapter, regardless of whether the transaction requires the payment of
tax. The county treasurer shall remit this fee to the state treasurer
at the same time the county treasurer remits funds to the state under
subsection (1) of this section. The state treasurer shall place money
from this fee in the real estate excise tax electronic technology
account. By the twentieth day of the subsequent month, the state
treasurer shall distribute to each county treasurer according to the
following formula: Three-quarters of the funds available shall be
equally distributed among the thirty-nine counties; and the balance
shall be ratably distributed among the counties in direct proportion to
their population as it relates to the total state's population based on
most recent statistics by the office of financial management.
(c) When received by the county treasurer, the funds shall be
placed in a special real estate excise tax electronic technology fund
held by the county treasurer to be used exclusively for the
development, implementation, and maintenance of an electronic
processing and reporting system for real estate excise tax affidavits.
Funds may be expended to make the system compatible with the automated
real estate excise tax system developed by the department and
compatible with the processes used in the offices of the county
assessor and county auditor. Any funds held in the account that are
not expended by the earlier of: July 1, 2015, or at such time that the
county treasurer is utilizing an electronic processing and reporting
system for real estate excise tax affidavits compatible with the
department and compatible with the processes used in the offices of the
county assessor and county ((assessor [auditor])) auditor, revert to
the special real estate and property tax administration assistance
account in accordance with subsection (5)(c) of this section.
(4) Beginning July 1, 2010, through December 31, 2013, the county
treasurer shall continue to collect the additional five-dollar fee in
subsection (3) of this section on all transactions required by this
chapter, regardless of whether the transaction requires the payment of
tax. During this period, the county treasurer shall remit this fee to
the state treasurer at the same time the county treasurer remits funds
to the state under subsection (1) of this section. The state treasurer
shall place money from this fee in the annual property revaluation
grant account created in RCW 84.41.170.
(5)(a) The real estate and property tax administration assistance
account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. An
appropriation is not required for expenditures and the account is not
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.
(b) Beginning January 1, 2014, the county treasurer must continue
to collect the additional five-dollar fee in subsection (3) of this
section on all transactions required by this chapter, regardless of
whether the transaction requires the payment of tax. The county
treasurer shall deposit one-half of this fee in the special real estate
and property tax administration assistance account in accordance with
(c) of this subsection and remit the balance to the state treasurer at
the same time the county treasurer remits funds to the state under
subsection (1) of this section. The state treasurer must place money
from this fee in the real estate and property tax administration
assistance account. By the twentieth day of the subsequent month, the
state treasurer must distribute the funds to each county treasurer
according to the following formula: One-half of the funds available
must be equally distributed among the thirty-nine counties; and the
balance must be ratably distributed among the counties in direct
proportion to their population as it relates to the total state's
population based on most recent statistics by the office of financial
management.
(c) When received by the county treasurer, the funds must be placed
in a special real estate and property tax administration assistance
account held by the county treasurer to be used for:
(i) Maintenance and operation of an annual revaluation system for
property tax valuation; and
(ii) Maintenance and operation of an electronic processing and
reporting system for real estate excise tax affidavits.

--- END ---