BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.03.265 and 2003 c 70 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Any applicant for a new withdrawal or a change, transfer, or
amendment of a water right pending before the department((,)) may
initiate a cost-reimbursement agreement with the department to provide
expedited review of the application. Except as provided in (b) of this
subsection, a cost-reimbursement agreement may ((only)) be initiated
under this subsection if the applicant agrees to pay for((, or as part
of a cooperative effort agrees to pay for,)) the cost of processing his
or her application and all other applications from the same source of
supply which must be acted upon before the applicant's request because
they were filed prior to the date of when the applicant filed.
(b) The requirement to pay for the cost of all other applications
from the same source of supply under (a) of this subsection does not
apply if:
(i) The application for a new appropriation or a change, transfer,
or amendment of a water right would not diminish the water available to
earlier pending applicants from the same source of supply, including an
application that provides a water impoundment or other water resource
management mitigation technique under RCW 90.03.255 or 90.44.055
acceptable to the department; or
(ii) The applicant agrees to pay for the cost of processing his or
her application as part of a coordinated cost-reimbursement agreement
entered under subsection (3) of this section.
(c) The department may enter into cost-reimbursement agreements,
provided resources are available, and shall use the process established
under RCW 43.21A.690 for entering into cost-reimbursement agreements.
The department's share of work related to a cost-reimbursement
application, such as final certificate approval, must be prioritized
within the framework of other water right processing needs.
(d) Each individual applicant is responsible for his or her own
appeal costs that may result from a water right decision made by the
department. In the event that an applicant's water right approval is
appealed under chapter 43.21B RCW by a third party, the applicant for
the water right in question must reimburse the department for the cost
of defending the decision.
(2) In pursuing a cost-reimbursement project, the department must
determine the source of water proposed to be diverted or withdrawn
from, including the boundaries of the area that delimits the source.
The department must determine if any other water right permit
applications are pending from the same source. A water source may
include surface water only, ground water only, or surface and ground
water together if the department believes they are hydraulically
connected. The department shall consider technical information
submitted by the applicant in making its determinations under this
subsection.
(3)(a) If the department determines that the public interest is
best served by initiation of a coordinated cost-reimbursement project,
the department must notify in writing all persons who have pending
applications on file for a new appropriation or withdrawal of water
from the same source. Such a notice must be made by way of mail. The
notification must inform those applicants that a coordinated cost-reimbursement process is being initiated. The notice must offer the
opportunity to voluntarily participate in funding a cost-reimbursement
contractor to investigate and make recommendations to the department
regarding the disposition of the applications. The notice must also
provide the estimated cost for having an application processed using a
cost-reimbursement contractor. The notice must provide not less than
sixty days for the applicants to respond in writing as to their
interest in participating in the coordinated cost-reimbursement
processing of their applications. The department shall adjust the
estimated costs for each participant based on those applicants electing
to participate. The department may initiate a coordinated cost-reimbursement project: (i) On its own volition; (ii) upon receipt of
a written request from an applicant; (iii) upon receipt of a written
request or recommendation from a watershed planning unit; or (iv) upon
receipt of a resolution of a county or city legislative authority with
jurisdiction over the area in which the water source is located.
(b) Each applicant who consents to participate in a coordinated
cost-reimbursement process must sign a contract with the department
agreeing to pay a pro rata share to the department of the cost of the
contractors and the department's costs, with an applicant's share of
cost being determined by the percentage of each applicant's
instantaneous quantity applied for relative to the sum of the
instantaneous quantities applied for by all the participating
applicants.
(c) For any applicant who elects to not participate in the
coordinated cost-reimbursement process or who fails to respond in
writing within the time allowed, the department shall retain the
application on file until such time as the department is able to
process it. These applicants may seek to initiate a cost-reimbursement
process at a later date, under either subsection (1)(a) or (3)(a) of
this section. The department shall process remaining applications on
file within the framework of other water right processing needs, as
determined by agency rule and to the extent resources are available.
(d) Coordinated cost reimbursement under this section applies only
to the sequence of application processing and does not affect the
relative priority date of any resulting water rights.
(4) The department shall provide notice to potential contractors of
the opportunity to be considered for inclusion on the list of cost-reimbursement contractors to whom work assignments will be made. The
department shall competitively select an appropriate number of
contractors who are qualified by training and experience to investigate
and make recommendations on the disposition of water rights
applications. The contractor list must be renewed at least every six
years, though the department may add qualified cost-reimbursement
contractors to the list at any time. The department shall enter a
master contract with each contractor selected and shall thereafter make
work assignments based on availability and qualifications.
(5) The department may remove any contractor from the contractor
list for poor performance, malfeasance, or excessive complaints from
cost-reimbursement participants. The department may interview any
cost-reimbursement contractor to determine whether the person is
qualified for this work, and shall spot check the work of contractors
to ensure that the public is being competently served.
(6) When assigned an application or set of applications to
investigate, the contractor must document its findings and recommended
disposition in the form of written draft reports of examination.
Within two weeks of the department receiving the draft reports of
examination, an applicant may provide comments to the department on the
contents of the report. The department may modify the reports of
examination submitted by the contractor. The department's decision on
a permit application is final unless it is appealed to the pollution
control hearings board under chapter 43.21B RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 90.44 RCW
to read as follows:
Applications to appropriate ground water under a cost-reimbursement
agreement must be processed in accordance with RCW 90.03.265 when an
applicant requests the assignment of a cost-reimbursement contractor as
provided in RCW 43.21A.690.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish and maintain a list of certified
water right examiners. Certified water right examiners on the list are
eligible to perform final proof examinations of permitted water uses
leading to the issuance of a water right certificate. The list must be
updated annually and must be made available to the public through
written and electronic media.
(2) In order to qualify for inclusion on the list, an individual
must be registered in Washington as a professional engineer,
professional land surveyor, or registered hydrogeologist or demonstrate
at least five years of applicable experience to the department.
Qualified individuals must also pass a written examination prior to
being certified by the department. Such an examination must be
administered by either the department or an entity formally approved by
the department. Each certified water right examiner must demonstrate
knowledge and competency regarding:
(a) Water law in the state of Washington;
(b) Measurement of the flow of water through open channels and
enclosed pipes;
(c) Water use and water level reporting;
(d) Estimation of the capacity of reservoirs and ponds;
(e) Irrigation crop water requirements;
(f) Aerial photo interpretation;
(g) Legal descriptions of land parcels;
(h) Location of land and water infrastructure through the use of
maps and global positioning;
(i) Proper construction and sealing of well bores; and
(j) Other topics related to the preparation and certification of
water rights in Washington state.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, upon
completion of a water appropriation and putting water to beneficial
use, in order to receive a final water right certificate, the permit
holder must secure the services of a certified water right examiner who
has been tested and certified by the department. The examiner shall
carry out a final examination of the project to verify its completion
and to determine and document for the permit holder and the department
the amount of water that has been appropriated for beneficial use, the
location of diversion or withdrawal and conveyance facilities, and the
actual place of use. The examiner shall take measurements or make
estimates of the maximum diversion or withdrawal, the capacity of water
storage facilities, the acreage irrigated, the type and number of
residences served, the type and number of stock watered, and other
information relevant to making a final determination of the amount of
water beneficially used. The examiner shall make photographs of the
facilities to document the use or uses of water and the photographs
must be submitted with the examiner's report to the department. The
department shall specify the format and required content of the reports
and may provide a form for that purpose.
(4) The department may suspend or revoke a certification based on
poor performance, malfeasance, failure to acquire continuing education
credits, or excessive complaints from the examiner's customers. The
department may require the retesting of an examiner. The department
may interview any examiner to determine whether the person is qualified
for this work. The department shall spot check the work of examiners
to ensure that the public is being competently served. Any person
aggrieved by an order of the department including the granting, denial,
revocation, or suspension of a certificate issued by the department
under this chapter may appeal pursuant to chapter 43.21B RCW.
(5) The decision regarding whether to issue a final water right
certificate and in what amounts and other particulars is solely the
responsibility and function of the department.
(6) Each certified water right examiner must complete eight hours
annually of qualifying continuing education in the water resources
field. The department shall determine and specify the qualifying
continuing education and shall inform examiners of the opportunities.
The department shall track whether examiners are current in their
continuing education and may suspend the certification of an examiner
who has not complied with the continuing education requirement.
(7) Each certified water right examiner must be bonded for at least
fifty thousand dollars.
(8) The department may waive the requirement to secure the services
of a certified water right examiner in situations in which the
department deems it unnecessary for purposes of issuing a certificate
of water right.
(9) The department shall establish and collect fees for the
examination, certification, and renewal of certification of water right
examiners. Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, the department is authorized to
set fees for examination, certification, and renewal of certification
for water right examiners.
(10) The department may adopt rules appropriate to carry out the
purposes of this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 90.03.255 and 1997 c 360 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall, when evaluating an application for a
water right, transfer, or change filed pursuant to RCW 90.03.250 or
90.03.380 that includes provision for any water impoundment or other
resource management technique, take into consideration the benefits and
costs, including environmental effects, of any water impoundment or
other resource management technique that is included as a component of
the application. The department's consideration shall extend to any
increased water supply that results from the impoundment or other
resource management technique, including but not limited to any
recharge of groundwater that may occur, as a means of making water
available or otherwise offsetting the impact of the diversion of
surface water proposed in the application for the water right,
transfer, or change. ((Provision for an impoundment or other resource
management technique in an application shall be made solely at the
discretion of the applicant and shall not otherwise be made by the
department as a condition for approving an application that does not
include such provision.))
(2) If the department determines that no water remains available
for any unmitigated new appropriation from a water source, the
department shall notify all persons holding pending applications to
divert water from that source of the determination. The department's
determination and notice must be specific in describing the affected
stream reaches, the extent of groundwater hydraulically connected to
those reaches, and when applicable, the location and seasonality of
water available for interruptible use. Any proposed impoundment or
resource management technique must not diminish the water available
from the described source of supply.
(3) The department may place pending applications for appropriation
from a particular water source into project-dependent status where a
proposed water supply development project or projects could feasibly
make water available for such dormant applications, including municipal
water applicants that have an approved water system plan under chapter
43.20 RCW that outlines projected future water demand and how they
intend to acquire the water to supply those demands. The department
may make a determination to place pending applications for
appropriation from a particular water source into project-dependent
status: (a) On its own volition; (b) upon receipt of a written request
or recommendation from a watershed planning unit; or (c) upon receipt
of a resolution of a county or city legislative authority with
jurisdiction over the area in which the water source is located. The
department shall notify all persons holding pending applications of
that determination. Each applicant retains their priority date while
in project-dependant status. Pending applications remain in project-dependent status as long as the project remains feasible.
(4) Upon the written request of any applicant who requests it, the
department shall provide a contact list of all other applicants who
received notification under this section for purposes of enabling
applicants to coordinate among each other to develop plans for water
impoundment or other resource management technique required by this
section.
(5) This section does not lessen, enlarge, or modify the rights of
any riparian owner, or any existing water right acquired by
appropriation or otherwise.
(6) Any final determination made by the department under this
section is appealable to the pollution control hearings board as
authorized under chapter 43.21B RCW.

Sec. 5 RCW 90.14.065 and 1987 c 93 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Any person or entity, or successor to such person or entity,
having a statement of claim on file with the water rights claims
registry ((on April 20, 1987,)) may submit to the department of ecology
for filing((,)) an amendment to such a statement of claim if the
submitted amendment is based on:
(((1))) (i) An error in estimation of the quantity of the
applicant's water claim prescribed in RCW 90.14.051 if the applicant
provides reasons for the failure to claim such right in the original
claim;
(((2))) (ii) A change in circumstances not foreseeable at the time
the original claim was filed, if such change in circumstances relates
only to the manner of transportation or diversion of the water and not
to the use or quantity of such water; or
(((3))) (iii) The amendment is ministerial in nature.
(b) The department shall accept any such submission and file the
same in the registry unless the department by written determination
concludes that the requirements of (a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this
subsection (((1), (2), or (3) of this section)) have not been
satisfied.
(2) A surface water right claim may be changed or transferred in
the same manner as a permit or certificate under RCW 90.03.380, and a
water right claim for groundwater may be changed or amended in the same
manner as a permit or certificate under RCW 90.44.100. However, RCW
90.44.100(4) applies as follows: For a water right claim, the
"location of the original well or wells" is the area up to one-quarter
mile radius from the current well or wells.
(3) Any person aggrieved by a determination of the department may
obtain a review thereof by filing a petition for review with the
pollution control hearings board within thirty days of the date of the
determination by the department. The provisions of RCW 90.14.081 shall
apply to any amendment ((filed)) approved under this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 90.44.055 and 1997 c 360 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall, when evaluating an application for a
water right or an amendment filed pursuant to RCW 90.44.050 or
90.44.100 that includes provision for any water impoundment or other
resource management technique, take into consideration the benefits and
costs, including environmental effects, of any water impoundment or
other resource management technique that is included as a component of
the application. The department's consideration shall extend to any
increased water supply that results from the impoundment or other
resource management technique, including but not limited to any
recharge of groundwater that may occur, as a means of making water
available or otherwise offsetting the impact of the withdrawal of
groundwater proposed in the application for the water right or
amendment in the same water resource inventory area. ((Provision for
an impoundment or other resource management technique in an application
shall be made solely at the discretion of the applicant and shall not
be made by the department as a condition for approving an application
that does not include such provision.))
(2) If the department determines that no water remains available
for any unmitigated new appropriation from a water source, the
department shall notify all persons holding pending applications to
withdraw water from that source of the determination. The department's
determination and notice must be specific in describing the affected
stream reaches, the extent of groundwater hydraulically connected to
those reaches, and when applicable, the location and seasonality of
water available for interruptible use. Any proposed impoundment or
resource management technique must not diminish the water available
from the described source of supply.
(3) The department may place pending applications for appropriation
from a particular water source into project-dependent status where a
proposed water supply development project or projects could feasibly
make water available for such dormant applications, including municipal
water applicants that have an approved water system plan under chapter
43.20 RCW which outlines projected future water demand and how they
intend on acquiring the water to supply those demands. The department
may make a determination to place pending applications for
appropriation from a particular water source into project-dependent
status: (a) On its own volition; (b) upon receipt of a written request
or recommendation from a watershed planning unit; or (c) upon receipt
of a resolution of a county or city legislative authority with
jurisdiction over the area in which the water source is located. The
department shall notify all persons holding pending applications of
that determination. Each applicant retains their priority date while
in project-dependant status. Pending applications remain in project-dependent status as long as the project remains feasible.
(4) Upon the written request of any applicant who requests it, the
department shall provide a contact list of all other applicants who
received notification under this section for purposes of enabling
applicants to coordinate among each other to develop plans for water
impoundment or other resource management technique required by this
section.
(5) This section does not lessen, enlarge, or modify the rights of
any riparian owner, or any existing water right acquired by
appropriation or otherwise.
(6) Any final determination made by the department under this
section is appealable to the pollution control hearings board as
authorized under chapter 43.21B RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall provide electronic notice and opportunity for
comment to affected federally recognized tribal governments
concurrently when providing notice to applicants under RCW 90.03.265,
90.03.255, and 90.44.055.

--- END ---