BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Local law enforcement agencies shall:
(a) Adopt a written policy designed to condemn and prevent
motorcycle profiling;
(b) Review and audit their existing procedures, practices, and
training to ensure that they do not enable or foster the practice of
motorcycle profiling;
(c) Institute training to address the issues related to motorcycle
profiling. Officers should be trained in how to better interact with
persons they stop so that legitimate police actions are not
misperceived as motorcycle profiling; and
(d) Work with motorcycle groups in their communities to
appropriately address the issue of motorcycle profiling.
(2) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall
coordinate with the criminal justice training commission to ensure that
issues related to motorcycle profiling are addressed in basic law
enforcement training and offered in regional training for in-service
law enforcement officers at all levels.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "motorcycle profiling" means
using the fact that a person rides a motorcycle or wears motorcycle-related paraphernalia as a factor in deciding to stop and question,
take enforcement action, arrest, or search a person or vehicle with or
without legal basis under the United States Constitution or the
Washington state Constitution.

--- END ---