BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.18.545 and 2002 c 360 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) (("Adverse action" has the same meaning as defined in the fair
credit reporting act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq. Adverse actions
include, but are not limited to:
(i) Cancellation, denial, or nonrenewal of personal insurance
coverage;
(ii) Charging a higher insurance premium for personal insurance
than would have been offered if the credit history or insurance score
had been more favorable, whether the charge is by:
(A) Application of a rating rule;
(B) Assignment to a rating tier that does not have the lowest
available rates; or
(C) Placement with an affiliate company that does not offer the
lowest rates available to the consumer within the affiliate group of
insurance companies; or
(iii) Any reduction, adverse, or unfavorable change in the terms of
coverage or amount of any personal insurance due to a consumer's credit
history or insurance score. A reduction, adverse, or unfavorable
change in the terms of coverage occurs when:
(A) Coverage provided to the consumer is not as broad in scope as
coverage requested by the consumer but available to other insureds of
the insurer or any affiliate; or
(B) The consumer is not eligible for benefits such as dividends
that are available through affiliate insurers.
(b) "Affiliate" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
48.31B.005(1).
(c))) "Consumer" means an individual policyholder or applicant for
insurance.
(((d) "Consumer report" has the same meaning as defined in the fair
credit reporting act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.
(e))) (b) "Credit history" means any written, oral, or other
communication of any information ((by a consumer reporting agency))
bearing on a consumer's creditworthiness, credit standing, or credit
capacity ((that is used or expected to be used, or collected in whole
or in part, for the purpose of serving as a factor in determining
personal insurance premiums or eligibility for coverage)), other than
the insurer's own record of premium payments made to it by a consumer.
(((f))) (c) "Deny" means an insurer refuses to offer insurance
coverage to a consumer.
(d) "Education" means enrollment in a public or private school,
college, or university or completion of a grade level, a diploma, or a
degree. It does not mean completion of a traffic safety course.
(e) "Insurance score" means a number or rating that is derived from
an algorithm, computer application, model, or other process that is
based in whole or in part on credit history.
(((g))) (f) "Personal insurance" means:
(i) Private passenger automobile coverage;
(ii) Homeowner's coverage, including mobile homeowners,
manufactured homeowners, condominium owners, and renter's coverage;
(iii) Dwelling property coverage;
(iv) Earthquake coverage for a residence or personal property;
(v) Personal liability and theft coverage;
(vi) Personal inland marine coverage; and
(vii) Mechanical breakdown coverage for personal auto or home
appliances.
(((h) "Tier" means a category within a single insurer into which
insureds with substantially like insuring, risk or exposure factors,
and expense elements are placed for purposes of determining rate or
premium.
(2) An insurer that takes adverse action against a consumer based
in whole or in part on credit history or insurance score shall provide
written notice to the applicant or named insured. The notice must
state the significant factors of the credit history or insurance score
that resulted in the adverse action. The insurer shall also inform the
consumer that the consumer is entitled to a free copy of their consumer
report under the fair credit reporting act.
(3))) (2) An insurer ((shall)) may not deny, cancel, or nonrenew
personal insurance based in whole or in part on a consumer's credit
history ((or)), insurance score, education, or income. ((An offer of
placement with an affiliate insurer does not constitute cancellation or
nonrenewal under this section.
(4) An insurer may use credit history to deny personal insurance
only in combination with other substantive underwriting factors. For
the purposes of this subsection:
(a) "Deny" means an insurer refuses to offer insurance coverage to
a consumer;
(b) An offer of placement with an affiliate insurer does not
constitute denial of coverage; and
(c) An insurer may reject an application when coverage is not bound
or cancel an insurance contract within the first sixty days after the
effective date of the contract.
(5) Insurers shall not deny personal insurance coverage based on:
(a) The absence of credit history or the inability to determine the
consumer's credit history, if the insurer has received accurate and
complete information from the consumer;
(b) The number of credit inquiries;
(c) Credit history or an insurance score based on collection
accounts identified with a medical industry code;
(d) The initial purchase or finance of a vehicle or house that adds
a new loan to the consumer's existing credit history, if evident from
the consumer report; however, an insurer may consider the bill payment
history of any loan, the total number of loans, or both;
(e) The consumer's use of a particular type of credit card, charge
card, or debit card; or
(f) The consumer's total available line of credit; however, an
insurer may consider the total amount of outstanding debt in relation
to the total available line of credit.
(6)(a) If disputed credit history is used to determine eligibility
for coverage and a consumer is placed with an affiliate that charges
higher premiums or offers less favorable policy terms:
(i) The insurer shall reissue or rerate the policy retroactive to
the effective date of the current policy term; and
(ii) The policy, as reissued or rerated, shall provide premiums and
policy terms the consumer would have been eligible for if accurate
credit history had been used to determine eligibility.
(b) This subsection only applies if the consumer resolves the
dispute under the process set forth in the fair credit reporting act
and notifies the insurer in writing that the dispute has been resolved.
(7))) (3) The commissioner may adopt rules to implement this
section.
(((8) This section applies to all personal insurance policies
issued or renewed after January 1, 2003.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.18 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that the practices covered by RCW 48.18.545
are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of
applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation
of RCW 48.18.545 is not reasonable in relation to the development and
preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or
commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purpose of
applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.19.035 and 2004 c 86 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) (("Affiliate" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
48.31B.005(1).
(b))) "Consumer" means an individual policyholder or applicant for
insurance.
(((c))) (b) "Credit history" means any written, oral, or other
communication of any information ((by a consumer reporting agency))
bearing on a consumer's creditworthiness, credit standing, or credit
capacity ((that is used or expected to be used, or collected in whole
or in part, for the purpose of serving as a factor in determining
personal insurance premiums or eligibility for coverage)), other than
the insurer's own record of premium payments made to it by a consumer.
(((d))) (c) "Education" means enrollment in a public or private
school, college, or university or completion of a grade level, a
diploma, or a degree. It does not mean completion of a traffic safety
course or scholastic achievement while enrolled in a school, college,
or university.
(d) "Insurance score" means a number or rating that is derived from
an algorithm, computer application, model, or other process that is
based in whole or in part on credit history.
(e) "Personal insurance" means:
(i) Private passenger automobile coverage;
(ii) Homeowner's coverage, including mobile homeowners,
manufactured homeowners, condominium owners, and renter's coverage;
(iii) Dwelling property coverage;
(iv) Earthquake coverage for a residence or personal property;
(v) Personal liability and theft coverage;
(vi) Personal inland marine coverage; and
(vii) Mechanical breakdown coverage for personal auto or home
appliances.
(2)(((a))) A consumer's credit history ((shall)), education, or
income may not be used in any manner to determine personal insurance
rates, premiums, or eligibility for coverage ((unless the insurance
scoring models are filed with the commissioner. Insurance scoring
models include all attributes and factors used in the calculation of an
insurance score. RCW 48.19.040(5) does not apply to any information
filed under this subsection, and the information shall be withheld from
public inspection and kept confidential by the commissioner. All
information filed under this subsection shall be considered trade
secrets under RCW 48.02.120(3). Information filed under this
subsection may be made public by the commissioner for the sole purpose
of enforcement actions taken by the commissioner.
(b) Each insurer that uses credit history or an insurance score to
determine personal insurance rates, premiums, or eligibility for
coverage must file all rates and rating plans for that line of coverage
with the commissioner. This requirement applies equally to a single
insurer and two or more affiliated insurers. RCW 48.19.040(5) applies
to information filed under this subsection except that any eligibility
rules or guidelines shall be withheld from public inspection under RCW
48.02.120(3) from the date that the information is filed and after it
becomes effective.
(3) Insurers shall not use the following types of credit history to
calculate a personal insurance score or determine personal insurance
premiums or rates:
(a) The absence of credit history or the inability to determine the
consumer's credit history, unless the insurer has filed actuarial data
segmented by demographic factors in a manner prescribed by the
commissioner that demonstrates compliance with RCW 48.19.020;
(b) The number of credit inquiries;
(c) Credit history or an insurance score based on collection
accounts identified with a medical industry code;
(d) The initial purchase or finance of a vehicle or house that adds
a new loan to the consumer's existing credit history, if evident from
the consumer report; however, an insurer may consider the bill payment
history of any loan, the total number of loans, or both;
(e) The consumer's use of a particular type of credit card, charge
card, or debit card; or
(f) The consumer's total available line of credit; however, an
insurer may consider the total amount of outstanding debt in relation
to the total available line of credit.
(4) If a consumer is charged higher premiums due to disputed credit
history, the insurer shall rerate the policy retroactive to the
effective date of the current policy term. As rerated, the consumer
shall be charged the same premiums they would have been charged if
accurate credit history was used to calculate an insurance score. This
subsection applies only if the consumer resolves the dispute under the
process set forth in the fair credit reporting act and notifies the
insurer in writing that the dispute has been resolved)).
(((5))) (3) The commissioner may adopt rules to implement this
section.
(((6) This section applies to all personal insurance policies
issued or renewed on or after June 30, 2003.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 48.19 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that the practices covered by RCW 48.19.035
are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of
applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation
of RCW 48.19.035 is not reasonable in relation to the development and
preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or
commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purpose of
applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect July 1, 2011, and
applies to all personal insurance policies issued or renewed on or
after July 1, 2011.

--- END ---