BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.14.010 and 2009 c 162 s 2 and 2009 c 119 s 10 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The commissioner shall collect in advance the following fees:

(a) For filing charter documents:

(i) Original charter documents,
bylaws or record of organization of
insurers, or certified copies
thereof, required to be filed . . . . . . . . . . . . $250.00

(ii) Amended charter documents, or
certified copy thereof, other than
amendments of bylaws . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10.00

(iii) No additional charge or fee shall
be required for filing any of such
documents in the office of the
secretary of state.

(b) Certificate of authority:

(i) Issuance . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 25.00

(ii) Renewal . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 25.00

(c) Annual statement of insurer, filing . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 20.00

(d) Organization or financing of domestic insurers and
affiliated corporations:

(i) Application for solicitation permit,
filing . . . . . . . . . . . . $100.00

(ii) Issuance of solicitation permit . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 25.00

(e) Insurance producer licenses:

(i) License application . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 55.00

(ii) License renewal, every two years

. . . . . . . . . . . . $ 55.00

(iii) Initial appointment and renewal of
appointment of each insurance
producer, every two years . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 20.00

(iv) Limited line insurance producer
license application and renewal,
every two years . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 20.00

(f) Title insurance agent licenses:

(i) License application . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 50.00

(ii) License renewal, every two
years . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 50.00

(g) Reinsurance intermediary licenses:

(i) Reinsurance intermediary-broker,
each year . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 50.00

(ii) Reinsurance intermediary-
manager, each year . . . . . . . . . . . . $100.00

(h) Surplus line broker license application
and renewal, every two years . . . . . . . . . . . . $200.00

(i) Adjusters' licenses:

(i) Independent adjuster((,)): (A)
License application . . . . . . . . . . . .
(B) License renewal, every two
years . . . . . . . . . . . .
$ 50.00

$ 50.00

(ii) Public adjuster((,)): (A) License
application . . . . . . . . . . . .
(B) License renewal, every two
years . . . . . . . . . . . .
$ 50.00

$ 50.00

(iii) Crop adjuster: (A) License
application . . . . . . . . . . . .
(B) License renewal, every two
years . . . . . . . . . . . .
$ 50.00

$50.00

(j) Managing general agent appointment,
every two years . . . . . . . . . . . . $200.00

(k) Examination for license, each examination:

All examinations, except examinations
administered by an independent testing
service, the fees for which are to be
approved by the commissioner and
collected directly by and retained by
such independent testing service

. . . . . . . . . . . . $ 20.00

(l) Miscellaneous services:

(i) Filing other documents . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5.00

(ii) Commissioner's certificate under
seal . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5.00

(iii) Copy of documents filed in the
commissioner's office, reasonable
charge therefor as determined by
the commissioner.

(m) Self-service storage specialty insurance producer
license application and renewal:

Every two years, $130.00 for an owner with
under fifty employees or $375.00 for an
owner with fifty or more employees;
plus a location fee of $35.00 for each
additional location of an owner.

(2) All fees so collected shall be remitted by the commissioner to
the state treasurer not later than the first business day following,
and shall be placed to the credit of the general fund.
(a) Fees for examinations administered by an independent testing
service that are approved by the commissioner under subsection (1)(k)
of this section shall be collected directly by the independent testing
service and retained by it.
(b) Fees for copies of documents filed in the commissioner's office
shall be remitted by the commissioner to the state treasurer not later
than the first business day following, and shall be placed to the
credit of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.17.010 and 2009 c 162 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this title unless
the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Adjuster" means any person who, for compensation as an
independent contractor or as an employee of an independent contractor,
or for fee or commission, investigates or reports to the adjuster's
principal relative to claims arising under insurance contracts, on
behalf solely of either the insurer or the insured. An attorney-at-law
who adjusts insurance losses from time to time incidental to the
practice of his or her profession((,)) or an adjuster of marine
losses((, or a salaried employee of an insurer or of a managing general
agent,)) is not deemed to be an "adjuster" for the purpose of this
chapter. A salaried employee of an insurer or of a managing general
agent is not deemed to be an "adjuster" for the purpose of this
chapter, except when acting as a crop adjuster.
(a) "Independent adjuster" means an adjuster representing the
interests of the insurer.
(b) "Public adjuster" means an adjuster employed by and
representing solely the financial interests of the insured named in the
policy.
(c) "Crop adjuster" means an adjuster, including (i) an independent
adjuster, (ii) a public adjuster, and (iii) an employee of an insurer
or managing general agent, who acts as an adjuster for claims arising
under crop insurance. Salaried employees of an insurer or of a
managing general agent who are certified by a crop adjuster program
approved by the risk management agency of the United States department
of agriculture are not deemed to be a crop adjuster for the purpose of
this chapter. Proof of certification must be provided to the
commissioner upon request.
(2) "Business entity" means a corporation, association,
partnership, limited liability company, limited liability partnership,
or other legal entity.
(3) "Crop insurance" means insurance coverage for damage to crops
from unfavorable weather conditions, fire or lightning, flood, hail,
insect infestation, disease, or other yield-reducing conditions or
perils provided by the private insurance market, or multiple peril crop
insurance that is reinsured by the federal crop insurance corporation,
including but not limited to revenue insurance.
(4) "Home state" means the District of Columbia and any state or
territory of the United States or province of Canada in which an
insurance producer maintains the insurance producer's principal place
of residence or principal place of business, and is licensed to act as
an insurance producer.
(((4))) (5) "Insurance education provider" means any insurer,
health care service contractor, health maintenance organization,
professional association, educational institution created by Washington
statutes, or vocational school licensed under Title 28C RCW, or
independent contractor to which the commissioner has granted authority
to conduct and certify completion of a course satisfying the insurance
education requirements of RCW 48.17.150.
(((5))) (6) "Insurance producer" means a person required to be
licensed under the laws of this state to sell, solicit, or negotiate
insurance. "Insurance producer" does not include title insurance agents
as defined in subsection (((15))) (16) of this section or surplus line
brokers licensed under chapter 48.15 RCW.
(((6))) (7) "Insurer" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.01.050, and
includes a health care service contractor as defined in RCW 48.44.010
and a health maintenance organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020.
(((7))) (8) "License" means a document issued by the commissioner
authorizing a person to act as an insurance producer or title insurance
agent for the lines of authority specified in the document. The
license itself does not create any authority, actual, apparent, or
inherent, in the holder to represent or commit to an insurer.
(((8))) (9) "Limited line credit insurance" includes credit life,
credit disability, credit property, credit unemployment, involuntary
unemployment, mortgage life, mortgage guaranty, mortgage disability,
automobile dealer gap insurance, and any other form of insurance
offered in connection with an extension of credit that is limited to
partially or wholly extinguishing the credit obligation that the
commissioner determines should be designated a form of limited line
credit insurance.
(((9))) (10) "NAIC" means national association of insurance
commissioners.
(((10))) (11) "Negotiate" means the act of conferring directly
with, or offering advice directly to, a purchaser or prospective
purchaser of a particular contract of insurance concerning any of the
substantive benefits, terms, or conditions of the contract, provided
that the person engaged in that act either sells insurance or obtains
insurance from insurers for purchasers.
(((11))) (12) "Person" means an individual or a business entity.
(((12))) (13) "Sell" means to exchange a contract of insurance by
any means, for money or its equivalent, on behalf of an insurer.
(((13))) (14) "Solicit" means attempting to sell insurance or
asking or urging a person to apply for a particular kind of insurance
from a particular insurer.
(((14))) (15) "Terminate" means the cancellation of the
relationship between an insurance producer and the insurer or the
termination of an insurance producer's authority to transact insurance.
(((15))) (16) "Title insurance agent" means a business entity
licensed under the laws of this state and appointed by an authorized
title insurance company to sell, solicit, or negotiate insurance on
behalf of the title insurance company.
(((16))) (17) "Uniform application" means the current version of
the NAIC uniform application for individual insurance producers for
resident and nonresident insurance producer licensing.
(((17))) (18) "Uniform business entity application" means the
current version of the NAIC uniform application for business entity
insurance license or registration for resident and nonresident business
entities.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.17.060 and 2009 c 162 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person shall not sell, solicit, or negotiate insurance in
this state for any line or lines of insurance unless the person is
licensed for that line of authority in accordance with this chapter.
(2) A person may not act as or hold himself or herself out to be an
adjuster or crop adjuster in this state unless licensed by the
commissioner or otherwise authorized to act as an adjuster or a crop
adjuster under this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 48.17.110 and 2009 c 162 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A resident individual applying for an insurance producer
license or an individual applying for an adjuster, including crop
adjuster, license shall pass a written examination unless exempt under
this section or RCW 48.17.175. The examination shall test the
knowledge of the individual concerning the lines of authority for which
application is made, the duties and responsibilities of an insurance
producer or adjuster, and the insurance laws and rules of this state.
Examinations required by this section shall be developed and conducted
under the rules prescribed by the commissioner. ((The commissioner
shall prepare, or approve, and make available a manual specifying in
general terms the subjects which may be covered in any examination for
a particular license.))
(2) The following are exempt from the examination requirement:
(a) Applicants for licenses under RCW 48.17.170(1) (g), (h), and
(i), at the discretion of the commissioner;
(b) With the exception of crop adjusters, applicants for an
adjuster's license who for a period of one year, a portion of which was
in the year next preceding the date of application, have been a full-time salaried employee of an insurer or of a managing general agent to
adjust, investigate, or report claims arising under insurance
contracts;
(c) With the exception of crop adjusters, applicants for a license
as a nonresident adjuster who are duly licensed in another state and
who are deemed by the commissioner to be fully qualified and competent
for a similar license in this state; and
(d) Applicants for a license as a nonresident crop adjuster, who
must:
(i) Be duly licensed as a crop adjuster, or hold a valid
substantially similar license in another state; and
(ii) Have completed prelicensing education and passed an
examination substantially similar to the prelicensing education and
examination required for licensure as a resident crop adjuster in this
state; or
(iii) If their state of residence does not license crop adjusters,
complete prelicensing education and pass an examination that are
substantially similar to the prelicensing education and examination
required to be licensed as a resident crop adjuster in this state.
(3) The commissioner may make arrangements, including contracting
with an outside testing service, for administering examinations.
(4) The commissioner may, at any time, require any licensed
insurance producer, adjuster or crop adjuster to take and successfully
pass an examination testing the licensee's competence and
qualifications as a condition to the continuance or renewal of a
license, if the licensee has been guilty of violating this title, or
has so conducted affairs under an insurance license as to cause the
commissioner to reasonably desire further evidence of the licensee's
qualifications.
(5) The commissioner may by rule establish requirements for crop
adjusters to:
(a) Successfully complete prelicensing education;
(b) Pass a written examination to obtain a license; and
(c) Renew their license.

Sec. 5 RCW 48.17.150 and 2009 c 162 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commissioner shall by rule establish minimum continuing
education requirements for the renewal or reissuance of a license to an
insurance producer.
(2) The commissioner may by rule establish minimum continuing
education requirements for the renewal or reissuance of a license to a
crop adjuster.
(3) The commissioner shall require that continuing education
courses will be made available on a statewide basis in order to ensure
that persons residing in all geographical areas of this state will have
a reasonable opportunity to attend such courses.
(((3))) (4) The continuing education requirements must be
appropriate to the license for the lines of authority specified in RCW
48.17.170 or by rule.

Sec. 6 RCW 48.17.390 and 2007 c 117 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The commissioner may license:
(i) An individual or business entity as an independent adjuster or
as a public adjuster((, and));
(ii) An individual as a crop adjuster; and
(b) Separate licenses shall be required for each type of adjuster.
(2) An individual or business entity may be concurrently licensed
under separate licenses as an independent adjuster and as a public
adjuster.
(3) An individual may be concurrently licensed under separate
licenses as an independent adjuster, a public adjuster, or a crop
adjuster.
(4) The full license fee shall be paid for each such license.

Sec. 7 RCW 48.17.420 and 2007 c 117 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((On behalf of and as authorized by an insurer for which an
insurance producer or title insurance agent has been appointed as an
agent,)) An insurance producer or title insurance agent may from time
to time act as an adjuster on behalf of and as authorized by an insurer
for which an insurance producer or title insurance agent has been
appointed as an agent and investigate and report upon claims without
being required to be licensed as an adjuster. An insurance producer or
title insurance agent must not act as a crop adjuster or investigate or
report upon claims arising under crop insurance without first obtaining
a crop adjuster license or, if a salaried employee of an insurer or of
a managing general agent, without first being certified by a crop
adjuster proficiency program approved by the risk management agency of
the United States department of agriculture.
(2) ((No)) Except for losses arising under crop insurance, a
license by this state ((shall be)) is not required of a nonresident
independent adjuster, for the adjustment in this state of a single
loss, or of losses arising out of a catastrophe common to all such
losses.
(3) For losses arising under crop insurance, a license by this
state is not required of a nonresident crop adjuster for the adjustment
in this state of a single loss or of losses arising out of a
catastrophe common to all such losses, if the nonresident crop adjuster
is:
(a) Duly licensed as a crop adjuster in another state;
(b) Duly certified by the risk management agency of the United
States department of agriculture; or
(c) A salaried employee of an insurer or of a managing general
agent who is certified by a crop adjuster proficiency program approved
by the risk management agency of the United States department of
agriculture.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act takes effect June 27, 2011.

--- END ---