BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.112.020 and 2006 c 338 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter shall be administered by the director or his or
her authorized agent. For the purpose of administering this chapter,
for motor fuel except biodiesel fuel, the standards set forth in the
Annual Book of ASTM Standards and supplements thereto, and revisions
thereof, are adopted, together with applicable federal environmental
protection agency standards. If a conflict exists between federal
environmental protection agency standards, ASTM standards, or state
standards, for purposes of uniformity, federal environmental protection
agency standards shall take precedence over ASTM standards. Any state
standards adopted must be consistent with federal environmental
protection agency standards and ASTM standards not in conflict with
federal environmental protection agency standards.
(2) The director may establish a fuel testing laboratory or may
contract with a laboratory for testing. The director may also adopt
rules on false and misleading advertising, labeling and posting of
prices, and the standards for, and identity of, motor fuels. The
director shall require fuel pumps offering ((biodiesel and)) an ethanol
blend((s)) to be identified by a label stating the percentage of
((biodiesel or)) ethanol and fuel pumps offering a biodiesel blend of
up to and including five percent to be identified by a label that
states "may contain up to five percent biodiesel." Biodiesel blends
above five percent shall be identified by a label stating the
percentage of biodiesel being offered.
(3) The rules adopted under RCW 19.112.140 shall also provide that
the diesel refiner is responsible for meeting the ASTM standards
required by chapter 338, Laws of 2006 when providing diesel fuel into
the distribution system.

--- END ---