BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.82.200 and 1965 c 7 s 35.82.200 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to the powers conferred upon an authority by other
provisions of this chapter, an authority is empowered to borrow money
or accept contributions, grants or other financial assistance from the
federal government for or in aid of any housing project within its area
of operation, to take over or lease or manage any housing project or
undertaking constructed or owned by the federal government, and to
these ends, to comply with such conditions and enter into such
mortgages, trust indentures, leases or agreements as may be necessary,
convenient or desirable. It is the purpose and intent of this chapter
to authorize every authority to do any and all things necessary or
desirable to secure the financial aid or cooperation of the federal
government in the undertaking, construction, maintenance or operation
of any housing project by such authority.
(2) All housing authorities shall be subject to the provisions of
chapter 39.10 RCW except where alternative requirements or procedures
of federal law or federal regulation are authorized.
(3) The requirements of chapter 39.12 RCW regarding prevailing
wages shall apply to housing authority public works except where
specifically preempted by federal law or federal regulation.

--- END ---