BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.21.260 and 1984 c 190 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided by this section, any group
disability insurance policy ((issued, renewed, or amended on or after
January 1, 1985,)) that provides benefits for hospital or medical
expenses ((shall)) must contain a provision granting a person covered
by the group policy the right to obtain a conversion policy from the
insurer upon termination of the person's eligibility for coverage under
the group policy.
(2) An insurer need not offer a conversion policy to:
(a) A person whose coverage under the group policy ended when the
person's employment or membership was terminated for misconduct:
PROVIDED, That when a person's employment or membership is terminated
for misconduct, a conversion policy shall be offered to the spouse
and/or dependents of the terminated employee or member. The policy
shall include in the conversion provisions the same conversion rights
and conditions which are available to employees or members and their
spouses and/or dependents who are terminated for reasons other than
misconduct;
(b) A person who is eligible for federal medicare coverage; or
(c) A person who is covered under another group plan, policy,
contract, or agreement providing benefits for hospital or medical care.
(3) To obtain the conversion policy, a person must submit a written
application and the first premium payment for the conversion policy not
later than thirty-one days after the date the person's group coverage
terminates or thirty-one days after the date the person received notice
of termination of coverage, whichever is later. The conversion policy
shall become effective, without lapse of coverage, immediately
following termination of coverage under the group policy.
(4) If an insurer or group policyholder does not renew, cancels, or
otherwise terminates the group policy, the insurer ((shall)) must offer
a conversion policy to any person who was covered under the terminated
policy unless the person is eligible to obtain group hospital or
medical expense coverage within thirty-one days after such nonrenewal,
cancellation, or termination of the group policy or thirty-one days
after the date the person received notice of termination of coverage,
whichever is later.
(5) The insurer shall determine the premium for the conversion
policy in accordance with the insurer's table of premium rates
applicable to the age and class of risk of each person to be covered
under the policy and the type and amount of benefits provided.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.44.370 and 1984 c 190 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided by this section, any group health
care service contract ((entered into or renewed on or after January 1,
1985,)) that provides benefits for hospital or medical expenses
((shall)) must contain a provision granting a person covered by the
group contract the right to obtain a conversion contract from the
contractor upon termination of the person's eligibility for coverage
under the group contract.
(2) A contractor need not offer a conversion contract to:
(a) A person whose coverage under the group contract ended when the
person's employment or membership was terminated for misconduct:
PROVIDED, That when a person's employment or membership is terminated
for misconduct, a conversion policy shall be offered to the spouse
and/or dependents of the terminated employee or member. The policy
shall include in the conversion provisions the same conversion rights
and conditions which are available to employees or members and their
spouses and/or dependents who are terminated for reasons other than
misconduct;
(b) A person who is eligible for federal medicare coverage; or
(c) A person who is covered under another group plan, policy,
contract, or agreement providing benefits for hospital or medical care.
(3) To obtain the conversion contract, a person must submit a
written application and the first premium payment for the conversion
contract not later than thirty-one days after the date the person's
eligibility for group coverage terminates or thirty-one days after the
date the person received notice of termination of coverage, whichever
is later. The conversion contract shall become effective, without
lapse of coverage, immediately following termination of coverage under
the group contract.
(4) If a health care service contractor or group contract holder
does not renew, cancels, or otherwise terminates the group contract,
the health care service contractor ((shall)) must offer a conversion
contract to any person who was covered under the terminated contract
unless the person is eligible to obtain group hospital or medical
expense coverage within thirty-one days after such nonrenewal,
cancellation, or termination of the group contract or thirty-one days
after the date the person received notice of termination of coverage,
whichever is later.
(5) The health care service contractor shall determine the premium
for the conversion contract in accordance with the contractor's table
of premium rates applicable to the age and class of risk of each person
to be covered under the contract and the type and amount of benefits
provided.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.46.450 and 1984 c 190 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided by this section, any group health
maintenance agreement ((entered into or renewed on or after January 1,
1985,)) that provides benefits for hospital or medical care ((shall))
must contain a provision granting a person covered by the group
agreement the right to obtain a conversion agreement from the health
maintenance organization upon termination of the person's eligibility
for coverage under the group agreement.
(2) A health maintenance organization need not offer a conversion
agreement to:
(a) A person whose coverage under the group agreement ended when
the person's employment or membership was terminated for misconduct:
PROVIDED, That when a person's employment or membership is terminated
for misconduct, a conversion policy shall be offered to the spouse
and/or dependents of the terminated employee or member. The policy
shall include in the conversion provisions the same conversion rights
and conditions which are available to employees or members and their
spouses and/or dependents who are terminated for reasons other than
misconduct;
(b) A person who is eligible for federal medicare coverage; or
(c) A person who is covered under another group plan, policy,
contract, or agreement providing benefits for hospital or medical care.
(3) To obtain the conversion agreement, a person must submit a
written application and the first premium payment for the conversion
agreement not later than thirty-one days after the date the person's
eligibility for group coverage terminates or thirty-one days after the
date the person received notice of termination of coverage, whichever
is later. The conversion agreement shall become effective without
lapse of coverage, immediately following termination of coverage under
the group agreement.
(4) If a health maintenance organization or group agreement holder
does not renew, cancels, or otherwise terminates the group agreement,
the health maintenance organization ((shall)) must offer a conversion
agreement to any person who was covered under the terminated agreement
unless the person is eligible to obtain group benefits for hospital or
medical care within thirty-one days after such nonrenewal,
cancellation, or termination of the group agreement or thirty-one days
after the date the person received notice of termination of coverage,
whichever is later.
(5) The health maintenance organization shall determine the premium
for the conversion agreement in accordance with the organization's
table of premium rates applicable to the age and class of risk of each
person to be covered under the agreement and the type and amount of
benefits provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act applies to any group disability
insurance policy, group health care service contract, and group health
maintenance agreement issued, entered into, or renewed on or after
January 1, 2011.

--- END ---