BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.57.010 and 2009 c 533 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The legislative authority of any town or city located in a
county with a population of less than one million may create a public
facilities district.
(b) The legislative authorities of any contiguous group of towns or
cities located in a county or counties each with a population of less
than one million may enter an agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW for the
creation and joint operation of a public facilities district.
(c) The legislative authority of any town or city, or any
contiguous group of towns or cities, located in a county with a
population of less than one million and the legislative authority of a
contiguous county, or the legislative authority of the county or
counties in which the towns or cities are located, may enter into an
agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW for the creation and joint operation
of a public facilities district.
(d) The legislative authority of a city located in a county with a
population greater than one million may create a public facilities
district, when the city has a total population of less than one hundred
fifteen thousand but greater than eighty thousand and commences
construction of a regional center prior to July 1, 2008.
(e) At least two legislative authorities, one or more of which
previously created a public facilities district or districts under (b)
or (c) of this subsection, may create an additional public facilities
district notwithstanding the fact that one or more of those towns or
cities, with or without a county or counties, previously have created
one or more public facilities districts within the geographic
boundaries of the additional public facilities district. Those
existing districts may continue their full corporate existence and
activities notwithstanding the creation and existence of the additional
district within all or part of the same geographic area. Additional
public facilities districts formed under this subsection may be
comprised of a maximum of three contiguous towns or cities separately
or in combination with a maximum of two contiguous counties.
(2)(a) A public facilities district ((shall be)) is coextensive
with the boundaries of the city or town or contiguous group of cities
or towns that created the district.
(b) A public facilities district created by an agreement between a
town or city, or a contiguous group of towns or cities, and a
contiguous county or the county in which they are located, ((shall be))
is coextensive with the boundaries of the towns or cities, and the
boundaries of the county or counties as to the unincorporated areas of
the county or counties. The boundaries ((shall)) do not include
incorporated towns or cities that are not parties to the agreement for
the creation and joint operation of the district.
(3)(a) A public facilities district created by a single city or
town shall be governed by a board of directors consisting of five
members selected as follows: (i) Two members appointed by the
legislative authority of the city or town; and (ii) three members
appointed by legislative authority based on recommendations from local
organizations. The members appointed under (a)(i) of this subsection,
shall not be members of the legislative authority of the city or town.
The members appointed under (a)(ii) of this subsection, ((shall)) must
be based on recommendations received from local organizations that may
include, but are not limited to the local chamber of commerce, local
economic development council, and local labor council. The members
shall serve four-year terms. Of the initial members, one must be
appointed for a one-year term, one must be appointed for a two-year
term, one must be appointed for a three-year term, and the remainder
must be appointed for four-year terms.
(b) A public facilities district created by a contiguous group of
cities and towns ((shall)) must be governed by a board of directors
consisting of seven members selected as follows: (i) Three members
appointed by the legislative authorities of the cities and towns; and
(ii) four members appointed by the legislative authorities of the
cities and towns based on recommendations from local organizations.
The members appointed under (b)(i) of this subsection shall not be
members of the legislative authorities of the cities and towns. The
members appointed under (b)(ii) of this subsection, ((shall)) must be
based on recommendations received from local organizations that
include, but are not limited to the local chamber of commerce, local
economic development council, local labor council, and a neighborhood
organization that is directly affected by the location of the regional
center in their area. The members of the board of directors ((shall))
must be appointed in accordance with the terms of the agreement under
chapter 39.34 RCW for the joint operation of the district and shall
serve four-year terms. Of the initial members, one must be appointed
for a one-year term, one must be appointed for a two-year term, one
must be appointed for a three-year term, and the remainder must be
appointed for four-year terms.
(c) A public facilities district created by a town or city, or a
contiguous group of towns or cities, and a contiguous county or the
county or counties in which they are located, ((shall)) must be
governed by a board of directors consisting of seven members selected
as follows: (i) Three members appointed by the legislative authorities
of the cities, towns, and county; and (ii) four members appointed by
the legislative authorities of the cities, towns, and county based on
recommendations from local organizations. The members appointed under
(c)(i) of this subsection shall not be members of the legislative
authorities of the cities, towns, or county. The members appointed
under (c)(ii) of this subsection ((shall)) must be based on
recommendations received from local organizations that include, but are
not limited to, the local chamber of commerce, the local economic
development council, the local labor council, and a neighborhood
organization that is directly affected by the location of the regional
center in their area. The members of the board of directors ((shall))
must be appointed in accordance with the terms of the agreement under
chapter 39.34 RCW for the joint operation of the district and shall
serve four-year terms. Of the initial members, one must be appointed
for a one-year term, one must be appointed for a two-year term, one
must be appointed for a three-year term, and the remainder must be
appointed for four-year terms.
(d)(i) A public facilities district created under subsection (1)(e)
of this section may provide, in the agreement providing for its
creation and operation, that the district must be governed by a board
of directors appointed under (b) or (c) of this subsection, or by a
board of directors of not more than nine members who are also members
of the legislative authorities that created the public facilities
district or of the governing boards of the public facilities district
or districts, or both, previously created by those legislative
authorities.
(ii) A board of directors formed under this subsection must have an
equal number of members representing each city, town, or county
participating in the public facilities district. If a public
facilities district is created by an even number of legislative
authorities, the members representing or appointed by those legislative
authorities shall appoint an additional board member. For a board
formed under this subsection to ((approve)) submit a proposition to the
voters under RCW 82.14.048, ((the proposition must be approved by)) a
majority of the members representing or appointed by each legislative
authority participating in the public facilities district must agree to
submit the proposition to the voters.
(4) A public facilities district is a municipal corporation, an
independent taxing "authority" within the meaning of Article VII,
section 1 of the state Constitution, and a "taxing district" within the
meaning of Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution.
(5) A public facilities district ((shall)) constitutes a body
corporate and ((shall)) possesses all the usual powers of a corporation
for public purposes as well as all other powers that may now or
hereafter be specifically conferred by statute, including, but not
limited to, the authority to hire employees, staff, and services, to
enter into contracts, and to sue and be sued.
(6) A public facilities district may acquire and transfer real and
personal property by lease, sublease, purchase, or sale. No direct or
collateral attack on any public facilities district purported to be
authorized or created in conformance with this chapter may be commenced
more than thirty days after creation by the city and/or county
legislative authority.

--- END ---