BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 80.50.020 and 2007 c 325 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Applicant" means any person who makes application for a site
certification pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.
(2) "Application" means any request for approval of a particular
site or sites filed in accordance with the procedures established
pursuant to this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires.
(3) "Person" means an individual, partnership, joint venture,
private or public corporation, association, firm, public service
company, political subdivision, municipal corporation, government
agency, public utility district, or any other entity, public or
private, however organized.
(4) "Site" means any proposed or approved location of an energy
facility, alternative energy resource, or electrical transmission
facility.
(5) "Certification" means a binding agreement between an applicant
and the state which shall embody compliance to the siting guidelines,
in effect as of the date of certification, which have been adopted
pursuant to RCW 80.50.040 as now or hereafter amended as conditions to
be met prior to or concurrent with the construction or operation of any
energy facility.
(6) "Associated facilities" means storage, transmission, handling,
or other related and supporting facilities connecting an energy plant
with the existing energy supply, processing, or distribution system,
including, but not limited to, communications, controls, mobilizing or
maintenance equipment, instrumentation, and other types of ancillary
transmission equipment, off-line storage or venting required for
efficient operation or safety of the transmission system and overhead,
and surface or subsurface lines of physical access for the inspection,
maintenance, and safe operations of the transmission facility and new
transmission lines constructed to operate at nominal voltages of at
least 115,000 volts to connect a thermal power plant or alternative
energy facilities to the northwest power grid. However, common carrier
railroads or motor vehicles shall not be included.
(7) "Transmission facility" means any of the following together
with their associated facilities:
(a) Crude or refined petroleum or liquid petroleum product
transmission pipeline of the following dimensions: A pipeline larger
than six inches minimum inside diameter between valves for the
transmission of these products with a total length of at least fifteen
miles;
(b) Natural gas, synthetic fuel gas, or liquefied petroleum gas
transmission pipeline of the following dimensions: A pipeline larger
than fourteen inches minimum inside diameter between valves, for the
transmission of these products, with a total length of at least fifteen
miles for the purpose of delivering gas to a distribution facility,
except an interstate natural gas pipeline regulated by the United
States federal power commission.
(8) "Electrical transmission facilities" means electrical power
lines and related equipment.
(9) "Independent consultants" means those persons who have no
financial interest in the applicant's proposals and who are retained by
the council to evaluate the applicant's proposals, supporting studies,
or to conduct additional studies.
(10) "Thermal power plant" means, for the purpose of certification,
any electrical generating facility using any fuel, including nuclear
materials((, for distribution of electricity by electric utilities)).
(11) "Energy facility" means an energy plant or transmission
facilities: PROVIDED, That the following are excluded from the
provisions of this chapter:
(a) Facilities for the extraction, conversion, transmission or
storage of water, other than water specifically consumed or discharged
by energy production or conversion for energy purposes; and
(b) Facilities operated by and for the armed services for military
purposes or by other federal authority for the national defense.
(12) "Council" means the energy facility site evaluation council
created by RCW 80.50.030.
(13) "Counsel for the environment" means an assistant attorney
general or a special assistant attorney general who shall represent the
public in accordance with RCW 80.50.080.
(14) "Construction" means on-site improvements, excluding
exploratory work, which cost in excess of two hundred fifty thousand
dollars.
(15) "Energy plant" means the following facilities together with
their associated facilities:
(a) Any stationary thermal power plant with generating capacity of
three hundred fifty thousand kilowatts or more, and any commercially
operated nuclear power facility, measured using maximum continuous
electric generating capacity, less minimum auxiliary load, at average
ambient temperature and pressure, and floating thermal power plants of
one hundred thousand kilowatts or more, including associated
facilities. For the purposes of this subsection, "floating thermal
power plants" means a thermal power plant that is suspended on the
surface of water by means of a barge, vessel, or other floating
platform;
(b) Facilities which will have the capacity to receive liquefied
natural gas in the equivalent of more than one hundred million standard
cubic feet of natural gas per day, which has been transported over
marine waters;
(c) Facilities which will have the capacity to receive more than an
average of fifty thousand barrels per day of crude or refined petroleum
or liquefied petroleum gas which has been or will be transported over
marine waters, except that the provisions of this chapter shall not
apply to storage facilities unless occasioned by such new facility
construction;
(d) Any underground reservoir for receipt and storage of natural
gas as defined in RCW 80.40.010 capable of delivering an average of
more than one hundred million standard cubic feet of natural gas per
day; and
(e) Facilities capable of processing more than twenty-five thousand
barrels per day of petroleum or biofuel into refined products.
(16) "Land use plan" means a comprehensive plan or land use element
thereof adopted by a unit of local government pursuant to chapter
35.63, 35A.63, 36.70, or 36.70A RCW, or as otherwise designated by
chapter 325, Laws of 2007.
(17) "Zoning ordinance" means an ordinance of a unit of local
government regulating the use of land and adopted pursuant to chapter
35.63, 35A.63, 36.70, or 36.70A RCW or Article XI of the state
Constitution, or as otherwise designated by chapter 325, Laws of 2007.
(18) "Alternative energy resource" ((means)) includes energy
facilities of the following types: (a) Wind; (b) solar energy; (c)
geothermal energy; (d) landfill gas; (e) wave or tidal action; or (f)
biomass energy based on solid organic fuels from wood, forest, or field
residues, or dedicated energy crops that do not include wood pieces
that have been treated with chemical preservatives such as creosote,
pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic.
(19) "Secretary" means the secretary of the United States
department of energy.
(20) "Preapplication process" means the process which is initiated
by written correspondence from the preapplicant to the council, and
includes the process adopted by the council for consulting with the
preapplicant and with cities, towns, and counties prior to accepting
applications for all transmission facilities.
(21) "Preapplicant" means a person considering applying for a site
certificate agreement for any transmission facility.
(22) "Biofuel" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 43.325.010.

Sec. 2 RCW 80.50.030 and 2001 c 214 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is created and established the energy facility site
evaluation council.
(2)(a) The chair of the council shall be appointed by the governor
with the advice and consent of the senate, shall have a vote on matters
before the council, shall serve for a term coextensive with the term of
the governor, and is removable for cause. The chair may designate a
member of the council to serve as acting chair in the event of the
chair's absence. The salary of the chair shall be determined under RCW
43.03.040. The chair is a "state employee" for the purposes of chapter
42.52 RCW. As applicable, when attending meetings of the council,
members may receive reimbursement for travel expenses in accordance
with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, and are eligible for compensation
under RCW 43.03.250.
(b) The chair or a designee shall execute all official documents,
contracts, and other materials on behalf of the council. ((The
Washington state department of community, trade, and economic
development shall provide all administrative and staff support for the
council. The director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development has supervisory authority over the staff of the
council and shall employ such personnel as are necessary to implement
this chapter.)) The Washington state utilities and transportation
commission shall provide all administrative and staff support for the
council. The Washington state utilities and transportation commission
has supervisory authority over the staff of the council and shall
employ such personnel as are necessary to implement this chapter. Not
more than three such employees may be exempt from chapter 41.06 RCW.
(3)(a) The council shall consist of the directors, administrators,
or their designees, of the following departments, agencies,
commissions, and committees or their statutory successors:
(i) Department of ecology;
(ii) Department of fish and wildlife;
(iii) Department of community, trade, and economic development;
(iv) Utilities and transportation commission; and
(v) Department of natural resources.
(b) The directors, administrators, or their designees, of the
following departments, agencies, and commissions, or their statutory
successors, may participate as councilmembers at their own discretion
provided they elect to participate no later than sixty days after an
application is filed:
(i) Department of agriculture;
(ii) Department of health;
(iii) Military department; and
(iv) Department of transportation.
(c) Council membership is discretionary for agencies that choose to
participate under (b) of this subsection only for applications that are
filed with the council on or after May 8, 2001. For applications filed
before May 8, 2001, council membership is mandatory for those agencies
listed in (b) of this subsection.
(4) The appropriate county legislative authority of every county
wherein an application for a proposed site is filed shall appoint a
member or designee as a voting member to the council. The member or
designee so appointed shall sit with the council only at such times as
the council considers the proposed site for the county which he or she
represents, and such member or designee shall serve until there has
been a final acceptance or rejection of the proposed site.
(5) The city legislative authority of every city within whose
corporate limits an energy ((plant)) facility is proposed to be located
shall appoint a member or designee as a voting member to the council.
The member or designee so appointed shall sit with the council only at
such times as the council considers the proposed site for the city
which he or she represents, and such member or designee shall serve
until there has been a final acceptance or rejection of the proposed
site.
(6) For any port district wherein an application for a proposed
port facility is filed subject to this chapter, the port district shall
appoint a member or designee as a nonvoting member to the council. The
member or designee so appointed shall sit with the council only at such
times as the council considers the proposed site for the port district
which he or she represents, and such member or designee shall serve
until there has been a final acceptance or rejection of the proposed
site. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply if the port
district is the applicant, either singly or in partnership or
association with any other person.

Sec. 3 RCW 80.50.071 and 2006 c 196 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The council shall receive all applications for energy facility
site certification. ((The following fees or charges for application
processing or certification monitoring shall be paid by the applicant
or certificate holder:)) Each applicant shall pay costs as are
necessarily incurred by the council in processing an application.
(a) ((A fee of twenty-five thousand dollars for each proposed site,
to be applied toward the cost of the independent consultant study
authorized in this subsection, shall accompany the application and
shall be a condition precedent to any further consideration or action
on the application by the council)) Each applicant shall, at the time
of application submission, deposit fifty thousand dollars, or such
greater amount as may be specified by the council after consultation
with the applicant. Costs that may be charged against the deposit
include, but are not limited to, independent consultants costs,
councilmember's wages, employee benefits, costs of a hearing examiner,
costs of a court reporter, staff salaries, wages and employee benefits,
goods and services, travel expenses, and miscellaneous direct and
indirect expenses as arise directly or indirectly from processing an
application.
((The council shall commission its own independent consultant study
to measure the consequences of the proposed energy facility on the
environment for each site application. The council shall direct the
consultant to study any matter which it deems essential to an adequate
appraisal of the site. The full cost of the study shall be paid by the
applicant: PROVIDED, That said costs exceeding a total of the twenty-five thousand dollars paid pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this
section shall be payable subject to the applicant giving prior approval
to such excess amount.))
(b) ((Each applicant shall, in addition to the costs of the
independent consultant provided by subsection (1)(a) of this section,
pay such reasonable costs as are actually and necessarily incurred by
the council and its members as designated in RCW 80.50.030 in
processing the application. Such costs shall include, but are not
limited to, council member's wages, employee benefits, costs of a
hearing examiner, a court reporter, additional staff salaries, wages
and employee benefits, goods and services, travel expenses within the
state and miscellaneous expenses, as arise directly from processing
such application)) The council may commission its own independent
consultant study to measure the consequences of the proposed energy
facility on the environment or any matter that it deems essential to an
adequate appraisal of the site. The council shall provide an estimate
of the cost of the study to the applicant and is payable subject to the
applicant giving prior approval.
((Each applicant shall, at the time of application submission,
deposit twenty thousand dollars, or such lesser amount as may be
specified by council rule, to cover costs provided for by subsection
(1)(b) of this section. Reasonable and necessary costs of the council
directly attributable to application processing shall be charged
against such deposit.))
(c) The council shall submit to each applicant a statement of such
expenditures actually made during the preceding calendar quarter which
shall be in sufficient detail to explain such expenditures. The
applicant shall pay the state treasurer the amount of such statement to
restore the total amount on deposit to the originally established
level: PROVIDED, That such applicant may, at the request of the
council, increase the amount of funds on deposit to cover anticipated
expenses during peak periods of application processing. Any funds
remaining unexpended at the conclusion of application processing shall
be refunded to the applicant, or at the applicant's option, credited
against required deposits of certificate holders.
(((c))) (2) Each certificate holder shall pay such reasonable costs
as are ((actually and)) necessarily incurred by the council for
inspection and determination of compliance by the certificate holder
with the terms of the certification relative to monitoring the effects
of construction ((and)), operation, and site restoration of the
facility.
(a) Each certificate holder, within thirty days of execution of the
site certification agreement, shall have on deposit ((twenty)) fifty
thousand dollars, or such ((other)) greater amount as may be specified
by the council ((rule, to cover costs provided for by subsection (1)(c)
of this section)) after consultation with the certificate holder.
((Reasonable and necessary costs of the council directly attributable
to)) Costs that may be charged against the deposit include, but are not
limited to, councilmember's wages, employee benefits, costs of a
hearing examiner, costs of a court reporter, staff salaries, wages and
employee benefits, contracts, goods and services, travel expenses, and
miscellaneous direct and indirect expenses as arise directly or
indirectly from inspection and determination of compliance by the
certificate holder with the terms of the certification ((relative to
monitoring the effects of construction and operation of the facility
shall be charged against such deposit)).
(b) The council shall submit to each certificate holder a statement
of such expenditures actually made during the preceding calendar
quarter which shall be in sufficient detail to explain such
expenditures. The certificate holder shall pay the state treasurer the
amount of such statement to restore the total amount on deposit to the
originally established level: PROVIDED, That if the actual((,
reasonable, and necessary)) expenditures for inspection and
determination of compliance in the preceding calendar quarter have
exceeded the amount of funds on deposit, such excess costs shall be
paid by the certificate holder.
(((2))) (3) If an applicant or certificate holder fails to provide
the initial deposit, or if subsequently required payments are not
received within thirty days following receipt of the statement from the
council, the council may (a) in the case of the applicant, suspend
processing of the application until payment is received; or (b) in the
case of a certificate holder, suspend the certification.
(((3))) (4) All payments required of the applicant or certificate
holder under this section are to be made to the state treasurer who
shall make payments as instructed by the council from the funds
submitted. All such funds shall be subject to state auditing
procedures. Any unexpended portions thereof shall be returned to the
applicant or certificate holder.
(5)(a) Reasonable and necessary costs under RCW 80.50.040(1)
incurred by the council in implementing and administering this chapter
may be assessed against applicants and certificate holders that are
subject to the requirements of this chapter.
(b) Reasonable and necessary costs may not exceed fifty thousand
dollars per applicant or certificate holder. Beginning July 1, 2015,
reasonable and necessary costs must be fifty thousand dollars per
applicant or certificate holder plus the consumer price index as
calculated in (c) of this subsection.
(c) Beginning July 1, 2015, and repeated every five years
thereafter, the dollar limit established in (b) of this subsection must
be adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management based
upon changes in the consumer price index during that time period.
"Consumer price index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual
average national consumer price index for all urban consumers, compiled
by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States department of
labor. The office of financial management must calculate the new
dollar limit and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for
publication in the Washington State Register at least one month before
the new dollar limit is to take effect.
(d) Moneys assessed and collected by the council from applicants
and certificate holders under this subsection must be dispersed by the
manager of the council.

--- END ---