BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 64.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section "construction contractor" has the
same meaning as "contractor" in RCW 18.27.010.
(2) A construction contractor working or contracting to work on a
property shall notify the property owner and local law enforcement
authorities if the construction contractor finds evidence of potential
contamination or that the site has been used as an illegal drug
manufacturing site.
(3) If a construction contractor fails to make the notifications
required in subsection (2) of this section, the construction contractor
may be liable for decontamination, demolition, and disposal expenses
if: (a) The property is later found to be contaminated and that there
was evidence of the contamination that the construction contractor
should have noticed; (b) the property owner did not occupy the property
at the time the construction contractor was working on it and had no
knowledge of the potential contamination; and (c) the property owner
who owned the property when the contractor was working on it no longer
owns the property.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.27.030 and 2008 c 120 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An applicant for registration as a contractor shall submit an
application under oath upon a form to be prescribed by the director and
which shall include the following information pertaining to the
applicant:
(a) Employer social security number.
(b) Unified business identifier number.
(c) Evidence of workers' compensation coverage for the applicant's
employees working in Washington, as follows:
(i) The applicant's industrial insurance account number issued by
the department;
(ii) The applicant's self-insurer number issued by the department;
or
(iii) For applicants domiciled in a state or province of Canada
subject to an agreement entered into under RCW 51.12.120(7), as
permitted by the agreement, filing a certificate of coverage issued by
the agency that administers the workers' compensation law in the
applicant's state or province of domicile certifying that the applicant
has secured the payment of compensation under the other state's or
province's workers' compensation law.
(d) Employment security department number.
(e) Unified business identifier (UBI) account number may be
substituted for the information required by (c) and (d) of this
subsection if the applicant will not employ employees in Washington.
(f) Type of contracting activity, whether a general or a specialty
contractor and if the latter, the type of specialty.
(g) The name and address of each partner if the applicant is a firm
or partnership, or the name and address of the owner if the applicant
is an individual proprietorship, or the name and address of the
corporate officers and statutory agent, if any, if the applicant is a
corporation or the name and address of all members of other business
entities. The information contained in such application is a matter of
public record and open to public inspection.
(2) The department may verify the workers' compensation coverage
information provided by the applicant under subsection (1)(c) of this
section, including but not limited to information regarding the
coverage of an individual employee of the applicant. If coverage is
provided under the laws of another state, the department may notify the
other state that the applicant is employing employees in Washington.
(3)(a) The department shall deny an application for registration
if: (i) The applicant has been previously performing work subject to
this chapter as a sole proprietor, partnership, corporation, or other
entity and the department has notice that the applicant has an
unsatisfied final judgment against him or her in an action based on
work performed subject to this chapter or the applicant owes the
department money for penalties assessed or fees due under this chapter
as a result of a final judgment; (ii) the applicant was an owner,
principal, or officer of a partnership, corporation, or other entity
that either has an unsatisfied final judgment against it in an action
that was incurred for work performed subject to this chapter or owes
the department money for penalties assessed or fees due under this
chapter as a result of a final judgment; (iii) the applicant does not
have a valid unified business identifier number; (iv) the department
determines that the applicant has falsified information on the
application, unless the error was inadvertent; or (v) the applicant
does not have an active and valid certificate of registration with the
department of revenue.
(b) The department shall suspend an active registration if (i) the
department has determined that the registrant has an unsatisfied final
judgment against it for work within the scope of this chapter; (ii) the
department has determined that the registrant is a sole proprietor or
an owner, principal, or officer of a registered contractor that has an
unsatisfied final judgment against it for work within the scope of this
chapter; (iii) the registrant does not maintain a valid unified
business identifier number; (iv) the department has determined that the
registrant falsified information on the application, unless the error
was inadvertent; ((or)) (v) the registrant does not have an active and
valid certificate of registration with the department of revenue; or
(vi) the registrant has violated section 1(3) of this act.
(c) The department may suspend an active registration if the
department has determined that an owner, principal, partner, or officer
of the registrant was an owner, principal, or officer of a previous
partnership, corporation, or other entity that has an unsatisfied final
judgment against it.
(4) The department shall not deny an application or suspend a
registration because of an unsatisfied final judgment if the
applicant's or registrant's unsatisfied final judgment was determined
by the director to be the result of the fraud or negligence of another
party.

--- END ---