BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17.710 and 2006 c 348 s 5 and 2006 c 344 s 31 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) During the period beginning on the thirtieth day before the
date a regular legislative session convenes and continuing through the
date of final adjournment, and during the period beginning on the date
a special legislative session convenes and continuing through the date
that session adjourns, no candidate for state office or state official,
or ((a)) persons employed by or acting on behalf of a candidate for
state office or a state official ((or state legislator)), may solicit
or accept contributions to a public office fund, to a candidate or
authorized committee, or to retire a campaign debt. Contributions
received through the mail after the thirtieth day before a regular
legislative session may be accepted if the contribution is postmarked
prior to the thirtieth day before the session.
(2) This section does not apply to activities authorized in RCW
43.07.370.

--- END ---