BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.16.110 and 2003 c 238 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
county legislative authority in each county shall, at its next regular
or special meeting after being appraised of any vacancy in any county,
township, precinct, or road district office of the county, fill the
vacancy by the appointment of some person qualified to hold such
office, and the officers thus appointed shall hold office until the
next general election, and until their successors are elected and
qualified.
(2)(a) If a vacancy occurs in a nonpartisan office in a county with
more than one million five hundred thousand residents, the county
legislative authority must make an appointment to fill the vacancy
within thirty days of notification of the vacancy. In filling the
vacancy, consideration of whether the successor will run for office at
the next election may not be determinative.
(b) If the county legislative authority fails to comply with (a) of
this subsection, the governor must, within thirty days after the
county's appointment period closes, appoint a successor to fill the
vacancy. Appointments under this subsection (2)(b) may be made only
after consultation with members of the Washington house of
representatives and senate who represent the area the appointee will
represent.
(3) If a vacancy occurs in a partisan county office after the
general election in a year that the position appears on the ballot and
before the start of the next term, the term of the successor who is of
the same party as the incumbent may commence once he or she has
qualified as defined in RCW ((29.01.135)) 29A.04.133 and shall continue
through the term for which he or she was elected.

--- END ---