BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Commission" means the Washington utilities and transportation
commission.
(2) "Consumer-owned utility" means a municipal electric utility
formed under Title 35 RCW, a public utility district formed under Title
54 RCW, an irrigation district formed under chapter 87.03 RCW, a
cooperative formed under chapter 23.86 RCW, a mutual corporation or
association formed under chapter 24.06 RCW, a port district formed
under Title 53 RCW, or a water-sewer district formed under Title 57
RCW, that is engaged in the business of distributing electricity to one
or more retail electric customers in the state.
(3) "Department" means the Washington department of commerce.
(4) "Electric utility" means a consumer-owned or investor-owned
utility located in Washington as defined in this section.
(5) "Investor-owned utility" means a corporation owned by investors
that meets the definition of "corporation" as defined in RCW 80.04.010
and is engaged in distributing electricity to more than one retail
electric customer in the state.
(6) "Owner" includes: Residential, commercial, and industrial
customers of electric utilities located in Washington; electric
utilities; independent power producers; federal, state, and local
governments; tribal governments and their political subdivisions; and
nonprofit agencies.
(7) "Renewable energy system" means a facility of an owner located
in Washington that produces electricity from the following sources of
energy:
(a) Biomass, including: (i) By-products of pulping and wood
manufacturing process; (ii) animal waste; (iii) solid organic fuels
from wood; (iv) forest or field residues; (v) wooden demolition or
construction debris; (vi) food waste; (vii) liquors derived from algae
and other sources; (viii) dedicated energy crops; (ix) biosolids; and
(x) yard waste. "Biomass energy" does not include wood pieces that
have been treated with chemical preservatives such as creosote,
pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic; wood from old growth
forests; or municipal solid waste;
(b) Gas from sewage treatment facilities and landfills;
(c) Geothermal;
(d) On-shore and off-shore wind;
(e) Solar electric;
(f) Solar thermal;
(g) Tidal;
(h) Water, where the hydroelectric generation facility is
positioned in irrigation pipes or canals, and the generation does not
result in new water diversions or impoundments; and
(i) Wave.
(8) "Interconnection standards" means technical, engineering,
operational, safety, and procedural requirements for interconnection to
the electric distribution and transmission grid of an electric utility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1)(a) Beginning July 1, 2011, all electric
utilities must provide standard offer contracts for the purchase of
electricity produced from renewable energy systems eligible under this
chapter with a generating capacity of two megawatts or less.
(b) An electric utility shall purchase electricity from renewable
energy systems on a first-come, first-served basis until the cumulative
nameplate generating capacity of renewable energy systems equals five
percent of the utility's peak demand during 2007. An electric
utility's share of the cumulative nameplate generating capacity may not
be more than the twelve percent of the total cumulative generating
capacity permitted under this subsection.
(c) Electric utilities must purchase the electricity from renewable
energy systems at a fixed rate, as determined by the commission, for
investor-owned utilities, and by the department, for customer-owned
utilities, for the duration of the contract.
(2)(a) All electric utilities must offer to owners of renewable
energy systems standard offer contracts of no less than twenty years.
(b) An electric utility may offer a standard offer contract of less
than twenty years if an owner requests a shorter term.
(3) If a renewable energy system under a standard offer contract is
transferred to a new owner, the new owner must notify the electric
utility within thirty days of the transfer in order to continue
receiving payments under existing terms of the previous owner's
standard offer contract for the electricity generated from the
renewable energy system.
(4) An owner is not eligible to enter into a standard offer
contract with an electric utility if the owner is participating in the
investment cost recovery incentive payment program under chapter 82.16
RCW or in the net metering program under chapter 80.60 RCW.
(5) All electric utilities shall distribute evenly across each
individual customer class the cost of the electricity purchased from
renewable energy system owners with a standard offer contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1)(a) An electric utility shall connect
renewable energy systems eligible under this chapter with a nameplate
generating capacity of ten kilowatts or less to its distribution or
transmission grid within sixty days of receiving an owner's written
request to connect.
(b) An electric utility shall connect renewable energy systems
eligible under this chapter with a nameplate generating capacity of
more than ten kilowatts to three hundred kilowatts to its distribution
or transmission grid within one hundred eighty days of receiving an
owner's written request to connect.
(c) An electric utility shall connect renewable energy systems
eligible under this chapter with a nameplate generating capacity of
more than three hundred kilowatts and up to two megawatts to its
distribution or transmission grid within three hundred sixty-five days
of receiving an owner's written request to connect.
(d) If an electric utility fails to connect a renewable energy
system to its distribution or transmission grid within the time allowed
under this section, the electric utility must pay a two thousand dollar
per day penalty to the owner until the system is connected to
distribution or transmission of the electric utility.
(2) An owner is responsible for the costs of equipment needed to
connect the renewable energy system to the electric utility's
distribution or transmission grid. A renewable energy system must
include, at the owner's expense, all equipment necessary to meet
applicable safety, power quality, and interconnection requirements
established by the commission, for investor-owned utilities, or by the
department, for consumer-owned utilities, as well as meet the standards
set by the national electrical code, national electrical safety code,
the institute of electrical and electronics engineers, and underwriters
laboratories.
(3) The owner and the electric utility shall share the cost of
upgrading the distribution system or transmission grid, if additional
upgrades are necessary solely to connect a renewable energy system.
The owner's share of the cost equals fifty percent of the cost of the
necessary upgrades and the electric utilities' share of the cost equals
fifty percent of the cost of the necessary upgrades.
(4)(a) By June 1, 2011, the commission, for investor-owned
utilities, shall review existing interconnection standards and adopt
interconnection standards for renewable energy systems eligible to
interconnect under this chapter.
(b) By June 1, 2011, the department, for consumer-owned utilities,
shall adopt interconnection standards for renewable energy systems
eligible under this chapter.
(c) The commission and department shall consult with each other in
developing the interconnection standards under this section.
(d) In adopting interconnection standards, the commission and the
department may not require owners of renewable energy systems to:
(i) Acquire insurance;
(ii) Install external disconnect switches if the inverter of the
renewable energy system meets standards established by the institute of
electrical and electronic engineers;
(iii) Pay a fee of more than one hundred dollars for an
interconnection application; or
(iv) Pay standby fees.
(5) By July 1, 2011, electric utilities shall develop, publish, and
provide transparent and nondiscriminatory rules for connecting a
renewable energy system to the utilities distribution or transmission
grid. Electric utilities must apply these standard rules for
connecting renewable energy systems to its distribution or transmission
grid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) By June 1, 2011, the commission, for
investor-owned utilities, and the department, for consumer-owned
utilities, shall develop and adopt through their respective rule-making
authorities a standard offer contract rate in kilowatt hours for the
electricity generated by renewable energy systems and supplied to the
distribution or transmission grid of an electric utility.
(2) The commission and department shall adopt fixed, levelized
rates for each renewable energy system to equal the average generation
costs of each renewable energy system plus a rate of return of ten
percent. The commission and department shall include, but not be
limited to, the following factors in calculating the average generating
cost of a renewable energy system:
(a) Installed capital costs;
(b) Fixed and variable operation and management expenses;
(c) Fuel costs;
(d) Cost of financing;
(e) Land costs or leases;
(f) Insurance;
(g) Transmission and interconnection costs;
(h) Net capacity factors; and
(i) Estimated project life and projected generation degradation.
(3) In developing the rate, the commission and department shall
ensure the rate is reasonable and fair to the owner of a renewable
energy system and to the ratepayers of electric utilities.
(4) The commission and department shall develop standard offer
contract rates that are differentiated based on the size of the system.
The following tiers must be used to differentiate rates:
(a) Tier one equals the nameplate generating capacity of a
renewable energy system up to ten kilowatts;
(b) Tier two equals the nameplate generating capacity of a
renewable energy system greater than ten kilowatts and up to three
hundred kilowatts; and
(c) Tier three equals the nameplate generating capacity of a
renewable energy system greater than three hundred kilowatts and up to
two megawatts.
(5)(a) By June 1, 2013, the commission, for investor-owned
utilities, and the department, for consumer-owned utilities, shall
review the average generation costs of renewable energy systems and
adopt standard offer contract rates based on the methods described in
subsection (2) of this section.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2013, all electric utilities shall offer
standard offer contracts to new applicants using rates adopted under
(a) of this subsection.
(c) The department and commission shall consult with each other in
reviewing the average generation costs of each renewable energy system.
(6) On June 30, 2016, and by June 30th every three years
thereafter, the commission and department shall review and adopt new
standard offer contract rates using methods described in subsection (2)
of this section. Beginning July 1st, following the review and adoption
of standard offer contract rates, all electric utilities shall provide
standard offer contracts using standard offer contract rates to new
applicants.
(7) In developing standard offer contract rates under this section,
the department and commission must consult with each other.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Renewable energy system owners and electric
utilities may negotiate with each other regarding who receives the
renewable energy credits associated with the renewable energy system.
If a renewable energy system owner decides to maintain the renewable
energy credits associated with their system, this has no bearing on the
responsibilities of electric utilities under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Renewable energy system owners served by
investor-owned utilities shall upon request provide the commission with
any information that may be relevant to the commission performing its
duties under this chapter.
(2) Renewable energy system owners served by a consumer-owned
utility shall upon request provide the department with any information
that may be relevant to the department performing its duties under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 80 RCW.

--- END ---