BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.294 and 2009 c 469 s 501 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(((a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging
within this state in the business of manufacturing solar energy systems
using photovoltaic modules, or of manufacturing solar grade silicon to
be used exclusively in components of such systems; as to such persons
the amount of tax with respect to such business shall, in the case of
manufacturers, be equal to the value of the product manufactured, or in
the case of processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the
business, multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(b) Beginning October 1, 2009,)) Upon every person engaging within
this state in the business of manufacturing solar energy systems using
photovoltaic modules or stirling converters, or of manufacturing solar
grade silicon, silicon solar wafers, silicon solar cells, thin film
solar devices, or compound semiconductor solar wafers to be used
exclusively in components of such systems; as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of
manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured, or in
the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the
business, multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(2)(((a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging
within this state in the business of making sales at wholesale of solar
energy systems using photovoltaic modules, or of solar grade silicon to
be used exclusively in components of such systems, manufactured by that
person; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the solar
energy systems using photovoltaic modules, or of the solar grade
silicon to be used exclusively in components of such systems,
multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(b) Beginning October 1, 2009,)) Upon every person engaging within
this state in the business of making sales at wholesale of solar energy
systems using photovoltaic modules or stirling converters, or of solar
grade silicon, silicon solar wafers, silicon solar cells, thin film
solar devices, or compound semiconductor solar wafers to be used
exclusively in components of such systems, manufactured by that person;
as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is
equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the solar energy systems using
photovoltaic modules or stirling converters, or of the solar grade
silicon to be used exclusively in components of such systems,
multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(3) ((Beginning October 1, 2009,)) Silicon solar wafers, silicon
solar cells, thin film solar devices, or compound semiconductor solar
wafers are "semiconductor materials" for the purposes of RCW 82.08.9651
and 82.12.9651.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Compound semiconductor solar wafers" means a semiconductor
solar wafer composed of elements from two or more different groups of
the periodic table.
(b) "Module" means the smallest nondivisible self-contained
physical structure housing interconnected photovoltaic cells and
providing a single direct current electrical output.
(c) "Photovoltaic cell" means a device that converts light directly
into electricity without moving parts.
(d) "Silicon solar cells" means a photovoltaic cell manufactured
from a silicon solar wafer.
(e) "Silicon solar wafers" means a silicon wafer manufactured for
solar conversion purposes.
(f) "Solar energy system" means any device or combination of
devices or elements that rely upon direct sunlight as an energy source
for use in the generation of electricity.
(g) "Solar grade silicon" means high-purity silicon used
exclusively in components of solar energy systems using photovoltaic
modules to capture direct sunlight. "Solar grade silicon" does not
include silicon used in semiconductors.
(h) "Stirling converter" means a device that produces electricity
by converting heat from a solar source utilizing a stirling engine.
(i) "Thin film solar devices" means a nonparticipating substrate on
which various semiconducting materials are deposited to produce a
photovoltaic cell that is used to generate electricity.
(5) This section expires June 30, 2014.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.16.110 and 2009 c 469 s 504 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1)(a) "Community solar project" means:
(i) A solar energy system owned by local individuals, households,
nonprofit organizations, or nonutility businesses that is placed on the
property owned by a cooperating local governmental entity that is not
in the light and power business or in the gas distribution business; or
(ii) A utility-owned solar energy system that is voluntarily funded
by the utility's ratepayers where, in exchange for their financial
support, the utility gives contributors a payment or credit on their
utility bill for the value of the electricity produced by the project.
(b) For the purposes of "community solar project" as defined in (a)
of this subsection:
(i) "Nonprofit organization" means an organization exempt from
taxation under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal
revenue code of 1986, as amended, as of January 1, 2009; and
(ii) "Utility" means a light and power business, an electric
cooperative, or a mutual corporation that provides electricity service.
(2) "Customer-generated electricity" means a community solar
project or the alternating current electricity that is generated from
a renewable energy system located on an individual's, businesses', or
local government's real property that is also provided electricity
generated by a light and power business. Except for community solar
projects, a system located on a leasehold interest does not qualify
under this definition. Except for community solar projects, "customer-generated electricity" does not include electricity generated by a
light and power business with greater than one thousand megawatt hours
of annual sales or a gas distribution business.
(3) "Economic development kilowatt-hour" means the actual kilowatt-hour measurement of customer-generated electricity multiplied by the
appropriate economic development factor.
(4) "Local governmental entity" means any unit of local government
of this state including, but not limited to, counties, cities, towns,
municipal corporations, quasi-municipal corporations, special purpose
districts, and school districts.
(5) "Photovoltaic cell" means a device that converts light directly
into electricity without moving parts.
(6) "Renewable energy system" means a solar energy system, an
anaerobic digester as defined in RCW 82.08.900, or a wind generator
used for producing electricity.
(7) "Solar energy system" means any device or combination of
devices or elements that rely upon direct sunlight as an energy source
for use in the generation of electricity.
(8) "Solar inverter" means the device used to convert direct
current to alternating current in a ((photovoltaic cell)) solar energy
system.
(9) "Solar module" means the smallest nondivisible self-contained
physical structure housing interconnected photovoltaic cells and
providing a single direct current electrical output.
(10) "Stirling converter" means a device that produces electricity
by converting heat from a solar source utilizing a stirling engine.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.16.120 and 2009 c 469 s 505 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any individual, business, local governmental entity, not in the
light and power business or in the gas distribution business, or a
participant in a community solar project may apply to the light and
power business serving the situs of the system, each fiscal year
beginning on July 1, 2005, for an investment cost recovery incentive
for each kilowatt-hour from a customer-generated electricity renewable
energy system. No incentive may be paid for kilowatt-hours generated
before July 1, 2005, or after June 30, 2020.
(2)(a) Before submitting for the first time the application for the
incentive allowed under subsection (4) of this section, the applicant
must submit to the department of revenue and to the climate and rural
energy development center at the Washington State University,
established under RCW 28B.30.642, a certification in a form and manner
prescribed by the department that includes, but is not limited to, the
following information:
(i) The name and address of the applicant and location of the
renewable energy system;
(ii) The applicant's tax registration number;
(iii) That the electricity produced by the applicant meets the
definition of "customer-generated electricity" and that the renewable
energy system produces electricity with:
(A) Any solar inverters and solar modules manufactured in
Washington state;
(B) A wind generator powered by blades manufactured in Washington
state;
(C) A solar inverter manufactured in Washington state;
(D) A solar module manufactured in Washington state; ((or))
(E) A stirling converter manufactured in Washington state; or
(F) Solar or wind equipment manufactured outside of Washington
state;
(iv) That the electricity can be transformed or transmitted for
entry into or operation in parallel with electricity transmission and
distribution systems;
(v) The date that the renewable energy system received its final
electrical permit from the applicable local jurisdiction.
(b) Within thirty days of receipt of the certification the
department of revenue must notify the applicant by mail, or
electronically as provided in RCW 82.32.135, whether the renewable
energy system qualifies for an incentive under this section. The
department may consult with the climate and rural energy development
center to determine eligibility for the incentive. System
certifications and the information contained therein are subject to
disclosure under RCW 82.32.330(3)(m).
(3)(a) By August 1st of each year application for the incentive
shall be made to the light and power business serving the situs of the
system by certification in a form and manner prescribed by the
department that includes, but is not limited to, the following
information:
(i) The name and address of the applicant and location of the
renewable energy system;
(ii) The applicant's tax registration number;
(iii) The date of the notification from the department of revenue
stating that the renewable energy system is eligible for the incentives
under this section;
(iv) A statement of the amount of kilowatt-hours generated by the
renewable energy system in the prior fiscal year.
(b) Within sixty days of receipt of the incentive certification the
light and power business serving the situs of the system shall notify
the applicant in writing whether the incentive payment will be
authorized or denied. The business may consult with the climate and
rural energy development center to determine eligibility for the
incentive payment. Incentive certifications and the information
contained therein are subject to disclosure under RCW 82.32.330(3)(m).
(c)(i) Persons receiving incentive payments shall keep and
preserve, for a period of five years, suitable records as may be
necessary to determine the amount of incentive applied for and
received. Such records shall be open for examination at any time upon
notice by the light and power business that made the payment or by the
department. If upon examination of any records or from other
information obtained by the business or department it appears that an
incentive has been paid in an amount that exceeds the correct amount of
incentive payable, the business may assess against the person for the
amount found to have been paid in excess of the correct amount of
incentive payable and shall add thereto interest on the amount.
Interest shall be assessed in the manner that the department assesses
interest upon delinquent tax under RCW 82.32.050.
(ii) If it appears that the amount of incentive paid is less than
the correct amount of incentive payable the business may authorize
additional payment.
(4) Except for community solar projects, the investment cost
recovery incentive may be paid fifteen cents per economic development
kilowatt-hour unless requests exceed the amount authorized for credit
to the participating light and power business. For community solar
projects, the investment cost recovery incentive may be paid thirty
cents per economic development kilowatt-hour unless requests exceed the
amount authorized for credit to the participating light and power
business. For the purposes of this section, the rate paid for the
investment cost recovery incentive may be multiplied by the following
factors:
(a) For customer-generated electricity produced using solar modules
manufactured in Washington state or a solar stirling converter
manufactured in Washington state, two and four-tenths;
(b) For customer-generated electricity produced using a solar or a
wind generator equipped with an inverter manufactured in Washington
state, one and two-tenths;
(c) For customer-generated electricity produced using an anaerobic
digester, or by other solar equipment or using a wind generator
equipped with blades manufactured in Washington state, one; and
(d) For all other customer-generated electricity produced by wind,
eight-tenths.
(5) No individual, household, business, or local governmental
entity is eligible for incentives provided under subsection (4) of this
section for more than five thousand dollars per year. Each applicant
in a community solar project is eligible for up to five thousand
dollars per year.
(6) If requests for the investment cost recovery incentive exceed
the amount of funds available for credit to the participating light and
power business, the incentive payments shall be reduced
proportionately.
(7) The climate and rural energy development center at Washington
State University energy program may establish guidelines and standards
for technologies that are identified as Washington manufactured and
therefore most beneficial to the state's environment.
(8) The environmental attributes of the renewable energy system
belong to the applicant, and do not transfer to the state or the light
and power business upon receipt of the investment cost recovery
incentive.

--- END ---