BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
encourage high-density, compact, in-fill development and redevelopment
within existing urban areas in order to further existing goals of
chapter 36.70A RCW, the growth management act, to promote the use of
public transit and encourage further investment in transit systems, and
to contribute to the reduction of greenhouse gas emissions by: (1)
Encouraging local governments to adopt plans and regulations that
authorize compact, high-density urban development as defined in section
2 of this act; (2) providing for the funding and preparation of
environmental impact statements that comprehensively examine the
impacts of such development at the time that the plans and regulations
are adopted; and (3) encouraging development that is consistent with
such plans and regulations by precluding appeals under chapter 43.21C
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Cities with a population greater than five thousand, in
accordance with their existing comprehensive planning and development
regulation authority under chapter 36.70A RCW, and in accordance with
this section, may adopt optional elements of their comprehensive plans
and optional development regulations that apply within specified
subareas of the cities, that are either:
(a) Areas designated as mixed-use or urban centers in a land use or
transportation plan adopted by a regional transportation planning
organization; or
(b) Areas within one-half mile of a major transit stop that are
zoned to have an average minimum density of fifteen dwelling units or
more per gross acre.
(2) Cities located on the east side of the Cascade mountains and
located in a county with a population of two hundred thirty thousand or
less, in accordance with their existing comprehensive planning and
development regulation authority under chapter 36.70A RCW, and in
accordance with this section, may adopt optional elements of their
comprehensive plans and optional development regulations that apply
within the mixed-use or urban centers. The optional elements of their
comprehensive plans and optional development regulations must enhance
pedestrian, bicycle, transit, or other nonvehicular transportation
methods.
(3) A major transit stop is defined as:
(a) A stop on a high capacity transportation service funded or
expanded under the provisions of chapter 81.104 RCW;
(b) Commuter rail stops;
(c) Stops on rail or fixed guideway systems, including transitways;
(d) Stops on bus rapid transit routes or routes that run on high
occupancy vehicle lanes; or
(e) Stops for a bus or other transit mode providing fixed route
service at intervals of at least thirty minutes during the peak hours
of operation.
(4)(a) A city that elects to adopt such an optional comprehensive
plan element and optional development regulations shall prepare a
nonproject environmental impact statement, pursuant to RCW 43.21C.030,
assessing and disclosing the probable significant adverse environmental
impacts of the optional comprehensive plan element and development
regulations and of future development that is consistent with the plan
and regulations.
(b) At least one community meeting must be held on the proposed
subarea plan before the scoping notice for such a nonproject
environmental impact statement is issued. Notice of scoping for such
a nonproject environmental impact statement and notice of the community
meeting required by this section must be mailed to all property owners
of record within the subarea to be studied, to all property owners
within one hundred fifty feet of the boundaries of such a subarea, and
to agencies with jurisdiction over the future development anticipated
within the subarea.
(c) In cities with over five hundred thousand residents, notice of
scoping for such a nonproject environmental impact statement and notice
of the community meeting required by this section must be mailed to all
small businesses as defined in RCW 19.85.020 of record within the
subarea to be studied, to all small businesses as defined in RCW
19.85.020 within one hundred fifty feet of the boundaries of such a
subarea, and to community preservation and development authorities
established under chapter 43.167 RCW. The process for community
involvement must have the goal of fair treatment and meaningful
involvement of all people with respect to the development and
implementation of the subarea planning process.
(d) The notice of the community meeting must include general
illustrations and descriptions of buildings generally representative of
the maximum building envelope that will be allowed under the proposed
plan and indicate that future appeals of proposed developments that are
consistent with the plan will be limited. Notice of the community
meeting must include signs located on major travel routes in the
subarea. If the building envelope increases during the process,
another notice complying with the requirements of this section must be
issued before the next public involvement opportunity.
(e) Any person that has standing to appeal the adoption of this
subarea plan or the implementing regulations under RCW 36.70A.280 has
standing to bring an appeal of the nonproject environmental impact
statement required by this subsection.
(f) In cities with over five hundred thousand residents, prior to
the community meeting being held, a city shall analyze whether the
proposed subarea plan will result in the displacement or fragmentation
of businesses, existing residents, including people living with
poverty, families with children, and intergenerational households, or
cultural groups within the proposed subarea plan. The analysis shall
inform and be included in the nonproject environmental impact statement
in (a) of this subsection. The city shall also discuss the results of
the analysis at the community meeting.
(g) As an incentive for development authorized under this section,
a city shall consider establishing a transfer of development rights
program in consultation with the county where the city is located, that
conserves county-designated agricultural and forest land of long-term
commercial significance. If the city decides not to establish a
transfer of development rights program, the city must state in the
record the reasons for not adopting the program. The city's decision
not to establish a transfer of development rights program is not
subject to appeal. Nothing in this subsection (4)(g) may be used as a
basis to challenge the optional comprehensive plan or subarea plan
policies authorized under this section.
(5)(a) Until July 1, 2018, a proposed development that is
consistent with the optional comprehensive plan or subarea plan
policies and development regulations adopted under subsection (1) or
(2) of this section and that is environmentally reviewed under
subsection (4) of this section may not be challenged in administrative
or judicial appeals for noncompliance with this chapter as long as a
complete application for such a development that vests the application
or would later lead to vested status under city or state law is
submitted to the city within a time frame established by the city, but
not to exceed ten years from the date of issuance of the final
environmental impact statement.
(b) After July 1, 2018, the immunity from appeals under this
chapter of any application that vests or will vest under this
subsection or the ability to vest under this subsection is still valid,
provided that the final subarea environmental impact statement is
issued by July 1, 2018. After July 1, 2018, a city may continue to
collect reimbursement fees under subsection (6) of this section for the
proportionate share of a subarea environmental impact statement issued
prior to July 1, 2018.
(6) It is recognized that a city that prepares a nonproject
environmental impact statement under subsection (4) of this section
must endure a substantial financial burden. A city may recover its
reasonable expenses of preparation of a nonproject environmental impact
statement prepared under subsection (4) of this section through access
to financial assistance under RCW 36.70A.490 or funding from private
sources. In addition, a city is authorized to recover a portion of its
reasonable expenses of preparation of such a nonproject environmental
impact statement by the assessment of reasonable and proportionate fees
upon subsequent development that is consistent with the plan and
development regulations adopted under subsection (5) of this section,
as long as the development makes use of and benefits, as described in
subsection (5) of this section, from the nonproject environmental
impact statement prepared by the city. Any assessment fees collected
from subsequent development may be used to reimburse funding received
from private sources. In order to collect such fees, the city must
enact an ordinance that sets forth objective standards for determining
how the fees to be imposed upon each development will be proportionate
to the impacts of each development and to the benefits accruing to each
development from the nonproject environmental impact statement. Any
disagreement about the reasonableness or amount of the fees imposed
upon a development may not be the basis for delay in issuance of a
project permit for that development. The fee assessed by the city may
be paid with the written stipulation "paid under protest" and if the
city provides for an administrative appeal of its decision on the
project for which the fees are imposed, any dispute about the amount of
the fees must be resolved in the same administrative appeal process.
(7) If a proposed development is inconsistent with the nonproject
environmental impact statement developed under subsection (4) of this
section or if potential impacts from a proposed development are not
adequately addressed in the nonproject environmental impact statement
developed under subsection (4) of this section, the city shall require
a supplement environmental impact statement.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.02.020 and 2009 c 535 s 1103 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except only as expressly provided in chapters 67.28, 81.104, and
82.14 RCW, the state preempts the field of imposing retail sales and
use taxes and taxes upon parimutuel wagering authorized pursuant to RCW
67.16.060, conveyances, and cigarettes, and no county, town, or other
municipal subdivision shall have the right to impose taxes of that
nature. Except as provided in RCW 64.34.440 and 82.02.050 through
82.02.090, no county, city, town, or other municipal corporation shall
impose any tax, fee, or charge, either direct or indirect, on the
construction or reconstruction of residential buildings, commercial
buildings, industrial buildings, or on any other building or building
space or appurtenance thereto, or on the development, subdivision,
classification, or reclassification of land. However, this section
does not preclude dedications of land or easements within the proposed
development or plat which the county, city, town, or other municipal
corporation can demonstrate are reasonably necessary as a direct result
of the proposed development or plat to which the dedication of land or
easement is to apply.
This section does not prohibit voluntary agreements with counties,
cities, towns, or other municipal corporations that allow a payment in
lieu of a dedication of land or to mitigate a direct impact that has
been identified as a consequence of a proposed development,
subdivision, or plat. A local government shall not use such voluntary
agreements for local off-site transportation improvements within the
geographic boundaries of the area or areas covered by an adopted
transportation program authorized by chapter 39.92 RCW. Any such
voluntary agreement is subject to the following provisions:
(1) The payment shall be held in a reserve account and may only be
expended to fund a capital improvement agreed upon by the parties to
mitigate the identified, direct impact;
(2) The payment shall be expended in all cases within five years of
collection; and
(3) Any payment not so expended shall be refunded with interest to
be calculated from the original date the deposit was received by the
county and at the same rate applied to tax refunds pursuant to RCW
84.69.100; however, if the payment is not expended within five years
due to delay attributable to the developer, the payment shall be
refunded without interest.
No county, city, town, or other municipal corporation shall require
any payment as part of such a voluntary agreement which the county,
city, town, or other municipal corporation cannot establish is
reasonably necessary as a direct result of the proposed development or
plat.
Nothing in this section prohibits cities, towns, counties, or other
municipal corporations from collecting reasonable fees from an
applicant for a permit or other governmental approval to cover the cost
to the city, town, county, or other municipal corporation of processing
applications, inspecting and reviewing plans, or preparing detailed
statements required by chapter 43.21C RCW, including reasonable fees
that are consistent with section 2(6) of this act.
This section does not limit the existing authority of any county,
city, town, or other municipal corporation to impose special
assessments on property specifically benefitted thereby in the manner
prescribed by law.
Nothing in this section prohibits counties, cities, or towns from
imposing or permits counties, cities, or towns to impose water, sewer,
natural gas, drainage utility, and drainage system charges. However,
no such charge shall exceed the proportionate share of such utility or
system's capital costs which the county, city, or town can demonstrate
are attributable to the property being charged. Furthermore, these
provisions may not be interpreted to expand or contract any existing
authority of counties, cities, or towns to impose such charges.
Nothing in this section prohibits a transportation benefit district
from imposing fees or charges authorized in RCW 36.73.120 nor prohibits
the legislative authority of a county, city, or town from approving the
imposition of such fees within a transportation benefit district.
Nothing in this section prohibits counties, cities, or towns from
imposing transportation impact fees authorized pursuant to chapter
39.92 RCW.
Nothing in this section prohibits counties, cities, or towns from
requiring property owners to provide relocation assistance to tenants
under RCW 59.18.440 and 59.18.450.
Nothing in this section limits the authority of counties, cities,
or towns to implement programs consistent with RCW 36.70A.540, nor to
enforce agreements made pursuant to such programs.
This section does not apply to special purpose districts formed and
acting pursuant to Title 54, 57, or 87 RCW, nor is the authority
conferred by these titles affected.

--- END ---