BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Increasing available residential curbside
service for solid waste, recyclable, and compostable materials provides
enumerable public benefits for all of Washington. Not only will
increased service provide better system-wide efficiency, but it will
also result in job creation, pollution reduction, and energy
conservation, all of which serve to improve the quality of life in
Washington communities.
It is therefore the intent of the legislature that Washington
strive to significantly increase current residential recycling rates by
2020.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.95.080 and 1985 c 448 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each county within the state, in cooperation with the various
cities located within such county, shall prepare a coordinated,
comprehensive solid waste management plan. Such plan may cover two or
more counties. The purpose is to plan for solid waste and materials
reduction, collection, and handling and management services and
programs throughout the state, as designed to meet the unique needs of
each county and city in the state. When updating a solid waste
management plan developed under this chapter, after the effective date
of this section, local comprehensive plans must consider and plan for
the following handling methods or services:
(a) Source separation of recyclable materials and products, organic
materials, and wastes by generators;
(b) Collection of source separated materials;
(c) Handling and proper preparation of materials for reuse or
recycling;
(d) Handling and proper preparation of organic materials for
composting or anaerobic digestion; and
(e) Handling and proper disposal of nonrecyclable wastes.
(2) When updating a solid waste management plan developed under
this chapter, after the effective date of this section, each local
comprehensive plan must, at a minimum, consider methods that will be
used to address the following:
(a) Construction and demolition waste for recycling or reuse;
(b) Organic material including yard debris, food waste, and food
contaminated paper products for composting or anaerobic digestion;
(c) Recoverable paper products for recycling;
(d) Metals, glass, and plastics for recycling; and
(e) Waste reduction strategies.
(3) Each city shall:
(((1))) (a) Prepare and deliver to the county auditor of the county
in which it is located its plan for its own solid waste management for
integration into the comprehensive county plan; ((or
(2))) (b) Enter into an agreement with the county pursuant to which
the city shall participate in preparing a joint city-county plan for
solid waste management; or
(((3))) (c) Authorize the county to prepare a plan for the city's
solid waste management for inclusion in the comprehensive county plan.
(4) Two or more cities may prepare a plan for inclusion in the
county plan. With prior notification of its home county of its intent,
a city in one county may enter into an agreement with a city in an
adjoining county, or with an adjoining county, or both, to prepare a
joint plan for solid waste management to become part of the
comprehensive plan of both counties.
(5) After consultation with representatives of the cities and
counties, the department shall establish a schedule for the development
of the comprehensive plans for solid waste management. In preparing
such a schedule, the department shall take into account the probable
cost of such plans to the cities and counties.
(6) Local governments shall not be required to include a hazardous
waste element in their solid waste management plans.

Sec. 3 RCW 81.77.185 and 2002 c 299 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission shall allow solid waste collection companies
collecting recyclable materials to retain up to ((thirty)) fifty
percent of the revenue paid to the companies for the material if the
companies submit a plan to the commission that is certified by the
appropriate local government authority as being consistent with the
local government solid waste plan and that demonstrates how the
revenues will be used to increase recycling. The remaining revenue
shall be passed to residential customers.
(2) By December 2, 2005, the commission shall provide a report to
the legislature that evaluates:
(a) The effectiveness of revenue sharing as an incentive to
increase recycling in the state; and
(b) The effect of revenue sharing on costs to customers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 81.77 RCW
to read as follows:
Upon request of a county, the commission may approve rates,
charges, or services at a discount for low-income senior customers and
low-income customers, as adopted by the county in its comprehensive
solid waste management plan. Expenses and lost revenues as a result of
these discounts must be included in the company's cost of service and
recovered in rates to other customers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Nothing in this act changes or limits the
authority of the Washington utilities and transportation commission to
regulate collection of solid waste, including curbside collection of
residential recyclable materials, nor does this act change or limit the
authority of a city or town to provide such service itself or by
contract under RCW 81.77.020.

--- END ---