BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that sustainably
managed commercial forestry produces jobs and revenue while also
providing clean water, clean air, renewable energy, wildlife habitat,
open space, and carbon storage, among other ecological values. For
these reasons, maintaining a base of forest lands that may be utilized
for sustainably managed commercial forestry is of utmost importance to
the state.
(2) The legislature finds that the promotion and fostering of the
economic success of the forest products industry with the goal of
keeping sustainably managed forestry as a priority land use, and
helping to secure the timber managing, growing, harvesting,
transporting, and manufacturing jobs is made possible by a vibrant
working forest land base.
(3) The legislature further finds that maintaining sustainable
working forests is important for the quality of life of all
Washingtonians, and that sustainable forest practices can help to
maintain and restore the vitality of Washington's communities while
also helping to preserve Washington's natural landscapes and
ecosystems.
(4) The legislature further finds that it is necessary to assist
landowners in gaining access to additional sources of revenue, such as
emerging ecosystem services markets, and to help landowners diversify
their incomes, improve the ecological functions of their lands, and
pass their lands and the lands' associated benefits to future
generations.
(5) The legislature further finds that the conservation and
restoration of forest ecosystems provide services to the residents of
the state that help improve water and habitat quality, help avoid
carbon emissions, help address impacts associated with climate change,
and help natural resources adapt to these impacts.
(6) The legislature further finds that ecosystem services markets
can lead to efficient, innovative, and effective conservation and
restoration actions and facilitate improved integration of public and
private investment.
(7) Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to develop tools
to facilitate small and industrial forest landowners' access to market
capital from existing and emerging ecosystem services markets.
(8) The legislature further intends to enable forest landowners who
provide ecosystem services access to financing to protect, restore, and
maintain the ecological values provided by protection of public
resources.

Sec. 2 RCW 76.09.010 and 1999 sp.s. c 4 s 901 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature hereby finds and declares that the forest land
resources are among the most valuable of all resources in the state;
that a viable forest products industry is of prime importance to the
state's economy; that it is in the public interest for public and
private commercial forest lands to be managed consistent with sound
policies of natural resource protection; that coincident with
maintenance of a viable forest products industry, it is important to
afford protection to forest soils, fisheries, wildlife, water quantity
and quality, air quality, recreation, and scenic beauty.
(2) The legislature further finds and declares it to be in the
public interest of this state to create and maintain through the
adoption of this chapter a comprehensive statewide system of laws and
forest practices rules which will achieve the following purposes and
policies:
(a) Afford protection to, promote, foster and encourage timber
growth, and require such minimum reforestation of commercial tree
species on forest lands as will reasonably utilize the timber growing
capacity of the soil following current timber harvest;
(b) Afford protection to forest soils and public resources by
utilizing all reasonable methods of technology in conducting forest
practices;
(c) Recognize both the public and private interest in the
profitable growing and harvesting of timber;
(d) Promote efficiency by permitting maximum operating freedom
consistent with the other purposes and policies stated herein;
(e) Provide for regulation of forest practices so as to avoid
unnecessary duplication in such rules;
(f) Provide for interagency input and intergovernmental and tribal
coordination and cooperation;
(g) Achieve compliance with all applicable requirements of federal
and state law with respect to nonpoint sources of water pollution from
forest practices;
(h) To consider reasonable land use planning goals and concepts
contained in local comprehensive plans and zoning regulations;
(i) Foster cooperation among managers of public resources, forest
landowners, Indian tribes and the citizens of the state; ((and))
(j) Develop a watershed analysis system that addresses the
cumulative effect of forest practices on, at a minimum, the public
resources of fish, water, and public capital improvements of the state
and its political subdivisions; and
(k) Assist forest landowners in accessing market capital and
financing for the ecosystem services provided to the public as a result
of the protection of public resources.
(3) The legislature further finds and declares that it is also in
the public interest of the state to encourage forest landowners to
undertake corrective and remedial action to reduce the impact of mass
earth movements and fluvial processes.
(4) The legislature further finds and declares that it is in the
public interest that the applicants for state forest practices permits
should assist in paying for the cost of review and permitting necessary
for the environmental protection of these resources.

Sec. 3 RCW 76.09.040 and 2009 c 246 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Where necessary to accomplish the purposes and policies
stated in RCW 76.09.010, and to implement the provisions of this
chapter, the board shall adopt forest practices rules pursuant to
chapter 34.05 RCW and in accordance with the procedures enumerated in
this section that:
(((a))) (i) Establish minimum standards for forest practices;
(((b))) (ii) Provide procedures for the voluntary development of
resource management plans which may be adopted as an alternative to the
minimum standards in (a)(i) of this subsection if the plan is
consistent with the purposes and policies stated in RCW 76.09.010 and
the plan meets or exceeds the objectives of the minimum standards;
(((c))) (iii) Set forth necessary administrative provisions;
(((d))) (iv) Establish procedures for the collection and
administration of forest practice fees as set forth by this chapter;
and
(((e))) (v) Allow for the development of watershed analyses.
(b) Forest practices rules pertaining to water quality protection
shall be adopted by the board after reaching agreement with the
director of the department of ecology or the director's designee on the
board with respect thereto. All other forest practices rules shall be
adopted by the board.
(c) Forest practices rules shall be administered and enforced by
either the department or the local governmental entity as provided in
this chapter. Such rules shall be adopted and administered so as to
give consideration to all purposes and policies set forth in RCW
76.09.010.
(2)(a) The board shall prepare proposed forest practices rules
consistent with this section and chapter 34.05 RCW. In addition to any
forest practices rules relating to water quality protection proposed by
the board, the department of ecology may submit to the board proposed
forest practices rules relating to water quality protection.
(b)(i) Prior to initiating the rule-making process, the proposed
rules shall be submitted for review and comments to the department of
fish and wildlife and to the counties of the state. After receipt of
the proposed forest practices rules, the department of fish and
wildlife and the counties of the state shall have thirty days in which
to review and submit comments to the board, and to the department of
ecology with respect to its proposed rules relating to water quality
protection.
(ii) After the expiration of ((such)) the thirty day period, the
board and the department of ecology shall jointly hold one or more
hearings on the proposed rules pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. ((At
such hearing(s))) Any county representative may propose specific forest
practices rules relating to problems existing within ((such)) the
county at the hearings.
(iii) The board may adopt and the department of ecology may approve
such proposals if they find the proposals are consistent with the
purposes and policies of this chapter.
(3)(a) The board shall establish by rule a program for the
acquisition of riparian open space and critical habitat for threatened
or endangered species as designated by the board. Acquisition must be
a conservation easement. Lands eligible for acquisition are forest
lands within unconfined channel migration zones or forest lands
containing critical habitat for threatened or endangered species as
designated by the board. Once acquired, these lands may be held and
managed by the department, transferred to another state agency,
transferred to an appropriate local government agency, or transferred
to a private nonprofit nature conservancy corporation, as defined in
RCW 64.04.130, in fee or transfer of management obligation. The board
shall adopt rules governing the acquisition by the state or donation to
the state of such interest in lands including the right of refusal if
the lands are subject to unacceptable liabilities. The rules shall
include definitions of qualifying lands, priorities for acquisition,
and provide for the opportunity to transfer such lands with limited
warranties and with a description of boundaries that does not require
full surveys where the cost of securing the surveys would be
unreasonable in relation to the value of the lands conveyed. The rules
shall provide for the management of the lands for ecological protection
or fisheries enhancement. For the purposes of conservation easements
entered into under this section, the following apply:
(((a))) (i) For conveyances of a conservation easement in which the
landowner conveys an interest in the trees only, the compensation must
include the timber value component, as determined by the cruised volume
of any timber located within the channel migration zone or critical
habitat for threatened or endangered species as designated by the
board, multiplied by the appropriate quality code stumpage value for
timber of the same species shown on the appropriate table used for
timber harvest excise tax purposes under RCW 84.33.091;
(((b))) (ii) For conveyances of a conservation easement in which
the landowner conveys interests in both land and trees, the
compensation must include the timber value component in (a)(i) of this
subsection plus such portion of the land value component as determined
just and equitable by the department. The land value component must be
the acreage of qualifying channel migration zone or critical habitat
for threatened or endangered species as determined by the board, to be
conveyed, multiplied by the average per acre value of all commercial
forest land in western Washington or the average for eastern
Washington, whichever average is applicable to the qualifying lands.
The department must determine the western and eastern Washington
averages based on the land value tables established by RCW 84.33.140
and revised annually by the department of revenue.
(((4))) (b) Subject to appropriations sufficient to cover the cost
of such an acquisition program and the related costs of administering
the program, the department must establish a conservation easement in
land that an owner tenders for purchase; provided that such lands have
been taxed as forest lands and are located within an unconfined channel
migration zone or contain critical habitat for threatened or endangered
species as designated by the board. Lands acquired under this section
shall become riparian or habitat open space. These acquisitions shall
not be deemed to trigger the compensating tax of chapters 84.33 and
84.34 RCW.
(((5))) (c) Instead of offering to sell interests in qualifying
lands, owners may elect to donate the interests to the state.
(((6))) (d) Any acquired interest in qualifying lands by the state
under this section shall be managed as riparian open space or critical
habitat.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The department of natural resources
shall, to the degree that resources are available, develop, consistent
with this section, proposals for the development of appropriate
landowner conservation incentives that support forest landowners
maintaining their land in forestry. These incentives may include, but
are not limited to, incentives that are related to ecosystem service
markets, tax incentives, easements, technical assistance, and
recognition or certification.
(2) The department of natural resources shall consult with the
forest practices board, representatives of federal, state, and local
government, Indian tribes, small forest landowners, conservation
groups, industrial foresters, and other individuals deemed beneficial
by the department in implementing this section.
(3) By December 31, 2011, the department of natural resources must
present their research and any proposed incentives to the governor, the
appropriate committees of the legislature, the commissioner of public
lands, and the forest practices board. The department of natural
resources shall also offer to present their findings and
recommendations to the Washington congressional delegation, local
governments, and any state or federal agency that has as a portion of
their mission the support of Washington's working land base and the
jobs, products, and ecological values that working lands provide.
(4) Neither the activities nor outcome of the department of natural
resources' actions or decisions under this section shall cause,
promote, or delay rule making by the forest practices board in the
execution of its applicable duties.
(5) The department of natural resources is authorized to seek
federal and private funds, and in-kind contributions to complete the
work in this act. At the discretion of the department of natural
resources, the department must comply with this act only to the degree
that existing or acquired nonstate resources permit.
(6) This section expires July 1, 2012.

Sec. 5 RCW 76.09.020 and 2009 c 354 s 5 and 2009 c 246 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Adaptive management" means reliance on scientific methods to
test the results of actions taken so that the management and related
policy can be changed promptly and appropriately.
(2) "Appeals board" means the forest practices appeals board
created by RCW 76.09.210.
(3) "Application" means the application required pursuant to RCW
76.09.050.
(4) "Aquatic resources" includes water quality, salmon, other
species of the vertebrate classes Cephalaspidomorphi and Osteichthyes
identified in the forests and fish report, the Columbia torrent
salamander (Rhyacotriton kezeri), the Cascade torrent salamander
(Rhyacotriton cascadae), the Olympic torrent salamander (Rhyacotriton
olympian), the Dunn's salamander (Plethodon dunni), the Van Dyke's
salamander (Plethodon vandyke), the tailed frog (Ascaphus truei), and
their respective habitats.
(5) "Board" means the forest practices board created in RCW
76.09.030.
(6) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of public lands.
(7) "Contiguous" means land adjoining or touching by common corner
or otherwise. Land having common ownership divided by a road or other
right-of-way shall be considered contiguous.
(8) "Conversion to a use other than commercial timber operation"
means a bona fide conversion to an active use which is incompatible
with timber growing and as may be defined by forest practices rules.
(9) "Department" means the department of natural resources.
(10) "Fish passage barrier" means any artificial instream structure
that impedes the free passage of fish.
(11) "Forest land" means all land which is capable of supporting a
merchantable stand of timber and is not being actively used for a use
which is incompatible with timber growing. Forest land does not
include agricultural land that is or was enrolled in the conservation
reserve enhancement program by contract if such agricultural land was
historically used for agricultural purposes and the landowner intends
to continue to use the land for agricultural purposes in the future.
As it applies to the operation of the road maintenance and abandonment
plan element of the forest practices rules on small forest landowners,
the term "forest land" excludes:
(a) Residential home sites, which may include up to five acres; and
(b) Cropfields, orchards, vineyards, pastures, feedlots, fish pens,
and the land on which appurtenances necessary to the production,
preparation, or sale of crops, fruit, dairy products, fish, and
livestock exist.
(12) "Forest landowner" means any person in actual control of
forest land, whether such control is based either on legal or equitable
title, or on any other interest entitling the holder to sell or
otherwise dispose of any or all of the timber on such land in any
manner. However, any lessee or other person in possession of forest
land without legal or equitable title to such land shall be excluded
from the definition of "forest landowner" unless such lessee or other
person has the right to sell or otherwise dispose of any or all of the
timber located on such forest land.
(13) "Forest practice" means any activity conducted on or directly
pertaining to forest land and relating to growing, harvesting, or
processing timber, including but not limited to:
(a) Road and trail construction;
(b) Harvesting, final and intermediate;
(c) Precommercial thinning;
(d) Reforestation;
(e) Fertilization;
(f) Prevention and suppression of diseases and insects;
(g) Salvage of trees; and
(h) Brush control.
"Forest practice" shall not include preparatory work such as tree
marking, surveying and road flagging, and removal or harvesting of
incidental vegetation from forest lands such as berries, ferns,
greenery, mistletoe, herbs, mushrooms, and other products which cannot
normally be expected to result in damage to forest soils, timber, or
public resources.
(14) "Forest practices rules" means any rules adopted pursuant to
RCW 76.09.040.
(15) "Forest road," as it applies to the operation of the road
maintenance and abandonment plan element of the forest practices rules
on small forest landowners, means a road or road segment that crosses
land that meets the definition of forest land, but excludes residential
access roads.
(16) "Forest trees" does not include hardwood trees cultivated by
agricultural methods in growing cycles shorter than fifteen years if
the trees were planted on land that was not in forest use immediately
before the trees were planted and before the land was prepared for
planting the trees. "Forest trees" includes Christmas trees, but does
not include Christmas trees that are cultivated by agricultural
methods, as that term is defined in RCW 84.33.035.
(17) "Forests and fish report" means the forests and fish report to
the board dated April 29, 1999.
(18) "Operator" means any person engaging in forest practices
except an employee with wages as his or her sole compensation.
(19) "Person" means any individual, partnership, private, public,
or municipal corporation, county, the department or other state or
local governmental entity, or association of individuals of whatever
nature.
(20) "Public resources" means water, fish and wildlife, and in
addition shall mean capital improvements of the state or its political
subdivisions.
(21) "Small forest landowner" has the same meaning as defined in
RCW 76.09.450.
(22) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, of a commercial
species, including Christmas trees. However, "timber" does not include
Christmas trees that are cultivated by agricultural methods, as that
term is defined in RCW 84.33.035.
(23) "Timber owner" means any person having all or any part of the
legal interest in timber. Where such timber is subject to a contract
of sale, "timber owner" shall mean the contract purchaser.
(24) "Unconfined channel migration zone" means the area within
which the active channel of an unconfined stream is prone to move and
where the movement would result in a potential near-term loss of
riparian forest adjacent to the stream. Sizeable islands with
productive timber may exist within the zone.
(25) "Unconfined stream" means generally fifth order or larger
waters that experience abrupt shifts in channel location, creating a
complex floodplain characterized by extensive gravel bars, disturbance
species of vegetation of variable age, numerous side channels, wall-based channels, oxbow lakes, and wetland complexes. Many of these
streams have dikes and levees that may temporarily or permanently
restrict channel movement.
(26) "Ecosystem services" means the benefits that the public enjoys
as a result of natural processes and biological diversity.
(27) "Ecosystem services market" means a system in which providers
of ecosystem services can access financing or market capital to
protect, restore, and maintain ecological values, including the full
spectrum of regulatory, quasiregulatory, and voluntary markets.

--- END ---