BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds increasing conflicts
between planned rural residential growth found in county comprehensive
plans and the availability of water to serve those areas of planned
growth. The legislature further finds that these conflicts raise
questions concerning the implementation of local land use plans.
Failure to address these conflicts will negatively impact local
government planning and environmental and consumer interests.
It is the intent of the legislature to obtain a comparative review
of local land use plans and water availability, to identify existing
and potential conflicts between land use plans and permit decisions and
rules, and to identify strategies that will reduce or eliminate those
conflicts.
It is not the intent of the legislature that this comparative
review analyze the underlying legal basis or validity of local land use
plans, water right permit decisions, or instream flow rules, or that
the results of this comparative review, be used in any local land use
or water resource planning process or in an administrative or judicial
appeal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department of commerce shall
contract with a consulting firm qualified in land use and water supply
planning to produce a comparative review of local land use plans
adopted by local governments and the water availability found in those
planning areas. The geographic scope of the comparative review must
include the sixteen water resource inventory areas designated by the
department of ecology as critical basins in its March 2003 "Washington
Water Acquisition Program" report, as well as Clallam, Jefferson,
Skagit, Skamania, Kittitas, Whatcom, Thurston, Snohomish, Clark,
Cowlitz, Walla Walla, Columbia, Chelan, and Yakima counties.
(2) The comparative review must investigate the following issues
associated with land use plans in rural areas:
(a) The planned amount of residential development in rural areas of
counties that will not be served by existing water purveyors;
(b) The water demand necessary to serve residential development,
including water for both potable and nonpotable uses; and
(c) Whether the water demand necessary under (b) of this subsection
is available based on water right permit decisions or instream flow
rules adopted by the department of ecology.
(3)(a) The comparative review must also identify and report on
mechanisms and strategies that could be implemented in rural areas that
would assist in providing the water supply necessary to meet planned
levels of rural growth.
(b) The comparative report must also report on how the following
mechanisms may be implemented in each geographic area under review:
(i) Provision of water by water purveyors at rural levels of
service that would be consistent with the terms "rural character,"
"rural development," and "rural governmental services" as defined in
RCW 36.70A.030;
(ii) Water right transfers;
(iii) A mechanism for banking water;
(iv) Water exchanges;
(v) Mitigation for consumptive water uses;
(vi) Water storage;
(vii) Purchase or transfer of development rights; and
(viii) Other programs, mechanisms, and strategies identified in the
report.
(4) In identifying and reporting on mechanisms and strategies to
address rural water supply issues, the comparative review must also
report on:
(a) Mechanisms and strategies being implemented in other states to
address similar issues; and
(b) The adequacy of financial resources and technical expertise at
the county level to implement the types of programs identified in
subsection (3)(b) of this section.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2010, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The comparative review in section 2 of this
act may not be used for any purpose in land use or water resource
planning processes, quasi-judicial appeals, or judicial review
proceedings.

--- END ---