BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.71.019 and 1996 c 195 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Uniform Disciplinary Act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs
unlicensed practice and the issuance and denial of licenses and
discipline of licensees under this chapter.
(2) When a panel of the commission revokes a license, the
respondent may request review of the revocation order of the panel by
the remaining members of the commission not involved in the initial
investigation. The respondent's request for review must be filed
within twenty days of the effective date of the order revoking the
respondent's license. The review shall be scheduled for hearing by the
remaining members of the commission not involved in the initial
investigation within sixty days. The commission shall adopt rules
establishing review procedures.
(3)(a) In addition to the requirements of RCW 18.130.095, the
secretary or the commission, as applicable, shall provide to a
complainant a written explanation of any determination pertaining to
his or her complaint including, but not limited to, a determination to
initiate an investigation, a determination to close a complaint without
investigation, a determination of whether to initiate a formal
disciplinary hearing, a finding of unprofessional conduct following a
hearing, or a finding that unprofessional conduct did not occur
following a hearing.
(b) Within sixty days of receiving a written explanation from the
secretary or commission under (a) of this subsection, the complainant
may appeal the determination to an administrative law judge in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.
(c) Within sixty days of receiving a decision under (b) of this
subsection, the complainant may request judicial review of the decision
in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.
(d) Following a ruling in favor of the complainant under (b) or (c)
of this subsection, the secretary or the commission, as appropriate,
shall continue to pursue the case against the license holder.
(4)(a) Prior to any final decision on any disciplinary proceeding
before the commission, the commission shall provide the complainant or
his or her representative an opportunity to be heard through an oral or
written victim impact statement, or both, at the victim's or his or her
representative's option, about the impact of the victim's injury on the
victim and his or her family and on a recommended sanction.
(b) The commission shall make reasonable efforts to ensure that the
victim or his or her representative be given the opportunity to provide
the impact statement in the presence of the physician who is the
subject of the disciplinary proceeding, unless the physician is not
present at the proceeding. If the physician is not present, the
commission shall transmit the impact statement to the physician who
shall certify to the commission that he or she has received and read
it.
(c) For purposes of this subsection, representatives of the victim
include his or her family members and such other affected parties as
may be designated by the commission upon request.

--- END ---