BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 7.70.050 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 56 s 10 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The following shall be necessary elements of proof that injury
resulted from health care in a civil negligence case or arbitration
involving the issue of the alleged breach of the duty to secure an
informed consent by a patient or his representatives against a health
care provider:
(a) That the health care provider failed to inform the patient of
a material fact or facts relating to the treatment, including, but
limited to:
(i) That the treatment involves the administration of a drug or a
family of drugs to which the patient has a known allergy; and
(ii) That there are negative outcomes, about which the provider
knows or should know, associated with the interaction of the drug with
another drug the patient is known to be taking;
(b) That the patient consented to the treatment without being aware
of or fully informed of such material fact or facts;
(c) That a reasonably prudent patient under similar circumstances
would not have consented to the treatment if informed of such material
fact or facts;
(d) That the treatment in question proximately caused injury to the
patient.
(2) Under the provisions of this section a fact is defined as or
considered to be a material fact, if a reasonably prudent person in the
position of the patient or his representative would attach significance
to it deciding whether or not to submit to the proposed treatment.
(3) Material facts under the provisions of this section which must
be established by expert testimony shall be either:
(a) The nature and character of the treatment proposed and
administered;
(b) The anticipated results of the treatment proposed and
administered;
(c) The recognized possible alternative forms of treatment; or
(d) The recognized serious possible risks, complications, and
anticipated benefits involved in the treatment administered and in the
recognized possible alternative forms of treatment, including
nontreatment.
(4) If a recognized health care emergency exists and the patient is
not legally competent to give an informed consent and/or a person
legally authorized to consent on behalf of the patient is not readily
available, his consent to required treatment will be implied.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.130.180 and 2008 c 134 s 25 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following conduct, acts, or conditions constitute
unprofessional conduct for any license holder under the jurisdiction of
this chapter:
(1) The commission of any act involving moral turpitude,
dishonesty, or corruption relating to the practice of the person's
profession, whether the act constitutes a crime or not. If the act
constitutes a crime, conviction in a criminal proceeding is not a
condition precedent to disciplinary action. Upon such a conviction,
however, the judgment and sentence is conclusive evidence at the
ensuing disciplinary hearing of the guilt of the license holder of the
crime described in the indictment or information, and of the person's
violation of the statute on which it is based. For the purposes of
this section, conviction includes all instances in which a plea of
guilty or nolo contendere is the basis for the conviction and all
proceedings in which the sentence has been deferred or suspended.
Nothing in this section abrogates rights guaranteed under chapter 9.96A
RCW;
(2) Misrepresentation or concealment of a material fact in
obtaining a license or in reinstatement thereof;
(3) All advertising which is false, fraudulent, or misleading;
(4) Incompetence, negligence, or malpractice which results in
injury to a patient or which creates an unreasonable risk that a
patient may be harmed. The use of a nontraditional treatment by itself
shall not constitute unprofessional conduct, provided that it does not
result in injury to a patient or create an unreasonable risk that a
patient may be harmed;
(5) Suspension, revocation, or restriction of the individual's
license to practice any health care profession by competent authority
in any state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction, a certified copy of the
order, stipulation, or agreement being conclusive evidence of the
revocation, suspension, or restriction;
(6) The possession, use, prescription for use, or distribution of
controlled substances or legend drugs in any way other than for
legitimate or therapeutic purposes, diversion of controlled substances
or legend drugs, the violation of any drug law, or prescribing
controlled substances for oneself;
(7) Violation of any state or federal statute or administrative
rule regulating the profession in question, including any statute or
rule defining or establishing standards of patient care or professional
conduct or practice;
(8) Failure to cooperate with the disciplining authority by:
(a) Not furnishing any papers, documents, records, or other items;
(b) Not furnishing in writing a full and complete explanation
covering the matter contained in the complaint filed with the
disciplining authority;
(c) Not responding to subpoenas issued by the disciplining
authority, whether or not the recipient of the subpoena is the accused
in the proceeding; or
(d) Not providing reasonable and timely access for authorized
representatives of the disciplining authority seeking to perform
practice reviews at facilities utilized by the license holder;
(9) Failure to comply with an order issued by the disciplining
authority or a stipulation for informal disposition entered into with
the disciplining authority;
(10) Aiding or abetting an unlicensed person to practice when a
license is required;
(11) Violations of rules established by any health agency;
(12) Practice beyond the scope of practice as defined by law or
rule;
(13) Misrepresentation or fraud in any aspect of the conduct of the
business or profession;
(14) Failure to adequately supervise auxiliary staff to the extent
that the consumer's health or safety is at risk;
(15) Engaging in a profession involving contact with the public
while suffering from a contagious or infectious disease involving
serious risk to public health;
(16) Promotion for personal gain of any unnecessary or
inefficacious drug, device, treatment, procedure, or service;
(17) Conviction of any gross misdemeanor or felony relating to the
practice of the person's profession. For the purposes of this
subsection, conviction includes all instances in which a plea of guilty
or nolo contendere is the basis for conviction and all proceedings in
which the sentence has been deferred or suspended. Nothing in this
section abrogates rights guaranteed under chapter 9.96A RCW;
(18) The procuring, or aiding or abetting in procuring, a criminal
abortion;
(19) The offering, undertaking, or agreeing to cure or treat
disease by a secret method, procedure, treatment, or medicine, or the
treating, operating, or prescribing for any health condition by a
method, means, or procedure which the licensee refuses to divulge upon
demand of the disciplining authority;
(20) The willful betrayal of a practitioner-patient privilege as
recognized by law;
(21) Violation of chapter 19.68 RCW;
(22) Interference with an investigation or disciplinary proceeding
by willful misrepresentation of facts before the disciplining authority
or its authorized representative, or by the use of threats or
harassment against any patient or witness to prevent them from
providing evidence in a disciplinary proceeding or any other legal
action, or by the use of financial inducements to any patient or
witness to prevent or attempt to prevent him or her from providing
evidence in a disciplinary proceeding;
(23) Current misuse of:
(a) Alcohol;
(b) Controlled substances; or
(c) Legend drugs;
(24) Abuse of a client or patient or sexual contact with a client
or patient;
(25) Acceptance of more than a nominal gratuity, hospitality, or
subsidy offered by a representative or vendor of medical or health-related products or services intended for patients, in contemplation of
a sale or for use in research publishable in professional journals,
where a conflict of interest is presented, as defined by rules of the
disciplining authority, in consultation with the department, based on
recognized professional ethical standards;
(26) Failure to obtain written informed consent prior to the
administration of any drug when the patient has a known allergy to that
drug or that family of drugs or when there are negative outcomes, about
which the license holder knows or should know, associated with the
interaction of the drug with another drug the patient is known to be
taking, regardless of whether the administration of the drug results in
injury and regardless of whether the failure to obtain written informed
consent constitutes a breach of the duty to secure an informed consent
under RCW 7.70.050. This subsection does not apply if: (a) A
recognized health care emergency exists; (b) the patient is not legally
competent to give an informed consent; and (c) a person legally
authorized to consent on behalf of the patient is not readily
available.

--- END ---