BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.96.030 and 1989 c 415 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Notwithstanding the terms of a franchise and notwithstanding the
terms of a waiver, no manufacturer may terminate, cancel, or fail to
renew a franchise with a new motor vehicle dealer, unless the
manufacturer has complied with the notice requirements of RCW 46.96.070
and an administrative law judge has determined, if requested in writing
by the new motor vehicle dealer within the applicable time period
specified in RCW 46.96.070 (1), (2), or (3), after hearing, that there
is good cause for the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal of the
franchise and that the manufacturer has acted in good faith, as defined
in this chapter, regarding the termination, cancellation, or
nonrenewal. Between the time of issuance of the notice required under
RCW 46.96.070 and the effective termination, cancellation, or
nonrenewal of the franchise under this chapter, the rights, duties, and
obligations of the new motor vehicle dealer and the manufacturer under
the franchise and this chapter are unaffected, including those under
RCW 46.96.200.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.96.070 and 1989 c 415 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Before the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal of a franchise,
the manufacturer shall give written notification to both the department
and the new motor vehicle dealer. For the purposes of this chapter,
the discontinuance of the sale and distribution of a new motor vehicle
line, or the constructive discontinuance by material reduction in
selection offered, such that continuing to retail the line is no longer
economically viable for a dealer is, at the option of the dealer,
considered a termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal of a franchise.
The notice shall be by certified mail or personally delivered to the
new motor vehicle dealer and shall state the intention to terminate,
cancel, or not renew the franchise, the reasons for the termination,
cancellation, or nonrenewal, and the effective date of the termination,
cancellation, or nonrenewal. The notice shall be given:
(1) Not less than ninety days before the effective date of the
termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal;
(2) Not less than fifteen days before the effective date of the
termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal with respect to any of the
following that constitute good cause for termination, cancellation, or
nonrenewal:
(a) Insolvency of the new motor vehicle dealer or the filing of any
petition by or against the new motor vehicle dealer under bankruptcy or
receivership law;
(b) Failure of the new motor vehicle dealer to conduct sales and
service operations during customary business hours for seven
consecutive business days, except for acts of God or circumstances
beyond the direct control of the new motor vehicle dealer;
(c) Conviction of the new motor vehicle dealer, or principal
operator of the dealership, of a felony punishable by imprisonment; or
(d) Suspension or revocation of a license that the new motor
vehicle dealer is required to have to operate the new motor vehicle
dealership where the suspension or revocation is for a period in excess
of thirty days;
(3) Not less than one hundred eighty days before the effective date
of termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal, where the manufacturer
intends to discontinue sale and distribution of the new motor vehicle
line.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.96.090 and 1989 c 415 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In the event of a termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal
under this chapter, except for termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal
under RCW 46.96.070(2) or a voluntary termination, cancellation, or
nonrenewal initiated by the dealer, the manufacturer shall, at the
request and option of the new motor vehicle dealer, also pay to the new
motor vehicle dealer the dealer costs for any relocation, substantial
alteration, or remodeling of a dealer's facilities required by a
manufacturer for the continuance or renewal of a franchise agreement
completed within three years of the termination, cancellation, or
nonrenewal and:
(a) A sum equivalent to rent for the unexpired term of the lease or
one year, whichever is less, or such longer term as provided in the
franchise, if the new motor vehicle dealer is leasing the new motor
vehicle dealership facilities from a lessor other than the
manufacturer; or
(b) A sum equivalent to the reasonable rental value of the new
motor vehicle dealership facilities for one year or until the
facilities are leased or sold, whichever is less, if the new motor
vehicle dealer owns the new motor vehicle dealership facilities.
(2) The rental payment required under subsection (1) of this
section is only required to the extent that the facilities were used
for activities under the franchise and only to the extent the
facilities were not leased for unrelated purposes. If the rental
payment under subsection (1) of this section is made, the manufacturer
is entitled to possession and use of the new motor vehicle dealership
facilities for the period rent is paid.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.96.105 and 2003 c 21 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each manufacturer shall specify in its franchise agreement, or
in a separate written agreement, with each of its dealers licensed in
this state, the dealer's obligation to perform warranty work or service
on the manufacturer's products. Each manufacturer shall provide each
of its dealers with a schedule of compensation to be paid to the dealer
for any warranty work or service, including parts, labor, and
diagnostic work, required of the dealer by the manufacturer in
connection with the manufacturer's products. The schedule of
compensation must not be less than the rates charged by the dealer for
similar service to retail customers for nonwarranty service and
repairs, and must not be less than the schedule of compensation for an
existing dealer as of the effective date of this section.
(a) The rates charged by the dealer for nonwarranty service or work
for parts means the manufacturer's suggested retail price for the part
or the dealer's cost for the part plus a forty percent markup,
whichever is greater.
(b) A manufacturer shall compensate a dealer for labor and
diagnostic work at the rates charged by the dealer to its retail
customers for such work. If a manufacturer can demonstrate that the
rates unreasonably exceed those of all other franchised motor vehicle
dealers in the same relevant market area offering the same or a
competitive motor vehicle line, the manufacturer is not required to
honor the rate increase proposed by the dealer. If the manufacturer is
not required to honor the rate increase proposed by the dealer, the
dealer is entitled to resubmit a new proposed rate for labor and
diagnostic work.
(c) A dealer may not be granted an increase in the average
percentage markup or labor and diagnostic work rate more than twice in
one calendar year.
(2) All claims for warranty work for parts and labor made by
dealers under this section shall be submitted to the manufacturer
within one year of the date the work was performed. All claims
submitted must be paid by the manufacturer within thirty days following
receipt, provided the claim has been approved by the manufacturer. The
manufacturer has the right to audit claims for warranty work and to
charge the dealer for any unsubstantiated, incorrect, or false claims
for a period of one year following payment. However, the manufacturer
may audit and charge the dealer for any fraudulent claims during any
period for which an action for fraud may be commenced under applicable
state law.
(3) All claims submitted by dealers on the forms and in the manner
specified by the manufacturer shall be either approved or disapproved
within thirty days following their receipt. The manufacturer shall
notify the dealer in writing of any disapproved claim, and shall set
forth the reasons why the claim was not approved. Any claim not
specifically disapproved in writing within thirty days following
receipt is approved, and the manufacturer is required to pay that claim
within thirty days of receipt of the claim.
(4) A manufacturer may not otherwise recover all or any portion of
its costs for compensating its dealers licensed in this state for
warranty parts and service either by reduction in the amount due to the
dealer or by separate charge, surcharge, or other imposition.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.96.110 and 1989 c 415 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding the terms of a franchise, (a) an owner may
appoint a designated successor to succeed to the ownership of the new
motor vehicle dealer franchise upon the owner's death or incapacity, or
(b) if an owner who has owned the franchise for not less than five
consecutive years, the owner may appoint a designated successor to be
effective on a date of the owner's choosing that is prior to the
owner's death or disability.
(2) Notwithstanding the terms of a franchise, a designated
successor ((of a deceased or incapacitated owner of a new motor vehicle
dealer franchise)) described under subsection (1) of this section may
succeed to the ownership interest of the owner under the existing
franchise, if:
(a) In the case of a designated successor who meets the definition
of a designated successor under RCW 46.96.020(5)(a), but who is not
experienced in the business of a new motor vehicle dealer, the person
will employ an individual who is qualified and experienced in the
business of a new motor vehicle dealer to help manage the day-to-day
operations of the motor vehicle dealership; or in the case of a
designated successor who meets the definition of a designated successor
under RCW 46.96.020(5) (b) or (c), the person is qualified and
experienced in the business of a new motor vehicle dealer and meets the
normal, reasonable, and uniformly applied standards for grant of an
application as a new motor vehicle dealer by the manufacturer; and
(b) The designated successor furnishes written notice to the
manufacturer of his or her intention to succeed to the ownership of the
new motor vehicle dealership within sixty days after the owner's death
or incapacity, or if the appointment is under subsection (1)(b) of this
section, at least thirty days before the designated successor's
proposed succession; and
(c) The designated successor agrees to be bound by all terms and
conditions of the franchise.
(3) The manufacturer may request, and the designated successor
shall promptly provide, such personal and financial information as is
reasonably necessary to determine whether the succession should be
honored.
(4) A manufacturer may refuse to honor the succession to the
ownership of a new motor vehicle dealer franchise by a designated
successor if the manufacturer establishes that good cause exists for
its refusal to honor the succession. If the designated successor ((of
a deceased or incapacitated owner)) of a new motor vehicle dealer
franchise fails to meet the requirements set forth in subsections
(2)(a), (b), and (c) of this section, good cause for refusing to honor
the succession is presumed to exist. If a manufacturer believes that
good cause exists for refusing to honor the succession to the ownership
of a new motor vehicle dealer franchise by a designated successor, the
manufacturer shall serve written notice on the designated successor and
on the department of its refusal to honor the succession no earlier
than sixty days from the date the notice is served. The notice must be
served not later than sixty days after the manufacturer's receipt of:
(a) Notice of the designated successor's intent to succeed to the
ownership interest of the new motor vehicle dealer's franchise; or
(b) Any personal or financial information requested by the
manufacturer.
(5) The notice in subsection (4) of this section shall state the
specific grounds for the refusal to honor the succession. If the
notice of refusal is not timely and properly served, the designated
successor may continue the franchise in full force and effect, subject
to termination only as otherwise provided under this chapter.
(6) Within twenty days after receipt of the notice or within twenty
days after the end of any appeal procedure provided by the
manufacturer, whichever is greater, the designated successor may file
a petition with the department protesting the refusal to honor the
succession. The petition shall contain a short statement setting forth
the reasons for the designated successor's protest. Upon the filing of
a protest and the receipt of the filing fee, the department shall
promptly notify the manufacturer that a timely protest has been filed
and shall request the appointment of an administrative law judge under
chapter 34.12 RCW to conduct a hearing. The manufacturer shall not
terminate or otherwise discontinue the existing franchise until the
administrative law judge has held a hearing and has determined that
there is good cause for refusing to honor the succession. If an appeal
is taken, the manufacturer shall not terminate or discontinue the
franchise until the appeal to superior court is finally determined or
until the expiration of one hundred eighty days from the date of
issuance of the administrative law judge's written decision, whichever
is less. Nothing in this section precludes a manufacturer or dealer
from petitioning the superior court for a stay or other relief pending
judicial review.
(7) The manufacturer has the burden of proof to show that good
cause exists for the refusal to honor the succession.
(8) The administrative law judge shall conduct the hearing and
render a final decision as expeditiously as possible, but in any event
not later than one hundred eighty days after a protest is filed.
(9) The administrative law judge shall conduct any hearing
concerning the refusal to the succession as provided in RCW
46.96.050(2) and all hearing costs shall be borne as provided in that
subsection. A party to such a hearing aggrieved by the final order of
the administrative law judge may appeal as provided and allowed in RCW
46.96.050(3).
(10) This section does not preclude the owner of a new motor
vehicle dealer franchise from designating any person as his or her
successor by a written, notarized, and witnessed instrument filed with
the manufacturer. In the event of a conflict between such a written
instrument that has not been revoked by written notice from the owner
to the manufacturer and this section, the written instrument governs.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.96.185 and 2003 c 21 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding the terms of a franchise agreement, a
manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory representative,
or an agent, officer, parent company, wholly or partially owned
subsidiary, affiliated entity, or other person controlled by or under
common control with a manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or
factory representative, shall not:
(a) Discriminate between new motor vehicle dealers by selling or
offering to sell a like vehicle to one dealer at a lower actual price
than the actual price offered to another dealer for the same model
similarly equipped;
(b) Discriminate between new motor vehicle dealers by selling or
offering to sell parts or accessories to one dealer at a lower actual
price than the actual price offered to another dealer;
(c) Discriminate between new motor vehicle dealers by using a
promotion plan, marketing plan, or other similar device that results in
a lower actual price on vehicles, parts, or accessories being charged
to one dealer over another dealer;
(d) Discriminate between new motor vehicle dealers by adopting a
method, or changing an existing method, for the allocation, scheduling,
or delivery of new motor vehicles, parts, or accessories to its dealers
that is not fair, reasonable, and equitable. Upon the request of a
dealer, a manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory
representative shall disclose in writing to the dealer the method by
which new motor vehicles, parts, and accessories are allocated,
scheduled, or delivered to its dealers handling the same line or make
of vehicles;
(e) Discriminate against a new motor vehicle dealer by preventing,
offsetting, or otherwise impairing the dealer's right to request a
documentary service fee on affinity or similar program purchases. This
prohibition applies to, but is not limited to, any promotion plan,
marketing plan, manufacturer or dealer employee or employee friends or
family purchase programs, or similar plans or programs;
(f) Give preferential treatment to some new motor vehicle dealers
over others by refusing or failing to deliver, in reasonable quantities
and within a reasonable time after receipt of an order, to a dealer
holding a franchise for a line or make of motor vehicles sold or
distributed by the manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or
factory representative, a new vehicle, parts, or accessories, if the
vehicle, parts, or accessories are being delivered to other dealers, or
require a dealer to purchase unreasonable advertising displays or other
materials, or unreasonably require a dealer to remodel or renovate
existing facilities as a prerequisite to receiving a model or series of
vehicles;
(((f))) (g) Compete with a new motor vehicle dealer of any make or
line by acting in the capacity of a new motor vehicle dealer, or by
owning, operating, or controlling, whether directly or indirectly, a
motor vehicle dealership in this state. It is not, however, a
violation of this subsection for:
(i) A manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory
representative to own or operate a dealership for a temporary period,
not to exceed two years, during the transition from one owner of the
dealership to another where the dealership was previously owned by a
franchised dealer and is currently for sale to any qualified
independent person at a fair and reasonable price. The temporary
operation may be extended for one twelve-month period on petition of
the temporary operator to the department. The matter will be handled
as an adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW. A dealer who is
a franchisee of the petitioning manufacturer or distributor may
intervene and participate in a proceeding under this subsection
(1)(((f))) (g)(i). The temporary operator has the burden of proof to
show justification for the extension and a good faith effort to sell
the dealership to an independent person at a fair and reasonable price;
(ii) A manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory
representative to own or operate a dealership in conjunction with an
independent person in a bona fide business relationship for the purpose
of broadening the diversity of its dealer body and enhancing
opportunities for qualified persons who are part of a group who have
historically been underrepresented in its dealer body, or other
qualified persons who lack the resources to purchase a dealership
outright, and where the independent person: (A) Has made, or within a
period of two years from the date of commencement of operation will
have made, a significant, bona fide capital investment in the
dealership that is subject to loss; (B) has an ownership interest in
the dealership; and (C) operates the dealership under a bona fide
written agreement with the manufacturer, distributor, factory branch,
or factory representative under which he or she will acquire all of the
ownership interest in the dealership within a reasonable period of time
and under reasonable terms and conditions. The manufacturer,
distributor, factory branch, or factory representative has the burden
of proof of establishing that the acquisition of the dealership by the
independent person was made within a reasonable period of time and
under reasonable terms and conditions. Nothing in this subsection
(1)(((f))) (g)(ii) relieves a manufacturer, distributor, factory
branch, or factory representative from complying with ((RCW
46.96.185(1))) (a) through (((e))) (f) of this subsection;
(iii) A manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory
representative to own or operate a dealership in conjunction with an
independent person in a bona fide business relationship where the
independent person: (A) Has made, or within a period of two years from
the date of commencement of operation will have made, a significant,
bona fide capital investment in the dealership that is subject to loss;
(B) has an ownership interest in the dealership; and (C) operates the
dealership under a bona fide written agreement with the manufacturer,
distributor, factory branch, or factory representative under which he
or she will acquire all of the ownership interest in the dealership
within a reasonable period of time and under reasonable terms and
conditions. The manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory
representative has the burden of proof of establishing that the
acquisition of the dealership by the independent person was made within
a reasonable period of time and under reasonable terms and conditions.
The number of dealerships operated under this subsection (1)(((f)))
(g)(iii) may not exceed four percent rounded up to the nearest whole
number of a manufacturer's total of new motor vehicle dealer franchises
in this state. Nothing in this subsection (1)(((f))) (g)(iii) relieves
a manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory representative
from complying with ((RCW 46.96.185(1))) (a) through (((e))) (f) of
this subsection;
(iv) A truck manufacturer to own, operate, or control a new motor
vehicle dealership that sells only trucks of that manufacturer's line
make with a gross vehicle weight rating of 12,500 pounds or more, and
the truck manufacturer has been continuously engaged in the retail sale
of the trucks at least since January 1, 1993; or
(v) A manufacturer to own, operate, or control a new motor vehicle
dealership trading exclusively in a single line make of the
manufacturer if (A) the manufacturer does not own, directly or
indirectly, in the aggregate, in excess of forty-five percent of the
total ownership interest in the dealership, (B) at the time the
manufacturer first acquires ownership or assumes operation or control
of any such dealership, the distance between any dealership thus owned,
operated, or controlled and the nearest new motor vehicle dealership
trading in the same line make of vehicle and in which the manufacturer
has no ownership or control is not less than fifteen miles and complies
with the applicable provisions in the relevant market area sections of
this chapter, (C) all of the manufacturer's franchise agreements confer
rights on the dealer of that line make to develop and operate within a
defined geographic territory or area, as many dealership facilities as
the dealer and the manufacturer agree are appropriate, and (D) as of
January 1, 2000, the manufacturer had no more than four new motor
vehicle dealers of that manufacturer's line make in this state, and at
least half of those dealers owned and operated two or more dealership
facilities in the geographic territory or area covered by their
franchise agreements with the manufacturer;
(((g))) (h) Compete with a new motor vehicle dealer by owning,
operating, or controlling, whether directly or indirectly, a service
facility in this state for the repair or maintenance of motor vehicles
under the manufacturer's new car warranty and extended warranty.
Nothing in this subsection (1)(((g))) (h), however, prohibits a
manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory representative
from owning or operating a service facility for the purpose of
providing or performing maintenance, repair, or service work on motor
vehicles that are owned by the manufacturer, distributor, factory
branch, or factory representative;
(((h))) (i) Use confidential or proprietary information obtained
from a new motor vehicle dealer to unfairly compete with the dealer.
For purposes of this subsection (1)(((h))) (i), "confidential or
proprietary information" means trade secrets as defined in RCW
19.108.010, business plans, marketing plans or strategies, customer
lists, contracts, sales data, revenues, or other financial information;
(((i))) (j) Terminate, cancel, or fail to renew a franchise with a
new motor vehicle dealer based upon any of the following events, which
do not constitute good cause for termination, cancellation, or
nonrenewal under RCW 46.96.060: (A) The fact that the new motor
vehicle dealer owns, has an investment in, participates in the
management of, or holds a franchise agreement for the sale or service
of another make or line of new motor vehicles((, or)); (B) the fact
that the new motor vehicle dealer has established another make or line
of new motor vehicles or service in the same dealership facilities as
those of the manufacturer or distributor ((with the prior written
approval of the manufacturer or distributor, if the approval was
required under the terms of the new motor vehicle dealer's franchise
agreement)); (C) that the new motor vehicle dealer has or intends to
relocate the manufacturer or distributor's make or line of new motor
vehicles or service to an existing dealership facility that is within
the relevant market area, as defined in RCW 46.96.140, of the make or
line to be relocated, except that, in any nonemergency circumstance,
the dealer must give the manufacturer or distributor at least sixty
days' notice of his or her intent to relocate; or (D) the failure of a
franchisee to change the location of the dealership or to make
substantial alterations to the use or number of franchises on the
dealership premises or facilities; ((or
(j))) (k) Coerce or attempt to coerce a motor vehicle dealer to
refrain from, or prohibit or attempt to prohibit a new motor vehicle
dealer from acquiring, owning, having an investment in, participating
in the management of, or holding a franchise agreement for the sale or
service of another make or line of new motor vehicles or related
products, or establishing another make or line of new motor vehicles or
service in the same dealership facilities, if the prohibition against
acquiring, owning, investing, managing, or holding a franchise for such
additional make or line of vehicles or products, or establishing
another make or line of new motor vehicles or service in the same
dealership facilities, is not supported by reasonable business
considerations. The burden of proving that reasonable business
considerations support or justify the prohibition against the
additional make or line of new motor vehicles or products or
nonexclusive facilities is on the manufacturer;
(l) Require, by contract or otherwise, a new motor vehicle dealer
to make a material alteration, expansion, or addition to any dealership
facility, unless the required alteration, expansion, or addition is
uniformly required of other similarly situated new motor vehicle
dealers of the same make or line of vehicles and is reasonable in light
of all existing circumstances, including economic conditions. In any
proceeding in which a required facility alteration, expansion, or
addition is an issue, the manufacturer or distributor has the burden of
proof;
(m) Prevent or attempt to prevent by contract or otherwise any new
motor vehicle dealer from changing the executive management of a new
motor vehicle dealer unless the manufacturer or distributor, having the
burden of proof, can show that a proposed change of executive
management will result in executive management by a person or persons
who are not of good moral character or who do not meet reasonable,
preexisting, and equitably applied standards of the manufacturer or
distributor. If a manufacturer or distributor rejects a proposed
change in the executive management, the manufacturer or distributor
shall give written notice of its reasons to the dealer within sixty
days after receiving written notice from the dealer of the proposed
change and all related information reasonably requested by the
manufacturer or distributor, or the change in executive management must
be considered approved; or
(n) Condition the sale, transfer, relocation, or renewal of a
franchise agreement or condition manufacturer, distributor, factory
branch, or factory representative sales, services, or parts incentives
upon the manufacturer obtaining site control, including rights to
purchase or lease the dealer's facility, or an agreement to make
improvements or substantial renovations to a facility. For purposes of
this section, a substantial renovation has a gross cost to the dealer
in excess of five thousand dollars.
(2) Subsection (1)(a), (b), and (c) of this section do not apply to
sales to a motor vehicle dealer: (a) For resale to a federal, state,
or local government agency; (b) where the vehicles will be sold or
donated for use in a program of driver's education; (c) where the sale
is made under a manufacturer's bona fide promotional program offering
sales incentives or rebates; (d) where the sale of parts or accessories
is under a manufacturer's bona fide quantity discount program; or (e)
where the sale is made under a manufacturer's bona fide fleet vehicle
discount program. For purposes of this subsection, "fleet" means a
group of fifteen or more new motor vehicles purchased or leased by a
dealer at one time under a single purchase or lease agreement for use
as part of a fleet, and where the dealer has been assigned a fleet
identifier code by the department of licensing.
(3) The following definitions apply to this section:
(a) "Actual price" means the price to be paid by the dealer less
any incentive paid by the manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or
factory representative, whether paid to the dealer or the ultimate
purchaser of the vehicle.
(b) "Control" or "controlling" means (i) the possession of, title
to, or control of ten percent or more of the voting equity interest in
a person, whether directly or indirectly through a fiduciary, agent, or
other intermediary, or (ii) the possession, direct or indirect, of the
power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of
a person, whether through the ownership of voting securities, through
director control, by contract, or otherwise, except as expressly
provided under the franchise agreement.
(c) "Motor vehicles" does not include trucks that are 14,001 pounds
gross vehicle weight and above or recreational vehicles as defined in
RCW 43.22.335.
(d) "Operate" means to manage a dealership, whether directly or
indirectly.
(e) "Own" or "ownership" means to hold the beneficial ownership of
one percent or more of any class of equity interest in a dealership,
whether the interest is that of a shareholder, partner, limited
liability company member, or otherwise. To hold an ownership interest
means to have possession of, title to, or control of the ownership
interest, whether directly or indirectly through a fiduciary, agent, or
other intermediary.
(4) A violation of this section is deemed to affect the public
interest and constitutes an unlawful and unfair practice under chapter
19.86 RCW. A person aggrieved by an alleged violation of this section
may petition the department to have the matter handled as an
adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 7 RCW 46.96.200 and 1994 c 274 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding the terms of a franchise, a manufacturer shall
not ((unreasonably)) withhold consent to the sale, transfer, or
exchange of a franchise to a qualified buyer who meets the normal,
reasonable, and uniformly applied standards established by the
manufacturer for the appointment of a new dealer who does not already
hold a franchise with the manufacturer or is capable of being licensed
as a new motor vehicle dealer in the state of Washington. A decision
or determination made by the administrative law judge as to whether a
qualified buyer is capable of being licensed as a new motor vehicle
dealer in the state of Washington is not conclusive or determinative of
any ultimate determination made by the department of licensing as to
the buyer's qualification for a motor vehicle dealer license. A
manufacturer's failure to respond in writing to a request for consent
under this subsection within sixty days after receipt of a written
request on the forms, if any, generally used by the manufacturer
containing the information and reasonable promises required by a
manufacturer is deemed to be consent to the request. A manufacturer
may request, and, if so requested, the applicant for a franchise (a)
shall promptly provide such personal and financial information as is
reasonably necessary to determine whether the sale, transfer, or
exchange should be approved, and (b) shall agree to be bound by all
reasonable terms and conditions of the franchise.
(2) If a manufacturer refuses to approve the sale, transfer, or
exchange of a franchise, the manufacturer shall serve written notice on
the applicant, the transferring, selling, or exchanging new motor
vehicle dealer, and the department of its refusal to approve the
transfer of the franchise no later than sixty days after the date the
manufacturer receives the written request from the new motor vehicle
dealer. If the manufacturer has requested personal or financial
information from the applicant under subsection (1) of this section,
the notice shall be served not later than sixty days after the receipt
of all of such documents. Service of all notices under this section
shall be made by personal service or by certified mail, return receipt
requested.
(3) The notice in subsection (2) of this section shall state the
specific grounds for the refusal to approve the sale, transfer, or
exchange of the franchise.
(4) Within twenty days after receipt of the notice of refusal to
approve the sale, transfer, or exchange of the franchise by the
transferring new motor vehicle dealer, the new motor vehicle dealer may
file a petition with the department to protest the refusal to approve
the sale, transfer, or exchange. The petition shall contain a short
statement setting forth the reasons for the dealer's protest. Upon the
filing of a protest and the receipt of the filing fee, the department
shall promptly notify the manufacturer that a timely protest has been
filed, and the department shall arrange for a hearing with an
administrative law judge as the presiding officer to determine if the
manufacturer unreasonably withheld consent to the sale, transfer, or
exchange of the franchise.
(5) ((In determining whether the manufacturer unreasonably withheld
its approval to the sale, transfer, or exchange, the manufacturer has
the burden of proof that it acted reasonably. A manufacturer's refusal
to accept or approve a proposed buyer who otherwise meets the normal,
reasonable, and uniformly applied standards established by the
manufacturer for the appointment of a new dealer, or who otherwise is
capable of being licensed as a new motor vehicle dealer in the state of
Washington, is presumed to be unreasonable.
(6))) The administrative law judge shall conduct a hearing and
render a final decision as expeditiously as possible, but in any event
not later than one hundred twenty days after a protest is filed. Only
the selling, transferring, or exchanging new motor vehicle dealer and
the manufacturer may be parties to the hearing.
(((7))) (6) The administrative law judge shall conduct any hearing
as provided in RCW 46.96.050(2), and all hearing costs shall be borne
as provided in that subsection. Only the manufacturer and the selling,
transferring, or exchanging new motor vehicle dealer may appeal the
final order of the administrative law judge as provided in RCW
46.96.050(3).
(((8))) (7) This section and RCW 46.96.030 through 46.96.110 apply
to all franchises and contracts existing on July 23, 1989, between
manufacturers and new motor vehicle dealers as well as to all future
franchises and contracts between manufacturers and new motor vehicle
dealers.
(((9))) (8) RCW 46.96.140 through 46.96.190 apply to all franchises
and contracts existing on October 1, 1994, between manufacturers and
new motor vehicle dealers as well as to all future franchises and
contracts between manufacturers and new motor vehicle dealers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 46.96 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In the event of a termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal
under this chapter, except for a termination, cancellation, or
nonrenewal under RCW 46.96.070(2), or a voluntary termination,
cancellation, or nonrenewal initiated by the dealer, the manufacturer
shall, at the request and option of the new motor vehicle dealer, also
pay to the new motor vehicle dealer the fair market value of the motor
vehicle dealer's goodwill for the make or line as of the date
immediately preceding any communication to the public or dealer
regarding termination. To the extent the franchise agreement provides
for the payment or reimbursement to the new motor vehicle dealer in
excess of the value specified in this section, the provisions of the
franchise agreement control.
(2) The manufacturer shall pay the new motor vehicle dealer the
value specified in subsection (1) of this section within ninety days
after the date of termination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 46.96 RCW
to read as follows:
A manufacturer shall, upon demand, indemnify and hold harmless any
existing or former franchisee and the franchisee's successors and
assigns from any and all damages sustained and attorneys' fees and
other expenses reasonably incurred by the franchisee that result from
or relate to any claim made or asserted by a third party against the
franchisee to the extent the claim results from any of the following:
(1) The condition, characteristics, manufacture, assembly, or
design of any vehicle, parts, accessories, tools, or equipment, or the
selection or combination of parts or components manufactured or
distributed by the manufacturer or distributor;
(2) Service systems, procedures, or methods that the franchisor
required or recommended the franchisee to use;
(3) Improper use by the manufacturer, its assignees, contractors,
representatives, or licensees of nonpublic personal information
obtained from a franchisee concerning any consumer, customer, or
employee of the franchisee; or
(4) Any act or omission of the manufacturer or distributor for
which the franchisee would have a claim for contribution or indemnity
under applicable law or under the franchise, irrespective of any prior
termination or expiration of the franchise.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 46.96 RCW
to read as follows:
A manufacturer may not take or threaten to take any adverse action
against a new motor vehicle dealer, including charge backs, reducing
vehicle allocations, or terminating or threatening to terminate a
franchise, because the dealer sold or leased a vehicle to a customer
who exported the vehicle to a foreign country or who resold the
vehicle, unless the manufacturer or distributor definitively proves
that the dealer knew or reasonably should have known that the customer
intended to export or resell the vehicle. A manufacturer or
distributor shall, upon demand, indemnify, hold harmless, and defend
any existing or former franchisee or franchisee's successors or assigns
from any and all claims asserted, or damages sustained and attorneys'
fees and other expenses reasonably incurred by the franchisee that
result from or relate to any claim made or asserted, by a third party
against the franchisee for any policy, program, or other behavior
suggested by the manufacturer for sales of vehicles to parties that
intend to export a vehicle purchased from the franchisee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 46.96 RCW
to read as follows:
A new motor vehicle dealer who is injured in his or her business or
property by a violation of this chapter may bring a civil action in the
superior court to recover the actual damages sustained by the dealer,
together with the costs of the suit, including reasonable attorneys'
fees if the new motor vehicle dealer prevails. The new motor vehicle
dealer may bring a civil action in district court to recover his or her
actual damages, except for damages that exceed the amount specified in
RCW 3.66.020, and the costs of the suit, including reasonable
attorneys' fees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 46.96 RCW
to read as follows:
A manufacturer or distributor shall not enter into an agreement or
understanding with a new motor vehicle dealer that requires the dealer
to waive any provisions of this chapter. However, a dealer may, by
written contract and for valuable and reasonable separate
consideration, waive, limit, or disclaim a manufacturer's obligations
or a dealer's rights under RCW 46.96.080, 46.96.090, 46.96.105,
46.96.140, and 46.96.150, if the contract sets forth the specific
provisions of this chapter that are waived, limited, or disclaimed. A
manufacturer shall not coerce, threaten, intimidate, or require a new
motor vehicle dealer, as a condition to granting or renewing a
franchise, to enter into such an agreement or understanding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---