BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature acknowledges that many
individuals living on improved property outside a fire protection
jurisdiction lack fire protection services. Accordingly, it is the
intent of the legislature to facilitate the provision of firefighting
services, to the maximum extent practicable, to areas outside a fire
protection jurisdiction by: (1) Coordinating firefighting services
among the various fire protection service agencies throughout the
state; (2) enabling cost recovery by fire protection service agencies;
and (3) clarifying that a fire protection service agency faces no
greater legal liability for providing firefighting services in areas
outside its jurisdictional boundaries than it would for providing
services within such boundaries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of natural resources.
(2) "Fire protection jurisdiction" means an area or property
located within a fire protection district, a regional fire protection
service authority, a city, a town, a port district, lands subject to
the jurisdiction of the department, or on federal lands.
(3) "Fire protection service agency" or "agency" means any
governmental entity responsible for the provision of firefighting
services, including fire protection districts, regional fire protection
service authorities, cities, towns, port districts, and the department.
(4) "Firefighting services" means the provision of fire prevention
services, fire suppression services, emergency medical services, and
other services related to the protection of life and property.
(5) "Improved property" means property upon which a structure is
located, but does not include roads, bridges, land devoted primarily to
growing and harvesting timber, or land devoted primarily to the
production of livestock or agricultural commodities for commercial
purposes.
(6) "Property" means land, structures, or land and structures.
(7) "Unimproved property" has the same meaning as "unimproved
lands" as in RCW 76.04.005(17).
(8) "Unprotected land" means improved property located outside a
fire protection jurisdiction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) In order to facilitate the provision of
firefighting services to unprotected lands, property owners are
encouraged to either form a fire protection district or enter into an
agreement with a fire protection service agency for the provision of
firefighting services on such unprotected lands. Any agreement between
a property owner and a fire protection service agency must include a
risk assessment of the property as well as a capabilities assessment
for the agency.
(2) An owner of property within unprotected land, who chooses to
neither form a fire protection district nor enter into an agreement
with a fire protection service agency for the provision of firefighting
services, is presumed to do so willingly and with full knowledge that
no agency is obligated to provide firefighting services to such land.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) In the absence of an agreement for the
provision of firefighting services between a fire protection service
agency and the owner of property on unprotected land, an agency may
nevertheless choose to provide firefighting services to property
located on such unprotected land.
(2) If a fire protection service agency or its employees provide
firefighting services outside of its jurisdictional boundaries, neither
the agency nor its employees are liable for civil damages resulting
from any act or omission in the rendering of such services, other than
acts or omissions constituting gross negligence or willful or wanton
misconduct.
(3) In the absence of an agreement with the owner of property on
unprotected land, a fire protection service agency is not liable for
failing to provide firefighting services to such unprotected land.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If, in the absence of an agreement with an
owner of property on unprotected land, firefighting services are
nevertheless provided to such land by a fire protection service agency,
the responding agency is entitled to recover reasonable costs incurred
in rendering such services. Such cost recovery is to be based upon a
standardized fee schedule designed to reimburse the service provider.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The provision of any firefighting
services to improved property on unprotected land by the department
must be in accordance with the provisions of chapter 76.04 RCW and the
provisions of this chapter.
(2) The department is not required to provide firefighting services
to buildings, structures, or other improvements on improved property
within unprotected lands.
(3) The department has discretionary authority to take actions that
may prevent approaching wildfire from damaging homes or other
improvements.
(4) The department may adopt rules necessary to implement this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The provisions of this chapter do not apply
to tribal trust lands located in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 52 RCW.

--- END ---