BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Notwithstanding the provisions of any other
law or ordinance, the legislative authority of a county or municipality
may, by ordinance, to protect the public health, safety, and welfare of
the residents of the county or municipality, adopt procedures pursuant
to which a public agency may file a nuisance action in superior court
to seek any or all of the forms of relief detailed in this chapter.
The legislative authority of a county or municipality may further
authorize and adopt rules providing for a nuisance action instituted by
a person who resides, works in, or owns property in the same
multifamily building or apartment complex or within a one-block radius
of the property where the nuisance is alleged to exist. A nuisance
action instituted by a person may only be brought against a building or
a unit within a building as defined in section 2 of this act. A
nuisance action authorized under this section is subject to the
provisions set forth in sections 2 through 14 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Building" includes, but is not limited to, any structure or
separate part or portion thereof, whether permanent or not, or the
ground itself.
(2) "Criminal street gang activity" means a pattern of criminal
street gang activity as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.
(3) "Criminal street gang associate or member" and "criminal street
gang-related offense" have the meaning prescribed in RCW 9.94A.030.
(4) "Public agency" includes a county, city, town, municipal
corporation, and an office, department, division, or agency thereof.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 An ordinance may authorize a nuisance action
providing for a restraining order, preliminary injunction, or permanent
injunction against a specific criminal street gang associate or member
to enjoin his or her activity that is associated with any criminal
street gang activity or any criminal street gang-related offense and
that is occurring within the county or municipality.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 An ordinance may authorize a nuisance action
providing for a restraining order, preliminary injunction, or order of
abatement against any building or unit within a building used for the
purpose of aiding, promoting, or conducting criminal street gang
activity. In a multiunit building, only the offending unit shall be
declared a nuisance, and only the offending unit shall be enjoined,
abated, and prevented. Nothing in this chapter applies to property
used for the purpose of, or activity involved in, providing health
services, food and financial assistance, treatment, counseling,
training, religious services, education, civic involvement, or any
social service or charitable assistance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Upon application for a temporary
restraining order or preliminary injunction, the court may, upon a
showing of good cause, (a) issue an ex parte restraining order or
preliminary injunction, preventing the defendant and all other persons,
other than the legal owner, from removing or in any manner interfering
with the personal property and contents of the place where the nuisance
is alleged to exist, and (b) grant preliminary equitable relief as is
necessary to prevent the continuance or recurrence of the nuisance
pending final resolution of the matter on the merits. Such ex parte
restraining order or preliminary injunction may remain in effect no
more than fifteen days from the date of issuance, except as provided in
section 7 of this act.
(2) The restraining order or preliminary injunction issued under
subsection (1) of this section in an action under section 3 of this act
must be served on the defendant personally, or by leaving a copy at the
dwelling house or usual place of abode of the defendant with any person
of suitable age and discretion residing therein. Where such a person
cannot with reasonable diligence be served as described, the
restraining order or preliminary injunction may be served by posting a
copy in a conspicuous place at the dwelling house or usual place of
abode of the defendant and thereafter mailing a copy by registered mail
to the defendant at his or her usual mailing address.
(3) The restraining order or preliminary injunction issued under
subsection (1) of this section in an action under section 4 of this act
must be served on the occupant and the owner of the building or unit
personally, or by leaving a copy with any person of suitable age and
discretion who is in charge of the property or who is residing at the
property. Where such a person cannot with reasonable diligence be
served as described, the restraining order or preliminary injunction
may be served by posting a copy in a conspicuous place on the property
and thereafter mailing a copy by registered mail to the person to be
served at his or her usual mailing address. Additionally, a copy of
the restraining order or preliminary injunction must be sent by
registered mail to the owner of the building.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 An action under this chapter shall have
precedence over all other actions, except prior matters of the same
character, actions under chapter 7.43 RCW, criminal proceedings,
election contests, hearings on temporary restraining orders and
injunctions, child dependency hearings, foreclosures by a legal owner,
actions to forfeit vehicles used in violation of the uniform controlled
substances act, and any other case determined to be a priority by
statute or by the court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A copy of the complaint, together with a
notice of the time and place of the hearing of the action, shall be
served upon the defendant at least six business days before the
hearing, and as provided for in section 5 of this act. If the hearing
is then continued at the request of any defendant, all temporary orders
and injunctions shall be extended as a matter of course.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, (a) if the existence of the nuisance under section 3 of
this act is established in the action, a permanent injunction must be
entered as part of the final judgment in the case, and (b) if the
existence of the nuisance under section 4 of this act is established in
the action, an order of abatement must be entered as part of the final
judgment in the case. The plaintiff's costs in the action, including
those of abatement, are a lien upon the building or unit within a
building to the extent of the owner's interest. The lien must be filed
as a judgment summary stating the name of the owner and the legal
description of the real property. The lien must be recorded and
enforced as a judgment summary.
(2) If the court finds and concludes that the owner of the building
or unit within a building:
(a) Had no knowledge of the existence of the nuisance or has been
making reasonable efforts to abate the nuisance;
(b) Has not been guilty of any contempt of court in the
proceedings; and
(c) Will immediately abate any such nuisance that may exist at the
building or unit within a building and prevent it from being a nuisance
for a period of one year thereafter, the court shall, if satisfied with
the owner's good faith, order the building or unit within a building to
be delivered to the owner, and no order of abatement shall be entered.
If an order of abatement has been entered and the owner subsequently
meets the requirements of this subsection, the order of abatement shall
be canceled.
(3) For the purposes of determining whether the owner of the
building or unit within a building made reasonable efforts to abate the
nuisance, the court shall consider such factors as whether the owner:
(a) Terminated or attempted to terminate the tenancy or lease of a
tenant or leaseholder where the nuisance is occurring, if the tenant or
leaseholder is involved in the criminal street gang activity;
(b) Placed restrictions on the rental agreement or lease;
(c) Adopted feasible measures on the property to try to prevent the
criminal street gang activity;
(d) Cooperated with law enforcement to attempt to stop the criminal
street gang activity; and
(e) Made other efforts the court finds relevant.
(4) In an action filed under section 4 of this act, if the court
finds there is insufficient evidence to establish the existence of the
nuisance, the court may order the person who filed the complaint to pay
the owner reasonable attorneys' fees and costs to defend the action,
any loss of rent or revenue experienced as a result of the action,
restraining order, or preliminary injunction, and damages up to five
hundred dollars each.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Any final order of abatement issued under
this chapter must:
(1) If the building or unit is not subject to the interests of
innocent legal owners, provide for the immediate closure of the
building or unit within a building against its use for any purpose, and
for keeping it closed for a period of one year unless released sooner
as provided in this chapter;
(2) State that while the order of abatement remains in effect, the
building or unit within a building shall remain in the custody of the
court; and
(3) Authorize a law enforcement officer to enter the building or
unit within a building to create an inventory of the personal property
and contents located in the building or unit within a building for
submission to the court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 An intentional violation of a restraining
order, preliminary injunction, permanent injunction, or order of
abatement in an action brought by a public agency under this chapter is
a misdemeanor and shall be punishable as such. If the violation also
constitutes a criminal offense under another provision of the law, the
violation may be prosecuted pursuant to this section or the other
provision of law, or both.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Whenever the owner of a building or unit
within a building upon which the act or acts constituting the contempt
have been committed, or the owner of any interest in the building or
unit has been found in contempt of court, and fined in any proceedings
under this chapter, the fine is a lien upon the building or unit within
a building to the extent of the owner's interest. The lien must be
filed as a judgment summary stating the name of the owner and the legal
description of the real property. The lien must be recorded and
enforced as a judgment summary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 An action may not be brought pursuant to
this section against any governmental entity or any charitable or
nonprofit organization that is conducting, with ordinary care and
skill, activities relating to prevention or education concerning
criminal street gangs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The abatement of a nuisance under this
chapter does not prejudice the right of any person to recover damages
for its past existence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Sections 1 through 14 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 9 RCW.

--- END ---