BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Association" means the Washington vaccine association.
(2) "Covered lives" means all persons under the age of nineteen in
Washington state who are:
(a) Covered under an individual or group health benefit plan issued
or delivered in Washington state or an individual or group health
benefit plan that otherwise provides benefits to Washington residents;
or
(b) Enrolled in a group health benefit plan administered by a
third-party administrator. Persons under the age of nineteen for whom
federal funding is used to purchase vaccines or who are enrolled in
state purchased health care programs covering low-income children
including, but not limited to, apple health for kids under RCW
74.09.470 and the basic health plan under chapter 70.47 RCW are not
considered "covered lives" under this chapter.
(3) "Estimated vaccine cost" means the estimated cost to the state
over the course of a state fiscal year for the purchase and
distribution of vaccines purchased at the federal discount rate by the
department of health.
(4) "Health benefit plan" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
48.43.005.
(5) "Health carrier" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
48.43.005.
(6) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health.
(7) "State supplied vaccine" means vaccine purchased by the state
department of health for covered lives for whom the state is purchasing
vaccine using state funds raised via assessments on health carriers and
third-party administrators as provided in this chapter.
(8) "Third-party administrator" means any person or entity who, on
behalf of a health insurer or health care purchaser, receives or
collects charges, contributions, or premiums for, or adjusts or settles
claims on or for, residents of Washington state or Washington health
care providers and facilities.
(9) "Total nonfederal program cost" means the estimated vaccine
cost less the amount of federal revenue available to the state for the
purchase and distribution of vaccines.
(10) "Vaccine" means a preparation of killed or attenuated living
microorganisms, or fraction thereof, that upon administration
stimulates immunity that protects against disease and is approved by
the federal food and drug administration as safe and effective and
recommended by the advisory committee on immunization practices of the
centers for disease control and prevention for administration to
children under the age of nineteen years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 There is created a nonprofit corporation to
be known as the Washington vaccine association. The association is
formed for the primary purpose of collecting and remitting adequate
funds from health carriers and third-party administrators for the cost
of vaccines provided to certain children in Washington state. The
association may also undertake other activities in support of a broader
private/public initiative to protect Washington's children from the
effects of preventable infectious diseases through increasing
immunization rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The association is comprised of all
health carriers issuing or renewing health benefit plans in Washington
state and all third-party administrators conducting business on behalf
of residents of Washington state or Washington health care providers
and facilities. Third-party administrators are subject to registration
under section 9 of this act.
(2) The association is a nonprofit corporation under chapter 24.03
RCW and has the powers granted under that chapter.
(3) The board of directors includes the following voting members:
(a) Four members, selected from health carriers or third-party
administrators, excluding health maintenance organizations, that have
the most fully insured and self-funded covered lives in Washington
state. The count of total covered lives includes enrollment in all
companies included in their holding company system. Each health
carrier or third-party administrator is entitled to no more than a
single position on the board to represent all entities under common
ownership or control.
(b) One member selected from the health maintenance organization
having the most fully insured and self-insured covered lives in
Washington state. The count of total lives includes enrollment in all
companies included in its holding company system. Each health
maintenance organization is entitled to no more than a single position
on the board to represent all entities under common ownership or
control.
(c) One member, representing health carriers not otherwise
represented on the board under (a) or (b) of this subsection, who is
elected from among the health carrier members not designated under (a)
or (b) of this subsection.
(d) One member, representing Taft Hartley plans, and one member
representing Washington state employers offering self-funded health
coverage, appointed by the secretary from a list of nominees submitted
by the Puget Sound health alliance.
(e) Two physician members appointed by the secretary, including at
least one board certified pediatrician.
(f) The secretary, or a designee of the secretary with expertise in
childhood immunization purchasing and distribution.
(4) The directors' terms and appointments must be specified in the
plan of operation adopted by the association.
(5) The board of directors of the association shall:
(a) Prepare and adopt articles of association and bylaws;
(b) Prepare and adopt a plan of operation;
(c) Submit the plan of operation to the secretary for approval;
(d) Conduct all activities in accordance with the approved plan of
operation;
(e) Enter into contracts as necessary or proper to collect and
disburse the assessment;
(f) Enter into contracts as necessary or proper to administer the
plan of operation;
(g) Sue or be sued, including taking any legal action necessary or
proper for the recovery of any assessment for, on behalf of, or against
members of the association or other participating person;
(h) Appoint, from among its directors, committees as necessary to
provide technical assistance in the operation of the association,
including the hiring of independent consultants as necessary;
(i) Obtain such liability and other insurance coverage for the
benefit of the association, its directors, officers, employees, and
agents as may in the judgment of the board of directors be helpful or
necessary for the operation of the association;
(j) By May 1, 2010, establish the estimated amount of the
assessment needed for the period of May 1, 2010, through December 31,
2010, based upon the estimate provided to the association under section
4(1) of this act; and notify, in writing, each health carrier and
third-party administrator of the health carrier's or third-party
administrator's total assessment for this period by May 15, 2010;
(k) On an annual basis, beginning no later than November 1, 2010,
and by November 1st of each year thereafter, establish the estimated
amount of the assessment;
(l) Notify, in writing, each health carrier and third-party
administrator of the health carrier's or third-party administrator's
estimated total assessment by November 15th of each year;
(m) Submit a periodic report to the secretary listing those health
carriers or third-party administrators that failed to remit their
assessments and audit health carrier and third-party administrator
books and records for accuracy of assessment payment submission;
(n) Allow each health carrier or third-party administrator no more
than ninety days after the notification required by (l) of this
subsection to remit any amounts in arrears or submit a payment plan,
subject to approval by the association and initial payment under an
approved payment plan;
(o) Deposit annual assessments collected by the association, less
the association's administrative costs, with the state treasurer to the
credit of the universal vaccine purchase account established in RCW
43.70.720;
(p) Borrow and repay such working capital, reserve, or other funds
as, in the judgment of the board of directors, may be helpful or
necessary for the operation of the association; and
(q) Perform any other functions as may be necessary or proper to
carry out the plan of operation and to affect any or all of the
purposes for which the association is organized.
(6) The secretary shall convene the initial meeting of the
association board of directors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The secretary shall estimate the total
nonfederal program cost for the upcoming calendar year by October 1,
2010, and October 1st of each year thereafter. Additionally, the
secretary shall subtract any amounts needed to serve children enrolled
in state purchased health care programs covering low-income children
for whom federal vaccine funding is not available, and report the final
amount to the association. In addition, the secretary shall perform
such calculation for the period of May 1st through December 31st, 2010,
as soon as feasible but in no event later than April 1, 2010. The
estimates shall be timely communicated to the association.
(2) The board of directors of the association shall determine the
method and timing of assessment collection in consultation with the
department of health. The board shall use a formula designed by the
board to ensure the total anticipated nonfederal program cost, minus
costs for other children served through state-purchased health care
programs covering low-income children, calculated under subsection (1)
of this section, is collected and transmitted to the universal vaccine
purchase account created in RCW 43.70.720 in order to ensure adequacy
of state funds to order state-supplied vaccine from federal centers for
disease control and prevention.
(3) Each licensed health carrier and third-party administrator must
be assessed and is required to timely remit payment for its share of
the total amount needed to fund nonfederal program costs calculated by
the department of health. Such an assessment includes additional funds
as determined necessary by the board to cover the reasonable costs for
the association's administration. The board shall determine the
assessment methodology, with the intent of ensuring that the nonfederal
costs are based on actual usage of vaccine for a health carrier or
third-party administrator's covered lives. The board may in addition
provide financial or other incentives for achievement of higher
vaccination rates. State and local governments and school districts
must pay their portion of vaccine expense for covered lives under this
chapter.
(4) The board of the association shall develop a mechanism through
which the number and cost of doses of vaccine purchased under this
chapter that have been administered to children covered by each health
carrier and third-party administrator are attributed to each such
health carrier and third-party administrator. Except as otherwise
permitted by the board, this mechanism must include at least the
following: Date of service; patient name; vaccine received; and health
benefit plan eligibility. The data must be collected and maintained in
a manner consistent with applicable state and federal health
information privacy laws. Beginning November 1, 2011, and each
November 1st thereafter, the board shall factor the results of this
mechanism for the previous year into the determination of the
appropriate assessment amount for each health carrier and third-party
administrator for the upcoming year.
(5) For any year in which the total calculated cost to be received
from association members through assessments is less than the total
nonfederal program cost, the association must pay the difference to the
state for deposit into the universal vaccine purchase account
established in RCW 43.70.720. The board may assess, and the health
carrier and third-party administrators are obligated to pay, their
proportionate share of such costs and appropriate reserves as
determined by the board.
(6) The aggregate amount to be raised by the association in any
year may be reduced by any surpluses remaining from prior years.
(7) In order to generate sufficient start-up funding, the
association may accept prepayment from member health carriers and
third-party administrators, subject to offset of future amounts
otherwise owing or other repayment method as determined by the board.
The initial deposit of start-up funding must be deposited into the
universal vaccine purchase account on or before April 30, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The board of the association shall
establish a committee for the purposes of developing recommendations to
the board regarding selection of vaccines to be purchased in each
upcoming year by the department. The committee must be composed of at
least five voting board members, including at least three health
carrier or third-party administrator members, one physician, and the
secretary or the secretary's designee. The committee must also include
a representative of vaccine manufacturers, who is a nonvoting member of
the committee. The representative of vaccine manufacturers must be
chosen by the secretary from a list of three nominees submitted
collectively by vaccine manufacturers on an annual basis.
(2) In selecting vaccines to purchase, the following factors should
be strongly considered by the committee: Patient safety and clinical
efficacy, public health and purchaser value, patient and provider
choice, and stability of vaccine supply.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 In addition to the duties and powers
enumerated elsewhere in this chapter:
(1) The association may, pursuant to either vote of its board of
directors or request of the secretary, audit compliance by any health
carrier or third-party administrator of any reporting obligations
established under the association's plan of operation. Upon failure of
any health carrier or third-party administrator to reimburse the costs
of such audit as certified by vote of the association's board of
directors within forty-five days of notice of such vote, the secretary
shall assess a civil penalty of one hundred fifty percent of the amount
of such costs.
(2) The association may establish an interest charge for late
payment of any assessment under this chapter. The secretary shall
assess a civil penalty against any health carrier or third-party
administrator that fails to pay an assessment within three months of
notification under section 3 of this act. The civil penalty under this
subsection is one hundred fifty percent of such assessment.
(3) The secretary and the association are authorized to file liens
and seek judgment to recover amounts in arrears and civil penalties,
and recover reasonable collection costs, including reasonable
attorneys' fees and costs. Civil penalties so levied must be deposited
in the universal vaccine purchase account created in RCW 43.70.720.
(4) The secretary may adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as
necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The board of directors of the association
shall submit to the secretary, no later than one hundred twenty days
after the close of the association's fiscal year, a financial report in
a form approved by the secretary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 No liability on the part of, and no cause of
action of any nature, shall arise against any member of the board of
the association, against an employee or agent of the association, or
against any health care provider for any lawful action taken by them in
the performance of their duties or required activities under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 43.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Beginning September 1, 2010, a third-party administrator
must register with the department of licensing and renew its
registration on an annual basis thereafter prior to December 31st of
each year, or within ten days after the registrant changes its name,
business name, business address, or business telephone number,
whichever occurs sooner.
(b) The registrant shall pay the registration or renewal fee
established by the department of licensing as provided in RCW
43.24.086.
(c) Any person or entity that is acting as or holding itself out to
be a third-party administrator while failing to have registered under
this section is subject to a civil penalty of not less than one
thousand dollars nor more than ten thousand dollars for each violation.
The civil penalty is in addition to any other penalties that may be
imposed for violations of other laws of this state.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "third-party administrator"
has the same meaning as defined in section 1 of this act.
(3) The department of licensing may adopt rules under chapter 34.05
RCW as necessary to implement this section.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.70.720 and 2009 c 564 s 934 are each amended to
read as follows:
The universal vaccine purchase account is created in the custody of
the state treasurer. Receipts from public and private sources for the
purpose of increasing access to vaccines for children may be deposited
into the account. Expenditures from the account must be used
exclusively for the purchase of vaccines, at no cost to health care
providers in Washington, to administer to children under nineteen years
old who are not eligible to receive vaccines at no cost through federal
programs. Only the secretary or the secretary's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 8 and 12 through 14 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) The association board may, on or after
June 30, 2015, vote to recommend termination of the association if it
finds that the original intent of its formation and operation, which is
to ensure more cost-effective purchase and distribution of vaccine than
if provided through uncoordinated purchase by health care providers,
has not been achieved. The association board shall provide notice of
the recommendation to the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature within thirty days of the vote being taken by the
association board. If the legislature has not acted by the last day of
the next regular legislative session to reject the board's
recommendation, the board may vote to permanently dissolve the
association.
(2) In the event of a voluntary or involuntary dissolution of the
association, funds remaining in the universal purchase vaccine account
created in RCW 43.70.720 that were collected under this chapter must be
returned to the member health carrier and third-party administrators in
proportion to their previous year's contribution, from any balance
remaining following the repayment of any prepayments for start-up
funding not previously recouped by such member.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Physicians and clinics ordering state
supplied vaccine must ensure they have billing mechanisms and practices
in place that enable the association to accurately track vaccine
delivered to association members' covered lives and must submit
documentation in such a form as may be prescribed by the board in
consultation with state physician organizations. Physicians and other
persons providing childhood immunization are strongly encouraged to use
state supplied vaccine whenever possible. Nothing in this chapter
prohibits health carriers and third-party administrators from denying
claims for vaccine serum costs when the serum or serums providing
similar protection are provided or available via state supplied
vaccine.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 If the requirement that any segment of
health carriers, third-party administrators, or state or local
governmental entities provide funding for the program established in
this chapter is invalidated by a court of competent jurisdiction, the
board of the association may terminate the program one hundred twenty
days following a final judicial determination on the matter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
Assessments paid by carriers under section 4 of this act may be
considered medical expenses for purposes of rate setting and regulatory
filings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to assessments described in sections 3
and 4 of this act received by a nonprofit corporation established under
section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---