BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the fundamental
purposes of the unemployment insurance system are to provide partial
wage replacement to unemployed workers, to provide families and
communities with a degree of economic stability, and to counter the
harmful effects of economic downturns by providing the economy with an
economic stimulus. To that end, the legislature finds that eligibility
requirements, disqualification provisions, and benefit amounts should
be improved to enhance the effects of the unemployment insurance system
on individuals, families, and communities.

Sec. 2 RCW 50.20.050 and 2009 c 493 s 3 and 2009 c 247 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) With respect to claims that have an effective date on or after
January 4, 2004, and ((for)) separations that occur before September 6,
2009:
(a) An individual shall be disqualified from benefits beginning
with the first day of the calendar week in which he or she has left
work voluntarily without good cause and thereafter for seven calendar
weeks and until he or she has obtained bona fide work in employment
covered by this title and earned wages in that employment equal to
seven times his or her weekly benefit amount.
The disqualification shall continue if the work obtained is a mere
sham to qualify for benefits and is not bona fide work. In determining
whether work is of a bona fide nature, the commissioner shall consider
factors including but not limited to the following:
(i) The duration of the work;
(ii) The extent of direction and control by the employer over the
work; and
(iii) The level of skill required for the work in light of the
individual's training and experience.
(b) An individual is not disqualified from benefits under (a) of
this subsection when:
(i) He or she has left work to accept a bona fide offer of bona
fide work as described in (a) of this subsection;
(ii) The separation was necessary because of the illness or
disability of the claimant or the death, illness, or disability of a
member of the claimant's immediate family if:
(A) The claimant pursued all reasonable alternatives to preserve
his or her employment status by requesting a leave of absence, by
having promptly notified the employer of the reason for the absence,
and by having promptly requested reemployment when again able to assume
employment. These alternatives need not be pursued, however, when they
would have been a futile act, including those instances when the
futility of the act was a result of a recognized labor/management
dispatch system; and
(B) The claimant terminated his or her employment status, and is
not entitled to be reinstated to the same position or a comparable or
similar position;
(iii)(A) With respect to claims that have an effective date before
July 2, 2006, he or she: (I) Left work to relocate for the spouse's
employment that, due to a mandatory military transfer: (1) Is outside
the existing labor market area; and (2) is in Washington or another
state that, pursuant to statute, does not consider such an individual
to have left work voluntarily without good cause; and (II) remained
employed as long as was reasonable prior to the move;
(B) With respect to claims that have an effective date on or after
July 2, 2006, he or she: (I) Left work to relocate for the spouse's
employment that, due to a mandatory military transfer, is outside the
existing labor market area; and (II) remained employed as long as was
reasonable prior to the move;
(iv) The separation was necessary to protect the claimant or the
claimant's immediate family members from domestic violence, as defined
in RCW 26.50.010, or stalking, as defined in RCW 9A.46.110;
(v) The individual's usual compensation was reduced by twenty-five
percent or more;
(vi) The individual's usual hours were reduced by twenty-five
percent or more;
(vii) The individual's worksite changed, such change caused a
material increase in distance or difficulty of travel, and, after the
change, the commute was greater than is customary for workers in the
individual's job classification and labor market;
(viii) The individual's worksite safety deteriorated, the
individual reported such safety deterioration to the employer, and the
employer failed to correct the hazards within a reasonable period of
time;
(ix) The individual left work because of illegal activities in the
individual's worksite, the individual reported such activities to the
employer, and the employer failed to end such activities within a
reasonable period of time;
(x) The individual's usual work was changed to work that violates
the individual's religious convictions or sincere moral beliefs; or
(xi) The individual left work to enter an apprenticeship program
approved by the Washington state apprenticeship training council.
Benefits are payable beginning Sunday of the week prior to the week in
which the individual begins active participation in the apprenticeship
program.
(2) With respect to separations that occur on or after September 6,
2009, and before July 4, 2010:
(a) An individual shall be disqualified from benefits beginning
with the first day of the calendar week in which he or she has left
work voluntarily without good cause and thereafter for seven calendar
weeks and until he or she has obtained bona fide work in employment
covered by this title and earned wages in that employment equal to
seven times his or her weekly benefit amount. Good cause reasons to
leave work are limited to reasons listed in (b) of this subsection.
The disqualification shall continue if the work obtained is a mere
sham to qualify for benefits and is not bona fide work. In determining
whether work is of a bona fide nature, the commissioner shall consider
factors including but not limited to the following:
(i) The duration of the work;
(ii) The extent of direction and control by the employer over the
work; and
(iii) The level of skill required for the work in light of the
individual's training and experience.
(b) An individual has good cause and is not disqualified from
benefits under (a) of this subsection only under the following
circumstances:
(i) He or she has left work to accept a bona fide offer of bona
fide work as described in (a) of this subsection;
(ii) The separation was necessary because of the illness or
disability of the claimant or the death, illness, or disability of a
member of the claimant's immediate family if:
(A) The claimant pursued all reasonable alternatives to preserve
his or her employment status by requesting a leave of absence, by
having promptly notified the employer of the reason for the absence,
and by having promptly requested reemployment when again able to assume
employment. These alternatives need not be pursued, however, when they
would have been a futile act, including those instances when the
futility of the act was a result of a recognized labor/management
dispatch system; and
(B) The claimant terminated his or her employment status, and is
not entitled to be reinstated to the same position or a comparable or
similar position;
(iii) The claimant: (A) Left work to relocate for the employment
of a spouse or domestic partner that is outside the existing labor
market area; and (B) remained employed as long as was reasonable prior
to the move;
(iv) The separation was necessary to protect the claimant or the
claimant's immediate family members from domestic violence, as defined
in RCW 26.50.010, or stalking, as defined in RCW 9A.46.110;
(v) The individual's usual compensation was reduced by twenty-five
percent or more;
(vi) The individual's usual hours were reduced by twenty-five
percent or more;
(vii) The individual's worksite changed, such change caused a
material increase in distance or difficulty of travel, and, after the
change, the commute was greater than is customary for workers in the
individual's job classification and labor market;
(viii) The individual's worksite safety deteriorated, the
individual reported such safety deterioration to the employer, and the
employer failed to correct the hazards within a reasonable period of
time;
(ix) The individual left work because of illegal activities in the
individual's worksite, the individual reported such activities to the
employer, and the employer failed to end such activities within a
reasonable period of time;
(x) The individual's usual work was changed to work that violates
the individual's religious convictions or sincere moral beliefs; or
(xi) The individual left work to enter an apprenticeship program
approved by the Washington state apprenticeship training council.
Benefits are payable beginning Sunday of the week prior to the week in
which the individual begins active participation in the apprenticeship
program.
(3) With respect to separations that occur on or after July 4,
2010:
(a) Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this subsection, an
individual shall be disqualified from benefits beginning with the first
day of the calendar week in which he or she has left work voluntarily
and thereafter for seven calendar weeks and until he or she has
obtained bona fide work in employment covered by this title and earned
wages in that employment equal to seven times his or her weekly benefit
amount.
The disqualification shall continue if the work obtained is a mere
sham to qualify for benefits and is not bona fide work. In determining
whether work is of a bona fide nature, the commissioner shall consider
factors including but not limited to the following:
(i) The duration of the work;
(ii) The extent of direction and control by the employer over the
work; and
(iii) The level of skill required for the work in light of the
individual's training and experience.
(b) An individual is not disqualified from benefits under (a) of
this subsection under the following circumstances:
(i) He or she has left work to accept a bona fide offer of bona
fide work as described in (a) of this subsection;
(ii) The separation was necessary because of the illness or
disability of the claimant or the death, illness, or disability of a
member of the claimant's immediate family if:
(A) The claimant pursued all reasonable alternatives to preserve
his or her employment status by requesting a leave of absence, by
having promptly notified the employer of the reason for the absence,
and by having promptly requested reemployment when again able to assume
employment. These alternatives need not be pursued, however, when they
would have been a futile act, including those instances when the
futility of the act was a result of a recognized labor/management
dispatch system; and
(B) The claimant terminated his or her employment status, and is
not entitled to be reinstated to the same position or a comparable or
similar position;
(iii) The claimant:
(A) Left work to relocate for the employment of a spouse or
domestic partner that is outside the existing labor market area; and
(B) Remained employed as long as was reasonable prior to the move;
(iv) The separation was necessary to protect the claimant or the
claimant's immediate family members from domestic violence, as defined
in RCW 26.50.010, or stalking, as defined in RCW 9A.46.110;
(v) The individual's usual compensation was reduced by twenty-five
percent or more;
(vi) The individual's usual hours were reduced by twenty-five
percent or more;
(vii) The individual's worksite changed, such change caused a
material increase in distance or difficulty of travel, and, after the
change, the commute was greater than is customary for workers in the
individual's job classification and labor market;
(viii) The individual's worksite safety deteriorated, the
individual reported such safety deterioration to the employer, and the
employer failed to correct the hazards within a reasonable period of
time;
(ix) The individual left work because of illegal activities in the
individual's worksite, the individual reported such activities to the
employer, and the employer failed to end such activities within a
reasonable period of time;
(x) The individual's usual work was changed to work that violates
the individual's religious convictions or sincere moral beliefs; or
(xi) The individual left work to enter an apprenticeship program
approved by the Washington state apprenticeship training council.
Benefits are payable beginning Sunday of the week prior to the week in
which the individual begins active participation in the apprenticeship
program.
(c) An individual also is not disqualified from benefits under (a)
of this subsection if the individual left work because continuing in
employment would work an unreasonable hardship on the individual.
"Unreasonable hardship" means a result not due to the individual's
voluntary action that would cause a reasonable person to leave that
employment. The circumstances must be based on existing facts, not
conjecture, and the reasons for leaving work must be significant. An
individual seeking to demonstrate unreasonable hardship must show that:
(i) The individual left work primarily for reasons connected with
his or her employment;
(ii) The work-connected reasons were of such a compelling nature
they would have caused a reasonably prudent person to leave work; and
(iii) The individual first exhausted all reasonable alternatives
before leaving work, unless pursuing reasonable alternatives would have
been futile.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (((2))) (1) through (3) of this
section, for separations occurring on or after July 26, 2009, an
individual who was simultaneously employed in full-time employment and
part-time employment and is otherwise eligible for benefits from the
loss of the full-time employment shall not be disqualified from
benefits because the individual:
(a) Voluntarily quit the part-time employment before the loss of
the full-time employment; and
(b) Did not have prior knowledge that he or she would be separated
from full-time employment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 50.20 RCW
to read as follows:
With respect to claims that have an effective date on or after
January 2, 2011, no otherwise eligible individual shall be denied
benefits for any week by reason of the application of RCW
50.20.010(1)(c), 50.20.080, or 50.22.020(1) relating to availability
for work and active search for work, or failure to apply for or refusal
to accept suitable work solely because the individual seeks, applies
for, or accepts only part-time work, instead of full-time work, if the
part-time work is for at least seventeen hours per week.

Sec. 4 RCW 50.20.100 and 2006 c 13 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Suitable work for an individual is employment in an occupation
in keeping with the individual's prior work experience, education, or
training and if the individual has no prior work experience, special
education, or training for employment available in the general area,
then employment which the individual would have the physical and mental
ability to perform. In determining whether work is suitable for an
individual, the commissioner shall also consider the degree of risk
involved to the individual's health, safety, and morals, the
individual's physical fitness, the individual's length of unemployment
and prospects for securing local work in the individual's customary
occupation, the distance of the available work from the individual's
residence, and such other factors as the commissioner may deem
pertinent, including state and national emergencies.
(2) For individuals with base year work experience in agricultural
labor, any agricultural labor available from any employer shall be
deemed suitable unless it meets conditions in RCW 50.20.110 or the
commissioner finds elements of specific work opportunity unsuitable for
a particular individual.
(3) ((For part-time workers as defined in RCW 50.20.119, suitable
work includes suitable work under subsection (1) of this section that
is for seventeen or fewer hours per week.
(4))) For individuals who have qualified for unemployment
compensation benefits under RCW 50.20.050 (1)(b)(iv) ((or)),
(2)(b)(iv), or (3)(b)(iv), as applicable, an evaluation of the
suitability of the work must consider the individual's need to address
the physical, psychological, legal, and other effects of domestic
violence or stalking.

Sec. 5 RCW 50.20.119 and 2006 c 13 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) With respect to claims that have an effective date on or after
January 2, 2005, and before January 2, 2011, an otherwise eligible
individual may not be denied benefits for any week because the
individual is a part-time worker and is available for, seeks, applies
for, or accepts only work of seventeen or fewer hours per week by
reason of the application of RCW 50.20.010(1)(c), 50.20.080, or
50.22.020(1) relating to availability for work and active search for
work, or failure to apply for or refusal to accept suitable work.
(2) For purposes of this section, "part-time worker" means an
individual who: (a) Earned wages in "employment" in at least forty
weeks in the individual's base year; and (b) did not earn wages in
"employment" in more than seventeen hours per week in any weeks in the
individual's base year.

Sec. 6 RCW 50.20.240 and 2006 c 13 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) To ensure that following the initial application for
benefits, an individual is actively engaged in searching for work, the
employment security department shall implement a job search monitoring
program. Effective January 4, 2004, the department shall contract with
employment security agencies in other states to ensure that individuals
residing in those states and receiving benefits under this title are
actively engaged in searching for work in accordance with the
requirements of this section. The department may use interactive voice
technology and other electronic means to ensure that individuals are
subject to comparable job search monitoring, regardless of whether they
reside in Washington or elsewhere.
(b) Except for those individuals with employer attachment or union
referral, individuals who qualify for unemployment compensation under
RCW 50.20.050 (1)(b)(iv) ((or)), (2)(b)(iv) or, (3)(b)(iv), as
applicable, and individuals in commissioner-approved training, an
individual who has received five or more weeks of benefits under this
title, regardless of whether the individual resides in Washington or
elsewhere, must provide evidence of seeking work, as directed by the
commissioner or the commissioner's agents, for each week beyond five in
which a claim is filed. With regard to claims with an effective date
before January 4, 2004, the evidence must demonstrate contacts with at
least three employers per week or documented in-person job search
activity at the local reemployment center. With regard to claims with
an effective date on or after January 4, 2004, the evidence must
demonstrate contacts with at least three employers per week or
documented in-person job search activities at the local reemployment
center at least three times per week.
(c) In developing the requirements for the job search monitoring
program, the commissioner or the commissioner's agents shall utilize an
existing advisory committee having equal representation of employers
and workers.
(2) Effective January 4, 2004, an individual who fails to comply
fully with the requirements for actively seeking work under RCW
50.20.010 shall lose all benefits for all weeks during which the
individual was not in compliance, and the individual shall be liable
for repayment of all such benefits under RCW 50.20.190.

Sec. 7 RCW 50.29.021 and 2009 c 493 s 1, 2009 c 50 s 1, and 2009
c 3 s 13 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) This section applies to benefits charged to the experience
rating accounts of employers for claims that have an effective date on
or after January 4, 2004.
(2)(a) An experience rating account shall be established and
maintained for each employer, except employers as described in RCW
50.44.010, 50.44.030, and 50.50.030 who have properly elected to make
payments in lieu of contributions, taxable local government employers
as described in RCW 50.44.035, and those employers who are required to
make payments in lieu of contributions, based on existing records of
the employment security department.
(b) Benefits paid to an eligible individual shall be charged to the
experience rating accounts of each of such individual's employers
during the individual's base year in the same ratio that the wages paid
by each employer to the individual during the base year bear to the
wages paid by all employers to that individual during that base year,
except as otherwise provided in this section.
(c) When the eligible individual's separating employer is a covered
contribution paying base year employer, benefits paid to the eligible
individual shall be charged to the experience rating account of only
the individual's separating employer if the individual qualifies for
benefits under:
(i) RCW 50.20.050 (1)(b)(i), (2)(b)(i), or (3)(b)(i), as
applicable, and became unemployed after having worked and earned wages
in the bona fide work; or
(ii) RCW 50.20.050 (1)(b) (v) through (x), (2)(b) (v) through (x),
or (3)(b) (v) through (x), as applicable.
(3) The legislature finds that certain benefit payments, in whole
or in part, should not be charged to the experience rating accounts of
employers except those employers described in RCW 50.44.010, 50.44.030,
and 50.50.030 who have properly elected to make payments in lieu of
contributions, taxable local government employers described in RCW
50.44.035, and those employers who are required to make payments in
lieu of contributions, as follows:
(a) Benefits paid to any individual later determined to be
ineligible shall not be charged to the experience rating account of any
contribution paying employer. However, when a benefit claim becomes
invalid due to an amendment or adjustment of a report where the
employer failed to report or inaccurately reported hours worked or
remuneration paid, or both, all benefits paid will be charged to the
experience rating account of the contribution paying employer or
employers that originally filed the incomplete or inaccurate report or
reports. An employer who reimburses the trust fund for benefits paid
to workers and who fails to report or inaccurately reported hours
worked or remuneration paid, or both, shall reimburse the trust fund
for all benefits paid that are based on the originally filed incomplete
or inaccurate report or reports.
(b) Benefits paid to an individual filing under the provisions of
chapter 50.06 RCW shall not be charged to the experience rating account
of any contribution paying employer only if:
(i) The individual files under RCW 50.06.020(1) after receiving
crime victims' compensation for a disability resulting from a nonwork-related occurrence; or
(ii) The individual files under RCW 50.06.020(2).
(c) Benefits paid which represent the state's share of benefits
payable as extended benefits defined under RCW 50.22.010(6) shall not
be charged to the experience rating account of any contribution paying
employer.
(d) In the case of individuals who requalify for benefits under RCW
50.20.050 or 50.20.060, benefits based on wage credits earned prior to
the disqualifying separation shall not be charged to the experience
rating account of the contribution paying employer from whom that
separation took place.
(e) Benefits paid to an individual who qualifies for benefits under
RCW 50.20.050 (1)(b) (iv) or (xi), (2)(b) (iv) or (xi) or (3)(b) (iv)
or (xi), as applicable, shall not be charged to the experience rating
account of any contribution paying employer.
(f) With respect to claims with an effective date on or after the
first Sunday following April 22, 2005, benefits paid that exceed the
benefits that would have been paid if the weekly benefit amount for the
claim had been determined as one percent of the total wages paid in the
individual's base year shall not be charged to the experience rating
account of any contribution paying employer. This subsection (3)(f)
does not apply to the calculation of contribution rates under RCW
50.29.025 for rate year 2010 and thereafter.
(g) The forty-five dollar increase paid as part of an individual's
weekly benefit amount as provided in RCW 50.20.1201 shall not be
charged to the experience rating account of any contribution paying
employer.
(h) With respect to claims where the minimum amount payable weekly
is increased to one hundred fifty-five dollars pursuant to RCW
50.20.1201(3), benefits paid that exceed the benefits that would have
been paid if the minimum amount payable weekly had been calculated
pursuant to RCW 50.20.120 shall not be charged to the experience rating
account of any contribution paying employer.
(i) Training benefits paid to an individual under RCW 50.22.155
shall not be charged to the experience rating account of any
contribution paying employer.
(4)(a) A contribution paying base year employer, not otherwise
eligible for relief of charges for benefits under this section, may
receive such relief if the benefit charges result from payment to an
individual who:
(i) Last left the employ of such employer voluntarily for reasons
not attributable to the employer;
(ii) Was discharged for misconduct or gross misconduct connected
with his or her work not a result of inability to meet the minimum job
requirements;
(iii) Is unemployed as a result of closure or severe curtailment of
operation at the employer's plant, building, worksite, or other
facility. This closure must be for reasons directly attributable to a
catastrophic occurrence such as fire, flood, or other natural disaster;
(iv) Continues to be employed on a regularly scheduled permanent
part-time basis by a base year employer and who at some time during the
base year was concurrently employed and subsequently separated from at
least one other base year employer. Benefit charge relief ceases when
the employment relationship between the employer requesting relief and
the claimant is terminated. This subsection does not apply to shared
work employers under chapter 50.06 RCW; or
(v) Was hired to replace an employee who is a member of the
military reserves or National Guard and was called to federal active
military service by the president of the United States and is
subsequently laid off when that employee is reemployed by their
employer upon release from active duty within the time provided for
reemployment in RCW 73.16.035.
(b) The employer requesting relief of charges under this subsection
must request relief in writing within thirty days following mailing to
the last known address of the notification of the valid initial
determination of such claim, stating the date and reason for the
separation or the circumstances of continued employment. The
commissioner, upon investigation of the request, shall determine
whether relief should be granted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act
must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the
receipt of federal funds by the state or the granting of federal
unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---