BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.23 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The director shall appoint a farm worker-grower advisory
committee composed of ten members: Four representing farm workers;
four representing growers; and two nonvoting ex officio members, one
representing the commissioner of the employment security department and
one representing the director. The member representing the director
shall be the chair of the committee.
(2) The committee shall aid the director in formulating policies
and discussing problems related to agricultural labor. The committee
shall provide comment on department rule making, policies, and other
initiatives related to agricultural labor. The committee shall also
conduct a continuing study of any aspect of agricultural labor the
committee determines to require its consideration. The committee shall
report its findings to the department or the employment security
department for action as deemed appropriate.
(3) The members of the committee shall be appointed for a term of
four years commencing July 1, 2010, and the terms of the members
representing the farm workers and growers shall be staggered so that
the director shall designate one member from each such group initially
appointed whose term shall expire June 30, 2011, one member from each
such group whose term shall expire June 30, 2012, and one member from
each such group whose term shall expire June 30, 2013.
(4) The members of the committee shall serve without compensation,
but shall be entitled to travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060.
(5) The committee may hire such experts, if any, as it shall
require to discharge its duties, and may use such personnel and
facilities of the department and the employment security department as
it shall need without charge.
(6) The expenses of the committee shall be paid by the department.

--- END ---