BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 19.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If he or she has reason to believe there has been a violation
of this chapter, the director and the director's authorized
representatives may issue subpoenas to enforce the production and
examination of any information, whether written or electronic,
necessary to enforce this chapter. The subpoena must describe the
possible violation, cite the relevant sections of this chapter and
rules adopted under this chapter, and must explain how the information
being subpoenaed is reasonably related to the possible violation.
(2) The subpoena may be issued only if an electrical contractor,
administrator, electrician, or other entity or person to which this
chapter applies fails to provide the above information when requested
by the department. The department's request for information must
describe the possible violation, cite the relevant sections of this
chapter and rules adopted under this chapter, and must explain how the
information being requested is reasonably related to the possible
violation.
(3) The superior court has the power to enforce such a subpoena by
proper proceedings.
(4) This section applies to all electrical contractors,
administrators, electricians, other entities and persons, and
electrical work to which this chapter applies.

--- END ---