BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 22.09.060 and 1988 c 95 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in ((RCW 22.09.405(2))) this
section, no warehouse or grain dealer license may be issued to an
applicant before a bond, certificate of deposit, or other security is
given to the department as provided in RCW 22.09.090((,)) or ((in RCW))
22.09.095.
(2) No warehouse license may be issued to an applicant before a
certificate of insurance as provided in RCW 22.09.110 has been filed
with the department.
(3) Grain dealers may be exempted by rule from the bonding
requirements of this section if the grain dealer does not do more than
one hundred thousand dollars in business annually and makes payments
solely in coin or currency of the United States at the time of
obtaining possession or control of grain. ((However,)) A cashier's
check, certified check, or bankdraft may be considered as cash for
purposes of this section.
(4) The bonding and security requirements of this section do not
apply to:
(a) Participants in the grain indemnity fund program, as provided
in RCW 22.09.405(2).
(b) Any warehouse license holder who receives grain exclusively
from licensed grain dealers who themselves have obtained the security
required under this section for grain dealers.

Sec. 2 RCW 22.09.090 and 1987 c 509 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 22.09.060, an applicant for a
warehouse or grain dealer license pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter shall give a bond to the state of Washington executed by the
applicant as the principal and by a corporate surety licensed to do
business in this state as surety.
(2) The bond required under this section for the issuance of a
warehouse license shall be in the sum of not less than fifty thousand
dollars nor more than seven hundred fifty thousand dollars. The
department shall, after holding a public hearing, determine the amount
that will be required for the warehouse bond which shall be computed at
a rate of not less than fifteen cents nor more than thirty cents per
bushel multiplied by the number of bushels of licensed commodity
storage capacity of the warehouses of the applicant furnishing the
bond. The applicant for a warehouse license may give a single bond
meeting the requirements of this chapter, and all warehouses operated
by the warehouseman are deemed to be one warehouse for the purpose of
the amount of the bond required under this subsection. Any change in
the capacity of a warehouse or addition of any new warehouse involving
a change in bond liability under this chapter shall be immediately
reported to the department.
(3) The bond required under this section for the issuance of a
grain dealer license shall be in the sum of not less than fifty
thousand dollars nor more than seven hundred fifty thousand dollars.
The department shall, after holding a public hearing, determine the
amount that will be required for the dealer bond which shall be
computed at a rate not less than six percent nor more than twelve
percent of the sales of agricultural commodities purchased by the
dealer from producers during the dealer's last completed fiscal year or
in the case of a grain dealer who has been engaged in business as a
grain dealer less than one year, the estimated aggregate dollar amount
to be paid by the dealer to producers for agricultural commodities to
be purchased by the dealer during the dealer's first fiscal year.
(4) An applicant making application for both a warehouse license
and a grain dealer license may satisfy the bonding requirements set
forth in subsections (2) and (3) of this section by giving to the state
of Washington a single bond for the issuance of both licenses, which
bond shall be in the sum of not less than fifty thousand dollars nor
more than seven hundred fifty thousand dollars. The department shall,
after holding a public hearing, determine the amount of the bond which
shall be computed at a rate of not less than fifteen cents nor more
than thirty cents per bushel multiplied by the number of bushels of
licensed commodity storage capacity of the warehouses of the applicant
furnishing the bond, or at the rate of not less than six percent nor
more than twelve percent of the gross sales of agricultural commodities
of the applicant whichever is greater.
(5) The bonds required under this chapter shall be approved by the
department and shall be conditioned upon the faithful performance by
the licensee of the duties imposed upon him by this chapter. If a
person has applied for warehouse licenses to operate two or more
warehouses in this state, the assets applicable to all warehouses, but
not the deposits except in case of a station, are subject to the
liabilities of each. The total and aggregate liability of the surety
for all claims upon the bond is limited to the face amount of the bond.
(6) Any person required to submit a bond to the department under
this chapter has the option to give the department a certificate of
deposit or other security acceptable to the department payable to the
director as trustee, in lieu of a bond or a portion thereof. The
principal amount of the certificate or other security shall be the same
as that required for a surety bond under this chapter or may be in an
amount which, when added to the bond, will satisfy the licensee's
requirements for a surety bond under this chapter, and the interest
thereon shall be made payable to the purchaser of the certificate or
other security. The certificate of deposit or other security shall
remain on deposit until it is released, canceled, or discharged as
provided for by rule of the department. The provisions of this chapter
that apply to a bond required under this chapter apply to each
certificate of deposit or other security given in lieu of such a bond.
(7) The department may, when it has reason to believe that a grain
dealer does not have the ability to pay producers for grain purchased,
or when it determines that the grain dealer does not have a sufficient
net worth to outstanding financial obligations ratio, or when it
believes there may be claims made against the bond in excess of the
face amount of the bond, require a grain dealer to post an additional
bond in a dollar amount deemed appropriate by the department or may
require an additional certificate of deposit or other security. The
additional bonding or other security may exceed the maximum amount of
the bond otherwise required under this chapter. Failure to post the
additional bond, certificate of deposit, or other security constitutes
grounds for suspension or revocation of a license issued under this
chapter.
(8) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the
license of a warehouseman or grain dealer shall automatically be
suspended in accordance with RCW 22.09.100 for failure at any time to
have or to maintain a bond, certificate of deposit, or other security
or combination thereof in the amount and type required by this chapter.
The department shall remove the suspension or issue a license as the
case may be, when the required bond, certificate of deposit, or other
security has been obtained.

--- END ---