BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 38.42.010 and 2006 c 253 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Business loan" means a loan or extension of credit granted to
a business entity that: (a) Is owned and operated by a service member,
in which the service member is either (i) a sole proprietor, or (ii)
the owner of at least fifty percent of the entity; and (b) experiences
a material reduction in revenue due to the service member's military
service.
(2) "Dependent" means:
(a) The service member's spouse;
(b) The service member's minor child; or
(c) An individual for whom the service member provided more than
one-half of the individual's support for one hundred eighty days
immediately preceding an application for relief under this chapter.
(3) "Financial institution" means an institution as defined in RCW
30.22.041.
(4) "Judgment" does not include temporary orders as issued by a
judicial court or administrative tribunal in domestic relations cases
under Title 26 RCW, including but not limited to establishment of a
temporary child support obligation, creation of a temporary parenting
plan, or entry of a temporary protective or restraining order.
(5) "Military service" means ((a service)) serving as:
(a) A reservist or national guard member under a call to active
service authorized by the president of the United States or the
secretary of defense for a period of more than thirty consecutive days;
or
(b) An active duty member of the armed forces.
(6) "National guard" has the meaning in RCW 38.04.010.
(7) "Service member" means any resident of Washington state
((that)) who is a member of the national guard or a member of a
military reserve component, or an active duty member of the federal
armed forces.

--- END ---