BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) It is the intent of the legislature that
the state should implement practical water quality trading and banking
that values multiple ecosystem services, is based on achieving net
improvements to ecosystem health, and is watershed-based.
(2) It is the policy of the legislature that water quality trading
and banking should strive to:
(a) Achieve early pollutant load reductions;
(b) Reduce the cost of total maximum daily loads implementation and
overall federal clean water act compliance;
(c) Act as an incentive for voluntary reductions in and above what
would otherwise be required;
(d) Offset future discharge of pollutants;
(e) Achieve greater environmental benefit, including habitat
improvements; and
(f) Combine ecological services for multiple benefits, including
habitat improvements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By December 31, 2011, the department shall develop and
implement a water quality trading and banking program as a means, at
the option of a regulated entity, of achieving water quality objectives
and standards in this state in lieu of other technology or water
quality-based requirements. The department shall develop the program
in a manner that complies with state and federal water quality rules
and regulations and promotes economic efficiency.
(2) In developing the water quality trading and banking program,
the department shall place a priority on trades that improve the water
quality within watersheds and on the following pollutants or
conditions:
(a) Nitrogenous and phosphorous compounds commonly referred to as
nutrients;
(b) Sediment;
(c) Temperature;
(d) Biological oxygen demand; and
(e) Chemical oxygen demand.
(3) The department shall:
(a) Develop a procedure to assist persons entering into an
agreement to offset, trade, or bank quantities of pollutants or
portions of assimilative capacity of receiving waters under this
section in a manner that results in any or all of the following: A net
reduction of pollutants; a net increase in ecological function within
watersheds; assistance in meeting water quality standards; or
implementation of total maximum daily load allocations;
(b) Provide oversight and administration of agreements entered into
under this section;
(c) Minimize administrative and technical requirements in order to
encourage and facilitate trading and banking under this section;
(d) Emphasize practical procedures for pollutant trading that may
be implemented using reasonable estimations and engineering judgment
commensurate with reasonable assurances for load allocations; and
(e) Allow for the banking and future credit taking by counties
where water quality improvements occur that exceed pollutant reductions
otherwise required as a load or waste load allocation of a total
maximum daily load. Credit taking includes a waiver of administrative
or procedural requirements of national pollutant discharge elimination
system municipal storm water permits, including but not limited to
tracking, recordkeeping, and training.
(4) To aid in meeting its obligations under this section, the
department may select two or more pilot projects or case studies from
volunteer participating counties to pilot the application of water
quality trades and banking.
(5) The department shall seek any approvals, waivers, or
authorizations from the United States environmental protection agency
necessary to implement the water quality trading and banking program.
(6) The department may seek federal funding to support the water
quality trading and banking program.
(7) This section may not be construed to allow any activity
expressly prohibited by federal law or regulation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act may be known and cited as the
watershed improvement through water quality trading and banking act.

--- END ---