BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Availability of insurance for loss arising
from flooding in the geographical area protected by any dam is vital to
the economy of the state of Washington. If adequate property insurance
for loss arising from this flood is not available, the security of
citizens' property and the viability of business operations and
services are threatened. This chapter gives the commissioner authority
to ensure continued availability of excess insurance to insure property
at risk from, and business that is interrupted by, flood arising from
the failure of a dam or from efforts to prevent the failure of a dam.
The commissioner may establish a temporary joint underwriting
association for excess flood insurance to insure property at risk from,
and business that is interrupted by, flood arising from the failure of
a dam or from efforts to prevent the failure of a dam if:
(1) Excess flood insurance of a particular class or type is not
available from the voluntary market; or
(2) There are so few insurers selling excess flood insurance that
a competitive market does not exist.
The commissioner may use appropriated funds as needed to establish
and supervise the association.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Association" means a nonprofit underwriting association
established under this chapter.
(2) "Board" means the governing board of the association.
(3) "Casualty insurance" has the same meaning as "general casualty
insurance" in RCW 48.11.070. "Casualty insurance" does not include any
type of:
(a) Workers' compensation insurance;
(b) Employers' liability insurance;
(c) Nuclear liability insurance;
(d) Personal insurance; or
(e) Surety insurance.
(4) "Dam" means any United States army corps of engineers dam
located in a county with a population that exceeds one million.
(5) "Excess flood insurance" means insurance against loss,
including business interruption, arising from flood that is in excess
of the limit of liability insurance offered by the national flood
insurance program.
(6) "Person" means a natural person, association, partnership, or
corporation.
(7) "Personal insurance" means:
(a) Private passenger automobile coverage;
(b) Homeowner's coverage, including mobile homeowners, manufactured
homeowners, condominium owners, and renter's coverage;
(c) Dwelling property coverage;
(d) Earthquake coverage for a residence or personal property;
(e) Personal liability and theft coverage;
(f) Personal inland marine coverage; and
(g) Mechanical breakdown coverage for personal auto or home
appliances.
(8) "Property insurance" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.11.040
and does not include personal insurance or surety insurance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The commissioner may create an
association to provide excess flood insurance to insure property at
risk from, and business that is interrupted by, flood arising from the
failure of a dam or from efforts to prevent the failure of a dam if the
requirements of this section are met.
(2) The commissioner must hold a hearing under chapters 48.04 and
34.05 RCW before forming an association.
(3) An association may not begin underwriting operations for excess
flood or business interruption insurance until the commissioner finds
that:
(a) If a market assistance plan formed under section 15 of this act
finds that there are fewer than four admitted or surplus lines insurers
offering excess flood insurance, exclusive of personal insurance, then
the market assistance plan is inadequate to insure property at risk
from, and business that is interrupted by, flood arising from the
failure of a dam or from efforts to prevent the failure of a dam;
(b) Persons cannot buy excess flood insurance through the voluntary
market; or
(c) There are so few insurers selling excess flood insurance that
a competitive market does not exist.
(4) At a hearing to appeal the commissioner's finding that excess
flood insurance is unavailable through the voluntary market or that a
competitive market does not exist, the finding that four or more
admitted or surplus lines insurers are offering excess flood insurance,
exclusive of personal insurance, is prima facie evidence that a
competitive market does exist. A decision of the commissioner, finding
that excess flood insurance is unavailable through the market
assistance plan, voluntary market, or that a competitive market does
not exist, may be appealed under chapters 48.04 and 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The association may offer policies only
as follows:
(a) The coverage of any one policy may not exceed five million
dollars; and
(b) The total amount of all coverage offered by the association may
never exceed two hundred fifty million dollars.
(2) The board, jointly with the commissioner, shall apportion
policies within these limitations on an equitable basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) If an association is formed, a person
that is unable to obtain excess flood or business interruption
insurance because it is unavailable in the voluntary market or because
the market is not competitive is eligible to apply to an association
for insurance.
(2) The association may decline to insure particular persons that
present an extraordinary risk because of the nature of their
operations, property condition, past claims experience, or inadequate
risk management. However, the location of a property for which
insurance is sought from the association must not, in and of itself,
constitute an extraordinary risk.
(3) Any decision to decline coverage must be sent to the applicant
and include:
(a) A statement of the actual reason for declination; and
(b) A statement that the applicant may appeal the decision to the
commissioner.
(4) If the commissioner finds that the decision to decline coverage
is not supported by the criteria in this section, the commissioner may
require the association to provide coverage.
(5) A decision of the commissioner to provide or to decline to
provide coverage under this may be appealed under chapters 48.04 and
34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The association is composed of all
insurers that have a certificate of authority to write either casualty
or property insurance, or both, in this state. Every property or
casualty insurer, or both, must be a member of the association as a
condition of its authority to continue to transact business in this
state.
(2) The association has the general powers and limitations of a
nonprofit corporation under chapter 24.03 RCW and of an insurance
company under Title 48 RCW, as needed to transact its business.
(3) To the extent consistent with this chapter, the association and
its member insurers are "persons" under chapter 48.30 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) A governing board shall administer the
association.
(2) The board and the commissioner shall work cooperatively to
achieve the objectives of this chapter.
(3) The board may select and employ one or more persons to manage
the operations of an association. Every managing person must be
authorized to transact insurance in the state of Washington and have
demonstrated expertise in excess flood insurance. The board may employ
any advisors that the board deems necessary.
(4) The board must consist of seven persons appointed as set forth
in this subsection.
(a) Three board members must be member insurers appointed by each
of the following three trade associations: Property casualty insurers
association of America, American insurance association, and national
association of mutual insurance companies. At least one of the three
insurers on the board must be a domestic insurer.
(b) Four board members must be residents of the state. One is
appointed by the insurance commissioner. One is appointed by the King
county council. One is appointed by the association of Washington
cities, to represent one or more of the following municipal
governments: Auburn, Kent, Renton, or Tukwila. One is appointed by
the board of directors of the center for advanced manufacturing Puget
Sound. None of the resident-appointees may be employed by, serve on
the board of directors of, or have a substantial ownership interest in
any insurer.
(c) Original board members must be appointed to serve an initial
term of three years and may be appointed for a second term. Board
members may serve consecutive terms. Successor board members must be
appointed as soon as possible subject to (a) and (b) of this
subsection.
(5) The commissioner shall notify the members of the board if he or
she has information that any board member is dishonest, reckless, or
incompetent or is failing to perform any duty of his or her office, and
the board shall meet immediately to consider the matter. The
commissioner must receive notice of the time and place of this meeting.
If the board finds by a majority of the board members, with the accused
board member not voting on this matter, that the commissioner's
objection is well-founded, the accused board member shall be removed
immediately. The successor of a board member removed under this
section must be appointed as soon as possible subject to subsection (4)
of this section.
(6) All members of the board shall conduct the business of the
association in a manner that is in the interest of all policyholders of
the association. Board members stand in a fiduciary relationship to
the association and must discharge their duties in good faith and with
that diligence, care, and skill that ordinary, prudent persons would
exercise under similar circumstances in a like position.
(7) Each person serving on the board or any subcommittee thereof,
each member insurer of the association, and each officer and employee
of the association must be indemnified by the association against all
costs and expenses actually and necessarily incurred by him, her, or it
in connection with the defense of any action, suit, or proceeding in
which he, she, or it is made a party by reason of his, her, or its
being or having been a member of the board, or a member or officer or
employee of the association, except in relation to matters as to which
he, she, or it has been judged in such action, suit, or proceeding to
be liable by reason of willful misconduct in the performance of his,
her, or its duties as a member of the board, or member, officer, or
employee of the association. This indemnification is not exclusive of
other rights as to which the member, officer, or employee may be
entitled as a matter of law.
(8) Board members shall receive no compensation, but may be
reimbursed for all travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The board must adopt a plan of operation
within thirty days of its appointment.
(2) The plan of operation may take effect only after it has been
reviewed by the commissioner. Any changes recommended by the
commissioner must be either approved by a majority of the members of
the board or a written statement of the board's reasons for rejection
of any provision provided to the commissioner. The commissioner may
continue to consult with the board to arrive at a plan of operation
that is approved by both the commissioner and the board, or the
commissioner may accept the plan of operation of the board. This
process must conclude with a plan of operation accepted by the board
within thirty days of the first board appointed under this act.
(a) The plan of operation may be amended by agreement of a majority
of the members of the board and the commissioner.
(b) The association must use rates that are demonstrably sound as
compared to accepted actuarial standards. At the time of filing with
the commissioner, the rates must be accompanied by an actuarial
analysis. The rates must comply with chapter 48.19 RCW and be approved
by the commissioner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The association must file a statement
annually with the commissioner that contains information about the
association's transactions, financial condition, and operations during
the preceding year. The statement must be in the form and in a manner
approved by the commissioner. The association must maintain its
records according to the accounting practices and procedures manual
adopted by the national association of insurance commissioners. The
commissioner may require the association to furnish additional
information if the commissioner considers it necessary to evaluate the
scope, operation, and experience of the association.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) The commissioner may examine the
transactions, financial condition, and operations of the association
when the commissioner finds it necessary in order to carry out the
purposes of this chapter. Except as set forth in subsections (2) and
(3) of this section, each examination must be conducted in the manner
prescribed for domestic insurance companies in chapter 48.03 or 48.37
RCW.
(2) The commissioner is not required to examine any association on
a prescribed cycle or schedule.
(3) An association created under this chapter is responsible for
the total costs of its financial and market conduct examinations. RCW
48.03.060 (1) and (2) and 48.37.060(14) (a) and (b) are not applicable
to the examination of an association created under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) The association is not a member of the
guaranty fund created under chapter 48.32 RCW. The guaranty fund, this
state, and any political subdivisions are not responsible for losses
sustained by the association.
(2) The association is exempt from payment of all fees and all
taxes levied by the state or any of its subdivisions, except taxes
levied on real or personal property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) The association is funded by premiums
paid by persons insured by the association.
(a) All premiums for the association must be deposited into a fund
or funds under management of the board.
(b) Premiums must be used to pay claims, administrative costs, and
other expenses of the association.
(2) The association may assess its members to pay past and future
financial obligations of the association, not funded by premiums. Each
member insurer must be assessed a proportionate share based on the sum
of direct premiums earned in this state for all property insurance and
casualty insurance.
(3) If the association makes an assessment, an assessed insurer
must pay the association within thirty days after it receives notice of
the assessment. If an insurer does not pay an assessment within thirty
days after it receives notice of the assessment:
(a) The assessment accrues interest at the maximum legal rate until
it is paid in full. The interest is paid to the association;
(b) The association may collect the assessment in a civil action
and must be awarded its attorneys' fees if it prevails;
(c) The commissioner may suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew an
insurer's certificate of authority; and
(d) The commissioner may fine the insurer up to ten thousand
dollars.
(4) This section may be enforced under RCW 48.02.080.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) The association may operate for a
period of five years. At the end of the five-year period, the
association must be dissolved unless the legislature authorizes its
continued operation.
(2) If, at any time, the commissioner or the board of directors
holds a hearing under chapters 48.04 and 34.05 RCW and determines that
excess flood and business interruption insurance is available through
a market assistance plan, in the voluntary market, or that a
competitive market exists, the commissioner must order the association
to end its underwriting operations.
(3) If the commissioner or the board of directors orders the
association to end all underwriting operations, the commissioner must
supervise the dissolution of the association, including settlement of
all financial and legal obligations and distribution of any remaining
assets as follows:
(a) If there has been an assessment on the members of the
association, and after all creditors of the association are paid in
full, then to the member insurers in a proportional manner and as
determined by rule by the commissioner; or
(b) If there has not been an assessment on the members of the
association, or if there are funds remaining after distribution under
(a) of this subsection and after all creditors of the association are
paid in full, then to the policyholders in a proportional manner and as
determined by rule by the commissioner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The commissioner may adopt all rules needed
to implement and administer this chapter and to ensure the efficient
operation of the association, including but not limited to rules:
(1) Creating sample plans of operation for the assistance of the
board;
(2) Requiring or limiting certain policy provisions;
(3) Containing the basis and method for assessing members for
operation of the association; and
(4) Establishing the order in which the assets of the association
that is dissolved by the commissioner must be distributed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 (1) The commissioner must by rule require
insurers authorized to write property insurance in this state to form
a market assistance plan to assist persons located in the geographical
area protected by any dam that are unable to purchase excess flood or
business interruption insurance in an adequate amount from either the
admitted or nonadmitted market.
(2) For the purpose of this section, a market assistance plan means
a voluntary mechanism by insurers writing property insurance in this
state in either the admitted or nonadmitted market to provide excess
flood or business interruption insurance for a class of insurance as
designated in writing to the plan by the commissioner.
(3) The bylaws and method of operation of any market assistance
plan must be approved by the commissioner prior to its operation.
(4) A market assistance plan must have a minimum of twenty-five
insurers willing to insure risks within the class designated by the
commissioner. If twenty-five insurers do not voluntarily agree to
participate, the commissioner may require either property or property
and casualty, or both, insurers to participate in a market assistance
plan as a condition of continuing to do business in this state. The
commissioner must make this requirement to fulfill the quota of at
least twenty-five insurers. The commissioner must make his or her
designation on the basis of the insurer's premium volume of property
insurance in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 The board and the commissioner shall report
to the respective committees of the house of representatives and senate
having jurisdiction over the insurance code by January 31, 2011, and
each subsequent January 31st of each year that the association remains
in existence.

Sec. 17 RCW 48.15.040 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 32 s 4 are each
amended to read as follows:
If certain insurance coverages cannot be procured from authorized
insurers, such coverages, hereinafter designated as "surplus lines,"
may be procured from unauthorized insurers subject to the following
conditions:
(1) The insurance must be procured through a licensed surplus line
broker.
(2) The insurance must not be procurable, after diligent effort has
been made to do so from among a majority of the insurers authorized to
transact that kind of insurance in this state.
(3) Coverage shall not be procured from an unauthorized insurer for
the purpose of securing a lower premium rate than would be accepted by
any authorized insurer nor to secure any other competitive advantage.
(4) The commissioner may by regulation establish the degree of
effort required to comply with subsections (2) and (3) of this section.
(5) At the time of the procuring of any such insurance an affidavit
setting forth the facts referred to in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section must be executed by the surplus line broker. Such affidavit
shall be filed with the commissioner within thirty days after the
insurance is procured.
(6) For purposes of chapter 48.-- RCW (the new chapter created in
section 18 of this act), a joint underwriting association established
or authorized by the legislature is not an authorized insurer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Sections 1 through 16 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 48 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 This act expires December 31, 2016.

--- END ---