BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 53.08.245 and 1985 c 125 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It shall be in the public purpose for all port districts to
engage in economic development programs. In addition, port districts
may contract with nonprofit corporations in furtherance of this and
other acts relating to economic development.
(2) Port districts may provide funding, property, and other port
resources to assist local governmental or nonprofit entities in the
development and maintenance of shelter or housing for homeless or low-income persons.

--- END ---