BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act shall be known and cited as
Hailey's Law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Despite every effort, the problem of driving or controlling a
vehicle while under the influence of alcohol or drugs remains a great
threat to the lives and safety of citizens. Over five hundred people
are killed by traffic accidents in Washington each year and impaired
vehicle operators account for almost forty-five percent, or over two
hundred deaths per year. That is, impairment is the leading cause of
traffic deaths in this state;
(b) Over thirty-nine thousand people are arrested each year in
Washington for driving or controlling a vehicle while under the
influence of alcohol or drugs. Persons arrested for driving or
controlling a vehicle while under the influence of alcohol or drugs may
still be impaired after they are cited and released and could return to
drive or control a vehicle. If the vehicle was impounded, there is
nothing to stop the impaired person from going to the tow truck
operator's storage facility and redeeming the vehicle while still
impaired;
(c) More can be done to deter those arrested for driving or
controlling a vehicle while under the influence of alcohol or drugs.
Approximately one-third of those arrested for operating a vehicle under
the influence are repeat offenders. Vehicle impoundment effectively
increases deterrence and prevents an impaired operator from accessing
the vehicle for a specified time. In addition, vehicle impoundment
provides an appropriate measure of accountability for registered owners
who allow impaired operators to drive or control their vehicles, but it
also allows the registered owners to redeem their vehicles once
impounded. Any inconvenience on a registered owner is outweighed by
the need to protect the public;
(d) In order to protect public safety and to enforce the state's
laws, it is reasonable and necessary to mandatorily impound the vehicle
operated by a person who has been arrested for driving or controlling
a vehicle while under the influence of alcohol or drugs.
(2) The legislature intends by this act:
(a) To change the primary reason for impounding the vehicle
operated by a person arrested for driving or controlling a vehicle
under the influence of alcohol or drugs. The purpose of impoundment
under this act is to protect the public from a person operating a
vehicle while still impaired, rather than to prevent a potential
traffic obstruction; and
(b) To require that officers have no discretion as to whether or
not to order an impound after they have arrested a vehicle operator
with reasonable grounds to believe the operator of the vehicle was
driving while under the influence of alcohol or drugs, or was in
physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of alcohol or
drugs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) When an operator of a vehicle is
arrested for a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, the vehicle is
subject to summary impoundment and the vehicle must be impounded. With
the exception of the twelve-hour hold mandated under this section, the
procedures for notice, redemption, storage, auction, and sale shall
remain the same as for other impounded vehicles under this chapter.
(2)(a) When an operator of a vehicle is arrested for a violation of
RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and the operator is a registered owner of
the vehicle, the impounded vehicle may not be redeemed within a
twelve-hour period following the time the impounded vehicle arrives at
the registered tow truck operator's storage facility as noted in the
registered tow truck operator's master log, unless there are two or
more registered owners. If there are two or more registered owners of
the impounded vehicle, a registered owner who is not the operator of
the vehicle may redeem the impounded vehicle after it arrives at the
registered tow truck operator's storage facility as noted in the
registered tow truck operator's master log.
(b) When an operator of a vehicle is arrested for a violation of
RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and the operator is a registered owner of
the vehicle, the police officer directing the impound shall notify the
operator that the impounded vehicle may not be redeemed within a
twelve-hour period following the time the impounded vehicle arrives at
the registered tow truck operator's storage facility as noted in the
registered tow truck operator's master log, unless there are two or
more registered owners. If there are two or more registered owners of
the impounded vehicle, the police officer directing the impound shall
notify the operator that the impounded vehicle may be redeemed by a
registered owner who is not the operator of the vehicle after the
impounded vehicle arrives at the registered tow truck operator's
storage facility as noted in the registered tow truck operator's master
log.
(c) A registered tow truck operator that releases an impounded
vehicle pursuant to the requirements stated in this subsection is not
liable for injuries or damages sustained by the operator or third
parties that may result from the operator's intoxicated state.
(3)(a) When an operator of a vehicle is arrested for a violation of
RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and the operator is not a registered owner
of the vehicle, the impounded vehicle may be redeemed by a registered
owner after the impounded vehicle arrives at the registered tow truck
operator's storage facility as noted in the registered tow truck
operator's master log.
(b) When an operator of a vehicle is arrested for a violation of
RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and the operator is not a registered owner
of the vehicle, the police officer directing the impound shall notify
the operator that the impounded vehicle may be redeemed by a registered
owner after the impounded vehicle arrives at the registered tow truck
operator's storage facility as noted in the registered tow truck
operator's master log.
(c) A registered tow truck operator that releases an impounded
vehicle pursuant to the requirements stated in this subsection is not
liable for injuries or damages sustained by the operator or third
parties that may result from the operator's intoxicated state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If an impoundment arising from an alleged
violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 is determined to be in
violation of this chapter, then the law enforcement officer directing
the impoundment and the government employing the officer are not liable
for damages for loss of use of the vehicle if the officer had
reasonable grounds to believe that the operator of the vehicle was
driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug,
or was in physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.55.113 and 2007 c 242 s 1 and 2007 c 86 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Whenever the driver of a vehicle is arrested for a violation of
RCW ((46.61.502, 46.61.504,)) 46.20.342((,)) or 46.20.345, the vehicle
is subject to summary impoundment, pursuant to the terms and conditions
of an applicable local ordinance or state agency rule at the direction
of a law enforcement officer.
(2) In addition, a police officer may take custody of a vehicle, at
his or her discretion, and provide for its prompt removal to a place of
safety under any of the following circumstances:
(a) Whenever a police officer finds a vehicle standing upon the
roadway in violation of any of the provisions of RCW 46.61.560, the
officer may provide for the removal of the vehicle or require the
driver or other person in charge of the vehicle to move the vehicle to
a position off the roadway;
(b) Whenever a police officer finds a vehicle unattended upon a
highway where the vehicle constitutes an obstruction to traffic or
jeopardizes public safety;
(c) Whenever a police officer finds an unattended vehicle at the
scene of an accident or when the driver of a vehicle involved in an
accident is physically or mentally incapable of deciding upon steps to
be taken to protect his or her property;
(d) Whenever the driver of a vehicle is arrested and taken into
custody by a police officer;
(e) Whenever a police officer discovers a vehicle that the officer
determines to be a stolen vehicle;
(f) Whenever a vehicle without a special license plate, placard, or
decal indicating that the vehicle is being used to transport a person
with disabilities under RCW 46.16.381 is parked in a stall or space
clearly and conspicuously marked under RCW 46.61.581 which space is
provided on private property without charge or on public property;
(g) Upon determining that a person is operating a motor vehicle
without a valid and, if required, a specially endorsed driver's license
or with a license that has been expired for ninety days or more;
(h) When a vehicle is illegally occupying a truck, commercial
loading zone, restricted parking zone, bus, loading, hooded-meter,
taxi, street construction or maintenance, or other similar zone where,
by order of the director of transportation or chiefs of police or fire
or their designees, parking is limited to designated classes of
vehicles or is prohibited during certain hours, on designated days or
at all times, if the zone has been established with signage for at
least twenty-four hours and where the vehicle is interfering with the
proper and intended use of the zone. Signage must give notice to the
public that a vehicle will be removed if illegally parked in the zone;
(i) When a vehicle with an expired registration of more than
forty-five days is parked on a public street.
(3) When an arrest is made for a violation of RCW 46.20.342, if the
vehicle is a commercial vehicle and the driver of the vehicle is not
the owner of the vehicle, before the summary impoundment directed under
subsection (1) of this section, the police officer shall attempt in a
reasonable and timely manner to contact the owner of the vehicle and
may release the vehicle to the owner if the owner is reasonably
available, as long as the owner was not in the vehicle at the time of
the stop and arrest and the owner has not received a prior release
under this subsection or RCW 46.55.120(1)(a)(ii).
(4) Nothing in this section may derogate from the powers of police
officers under the common law. For the purposes of this section, a
place of safety may include the business location of a registered tow
truck operator.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 2 through 4 of this act are each
added to chapter 46.55 RCW.

--- END ---