BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that publicly owned
facilities accredited by the association of zoos and aquariums in
Washington serve a public purpose by providing educational and
recreational opportunities for Washington citizens and spurring
economic development in the state. The legislature also finds that
organizations operating accredited zoos and aquariums are similar to
other artistic or cultural organizations, which currently receive
favorable tax treatment. The legislature intends to provide certain
excise tax relief to organizations operating accredited zoo and
aquarium facilities in order to further their public purpose and
stimulate economic development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax
by persons subject to payment of the tax on manufacturing under RCW
82.04.240, the value of the products manufactured to the extent the
manufacturing activities are: (a) Undertaken by a nonprofit
organization or metropolitan park district operating a zoological
facility; and (b) solely for the purpose of manufacturing articles for
use by the organization or district in displaying or presenting
zoological exhibitions, presentations, performances, or education
programs at the zoological facility.
(2) In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax
those amounts received:
(a) By a nonprofit organization or metropolitan park district where
the income is derived from business activities conducted by the
organization or district with respect to a zoological facility; or
(b) By a nonprofit organization or metropolitan park district from
the United States or any instrumentality thereof or from the state of
Washington or any municipal corporation or subdivision thereof as
compensation for, or to support, zoological exhibitions, presentations,
performances, or education programs at a zoological facility.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Metropolitan park district" or "district" means a metropolitan
park district created under chapter 35.61 RCW.
(b) "Nonprofit organization" means a business entity incorporated
or authorized to conduct affairs in this state under chapter 24.03 RCW.
(c) "Zoological facility" means a publicly owned facility
accredited by the association of zoos and aquariums.

--- END ---