BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds:
(a) The initiative and referendum process is a valued right for the
people of Washington. It provides citizens with the opportunity to
collect signatures on a proposal, place it on the ballot, have their
fellow citizens vote on it, and see it become law.
(b) Passing laws in Washington is done in the legislature or by
initiative and referendum. Upon taking office, legislators swear to
uphold the Constitution, are required to file financial disclosure
reports, must recuse themselves from acting on bills where there is a
conflict, take required ethics classes, abide by limits on gifts, and
receive a salary recommended by the salary commission. Sponsors of
initiatives or referenda seeking to also pass laws that apply to
Washington residents are not required to follow any of these
provisions.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to limit the making of laws
from being a profit-making activity for those engaged in putting
initiatives and referenda on the ballot, to require transparency with
financial disclosure, to limit conflicts of interest with gift
restrictions, and to require that petition sponsors swear to uphold the
Constitution.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.17.020 and 2008 c 6 s 201 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Actual malice" means to act with knowledge of falsity or with
reckless disregard as to truth or falsity.
(2) "Agency" includes all state agencies and all local agencies.
"State agency" includes every state office, department, division,
bureau, board, commission, or other state agency. "Local agency"
includes every county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or special purpose district, or any office,
department, division, bureau, board, commission, or agency thereof, or
other local public agency.
(3) "Authorized committee" means the political committee authorized
by a candidate, or by the public official against whom recall charges
have been filed, to accept contributions or make expenditures on behalf
of the candidate or public official.
(4) "Ballot proposition" means any "measure" as defined by RCW
29A.04.091, or any initiative, recall, or referendum proposition
proposed to be submitted to the voters of the state or any municipal
corporation, political subdivision, or other voting constituency from
and after the time when the proposition has been initially filed with
the appropriate election officer of that constituency prior to its
circulation for signatures.
(5) "Benefit" means a commercial, proprietary, financial, economic,
or monetary advantage, or the avoidance of a commercial, proprietary,
financial, economic, or monetary disadvantage.
(6) "Bona fide political party" means:
(a) An organization that has filed a valid certificate of
nomination with the secretary of state under chapter 29A.20 RCW;
(b) The governing body of the state organization of a major
political party, as defined in RCW 29A.04.086, that is the body
authorized by the charter or bylaws of the party to exercise authority
on behalf of the state party; or
(c) The county central committee or legislative district committee
of a major political party. There may be only one legislative district
committee for each party in each legislative district.
(7) "Depository" means a bank designated by a candidate or
political committee pursuant to RCW 42.17.050.
(8) "Treasurer" and "deputy treasurer" mean the individuals
appointed by a candidate or political committee, pursuant to RCW
42.17.050, to perform the duties specified in that section.
(9) "Candidate" means any individual who seeks nomination for
election or election to public office. An individual seeks nomination
or election when he or she first:
(a) Receives contributions or makes expenditures or reserves space
or facilities with intent to promote his or her candidacy for office;
(b) Announces publicly or files for office;
(c) Purchases commercial advertising space or broadcast time to
promote his or her candidacy; or
(d) Gives his or her consent to another person to take on behalf of
the individual any of the actions in (a) or (c) of this subsection.
(10) "Caucus political committee" means a political committee
organized and maintained by the members of a major political party in
the state senate or state house of representatives.
(11) "Commercial advertiser" means any person who sells the service
of communicating messages or producing printed material for broadcast
or distribution to the general public or segments of the general public
whether through the use of newspapers, magazines, television and radio
stations, billboard companies, direct mail advertising companies,
printing companies, or otherwise.
(12) "Commission" means the agency established under RCW 42.17.350.
(13) "Compensation" unless the context requires a narrower meaning,
includes payment in any form for real or personal property or services
of any kind: PROVIDED, That for the purpose of compliance with RCW
42.17.241, the term "compensation" shall not include per diem
allowances or other payments made by a governmental entity to reimburse
a public official for expenses incurred while the official is engaged
in the official business of the governmental entity.
(14) "Continuing political committee" means a political committee
that is an organization of continuing existence not established in
anticipation of any particular election campaign.
(15)(a) "Contribution" includes:
(i) A loan, gift, deposit, subscription, forgiveness of
indebtedness, donation, advance, pledge, payment, transfer of funds
between political committees, or anything of value, including personal
and professional services for less than full consideration;
(ii) An expenditure made by a person in cooperation, consultation,
or concert with, or at the request or suggestion of, a candidate, a
political committee, the person or persons named on the candidate's or
committee's registration form who direct expenditures on behalf of the
candidate or committee, or their agents;
(iii) The financing by a person of the dissemination, distribution,
or republication, in whole or in part, of broadcast, written, graphic,
or other form of political advertising or electioneering communication
prepared by a candidate, a political committee, or its authorized
agent;
(iv) Sums paid for tickets to fund-raising events such as dinners
and parties, except for the actual cost of the consumables furnished at
the event.
(b) "Contribution" does not include:
(i) Standard interest on money deposited in a political committee's
account;
(ii) Ordinary home hospitality;
(iii) A contribution received by a candidate or political committee
that is returned to the contributor within five business days of the
date on which it is received by the candidate or political committee;
(iv) A news item, feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly
scheduled news medium that is of primary interest to the general
public, that is in a news medium controlled by a person whose business
is that news medium, and that is not controlled by a candidate or a
political committee;
(v) An internal political communication primarily limited to the
members of or contributors to a political party organization or
political committee, or to the officers, management staff, or
stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or to the members
of a labor organization or other membership organization;
(vi) The rendering of personal services of the sort commonly
performed by volunteer campaign workers, or incidental expenses
personally incurred by volunteer campaign workers not in excess of
fifty dollars personally paid for by the worker. "Volunteer services,"
for the purposes of this section, means services or labor for which the
individual is not compensated by any person;
(vii) Messages in the form of reader boards, banners, or yard or
window signs displayed on a person's own property or property occupied
by a person. However, a facility used for such political advertising
for which a rental charge is normally made must be reported as an in-kind contribution and counts towards any applicable contribution limit
of the person providing the facility;
(viii) Legal or accounting services rendered to or on behalf of:
(A) A political party or caucus political committee if the person
paying for the services is the regular employer of the person rendering
such services; or
(B) A candidate or an authorized committee if the person paying for
the services is the regular employer of the individual rendering the
services and if the services are solely for the purpose of ensuring
compliance with state election or public disclosure laws; or
(ix) The performance of ministerial functions by a person on behalf
of two or more candidates or political committees either as volunteer
services defined in (b)(vi) of this subsection or for payment by the
candidate or political committee for whom the services are performed as
long as:
(A) The person performs solely ministerial functions;
(B) A person who is paid by two or more candidates or political
committees is identified by the candidates and political committees on
whose behalf services are performed as part of their respective
statements of organization under RCW 42.17.040; and
(C) The person does not disclose, except as required by law, any
information regarding a candidate's or committee's plans, projects,
activities, or needs, or regarding a candidate's or committee's
contributions or expenditures that is not already publicly available
from campaign reports filed with the commission, or otherwise engage in
activity that constitutes a contribution under (a)(ii) of this
subsection.
A person who performs ministerial functions under this subsection
(15)(b)(ix) is not considered an agent of the candidate or committee as
long as he or she has no authority to authorize expenditures or make
decisions on behalf of the candidate or committee.
(c) Contributions other than money or its equivalent are deemed to
have a monetary value equivalent to the fair market value of the
contribution. Services or property or rights furnished at less than
their fair market value for the purpose of assisting any candidate or
political committee are deemed a contribution. Such a contribution
must be reported as an in-kind contribution at its fair market value
and counts towards any applicable contribution limit of the provider.
(16) "Elected official" means any person elected at a general or
special election to any public office, and any person appointed to fill
a vacancy in any such office.
(17) "Election" includes any primary, general, or special election
for public office and any election in which a ballot proposition is
submitted to the voters: PROVIDED, That an election in which the
qualifications for voting include other than those requirements set
forth in Article VI, section 1 (Amendment 63) of the Constitution of
the state of Washington shall not be considered an election for
purposes of this chapter.
(18) "Election campaign" means any campaign in support of or in
opposition to a candidate for election to public office and any
campaign in support of, or in opposition to, a ballot proposition.
(19) "Election cycle" means the period beginning on the first day
of January after the date of the last previous general election for the
office that the candidate seeks and ending on December 31st after the
next election for the office. In the case of a special election to
fill a vacancy in an office, "election cycle" means the period
beginning on the day the vacancy occurs and ending on December 31st
after the special election.
(20) "Electioneering communication" means any broadcast, cable, or
satellite television or radio transmission, United States postal
service mailing, billboard, newspaper, or periodical that:
(a) Clearly identifies a candidate for a state, local, or judicial
office either by specifically naming the candidate, or identifying the
candidate without using the candidate's name;
(b) Is broadcast, transmitted, mailed, erected, distributed, or
otherwise published within sixty days before any election for that
office in the jurisdiction in which the candidate is seeking election;
and
(c) Either alone, or in combination with one or more communications
identifying the candidate by the same sponsor during the sixty days
before an election, has a fair market value of five thousand dollars or
more.
(21) "Electioneering communication" does not include:
(a) Usual and customary advertising of a business owned by a
candidate, even if the candidate is mentioned in the advertising when
the candidate has been regularly mentioned in that advertising
appearing at least twelve months preceding his or her becoming a
candidate;
(b) Advertising for candidate debates or forums when the
advertising is paid for by or on behalf of the debate or forum sponsor,
so long as two or more candidates for the same position have been
invited to participate in the debate or forum;
(c) A news item, feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly
scheduled news medium that is:
(i) Of primary interest to the general public;
(ii) In a news medium controlled by a person whose business is that
news medium; and
(iii) Not a medium controlled by a candidate or a political
committee;
(d) Slate cards and sample ballots;
(e) Advertising for books, films, dissertations, or similar works
(i) written by a candidate when the candidate entered into a contract
for such publications or media at least twelve months before becoming
a candidate, or (ii) written about a candidate;
(f) Public service announcements;
(g) A mailed internal political communication primarily limited to
the members of or contributors to a political party organization or
political committee, or to the officers, management staff, or
stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or to the members
of a labor organization or other membership organization;
(h) An expenditure by or contribution to the authorized committee
of a candidate for state, local, or judicial office; or
(i) Any other communication exempted by the commission through rule
consistent with the intent of this chapter.
(22) "Expenditure" includes a payment, contribution, subscription,
distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of money or anything of
value, and includes a contract, promise, or agreement, whether or not
legally enforceable, to make an expenditure. The term "expenditure"
also includes a promise to pay, a payment, or a transfer of anything of
value in exchange for goods, services, property, facilities, or
anything of value for the purpose of assisting, benefiting, or honoring
any public official or candidate, or assisting in furthering or
opposing any election campaign. For the purposes of this chapter,
agreements to make expenditures, contracts, and promises to pay may be
reported as estimated obligations until actual payment is made. The
term "expenditure" shall not include the partial or complete repayment
by a candidate or political committee of the principal of a loan, the
receipt of which loan has been properly reported.
(23) "Final report" means the report described as a final report in
RCW 42.17.080(2).
(24) "General election" for the purposes of RCW 42.17.640 means the
election that results in the election of a person to a state office.
It does not include a primary.
(25) "Gift," is as defined in RCW 42.52.010.
(26) "Immediate family" includes the spouse or domestic partner,
dependent children, and other dependent relatives, if living in the
household. For the purposes of RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790,
"immediate family" means an individual's spouse or domestic partner,
and child, stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent,
brother, half brother, sister, or half sister of the individual and the
spouse or the domestic partner of any such person and a child,
stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, brother, half
brother, sister, or half sister of the individual's spouse or domestic
partner and the spouse or the domestic partner of any such person.
(27) "Incumbent" means a person who is in present possession of an
elected office.
(28) "Independent expenditure" means an expenditure that has each
of the following elements:
(a) It is made in support of or in opposition to a candidate for
office by a person who is not (i) a candidate for that office, (ii) an
authorized committee of that candidate for that office, (iii) a person
who has received the candidate's encouragement or approval to make the
expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any
other candidate or candidates for that office, or (iv) a person with
whom the candidate has collaborated for the purpose of making the
expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any
other candidate or candidates for that office;
(b) The expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising that either specifically names the candidate supported or
opposed, or clearly and beyond any doubt identifies the candidate
without using the candidate's name; and
(c) The expenditure, alone or in conjunction with another
expenditure or other expenditures of the same person in support of or
opposition to that candidate, has a value of five hundred dollars or
more. A series of expenditures, each of which is under five hundred
dollars, constitutes one independent expenditure if their cumulative
value is five hundred dollars or more.
(29)(a) "Intermediary" means an individual who transmits a
contribution to a candidate or committee from another person unless the
contribution is from the individual's employer, immediate family as
defined for purposes of RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790, or an
association to which the individual belongs.
(b) A treasurer or a candidate is not an intermediary for purposes
of the committee that the treasurer or candidate serves.
(c) A professional fund-raiser is not an intermediary if the fund-raiser is compensated for fund-raising services at the usual and
customary rate.
(d) A volunteer hosting a fund-raising event at the individual's
home is not an intermediary for purposes of that event.
(30) "Legislation" means bills, resolutions, motions, amendments,
nominations, and other matters pending or proposed in either house of
the state legislature, and includes any other matter that may be the
subject of action by either house or any committee of the legislature
and all bills and resolutions that, having passed both houses, are
pending approval by the governor.
(31) "Lobby" and "lobbying" each mean attempting to influence the
passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature of the state of
Washington, or the adoption or rejection of any rule, standard, rate,
or other legislative enactment of any state agency under the state
Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW. Neither "lobby" nor
"lobbying" includes an association's or other organization's act of
communicating with the members of that association or organization.
(32) "Lobbyist" includes any person who lobbies either in his or
her own or another's behalf.
(33) "Lobbyist's employer" means the person or persons by whom a
lobbyist is employed and all persons by whom he or she is compensated
for acting as a lobbyist.
(34) "Ministerial functions" means an act or duty carried out as
part of the duties of an administrative office without exercise of
personal judgment or discretion.
(35) "Participate" means that, with respect to a particular
election, an entity:
(a) Makes either a monetary or in-kind contribution to a candidate;
(b) Makes an independent expenditure or electioneering
communication in support of or opposition to a candidate;
(c) Endorses a candidate prior to contributions being made by a
subsidiary corporation or local unit with respect to that candidate or
that candidate's opponent;
(d) Makes a recommendation regarding whether a candidate should be
supported or opposed prior to a contribution being made by a subsidiary
corporation or local unit with respect to that candidate or that
candidate's opponent; or
(e) Directly or indirectly collaborates or consults with a
subsidiary corporation or local unit on matters relating to the support
of or opposition to a candidate, including, but not limited to, the
amount of a contribution, when a contribution should be given, and what
assistance, services or independent expenditures, or electioneering
communications, if any, will be made or should be made in support of or
opposition to a candidate.
(36) "Person" includes an individual, partnership, joint venture,
public or private corporation, association, federal, state, or local
governmental entity or agency however constituted, candidate,
committee, political committee, political party, executive committee
thereof, or any other organization or group of persons, however
organized.
(37) "Person in interest" means the person who is the subject of a
record or any representative designated by that person, except that if
that person is under a legal disability, the term "person in interest"
means and includes the parent or duly appointed legal representative.
(38) "Political advertising" includes any advertising displays,
newspaper ads, billboards, signs, brochures, articles, tabloids,
flyers, letters, radio or television presentations, or other means of
mass communication, used for the purpose of appealing, directly or
indirectly, for votes or for financial or other support or opposition
in any election campaign.
(39) "Political committee" means any person (except a candidate or
an individual dealing with his or her own funds or property) having the
expectation of receiving contributions or making expenditures in
support of, or opposition to, any candidate or any ballot proposition.
(40) "Primary" for the purposes of RCW 42.17.640 means the
procedure for nominating a candidate to state office under chapter
29A.52 RCW or any other primary for an election that uses, in large
measure, the procedures established in chapter 29A.52 RCW.
(41) "Prime sponsor or sponsors of a ballot proposition" means the
registered voter or voters who complete the affidavit for a proposed
initiative or referendum as well as any person who holds themselves out
publicly as the sponsor of an initiative or referendum.
(42) "Public office" means any federal, state, judicial, county,
city, town, school district, port district, special district, or other
state political subdivision elective office.
(((42))) (43) "Public record" includes any writing containing
information relating to the conduct of government or the performance of
any governmental or proprietary function prepared, owned, used, or
retained by any state or local agency regardless of physical form or
characteristics. For the office of the secretary of the senate and the
office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives, public
records means legislative records as defined in RCW 40.14.100 and also
means the following: All budget and financial records; personnel
leave, travel, and payroll records; records of legislative sessions;
reports submitted to the legislature; and any other record designated
a public record by any official action of the senate or the house of
representatives.
(((43))) (44) "Recall campaign" means the period of time beginning
on the date of the filing of recall charges under RCW 29A.56.120 and
ending thirty days after the recall election.
(((44))) (45) "Sponsor of an electioneering communications,
independent expenditures, or political advertising" means the person
paying for the electioneering communication, independent expenditure,
or political advertising. If a person acts as an agent for another or
is reimbursed by another for the payment, the original source of the
payment is the sponsor.
(((45))) (46) "State legislative office" means the office of a
member of the state house of representatives or the office of a member
of the state senate.
(((46))) (47) "State office" means state legislative office or the
office of governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, attorney
general, commissioner of public lands, insurance commissioner,
superintendent of public instruction, state auditor, or state
treasurer.
(((47))) (48) "State official" means a person who holds a state
office.
(((48))) (49) "Surplus funds" mean, in the case of a political
committee or candidate, the balance of contributions that remain in the
possession or control of that committee or candidate subsequent to the
election for which the contributions were received, and that are in
excess of the amount necessary to pay remaining debts incurred by the
committee or candidate prior to that election. In the case of a
continuing political committee, "surplus funds" mean those
contributions remaining in the possession or control of the committee
that are in excess of the amount necessary to pay all remaining debts
when it makes its final report under RCW 42.17.065.
(((49))) (50) "Writing" means handwriting, typewriting, printing,
photostating, photographing, and every other means of recording any
form of communication or representation, including, but not limited to,
letters, words, pictures, sounds, or symbols, or combination thereof,
and all papers, maps, magnetic or paper tapes, photographic films and
prints, motion picture, film and video recordings, magnetic or punched
cards, discs, drums, diskettes, sound recordings, and other documents
including existing data compilations from which information may be
obtained or translated.
As used in this chapter, the singular shall take the plural and any
gender, the other, as the context requires.

Sec. 3 RCW 42.17.240 and 1995 c 397 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every elected official and every executive state officer shall
after January 1st and before April 15th of each year file with the
commission a statement of financial affairs for the preceding calendar
year. However, any local elected official whose term of office expires
immediately after December 31st shall file the statement required to be
filed by this section for the year that ended on that December 31st.
(2) Every candidate shall within two weeks of becoming a candidate
file with the commission a statement of financial affairs for the
preceding twelve months.
(3) Every person appointed to a vacancy in an elective office or
executive state officer position shall within two weeks of being so
appointed file with the commission a statement of financial affairs for
the preceding twelve months.
(4) Every prime sponsor or sponsors of a ballot proposition shall,
within two weeks of filing the affidavit for a proposed initiative or
referendum, file with the commission a statement of financial affairs
for the preceding twelve months.
(5) A statement of a candidate or appointee filed during the period
from January 1st to April 15th shall cover the period from January 1st
of the preceding calendar year to the time of candidacy or appointment
if the filing of the statement would relieve the individual of a prior
obligation to file a statement covering the entire preceding calendar
year.
(((5))) (6) No individual may be required to file more than once in
any calendar year.
(((6))) (7) Each statement of financial affairs filed under this
section shall be sworn as to its truth and accuracy.
(((7))) (8) Every elected official and every executive state
officer shall file with their statement of financial affairs a
statement certifying that they have read and are familiar with RCW
42.17.130 or 42.52.180, whichever is applicable.
(((8))) (9) For the purposes of this section, the term "executive
state officer" includes those listed in RCW 42.17.2401.
(((9))) (10) This section does not apply to incumbents or
candidates for a federal office or the office of precinct committee
officer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 29A.72 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The prime sponsor or sponsors of a ballot proposition shall,
before filing an affidavit for a proposed initiative or referendum,
take and subscribe an oath or affirmation in substance as follows: "I
do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will support the Constitution of
the United States and the Constitution and laws of the state of
Washington."
(2) For the purposes of this section, "prime sponsor or sponsors of
a ballot proposition" has the same meaning as in RCW 42.17.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A prime sponsor or sponsors of a proposed
ballot proposition may not accept financial remuneration from the
ballot proposition campaign funds in excess of the annual salary of a
legislator as established in chapter 43.03 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1)(a) No prime sponsor or sponsors of a
ballot proposition may accept gifts, other than those specified in
subsections (2) and (3) of this section, with an aggregate value in
excess of fifty dollars from a single source in a calendar year or a
single gift from multiple sources with a value in excess of fifty
dollars. The value of gifts given to a prime sponsor's family member
or guest shall be attributed to the prime sponsor for the purpose of
determining whether the limit has been exceeded, unless an independent
business, family, or social relationship exists between the donor and
the family member or guest.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection:
(i) "Single source" means any person, as defined in RCW 42.52.010,
whether acting directly or through any agent or other intermediary; and
(ii) "Single gift" includes any event, item, or group of items used
in conjunction with each other or any trip including transportation,
lodging, and attendant costs, not excluded from the definition of gift
under RCW 42.52.010.
(2) The following items are presumed not to influence and may be
accepted without regard to the limit established by this section:
(a) Unsolicited flowers, plants, and floral arrangements;
(b) Unsolicited advertising or promotional items of nominal value,
such as pens and note pads;
(c) Unsolicited tokens or awards of appreciation in the form of a
plaque, trophy, desk item, wall memento, or similar item;
(d) Informational material, publications, or subscriptions related
to the ballot proposition; and
(e) Food and beverages consumed at hosted receptions where
attendance is related to the ballot proposition.
(3) The presumption in subsection (2) of this section is rebuttable
and may be overcome based on the circumstances surrounding the giving
and acceptance of the item.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 5 and 6 of this act are each added
to chapter 42.17 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---