BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.13 RCW
to read as follows:
When territory is annexed under this chapter to a city located
within the boundaries of a regional transit authority, the territory is
simultaneously included within the boundaries of the authority and
subject from the effective date of the annexation to all taxes and
other liabilities and obligations applicable within the city with
respect to the authority. The city must notify the authority of the
annexation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35A.14 RCW
to read as follows:
When territory is annexed under this chapter to a code city located
within the boundaries of a regional transit authority, the territory is
simultaneously included within the boundaries of the authority and
subject from the effective date of the annexation to all taxes and
other liabilities and obligations applicable within the code city with
respect to the authority. The code city must notify the authority of
the annexation.

--- END ---