BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
restructure certain fees for the division of corporations of the office
of the secretary of state in a manner that has minimal revenue impact
but moves the division of corporations towards a more self-sustaining
budget.

Sec. 2 RCW 23B.01.530 and 1993 c 269 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the privilege of doing business, every corporation organized
under the laws of this state, except the corporations for which
existing law provides a different fee schedule, ((shall)) must make and
file a statement in the form prescribed by the secretary of state and
((shall)) must pay an annual license fee each year following
incorporation, on or before the expiration date of its corporate
license, to the secretary of state. The secretary of state ((shall))
must collect an annual license fee of ((ten dollars for each inactive
corporation and fifty dollars for other)) sixty dollars for
corporations that are not inactive corporations, of which ten dollars
is designated to be deposited into the secretary's revolving fund per
RCW 43.07.130. The secretary of state must collect an annual license
fee for inactive corporations as established by the secretary of state
in rule. As used in this section, "inactive corporation" means a
corporation that certifies at the time of filing under this section
that it did not engage in any business activities during the year
ending on the expiration date of its corporate license.

Sec. 3 RCW 24.03.405 and 1993 c 269 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The secretary of state shall charge and collect for:
(a) Filing articles of incorporation, thirty dollars.
(b) Filing an annual report of a domestic or foreign corporation,
ten dollars.
(c) Filing an application of a foreign corporation for a
certificate of authority to conduct affairs in this state, thirty
dollars.
(2))) The secretary of state ((shall)) must establish by rule, fees
for the following:
(a) Filing articles of incorporation.
(b) Filing an annual report of a domestic or foreign corporation.
(c) Filing an application of a foreign corporation for a
certificate of authority to conduct affairs in this state.
(d) An application for reinstatement under RCW 24.03.386.
(((b))) (e) Filing articles of amendment or restatement or an
amendment or supplement to an application for reinstatement.
(((c))) (f) Filing articles of merger or consolidation.
(((d))) (g) Filing a statement of change of address of registered
office or change of registered agent, or revocation, resignation, or
any combination of these. ((A separate fee for filing such statement
shall not be charged if the statement appears in an amendment to
articles of incorporation or in conjunction with the filing of the
annual report.
(e))) (h) Filing articles of dissolution((, no fee)).
(((f))) (i) Filing an application of a foreign corporation for an
amended certificate of authority to conduct affairs in this state.
(((g))) (j) Filing an application for withdrawal of a foreign
corporation and issuing a certificate of withdrawal((, no fee)).
(((h))) (k) Filing a certificate by a foreign corporation of the
appointment of a registered agent. ((A separate fee for filing such
certificate shall not be charged if the statement appears in
conjunction with the filing of the annual report.
(i))) (l) Filing a certificate of election adopting the provisions
of chapter 24.03 RCW.
(((j))) (m) Filing an application to reserve a corporate name.
(((k))) (n) Filing a notice of transfer of a reserved corporate
name.
(((l))) (o) Filing a name registration.
(((m))) (p) Filing any other statement or report authorized for
filing under this chapter.
(((3))) (2) Fees ((shall be)) are adjusted by rule only in an
amount that does not exceed the average biennial increase in the cost
of providing service. This ((shall)) must be determined in a
((biannual [biennial])) biennial cost study performed by the secretary.

Sec. 4 RCW 24.06.450 and 1993 c 269 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The secretary of state shall charge and collect for:
(a) Filing articles of incorporation, thirty dollars.
(b) Filing an annual report, ten dollars.
(c) Filing an application of a foreign corporation for a
certificate of authority to conduct affairs in this state, thirty
dollars.
(2))) The secretary of state ((shall)) must establish by rule, fees
for the following:
(a) Filing articles of incorporation.
(b) Filing an annual report.
(c) Filing an application of a foreign corporation for a
certificate of authority to conduct affairs in this state.
(d) Filing articles of amendment or restatement.
(((b))) (e) Filing articles of merger or consolidation.
(((c))) (f) Filing a statement of change of address of registered
office or change of registered agent, or revocation, resignation, or
any combination of these. ((A separate fee for filing such statement
shall not be charged if the statement appears in an amendment to the
articles of incorporation or in conjunction with the annual report.
(d))) (g) Filing articles of dissolution, no fee.
(((e))) (h) Filing an application of a foreign corporation for an
amended certificate of authority to conduct affairs in this state.
(((f))) (i) Filing a copy of an amendment to the articles of
incorporation of a foreign corporation holding a certificate of
authority to conduct affairs in this state.
(((g))) (j) Filing a copy of articles of merger of a foreign
corporation holding a certificate of authority to conduct affairs in
this state.
(((h))) (k) Filing an application for withdrawal of a foreign
corporation and issuing a certificate of withdrawal((, no fee)).
(((i))) (l) Filing a certificate by a foreign corporation of the
appointment of a registered agent. ((A separate fee for filing such
certificate shall not be charged if the statement appears in an
amendment to the articles of incorporation or in conjunction with the
annual report.
(j))) (m) Filing a certificate by a foreign corporation of the
revocation of the appointment of a registered agent. ((A separate fee
for filing such certificate shall not be charged if the statement
appears in an amendment to the articles of incorporation or in
conjunction with the annual report.
(k))) (n) Filing an application to reserve a corporate name.
(((l))) (o) Filing a notice of transfer of a reserved corporate
name.
(((m))) (p) Filing any other statement or report of a domestic or
foreign corporation.
(((3))) (2) Fees ((shall be)) are adjusted by rule in an amount
that does not exceed the average biennial increase in the cost of
providing service. This ((shall)) must be determined in a biennial
cost study performed by the secretary.

Sec. 5 RCW 25.05.500 and 2009 c 437 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A partnership which is not a limited liability partnership on
June 11, 1998, may become a limited liability partnership upon the
approval of the terms and conditions upon which it becomes a limited
liability partnership by the vote necessary to amend the partnership
agreement except, in the case of a partnership agreement that expressly
considers obligations to contribute to the partnership, the vote
necessary to amend those provisions, and by filing the applications
required by subsection (2) of this section. A partnership which is a
limited liability partnership on June 11, 1998, continues as a limited
liability partnership under this chapter.
(2)(a) To become and to continue as a limited liability
partnership, a partnership ((shall)) must file with the secretary of
state an application stating the name of the partnership; the location
of a registered office, which need not be a place of its activity in
this state; the address of its principal office; if the partnership's
principal office is not located in this state, the address of a
registered office and the name and address of a registered agent for
service of process in this state which the partnership will be required
to continuously maintain; the number of partners; a brief statement of
the business in which the partnership engages; any other matters that
the partnership determines to include; and that the partnership thereby
applies for status as a limited liability partnership.
(b) A registered agent for service of process under (a) of this
subsection must be an individual who is a resident of this state or
other person authorized to do business in this state.
(3) The application ((shall)) must be accompanied by a fee ((of one
hundred seventy-five dollars)) for each partnership as established by
the secretary of state in rule.
(4) The secretary of state ((shall)) must register as a limited
liability partnership any partnership that submits a completed
application with the required fee.
(5) A partnership registered under this section ((shall)) must pay
an annual fee, in each year following the year in which its application
is filed, on a date and in an amount specified by the secretary of
state. The fee must be accompanied by a notice, on a form provided by
the secretary of state, of the number of partners currently in the
partnership and of any material changes in the information contained in
the partnership's application for registration.
(6) Registration is effective immediately after the date an
application is filed, and remains effective until:
(a) It is voluntarily withdrawn by filing with the secretary of
state a written withdrawal notice executed by a majority of the
partners or by one or more partners or other persons authorized to
execute a withdrawal notice; or
(b) Thirty days after receipt by the partnership of a notice from
the secretary of state, which notice ((shall)) must be sent by first-class mail, postage prepaid, that the partnership has failed to make
timely payment of the annual fee specified in subsection (5) of this
section, unless the fee is paid within such a thirty-day period.
(7) The status of a partnership as a limited liability partnership,
and the liability of the partners thereof, ((shall)) is not ((be))
affected by: (a) Errors in the information stated in an application
under subsection (2) of this section or a notice under subsection (6)
of this section; or (b) changes after the filing of such an application
or notice in the information stated in the application or notice.
(8) The secretary of state may provide forms for the application
under subsection (2) of this section or a notice under subsection (6)
of this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.07.120 and 1998 c 103 s 1309 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The secretary of state ((shall)) must establish by rule and
collect the fees in this subsection:
(a) For a copy of any law, resolution, record, or other document or
paper on file in the secretary's office;
(b) For any certificate under seal;
(c) For filing and recording trademark;
(d) For each deed or patent of land issued by the governor;
(e) For recording miscellaneous records, papers, or other
documents.
(2) The secretary of state may adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW
establishing reasonable fees for the following services rendered under
Title 23B RCW, chapter 18.100, 19.09, 19.34, 19.77, 23.86, 23.90,
24.03, 24.06, 24.12, 24.20, 24.24, 24.28, 24.36, 25.04, 25.15, 25.10,
((or)) 25.05, or 26.60 RCW:
(a) Any service rendered in-person at the secretary of state's
office;
(b) Any expedited service;
(c) The electronic or facsimile transmittal of information from
corporation records or copies of documents;
(d) The providing of information by micrographic or other reduced-format compilation;
(e) The handling of checks, drafts, or credit or debit cards upon
adoption of rules authorizing their use for which sufficient funds are
not on deposit; and
(f) Special search charges.
(3) To facilitate the collection of fees, the secretary of state
may establish accounts for deposits by persons who may frequently be
assessed such fees to pay the fees as they are assessed. The secretary
of state may make whatever arrangements with those persons as may be
necessary to carry out this section.
(4) The secretary of state may adopt rules for the use of credit or
debit cards for payment of fees.
(5) No member of the legislature, state officer, justice of the
supreme court, judge of the court of appeals, or judge of the superior
court ((shall)) may be charged for any search relative to matters
pertaining to the duties of his or her office; nor may such official be
charged for a certified copy of any law or resolution passed by the
legislature relative to his or her official duties, if such law has not
been published as a state law.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.07.130 and 2005 c 518 s 924 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is created within the state treasury a revolving fund, to be
known as the "secretary of state's revolving fund," which ((shall))
must be used by the office of the secretary of state to defray the
costs of ((printing, reprinting, or distributing printed matter))
providing registration and information services authorized by law ((to
be issued)) by the office of the secretary of state, and any other cost
of carrying out the functions of the secretary of state under Title 11,
18, 19, 23, 23B, 24, 25, 26, 30, 42, 43, or 64 RCW((, or chapters
18.100, 23.86, 23.90, 24.03, 24.06, 24.12, 24.20, 24.24, 24.28, 24.36,
25.15, or 25.10 RCW)).
The secretary of state is ((hereby)) authorized to charge a fee for
((such)) publications in an amount which will compensate for the costs
of printing, reprinting, and distributing such printed matter. Fees
recovered by the secretary of state under RCW 43.07.120(2), 19.09.305,
19.09.315, 19.09.440, 23B.01.220 (1)(e), (6) and (7), 23B.18.050,
24.03.410, 24.06.455, 25.10.600(6), 25.10.916(1)(e), or 46.64.040, and
such other moneys as are expressly designated for deposit in the
secretary of state's revolving fund ((shall)) must be placed in the
secretary of state's revolving fund.
During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer
from the secretary of state's revolving fund to the state general fund
such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.

Sec. 8 RCW 25.15.105 and 2001 c 307 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each domestic limited liability company, and each foreign
limited liability company authorized to transact business in this
state, ((shall)) must deliver to the secretary of state for filing,
both initial and annual reports that set forth:
(a) The name of the company and the state or country under whose
law it is organized;
(b) The street address of its registered office and the name of its
registered agent at that office in this state;
(c) In the case of a foreign company, the address of its principal
office in the state or country under the laws of which it is organized;
(d) The address of the principal place of business of the company
in this state;
(e) The names and addresses of the company's members, or if the
management of the company is vested in a manager or managers, then the
name and address of its manager or managers; and
(f) A brief description of the nature of its business.
(2) Information in an initial report or an annual report must be
current as of the date the report is executed on behalf of the company.
(3) A company's initial report must be delivered to the secretary
of state within one hundred twenty days of the date on which a domestic
company's certificate of formation was filed, or on which a foreign
company's application for registration was submitted. Subsequent
annual reports must be delivered to the secretary of state on a date
determined by the secretary of state, and at such additional times as
the company elects.
(4)(a) The secretary of state may allow a company to file an
initial or annual report through electronic means. If allowed, the
secretary of state ((shall)) must adopt rules detailing the
circumstances under which the electronic filing of ((such)) the reports
((shall be)) is permitted and how ((such)) the reports may be filed.
(b) For purposes of this section only, a person executing an
electronically filed annual report may deliver the report to the office
of the secretary of state without a signature and without an exact or
conformed copy, but the person's name must appear in the electronic
filing as the person executing the filing, and the filing must state
the capacity in which the person is executing the filing.

Sec. 9 RCW 19.77.030 and 1998 c 39 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the limitations set forth in this chapter, any
person who has adopted and is using a trademark in this state may file
in the office of the secretary of state, on a form to be furnished by
the secretary of state, an application for registration of that
trademark setting forth, but not limited to, the following information:
(a) The name and business address of the applicant, and, if the
applicant is a corporation, its state of incorporation;
(b) The particular goods or services in connection with which the
trademark is used and the class in which such goods or services fall;
(c) The manner in which the trademark is placed on or affixed to
the goods or containers, or displayed in connection with such goods, or
used in connection with the sale or advertising of the services;
(d) The date when the trademark was first used with such goods or
services anywhere and the date when it was first used with such goods
or services in this state by the applicant or his predecessor in
business;
(e) A statement that the trademark is presently in use in this
state by the applicant;
(f) A statement that the applicant believes himself to be the owner
of the trademark and believes that no other person has the right to use
such trademark in connection with the same or similar goods or services
in this state either in the identical form or in such near resemblance
thereto as to be likely, when used on or in connection with the goods
or services of such other person, to cause confusion or mistake or to
deceive; and
(g) Such additional information or documents as the secretary of
state may reasonably require.
(2) A single application for registration of a trademark may
specify all goods or services in a single class or in multiple classes
for which the trademark is actually being used.
(3) The application ((shall)) must be signed by the applicant
individual, or by a member of the applicant firm, or by an officer of
the applicant corporation, association, union or other organization.
(4) The application ((shall)) must be accompanied by three
specimens or facsimiles of the trademark for each of the goods or
services for which its registration is requested, and a filing fee, as
set by rule by the secretary of state, payable to the secretary of
state. The fee established by the secretary may vary based upon the
number of categories listed in the application.
(5) An applicant may correct an application previously filed by the
secretary of state, within ninety days of the original filing, if the
application contains an incorrect statement or the application was
defectively executed, signed, or acknowledged. An application is
corrected by filing a form provided by the secretary of state, and
accompanied by a filing fee established by the secretary by rule. The
correction may not change the mark itself. A corrected application is
effective on the effective date of the document it corrects, except
that it is effective on the date the correction is filed as to persons
relying on the uncorrected document and adversely affected by the
correction.
(6) An applicant may amend an application previously filed by the
secretary of state if the applicant changes the categories in which it
does business. An application is amended by filing a form provided by
the secretary of state, accompanied by three specimens or facsimiles of
the trademark for any new or additional goods or services for which the
amendment is requested, and a filing fee established by the secretary
by rule. The amendment or correction may not change the mark itself.
An amended application is effective on the date it is filed.
(7) If the secretary of state determines within ninety days of
issuance, that a certificate of registration was issued in error, then
the secretary may cancel the certificate of registration. The
secretary shall promptly notify the registrant of the cancellation in
writing. The registrant may petition the superior court of Thurston
county for review of the cancellation within sixty days.

Sec. 10 RCW 23.86.070 and 1993 c 269 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
For filing articles of incorporation of an association organized
under this chapter or filing application for a certificate of authority
by a foreign corporation, there ((shall)) must be paid to the secretary
of state ((the sum of twenty-five dollars)) a fee as established by the
secretary by rule. Fees for filing an amendment to articles of
incorporation ((shall)) must be established by the secretary of state
by rule. For filing other documents with the secretary of state and
issuing certificates, fees ((shall be)) are as prescribed in RCW
23B.01.220. Associations subject to this chapter ((shall)) are not
((be)) subject to any corporation license fees excepting the fees
hereinabove enumerated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 19.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary of state shall collect the following fees in
accordance with this chapter:
(1) For an application for registration as a charitable
organization, a fee of sixty dollars. Twenty dollars of this fee must
be deposited in the state general fund and the remaining forty dollars
must be deposited in the charitable organization education account
under RCW 19.09.530;
(2) For an annual renewal of registration as a charitable
organization, a fee of forty dollars. Ten dollars of this fee must be
deposited in the state general fund and the remaining thirty dollars
must be deposited in the charitable organization education account
under RCW 19.09.530;
(3) For an application for registration as a commercial fundraiser,
a fee of three hundred dollars. Two hundred fifty dollars of this fee
must be deposited in the state general fund and the remaining fifty
dollars must be deposited in the charitable organization education
account under RCW 19.09.530;
(4) For an annual renewal of registration as a commercial
fundraiser, a fee of two hundred twenty-five dollars. One hundred
seventy-five dollars of this fee must be deposited in the state general
fund and the remaining fifty dollars must be deposited in the
charitable organization education account under RCW 19.09.530;
(5) For a registration of a commercial fundraiser service contract,
a fee of twenty dollars. Ten dollars of this fee must be deposited in
the state general fund and the remaining ten dollars must be deposited
in the charitable organization education account under RCW 19.09.530.

Sec. 12 RCW 19.09.075 and 2007 c 471 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
An application for registration as a charitable organization shall
be submitted in the form prescribed by rule by the secretary,
containing, but not limited to, the following:
(1) The name, address, and telephone number of the charitable
organization;
(2) The name(s) under which the organization will solicit
contributions;
(3) The name, address, and telephone number of the officers of or
persons accepting responsibility for the organization;
(4) The names of the three officers or employees receiving the
greatest amount of compensation from the organization;
(5) The purpose of the organization;
(6)(a) Whether the organization is exempt from federal income tax;
and if so the organization shall attach to its application a copy of
the letter by which the internal revenue service granted such status;
and
(b) The name and address of the entity that prepares, reviews, or
audits the financial statement of the organization;
(7) A solicitation report of the organization for the preceding
accounting year including:
(a) The types of solicitations conducted;
(b) The total dollar value of contributions received from
solicitations and from all other sources received on behalf of the
charitable purpose of the charitable organization;
(c) The total amount of money applied to charitable purposes, fund
raising costs, and other expenses; and
(d) The name, address, and telephone number of any commercial fund
raiser used by the organization;
(8) An irrevocable appointment of the secretary to receive service
of process in noncriminal proceedings as provided in RCW 19.09.305; and
(9) The total revenue of the preceding fiscal year.
The solicitation report required to be submitted under subsection
(7) of this section shall be in the form prescribed by rule by the
secretary, or as agreed to by the secretary and a charitable
organization. The president, treasurer, or comparable officer of the
organization must sign and date the application. The application shall
be submitted with a nonrefundable filing fee ((which shall be in an
amount to be established by the secretary by rule. In determining the
amount of this application fee, the secretary may consider factors such
as the entity's annual budget and its federal income tax status))
established in section 11 of this act. If the secretary determines
that the application is complete, the application shall be filed and
the applicant deemed registered.

Sec. 13 RCW 19.09.079 and 2007 c 471 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
An application for registration as a commercial fund raiser shall
be submitted in the form prescribed by the secretary, containing, but
not limited to, the following:
(1) The name, address, and telephone number of the commercial fund-raising entity;
(2) The name(s), address(es), and telephone number(s) of the
owner(s) and principal officer(s) of the commercial fund-raising
entity;
(3) The name, address, and telephone number of the individual
responsible for the activities of the commercial fund-raising entity in
Washington;
(4) The names of the three officers or employees receiving the
greatest amount of compensation from the commercial fund-raising
entity;
(5) The name and address of the entity that prepares, reviews, or
audits the financial statement of the organization;
(6) A solicitation report of the commercial fund-raising entity for
the preceding accounting year, including:
(a) The types of fund raising services conducted;
(b) The names of charitable organizations required to register
under RCW 19.09.065 for whom fund raising services have been performed;
(c) The total value of contributions received on behalf of
charitable organizations required to register under RCW 19.09.065 by
the commercial fund raiser, affiliate of the commercial fund raiser, or
any entity retained by the commercial fund raiser; and
(d) The amount of money disbursed to charitable organizations for
charitable purposes, net of fund raising costs paid by the charitable
organization as stipulated in any agreement between charitable
organizations and the commercial fund raiser;
(7) The name, address, and telephone number of any commercial fund
raiser that was retained in the conduct of providing fund raising
services; and
(8) An irrevocable appointment of the secretary to receive service
of process in noncriminal proceedings as provided in RCW 19.09.305.
The application shall be signed by an officer or owner of the
commercial fund raiser and shall be submitted with a nonrefundable fee
((in an amount to be established by rule of the secretary)) established
in section 11 of this act. If the secretary determines that the
application is complete, the application shall be filed and the
applicant deemed registered.

Sec. 14 RCW 19.09.097 and 2007 c 471 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No charitable organization may contract with a commercial fund
raiser for any fund raising service or activity unless its contract
requires that both parties comply with the law and permits officers of
the charity reasonable access to: (a) The fund raisers' financial
records relating to that charitable organization; (b) the fund raisers'
operations including without limitation the right to be present during
any telephone solicitation; and (c) the names of all of the fund
raisers' employees or staff who are conducting fund raising or
charitable solicitations on behalf of the charitable organization. In
addition, the contract shall specify the amount of raised funds that
the charitable organization will receive or the method of computing
that amount, the amount of compensation of the commercial fund raiser
or the method of computing that amount, and whether the compensation is
fixed or contingent.
(2) Before a charitable organization may contract with a commercial
fund raiser for any fund raising service or activity, the charitable
organization and commercial fund raiser shall complete and file a
registration form with the secretary. The registration shall be filed
by the charitable organization in the form prescribed by the secretary.
The registration shall contain, but not be limited to, the following
information:
(a) The name and registration number of the commercial fund raiser;
(b) The name of the surety or sureties issuing the bond required by
RCW 19.09.190, the aggregate amount of such bond or bonds, the bond
number(s), original effective date(s), and termination date(s);
(c) The name and registration number of the charitable
organization;
(d) The name of the representative of the commercial fund raiser
who will be responsible for the conduct of the fund raising;
(e) The type(s) of service(s) to be provided by the commercial fund
raiser;
(f) The dates such service(s) will begin and end;
(g) The terms of the agreement between the charitable organization
and commercial fund raiser relating to:
(i) Amount or percentages of amounts to inure to the charitable
organization;
(ii) Limitations placed on the maximum amount to be raised by the
fund raiser, if the amount to inure to the charitable organization is
not stated as a percentage of the amount raised;
(iii) Costs of fund raising that will be the responsibility of the
charitable organization, regardless of whether paid as a direct
expense, deducted from the amounts disbursed, or otherwise; and
(iv) The manner in which contributions received directly by the
charitable organization, not the result of services provided by the
commercial fund raiser, will be identified and used in computing the
fee owed to the commercial fund raiser; and
(h) The names of any entity to which more than ten percent of the
total anticipated fund raising cost is to be paid, and whether any
principal officer or owner of the commercial fund raiser or relative by
blood or marriage thereof is an owner or officer of any such entity.
(3) A correct copy of the contract shall be filed with the
secretary before the commencement of any campaign.
(4) The registration form shall be submitted with a nonrefundable
filing fee ((in an amount to be established by rule of the secretary))
established in section 11 of this act and shall be signed by an owner
or principal officer of the commercial fund raiser and the president,
treasurer, or comparable officer of the charitable organization.

Sec. 15 RCW 19.09.355 and 1983 c 265 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all fees and other
moneys received by the secretary of state under this chapter shall be
transmitted to the state treasurer for deposit in the state general
fund.

Sec. 16 RCW 19.09.530 and 2007 c 471 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
The charitable organization education account is created in
(([the])) the state treasury. All receipts from the portion of fees
((authorized in RCW 19.09.520(1))) designated in section 11 of this act
must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent
only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used
only for the charitable organization education program authorized in
RCW 19.09.510.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 RCW 19.09.520 (Charitable organization
education program -- Fees) and 2007 c 471 s 13 are each repealed.

--- END ---