BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
GENERAL PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 The legislature finds that:
(1) The state is projected to experience substantial population
growth in the next two decades and this growth will require substantial
new housing, places of employment, community facilities, and supporting
local, subregional, and regional infrastructure;
(2) In most areas of the state projected to accommodate substantial
growth, there are inadequate community facilities and infrastructure to
facilitate and support such growth. In addition, current public
financing options and resources are not adequate to provide the needed
community facilities and local, subregional, and regional
infrastructure;
(3) A more flexible type of financing mechanism known as a
community facilities district should be available to counties, cities,
and towns so that needed community facilities and local, subregional,
and regional infrastructure can be provided; and
(4) This chapter is intended to facilitate voluntary landowner
financing of community facilities and local, subregional, and regional
infrastructure by authorizing the creation of community facilities
districts, while creating jobs and facilitating economic development.
(5) It is in the interest of the people of the state of Washington
to authorize the establishment of community facility districts as
independently governed, special purpose districts, vested with the
corporate authority included under Article VII, section 9 of the state
Constitution to make local improvements in accordance with this chapter
and to carry out the purposes specifically authorized under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board of supervisors" or "board" means the governing body of
a community facilities district.
(2) "Community facilities district" or "district" means a district
created under this chapter.
(3) "Facility" or "facilities" means the local improvements
included under section 501 of this act.
(4) "Legislative authority" means the governing body of a county,
city, or town to which a petition or amended petition is submitted,
where the proposed or existing community facilities district is
located.
(5) "Petition" means a request, meeting the requirements of section
201 of this act, made by landowners to form a community facilities
district and to voluntarily submit their land to the assessments, fees,
and charges authorized under this chapter and includes an amended
petition meeting the requirements of section 201(3) of this act.
(6) "Special assessment" means an assessment imposed in accordance
with the requirements of this chapter.

PART II
COMMUNITY FACILITIES DISTRICT FORMATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 Community facilities districts are
authorized to be formed for the purposes authorized under this chapter
and may only include land within urban growth areas designated under
the state growth management act, located in portions of one or more
cities, towns, or counties when created in accordance with this
chapter.
(1) To form a community facilities district, a petition must be
presented to the legislative authority of each jurisdiction included
within the boundaries of the proposed district. The petition must:
(a) Designate and describe the boundaries of the district by metes
and bounds or reference to United States townships, ranges, and legal
subdivisions;
(b) Be executed by one hundred percent of all owners of private
property located within the boundaries of the proposed district. The
property owners must include a request to subject their property to the
assessments, fees, and/or charges, up to the amount included in the
petition and authorized under this chapter;
(c) Include a certification by the petitioners that they want to
voluntarily submit their property to the authority of the district
under this chapter to approve the petitioner's request to submit their
property to the assessments, fees, and/or charges, up to the amount
included in the petition and authorized under this chapter;
(d) Include a general explanation of the objective and plan of the
district;
(e) Declare the district will be conducive to public health,
safety, and welfare;
(f) Assert that the purpose for forming the district will be a
benefit to the land located in the district;
(g) Be accompanied by an "obligation" signed by at least two
petitioners who agree to pay the costs of the formation process;
(h) Include a list of petitioners who are willing and able to serve
on the board of supervisors. All petitioners within a proposed
district are eligible to include their name on the list of eligible
supervisors; and
(i) If it proposes a special assessment, include: (i) Each
separate lot, tract, parcel of land, or other property in the district;
(ii) the acreage of the property; (iii) the name and address of the
owner or reputed owner of each lot, tract, parcel of land, or other
property as shown on the tax rolls of the county assessor; and (iv) the
special assessment proposed to be imposed on each lot, tract, parcel of
land, or other property.
(2) The petition must be filed with the auditor of each county in
which property included within the proposed district is located. The
auditor for the county in which the largest geographic portion of the
proposed district is located must be the lead auditor for the purposes
of this section. Within ten days of the lead auditor's receipt of the
petition, the lead auditor must confirm that the petition has been
validly executed by one hundred percent of all owners of the property
located within the proposed district, including confirmation by the
auditors of all other counties with whom the petition was filed.
Within ten days of the lead auditor's finding that the petition either
does or does not contain the required signatures, the lead auditor must
either (a) transmit the petition, together with a certificate of
sufficiency attached thereto, to each legislative authority petitioned
for formation of the district; or (b) return the petition to the
petitioners with a list of property owners who must sign the petition
in order to comply with this section. There are no restrictions on the
number of petitions that may be submitted by one or more property
owners.
(3) A petition may be amended for any reason if the amendment is
signed by one hundred percent of the owners of property located within
the district proposed in the amended petition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 A public hearing on the petition must be
held by the legislative authority of each jurisdiction included within
the boundaries of the proposed district, not less than thirty, but not
more than forty-five days, from the date that the lead county auditor
issues the certificate of sufficiency required under section 201 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 Notice of all public hearings must include
a description of the proposal, be mailed to all petitioners, and must
be published once a week for three consecutive weeks in the official
paper of the applicable county, city, or town prior to the date set for
the hearing. The notice must be posted for not less than fifteen days
prior to the date of the hearing in each of three public places within
the boundaries of the proposed district. Each notice must contain the
time, date, and place of the public hearing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 At the time and place of the public
hearing, the legislative authority must consider the petition. The
legislative authority must receive any evidence it deems material that
supports or opposes the formation of the district, including the
inclusion or exclusion of land. Unless an amended petition satisfying
the requirements of section 201 of this act is approved in accordance
with the requirements of this chapter, no land outside the boundaries
described in the petition may be included within the proposed district.
With the exception of the authority of any court hearing an appeal made
in accordance with the requirements of this chapter, no land inside the
boundaries of an approved petition may be removed from the district
unless an amended petition satisfying the requirements of section 201
of this act is approved in accordance with the requirements of this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 (1) The legislative authority may act on
the petition to form a community facilities district at the public
hearing held under section 204 of this act and in no event may the
legislative authority's decision be issued later than thirty days after
the day of the public hearing. The legislative authority must approve
the petition by resolution or ordinance if the legislative authority
determines, in its sole discretion, that the petitioners will benefit
from the proposed district and that the formation of the district will
be in the best interest of the county, city or town, as applicable, and
that formation of the district is consistent with the requirements of
Washington's growth management act.
(2) A community facilities district may not be formed unless the
legislative authority of each jurisdiction included within the
boundaries of the proposed district makes the finding required under
subsection (1) of this section with respect to the property included
within that jurisdiction's boundaries and with respect to the interest
of the jurisdiction.
(3) Two or more legislative authorities may adopt a joint
resolution approving a petition.
(4) All resolutions approving a petition must conform to the terms
and conditions contained in the petition, including the maximum amounts
of special assessments, fees, and/or charges set forth in the petition,
and must designate the name and number of the community facilities
district being formed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 (1) Any person who objects to formation of
the district may appeal the final decision of a legislative authority
to approve a petition for formation of a community facilities district
by filing an appeal with the superior court of the county in which any
part of the district is located within five days of the legislative
authority's decision.
(2) If no appeal is filed within five days of a legislative
authority's approval of the petition, the legislative authority's
decision is deemed valid, complete, and final, and neither the legal
existence of the district, nor the terms and conditions of an approved
petition can thereafter be challenged or questioned by any person on
the grounds of procedural defect or otherwise. Certified copies of
each approval must be filed with the auditor of the county or counties
in which the community facilities district is located.

PART III
COMMUNITY FACILITIES DISTRICT BOARD OF SUPERVISORS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 (1) A community facilities district must
be governed by a board of supervisors possessing the powers set forth
under section 401 of this act. The board of supervisors must be
appointed by the applicable legislative authority. Except as expressly
provided under this section, each legislative authority is authorized
to appoint members to the board of supervisors only from among the
members of its own governing body. The legislative authority of the
jurisdiction having the greatest area within the district must appoint
the petitioner members required under subsection (2) or (3) of this
section. The term of office of each supervisor is three years and
until a successor is appointed, except that the supervisors first
appointed serve for one and two years respectively from the date of
their appointments, as designated in their appointments.
(2) If the boundaries of a district include only one jurisdiction,
then the board of supervisors consists of: (a) Three members of the
legislative authority of the jurisdiction; and (b) two members
appointed from among the petitioners listed in the petition as provided
in section 201(1)(h) of this act.
(3) If the boundaries of the district include more than one
jurisdiction, then the board of supervisors consists of: (a) Two
members appointed from the legislative authority of the jurisdiction
containing the largest geographic portion of the approved district; (b)
one member appointed from the legislative authority of each additional
jurisdiction in which the district is located; and (c) either one or
two members appointed from the list of eligible petitioners included in
the petition as provided in section 201(1)(h) of this act, depending on
the number of additional members that are required to result in an
overall odd number of supervisors.
(4) Vacancies on the board must be filled by appointments by the
legislative authority authorized to make appointments under this
section. Vacancies must be filled by a person in the same position
vacating the board, which for initial petitioner members includes
property owners within the boundaries of an approved district.
Supervisors must serve without compensation, but they are entitled to
expenses, including traveling expenses, necessarily incurred in
discharge of their duties. The board must designate a chair from time
to time.

PART IV
COMMUNITY FACILITIES DISTRICT POWERS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 (1) A community facilities district
created in accordance with this chapter is an independently governed,
special purpose district, vested with the corporate authority included
under Article VII, section 9 of the state Constitution to make local
improvements in accordance with this chapter.
(2) Subject to the terms and conditions of an approved petition, a
community facilities district has the powers necessary to carry out the
specific purposes authorized under this chapter including, but not
limited to, the authority to:
(a) Acquire, purchase, hold, lease, finance, manage, occupy,
construct, and sell real and personal property, facilities, or any
interest therein, either inside or outside of the boundaries of the
district;
(b) Finance and construct facilities authorized under this chapter;
(c) Enter into and perform any and all contracts;
(d) Levy and enforce the collection of special assessments, fees,
and charges, for district revenue, against the property included within
a district approved in accordance with this chapter;
(e) Enter into lease-purchase agreements with or without an option
to purchase;
(f) Enter into executory conditional sales contracts, leases, and
installment promissory notes;
(g) Borrow money to the extent and in the manner authorized by this
chapter;
(h) Hold in trust property useful to accomplishment of the
authority granted under this chapter;
(i) Issue revenue bonds in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW and
the requirements of this chapter, payable from revenue of the district
that is legally available to be pledged to secure the revenue bonds,
which must include, but not be limited to, special assessments;
(j) Contract with any municipal corporation, governmental, or
private agencies to carry out the purposes authorized by this chapter;
(k) Sue and be sued;
(l) Accept and receive on behalf of the district any money or
property donated, devised, or bequeathed to the district and carry out
the terms of the donation, devise, or bequest, if it is within the
powers granted by law to community facilities districts or, in the
absence of such terms, expend or use the money or property for district
purposes as determined by the board of supervisors; and
(m) Do any and all lawful acts required and expedient to carry out
the express authority provided in this chapter.

PART V
COMMUNITY FACILITIES DISTRICT FINANCES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 Through the use of district revenue
derived through special assessments, fees, and charges authorized under
this chapter and, consistent with the terms and conditions of a
petition approved in accordance with this chapter, a community
facilities district may finance all or a portion of the following
costs, expenses, and facilities whether located inside or outside the
boundaries of an approved district:
(1) The cost, or any portion thereof, of the purchase, finance,
lease, sublease, construction, expansion, improvement, or
rehabilitation of any facility with an estimated life of five years or
longer;
(2) The planning and design work that is directly related to the
purchase, construction, expansion, improvement, or rehabilitation of a
facility, including engineering, architectural, planning, and
inspection costs;
(3) Facilities listed in RCW 35.43.040 to the extent not specified
in this section;
(4) Sanitary sewage systems, including collection, transport,
storage, treatment, dispersal, effluent use, and discharge;
(5) Drainage and flood control systems, including collection,
transport, diversion, storage, detention, retention, dispersal, use,
and discharge;
(6) Water systems for domestic, industrial, irrigation, municipal,
or community facilities purposes, including production, collection,
storage, treatment, transport, delivery, connection, and dispersal;
(7) Highways, streets, roadways, and parking facilities, including
all areas for vehicular use for travel, ingress, egress, and parking;
(8) Areas for pedestrian, equestrian, bicycle, or other nonmotor
vehicle use for travel, ingress, egress, and parking;
(9) Pedestrian malls, parks, recreational facilities, and open-space facilities for the use of members of the public for
entertainment, assembly, and recreation;
(10) Landscaping, including earthworks, structures, lakes, and
other water features, plants, trees, and related water delivery
systems;
(11) Public buildings, public safety facilities, and community
facilities;
(12) Publicly owned natural gas transmission and distribution
facilities, facilities for the transmission or distribution of
electrical energy, and limited communications facilities, specifically
poles, trenches, and conduits, for use of any communications provider;
(13) Street lighting;
(14) Traffic control systems and devices, including signals,
controls, markings, and signage;
(15) Systems of surface, underground, or overhead railways,
tramways, buses, or any other means of mass transportation facilities,
including passenger, terminal, station parking, and related facilities
and areas for passenger and vehicular use for travel, ingress, egress,
and parking;
(16) Library, educational, and cultural facilities; and
(17) Facilities similar to those listed in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 (1) Consistent with the terms and
conditions of a petition approved in accordance with this chapter, a
community facilities district may impose special assessments on
property located inside the district and benefited by the facilities
provided, or to be provided, by a district and may pledge all or a
portion of the revenues, together with any other revenues that may be
legally available to the district, to the payment of revenue bonds as
authorized under this chapter. The term of the special assessment is
limited to forty years or the term of any bonds issued by or on behalf
of the district to which the revenue generated by the special
assessment is specifically dedicated or obligated.
(2) Any reasonable method or combination of methods may be used in
the petition to compute special assessments, determine manifest degrees
of benefit or use from facilities, activities, or improvements funded
directly or indirectly by special assessments under this section, and
to arrive at a final assessment roll. Administrative and operational
costs incurred by the district may be proportionally included in these
special assessments. A petition meeting the requirements of section
201 of this act may provide for the reduction or waiver of special
assessments for low-income households as that term is defined in RCW
36.130.010.
(3) The board must set a date, time, and place for hearing any
objections to the system of assessments and the special assessment roll
set forth in the petition. Objections must be made in writing, must
clearly state the grounds for objections, and must be filed with the
board prior to the public hearing. Objections to a special assessment
or final assessments roll that are not made as provided in this section
are deemed waived and will not be considered by the board or a court on
appeal.
(4) The board of supervisors must ensure that the system or systems
of assessment included in the petition utilizes a differential system
of assessment to distinguish between different classes of property
within the district and that the assessments reflect the benefit
accruing to the assessed property as a result of the proposed
activities to be funded thereby.
(a) If the system of assessments included in the petition or
amended petition satisfies the requirements of this subsection (4),
then the board of supervisors must adopt an ordinance or resolution
approving the system or systems of assessment and finalizing the
assessment roll.
(b) If the system of assessments included in the petition or
amended petition does not satisfy the requirements of this subsection
(4), then the board may correct, revise, raise, lower, change, or
modify the special assessment roll or any part thereof, and return the
petition to the petitioner with a detailed explanation of the changes
made by the board.
(c) If the petition is revised by the board in any way, then the
petitioner must have the opportunity to take either of the following
unanimous actions: (i) Amend or rescind the petition; or (ii) accept
the changes made by the board, upon which occurrence the board must
adopt an ordinance approving the revised system of assessments and the
final assessment roll as modified by the board.
(5) The decision of the board upon any objection to the special
assessment roll may be appealed to the superior court only if
objections are timely made in the manner prescribed under subsection
(3) of this section.
(a)(i) The appeal must be made within ten days after publication of
a notice that the ordinance or resolution approving the system of
special assessment and the final special assessment roll has been
adopted by filing written notice of the appeal with the board and the
clerk of the superior court in the county in which the real property is
situated.
(ii) The notice of appeal must describe the property subject to the
assessment forming the basis for the appeal and must set forth the
specific objections of the appellant to the special assessment.
(iii) Within ten days from the filing of the notice of appeal with
the clerk of the superior court, the appellant must file with the clerk
of the court a transcript consisting of the special assessment roll
together with the resolution confirming the special assessment roll and
the record of the board with reference to the special assessment. The
transcript, upon payment of the necessary fees therefor, must be
furnished by the officer having custody of the special assessment roll
and must be certified to contain full, true, and correct copies of all
matters and proceedings required to be included in the transcript. The
fees must be the same as the fees payable to the county clerk for the
preparation and certification of transcripts on appeal to the supreme
court or the court of appeals in civil actions.
(b) At the time of the filing of the notice of appeal with the
clerk of the superior court, a sufficient bond in the sum of two
hundred dollars, with a surety or sureties thereon as provided by law
for appeals in civil cases, must be filed. If the appeal is
unsuccessful, the appellant must pay all costs incurred by the board
because of the appeal. The court may order the appellant, upon
application therefor, to execute and file the additional bond or bonds
as the necessity of the case may require.
(c)(i) Within three days after the transcript is filed in the
superior court, the appellant must give written notice to the board
that the transcript is filed. The notice must state a time, not less
than three days from the service thereof, when the appellant will call
up the cause for hearing. The superior court must, at this time or at
a later time as may be fixed by order of the court, hear and determine
the appeal without a jury, and the cause must have preference over all
civil causes pending in the court, except proceedings under an act
relating to eminent domain in that jurisdiction and actions of forcible
entry and detainer.
(ii) The judgment of the court must confirm, correct, modify, or
annul the special assessment or annual special assessments insofar as
the same affects the property of the appellant.
(iii) A certified copy of the decision of the court must be filed
with the officer having custody of the special assessment roll, and he
or she must modify and correct the special assessment roll in
accordance with the decision.
(d)(i) Any appeal must be made to the supreme court or the court of
appeals from the judgment of the superior court, as in other cases.
However, the appeal must be taken within fifteen days after the date of
the entry of the judgment of the superior court, and the record and
opening brief of the appellant in the cause must be filed in the
supreme court or the court of appeals within sixty days after the
appeal is taken by notice as provided in this section.
(ii) The time for filing the record and serving and filing of
briefs may be extended by order of the superior court, or by
stipulation of the parties concerned. The supreme court or the court
of appeals on the appeal may correct, modify, confirm, or annul the
special assessment or annual special assessments insofar as the same
affects the property of the appellant.
(iii) A certified copy of the order of the supreme court or the
court of appeals upon the appeal must be filed with the officer having
custody of the special assessment roll, who must thereupon modify and
correct the special assessment roll in accordance with the decision.
(6) The system or systems of assessment must be reviewed and
finalized by the board of supervisors at least once per year. A system
or systems of assessment must be finalized on or before the first of
September in the year that it is finalized. If the board of
supervisors is responsible for establishing a system or systems of
assessment for more than one district, then the board of supervisors
may, at its option, stagger the initial finalization of the systems of
assessment for different districts over a period of up to two years.
Assessments must be collected in districts pursuant to the district's
previous system of assessment until the system or systems of assessment
under this chapter are finalized under this section.
(7) Every district must use the assessed value applicable to forest
land, farm and agricultural land, or open space land, under chapter
84.33 or 84.34 RCW, when the land has been designated as such and the
assessed value is used as a component in determining the district
assessment and property designated as such is subject to assessments
approved under this chapter. If a district uses a fractional amount of
assessed value as a component in determining the district assessment,
then a fractional amount of the value applicable to forest land, farm
and agricultural land, or open space land, under chapter 84.33 or 84.34
RCW, must be used.
(8)(a) Or on before December 1st of each year, the district must
adopt a budget reflecting the special assessments approved under this
chapter consistent with the terms of the petition. A copy of the
resolution and the budget must be forwarded immediately to the
treasurer of the jurisdictions in which the district is located.
(b) Special assessments necessary to generate funds for this budget
must be imposed pursuant to the system or systems of assessment
approved by the board of supervisors. Special assessments must be
collected by the county treasurer or treasurers within which the
district is located. Notice of the special assessments must be
included on all annual notices of property taxes and included on a
separate notice mailed separately from the notice of property taxes
due, not less than once per year, with the following notice appearing
at the top of the page in at least fourteen point, bold font:

****NOTICE****

THIS PROPERTY IS SUBJECT TO THE ASSESSMENTS, FEES, AND CHARGES ITEMIZED
BELOW AND APPROVED BY COMMUNITY FACILITIES DISTRICT # . . . . .. AS
THE OWNER OR POTENTIAL BUYER OF THIS PROPERTY, YOU ARE, OR WOULD BE,
RESPONSIBLE FOR PAYMENT OF THE AMOUNTS ITEMIZED BELOW.

PLEASE REFER TO RCW 36.--.--- (section 502, chapter . . ., Laws of 2010
(section 502 of this act)) OR CONTACT YOUR COUNTY AUDITOR FOR
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION.

(9) Special assessments are due at the same time property taxes are
due and constitute liens on the land or improvements upon which they
are imposed. Special assessments must be collected and foreclosed by
the appropriate officers of the jurisdiction within which the district
is located, in the same manner provided by law for the foreclosure of
liens held by cities or towns against property in local improvement
districts. The applicable treasurers may impose a fee for collecting
special assessments not to exceed one percent of the dollar value of
special assessments collected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 (1) The district may utilize the revenue
derived in accordance with this chapter for the payment of principal
and interest on revenue bonds and/or special assessment bonds issued to
fund or reimburse the costs of facilities authorized under this chapter
and may otherwise utilize the revenue to directly fund the costs of
providing the facilities authorized under this chapter on a pay-as-you-go basis.
(2) The board of supervisors may establish, administer, and pay or
otherwise obligate the revenue generated in accordance with this
chapter into a specific fund created by or on behalf of the district,
in order to guarantee payment of obligations incurred in connection
with facilities provided under this chapter, including the payment of
principal and interest on any bonds issued by or on behalf of the
district.
(3) The proceeds of any bond issued pursuant to this chapter may be
used to pay any and all costs related to providing the facilities
authorized under this chapter, including expenses incurred in
connection with issuance of the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 (1) Consistent with the terms and
conditions of a petition approved under this chapter, the board of
supervisors may by resolution, for community facilities district
purposes authorized by law, fix and impose a benefit charge on personal
property, real property, and improvements to real property which are
located within the community facilities district on the date specified
and which have or will receive the benefits provided by the community
facilities district, to be paid by the owners of the properties.
(2) A benefit charge imposed must be reasonably proportioned to the
measurable benefits to property resulting from the facilities and
services afforded by the district. It is acceptable to allocate the
benefit charges to the properties based on any reasonable method. All
charges are subject to contest by the property owners subject to the
charges on the grounds of unreasonable or capricious allocation in
excess of the measurable benefits to the property resulting from
services afforded by the district.
(3) For administrative purposes, the benefit charge imposed on any
individual property may be compiled into a single charge, provided that
the district, upon request of the property owner, provide an itemized
list of charges for each measurable benefit included in the charge.
(4) The resolution establishing benefit charges must specify, by
legal geographical areas or other specific designations, the charge to
apply to each property by location, type, or other designation, or
other information that is necessary to the proper computation of the
benefit charge to be charged to each property owner subject to the
resolution. The district must determine and identify the personal
properties, real property, and improvements to real property which are
subject to a benefit charge in each community facilities district and
must furnish and deliver to the county treasurer a listing of the
properties with information describing the location, legal description,
and address of the person to whom the statement of benefit charges is
to be mailed, the name of the owner, and the value of the property and
improvements, together with the benefit charge to apply to each.
(5) Each community facilities district must contract, prior to the
imposition of a benefit charge, for the administration and collection
of the benefit charge by the treasurer of the applicable county, city,
or town, who must deduct a percent, as provided by contract for
reimbursement of expenses incurred by the assessor and treasurer in the
administration of the resolution and this chapter. The treasurer must
make distributions each year, as the charges are collected, in the
amount of the benefit charges imposed on behalf of each district, less
the deduction provided for in the contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505 Subject to applicable debt limits, a
community facilities district may incur general indebtedness for the
purposes expressly authorized under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 506 No bonds issued by or on behalf of a
community facilities district are obligations of any city, town,
county, or the state of Washington or any political subdivision thereof
other than the district and the bonds will so state, unless the
legislative authority of the city, town, county, or the legislature
expressly authorizes particular bonds to be guaranteed by or
obligations of its respective city, town, county, or of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 507 (1) If a district is located entirely
within one jurisdiction, then the treasurer of that jurisdiction is the
treasurer of the district. If the community facilities district is
located in more than one jurisdiction, then the treasurer of the
district is the treasurer of the jurisdiction with the greatest area
included within the district. Except as specifically provided under
this chapter, the duties of a treasurer for a county, city, or town are
as provided under applicable law.
(2) The district treasurer must establish a community facilities
district fund, into which must be paid all district revenues. The
district treasurer must also maintain any special funds created by the
board of supervisors of the community facilities district, into which
the district treasurer must place all money as the board of supervisors
may, by resolution, direct. The treasurer may create such subfunds,
accounts, and subaccounts as he or she deems necessary.
(3) The district treasurer may pay assessment bonds and revenue
bonds and the accrued interest thereon in accordance with their terms
from the appropriate fund when interest or principal payments become
due.
(4) All interest collected on community facilities district funds
belongs to the district and must be deposited to its credit in the
proper district funds.

PART VI
IMPACT FEES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 A new section is added to chapter 82.02
RCW to read as follows:
A community facilities district may not be required to pay an
impact fee under the provisions of RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090.

PART VII
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 All assessments, fees, and charges,
imposed on the respective lots, tracts, parcels of land, and other
property included within the boundaries of an approved district in
accordance with this chapter, are a lien upon the property from the
date of final approval and are paramount and superior to any other lien
or encumbrance whatsoever, theretofore or thereafter created, except a
lien for general taxes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702 Sections 101 through 507 and 701 of this
act constitute a new chapter in Title 36 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---