BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.55.050 and 2009 c 551 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to any otherwise applicable statutory dollar rate
limitations, regular property taxes may be levied by or for a taxing
district in an amount exceeding the limitations provided for in this
chapter if ((such)) the levy is authorized by a proposition approved by
a majority of the voters of the taxing district voting on the
proposition at a general election held within the district or at a
special election within the taxing district called by the district for
the purpose of submitting ((such)) the proposition to the voters. Any
election held pursuant to this section ((shall)) must be held not more
than twelve months prior to the date on which the proposed levy is to
be made, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section. The
ballot of the proposition ((shall)) must state the dollar rate proposed
and ((shall)) must clearly state the conditions, if any, which are
applicable under subsection (4) of this section.
(2)(a) Subject to statutory dollar limitations, a proposition
placed before the voters under this section may authorize annual
increases in levies for multiple consecutive years, up to six
consecutive years, during which period each year's authorized maximum
legal levy ((shall)) must be used as the base upon which an increased
levy limit for the succeeding year is computed, but the ballot
proposition must state the dollar rate proposed only for the first year
of the consecutive years and must state the limit factor, or a
specified index to be used for determining a limit factor, such as the
consumer price index, which need not be the same for all years, by
which the regular tax levy for the district may be increased in each of
the subsequent consecutive years. For any levy that is subject to
voter approval under this section, the ballot proposition also must
state the following:
(i) The currently existing dollar rate, as of the date the
proposition is subject to voter approval under this section; and
(ii) The amount the proposed levy increase exceeds the currently
existing dollar rate. Elections for this purpose must be held at a
primary or general election. The title of each ballot measure must
state the limited purposes for which the proposed annual increases
during the specified period of up to six consecutive years ((shall))
must be used.
(b)(i) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (2)(b),
funds raised by a levy under this subsection may not supplant existing
funds used for the limited purpose specified in the ballot title. For
purposes of this subsection, existing funds means the actual operating
expenditures for the calendar year in which the ballot measure is
approved by voters. Actual operating expenditures excludes lost
federal funds, lost or expired state grants or loans, extraordinary
events not likely to reoccur, changes in contract provisions beyond the
control of the taxing district receiving the services, and major
nonrecurring capital expenditures.
(ii) The supplanting limitations in (b)(i) of this subsection do
not apply to levies approved by the voters in calendar years 2009,
2010, and 2011, in any county with a population of one million five
hundred thousand or more. This subsection (2)(b)(ii) only applies to
levies approved by the voters after July 26, 2009.
(iii) The supplanting limitations in (b)(i) of this subsection do
not apply to levies approved by the voters in calendar year 2009 and
thereafter in any county with a population less than one million five
hundred thousand. This subsection (2)(b)(iii) only applies to levies
approved by the voters after July 26, 2009.
(3) After a levy authorized pursuant to this section is made, the
dollar amount of such levy may not be used for the purpose of computing
the limitations for subsequent levies provided for in this chapter,
unless the ballot proposition expressly states that the levy made under
this section will be used for this purpose.
(4) If expressly stated, a proposition placed before the voters
under subsection (1) or (2) of this section may:
(a) Use the dollar amount of a levy under subsection (1) of this
section, or the dollar amount of the final levy under subsection (2) of
this section, for the purpose of computing the limitations for
subsequent levies provided for in this chapter;
(b) Limit the period for which the increased levy is to be made
under (a) of this subsection;
(c) Limit the purpose for which the increased levy is to be made
under (a) of this subsection, but if the limited purpose includes
making redemption payments on bonds, the period for which the increased
levies are made shall not exceed nine years;
(d) Set the levy or levies at a rate less than the maximum rate
allowed for the district; or
(e) Include any combination of the conditions in this subsection.
(5) Except as otherwise expressly stated in an approved ballot
measure under this section, subsequent levies ((shall)) must be
computed as if:
(a) The proposition under this section had not been approved; and
(b) The taxing district had made levies at the maximum rates which
would otherwise have been allowed under this chapter during the years
levies were made under the proposition.

--- END ---