BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29A.72 RCW
to read as follows:
Any person who signs a petition for a ballot measure may request
that his or her signature be removed on that petition by making a
written request to the secretary of state. The request must be signed
and postmarked no later than the day signature petitions are due to be
filled with the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall
revoke a signature only in instances where the signature verification
procedure necessitates that all signatures on a petition be verified.

--- END ---