BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In 2008, the legislature enacted
comprehensive legislation in support of rigorous, high-quality
secondary career and technical education. It is the legislature's
intent to continue this support and address lingering issues regarding
recognition of career and technical courses by community and technical
colleges.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.50.531 and 2008 c 170 s 108 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is the legislature's intent to recognize and support the
work of community and technical colleges, high schools, and skill
centers in creating articulation and dual credit agreements for career
and technical education students, in part by codifying current
practice.
(2) Community and technical colleges shall create agreements with
high schools and skill centers to offer dual high school and college
credit for secondary career and technical courses. Agreements, with
input from instructional staff, shall be ((subject to approval))
approved by the chief instructional officer of the college ((and the
principal)) and the career and technical education director of the high
school or the executive director of the skill center.
(3) Community and technical colleges may create dual credit
agreements with high schools and skill centers that are located outside
the college district boundary or service area.
(4) If a community or technical college has created an agreement
with a high school or skill center to offer college credit for a
secondary career and technical course, all community and technical
colleges shall accept the course for an equal amount of college credit.
A college may not charge a student more than a standard transcription
fee to accept a course under this subsection for college credit.

--- END ---