BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the foundations
of school success are laid long before students enter kindergarten.
Parents are their children's primary educators and must be acknowledged
as key partners in the education process. The legislature recognizes
that time and finances are constraints in expanding parent outreach and
parent involvement activities. But the legislature believes that the
benefits of outreach to parents of kindergarten students and supporting
their students' transition into school are worth the cost of some
instructional time in kindergarten.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.305
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A school district may submit an application to the state board
of education to count hours of kindergarten outreach as defined by this
section for up to five percent of the minimum instructional hours for
kindergarten students required under RCW 28A.150.220 and 28A.150.315.
(2) The purpose of kindergarten outreach is to encourage, support,
and assist parents in their role as the primary educator of their
children and to support students' successful transition into the K-12
education system. Outreach activities should be structured to be as
accessible as possible to the maximum number of parents. Participation
in kindergarten outreach activities is optional for parents.
(3) As used in this section, "kindergarten outreach" includes, but
is not limited to:
(a) Visits to students' homes to meet with parents or legal
guardians;
(b) Special educational events or activities for both parents and
students; and
(c) Classes or workshops for parents.
(4) The state board of education shall develop a procedure for
receiving and reviewing applications under this section. A school
district may submit an application for some or all kindergarten
programs in the district and for half-day or full-day kindergarten
programs. At a minimum:
(a) Each application must include home visits as one kindergarten
outreach activity but may include other additional activities.
(b) The type of kindergarten outreach activities proposed, their
intended purpose, and the estimated number of hours for each must be
identified and described in the application.
(c) Kindergarten outreach must be conducted by the certificated
instructional staff and classified instructional support staff who
would otherwise be providing direct instruction to the kindergarten
students. Other school or district staff may also participate in
outreach activities.
(5) An application approved by the state board of education under
this section may be in effect for no more than three school years,
after which a school district must reapply.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.150.205 and 1992 c 141 s 502 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definition in
this section applies throughout RCW 28A.150.200 through 28A.150.295 and
section 2 of this act.
(1) "Instructional hours" means those hours students are provided
the opportunity to engage in educational activity planned by and under
the direction of school district staff, as directed by the
administration and board of directors of the district, inclusive of
intermissions for class changes, recess, and teacher/parent-guardian
conferences that are planned and scheduled by the district for the
purpose of discussing students' educational needs or progress, and
exclusive of time actually spent for meals.
(2) For school districts with applications approved by the state
board of education under section 2 of this act, "instructional hours"
also means hours of kindergarten outreach activities.

--- END ---