BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.71 RCW
to read as follows:
Peddlers and vendors of books, periodicals, or newspapers who sell
house-to-house may only sell or offer to sell goods between the hours
of 10:00 a.m. and 8:00 p.m. or thirty minutes after sunset, whichever
is earlier. A person who sells or offers to sell outside of these
times commits a class 2 civil infraction under chapter 7.80 RCW and is
subject to a fine set out in chapter 7.80 RCW.

--- END ---