BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.75.020 and 2002 c 247 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be unlawful for any person to lead, drive, ride, or propel
any team, wagon, animal, or vehicle other than a bicycle, local
electric cart, electric personal assistive mobility device, or similar
vehicle upon and along any bicycle path constructed within or without
the corporate limits of any city or town excepting at suitable
crossings to be provided in the construction of such paths. Any person
violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Local electric cart" means a self-propelled, electrically powered,
four-wheeled device whose speed attainable in one mile is less than
twenty miles per hour and which is not required to conform to federal
regulations under 49 C.F.R. Sec. 571.500.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.04.320 and 2007 c 510 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Motor vehicle" means every vehicle that is self-propelled and
every vehicle that is propelled by electric power obtained from
overhead trolley wires, but not operated upon rails. "Motor vehicle"
includes a neighborhood electric vehicle as defined in RCW 46.04.357.
"Motor vehicle" includes a medium-speed electric vehicle as defined in
RCW 46.04.295. An electric personal assistive mobility device is not
considered a motor vehicle. A power wheelchair is not considered a
motor vehicle. A local electric cart is not considered a motor
vehicle.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.04.400 and 2003 c 141 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Pedestrian" means any person who is afoot or who is using a
wheelchair, a power wheelchair, a local electric cart, or a means of
conveyance propelled by human power other than a bicycle.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.04.670 and 2003 c 141 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Vehicle" includes every device capable of being moved upon a
public highway and in, upon, or by which any persons or property is or
may be transported or drawn upon a public highway, including bicycles.
The term does not include power wheelchairs or devices other than
bicycles moved by human or animal power or used exclusively upon
stationary rails or tracks. Mopeds shall not be considered vehicles or
motor vehicles for the purposes of chapter 46.70 RCW. Bicycles shall
not be considered vehicles for the purposes of chapter 46.12, 46.16, or
46.70 RCW. Electric personal assistive mobility devices and local
electric carts are not considered vehicles or motor vehicles for the
purposes of chapter 46.12, 46.16, 46.29, 46.37, or 46.70 RCW.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.61.110 and 2005 c 396 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following rules shall govern the overtaking and passing of
vehicles proceeding in the same direction, subject to those
limitations, exceptions and special rules hereinafter stated:
(1) The driver of a vehicle overtaking other traffic proceeding in
the same direction shall pass to the left thereof at a safe distance
and shall not again drive to the right side of the roadway until safely
clear of the overtaken traffic.
(2) The driver of a vehicle approaching a pedestrian, local
electric cart, or bicycle that is on the roadway or on the right-hand
shoulder or bicycle lane of the roadway shall pass to the left at a
safe distance to clearly avoid coming into contact with the pedestrian,
local electric cart, or bicyclist, and shall not again drive to the
right side of the roadway until safely clear of the overtaken
pedestrian, local electric cart, or bicyclist.
(3) Except when overtaking and passing on the right is permitted,
overtaken traffic shall give way to the right in favor of an overtaking
vehicle on audible signal and shall not increase speed until completely
passed by the overtaking vehicle.

Sec. 7 RCW 46.61.125 and 2005 c 396 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No vehicle shall be driven on the left side of the roadway
under the following conditions:
(a) When approaching or upon the crest of a grade or a curve in the
highway where the driver's view is obstructed within such distance as
to create a hazard in the event other traffic might approach from the
opposite direction;
(b) When approaching within one hundred feet of or traversing any
intersection or railroad grade crossing;
(c) When the view is obstructed upon approaching within one hundred
feet of any bridge, viaduct or tunnel;
(d) When a bicycle, local electric cart, or pedestrian is within
view of the driver and is approaching from the opposite direction, or
is present, in the roadway, shoulder, or bicycle lane within a distance
unsafe to the bicyclist, local electric cart operator, or pedestrian
due to the width or condition of the roadway, shoulder, or bicycle
lane.
(2) The foregoing limitations shall not apply upon a one-way
roadway, nor under the conditions described in RCW 46.61.100(1)(b), nor
to the driver of a vehicle turning left into or from an alley, private
road or driveway.

Sec. 8 RCW 46.61.235 and 2000 c 85 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The operator of an approaching vehicle shall stop and remain
stopped to allow a pedestrian, local electric cart, or bicycle to cross
the roadway within an unmarked or marked crosswalk when the pedestrian,
local electric cart, or bicycle is upon or within one lane of the half
of the roadway upon which the vehicle is traveling or onto which it is
turning. For purposes of this section "half of the roadway" means all
traffic lanes carrying traffic in one direction of travel, and includes
the entire width of a one-way roadway.
(2) No pedestrian, local electric cart, or bicycle shall suddenly
leave a curb or other place of safety and walk, run, or otherwise move
into the path of a vehicle which is so close that it is impossible for
the driver to stop.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply under the
conditions stated in RCW 46.61.240(2).
(4) Whenever any vehicle is stopped at a marked crosswalk or at any
unmarked crosswalk at an intersection to permit a pedestrian, local
electric cart, or bicycle to cross the roadway, the driver of any other
vehicle approaching from the rear shall not overtake and pass such
stopped vehicle.

Sec. 9 RCW 46.61.261 and 2000 c 85 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The driver of a vehicle shall yield the right-of-way to any
pedestrian, local electric cart, or bicycle on a sidewalk. The
((rider)) operator of a bicycle or local electric cart shall yield the
right-of-way to a pedestrian on a sidewalk or crosswalk.

Sec. 10 RCW 46.61.755 and 2000 c 85 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every person riding a bicycle or operating a local electric
cart upon a roadway shall be granted all of the rights and shall be
subject to all of the duties applicable to the driver of a vehicle by
this chapter, except as to special regulations in RCW 46.61.750 through
46.61.780 and except as to those provisions of this chapter which by
their nature can have no application.
(2) Every person riding a bicycle or operating a local electric
cart upon a sidewalk or crosswalk must be granted all of the rights and
is subject to all of the duties applicable to a pedestrian by this
chapter.

Sec. 11 RCW 46.61.758 and 1982 c 55 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
All hand signals required of persons operating bicycles or local
electric carts shall be given in the following manner:
(1) Left turn. Left hand and arm extended horizontally beyond the
side of the bicycle or local electric cart;
(2) Right turn. Left hand and arm extended upward beyond the side
of the bicycle or local electric cart, or right hand and arm extended
horizontally to the right side of the bicycle;
(3) Stop or decrease speed. Left hand and arm extended downward
beyond the side of the bicycle or local electric cart.
The hand signals required by this section shall be given before
initiation of a turn.

Sec. 12 RCW 46.61.770 and 1982 c 55 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every person operating a bicycle or local electric cart upon a
roadway at a rate of speed less than the normal flow of traffic at the
particular time and place shall ride as near to the right side of the
right through lane as is safe except as may be appropriate while
preparing to make or while making turning movements, or while
overtaking and passing another bicycle, local electric cart, or vehicle
proceeding in the same direction. A person operating a bicycle or
local electric cart upon a roadway or highway other than a limited-access highway, which roadway or highway carries traffic in one
direction only and has two or more marked traffic lanes, may ((ride))
position themselves as near to the left side of the left through lane
as is safe. A person operating a bicycle or local electric cart upon
a roadway may use the shoulder of the roadway or any specially
designated bicycle lane if such exists.
(2) Persons riding bicycles upon a roadway shall not ride more than
two abreast except on paths or parts of roadways set aside for the
exclusive use of bicycles.

Sec. 13 RCW 46.61.780 and 1998 c 165 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every bicycle and local electric cart when in use during the
hours of darkness as ((defined)) described in RCW 46.37.020 shall be
equipped with a lamp on the front which shall emit a white light
visible from a distance of at least five hundred feet to the front and
with a red reflector on the rear of a type approved by the state patrol
which shall be visible from all distances up to six hundred feet to the
rear when directly in front of lawful lower beams of head lamps on a
motor vehicle. A lamp emitting a red light visible from a distance of
five hundred feet to the rear may be used in addition to the red
reflector. A light-emitting diode flashing taillight visible from a
distance of five hundred feet to the rear may also be used in addition
to the red reflector.
(2) Every bicycle and local electric cart shall be equipped with a
brake which will enable the operator to make the braked wheels skid on
dry, level, clean pavement.
(3) Every local electric cart when in use during the hours of
darkness as described in RCW 46.37.020 must be equipped with and
utilize turn signal indicators that must be plainly visible from both
the front and rear of the cart from a distance of five hundred feet.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---