BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to promote the
development of sustainable energy resources and smart energy
technologies and to improve system reliability by establishing a
utility-based system benefits charge that may be used to reduce the
cost of deploying sustainable energy projects and smart energy
technologies in the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Commission" means the Washington state utilities and
transportation commission.
(2) "Consumer-owned utility" includes a municipal electric utility
formed under Title 35 RCW, a public utility district formed under Title
54 RCW, an irrigation district formed under chapter 87.03 RCW, a
cooperative formed under chapter 23.86 RCW, a mutual corporation or
association formed under chapter 24.06 RCW, a port district formed
under Title 53 RCW, or a water-sewer district formed under Title 57
RCW, that is authorized to and engaged in the business of distributing
electricity or natural gas to one or more retail customers in the
state.
(3) "Department" means the energy policy division of the department
of commerce.
(4) "Electric utility" means an investor-owned utility or consumer-owned utility that is authorized to and engaged in the business of
distributing electricity to one or more retail customers in the state.
(5) "Governing body" means the board of directors, city council, or
the commissioners of any consumer-owned utility.
(6) "Investor-owned utility" means a corporation owned by investors
that meets the definition of "corporation" defined in RCW 80.04.010 and
is engaged in distributing electricity or natural gas to more than one
retail electric customer in the state.
(7) "Natural gas utility" means an investor-owned utility or
consumer-owned utility that is authorized to and engaged in the
business of distributing natural gas to one or more retail customers in
the state.
(8) "Smart energy" means the use of technology to allow electrical
networks to operate efficiently and to link small-scale sustainable
energy resources to the grid.
(9) "Sustainable energy resource" includes solar energy, wind,
ocean thermal energy, wave or tidal energy, fuel cells, landfill gas
and low emission advanced biomass conversion technologies, high-efficiency cogeneration with an efficiency level above seventy percent,
and other emerging energy technologies that significantly reduce
pollution from existing technologies and have significant potential for
commercialization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 All electric and natural gas utilities may
collect a monthly system benefits charge from all retail electricity
and natural gas customers served by the utility. The purpose of the
system benefits charge is to foster the growth, development, and
commercialization of sustainable energy resources of five megawatts or
less or smart energy technologies that are connected to the
distribution system of an electric utility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Before collecting a system benefits
charge, a consumer-owned utility must prepare and submit to its
governing body a sustainable energy project proposal consisting of the
following: A list of proposed sustainable energy resource or smart
energy technology projects; a project management plan for each proposed
project containing technical milestones and stage-gates; the cost of
each project; the amount required to be collected through a system
benefits charge to develop each project; and the estimated time frame
for collecting the system benefits charge.
(2) Before collecting a system benefits charge, an investor-owned
utility must prepare and submit to the commission a sustainable energy
project proposal consisting of the following: A list of proposed
sustainable energy resource or smart energy technology projects; a
project management plan for each proposed project containing technical
milestones and stage-gates; the cost of each project; the amount
required to be collected through a system benefits charge to develop
each project; and the estimated time frame for collecting the system
benefits charge.
(3) Consumer-owned and investor-owned utilities shall make
available upon request the list of proposed and approved projects and
the project management plans for each project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1)(a) Upon approval of the sustainable
energy project proposal by the governing body, a consumer-owned utility
may collect a system benefits charge for a time approved by the
governing body.
(b) Upon approval of the sustainable energy project proposal by the
commission, an investor-owned utility may collect a system benefits
charge for a time approved by the commission.
(2) The monthly system benefits charge may be up to, and no more
than, one dollar and ninety cents per customer.
(3) Funds collected from the system benefits charge must be used by
an electric or natural gas utility to develop sustainable energy
resource or smart energy technology projects as approved by a governing
body or the commission.
(4) Funds collected from the system benefits charge must be
deposited in a sustainable energy project account established and
maintained by the utility and separate from other accounts.
(5) Interest that accrues to the sustainable energy project account
must be reinvested into the sustainable energy project account and
spent on sustainable energy resource or smart energy technology
projects.
(6) No more than five percent of money collected from the system
benefits charge may be used by an electric or natural gas utility for
administrative purposes.
(7)(a) Beginning November 1, 2007, each electric or natural gas
consumer-owned utility whose governing body has approved the collection
of a system benefits charge must submit the approved sustainable energy
project proposal to the department.
(b) The department shall utilize the information received in (a) of
this subsection in the biennial energy report.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 80 RCW.

--- END ---