BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of the unlawful use of shellfish gear for
commercial purposes if the person:
(a) Takes, fishes for, or possesses crab, shrimp, or crawfish for
commercial purposes with shellfish gear that is constructed or altered
in a manner that violates any rule of the commission relating to
required gear design specifications; or
(b) Is found in possession of, upon any vessel located on the
waters of the state, shellfish gear that is constructed or altered in
a manner that violates any rule of the commission relating to required
gear design specifications, unless a person holds a valid crab pot
removal permit under RCW 77.70.500 and is in the process of
transporting removed crab pots as part of the Dungeness crab pot
removal program.
(2) The unlawful use of shellfish gear for commercial purposes is
a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of the unlawful use of shellfish gear for
personal use purposes if the person:
(a) Takes, fishes for, or possesses crab, shrimp, or crawfish for
personal use purposes with shellfish gear that is constructed or
altered in a manner that violates any rule of the commission relating
to required gear design specifications; or
(b) Is found in possession of, upon any vessel located on the
waters of the state, shellfish gear that is constructed or altered in
a manner that violates any rule of the commission relating to required
gear design specifications, unless a person holds a valid crab pot
removal permit under RCW 77.70.500 and is in the process of
transporting removed crab pots as part of the Dungeness crab pot
removal program.
(2) The unlawful use of shellfish gear for personal use purposes is
a misdemeanor.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.70.500 and 2009 c 355 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) As part of a coastal commercial Dungeness crab pot removal
program, the department shall issue a crab pot removal permit that
allows the participants in the Dungeness crab-coastal fishery created
in RCW 77.70.280 to remove crab pots belonging to state commercial
licensed crab fisheries from coastal marine waters after the close of
the primary commercial Dungeness crab-coastal harvest season,
regardless of whether the crab pot was originally set by the
participant or not.
(b) Beginning fifteen days after the close of the primary
commercial Dungeness crab-coastal harvest season, any individual with
a current commercial Dungeness crab-coastal license and a valid crab
pot removal permit issued by the department may remove a crab pot or
crab pots used to harvest Dungeness crabs remaining in coastal marine
waters after the close of the primary commercial Dungeness crab-coastal
harvest season.
(c) In cooperation with individuals with a current commercial
Dungeness crab-coastal license, the department may expand the coastal
commercial Dungeness crab pot removal program to those areas closed to
commercial Dungeness crab harvest prior to the end of the primary
season.
(d) Nothing in this section prohibits the department from exempting
certain crab pots from the coastal commercial Dungeness crab pot
removal program or from restricting crab pot removal activities to
specific geographic areas.
(((e) The department may adopt rules to implement this subsection
(1).))
(2)(a) The department may expand the crab pot removal program to
allow for the removal of shellfish pots belonging to state commercial
or recreational licensed shellfish fisheries from Puget Sound waters
during shellfish harvest closures, regardless of whether the shellfish
pot was originally set by the permittee or not.
(b) If the department expands the program to Puget Sound waters,
the department shall limit the program as necessary to streamline
implementation, minimize the oversight burden on fish and wildlife
enforcement officers, minimize interference with lawful fisheries and
other user groups, minimize administrative overhead cost, and avoid the
collection of shellfish pots that are not abandoned. The program may
be limited as deemed appropriate by the department, including
limitations on:
(i) The number of participants;
(ii) The eligible geographic areas in Puget Sound where shellfish
pots may be recovered;
(iii) The types of shellfish pots that may be recovered;
(iv) The maximum or minimum depth where a shellfish pot must be
located to be eligible for recovery; and
(v) The ports through which the vessels collecting the abandoned
shellfish pots may operate.
(3) The department may adopt rules to implement subsections (1) and
(2) of this section.
(4)(a) The following are exempt from complying with the lost and
found property provisions in chapter 63.21 RCW:
(i) An individual participating in permitted crab pot removal
activities in coastal marine waters who has a valid crab pot removal
permit, and who adheres to the provisions of the permit as they relate
to crab pot removal((, is exempt from complying with the lost and found
property provisions in chapter 63.21 RCW.)); and
(ii) An individual participating in permitted shellfish pot removal
activities in Puget Sound waters who has a valid shellfish pot removal
permit and who adheres to the provisions of the permit as they relate
to shellfish pot removal.
(b) The individual who removes ((the crab)) a shellfish pot under
a valid crab pot removal permit or a valid shellfish pot removal permit
takes the property free and clear of all claims of the owner or
previous holder and free and clear of all individuals claiming
ownership under the previous owner.
(((3)(a) A person is guilty of unlawful use of a crab pot removal
permit if the person:
(i) Violates any terms or conditions of the permit issued under
this section; or
(ii) Violates any rule of the department applicable to the
requirement for, issuance of, or use of the permit.
(b) Unlawful use of a crab pot removal permit is a misdemeanor.))
(5) A violation of this section, or any rules or permit conditions
provided under this section, is punishable as provided in RCW
77.15.750.
(6) Individuals who remove shellfish pots under a valid crab pot
removal permit or a valid shellfish pot removal permit in accordance
with this section are not subject to permitting under RCW 77.55.021.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.15.520 and 1998 c 190 s 37 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except for actions involving shellfish gear punishable under
section 1 of this act, a person is guilty of commercial fishing using
unlawful gear or methods if the person acts for commercial purposes and
takes or fishes for any fish or shellfish using any gear or method in
violation of a rule of the ((department)) commission specifying,
regulating, or limiting the gear or method for taking, fishing, or
harvesting of such fish or shellfish.
(2) Commercial fishing using unlawful gear or methods is a gross
misdemeanor.

Sec. 5 RCW 77.15.380 and 2001 c 253 s 39 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful recreational fishing in the
second degree if the person fishes for, takes, possesses, or harvests
fish or shellfish and:
(a) The person does not have and possess the license or the catch
record card required by chapter 77.32 RCW for such activity; or
(b) The action violates any rule of the commission or the director
regarding seasons, bag or possession limits but less than two times the
bag or possession limit, closed areas, closed times, or any other rule
addressing the manner or method of fishing or possession of fish,
except for use of a net to take fish as provided for in RCW 77.15.580
and the unlawful use of shellfish gear for personal use as provided in
section 2 of this act.
(2) Unlawful recreational fishing in the second degree is a
misdemeanor.

Sec. 6 RCW 63.21.080 and 2009 c 355 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
This chapter shall not apply to:
(1) Motor vehicles under chapter 46.52 RCW;
(2) Unclaimed property in the hands of a bailee under chapter 63.24
RCW;
(3) Uniform disposition of unclaimed property under chapter 63.29
RCW;
(4) Secured vessels under chapter 79A.65 RCW; and
(5) Crab or other shellfish pots in coastal marine or Puget Sound
waters under RCW 77.70.500.

Sec. 7 RCW 77.12.865 and 2005 c 146 s 1004 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) As used in this section and RCW 77.12.870, "derelict fishing
gear" includes lost or abandoned fishing nets, fishing lines, ((crab
pots, shrimp pots,)) and other commercial and recreational fishing
equipment. The term does not include lost or abandoned vessels or
shellfish pots.
(2) The department, in partnership with the Northwest straits
commission, the department of natural resources, and other interested
parties, must publish guidelines for the safe removal and disposal of
derelict fishing gear. The guidelines ((must be completed by August
31, 2002, and)) may be updated as deemed necessary by the department.
The guidelines must be made available to any person interested in
derelict fishing gear removal.
(3) Derelict fishing gear removal conducted in accordance with the
guidelines prepared in subsection (2) of this section is not subject to
permitting under RCW 77.55.021.

Sec. 8 RCW 77.12.870 and 2009 c 333 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department, in consultation with the Northwest straits
commission, the department of natural resources, and other interested
parties, must create and maintain a database of known derelict fishing
gear and shellfish pots, including the type of gear and its location.
(2) A person who loses or abandons commercial fishing gear or
shellfish pots within the waters of the state is encouraged to report
the location of the loss and the type of gear lost to the department
within forty-eight hours of the loss.

Sec. 9 RCW 77.15.750 and 2009 c 333 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful use of a department permit if
the person:
(a) Violates any terms or conditions of the permit issued by the
department or the director; or
(b) Violates any rule of the commission or the director applicable
to the requirement for, issuance of, or use of the permit.
(2)(a) Permits covered under subsection (1) of this section
include, but are not limited to, master hunter permits, crab pot
removal permits and shellfish pot removal permits under RCW 77.70.500,
depredation permits, landowner hunting permits, commercial carp license
permits, permits to possess or dispense beer or malt liquor pursuant to
RCW 66.28.210, and permits to hold, sponsor, or attend an event
requiring a banquet permit from the liquor control board.
(b) Permits excluded from subsection (1) of this section include
fish and wildlife lands vehicle use permits, commercial use or activity
permits, noncommercial use or activity permits, parking permits,
experimental fishery permits, trial commercial fishery permits, and
scientific collection permits.
(3) Unlawful use of a department permit is a misdemeanor.
(4) A person is guilty of unlawful use of an experimental fishery
permit or a trial commercial fishery permit if the person:
(a) Violates any terms or conditions of the permit issued by the
department or the director; or
(b) Violates any rule of the commission or the director applicable
to the issuance or use of the permit.
(5) Unlawful use of an experimental fishery permit or a trial
commercial fishery permit is a gross misdemeanor.
(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Experimental fishery permit" means a permit issued by the
director for either:
(i) An "emerging commercial fishery," defined as a fishery for a
newly classified species for which the department has determined that
there is a need to limit participation; or
(ii) An "expanding commercial fishery," defined as a fishery for a
previously classified species in a new area, by a new method, or at a
new effort level, for which the department has determined that there is
a need to limit participation.
(b) "Trial commercial fishery permit" means a permit issued by the
department for trial harvest of a newly classified species or harvest
of a previously classified species in a new area or by a new means.

Sec. 10 RCW 77.55.041 and 2005 c 146 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The removal of derelict fishing gear does not require a permit
under this chapter if the gear is removed according to the guidelines
described in RCW 77.12.865.
(2) The removal of crab and other shellfish gear does not require
a permit under this chapter if the gear is removed under a permit
issued pursuant to RCW 77.70.500.

Sec. 11 RCW 77.32.430 and 2009 c 333 s 40 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Catch record card information is necessary for proper
management of the state's food fish and game fish species and shellfish
resources. Catch record card administration shall be under rules
adopted by the commission. There is no charge for an initial catch
record card. Each subsequent or duplicate catch record card costs ten
dollars.
(2) A license to take and possess Dungeness crab is only valid in
Puget Sound waters east of the Bonilla-Tatoosh line if the fisher has
in possession a valid catch record card officially endorsed for
Dungeness crab. The endorsement shall cost no more than three dollars,
including any or all fees authorized under RCW 77.32.050, when
purchased for a personal use saltwater, combination, or shellfish and
seaweed license. The endorsement shall cost no more than one dollar,
including any or all fees authorized under RCW 77.32.050, when
purchased for a temporary combination fishing license authorized under
RCW 77.32.470(3)(a).
(3) Catch record cards issued with affixed temporary short-term
charter stamp licenses are not subject to the ten-dollar charge nor to
the Dungeness crab endorsement fee provided for in this section.
Charter boat or guide operators issuing temporary short-term charter
stamp licenses shall affix the stamp to each catch record card issued
before fishing commences. Catch record cards issued with a temporary
short-term charter stamp are valid for one day.
(4) The department shall include provisions for recording marked
and unmarked salmon in catch record cards issued after March 31, 2004.
(5)(a) The funds received from the sale of catch record cards and
the Dungeness crab endorsement must be deposited into the state
wildlife account created in RCW 77.12.170. The funds received from the
Dungeness crab endorsement may be used only for the sampling,
monitoring, and management of catch associated with the Dungeness crab
recreational fisheries. Until June 30, 2011, funds received from the
Dungeness crab endorsement may be used for the removal and disposal of
derelict shellfish gear either directly by the department or under
contract with a third party.
(b) Moneys allocated under this section shall supplement and not
supplant other federal, state, and local funds used for Dungeness crab
recreational fisheries management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) The department of fish and wildlife
shall, in cooperation with stakeholders in the recreational and
commercial crab fisheries and other knowledgeable individuals, as
deemed appropriate by the director of the department, deliver to the
appropriate committees of the legislature findings and recommendations
relating to the following topics:
(a) The scope of the derelict shellfish gear problem in Washington
waters, including estimates of the existing quantity of derelict gear
and estimates of annual shellfish gear loss;
(b) The cost of recovering and disposing of derelict shellfish
gear;
(c) Technical and legal barriers to recovering and disposing of
derelict shellfish gear;
(d) Possible public education efforts to prevent future shellfish
gear loss and to promote compliance with required gear specifications;
(e) Possible changes to the current funding structure for derelict
shellfish gear removal and Dungeness crab sampling, monitoring, and
management, which may include the termination or alteration of the
existing Dungeness crab assessment required under RCW 77.32.430 and the
identification of possible new funding sources.
(2) If deemed practicable by the director of the department of fish
and wildlife, the findings and recommendations included in the report
required in this section should be informed by the actual collection of
derelict shellfish pots.
(3) Findings and recommendations required under this section must
be submitted consistent with RCW 43.01.036 by December 31, 2010.
(4) This section expires July 31, 2011.

--- END ---