BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that a recent decision
of the Washington state supreme court may limit the ability of
employers to terminate law enforcement officers for dishonesty. As a
result of this decision, criminal prosecutions may be jeopardized and
public confidence in law enforcement eroded.
In Kitsap County Deputy Sheriff's Guild v. Kitsap County, No.
80720-5 (2009), the supreme court held that an arbitration decision
arising out of a collective bargaining agreement may be vacated if it
violates an "explicit, well-defined, and dominant public policy." The
supreme court, however, also concluded that there was no statute or
other expression of the state's public policy requiring the termination
or prohibiting the reinstatement of a law enforcement officer found to
have been untruthful. The supreme court ultimately declined to vacate
an arbitration decision stating that a law enforcement officer who was
terminated for untruthfulness and other acts of misconduct could return
to duty.
The legislature intends to amend state law to include an "explicit,
well-defined, and dominant public policy" requiring that law
enforcement officers be honest when acting in their official capacity,
so that criminal prosecutions are not jeopardized and public confidence
in law enforcement is not eroded. For this reason, the legislature
intends to clarify that an arbitrator shall not overturn the decision
of an employer to terminate a law enforcement officer for engaging in
an act or acts of dishonesty established by clear, cogent, and
convincing evidence.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.12.080 and 2007 c 218 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tenure of everyone holding an office, place, position or
employment under the provisions of this chapter shall be only during
good behavior, and except as provided in subsection (2) of this
section, any such person may be removed or discharged, suspended
without pay, demoted, or reduced in rank, or deprived of vacation
privileges or other special privileges for any of the following
reasons:
(((1))) (a) Incompetency, inefficiency or inattention to or
dereliction of duty;
(((2))) (b) Dishonesty, intemperance, immoral conduct,
insubordination, discourteous treatment of the public, or a fellow
employee, or any other act of omission or commission tending to injure
the public service; or any other willful failure on the part of the
employee to properly conduct himself or herself; or any willful
violation of the provisions of this chapter or the rules and regulation
to be adopted hereunder;
(((3))) (c) Mental or physical unfitness for the position which the
employee holds;
(((4))) (d) Dishonest, disgraceful, immoral or prejudicial conduct;
(((5))) (e) Drunkenness or use of intoxicating liquors, narcotics,
or any other habit forming drug, liquid or preparation to such extent
that the use thereof interferes with the efficiency or mental or
physical fitness of the employee, or which precludes the employee from
properly performing the function and duties of any position under civil
service;
(((6))) (f) Conviction of a felony, or a misdemeanor, involving
moral turpitude;
(((7))) (g) Any other act or failure to act which in the judgment
of the civil service commissioners is sufficient to show the offender
to be an unsuitable and unfit person to be employed in the public
service.
(2) In the event that an employer terminates a person holding an
office, place, position, or employment under the provisions of this
chapter for engaging in an act or acts of dishonesty, and an arbitrator
finds that the employer established that the person engaged in the act
or acts of dishonesty by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence, the
termination: (a) Shall be deemed to be reasonably related to both the
seriousness of the offense and the record of the employee; and (b)
shall not be overturned by the arbitrator.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.14.110 and 1959 c 1 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tenure of every person holding an office, place, position,
or employment under the provisions of this chapter shall be only during
good behavior, and except as provided in subsection (2) of this
section, any such person may be removed or discharged, suspended
without pay, demoted, or reduced in rank, or deprived of vacation
privileges or other special privileges for any of the following
reasons:
(((1))) (a) Incompetency, inefficiency, or inattention to, or
dereliction of duty;
(((2))) (b) Dishonesty, intemperance, immoral conduct,
insubordination, discourteous treatment of the public, or a fellow
employee, or any other act of omission or commission tending to injure
the public service; or any other wilful failure on the part of the
employee to properly conduct himself; or any wilful violation of the
provisions of this chapter or the rules and regulations to be adopted
hereunder;
(((3))) (c) Mental or physical unfitness for the position which the
employee holds;
(((4))) (d) Dishonest, disgraceful, or prejudicial conduct;
(((5))) (e) Drunkenness or use of intoxicating liquors, narcotics,
or any other habit forming drug, liquid, or preparation to such extent
that the use thereof interferes with the efficiency or mental or
physical fitness of the employee, or which precludes the employee from
properly performing the function and duties of any position under civil
service;
(((6))) (f) Conviction of a felony, or a misdemeanor involving
moral turpitude;
(((7))) (g) Any other act or failure to act which in the judgment
of the civil service commission is sufficient to show the offender to
be an unsuitable and unfit person to be employed in the public service.
(2) In the event that an employer terminates a person holding an
office, place, position, or employment under the provisions of this
chapter for engaging in an act or acts of dishonesty, and an arbitrator
finds that the employer established that the person engaged in the act
or acts of dishonesty by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence, the
termination: (a) Shall be deemed to be reasonably related to both the
seriousness of the offense and the record of the employee; and (b)
shall not be overturned by the arbitrator.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.43.070 and 1984 c 141 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Discharge of any officer with probationary status and
discharge, demotion, or suspension of any officer with nonprobationary
status shall be only for cause, which shall be clearly stated in a
written complaint, sworn to by the person preferring the charges, and
served upon the officer complained of.
(2) Discharge of any officer for engaging in an act or acts of
dishonesty established by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence shall
be deemed to satisfy the "reasonableness and lawfulness" standard set
forth in RCW 43.43.100.
(3) Upon being ((so)) served with a written complaint, any such
officer shall be entitled to a public hearing before a trial board
consisting of two Washington state patrol officers of the rank of
captain, and one officer of equal rank with the officer complained of,
who shall be selected by the chief of the Washington state patrol by
lot from the roster of the patrol. In the case of complaint by an
officer, such officer shall not be a member of the trial board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW
to read as follows:
In the event that an employer terminates a person holding an
office, place, position, or employment that requires a law enforcement
certification under this chapter for engaging in an act or acts of
dishonesty, and an arbitrator finds that the employer established that
the person engaged in the act or acts of dishonesty by clear, cogent,
and convincing evidence, the termination: (1) Shall be deemed to be
reasonably related to both the seriousness of the offense and the
record of the employee; and (2) shall not be overturned by the
arbitrator.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---