BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.44.050 and 2003 c 307 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After June 6, 1945, no withdrawal of public groundwaters of the
state shall be begun, nor shall any well or other works for such
withdrawal be constructed, unless an application to appropriate such
waters has been made to the department and a permit has been granted by
it as herein provided: EXCEPT, HOWEVER, That any withdrawal of public
groundwaters for stock watering purposes that is in accordance with
subsection (2) of this section, or for the watering of a lawn or of a
noncommercial garden not exceeding one-half acre in area, or for single
or group domestic uses in an amount not exceeding five thousand gallons
a day, or as provided in RCW 90.44.052, or for an industrial purpose in
an amount not exceeding five thousand gallons a day, is and shall be
exempt from the provisions of this section, but, to the extent that it
is regularly used beneficially, shall be entitled to a right equal to
that established by a permit issued under the provisions of this
chapter: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the department from time to time may
require the person or agency making any such small withdrawal to
furnish information as to the means for and the quantity of that
withdrawal: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That at the option of the party making
withdrawals of groundwaters of the state not exceeding five thousand
gallons per day, applications under this section or declarations under
RCW 90.44.090 may be filed and permits and certificates obtained in the
same manner and under the same requirements as is in this chapter
provided in the case of withdrawals in excess of five thousand gallons
a day.
(2)(a) After the effective date of this section, withdrawal of
public groundwaters for stock watering purposes must be metered and may
not exceed five thousand gallons per day, except those withdrawals
authorized in (b) of this subsection.
(b) The withdrawer of public groundwaters that are put to
beneficial use for stock watering purposes prior to the effective date
of this section may continue to withdraw public groundwaters for stock
watering purposes in an amount not exceeding five thousand gallons per
day or their total per livestock water limit as determined by the
Washington state department of agriculture in section 2 of this act for
the highest daily number of livestock present in 2009 on the parcel
where the permit exempt well used for stock watering is located.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 16.36 RCW
to read as follows:
The department must determine by rule the average daily water use
of individual livestock in Washington. The estimate of water use per
individual livestock must include all reasonable uses of water needed
for domestic farm animals for drinking and for maintenance of livestock
health and welfare.

--- END ---