BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 54.16.330 and 2004 c 158 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A public utility district in existence on June 8, 2000, may
construct, purchase, acquire, develop, finance, lease, license, handle,
provide, add to, contract for, interconnect, alter, improve, repair,
operate, and maintain any telecommunications facilities within or
without the district's limits for the following purposes:
(a) For the district's internal telecommunications needs; and
(b) For the provision of wholesale telecommunications services
within the district and by contract with another public utility
district; and
(c) For the provision of retail telecommunications services within
the district, provided that the district:
(i) Does not individually provide telecommunications services to
the end user as part of its utility function but instead enters into a
partnership with a nonprofit organization, or a federally recognized
tribe or its political subdivision, for the joint provision of
telecommunications services to the end user; and
(ii) Secures the approval of the voters of the district.
Except as provided in this subsection (1)(c), nothing in this
subsection shall be construed to authorize public utility districts to
provide telecommunications services to end users.
(2) A public utility district providing wholesale
telecommunications services or retail telecommunications services in
partnership with a nonprofit organization, or a federally recognized
tribe or its political subdivision, shall ensure that rates, terms, and
conditions for such services are not unduly or unreasonably
discriminatory or preferential. Rates, terms, and conditions are
discriminatory or preferential when a public utility district offering
rates, terms, and conditions to an entity for wholesale
telecommunications services does not offer substantially similar rates,
terms, and conditions to all other entities seeking substantially
similar services.
(3) A public utility district providing wholesale
telecommunications services shall not be required to but may establish
a separate utility system or function for such purpose. In either
case, a public utility district providing wholesale telecommunications
services or retail telecommunications services in partnership with a
nonprofit organization, or a federally recognized tribe or its
political subdivision, shall separately account for any revenues and
expenditures for those services according to standards established by
the state auditor pursuant to its authority in chapter 43.09 RCW and
consistent with the provisions of this title. Any revenues received
from the provision of wholesale telecommunications services or retail
telecommunications services in partnership with a nonprofit
organization, or a federally recognized tribe or its political
subdivision, must be dedicated to costs incurred to build and maintain
any telecommunications facilities constructed, installed, or acquired
to provide such services, including payments on debt issued to finance
such services, until such time as any bonds or other financing
instruments executed after June 8, 2000, and used to finance such
telecommunications facilities are discharged or retired.
(4) When a public utility district provides wholesale
telecommunications services or retail telecommunications services in
partnership with a nonprofit organization, or a federally recognized
tribe or its political subdivision, all telecommunications services
rendered to the district for the district's internal telecommunications
needs shall be allocated or charged at its true and full value. A
public utility district may not charge its nontelecommunications
operations rates that are preferential or discriminatory compared to
those it charges entities purchasing wholesale or retail
telecommunications services.
(5) A public utility district shall not exercise powers of eminent
domain to acquire telecommunications facilities or contractual rights
held by any other person or entity to telecommunications facilities.
(6) Except as otherwise specifically provided, a public utility
district may exercise any of the powers granted to it under this title
and other applicable laws in carrying out the powers authorized under
this section. Nothing in chapter 81, Laws of 2000 limits any existing
authority of a public utility district under this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 54.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A district that owns or operates electric facilities for the
generation, transmission, or distribution of electric power may expand
their operations to include the provision of retail telecommunications
services in partnership with a nonprofit organization, or a federally
recognized tribe or its political subdivision, if the district secures
the approval of such expansion by the voters of the district.
(2) The proposal to expand operations to include retail
telecommunications services in partnership with a nonprofit
organization, or a federally recognized tribe or its political
subdivision, may be conducted at any general election held in an even-numbered year. The proposal may be submitted in one of two ways:
(a) To the voters of the district by resolution of the governing
board of the public utility district; or
(b) To the voters of the district by the county legislative
authority on petition of ten percent of the qualified electors of such
a district, based on the total vote cast in the last general county
election held in an even-numbered year.
(3) A form of petition for the expansion of a public utility
district's operations to include retail telecommunications services in
partnership with a nonprofit organization, or a federally recognized
tribe or its political subdivision, must be submitted to the county
auditor within ten months prior to the election at which such a
proposition is to be submitted to the voters. Petitions must be filed
with the county auditor not less than four months before such an
election.
(4) The county auditor must examine the signatures submitted within
thirty days of the signatures being submitted and certify the
sufficiency or insufficiency of the signatures. If the petition is
found to be insufficient, it must be returned to the public utility
district that filed the petition, who may amend and add names to the
petition for up to ten days before returning the petition to the county
auditor. Upon receipt of an amended petition, the county auditor shall
have an additional fifteen days to examine the amended petition and
attach a certificate to the petition if the signatures are found to be
sufficient.
(5) Any person who has signed such a petition may not withdraw his
or her name from the petition after it has been filed with the county
auditor, provided that each signature on the petition is dated and no
signature dated prior to the date on which the form of petition was
submitted to the county auditor is valid.
(6) If the petition is certified to be sufficient, the county
auditor shall transmit the petition, along with the attached
certificate of sufficiency, to the county legislative authority.
(7) Upon receipt of a petition and a certificate of sufficiency
from the county auditor, the county legislative authority must submit
the proposition to the voters of the district at the next general
election in an even-numbered year according to RCW 29A.04.330. The
notice of the election must state the object of such an election, and
must in other respects conform to the requirements of the general laws
of Washington, governing the time and manner of holding elections.
(8) The proposal submitted to the voters for their approval or
rejection must be expressed on the ballot substantially in the
following terms:

Shall Public Utility District No. . . . of . . . . . . County
expand their operations to include retail telecommunications services
in partnership with . . . .?

Yes □
No □

(9) Within ten days after such an election, the election board of
the county shall canvass the returns, and if at such an election a
majority of the voters voting on such a proposition vote in favor of
the district's proposal, the district is authorized to expand their
operations to include retail telecommunications services.

Sec. 3 RCW 53.08.370 and 2000 c 81 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A rural port district in existence on June 8, 2000, may
construct, purchase, acquire, develop, finance, lease, license, handle,
provide, add to, contract for, interconnect, alter, improve, repair,
operate, and maintain any telecommunications facilities within or
without the district's limits for the following purposes:
(a) For the district's own use; ((and))
(b) For the provision of wholesale telecommunications services
within the district's limits; and
(c) For the provision of retail telecommunications services within
the district, provided that the district:
(i) Does not individually provide telecommunications services to
the end user but instead enters into a partnership with a nonprofit
organization, or a federally recognized tribe or its political
subdivision, for the joint provision of telecommunications services to
the end user; and
(ii) Secures the approval of the voters of the district.
Except as provided in this subsection (1)(c), nothing in this
subsection shall be construed to authorize rural port districts to
provide telecommunications services to end users.
(2) A rural port district providing wholesale telecommunications
services or retail telecommunications services in partnership with a
nonprofit organization, or a federally recognized tribe or its
political subdivision, under this section shall ensure that rates,
terms, and conditions for such services are not unduly or unreasonably
discriminatory or preferential. Rates, terms, and conditions are
discriminatory or preferential when a rural port district offering such
rates, terms, and conditions to an entity for wholesale
telecommunications services does not offer substantially similar rates,
terms, and conditions to all other entities seeking substantially
similar services.
(3) When a rural port district establishes a separate utility
function for the provision of wholesale telecommunications services or
retail telecommunications services in partnership with a nonprofit
organization, or a federally recognized tribe or its political
subdivision, it shall account for any and all revenues and expenditures
related to its wholesale telecommunications facilities and services
separately from revenues and expenditures related to its internal
telecommunications operations. Any revenues received from the
provision of wholesale telecommunications services or retail
telecommunications services in partnership with a nonprofit
organization, or a federally recognized tribe or its political
subdivision, must be dedicated to the utility function that includes
the provision of wholesale telecommunications services for costs
incurred to build and maintain the telecommunications facilities until
such time as any bonds or other financing instruments executed after
June 8, 2000, and used to finance the telecommunications facilities are
discharged or retired.
(4) When a rural port district establishes a separate utility
function for the provision of wholesale telecommunications services,
all telecommunications services rendered by the separate function to
the district for the district's internal telecommunications needs shall
be charged at its true and full value. A rural port district may not
charge its nontelecommunications operations rates that are preferential
or discriminatory compared to those it charges entities purchasing
wholesale telecommunications services or retail telecommunications
services offered in partnership with a nonprofit organization, or a
federally recognized tribe or its political subdivision.
(5) A rural port district shall not exercise powers of eminent
domain to acquire telecommunications facilities or contractual rights
held by any other person or entity to telecommunications facilities.
(6) Except as otherwise specifically provided, a rural port
district may exercise any of the powers granted to it under this title
and other applicable laws in carrying out the powers authorized under
this section. Nothing in chapter 81, Laws of 2000 limits any existing
authority of a rural port district under this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 54.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A rural port district may expand its operations to include the
provision of retail telecommunications services in partnership with a
nonprofit organization, or a federally recognized tribe or its
political subdivision, if the district secures the approval of such an
expansion by the voters of the district.
(2) The proposal to expand operations to include retail
telecommunications services in partnership with a nonprofit
organization, or a federally recognized tribe or its political
subdivision, may be conducted at any general election held in an even-numbered year. The proposal may be submitted in one of two ways:
(a) To the voters of the district by resolution of the governing
board of the rural port district; or
(b) To the voters of the district by the county legislative
authority on petition of ten percent of the qualified electors of such
a district, based on the total vote cast in the last general county
election held in an even-numbered year.
(3) A form of petition for the expansion of a rural port district's
operations to include retail telecommunications services in partnership
with a nonprofit organization, or a federally recognized tribe or its
political subdivision, must be submitted to the county auditor within
ten months prior to the election at which such a proposition is to be
submitted to the voters. Petitions must be filed with the county
auditor not less than four months before such an election.
(4) The county auditor must examine the signatures submitted within
thirty days of the signatures being submitted and certify the
sufficiency or insufficiency of the signatures. If the petition is
found to be insufficient, it must be returned to the rural port
district that filed the petition, who may amend and add names to the
petition for up to ten days before returning the petition to the county
auditor. Upon receipt of an amended petition, the county auditor shall
have an additional fifteen days to examine the amended petition and
attach a certificate to the petition if the signatures are found to be
sufficient.
(5) Any person who has signed such a petition may not withdraw his
or her name from the petition after it has been filed with the county
auditor, provided that each signature on the petition is dated and no
signature dated prior to the date on which the form of petition was
submitted to the county auditor is valid.
(6) If the petition is certified to be sufficient, the county
auditor shall transmit the petition, along with the attached
certificate of sufficiency, to the county legislative authority.
(7) Upon receipt of a petition and a certificate of sufficiency
from the county auditor, the county legislative authority must submit
the proposition to the voters of the district at the next general
election in an even-numbered year according to RCW 29A.04.330. The
notice of the election must state the object of such an election, and
must in other respects conform to the requirements of the general laws
of Washington, governing the time and manner of holding elections.
(8) The proposal submitted to the voters for their approval or
rejection must be expressed on the ballot substantially in the
following terms:

Shall Rural Port District No. . . . of . . . . . . County expand
their operations to include retail telecommunications services in
partnership with . . . .?

Yes □
No □

(9) Within ten days after such an election, the election board of
the county shall canvass the returns, and if at such an election a
majority of the voters voting on such a proposition vote in favor of
the rural port district's proposal, the district is authorized to
expand their operations to include retail telecommunications services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 54.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By July 1, 2010, public utility districts that own, lease, or
have rights to telecommunications infrastructure shall provide
information as requested by the department of information services to
the third party mapping vendor under contract with the department of
information services, in conjunction with the department of information
services' broadband mapping and planning grants from the federal
department of commerce and the national telecommunications and
information administration. This information must include, but not be
limited to, the following information, to the extent available:
(a) The location of middle mile and last mile infrastructure;
(b) The location of dark fiber, including the location and use of
nontelecommunications fiber, such as fiber used for traffic lights;
(c) Identification of broadband service area;
(d) The penetration and adoption rate of broadband in their
services area;
(e) The type of technology used; and
(f) The advertised speeds.
(2) For purposes of this section, "telecommunications
infrastructure" includes conduits, wires, fiberoptic cable or lines,
coaxial cable, copper twisted pair telephone lines, receivers,
transmitters, and broadcast radio frequency bandwidth.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 54.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By July 1, 2010, rural port districts that own, lease, or have
rights to telecommunications infrastructure shall provide information
as requested by the department of information services to the third
party mapping vendor under contract with the department of information
services, in conjunction with the department of information services'
broadband mapping and planning grants from the federal department of
commerce and the national telecommunications and information
administration. This information must include, but not be limited to,
the following information, to the extent available:
(a) The location of middle mile and last mile infrastructure;
(b) The location of dark fiber, including the location and use of
nontelecommunications fiber, such as fiber used for traffic lights;
(c) Identification of broadband service area;
(d) The penetration and adoption rate of broadband in their
services area;
(e) The type of technology used; and
(f) The advertised speeds.
(2) For purposes of this section, "telecommunications
infrastructure" includes conduits, wires, fiberoptic cable or lines,
coaxial cable, copper twisted pair telephone lines, receivers,
transmitters, and broadcast radio frequency bandwidth.

--- END ---