BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that recent changes in
technology have fundamentally changed the telecommunications industry.
In past decades, telecommunications companies retained monopolies in
their service areas and states traditionally regulated them to ensure
that their rates were fair, just, and reasonable. In today's
marketplace, these same telecommunications companies face increasing
competition from cable, wireless, internet, and other companies for the
same or functionally equivalent services. In light of increasing
competition in an ever-changing telecommunications industry, the
legislature intends to review the sufficiency of the current rate-of-return regulation model, the current tax structure for various
telecommunications services, and the role the state's utilities and
transportation commission should play in regulating telecommunications
services in the future.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The technology law and public policy
clinic at the University of Washington school of law shall prepare a
comprehensive report identifying and analyzing trends in the
telecommunications industry and pathways for telecommunications
regulatory reform. The report must include, but not be limited to, a
review of the following issues:
(a) The taxation treatment of all telecommunications services that
provide the same or functionally equivalent services;
(b) The character and degree of competition in the
telecommunications market;
(c) The regulatory, legal, and economic barriers to adequate
competition, actual or perceived, that exist;
(d) What changes could be made in policy, law, or administrative
rule to address any actual or perceived barriers to competition; and
(e) The role of the utilities and transportation commission in the
oversight and regulation of telecommunications services.
(2) The technology law and public policy clinic shall consult with
local governments, public utility districts, telecommunications service
providers, the utilities and transportation commission, the department
of revenue, and other stakeholders in preparing its analysis and
report.
(3) By December 1, 2011, the technology law and public policy
clinic shall issue a report to the legislature with recommendations on
legislative action that may be necessary in order to effectuate
telecommunications regulatory reform in Washington.

--- END ---