BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The department of licensing shall submit
recommendations to the legislature on establishing continuing education
requirements for engineers using the public criteria set forth in RCW
18.118.010.
(2) In developing the recommendations, the department of licensing
shall consult with registered engineers and other stakeholders.
(3) The department of licensing shall submit a report detailing its
findings and recommendations under this section to the appropriate
legislative committees by December 1, 2010.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2011.

--- END ---