BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 34.05.110 and 2009 c 358 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Agencies must provide to a small business a copy of the state
law or agency rule that a small business is violating and a period of
at least two business days to correct the violation before the agency
may impose any fines, civil penalties, or administrative sanctions for
a violation of a state law or agency rule by a small business. If no
correction is possible, the requirements in this subsection do not
apply.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (((3))) (4) of this section,
agencies shall waive any fines, civil penalties, or administrative
sanctions for first-time paperwork violations by a small business.
(((2))) (3) When an agency waives a fine, penalty, or sanction
under this section, when possible it shall require the small business
to correct the violation within a reasonable period of time, in a
manner specified by the agency. If correction is impossible, no
correction may be required and failure to correct is not grounds for
reinstatement of fines, penalties, or sanctions under subsection
(((4))) (5)(b) of this section.
(((3))) (4) Exceptions to requirements of subsection (1) of this
section and the waiver requirement in subsection (2) of this section
may be made for any of the following reasons:
(a) The agency head determines that the effect of the violation or
waiver presents a direct danger to the public health, results in a loss
of income or benefits to an employee, poses a potentially significant
threat to human health or the environment, or causes serious harm to
the public interest;
(b) The violation involves a small business knowingly or willfully
engaging in conduct that may result in a felony conviction;
(c) The violation is of a requirement concerning the assessment,
collection, or administration of any tax, tax program, debt, revenue,
receipt, a regulated entity's financial filings, or insurance rate or
form filing;
(d) The ((waiver is)) requirements of this section are in conflict
with federal law or program requirements, federal requirements that are
a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state,
or the requirements for eligibility of employers in this state for
federal unemployment tax credits, as determined by the agency head;
(e) The small business committing the violation previously violated
a substantially similar ((paperwork)) requirement; or
(f) The owner or operator of the small business committing the
violation owns or operates, or owned or operated a different small
business which previously violated a substantially similar
((paperwork)) requirement.
(((4))) (5)(a) Nothing in this section prohibits an agency from
waiving fines, civil penalties, or administrative sanctions incurred by
a small business for a paperwork violation that is not a first-time
offense.
(b) Any fine, civil penalty, or administrative sanction that is
waived under this section may be reinstated and imposed in addition to
any additional fines, penalties, or administrative sanctions associated
with a subsequent violation for noncompliance with a substantially
similar paperwork requirement, or failure to correct the previous
violation as required by the agency under subsection (((2))) (3) of
this section.
(((5))) (6) Nothing in this section may be construed to diminish
the responsibility for any citizen or business to apply for and obtain
a permit, license, or authorizing document that is required to engage
in a regulated activity, or otherwise comply with state or federal law.
(((6))) (7) Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply to
small businesses required to provide accurate and complete information
and documentation in relation to any claim for payment of state or
federal funds or who are licensed or certified to provide care and
services to vulnerable adults or children.
(((7))) (8) As used in this section:
(a) "Small business" ((means a business with two hundred fifty or
fewer employees)) has the same meaning as provided in RCW 39.29.006.
(b) "Paperwork violation" means the violation of any statutory or
regulatory requirement that mandates the collection of information by
an agency, or the collection, posting, or retention of information by
a small business. This includes but is not limited to requirements in
the Revised Code of Washington, the Washington Administrative Code, the
Washington State Register, or any other agency directive.
(c) "First-time paperwork violation" means the first instance of a
particular or substantially similar paperwork violation.

--- END ---