BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that increased demand for water supplies
in the state requires the state to manage its water resources wisely
and that wise management includes examining innovative policies for
maximizing use while minimizing the impact of that use. The
legislature declares that one such innovative policy is allowing the
withdrawal of freshwater from larger rivers just before the water would
otherwise mix with marine water and become salty. The Skagit river
watershed is designated by the legislature as a pilot project area to
implement and evaluate this new policy approach. To permit the state
to adequately implement such a policy, the legislature authorizes as an
exemption from the normal permitting process such uses for agricultural
purposes as provided in this section.
(2) A diversion of water from the Skagit river for agricultural
purposes made as authorized by this section is exempt from the
application and permit requirements of RCW 90.03.250 through 90.03.320
if the diversion is made within the tidally influenced portion of the
river, which for the purposes of this section shall be from the
confluence point of the river with marine water upstream to the first
available presently existing permanent United States geological survey
real-time stream flow measurement station (Station No. 12-2005-00) that
is located at river mile 15.7 near Mt. Vernon. Such a diversion is
subject to all other applicable state law.
(3) Before a diversion of water for agricultural purposes is made
under this section, the person requesting the diversion shall notify
the department in writing of the intent to divert water, the location
of the point of diversion, and the annual and instantaneous amount of
water to be diverted. Upon receipt of the notification, the department
shall provide a letter to the person proposing the diversion within
seven working days confirming that the diversion is in conformance with
the provisions of this section. If a response has not been provided by
the department, the diversion is deemed authorized and may begin once
the department response period has expired.
(4) The total amount of water diverted for agricultural purposes
under this section shall be not more than one-tenth of one percent of
the minimum instantaneous flow or river level established by
preexisting rule.
(5) The right for the diversion established under this section is
equal to that established by a permit issued under this chapter, and is
subject to restriction necessary to protect minimum instream flows or
water levels as established by preexisting rule.
(6) The department shall compile the information provided under
this section for diversions and make information available upon
request. The department shall evaluate the effects and effectiveness
of diversions made under this section and report its findings to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2014.

--- END ---