BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.32.570 and 2007 c 50 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) If a retiree enters employment with an employer sooner than
one calendar month after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly
retirement allowance will be reduced by five and one-half percent for
every seven hours worked during that month. This reduction will be
applied each month until the retiree remains absent from employment
with an employer for one full calendar month.
(b) The benefit reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will
accrue for a maximum of one hundred forty hours per month. Any monthly
benefit reduction over one hundred percent will be applied to the
benefit the retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent months.
(2) Except under subsection (3) of this section, any retired
teacher or retired administrator who enters service in any public
educational institution in Washington state at least one calendar month
after his or her accrual date shall cease to receive pension payments
while engaged in such service, after the retiree has rendered service
for more than eight hundred sixty-seven hours in a school year.
(3) Any retired teacher or retired administrator who enters service
in any public educational institution in Washington state one and one-half calendar months or more after his or her accrual date and:
(a) Is hired pursuant to a written policy into a position for which
the school board has documented a justifiable need to hire a retiree
into the position;
(b) Is hired through the established process for the position with
the approval of the school board or other highest decision-making
authority of the prospective employer;
(c) Whose employer retains records of the procedures followed and
the decisions made in hiring the retired teacher or retired
administrator and provides those records in the event of an audit; and
(d) The employee has not already rendered a cumulative total of
more than one thousand nine hundred hours of service while in receipt
of pension payments beyond an annual threshold of eight hundred sixty-seven hours;
shall cease to receive pension payments while engaged in that service
after the retiree has rendered service for more than one thousand five
hundred hours in a school year. The one thousand nine hundred hour
cumulative total limitation under this section applies prospectively
after July 22, 2007.
(4)(a) Any retired teacher, who enters service as a teacher in any
public educational institution in Washington state one and one-half
calendar months or more after his or her accrual date, must cease to
receive pension payments while engaged in that service after the
retiree has rendered service for more than one thousand five hundred
hours in a school year.
(b) A retired teacher may enter service under (a) of this
subsection (4), only if:
(i) The teacher is hired pursuant to a written policy into a high-demand math, science, or special education teaching position for which
the school board has documented a justifiable need to hire a retiree
into the position;
(ii) The teacher is hired through the established process for the
position with the approval of the school board or other highest
decision-making authority of the prospective employer; and
(iii) The teacher's employer retains records of the procedures
followed and the decisions made in hiring the retired teacher or
retired administrator and provides those records in the event of an
audit.
(c) This subsection (4) applies prospectively after July 22, 2010.
(5) When a retired teacher or administrator renders service beyond
eight hundred sixty-seven hours, the department shall collect from the
employer the applicable employer retirement contributions for the
entire duration of the member's employment during that fiscal year.
(((5))) (6) The department shall collect and provide the state
actuary with information relevant to the use of this section for the
select committee on pension policy.
(((6))) (7) The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal
this section in the future and no member or beneficiary has a
contractual right to be employed for more than five hundred twenty-five
hours per year without a reduction of his or her pension.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.32 RCW
to read as follows:
The office of the superintendent of public instruction must
periodically study the demand for teaching positions that are included
in the provisions of RCW 41.32.570(4) and report to the select
committee on pension policy and the appropriate committees of the
legislature on any recommended changes to the postretirement provisions
for high-demand teachers.

--- END ---