BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 31.04.015 and 2009 c 149 s 12 and 2009 c 120 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this
chapter unless the context clearly requires a different meaning.
(1) "Add-on method" means the method of precomputing interest
payable on a loan whereby the interest to be earned is added to the
principal balance and the total plus any charges allowed under this
chapter is stated as the loan amount, without further provision for the
payment of interest except for failure to pay according to loan terms.
The director may adopt by rule a more detailed explanation of the
meaning and use of this method.
(2) "Applicant" means a person applying for a license under this
chapter.
(3) "Borrower" means any person who consults with or retains a
licensee or person subject to this chapter in an effort to obtain or
seek information about obtaining a loan, regardless of whether that
person actually obtains such a loan.
(4) "Depository institution" has the same meaning as in section 3
of the federal deposit insurance act on July 26, 2009, and includes
credit unions.
(5) "Director" means the director of financial institutions.
(6) "Federal banking agencies" means the board of governors of the
federal reserve system, comptroller of the currency, director of the
office of thrift supervision, national credit union administration, and
federal deposit insurance corporation.
(7) "Individual servicing a mortgage loan" means a person on behalf
of a lender or servicer licensed by this state, who collects or
receives payments including payments of principal, interest, escrow
amounts, and other amounts due, on existing obligations due and owing
to the licensed lender or servicer for a residential mortgage loan when
the borrower is in default, or in reasonably foreseeable likelihood of
default, working with the borrower and the licensed lender or servicer,
collects data and makes decisions necessary to modify either
temporarily or permanently certain terms of those obligations, or
otherwise finalizing collection through the foreclosure process.
(8) "Insurance" means life insurance, disability insurance,
property insurance, involuntary unemployment insurance, and such other
insurance as may be authorized by the insurance commissioner.
(9) "License" means a single license issued under the authority of
this chapter with respect to a single place of business.
(10) "Licensee" means a person to whom one or more licenses have
been issued.
(11) "Loan" means a sum of money lent at interest or for a fee or
other charge and includes both open-end and closed-end loan
transactions.
(12) "Loan processor" means an individual who performs clerical or
support duties as an employee at the direction of and subject to the
supervision and instruction of a person licensed, or exempt from
licensing, under chapter 19.146 RCW.
(13) "Making a loan" means advancing, offering to advance, or
making a commitment to advance funds to a borrower for a loan.
(14) "Mortgage broker" means the same as defined in RCW 19.146.010,
except that for purposes of this chapter, a licensee or person subject
to this chapter cannot receive compensation as both a consumer loan
licensee making the loan and as a consumer loan licensee acting as the
mortgage broker in the same loan transaction.
(15)(a) "Mortgage loan originator" means an individual who for
compensation or gain (i) takes a residential mortgage loan application,
or (ii) offers or negotiates terms of a residential mortgage loan.
"Mortgage loan originator" does not include any individual who performs
purely administrative or clerical tasks; and does not include a person
or entity solely involved in extensions of credit relating to timeshare
plans, as that term is defined in section 101(53D) of Title 11, United
States Code. For the purposes of this definition, administrative or
clerical tasks means the receipt, collection, and distribution of
information common for the processing of a loan in the mortgage
industry and communication with a consumer to obtain information
necessary for the processing of a residential mortgage loan.
(b) "Mortgage loan originator" also includes an individual who for
compensation or gain performs residential mortgage loan modification
services or holds himself or herself out as being able to perform
residential mortgage loan modification services.
(c) "Mortgage loan originator" does not include a person or entity
that only performs real estate brokerage activities and is licensed or
registered in accordance with applicable state law, unless the person
or entity is compensated by a lender, a mortgage broker, or other
mortgage loan originator or by any agent of such a lender, mortgage
broker, or other mortgage loan originator. For the purposes of chapter
120, Laws of 2009, the term "real estate brokerage activity" means any
activity that involves offering or providing real estate brokerage
services to the public, including:
(i) Acting as a real estate agent or real estate broker for a
buyer, seller, lessor, or lessee of real property;
(ii) Bringing together parties interested in the sale, purchase,
lease, rental, or exchange of real property;
(iii) Negotiating, on behalf of any party, any portion of a
contract relating to the sale, purchase, lease, rental, or exchange of
real property, other than in connection with providing financing with
respect to such a transaction;
(iv) Engaging in any activity for which a person engaged in the
activity is required to be registered or licensed as a real estate
agent or real estate broker under any applicable law; and
(v) Offering to engage in any activity, or act in any capacity,
described in (((b))) (c)(i) through (iv) of this subsection.
(((c))) (d) This subsection does not apply to an individual
servicing a mortgage loan before July 1, 2011.
(e) This subsection does not apply to employees of a housing
counseling agency approved by the United States department of housing
and urban development unless the employees of a housing counseling
agency are required under federal law to be individually licensed as
mortgage loan originators.
(16) "Nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry" means a
mortgage licensing system developed and maintained by the conference of
state bank supervisors and the American association of residential
mortgage regulators for the licensing and registration of mortgage loan
originators.
(17) "Officer" means an official appointed by the company for the
purpose of making business decisions or corporate decisions.
(18) "Person" includes individuals, partnerships, associations,
limited liability companies, limited liability partnerships, trusts,
corporations, and all other legal entities.
(19) "Principal" means any person who controls, directly or
indirectly through one or more intermediaries, alone or in concert with
others, a ten percent or greater interest in a partnership; company;
association or corporation; or a limited liability company, and the
owner of a sole proprietorship.
(20) "Registered mortgage loan originator" means any individual who
meets the definition of mortgage loan originator and is an employee of
a depository institution; a subsidiary that is owned and controlled by
a depository institution and regulated by a federal banking agency; or
an institution regulated by the farm credit administration and is
registered with, and maintains a unique identifier through, the
nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry.
(21) "Residential mortgage loan" means any loan primarily for
personal, family, or household use that is secured by a mortgage, deed
of trust, or other equivalent consensual security interest on a
dwelling, as defined in section 103(v) of the truth in lending act, or
residential real estate upon which is constructed or intended to be
constructed a dwelling.
(22) "Residential mortgage loan modification" means a change in one
or more of a residential mortgage loan's terms or conditions. Changes
to a residential mortgage loan's terms or conditions include but are
not limited to forbearances; repayment plans; changes in interest
rates, loan terms, or loan types; capitalizations of arrearages; or
principal reductions.
(23) "Residential mortgage loan modification services" includes
negotiating, attempting to negotiate, arranging, attempting to arrange,
or otherwise offering to perform a residential mortgage loan
modification. "Residential mortgage loan modification services" also
includes the collection of data for submission to an entity performing
mortgage loan modification services. "Residential mortgage loan
modification services" do not include actions by individuals servicing
a mortgage loan before July 1, 2011.
(24) "S.A.F.E. act" means the secure and fair enforcement for
mortgage licensing act of 2008, Title V of the housing and economic
recovery act of 2008 ("HERA"), P.L. 110-289, effective July 30, 2008.
(((23))) (25) "Senior officer" means an officer of a licensee at
the vice president level or above.
(((24))) (26) "Service or servicing a loan" means on behalf of the
lender or investor of a residential mortgage loan: (a) Collecting or
receiving payments on existing obligations due and owing to the lender
or investor, including payments of principal, interest, escrow amounts,
and other amounts due; (b) collecting fees due to the servicer; (c)
working with the borrower and the licensed lender or servicer to
collect data and make decisions necessary to modify certain terms of
those obligations either temporarily or permanently; (d) otherwise
finalizing collection through the foreclosure process; or (e) servicing
a reverse mortgage loan.
(27) "Service or servicing a reverse mortgage loan" means, pursuant
to an agreement with the owner of a reverse mortgage loan:
Calculating, collecting, or receiving payments of interest or other
amounts due; administering advances to the borrower; and providing
account statements to the borrower or lender.
(28) "Simple interest method" means the method of computing
interest payable on a loan by applying the annual percentage interest
rate or its periodic equivalent to the unpaid balances of the principal
of the loan outstanding for the time outstanding with each payment
applied first to any unpaid penalties, fees, or charges, then to
accumulated interest, and the remainder of the payment applied to the
unpaid balance of the principal until paid in full. In using such
method, interest shall not be payable in advance nor compounded, except
that on a loan secured by real estate, a licensee may collect at the
time of the loan closing up to but not exceeding forty-five days of
prepaid interest. The prohibition on compounding interest does not
apply to reverse mortgage loans made in accordance with the Washington
state reverse mortgage act. The director may adopt by rule a more
detailed explanation of the meaning and use of this method.
(((25))) (29) "Third-party residential mortgage loan modification
services" means residential mortgage loan modification services offered
or performed by any person other than the owner or servicer of the
loan.
(30) "Third-party service provider" means any person other than the
licensee or a mortgage broker who provides goods or services to the
licensee or borrower in connection with the preparation of the
borrower's loan and includes, but is not limited to, credit reporting
agencies, real estate brokers or salespersons, title insurance
companies and agents, appraisers, structural and pest inspectors, or
escrow companies.
(((26))) (31) "Unique identifier" means a number or other
identifier assigned by protocols established by the nationwide mortgage
licensing system and registry.

Sec. 2 RCW 31.04.035 and 2009 c 120 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
No person may engage in the business of making secured or unsecured
loans of money, credit, or things in action, or servicing residential
mortgage loans, without first obtaining and maintaining a license in
accordance with this chapter, except those exempt under RCW 31.04.025.

Sec. 3 RCW 31.04.045 and 2009 c 120 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Application for a license under this chapter must be made to
the nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry or in the form
prescribed by the director. The application must contain at least the
following information:
(a) The name and the business addresses of the applicant;
(b) If the applicant is a partnership or association, the name of
every member;
(c) If the applicant is a corporation, the name, residence address,
and telephone number of each officer and director;
(d) The street address, county, and municipality from which
business is to be conducted; and
(e) Such other information as the director may require by rule.
(2) As part of or in connection with an application for any license
under this section, or periodically upon license renewal, each officer,
director, and owner applicant shall furnish information concerning his
or her identity, including fingerprints for submission to the
Washington state patrol, the federal bureau of investigation, the
nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry, or any governmental
agency or entity authorized to receive this information for a state and
national criminal history background check; personal history;
experience; business record; purposes; and other pertinent facts, as
the director may reasonably require. As part of or in connection with
an application for a license under this chapter, or periodically upon
license renewal, the director is authorized to receive criminal history
record information that includes nonconviction data as defined in RCW
10.97.030. The department may only disseminate nonconviction data
obtained under this section to criminal justice agencies. This section
does not apply to financial institutions regulated under chapters 31.12
and 31.13 RCW and Titles 30, 32, and 33 RCW.
(3) In order to reduce the points of contact which the federal
bureau of investigation may have to maintain, the director may use the
nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry as a channeling agent
for requesting information from and distributing information to the
department of justice or any governmental agency.
(4) In order to reduce the points of contact which the director may
have to maintain, the director may use the nationwide mortgage
licensing system and registry as a channeling agent for requesting and
distributing information to and from any source so directed by the
director.
(5) At the time of filing an application for a license under this
chapter, each applicant shall pay to the director or through the
nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry an investigation fee
and the license fee in an amount determined by rule of the director to
be sufficient to cover the director's costs in administering this
chapter.
(6) Each applicant shall file and maintain a surety bond, approved
by the director, executed by the applicant as obligor and by a surety
company authorized to do a surety business in this state as surety,
whose liability as such surety shall not exceed in the aggregate the
penal sum of the bond. The penal sum of the bond shall be a minimum of
thirty thousand dollars and based on the annual dollar amount of loans
originated or residential mortgage loans serviced. The bond shall run
to the state of Washington as obligee for the use and benefit of the
state and of any person or persons who may have a cause of action
against the obligor under this chapter. The bond shall be conditioned
that the obligor as licensee will faithfully conform to and abide by
this chapter and all the rules adopted under this chapter. The bond
will pay to the state and any person or persons having a cause of
action against the obligor all moneys that may become due and owing to
the state and those persons under and by virtue of this chapter. In
lieu of a surety bond, if the applicant is a Washington business
corporation, the applicant may maintain unimpaired capital, surplus,
and long-term subordinated debt in an amount that at any time its
outstanding promissory notes or other evidences of debt (other than
long-term subordinated debt) in an aggregate sum do not exceed three
times the aggregate amount of its unimpaired capital, surplus, and
long-term subordinated debt. The director may define qualifying "long-term subordinated debt" for purposes of this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 31.04.055 and 2001 c 81 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall issue and deliver a license to the applicant
to make loans in accordance with this chapter at the location specified
in the application if, after investigation, the director finds that:
(a) The applicant has paid all required fees;
(b) The applicant has submitted a complete application in
compliance with RCW 31.04.045;
(c) Neither the applicant nor its officers or principals have had
a license issued under this section or any other section, in this state
or another state, revoked or suspended within the last five years of
the date of filing of the application;
(d) Neither the applicant nor any of its officers or principals
have been convicted of a gross misdemeanor involving dishonesty or
financial misconduct or a felony or a violation of the banking laws of
this state or of the United States within seven years of the filing of
an application; ((and))
(e) The financial responsibility, experience, character, and
general fitness of the applicant are such as to command the confidence
of the community and to warrant a belief that the business will be
operated honestly, fairly, and efficiently within the purposes of this
chapter; and
(f) Neither the applicant nor any of its principals have provided
unlicensed residential mortgage loan modification services in this
state in the five years prior to the filing of the present application.
(2) If the director does not find the conditions of subsection (1)
of this section have been met, the director shall not issue the
license. The director shall notify the applicant of the denial and
return to the applicant the bond posted and the sum paid by the
applicant as a license fee, retaining the investigation fee to cover
the costs of investigating the application. The director shall approve
or deny every application for license under this chapter within ninety
days from the filing of a complete application with the fees and the
approved bond.

Sec. 5 RCW 31.04.085 and 2001 c 81 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A licensee shall, for each license held by any person, on or
before the first day of each March, pay to the director an annual
assessment as determined by rule by the director. The licensee shall
be responsible for payment of the annual assessment for the previous
calendar year if the licensee had a license for any time during the
preceding calendar year, regardless of whether they surrendered their
license during the calendar year or whether their license was suspended
or revoked. At the same time the licensee shall file with the director
the required bond or otherwise demonstrate compliance with RCW
31.04.045.
(2) The director may establish a different yearly assessment fee
for persons servicing residential mortgage loans.

Sec. 6 RCW 31.04.093 and 2001 c 81 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall enforce all laws and rules relating to the
licensing and regulation of licensees and persons subject to this
chapter.
(2) The director may deny applications for licenses for:
(a) Failure of the applicant to demonstrate within its application
for a license that it meets the requirements for licensing in RCW
31.04.045 and 31.04.055;
(b) Violation of an order issued by the director under this chapter
or another chapter administered by the director, including but not
limited to cease and desist orders and temporary cease and desist
orders;
(c) Revocation or suspension of a license to conduct lending or
residential mortgage loan servicing, or to provide settlement services
associated with lending or residential mortgage loan servicing, by this
state, another state, or by the federal government within five years of
the date of submittal of a complete application for a license; or
(d) Filing an incomplete application when that incomplete
application has been filed with the department for sixty or more days,
provided that the director has given notice to the licensee that the
application is incomplete, informed the applicant why the application
is incomplete, and allowed at least twenty days for the applicant to
complete the application.
(3) The director may suspend or revoke a license issued under this
chapter if the director finds that:
(a) The licensee has failed to pay any fee due the state of
Washington, has failed to maintain in effect the bond or permitted
substitute required under this chapter, or has failed to comply with
any specific order or demand of the director lawfully made and directed
to the licensee in accordance with this chapter;
(b) The licensee, either knowingly or without the exercise of due
care, has violated any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted
under this chapter; or
(c) A fact or condition exists that, if it had existed at the time
of the original application for the license, clearly would have allowed
the director to deny the application for the original license. The
director may revoke or suspend only the particular license with respect
to which grounds for revocation or suspension may occur or exist unless
the director finds that the grounds for revocation or suspension are of
general application to all offices or to more than one office operated
by the licensee, in which case, the director may revoke or suspend all
of the licenses issued to the licensee.
(4) The director may impose fines of up to one hundred dollars per
day upon the licensee, its employee or loan originator, or other person
subject to this chapter for:
(a) Any violation of this chapter; or
(b) Failure to comply with any order or subpoena issued by the
director under this chapter.
(5) The director may issue an order directing the licensee, its
employee or loan originator, or other person subject to this chapter
to:
(a) Cease and desist from conducting business in a manner that is
injurious to the public or violates any provision of this chapter;
(b) Take such affirmative action as is necessary to comply with
this chapter; or
(c) Make restitution to a borrower or other person who is damaged
as a result of a violation of this chapter.
(6) The director may issue an order removing from office or
prohibiting from participation in the affairs of any licensee, or both,
any officer, principal, employee or loan originator, or any person
subject to this chapter for:
(a) False statements or omission of material information from an
application for a license that, if known, would have allowed the
director to deny the original application for a license;
(b) Conviction of a gross misdemeanor involving dishonesty or
financial misconduct or a felony;
(c) Suspension or revocation of a license to engage in lending or
residential mortgage loan servicing, or perform a settlement service
related to lending or residential mortgage loan servicing, in this
state or another state;
(d) Failure to comply with any order or subpoena issued under this
chapter; or
(e) A violation of RCW 31.04.027.
(7) Whenever the director determines that the public is likely to
be substantially injured by delay in issuing a cease and desist order,
the director may immediately issue a temporary cease and desist order.
The order may direct the licensee to discontinue any violation of this
chapter, to take such affirmative action as is necessary to comply with
this chapter, and may include a summary suspension of the licensee's
license and may order the licensee to immediately cease the conduct of
business under this chapter. The order shall become effective at the
time specified in the order. Every temporary cease and desist order
shall include a provision that a hearing will be held upon request to
determine whether the order will become permanent. Such hearing shall
be held within fourteen days of receipt of a request for a hearing
unless otherwise specified in chapter 34.05 RCW.
(8) A licensee may surrender a license by delivering to the
director written notice of surrender, but the surrender does not affect
the licensee's civil or criminal liability, if any, for acts committed
before the surrender, including any administrative action initiated by
the director to suspend or revoke a license, impose fines, compel the
payment of restitution to borrowers or other persons, or exercise any
other authority under this chapter.
(9) The revocation, suspension, or surrender of a license does not
impair or affect the obligation of a preexisting lawful contract
between the licensee and a borrower.
(10) Every license issued under this chapter remains in force and
effect until it has been surrendered, revoked, or suspended in
accordance with this chapter. However, the director may on his or her
own initiative reinstate suspended licenses or issue new licenses to a
licensee whose license or licenses have been revoked if the director
finds that the licensee meets all the requirements of this chapter.

Sec. 7 RCW 31.04.165 and 2009 c 120 s 30 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director has the power, and broad administrative
discretion, to administer and interpret this chapter to facilitate the
delivery of financial services to the citizens of this state by
consumer loan companies, residential mortgage loan servicers, and
mortgage loan originators subject to this chapter. The director shall
adopt all rules necessary to administer this chapter and to ensure
complete and full disclosure by licensees of lending transactions
governed by this chapter.
(2) If it appears to the director that a licensee is conducting
business in an injurious manner or is violating any provision of this
chapter, the director may order or direct the discontinuance of any
such injurious or illegal practice.
(3) For purposes of this section, "conducting business in an
injurious manner" means conducting business in a manner that violates
any provision of this chapter, or that creates the reasonable
likelihood of a violation of any provision of this chapter.
(4) The director or designated persons, with or without prior
administrative action, may bring an action in superior court to enjoin
the acts or practices that constitute violations of this chapter and to
enforce compliance with this chapter or any rule or order made under
this chapter. Upon proper showing, injunctive relief or a temporary
restraining order shall be granted. The director shall not be required
to post a bond in any court proceedings.

Sec. 8 RCW 31.04.277 and 2009 c 120 s 27 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each consumer loan company licensee who makes, services, or brokers
a loan secured by real property shall submit to the nationwide mortgage
licensing system and registry reports of condition, which must be in
the form and must contain the information as the nationwide mortgage
licensing system and registry may require.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) A residential mortgage loan servicer
must comply with the following requirements:
(a) The requirements of chapter 19.148 RCW;
(b) Any fee that is assessed by a servicer must be assessed within
forty-five days of the date on which the fee was incurred and must be
explained clearly and conspicuously in a statement mailed to the
borrower at the borrower's last known address no more than thirty days
after assessing the fee;
(c) All amounts received by a servicer on a residential mortgage
loan at the address where the borrower has been instructed to make
payments must be accepted and credited, or treated as credited, within
one business day of the date received, provided that the borrower has
provided sufficient information to credit the account. If a servicer
uses the scheduled method of accounting, any regularly scheduled
payment made prior to the scheduled due date must be credited no later
than the due date. If any payment is received and not credited, or
treated as credited, the borrower must be notified of the disposition
of the payment within ten business days by mail at the borrower's last
known address. The notification must identify the reason the payment
was not credited or treated as credited to the account, as well as any
actions the borrower must take to make the residential mortgage loan
current;
(d) Any servicer that exercises the authority to collect escrow
amounts on a residential mortgage loan held for the borrower for
payment of insurance, taxes, and other charges with respect to the
property shall collect and make all such payments from the escrow
account and ensure that no late penalties are assessed or other
negative consequences result for the borrower;
(e) The servicer shall make reasonable attempts to comply with a
borrower's request for information about the residential mortgage loan
account and to respond to any dispute initiated by the borrower about
the loan account. The servicer:
(i) Must maintain written or electronic records of each written
request for information regarding a dispute or error involving the
borrower's account until the residential mortgage loan is paid in full,
sold, or otherwise satisfied;
(ii) Must provide a written statement to the borrower within
fifteen business days of receipt of a written request from the
borrower. The borrower's request must include the name and account
number, if any, of the borrower, a statement that the account is or may
be in error, and sufficient detail regarding the information sought by
the borrower to permit the servicer to comply. At a minimum, the
servicer's response to the borrower's request must include the
following information:
(A) Whether the account is current or, if the account is not
current, an explanation of the default and the date the account went
into default;
(B) The current balance due on the residential mortgage loan,
including the principal due, the amount of funds, if any, held in a
suspense account, the amount of the escrow balance known to the
servicer, if any, and whether there are any escrow deficiencies or
shortages known to the servicer;
(C) The identity, address, and other relevant information about the
current holder, owner, or assignee of the residential mortgage loan;
and
(D) The telephone number and mailing address of a servicer
representative with the information and authority to answer questions
and resolve disputes; and
(iii) May charge a fee for preparing and furnishing the statement
in (e)(ii) of this subsection not exceeding thirty dollars per
statement; and
(f) Promptly correct any errors and refund any fees assessed to the
borrower resulting from the servicer's error.
(2) In addition to the statement in subsection (1)(e)(ii) of this
section, a borrower may request more detailed information from a
servicer, and the servicer must provide the information within fifteen
business days of receipt of a written request from the borrower. The
request must include the name and account number, if any, of the
borrower, a statement that the account is or may be in error, and
provide sufficient detail to the servicer regarding information sought
by the borrower. If requested by the borrower this statement must
include:
(a) A copy of the original note, or if unavailable, an affidavit of
lost note; and
(b) A statement that identifies and itemizes all fees and charges
assessed under the loan transaction and provides a full payment history
identifying in a clear and conspicuous manner all of the debits,
credits, application of and disbursement of all payments received from
or for the benefit of the borrower, and other activity on the
residential mortgage loan including escrow account activity and
suspense account activity, if any. The period of the account history
shall cover at a minimum the two-year period prior to the date of the
receipt of the request for information. If the servicer has not
serviced the residential mortgage loan for the entire two-year time
period the servicer shall provide the information going back to the
date on which the servicer began servicing the home loan, and identify
the previous servicer, if known. If the servicer claims that any
delinquent or outstanding sums are owed on the home loan prior to the
two-year period or the period during which the servicer has serviced
the residential mortgage loan, the servicer shall provide an account
history beginning with the month that the servicer claims any
outstanding sums are owed on the residential mortgage loan up to the
date of the request for the information. The borrower may request
annually one statement free of charge.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) In addition to any other requirements
under federal or state law, an advance fee may not be collected for
residential mortgage loan modification services unless a written
disclosure summary of all material terms, in the format adopted by the
department under subsection (2) of this section, has been provided to
the borrower.
(2) The department shall adopt by rule a model written fee
agreement, and any other rules necessary to implement this section.
This may include, but is not limited to, usual and customary fees for
residential mortgage loan modification services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) In addition to complying with all
requirements for loan originators under this chapter, third-party
residential mortgage loan modification services providers must:
(a) Provide a written fee disclosure summary as described in
section 10 of this act before accepting any advance fee;
(b) Not receive an advance fee greater than seven hundred fifty
dollars;
(c) Not charge total fees in excess of usual and customary charges,
or total fees that are not reasonable in light of the service provided;
and
(d) Immediately inform the borrower in writing if the owner of the
loan requires additional information from the borrower, or if it
becomes apparent that a residential mortgage loan modification is not
possible.
(2) As a condition for providing a loan modification or loan
modification services, third-party residential mortgage loan
modification services providers and individuals servicing a residential
mortgage loan must not require or encourage a borrower to:
(a) Sign a waiver of his or her legal defenses, counterclaims, and
other legal rights against the servicer for future acts;
(b) Sign a waiver of his or her right to contest a future
foreclosure;
(c) Waive his or her right to receive notice before the owner or
servicer of the loan initiates foreclosure proceedings;
(d) Agree to pay charges not enumerated in any agreement between
the borrower and the lender, servicer, or owner of the loan; or
(e) Cease communication with the lender, investor, or loan
servicer.
(3) Failure to comply with subsection (1) of this section is a
violation of RCW 19.144.080.

Sec. 12 RCW 19.144.080 and 2008 c 108 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
It is unlawful for any person in connection with making, brokering,
((or)) obtaining, or modifying a residential mortgage loan to directly
or indirectly:
(1)(a) Employ any scheme, device, or artifice to defraud or
materially mislead any borrower during the lending process; (b) defraud
or materially mislead any lender, defraud or materially mislead any
person, or engage in any unfair or deceptive practice toward any person
in the lending process; or (c) obtain property by fraud or material
misrepresentation in the lending process;
(2) Knowingly make any misstatement, misrepresentation, or omission
during the mortgage lending process knowing that it may be relied on by
a mortgage lender, borrower, or any other party to the mortgage lending
process;
(3) Use or facilitate the use of any misstatement,
misrepresentation, or omission, knowing the same to contain a
misstatement, misrepresentation, or omission, during the mortgage
lending process with the intention that it be relied on by a mortgage
lender, borrower, or any other party to the mortgage lending process;
or
(4) Receive any proceeds or anything of value in connection with a
residential mortgage closing that such person knew resulted from a
violation of subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section.

Sec. 13 RCW 19.146.010 and 2009 c 528 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Affiliate" means any person who directly or indirectly through
one or more intermediaries, controls, or is controlled by, or is under
common control with another person.
(2) "Application" means the same as in Regulation X, Real Estate
Settlement Procedures, 24 C.F.R. Sec. 3500.
(3) "Borrower" means any person who consults with or retains a
mortgage broker or loan originator in an effort to obtain or seek
advice or information on obtaining or applying to obtain a residential
mortgage loan for himself, herself, or persons including himself or
herself, regardless of whether the person actually obtains such a loan.
(4) "Computer loan information systems" or "CLI system" means a
real estate mortgage financing information system that facilitates the
provision of information to consumers by a mortgage broker, loan
originator, lender, real estate agent, or other person regarding
interest rates and other loan terms available from different lenders.
(5) "Department" means the department of financial institutions.
(6) "Designated broker" means a natural person designated as the
person responsible for activities of the licensed mortgage broker in
conducting the business of a mortgage broker under this chapter and who
meets the experience and examination requirements set forth in RCW
19.146.210(1)(e).
(7) "Director" means the director of financial institutions.
(8) "Employee" means an individual who has an employment
relationship with a mortgage broker, and the individual is treated as
an employee by the mortgage broker for purposes of compliance with
federal income tax laws.
(9) "Federal banking agencies" means the board of governors of the
federal reserve system, comptroller of the currency, director of the
office of thrift supervision, national credit union administration, and
federal deposit insurance corporation.
(10) "Independent contractor" or "person who independently
contracts" means any person that expressly or impliedly contracts to
perform mortgage brokering services for another and that with respect
to its manner or means of performing the services is not subject to the
other's right of control, and that is not treated as an employee by the
other for purposes of compliance with federal income tax laws.
(11)(a) "Loan originator" means a natural person who for direct or
indirect compensation or gain, or in the expectation of direct or
indirect compensation or gain (i) takes a residential mortgage loan
application for a mortgage broker, or (ii) offers or negotiates terms
of a mortgage loan. "Loan originator" also includes a person who holds
themselves out to the public as able to perform any of these
activities. "Loan originator" does not mean persons performing purely
administrative or clerical tasks for a mortgage broker. For the
purposes of this subsection, "administrative or clerical tasks" means
the receipt, collection, and distribution of information common for the
processing of a loan in the mortgage industry and communication with a
borrower to obtain information necessary for the processing of a loan.
A person who holds himself or herself out to the public as able to
obtain a loan is not performing administrative or clerical tasks.
(b) "Loan originator" also includes a natural person who for direct
or indirect compensation or gain or in the expectation of direct or
indirect compensation or gain performs residential mortgage loan
modification services or holds himself or herself out as being able to
perform residential mortgage loan modification services.
(c) "Loan originator" does not include a person or entity that only
performs real estate brokerage activities and is licensed or registered
in accordance with applicable state law, unless the person or entity is
compensated by a lender, a mortgage broker, or other mortgage loan
originator or by any agent of such a lender, mortgage broker, or other
mortgage loan originator. For purposes of this chapter, the term "real
estate brokerage activity" means any activity that involves offering or
providing real estate brokerage services to the public, including:
(i) Acting as a real estate agent or real estate broker for a
buyer, seller, lessor, or lessee of real property;
(ii) Bringing together parties interested in the sale, purchase,
lease, rental, or exchange of real property;
(iii) Negotiating, on behalf of any party, any portion of a
contract relating to the sale, purchase, lease, rental, or exchange of
real property, other than in connection with providing financing with
respect to such a transaction;
(iv) Engaging in any activity for which a person engaged in the
activity is required to be registered or licensed as a real estate
agent or real estate broker under any applicable law; and
(v) Offering to engage in any activity, or act in any capacity,
described in (((b))) (c)(i) through (iv) of this subsection.
(((c))) (d) "Loan originator" does not include a person or entity
solely involved in extensions of credit relating to timeshare plans, as
that term is defined in section 101(53D) of Title 11, United States
Code.
(e) This subsection does not apply to employees of a housing
counseling agency approved by the United States department of housing
and urban development unless the employees of a housing counseling
agency are required under federal law to be licensed individually as
loan originators.
(12) "Loan processor" means an individual who performs clerical or
support duties as an employee at the direction of and subject to the
supervision and instruction of a person licensed, or exempt from
licensing, under this chapter ((19.146 RCW)).
(13) "Lock-in agreement" means an agreement with a borrower made by
a mortgage broker or loan originator, in which the mortgage broker or
loan originator agrees that, for a period of time, a specific interest
rate or other financing terms will be the rate or terms at which it
will make a loan available to that borrower.
(14) "Mortgage broker" means any person who for compensation or
gain, or in the expectation of compensation or gain (a) assists a
person in obtaining or applying to obtain a residential mortgage loan
or (b) holds himself or herself out as being able to assist a person in
obtaining or applying to obtain a residential mortgage loan.
(15) "Mortgage loan originator" has the same meaning as "loan
originator."
(16) "Nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry" means a
mortgage licensing system developed and maintained by the conference of
state bank supervisors and the American association of residential
mortgage regulators for the licensing and registration of mortgage loan
originators.
(17) "Person" means a natural person, corporation, company, limited
liability corporation, partnership, or association.
(18) "Principal" means any person who controls, directly or
indirectly through one or more intermediaries, or alone or in concert
with others, a ten percent or greater interest in a partnership,
company, association, or corporation, and the owner of a sole
proprietorship.
(19) "Residential mortgage loan" means any loan primarily for
personal, family, or household use secured by a mortgage or deed of
trust on residential real estate upon which is constructed or intended
to be constructed a single family dwelling or multiple family dwelling
of four or less units.
(20) "Residential mortgage loan modification" means a change in one
or more of a residential mortgage loan's terms or conditions. Changes
to a residential mortgage loan's terms or conditions include but are
not limited to forbearances; repayment plans; changes in interest
rates, loan terms, or loan types; capitalizations of arrearages; or
principal reductions.
(21) "Residential mortgage loan modification services" includes
negotiating, attempting to negotiate, arranging, attempting to arrange,
or otherwise offering to perform a residential mortgage loan
modification. "Residential mortgage loan modification services" also
includes the collection of data for submission to any entity performing
mortgage loan modification services.
(22) "S.A.F.E. act" means the secure and fair enforcement for
mortgage licensing act of 2008, or Title V of the housing and economic
recovery act of 2008 ("HERA"), P.L. 110-289, effective July 30, 2008.
(((21))) (23) "Third-party provider" means any person other than a
mortgage broker or lender who provides goods or services to the
mortgage broker in connection with the preparation of the borrower's
loan and includes, but is not limited to, credit reporting agencies,
title companies, appraisers, structural and pest inspectors, or escrow
companies.
(((22))) (24) "Third-party residential mortgage loan modification
services" means residential mortgage loan modification services offered
or performed by any person other than the owner or servicer of the
loan.
(25) "Unique identifier" means a number or other identifier
assigned by protocols established by the nationwide mortgage licensing
system and registry.

Sec. 14 RCW 19.146.210 and 2006 c 19 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director shall issue and deliver a mortgage broker license
to an applicant if, after investigation, the director makes the
following findings:
(a) The applicant has paid the required license fees;
(b) The applicant has complied with RCW 19.146.205;
(c) Neither the applicant, any of its principals, or the designated
broker have had a license issued under this chapter or any similar
state statute suspended or revoked within five years of the filing of
the present application;
(d) Neither the applicant, any of its principals, or the designated
broker have been convicted of a gross misdemeanor involving dishonesty
or financial misconduct or a felony within seven years of the filing of
the present application;
(e) The designated broker((,)): (i) Has at least two years of
experience in the residential mortgage loan industry; and (ii) has
passed a written examination whose content shall be established by rule
of the director;
(f) The applicant, its principals, and the designated broker have
demonstrated financial responsibility, character, and general fitness
such as to command the confidence of the community and to warrant a
belief that the business will be operated honestly, fairly, and
efficiently within the purposes of this chapter; ((and))
(g) Neither the applicant, any of its principals, or the designated
broker have been found to be in violation of this chapter or rules; and
(h) Neither the applicant, any of its principals, nor the
designated broker have provided unlicensed residential mortgage loan
modification services in this state in the five years prior to the
filing of the present application.
(2) If the director does not find the conditions of subsection (1)
of this section have been met, the director shall not issue the
license. The director shall notify the applicant of the denial and
return to the applicant the bond or approved alternative and any
remaining portion of the license fee that exceeds the department's
actual cost to investigate the license.
(3) ((The director shall issue a mortgage broker license under this
chapter to any licensee issued a license under chapter 468, Laws of
1993, that has a valid license and is otherwise in compliance with the
provisions of this chapter.
(4))) A license issued pursuant to this section expires on the date
one year from the date of issuance which, for license renewal purposes,
is also the renewal date. The director shall adopt rules establishing
the process for renewal of licenses.
(((5))) (4) A licensee may surrender a license by delivering to the
director written notice of surrender, but the surrender does not affect
the licensee's civil or criminal liability or any administrative
actions arising from acts or omissions occurring before such surrender.
(((6))) (5) To prevent undue delay in the issuance of a license and
to facilitate the business of a mortgage broker, an interim license
with a fixed date of expiration may be issued when the director
determines that the mortgage broker has substantially fulfilled the
requirements for licensing as defined by rule.

Sec. 15 RCW 19.146.310 and 2009 c 528 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director shall issue and deliver a loan originator license
if, after investigation, the director makes the following findings:
(a) The loan originator applicant has paid the required license
fees;
(b) The loan originator applicant has met the requirements of RCW
19.146.300;
(c) The loan originator applicant has never had a license issued
under this chapter or any similar state statute revoked except that,
for the purposes of this subsection, a subsequent formal vacation of a
revocation is not a revocation;
(d)(i) The loan originator applicant has not been convicted of a
gross misdemeanor involving dishonesty or financial misconduct or has
not been convicted of, or pled guilty or nolo contendere to, a felony
in a domestic, foreign, or military court within seven years of the
filing of the present application; and
(ii) The loan originator applicant has not been convicted of, or
pled guilty or nolo contendere to, a felony in a domestic, foreign, or
military court at any time preceding the date of application if the
felony involved an act of fraud, dishonesty, breach of trust, or money
laundering;
(e) The loan originator applicant has passed a written examination
whose content shall be established by rule of the director;
(f) The loan originator applicant has not been found to be in
violation of this chapter or rules;
(g) The loan originator applicant has demonstrated financial
responsibility, character, and general fitness such as to command the
confidence of the community and to warrant a belief that the business
will be operated honestly and fairly within the purposes of this
chapter. For the purposes of this section, an applicant has not
demonstrated financial responsibility when the applicant shows
disregard in the management of his or her financial condition. A
determination that an individual has shown disregard in the management
of his or her financial condition may include, but is not limited to,
an assessment of: Current outstanding judgments, except judgments
solely as a result of medical expenses; current outstanding tax liens
or other government liens and filings; foreclosures within the last
three years; or a pattern of seriously delinquent accounts within the
past three years; ((and))
(h) The loan originator licensee has completed, during the calendar
year preceding a licensee's annual license renewal date, a minimum of
eight hours of continuing education as established by rule of the
director; and
(i) Neither the applicant, any of its principals, nor the
designated broker have provided unlicensed residential mortgage loan
modification services in this state in the five years prior to the
filing of the present application.
(2) If the director does not find the conditions of subsection (1)
of this section have been met, the director shall not issue the loan
originator license. The director shall notify the loan originator
applicant of the denial and return to the loan originator applicant any
remaining portion of the license fee that exceeds the department's
actual cost to investigate the license.
(3) The director shall issue a new loan originator license under
this chapter to any licensee that has a valid license and is otherwise
in compliance with this chapter.
(4) A loan originator license issued under this section expires on
the date one year from the date of issuance which, for license renewal
purposes, is also the renewal date. The director shall establish rules
regarding the loan originator license renewal process created under
this chapter.
(5) A loan originator licensee may surrender a license by
delivering to the director written notice of surrender, but the
surrender does not affect the loan originator licensee's civil or
criminal liability or any administrative actions arising from acts or
omissions occurring before such surrender.
(6) To prevent undue delay in the issuance of a loan originator
license and to facilitate the business of a loan originator, an interim
loan originator license with a fixed date of expiration may be issued
when the director determines that the loan originator has substantially
fulfilled the requirements for loan originator licensing as defined by
rule.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 (1) In addition to any other requirements
under federal or state law, an advance fee may not be collected for
residential mortgage loan modification services unless a written
disclosure summary of all material terms, in the format adopted by the
department under subsection (2) of this section, has been provided to
the borrower.
(2) The department shall adopt by rule a model written fee
agreement, and any other rules necessary to implement this section.
This may include, but is not limited to, usual and customary fees for
residential mortgage loan modification services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 (1) In addition to complying with all
requirements for loan originators under this chapter, third-party
residential mortgage loan modification services providers must:
(a) Provide a written fee disclosure summary as described in
section 16 of this act before accepting any advance fee;
(b) Not receive an advance fee greater than seven hundred fifty
dollars;
(c) Not charge total fees in excess of usual and customary charges,
or total fees that are not reasonable in light of the service provided;
and
(d) Immediately inform the borrower in writing if the owner of the
loan requires additional information from the borrower, or if it
becomes apparent that a residential mortgage loan modification is not
possible.
(2) As a condition for providing a loan modification or loan
modification services, third-party residential mortgage loan
modification services providers and individuals servicing a residential
mortgage loan must not require or encourage a borrower to:
(a) Sign a waiver of his or her legal defenses, counterclaims, and
other legal rights against the servicer for future acts;
(b) Sign a waiver of his or her right to contest a future
foreclosure;
(c) Waive his or her right to receive notice before the owner or
servicer of the loan initiates foreclosure proceedings;
(d) Agree to pay charges not enumerated in any agreement between
the borrower and the lender, servicer, or owner of the loan; or
(e) Cease communication with the lender, investor, or loan
servicer.
(3) Failure to comply with subsection (1) of this section is a
violation of RCW 19.144.080.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 An individual defined as a mortgage loan
originator may not engage in the business of a mortgage loan originator
without first obtaining and maintaining annually a license under this
chapter. Each licensed mortgage loan originator must register with and
maintain a valid unique identifier issued by the nationwide mortgage
licensing system and registry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 RCW 31.04.2211 (Mortgage loan originator--License required -- Unique identifier required) and 2009 c 528 s 14 are
each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 Sections 9 through 11 of this act are each
added to chapter 31.04 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 Sections 16 through 18 of this act are each
added to chapter 19.146 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---