BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that by preventing
one high school student from dropping out the annual savings is
approximately ten thousand five hundred dollars, including lost state
and local taxes and savings to the temporary assistance to needy
families program, food stamps, housing assistance, the criminal justice
system, and the health care system.
(2) The legislature further finds that school districts need both
accountability and technical assistance to improve high school
graduation rates.
(3) The legislature further finds that many vulnerable students
fail to graduate from high school without adequate dropout prevention,
intervention, and reengagement systems at the school district level.
(4) The legislature further finds that school districts need the
support of families, agencies, and organizations in the local community
to prevent dropouts. In order to significantly improve statewide high
school graduation rates, it is the intent of the legislature to
facilitate the development of a collaborative infrastructure at the
local, regional, and state level between systems that serve vulnerable
youth.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.175
RCW to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout sections 3 through
7 of this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Critical community members" means representatives in the local
community from among the following agencies and organizations:
Student/parent organizations, local government, law enforcement,
juvenile corrections, any tribal organization in the local school
district, the local health district, nonprofit and social service
organizations serving youth, and faith organizations.
(2) "Dropout early warning and intervention data system" means a
student information system that provides the data needed to conduct a
universal screening to identify students at risk of dropping out,
catalog student interventions, and monitor student progress towards
graduation.
(3) "K-12 dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement
system" means a system that provides all of the following functions:
(a) Engaging in school improvement planning specifically focused on
improving high school graduation rates, including goal-setting and
action planning, based on a comprehensive assessment of strengths and
challenges;
(b) Providing prevention activities, including, but not limited to,
emotionally and physically safe school environments, implementation of
a comprehensive guidance and counseling model, core academic
instruction, and career and technical education exploratory and
preparatory programs;
(c) Identifying vulnerable students based on a dropout early
warning and intervention data system;
(d) Timely academic and nonacademic group and individual
interventions for vulnerable students based on a response to
intervention model, including planning and sharing of information at
critical academic transitions;
(e) Providing graduation coaches, mentors, and/or case managers for
vulnerable students identified as needing a more intensive one-on-one
adult relationship;
(f) Establishing and providing staff to coordinate a
school/family/community partnership that assists in building a K-12
dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement system;
(g) Providing retrieval or reentry activities; and
(h) Providing alternative educational programming, including, but
not limited to, credit retrieval and online learning opportunities.
(4) "School/family/community partnership" means a partnership
between a school or schools, families, and the community, that engages
critical community members in a formal, structured partnership with
local school districts in a coordinated effort to provide comprehensive
support services and improve outcomes for vulnerable youth.
(5) "Vulnerable students" means students who are in foster care,
involved in the juvenile justice system, receiving special education
services under chapter 28A.155 RCW, recent immigrants, homeless,
emotionally traumatized, or are facing behavioral health issues, and
students deemed at-risk of school failure as identified by a dropout
early warning data system or other assessment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.175
RCW to read as follows:
The state board of education shall include a student graduation and
completion planning component in the rules on school improvement
planning beginning in the 2011-12 school year. The rule shall include
proposed criteria to determine which school districts need improvement
and assistance regarding high school graduation rates. The state board
of education shall develop the rule in collaboration with the building
bridges work group and present the proposed rule to the quality
education council and the legislature by September 15, 2010. The
student graduation and completion planning component shall include a
requirement that school districts needing improvement and assistance
regarding high school graduation rates must plan and implement a K-12
dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 By September 15, 2010, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, in collaboration with the work
group established in RCW 28A.175.075, shall develop and report
recommendations to the quality education council and the legislature
for expanding the current school improvement planning program to
include state-funded, dropout-focused school improvement technical
assistance that provides a cadre of state-level facilitators to work
with school districts in significant need of improvement related to
high school graduation. The program recommended shall include
technical assistance in planning and implementing a dropout prevention,
intervention, and reengagement system.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.175.075 and 2007 c 408 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
establish a state-level building bridges work group that includes K-12
and state agencies that work with youth who have dropped out or are at
risk of dropping out of school. The following agencies shall appoint
representatives to the work group: The office of the superintendent of
public instruction, the workforce training and education coordinating
board, the department of early learning, the employment security
department, the state board for community and technical colleges, the
department of health, the community mobilization office, and the
following divisions and offices of the department of social and health
services: Children's services, juvenile rehabilitation, behavioral
health and recovery, and the office of juvenile justice. The ((state-level leadership)) work group ((shall)) should also consist of one
representative from each of the following agencies and organizations:
((The workforce training and education coordinating board;)) A
statewide organization representing career and technical education
programs including skill centers; ((relevant divisions of the
department of social and health services;)) the juvenile courts; the
Washington association of prosecuting attorneys; the Washington state
office of public defense; ((the employment security department;))
accredited institutions of higher education; the educational service
districts; the area workforce development councils; parent and educator
associations; ((the department of health;)) local school districts;
agencies or organizations that provide services to special education
students; community organizations serving youth; federally recognized
tribes and urban tribal centers; each of the major political caucuses
of the senate and house of representatives; and the minority
commissions.
(2) To assist and enhance the work of the building bridges programs
established in RCW ((28A.175.055)) 28A.175.025, the state-level work
group shall:
(a) Identify and make recommendations to the legislature for the
reduction of fiscal, legal, and regulatory barriers that prevent
coordination of program resources across agencies at the state and
local level;
(b) Develop and track performance measures and benchmarks for each
partner agency or organization across the state including performance
measures and benchmarks based on student characteristics and outcomes
specified in RCW 28A.175.035(1)(e); and
(c) Identify research-based and emerging best practices regarding
prevention, intervention, and retrieval programs.
(3)(a) The work group shall report to the quality education
council, the legislature and the governor on an annual basis beginning
December 1, 2007, with proposed strategies for building K-12 dropout
prevention, intervention, and reengagement systems in local communities
throughout the state, including, but not limited to, recommendations
for implementing emerging best practices, needed additional resources,
and eliminating barriers.
(b) By September 15, 2010, the work group shall report on:
(i) A recommended state goal and annual state targets for the
percentage of students graduating from high school;
(ii) A recommended state goal and annual state targets for the
percentage of youth who have dropped out of school who should be
reengaged in education and be college and work ready;
(iii) Recommended funding formulas for supporting career guidance
and the planning and implementation of K-12 dropout prevention and
intervention systems in school districts and a plan for phasing the
formulas into the program of basic education, beginning in the 2011-2013 biennium; and
(iv) A plan for phasing in, beginning in the 2011-2013 biennium,
the expansion of the current school improvement planning program to
include state-funded, dropout-focused school improvement technical
assistance for school districts in significant need of improvement
regarding high school graduation rates.
(4) State agencies in the building bridges work group shall work
together on the following activities to support school/family/community
partnerships engaged in building K-12 dropout prevention, intervention,
and reengagement systems:
(a) Providing opportunities for coordination and flexibility of
program eligibility and funding criteria;
(b) Providing joint funding, where feasible;
(c) Developing protocols and templates for model agreements on
sharing records and data;
(d) Providing joint professional development opportunities that
provide knowledge and training on:
(i) Research-based and promising practices;
(ii) The availability of programs and services for vulnerable
youth; and
(iii) Cultural competence.
(5) The building bridges work group shall make recommendations to
the governor and the legislature by December 1, 2010, on a state-level
and regional infrastructure for coordinating services for vulnerable
youth. Recommendations must address the following issues:
(a) Whether and how to engage high-level, cross-agency state
leadership in a formal, consolidated structure designed to develop the
infrastructure for a coordinated, statewide system of comprehensive
support services and improved outcomes for vulnerable youth with links
to any infrastructure developed to support early learning programs;
(b) Whether to adopt an official conceptual approach or framework
for all entities working with vulnerable youth that can support
coordinated planning and evaluation;
(c) The creation of a performance-based management system,
including outcomes, indicators, and performance measures relating to
vulnerable youth and programs serving them, including accountability
for the dropout issue;
(d) The development of regional and/or county-level multipartner
youth consortia with a specific charge to assist school districts and
local communities in building K-12 comprehensive dropout prevention,
intervention, and reengagement systems;
(e) The development of integrated or school-based one-stop shopping
for services that would:
(i) Provide individualized attention to the neediest youth and
prioritized access to services for students identified by a dropout
early warning and intervention data system;
(ii) Establish protocols for coordinating data and services,
including getting data release at time of intake and common assessment
and referral processes; and
(iii) Build a system of single case managers across agencies;
(f) Launching a statewide media campaign on increasing the high
school graduation rate; and
(g) Developing a statewide database of available services for
vulnerable youth.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.290.010 and 2009 c 548 s 114 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The quality education council is created to recommend and
inform the ongoing implementation by the legislature of an evolving
program of basic education and the financing necessary to support such
program. The council shall develop strategic recommendations on the
program of basic education for the common schools. The council shall
take into consideration the capacity report produced under RCW
28A.300.172 and the availability of data and progress of implementing
the data systems required under RCW 28A.655.210. Any recommendations
for modifications to the program of basic education shall be based on
evidence that the programs effectively support student learning. The
council shall update the statewide strategic recommendations every four
years. The recommendations of the council are intended to:
(a) Inform future educational policy and funding decisions of the
legislature and governor;
(b) Identify measurable goals and priorities for the educational
system in Washington state for a ten-year time period, including the
goals of basic education and ongoing strategies for coordinating
statewide efforts to eliminate the achievement gap and reduce student
dropout rates; and
(c) Enable the state of Washington to continue to implement an
evolving program of basic education.
(2) The council may request updates and progress reports from the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, the state board of
education, the professional educator standards board, and the
department of early learning on the work of the agencies as well as
educational working groups established by the legislature.
(3) The chair of the council shall be selected from the
councilmembers. The council shall be composed of the following
members:
(a) Four members of the house of representatives, with two members
representing each of the major caucuses and appointed by the speaker of
the house of representatives;
(b) Four members of the senate, with two members representing each
of the major caucuses and appointed by the president of the senate; and
(c) One representative each from the office of the governor, office
of the superintendent of public instruction, state board of education,
professional educator standards board, and department of early
learning.
(4) In the 2009 fiscal year, the council shall meet as often as
necessary as determined by the chair. In subsequent years, the council
shall meet no more than four times a year.
(5)(a) The council shall submit an initial report to the governor
and the legislature by January 1, 2010, detailing its recommendations,
including recommendations for resolving issues or decisions requiring
legislative action during the 2010 legislative session, and
recommendations for any funding necessary to continue development and
implementation of chapter 548, Laws of 2009.
(b) The initial report shall, at a minimum, include:
(i) Consideration of how to establish a statewide beginning teacher
mentoring and support system;
(ii) Recommendations for a program of early learning for at-risk
children;
(iii) A recommended schedule for the concurrent phase-in of the
changes to the instructional program of basic education and the
implementation of the funding formulas and allocations to support the
new instructional program of basic education as established under
chapter 548, Laws of 2009. The phase-in schedule shall have full
implementation completed by September 1, 2018; and
(iv) A recommended schedule for phased-in implementation of the new
distribution formula for allocating state funds to school districts for
the transportation of students to and from school, with phase-in
beginning no later than September 1, 2013.
(c) By January 1, 2011, the council shall make a recommendation to
the legislature on:
(i) The establishment of statewide graduation and reengagement
goals;
(ii) Establishing funding formulas to support career guidance and
the planning and implementation of school district dropout prevention,
intervention, and reengagement systems, including a recommended phase-in schedule; and
(iii) Providing an expansion of the current school improvement
planning program to include state-funded, dropout-focused school
improvement technical assistance for school districts in significant
need of improvement regarding high school graduation rates.
(6) The council shall be staffed by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction and the office of financial
management. Additional staff support shall be provided by the state
entities with representatives on the committee. Senate committee
services and the house of representatives office of program research
may provide additional staff support.
(7) Legislative members of the council shall serve without
additional compensation but may be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 44.04.120 while attending sessions of the council
or on official business authorized by the council. Nonlegislative
members of the council may be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.655.210 and 2009 c 548 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is the legislature's intent to establish a comprehensive K-12 education data improvement system for financial, student, and
educator data. The objective of the system is to monitor student
progress, have information on the quality of the educator workforce,
monitor and analyze the costs of programs, provide for financial
integrity and accountability, and have the capability to link across
these various data components by student, by class, by teacher, by
school, by district, and statewide. Education data systems must be
flexible and able to adapt to evolving needs for information, but there
must be an objective and orderly data governance process for
determining when changes are needed and how to implement them. It is
the further intent of the legislature to provide independent review and
evaluation of a comprehensive K-12 education data improvement system by
assigning the review and monitoring responsibilities to the education
data center and the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee.
(2) It is the intent that the data system specifically service
reporting requirements for teachers, parents, superintendents, school
boards, the legislature, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, and the public.
(3) It is the legislature's intent that the K-12 education data
improvement system used by school districts and the state include but
not be limited to the following information and functionality:
(a) Comprehensive educator information, including grade level and
courses taught, building or location, program, job assignment, years of
experience, the institution of higher education from which the educator
obtained his or her degree, compensation, class size, mobility of class
population, socioeconomic data of class, number of languages and which
languages are spoken by students, general resources available for
curriculum and other classroom needs, and number and type of
instructional support staff in the building;
(b) The capacity to link educator assignment information with
educator certification information such as certification number, type
of certification, route to certification, certification program, and
certification assessment or evaluation scores;
(c) Common coding of secondary courses and major areas of study at
the elementary level or standard coding of course content;
(d) Robust student information, including but not limited to
student characteristics, course and program enrollment, performance on
statewide and district summative and formative assessments to the
extent district assessments are used, and performance on college
readiness tests;
(e) A subset of student information elements to ((serve as))
support a dropout early warning and intervention data system. The
information elements must provide local school districts with the data
needed to conduct a universal screening to identify students at risk of
dropping out, catalog student interventions, and monitor student
progress towards graduation;
(f) The capacity to link educator information with student
information;
(g) A common, standardized structure for reporting the costs of
programs at the school and district level with a focus on the cost of
services delivered to students;
(h) Separate accounting of state, federal, and local revenues and
costs;
(i) Information linking state funding formulas to school district
budgeting and accounting, including procedures:
(i) To support the accuracy and auditing of financial data; and
(ii) Using the prototypical school model for school district
financial accounting reporting;
(j) The capacity to link program cost information with student
performance information to gauge the cost-effectiveness of programs;
(k) Information that is centrally accessible and updated regularly;
and
(l) An anonymous, nonidentifiable replicated copy of data that is
updated at least quarterly, and made available to the public by the
state.
(4) It is the legislature's goal that all school districts have the
capability to collect state-identified common data and export it in a
standard format to support a statewide K-12 education data improvement
system under this section.
(5) It is the legislature's intent that the K-12 education data
improvement system be developed to provide the capability to make
reports as required under RCW 28A.300.507 available.
(6) It is the legislature's intent that school districts collect
and report new data elements to satisfy the requirements of RCW
43.41.400, this section, and RCW 28A.300.507, only to the extent funds
are available for this purpose.

--- END ---