BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.56.230 and 2009 c 510 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following personal information is exempt from public inspection
and copying under this chapter:
(1) Personal information in any files maintained for students in
public schools, patients or clients of public institutions or public
health agencies, or welfare recipients;
(2) Personal information in files maintained for employees,
appointees, or elected officials of any public agency to the extent
that disclosure would violate their right to privacy;
(3) Information required of any taxpayer in connection with the
assessment or collection of any tax if the disclosure of the
information to other persons would (a) be prohibited to such persons by
RCW 84.08.210, 82.32.330, 84.40.020, or 84.40.340 or (b) violate the
taxpayer's right to privacy or result in unfair competitive
disadvantage to the taxpayer;
(4) Credit card numbers, debit card numbers, electronic check
numbers, card expiration dates, or bank or other financial account
numbers, except when disclosure is expressly required by or governed by
other law;
(5) Personal and financial information related to a small loan or
any system of authorizing a small loan in RCW 31.45.093; ((and))
(6) Documents and related materials and scanned images of documents
and related materials used to prove identity, age, residential address,
social security number, or other personal information required to apply
for a driver's license or identicard; and
(7) Personal information that could be used to identify a person
filing a complaint with an agency if the complainant requests the
agency to keep his or her identity confidential.

--- END ---