BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 52.04.061 and 2009 c 115 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A city or town lying adjacent to a fire protection district may
be annexed to such district if at the time of the initiation of
annexation the population of the city or town is 100,000 or less. The
legislative authority of the city or town may initiate annexation by
the adoption of an ordinance stating an intent to join the fire
protection district specifying the conditions under RCW 52.04.081(3) of
the annexation and finding that the public interest will be served
thereby. If the board of fire commissioners of the fire protection
district shall concur in the annexation and the specified conditions,
notification thereof shall be transmitted to the legislative authority
or authorities of the counties in which the city or town and the
district are situated.
(2) When a city or town is located in two counties, and at least
eighty percent of the population resides in one county, all of that
portion of the city lying in that county and encompassing eighty
percent of the population may be annexed to a fire protection district
if at the time of the initiation of annexation the proposed area lies
adjacent to a fire protection district, and the population of the
proposed area is greater than five thousand but less than ten thousand.
The legislative authority of the city or town may initiate annexation
by the adoption of an ordinance stating an intent to join the fire
protection district and finding that the public interest will be served
thereby. If the board of fire commissioners of the fire protection
district shall concur in the annexation, notification thereof must be
transmitted to the legislative authority or authorities of the counties
in which the city or town and the district are situated.

Sec. 2 RCW 52.04.081 and 2009 c 115 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The annual tax levies authorized by chapter 52.16 RCW shall be
imposed throughout the fire protection district, including any city,
partial city as set forth in RCW 52.04.061(2), or town annexed thereto,
except as provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(2) Any city, partial city as set forth in RCW 52.04.061(2), or
town annexed to a fire protection district is entitled to levy up to
three dollars and sixty cents per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation less any regular levy made by the fire protection district or
by a library district under RCW 27.12.390 in the incorporated area:
PROVIDED, That the limitations upon regular property taxes imposed by
chapter 84.55 RCW apply.
(3) If a city, partial city as set forth in RCW 52.04.061(2), or
town annexing into a fire protection district has then outstanding
voter-approved indebtedness incurred for fire protection related
capital improvements, the annual tax levies authorized by RCW 52.16.080
with respect to indebtedness incurred by the fire protection district
prior to the effective date of the annexation may continue to be levied
and collected, in whole or in part, solely within the boundaries of the
fire protection district as they existed on the last date preceding the
annexation for establishment of taxing district boundaries under RCW
84.09.030 and within the areas outside of the city that are later
annexed to the fire protection district. The commissioners of the fire
protection district shall make the determination prior to transmitting
the issue of annexation to the legislative authority or authorities of
counties in which the city, partial city, or town and the district are
situated pursuant to RCW 52.04.061(1). The determination by the
commission is binding upon the district until the outstanding
indebtedness is fully redeemed or defeased.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---