BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that a government that
protects the rights of people to share their true beliefs will better
represent the people it governs. The legislature further finds that
disclosure of signature petitions may chill the desire of citizens to
sign a petition and participate in the political process. The
legislature recognizes that signing a petition does not mean that a
person is in favor of or against a proposition being brought forward;
rather, it means that a person signing the petition believes the voters
in the state should have a right to decide the issue by a vote of the
people. The legislature finds it is more important to err through
protection and have more proposals sent to the people.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
Signature petitions for referenda and initiatives are exempt from
public inspection and copying.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.72.230 and 2003 c 111 s 1823 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon the filing of an initiative or referendum petition, the
secretary of state shall proceed to verify and canvass the names of the
legal voters on the petition. The verification and canvass of
signatures on the petition may be observed by persons representing the
advocates and opponents of the proposed measure so long as they make no
record of the names, addresses, or other information on the petitions
or related records during the verification process except upon the
order of the superior court of Thurston county. The secretary of state
may limit the number of observers to not less than two on each side, if
in his or her opinion, a greater number would cause undue delay or
disruption of the verification process. Any such limitation shall
apply equally to both sides. The secretary of state may use any
statistical sampling techniques for this verification and canvass which
have been adopted by rule as provided by chapter 34.05 RCW. No
petition will be rejected on the basis of any statistical method
employed, and no petition will be accepted on the basis of any
statistical method employed if such method indicates that the petition
contains fewer than the requisite number of signatures of legal voters.
If the secretary of state finds the same name signed to more than one
petition, he or she shall reject all but the first such valid
signature. For an initiative to the legislature, the secretary of
state shall transmit a certified copy of the proposed measure to the
legislature at the opening of its session and, as soon as the
signatures on the petition have been verified and canvassed, the
secretary of state shall send to the legislature a certificate of the
facts relating to the filing, verification, and canvass of the
petition.
Signature petitions are exempt from public inspection and copying
in accordance with section 2 of this act.

--- END ---