BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17.020 and 2008 c 6 s 201 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Actual malice" means to act with knowledge of falsity or with
reckless disregard as to truth or falsity.
(2) "Agency" includes all state agencies and all local agencies.
"State agency" includes every state office, department, division,
bureau, board, commission, or other state agency. "Local agency"
includes every county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or special purpose district, or any office,
department, division, bureau, board, commission, or agency thereof, or
other local public agency.
(3) "Authorized committee" means the political committee authorized
by a candidate, or by the public official against whom recall charges
have been filed, to accept contributions or make expenditures on behalf
of the candidate or public official.
(4) "Ballot proposition" means any "measure" as defined by RCW
29A.04.091, or any initiative, recall, or referendum proposition
proposed to be submitted to the voters of the state or any municipal
corporation, political subdivision, or other voting constituency from
and after the time when the proposition has been initially filed with
the appropriate election officer of that constituency prior to its
circulation for signatures.
(5) "Benefit" means a commercial, proprietary, financial, economic,
or monetary advantage, or the avoidance of a commercial, proprietary,
financial, economic, or monetary disadvantage.
(6) "Bona fide political party" means:
(a) An organization that has filed a valid certificate of
nomination with the secretary of state under chapter 29A.20 RCW;
(b) The governing body of the state organization of a major
political party, as defined in RCW 29A.04.086, that is the body
authorized by the charter or bylaws of the party to exercise authority
on behalf of the state party; or
(c) The county central committee or legislative district committee
of a major political party. There may be only one legislative district
committee for each party in each legislative district.
(7) "Depository" means a bank designated by a candidate or
political committee pursuant to RCW 42.17.050.
(8) "Treasurer" and "deputy treasurer" mean the individuals
appointed by a candidate or political committee, pursuant to RCW
42.17.050, to perform the duties specified in that section.
(9) "Candidate" means any individual who seeks nomination for
election or election to public office. An individual seeks nomination
or election when he or she first:
(a) Receives contributions or makes expenditures or reserves space
or facilities with intent to promote his or her candidacy for office;
(b) Announces publicly or files for office;
(c) Purchases commercial advertising space or broadcast time to
promote his or her candidacy; or
(d) Gives his or her consent to another person to take on behalf of
the individual any of the actions in (a) or (c) of this subsection.
(10) "Caucus political committee" means a political committee
organized and maintained by the members of a major political party in
the state senate or state house of representatives.
(11) "Commercial advertiser" means any person who sells the service
of communicating messages or producing printed material for broadcast
or distribution to the general public or segments of the general public
whether through the use of newspapers, magazines, television and radio
stations, billboard companies, direct mail advertising companies,
printing companies, or otherwise.
(12) "Commission" means the agency established under RCW 42.17.350.
(13) "Compensation" unless the context requires a narrower meaning,
includes payment in any form for real or personal property or services
of any kind: PROVIDED, That for the purpose of compliance with RCW
42.17.241, the term "compensation" shall not include per diem
allowances or other payments made by a governmental entity to reimburse
a public official for expenses incurred while the official is engaged
in the official business of the governmental entity.
(14) "Continuing political committee" means a political committee
that is an organization of continuing existence not established in
anticipation of any particular election campaign.
(15)(a) "Contribution" includes:
(i) A loan, gift, deposit, subscription, forgiveness of
indebtedness, donation, advance, pledge, payment, transfer of funds
between political committees, or anything of value, including personal
and professional services for less than full consideration;
(ii) An expenditure made by a person in cooperation, consultation,
or concert with, or at the request or suggestion of, a candidate, a
political committee, the person or persons named on the candidate's or
committee's registration form who direct expenditures on behalf of the
candidate or committee, or their agents;
(iii) The financing by a person of the dissemination, distribution,
or republication, in whole or in part, of broadcast, written, graphic,
or other form of political advertising or electioneering communication
prepared by a candidate, a political committee, or its authorized
agent;
(iv) Sums paid for tickets to fund-raising events such as dinners
and parties, except for the actual cost of the consumables furnished at
the event.
(b) "Contribution" does not include:
(i) Standard interest on money deposited in a political committee's
account;
(ii) Ordinary home hospitality;
(iii) A contribution received by a candidate or political committee
that is returned to the contributor within five business days of the
date on which it is received by the candidate or political committee;
(iv) A news item, feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly
scheduled news medium that is of primary interest to the general
public, that is in a news medium controlled by a person whose business
is that news medium, and that is not controlled by a candidate or a
political committee;
(v) An internal political communication primarily limited to the
members of or contributors to a political party organization or
political committee, or to the officers, management staff, or
stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or to the members
of a labor organization or other membership organization;
(vi) The rendering of personal services of the sort commonly
performed by volunteer campaign workers, or incidental expenses
personally incurred by volunteer campaign workers not in excess of
fifty dollars personally paid for by the worker. "Volunteer services,"
for the purposes of this section, means services or labor for which the
individual is not compensated by any person;
(vii) Messages in the form of reader boards, banners, or yard or
window signs displayed on a person's own property or property occupied
by a person. However, a facility used for such political advertising
for which a rental charge is normally made must be reported as an in-kind contribution and counts towards any applicable contribution limit
of the person providing the facility;
(viii) Legal or accounting services rendered to or on behalf of:
(A) A political party or caucus political committee if the person
paying for the services is the regular employer of the person rendering
such services; or
(B) A candidate or an authorized committee if the person paying for
the services is the regular employer of the individual rendering the
services and if the services are solely for the purpose of ensuring
compliance with state election or public disclosure laws; or
(ix) The performance of ministerial functions by a person on behalf
of two or more candidates or political committees either as volunteer
services defined in (b)(vi) of this subsection or for payment by the
candidate or political committee for whom the services are performed as
long as:
(A) The person performs solely ministerial functions;
(B) A person who is paid by two or more candidates or political
committees is identified by the candidates and political committees on
whose behalf services are performed as part of their respective
statements of organization under RCW 42.17.040; and
(C) The person does not disclose, except as required by law, any
information regarding a candidate's or committee's plans, projects,
activities, or needs, or regarding a candidate's or committee's
contributions or expenditures that is not already publicly available
from campaign reports filed with the commission, or otherwise engage in
activity that constitutes a contribution under (a)(ii) of this
subsection.
A person who performs ministerial functions under this subsection
(15)(b)(ix) is not considered an agent of the candidate or committee as
long as he or she has no authority to authorize expenditures or make
decisions on behalf of the candidate or committee.
(c) Contributions other than money or its equivalent are deemed to
have a monetary value equivalent to the fair market value of the
contribution. Services or property or rights furnished at less than
their fair market value for the purpose of assisting any candidate or
political committee are deemed a contribution. Such a contribution
must be reported as an in-kind contribution at its fair market value
and counts towards any applicable contribution limit of the provider.
(16) "Elected official" means any person elected at a general or
special election to any public office, and any person appointed to fill
a vacancy in any such office.
(17) "Election" includes any primary, general, or special election
for public office and any election in which a ballot proposition is
submitted to the voters: PROVIDED, That an election in which the
qualifications for voting include other than those requirements set
forth in Article VI, section 1 (Amendment 63) of the Constitution of
the state of Washington shall not be considered an election for
purposes of this chapter.
(18) "Election campaign" means any campaign in support of or in
opposition to a candidate for election to public office and any
campaign in support of, or in opposition to, a ballot proposition.
(19) "Election cycle" means the period beginning on the first day
of January after the date of the last previous general election for the
office that the candidate seeks and ending on December 31st after the
next election for the office. In the case of a special election to
fill a vacancy in an office, "election cycle" means the period
beginning on the day the vacancy occurs and ending on December 31st
after the special election.
(20) "Electioneering communication" means any broadcast, cable, or
satellite television or radio transmission, United States postal
service mailing, billboard, newspaper, or periodical that:
(a) Clearly identifies a candidate for a state, local, or judicial
office either by specifically naming the candidate, or identifying the
candidate without using the candidate's name;
(b) Is broadcast, transmitted, mailed, erected, distributed, or
otherwise published within sixty days before any election for that
office in the jurisdiction in which the candidate is seeking election;
and
(c) Either alone, or in combination with one or more communications
identifying the candidate by the same sponsor during the sixty days
before an election, has a fair market value of five thousand dollars or
more.
(21) "Electioneering communication" does not include:
(a) Usual and customary advertising of a business owned by a
candidate, even if the candidate is mentioned in the advertising when
the candidate has been regularly mentioned in that advertising
appearing at least twelve months preceding his or her becoming a
candidate;
(b) Advertising for candidate debates or forums when the
advertising is paid for by or on behalf of the debate or forum sponsor,
so long as two or more candidates for the same position have been
invited to participate in the debate or forum;
(c) A news item, feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly
scheduled news medium that is:
(i) Of primary interest to the general public;
(ii) In a news medium controlled by a person whose business is that
news medium; and
(iii) Not a medium controlled by a candidate or a political
committee;
(d) Slate cards and sample ballots;
(e) Advertising for books, films, dissertations, or similar works
(i) written by a candidate when the candidate entered into a contract
for such publications or media at least twelve months before becoming
a candidate, or (ii) written about a candidate;
(f) Public service announcements;
(g) A mailed internal political communication primarily limited to
the members of or contributors to a political party organization or
political committee, or to the officers, management staff, or
stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or to the members
of a labor organization or other membership organization;
(h) An expenditure by or contribution to the authorized committee
of a candidate for state, local, or judicial office; or
(i) Any other communication exempted by the commission through rule
consistent with the intent of this chapter.
(22) "Expenditure" includes a payment, contribution, subscription,
distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of money or anything of
value, and includes a contract, promise, or agreement, whether or not
legally enforceable, to make an expenditure. The term "expenditure"
also includes a promise to pay, a payment, or a transfer of anything of
value in exchange for goods, services, property, facilities, or
anything of value for the purpose of assisting, benefiting, or honoring
any public official or candidate, or assisting in furthering or
opposing any election campaign. For the purposes of this chapter,
agreements to make expenditures, contracts, and promises to pay may be
reported as estimated obligations until actual payment is made. The
term "expenditure" shall not include the partial or complete repayment
by a candidate or political committee of the principal of a loan, the
receipt of which loan has been properly reported.
(23) "Final report" means the report described as a final report in
RCW 42.17.080(2).
(24) "General election" for the purposes of RCW 42.17.640 means the
election that results in the election of a person to a state office.
It does not include a primary.
(25) "Gift," is as defined in RCW 42.52.010.
(26) "Immediate family" includes the spouse or domestic partner,
dependent children, and other dependent relatives, if living in the
household. For the purposes of RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790,
"immediate family" means an individual's spouse or domestic partner,
and child, stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent,
brother, half brother, sister, or half sister of the individual and the
spouse or the domestic partner of any such person and a child,
stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, brother, half
brother, sister, or half sister of the individual's spouse or domestic
partner and the spouse or the domestic partner of any such person.
(27) "Incumbent" means a person who is in present possession of an
elected office.
(28) "Independent expenditure" means an expenditure that has each
of the following elements:
(a) It is made in support of or in opposition to a candidate for
office by a person who is not (i) a candidate for that office, (ii) an
authorized committee of that candidate for that office, (iii) a person
who has received the candidate's encouragement or approval to make the
expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any
other candidate or candidates for that office, or (iv) a person with
whom the candidate has collaborated for the purpose of making the
expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any
other candidate or candidates for that office;
(b) The expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising that either specifically names the candidate supported or
opposed, or clearly and beyond any doubt identifies the candidate
without using the candidate's name; and
(c) The expenditure, alone or in conjunction with another
expenditure or other expenditures of the same person in support of or
opposition to that candidate, has a value of five hundred dollars or
more. A series of expenditures, each of which is under five hundred
dollars, constitutes one independent expenditure if their cumulative
value is five hundred dollars or more.
(29)(a) "Intermediary" means an individual who transmits a
contribution to a candidate or committee from another person unless the
contribution is from the individual's employer, immediate family as
defined for purposes of RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790, or an
association to which the individual belongs.
(b) A treasurer or a candidate is not an intermediary for purposes
of the committee that the treasurer or candidate serves.
(c) A professional fund-raiser is not an intermediary if the fund-raiser is compensated for fund-raising services at the usual and
customary rate.
(d) A volunteer hosting a fund-raising event at the individual's
home is not an intermediary for purposes of that event.
(30) "Legislation" means bills, resolutions, motions, amendments,
nominations, and other matters pending or proposed in either house of
the state legislature, and includes any other matter that may be the
subject of action by either house or any committee of the legislature
and all bills and resolutions that, having passed both houses, are
pending approval by the governor.
(31) "Lobby" and "lobbying" each mean attempting to influence the
passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature of the state of
Washington, or the adoption or rejection of any rule, standard, rate,
or other legislative enactment of any state agency under the state
Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW. Neither "lobby" nor
"lobbying" includes an association's or other organization's act of
communicating with the members of that association or organization.
(32) "Lobbyist" includes any person who lobbies either in his or
her own or another's behalf.
(33) "Lobbyist's employer" means the person or persons by whom a
lobbyist is employed and all persons by whom he or she is compensated
for acting as a lobbyist.
(34) "Ministerial functions" means an act or duty carried out as
part of the duties of an administrative office without exercise of
personal judgment or discretion.
(35) "Paid signature gatherer" means an individual who is
compensated through payments of money or other valuable consideration,
as an independent contractor, to obtain signatures on a state or local
initiative, referendum, or recall petition.
(36) "Participate" means that, with respect to a particular
election, an entity:
(a) Makes either a monetary or in-kind contribution to a candidate;
(b) Makes an independent expenditure or electioneering
communication in support of or opposition to a candidate;
(c) Endorses a candidate prior to contributions being made by a
subsidiary corporation or local unit with respect to that candidate or
that candidate's opponent;
(d) Makes a recommendation regarding whether a candidate should be
supported or opposed prior to a contribution being made by a subsidiary
corporation or local unit with respect to that candidate or that
candidate's opponent; or
(e) Directly or indirectly collaborates or consults with a
subsidiary corporation or local unit on matters relating to the support
of or opposition to a candidate, including, but not limited to, the
amount of a contribution, when a contribution should be given, and what
assistance, services or independent expenditures, or electioneering
communications, if any, will be made or should be made in support of or
opposition to a candidate.
(((36))) (37) "Person" includes an individual, partnership, joint
venture, public or private corporation, association, federal, state, or
local governmental entity or agency however constituted, candidate,
committee, political committee, political party, executive committee
thereof, or any other organization or group of persons, however
organized.
(((37))) (38) "Person in interest" means the person who is the
subject of a record or any representative designated by that person,
except that if that person is under a legal disability, the term
"person in interest" means and includes the parent or duly appointed
legal representative.
(((38))) (39) "Political advertising" includes any advertising
displays, newspaper ads, billboards, signs, brochures, articles,
tabloids, flyers, letters, radio or television presentations, or other
means of mass communication, used for the purpose of appealing,
directly or indirectly, for votes or for financial or other support or
opposition in any election campaign.
(((39))) (40) "Political committee" means any person (except a
candidate or an individual dealing with his or her own funds or
property) having the expectation of receiving contributions or making
expenditures in support of, or opposition to, any candidate or any
ballot proposition.
(((40))) (41) "Primary" for the purposes of RCW 42.17.640 means the
procedure for nominating a candidate to state office under chapter
29A.52 RCW or any other primary for an election that uses, in large
measure, the procedures established in chapter 29A.52 RCW.
(((41))) (42) "Prime sponsor or sponsors" means the registered
voter or voters who complete the affidavit for proposed initiative or
referendum or files a recall petition under chapter 29A.56 RCW as well
as any persons who hold themselves out publicly as the sponsor of an
initiative, referendum, or recall petition.
(43) "Public office" means any federal, state, judicial, county,
city, town, school district, port district, special district, or other
state political subdivision elective office.
(((42))) (44) "Public record" includes any writing containing
information relating to the conduct of government or the performance of
any governmental or proprietary function prepared, owned, used, or
retained by any state or local agency regardless of physical form or
characteristics. For the office of the secretary of the senate and the
office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives, public
records means legislative records as defined in RCW 40.14.100 and also
means the following: All budget and financial records; personnel
leave, travel, and payroll records; records of legislative sessions;
reports submitted to the legislature; and any other record designated
a public record by any official action of the senate or the house of
representatives.
(((43))) (45) "Recall campaign" means the period of time beginning
on the date of the filing of recall charges under RCW 29A.56.120 and
ending thirty days after the recall election.
(((44))) (46) "Sponsor of an electioneering communications,
independent expenditures, or political advertising" means the person
paying for the electioneering communication, independent expenditure,
or political advertising. If a person acts as an agent for another or
is reimbursed by another for the payment, the original source of the
payment is the sponsor.
(((45))) (47) "State legislative office" means the office of a
member of the state house of representatives or the office of a member
of the state senate.
(((46))) (48) "State office" means state legislative office or the
office of governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, attorney
general, commissioner of public lands, insurance commissioner,
superintendent of public instruction, state auditor, or state
treasurer.
(((47))) (49) "State official" means a person who holds a state
office.
(((48))) (50) "Surplus funds" mean, in the case of a political
committee or candidate, the balance of contributions that remain in the
possession or control of that committee or candidate subsequent to the
election for which the contributions were received, and that are in
excess of the amount necessary to pay remaining debts incurred by the
committee or candidate prior to that election. In the case of a
continuing political committee, "surplus funds" mean those
contributions remaining in the possession or control of the committee
that are in excess of the amount necessary to pay all remaining debts
when it makes its final report under RCW 42.17.065.
(((49))) (51) "Writing" means handwriting, typewriting, printing,
photostating, photographing, and every other means of recording any
form of communication or representation, including, but not limited to,
letters, words, pictures, sounds, or symbols, or combination thereof,
and all papers, maps, magnetic or paper tapes, photographic films and
prints, motion picture, film and video recordings, magnetic or punched
cards, discs, drums, diskettes, sound recordings, and other documents
including existing data compilations from which information may be
obtained or translated.
As used in this chapter, the singular shall take the plural and any
gender, the other, as the context requires.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.72.010 and 2003 c 111 s 1802 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If any legal voter of the state, either individually or on
behalf of an organization, desires to petition the legislature to enact
a proposed measure, or submit a proposed initiative measure to the
people, or order that a referendum of all or part of any act, bill, or
law, passed by the legislature be submitted to the people, he or she
shall file with the secretary of state a legible copy of the measure
proposed, or the act or part of such act on which a referendum is
desired, accompanied by an affidavit that the sponsor is a legal voter
and a filing fee prescribed under RCW 43.07.120.
(2) Before obtaining signatures on a proposed initiative or
referendum, the prime sponsor shall file with the secretary of state a
statement declaring whether one or more persons will be paid money or
other valuable consideration for obtaining signatures of electors on
the proposed initiative or referendum. After a statement has been
filed under this subsection, the prime sponsor shall notify the
secretary of state no later than the tenth day after any of the prime
sponsors first has knowledge or should have had knowledge that:
(a) A person is being paid for obtaining signatures, when the
statement filed under this subsection declared that no such person
would be paid; or
(b) No person is being paid for obtaining signatures, when the
statement under this subsection declared that one or more persons would
be paid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Registration with the public disclosure
commission is required for:
(a) All businesses operating in this state engaged in the activity
of collecting signatures for state or local initiatives, referenda, or
recall petitions and that are using paid signature gatherers; and
(b) All paid signature gatherers.
(2) Registration is valid for:
(a) Only one state or local initiative, referendum, or recall
petition in the case of a paid signature gatherer. In the event a paid
signature gatherer is gathering signatures for more than one state or
local initiative, referendum, or recall petition, registration and a
separate registration number is required for each petition. The public
disclosure commission shall provide each registered signature gatherer
with an individual registration number for each state or local
initiative, referendum, or recall petition on which signatures will be
gathered; and
(b) One calendar year in the case of a business operating in this
state engaged in the activity of collecting signatures for state or
local initiatives, referenda, or recall petitions and that are using
paid signature gatherers. In the event that a business becomes
involved with the collection of signatures for any state or local
initiatives, referenda, or recall petitions that are using paid
signature gatherers that were not listed on their original registration
for that calendar year, the business must notify the public disclosure
commission within five working days of becoming involved in the new
petition.
(3) To register with the public disclosure commission, a paid
signature gatherer must provide:
(a) His or her full name and assumed name, if any;
(b) The street address of his or her permanent residence;
(c) His or her signature;
(d) A list of the state or local initiatives, referenda, or recall
petitions on which the paid signature gatherer will gather signatures;
(e) A signed statement attesting that the paid signature gatherer:
(i) Has not been convicted of a criminal offense involving fraud,
forgery, or identification theft within the past five years; (ii) has
not been convicted of a crime under chapter 29A.84 RCW, or its
equivalent in another jurisdiction, in the past five years; (iii) has
not been found in violation of election laws under chapter 29A.84 RCW,
or its equivalent in another jurisdiction, in the past five years; and
(iv) is not a convicted sex offender;
(f) A criminal history check performed by a fingerprint-based check
of the Washington state patrol, the federal bureau of investigation, or
any governmental agency or entity authorized to receive this
information for a state and national criminal history background check,
upon the consent of the paid signature gatherer and upon the request of
the secretary of state, in order to assist in determining the identity
of a paid signature gatherer or whether a paid signature gatherer has
been convicted of a criminal offense described in (e) of this
subsection;
(g) A signed statement acknowledging that the paid signature
gatherer has read and understands Washington law applicable to the
gathering of signatures on state or local initiatives, referenda, or
recall petitions;
(h) Evidence indicating that the paid signature gatherer has
completed the training required under section 8 of this act;
(i) A conventional photograph showing the paid signature gatherer's
head, neck, and shoulders, and is appropriate for copying and
processing by the public disclosure commission; and
(j) A statement signed by a prime sponsor or sponsors of each state
or local initiative, referendum, or recall petition upon which the paid
signature gatherer will gather signatures acknowledging that the prime
sponsor is liable for violations of law or rule committed by the paid
signature gatherer obtaining signatures as provided in RCW 29A.84.220
and 29A.84.250.
(4) To register with the public disclosure commission, a business
operating in this state engaged in the activity of collecting
signatures for state or local initiatives, referenda, or recall
petitions that is using paid signature gatherers must provide:
(a) The name of the business as registered with the applicable
state agency depending on the business structure, which may include the
department of revenue, the secretary of state, or the department of
licensing, as well as any other names under which the business is doing
business or any trade names;
(b) The street address of the main office in the state, the mailing
address, if different, the office phone number, and the business e-mail
address, if any. If the business is operated out of a residence, the
residence shall be considered the main office for the purposes of this
subsection;
(c) The full name of the business owner or owners and any assumed
names;
(d) A signature of the business owner or owners;
(e) A signed statement attesting that the business owner or owners:
(i) Have not been convicted of a criminal offense involving fraud,
forgery, or identification theft within the past five years; (ii) have
not been convicted of a crime under chapter 29A.84 RCW, or its
equivalent in another jurisdiction, in the past five years; (iii) have
not been found in violation of election laws under chapter 29A.84 RCW,
or its equivalent in another jurisdiction, in the past five years; and
(iv) are not convicted sex offenders;
(f) A list of the state or local initiatives, referenda, or recall
petitions on which the business will be involved with the gathering of
signatures;
(g) A signed statement acknowledging the business owner or owners
have read and understand Washington law applicable to the gathering of
signatures on state or local initiatives, referenda, or recall
petitions;
(h) A statement signed by the prime sponsor or sponsors of each
state or local initiative, referendum, or recall petition for which the
business will be involved with the gathering of signatures that the
prime sponsor will be liable for violations of law or rule committed by
the business owner or owners as provided in RCW 29A.84.220 and
29A.84.250;
(i) Evidence indicating that the business owner or owners completed
the training required under section 8 of this act; and
(j) A conventional photograph showing the paid signature gatherer's
head, neck, and shoulders, and is appropriate for copying and
processing by the public disclosure commission.
(5) A person, including a business owner, is ineligible for
registration under this section if he or she: (a) Has been convicted
of a criminal offense involving fraud, forgery, or identification theft
in any jurisdiction within the past five years; (b) has been convicted
of a crime under chapter 29A.84 RCW, or its equivalent in another
jurisdiction, in the past five years; (c) has been found in violation
of election laws under chapter 29A.84 RCW, or its equivalent in another
jurisdiction, in the past five years; or (d) is a convicted sex
offender.
(6) When gathering signatures, a paid signature gatherer must carry
on his or her person evidence of registration including the paid
signature gatherer's photograph and registration number. If requested,
the paid signature gatherer shall produce the evidence of registration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The secretary of state shall adopt rules
necessary to implement sections 3 and 6 of this act, including rules
establishing procedures for registering persons who may be paid money
or other valuable consideration for obtaining signatures of electors on
state or local initiatives, referenda, or recall petitions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If a person receives money or other valuable
consideration for obtaining signatures of electors on a state or local
initiative, referendum, or recall petition, and the paid signature
gatherer was not registered as required by section 3 of this act at the
time the signatures were obtained, the signatures shall not be counted
for purposes of determining whether the state or local initiative,
referendum, or recall petition contains the required number of
signatures of electors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) A registered paid signature gatherer who
knowingly submits an invalid signature will have his or her
registration number revoked and he or she is prohibited from
registering for five years from the date of the public disclosure
commission's revocation order. This subsection applies when:
(a) The paid signature gatherer provides a petition that contains
an invalid signature as determined by the secretary of state; and
(b) The public disclosure commission determines that the signature
was obtained by that paid signature gatherer and the paid signature
gatherer knew or should have known the signature was invalid. However,
this subsection does not apply when the paid signature gatherer had no
knowledge or reason to know that the signature was invalid including,
but not limited to, the paid signature gatherer did not know and had no
reason to know the signature was a duplicate, that the person's
signature had changed over time and no longer matched the signature on
file with the relevant election official, that the person had moved to
a new residence but failed to update his or her voter registration form
before signing the petition, and the signature did not match a valid
registered voter in Washington.
(2) When the public disclosure commission is informed that a
registered paid signature gatherer has been convicted of any of the
crimes described in (a) through (d) of this subsection, or the public
disclosure commission makes a finding under (e) of this subsection, the
paid signature gatherer will have his or her registration number
revoked and he or she is prohibited from applying for future
registrations for five years from the date of the public disclosure
commission's revocation order. This subsection applies to a paid
signature gatherer who:
(a) Has been convicted of violating RCW 9.44.080 or 9A.46.020;
(b) Has been convicted of violating a provision of chapter 29A.84
RCW or the felonies or misdemeanors referenced therein;
(c) Has been convicted of any other election-related crime in any
state or federal court;
(d) Has been convicted in any state or federal court of a criminal
offense involving fraud, forgery, or identification theft; or
(e) Has been determined by the public disclosure commission to have
submitted false information on his or her registration application.
(3) When the public disclosure commission is informed that a paid
signature gatherer has been convicted of any sex offense, he or she
will have his or her registration number permanently revoked and he or
she is prohibited from applying for or obtaining future registrations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The failure to register under section 3 of
this act by a business operating in this state engaged in the activity
of collecting signatures for state or local initiatives, referenda, or
recall petitions using paid signature gatherers will result in the
invalidation of any signatures gathered by the business and its paid
signature gatherers and will be subject to penalties of up to ten
thousand dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The secretary of state shall provide the
required training for paid signature gatherers and the businesses
operating in this state engaged in the activity of collecting
signatures for state or local initiatives, referenda, or recall
petitions and that are using paid signature gatherers. The training
shall be provided via the internet.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The definitions in this section apply to
sections 5, 7, and 8 of this act:
(1) "Paid signature gatherer" means an individual who is
compensated through payments of money or other valuable consideration,
as an independent contractor, to obtain signatures on a state or local
initiative, referendum, or recall petition.
(2) "Prime sponsor or sponsors" means the registered voter or
voters who complete the affidavit for proposed initiative or referendum
or files a recall petition under chapter 29A.56 RCW as well as any
persons who hold themselves out publicly as the sponsor of an
initiative, referendum, or recall petition.
(3) "Volunteer signature gatherer" means an individual who is not
compensated through payments of money or other valuable consideration
to obtain signatures on a state or local initiative, referendum, or
recall petition and is not required to register under RCW 29A.72.010
and sections 3 through 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 3 through 8 of this act do not
apply to individuals who volunteer to engage in the activity of
collecting signatures for state or local initiatives, referenda, or
recall petitions.

Sec. 11 RCW 29A.72.110 and 2005 c 239 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Petitions for proposing measures for submission to the legislature
at its next regular session must be substantially in the following
form:

The warning prescribed by RCW 29A.72.140; followed by:

INITIATIVE PETITION FOR SUBMISSION TO THE LEGISLATURE

To the Honorable . . . . . ., Secretary of State of the State of
Washington:
We, the undersigned citizens and legal voters of the State of
Washington, respectfully direct that this petition and the proposed
measure known as Initiative Measure No. . . . . and entitled (here set
forth the established ballot title of the measure), a full, true, and
correct copy of which is printed on the reverse side of this petition,
be transmitted to the legislature of the State of Washington at its
next ensuing regular session, and we respectfully petition the
legislature to enact said proposed measure into law; and each of us for
himself or herself says: I have personally signed this petition; I am
a legal voter of the State of Washington in the city (or town) and
county written after my name, my residence address is correctly stated,
and I have knowingly signed this petition only once.
The petition must include a place for each petitioner to sign and
print his or her name, and the address, city, and county at which he or
she is registered to vote.
The following declaration must be printed on the reverse side of
the petition, and must be signed by the signature gatherer who
circulated the petition sheet after the sheet has been signed by
petitioners but before the petition is submitted to the secretary of
state:

I, . . . . . . . . . . . ., swear or affirm under penalty of law
that I circulated this sheet of the foregoing petition, and that, to
the best of my knowledge, every person who signed this sheet of the
foregoing petition knowingly and without any compensation or promise of
compensation willingly signed his or her true name and that the
information provided therewith is true and correct. I further
acknowledge that under chapter 29A.84 RCW, forgery of signatures on
this petition constitutes a class C felony, and that offering any
consideration or gratuity to any person to induce them to sign a
petition is a gross misdemeanor, such violations being punishable by
fine or imprisonment or both.
Signature
Date of Signature
Print Name
Print Street Address
Print City, State, Zip Code
Signing this declaration constitutes an oath subjecting the
signatory to the penalty of the law. The declaration must be
individually signed by the signature gatherer. Stamps or other
signature reproductions may not be used.
RCW 9A.46.020 applies to any conduct constituting harassment
against a petition signature gatherer. This penalty does not preclude
the victim from seeking any other remedy otherwise available under law.

((The petition must include a place for each petitioner to sign and
print his or her name, and the address, city, and county at which he or
she is registered to vote.))

Sec. 12 RCW 29A.72.120 and 2005 c 239 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Petitions for proposing measures for submission to the people for
their approval or rejection at the next ensuing general election must
be substantially in the following form:

The warning prescribed by RCW 29A.72.140; followed by:

INITIATIVE PETITION FOR SUBMISSION TO THE PEOPLE

To the Honorable . . . . . ., Secretary of State of the State of
Washington:
We, the undersigned citizens and legal voters of the State of
Washington, respectfully direct that the proposed measure known as
Initiative Measure No. . . . ., entitled (here insert the established
ballot title of the measure), a full, true and correct copy of which is
printed on the reverse side of this petition, be submitted to the legal
voters of the State of Washington for their approval or rejection at
the general election to be held on the . . . . . day of November,
(year); and each of us for himself or herself says: I have personally
signed this petition; I am a legal voter of the State of Washington, in
the city (or town) and county written after my name, my residence
address is correctly stated, and I have knowingly signed this petition
only once.
The petition must include a place for each petitioner to sign and
print his or her name, and the address, city, and county at which he or
she is registered to vote.
The following declaration must be printed on the reverse side of
the petition, and must be signed by the signature gatherer who
circulated the petition sheet after the sheet has been signed by
petitioners but before the petition is submitted to the secretary of
state:

I, . . . . . . . . . . . ., swear or affirm under penalty of law
that I circulated this sheet of the foregoing petition, and that, to
the best of my knowledge, every person who signed this sheet of the
foregoing petition knowingly and without any compensation or promise of
compensation willingly signed his or her true name and that the
information provided therewith is true and correct. I further
acknowledge that under chapter 29A.84 RCW, forgery of signatures on
this petition constitutes a class C felony, and that offering any
consideration or gratuity to any person to induce them to sign a
petition is a gross misdemeanor, such violations being punishable by
fine or imprisonment or both.
Signature
Date of Signature
Print Name
Print Street Address
Print City, State, Zip Code
Signing this declaration constitutes an oath subjecting the
signatory to the penalty of the law. The declaration must be
individually signed by the signature gatherer. Stamps or other
signature reproductions may not be used.
RCW 9A.46.020 applies to any conduct constituting harassment
against a petition signature gatherer. This penalty does not preclude
the victim from seeking any other remedy otherwise available under law.

((The petition must include a place for each petitioner to sign and
print his or her name, and the address, city, and county at which he or
she is registered to vote.))

Sec. 13 RCW 29A.72.130 and 2005 c 239 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Petitions ordering that acts or parts of acts passed by the
legislature be referred to the people at the next ensuing general
election, or special election ordered by the legislature, must be
substantially in the following form:

The warning prescribed by RCW 29A.72.140; followed by:

PETITION FOR REFERENDUM

To the Honorable . . . . . ., Secretary of State of the State of
Washington:
We, the undersigned citizens and legal voters of the State of
Washington, respectfully order and direct that Referendum Measure No.
. . . . ., filed to revoke a (or part or parts of a) bill that (concise
statement required by RCW 29A.36.071) and that was passed by the
. . . . . . legislature of the State of Washington at the last regular
(special) session of said legislature, shall be referred to the people
of the state for their approval or rejection at the regular (special)
election to be held on the . . . . day of November, (year); and each of
us for himself or herself says: I have personally signed this
petition; I am a legal voter of the State of Washington, in the city
(or town) and county written after my name, my residence address is
correctly stated, and I have knowingly signed this petition only once.
The petition must include a place for each petitioner to sign and
print his or her name, and the address, city, and county at which he or
she is registered to vote.
The following declaration must be printed on the reverse side of
the petition, and must be signed by the signature gatherer who
circulated the petition sheet after the sheet has been signed by
petitioners but before the petition is submitted to the secretary of
state:

I, . . . . . . . . . . . ., swear or affirm under penalty of law
that I circulated this sheet of the foregoing petition, and that, to
the best of my knowledge, every person who signed this sheet of the
foregoing petition knowingly and without any compensation or promise of
compensation willingly signed his or her true name and that the
information provided therewith is true and correct. I further
acknowledge that under chapter 29A.84 RCW, forgery of signatures on
this petition constitutes a class C felony, and that offering any
consideration or gratuity to any person to induce them to sign a
petition is a gross misdemeanor, such violations being punishable by
fine or imprisonment or both.
Signature
Date of Signature
Print Name
Print Street Address
Print City, State, Zip Code
Signing this declaration constitutes an oath subjecting the
signatory to the penalty of the law. The declaration must be
individually signed by the signature gatherer. Stamps or other
signature reproductions may not be used.
RCW 9A.46.020 applies to any conduct constituting harassment
against a petition signature gatherer. This penalty does not preclude
the victim from seeking any other remedy otherwise available under law.

((The petition must include a place for each petitioner to sign and
print his or her name, and the address, city, and county at which he or
she is registered to vote.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A prime sponsor or sponsors of an
initiative or referendum petition must check each petition sheet to
ensure the declaration required in RCW 29A.72.110, 29A.72.120, or
29A.72.130 is signed by the signature gatherer and must sign an
affidavit attesting he or she verified that the declaration on each
petition sheet submitted to the secretary of state has been completed
and signed. The affidavit must accompany the petition at the time of
filing with the secretary of state.

Sec. 15 RCW 29A.72.170 and 2003 c 111 s 1818 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of state ((may)) shall refuse to file any initiative
or referendum petition being submitted upon any of the following
grounds:
(1) That the petition does not contain the information required by
RCW 29A.72.110, 29A.72.120, or 29A.72.130.
(2) That the petition clearly bears insufficient signatures.
(3) That the time within which the petition may be filed has
expired.
(4) That the declaration printed on the reverse side of the
petition sheet has not been properly signed and dated with a printed
name and address of the signature gatherer.
In case of such refusal, the secretary of state shall endorse on
the petition the word "submitted" and the date, and retain the petition
pending appeal.
If none of the grounds for refusal exists, the secretary of state
must accept and file the petition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Sections 3, 5 through 9, and 14 of this act
are each added to chapter 29A.72 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 This act takes effect January 1, 2011.

--- END ---