BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.72.110 and 2005 c 239 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Petitions for proposing measures for submission to the legislature
at its next regular session must be substantially in the following
form:

The warning prescribed by RCW 29A.72.140; followed by:

INITIATIVE PETITION FOR SUBMISSION TO THE LEGISLATURE

To the Honorable . . . . . ., Secretary of State of the State of
Washington:
We, the undersigned citizens and legal voters of the State of
Washington, respectfully direct that this petition and the proposed
measure known as Initiative Measure No. . . . . and entitled (here set
forth the established ballot title of the measure), a full, true, and
correct copy of which is printed on the reverse side of this petition,
be transmitted to the legislature of the State of Washington at its
next ensuing regular session, and we respectfully petition the
legislature to enact said proposed measure into law; and each of us for
himself or herself says: I have personally signed this petition; I am
a legal voter of the State of Washington in the city (or town) and
county written after my name, my residence address is correctly stated,
and I have knowingly signed this petition only once.
The petition must include a place for each petitioner to sign and
print his or her name, and the address, city, and county at which he or
she is registered to vote.
The following declaration must be printed on the reverse side of
the petition, and must be signed by the signature gatherer who
circulated the petition sheet after the sheet has been signed by
petitioners but before the petition is submitted to the secretary of
state:

I, . . . . . . . . . . . ., swear or affirm under penalty of law
that I circulated this sheet of the foregoing petition, and that, to
the best of my knowledge, every person who signed this sheet of the
foregoing petition knowingly and without any compensation or promise of
compensation willingly signed his or her true name and that the
information provided therewith is true and correct. I further
acknowledge that under chapter 29A.84 RCW, forgery of signatures on
this petition constitutes a class C felony, and that offering any
consideration or gratuity to any person to induce them to sign a
petition is a gross misdemeanor, such violations being punishable by
fine or imprisonment or both.
Signature
Date of Signature
Print Name
Print Street Address
Print City, State, Zip Code
Signing this declaration constitutes an oath subjecting the
signatory to the penalty of the law. The declaration must be
individually signed by the signature gatherer. Stamps or other
signature reproductions may not be used.
RCW 9A.46.020 applies to any conduct constituting harassment
against a petition signature gatherer. This penalty does not preclude
the victim from seeking any other remedy otherwise available under law.

((The petition must include a place for each petitioner to sign and
print his or her name, and the address, city, and county at which he or
she is registered to vote.))

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.72.120 and 2005 c 239 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Petitions for proposing measures for submission to the people for
their approval or rejection at the next ensuing general election must
be substantially in the following form:

The warning prescribed by RCW 29A.72.140; followed by:

INITIATIVE PETITION FOR SUBMISSION TO THE PEOPLE

To the Honorable . . . . . ., Secretary of State of the State of
Washington:
We, the undersigned citizens and legal voters of the State of
Washington, respectfully direct that the proposed measure known as
Initiative Measure No. . . . ., entitled (here insert the established
ballot title of the measure), a full, true and correct copy of which is
printed on the reverse side of this petition, be submitted to the legal
voters of the State of Washington for their approval or rejection at
the general election to be held on the . . . . . day of November,
(year); and each of us for himself or herself says: I have personally
signed this petition; I am a legal voter of the State of Washington, in
the city (or town) and county written after my name, my residence
address is correctly stated, and I have knowingly signed this petition
only once.
The petition must include a place for each petitioner to sign and
print his or her name, and the address, city, and county at which he or
she is registered to vote.
The following declaration must be printed on the reverse side of
the petition, and must be signed by the signature gatherer who
circulated the petition sheet after the sheet has been signed by
petitioners but before the petition is submitted to the secretary of
state:

I, . . . . . . . . . . . ., swear or affirm under penalty of law
that I circulated this sheet of the foregoing petition, and that, to
the best of my knowledge, every person who signed this sheet of the
foregoing petition knowingly and without any compensation or promise of
compensation willingly signed his or her true name and that the
information provided therewith is true and correct. I further
acknowledge that under chapter 29A.84 RCW, forgery of signatures on
this petition constitutes a class C felony, and that offering any
consideration or gratuity to any person to induce them to sign a
petition is a gross misdemeanor, such violations being punishable by
fine or imprisonment or both.
Signature
Date of Signature
Print Name
Print Street Address
Print City, State, Zip Code
Signing this declaration constitutes an oath subjecting the
signatory to the penalty of the law. The declaration must be
individually signed by the signature gatherer. Stamps or other
signature reproductions may not be used.
RCW 9A.46.020 applies to any conduct constituting harassment
against a petition signature gatherer. This penalty does not preclude
the victim from seeking any other remedy otherwise available under law.

((The petition must include a place for each petitioner to sign and
print his or her name, and the address, city, and county at which he or
she is registered to vote.))

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.72.130 and 2005 c 239 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Petitions ordering that acts or parts of acts passed by the
legislature be referred to the people at the next ensuing general
election, or special election ordered by the legislature, must be
substantially in the following form:

The warning prescribed by RCW 29A.72.140; followed by:

PETITION FOR REFERENDUM

To the Honorable . . . . . ., Secretary of State of the State of
Washington:
We, the undersigned citizens and legal voters of the State of
Washington, respectfully order and direct that Referendum Measure No.
. . . . ., filed to revoke a (or part or parts of a) bill that (concise
statement required by RCW 29A.36.071) and that was passed by the
. . . . . . legislature of the State of Washington at the last regular
(special) session of said legislature, shall be referred to the people
of the state for their approval or rejection at the regular (special)
election to be held on the . . . . day of November, (year); and each of
us for himself or herself says: I have personally signed this
petition; I am a legal voter of the State of Washington, in the city
(or town) and county written after my name, my residence address is
correctly stated, and I have knowingly signed this petition only once.
The petition must include a place for each petitioner to sign and
print his or her name, and the address, city, and county at which he or
she is registered to vote.
The following declaration must be printed on the reverse side of
the petition, and must be signed by the signature gatherer who
circulated the petition sheet after the sheet has been signed by
petitioners but before the petition is submitted to the secretary of
state:

I, . . . . . . . . . . . ., swear or affirm under penalty of law
that I circulated this sheet of the foregoing petition, and that, to
the best of my knowledge, every person who signed this sheet of the
foregoing petition knowingly and without any compensation or promise of
compensation willingly signed his or her true name and that the
information provided therewith is true and correct. I further
acknowledge that under chapter 29A.84 RCW, forgery of signatures on
this petition constitutes a class C felony, and that offering any
consideration or gratuity to any person to induce them to sign a
petition is a gross misdemeanor, such violations being punishable by
fine or imprisonment or both.
Signature
Date of Signature
Print Name
Print Street Address
Print City, State, Zip Code
Signing this declaration constitutes an oath subjecting the
signatory to the penalty of the law. The declaration must be
individually signed by the signature gatherer. Stamps or other
signature reproductions may not be used.
RCW 9A.46.020 applies to any conduct constituting harassment
against a petition signature gatherer. This penalty does not preclude
the victim from seeking any other remedy otherwise available under law.

((The petition must include a place for each petitioner to sign and
print his or her name, and the address, city, and county at which he or
she is registered to vote.))

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.72.150 and 2003 c 111 s 1816 are each amended to
read as follows:
When the person proposing any initiative measure has obtained
signatures of legal voters equal to or exceeding eight percent of the
votes cast for the office of governor at the last regular gubernatorial
election prior to the submission of the signatures for verification, or
when the person or organization demanding any referendum of an act or
part of an act of the legislature has obtained a number of signatures
of legal voters equal to or exceeding four percent of the votes cast
for the office of governor at the last regular gubernatorial election
prior to the submission of the signatures for verification, the
petition containing the signatures may be submitted to the secretary of
state for filing. The person or organization submitting the petition
to the secretary of state shall not submit any petition sheets that
have an unsigned signature gatherer declaration required pursuant to
RCW 29A.72.110, 29A.72.120, or 29A.72.130.

--- END ---