BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.72.010 and 2003 c 111 s 1802 are each amended to
read as follows:
If any legal voter of the state, either individually or on behalf
of an organization, desires to petition the legislature to enact a
proposed measure, or submit a proposed initiative measure to the
people, or order that a referendum of all or part of any act, bill, or
law, passed by the legislature be submitted to the people, he or she
shall file with the secretary of state a legible copy of the measure
proposed, or the act or part of such act on which a referendum is
desired, accompanied by an affidavit that the sponsor is a legal voter
and a filing fee ((prescribed under RCW 43.07.120)) of two hundred
fifty dollars. If the sponsor submits the required number of
signatures for the measure to appear on the ballot, he or she shall
receive a refund of two hundred dollars.

--- END ---