BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.315
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The commission on statewide school district reorganization is
established to develop and recommend a comprehensive plan for the
reorganization of Washington school districts for adoption by the
legislature as provided in section 2 of this act.
(2) The commission shall be composed of the following members:
(a) A representative of the state board of education selected by
the members of the board;
(b) Two representatives of school administrators selected by the
Washington association of school administrators, with one
representative each from eastern and western Washington;
(c) Two representatives of school board directors selected by the
Washington state school directors' association, with one representative
each from eastern and western Washington;
(d) One representative of certificated instructional school
employees selected by the Washington education association;
(e) An individual with experience as a demographer or as a
participant on the redistricting commission under chapter 44.05 RCW
selected by the governor; and
(f) Four individuals selected jointly by the speaker of the house
of representatives and the president of the senate, with two
individuals each from eastern and western Washington.
(3) Staff support for the commission shall be provided by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction. The superintendent
of public instruction shall convene the initial meeting of the
commission, at which time the members of the commission shall elect a
chair from among the members.
(4) Members of the commission are entitled to receive compensation
under RCW 43.03.240 and reimbursement for travel expenses in accordance
with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(5) Any vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the
selection originally provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.315
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The commission on statewide school district reorganization
established under section 1 of this act shall develop objective
criteria, ranked in priority order, for the reorganization of
Washington school districts. The commission may consider but shall not
be limited to the criteria in RCW 28A.315.015 and 28A.315.205. The
commission shall adopt the criteria as administrative rules under the
provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW. The commission shall hold at least
one public hearing on the proposed criteria in each educational service
district before final adoption. The commission shall cause notice to
be given at least ten days before the scheduled date of the hearing in
one or more newspapers of general circulation within the educational
service district.
(2)(a) Based on the adopted objective criteria, the commission
shall develop a comprehensive plan for the reorganization of Washington
school districts. The plan shall result in no more than one hundred
fifty school districts in the state and their boundaries. The plan
shall also result in a reorganization of the number and boundaries of
educational service districts.
(b) The commission shall hold at least one public hearing in each
educational service district during the development of the proposed
plan. The commission shall cause notice to be given at least ten days
before the scheduled date of the hearing in one or more newspapers of
general circulation within the educational service district.
(c) After considering the information from the public hearings, the
results of the review under section 3 of this act, and any other
information or considerations, the commission shall submit the final
comprehensive school district reorganization plan to the superintendent
of public instruction, the governor, and the legislature by December 1,
2012, as provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) The comprehensive school district reorganization plan shall
consist of two parts, each of which shall be submitted separately in
the form of proposed legislation:
(a) Part A of the plan shall be a list of the recommended school
districts and educational service districts and their respective
boundaries. Except for amendments to correct technical errors or
omissions, the legislation implementing part A of the plan as submitted
by the commission may be amended only if approved by a two-thirds vote
of each house of the legislature; and
(b) Part B of the plan shall be recommended procedures and
timelines for implementation of the reorganization plan, including but
not limited to:
(i) A phased-in implementation schedule;
(ii) Procedures and timelines for determination, adjustment, and
transfer of assets and liabilities among school districts, including
bonded indebtedness;
(iii) Procedures and timelines for determination and election of
school district and educational service district boards of directors,
which shall include a transition period for any consolidated school
districts of up to two years, during which time all previous school
district boards of directors of the consolidated districts shall
continue to have governing responsibilities until a single board is
elected; and
(iv) Amendments to or temporary suspension of the provisions of
this chapter, chapter 28A.310 RCW, and other laws that are necessary to
implement the reorganization plan and also provide an ongoing process
for management of school district organization and boundary issues
after the plan has been implemented.
(4) Nothing in this section requires consolidation or closure of
high schools or other schools. Decisions regarding the disposition of
schools rest with school district boards of directors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.315
RCW to read as follows:
The joint legislative audit and review committee shall conduct an
independent review of the comprehensive plan developed under section 2
of this act to assure that the proposed plan is based on and follows to
the maximum extent possible the objective criteria adopted by the
commission. The committee shall submit a report of its findings, along
with recommendations for any changes to the plan that would improve its
alignment with the criteria, to the commission on statewide school
district reorganization by September 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act expire June
30, 2014.

--- END ---