BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A person who engages in mountain
climbing during the months of November, December, January, February,
and March shall use an electronic signaling device when climbing a
mountain at a point above the timberline.
(2) A person who guides for compensation an organized group that
includes children under eighteen years of age on any mountain above the
timberline shall carry an altimeter, an electronic signaling device, a
contour map of the area, and a compass.
(3) As used in this section, an electronic signaling device
includes emergency locator transmitters (ELTs), emergency position
indicating radio beacons (EPIRBs), and personal locator beacons (PLBs).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act constitutes a new
chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---