BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature has made a commitment to
support multiple strategies to improve teaching and learning of
science, technology, engineering, and mathematics in Washington's
public schools. In recent years, Washington has adopted new
technology, mathematics, and science learning standards; provided
professional development for mathematics and science teachers; created
a scholarship program to encourage students to enter mathematics and
science degree programs; supported career and technical education in
high-demand fields; and authorized alternative ways for teachers to
earn certification in the mathematics and science fields.
(2) At the local level, school districts and their communities are
also finding new ways to improve teaching and learning of science,
technology, engineering, and mathematics. Some districts have combined
several best practices into promising learning models for students.
For example, Aviation high school in the Highline school district
offers a small, highly personalized learning community that is focused
on interdisciplinary immersion in science, technology, engineering, and
mathematics using a hands-on, project-based curriculum. Delta high
school in the Tri-Cities is a collaboration among three school
districts, a skill center, two institutions of higher education, a
community foundation, and local business leaders. The science and math
institute at Point Defiance in Tacoma offers students field-based
applied learning using the natural, historical, and community resources
of a large metropolitan park. These schools draw students from across
regions who are seeking an exciting, rigorous, and nontraditional
learning experience. Other schools and communities across the state
are seeking to replicate these innovative learning models.
(3) The legislature intends to support continued expansion of the
type of innovation and creativity displayed by Aviation, Delta, and the
science and math institute by designating so-called "lighthouse" high
schools to serve as resources and examples of best practices in
science, technology, engineering, and mathematics instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.630
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the
superintendent of public instruction shall designate up to three high
schools to serve as resources and examples of how to combine the
following best practices:
(a) A small, highly personalized learning community;
(b) An interdisciplinary curriculum with a strong focus on science,
technology, engineering, and mathematics delivered through a project-based instructional approach; and
(c) Active partnerships with businesses and the local community to
connect learning beyond the classroom.
(2) The designated high schools shall serve as lighthouse programs
and provide technical assistance and advice to other high schools and
communities in the initial stages of creating an alternative learning
environment focused on science, technology, engineering, and
mathematics. The designated high schools must have proven experience
and be recognized as model programs.
(3) In addition, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall work with the designated high schools to publicize
the models of best practices in science, technology, engineering, and
mathematics instruction used by the designated high schools and shall
encourage other high schools and communities to work with the
designated high schools to replicate similar models.

--- END ---