BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature has determined that it is
necessary to examine patterns related to the exchange of out-of-state
offenders needing supervision. The examination must assess the past
action and behavior of other states that send offenders to the state of
Washington for supervision to assure that the interstate compact for
adult offender supervision operates to protect the safety of the people
and communities of Washington and other individual states.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall identify the states from which it receives
adult offenders who need supervision and examine the feasibility and
cost of establishing memoranda of understanding with the states that
send the highest number of offenders for supervision to Washington
state with the goal of achieving more balanced and equitable
obligations under the interstate compact for adult offender
supervision.
(2) At the next meeting of the interstate compact commission,
Washington's representatives on the commission shall seek a resolution
by the commission regarding any inequitable distribution of costs,
benefits, and obligations affecting Washington under the interstate
compact.
(3) The department shall examine the feasibility and cost of
withdrawal from the interstate compact for adult offender supervision.
(4) The department shall report to the legislature no later than
December 1, 2010, regarding:
(a) The development of memoranda of understanding with states that
send the highest numbers of offenders to Washington state for
supervision;
(b) The outcome of the resolution process with the interstate
commission; and
(c) The feasibility and cost of withdrawal from the interstate
compact for adult offender supervision.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
June 1, 2010.

--- END ---