BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends by this act to
require an individualized determination by a judicial officer of
conditions of release for persons in custody for felony offenses and to
eliminate the practice of allowing release on bail where the bail is
based on a bail schedule and not individually determined by a judicial
officer. This requirement is consistent with constitutional
requirements and court rules regarding the right of a detained person
to a prompt determination of probable cause and judicial review of the
conditions of release and the requirement that judicial determinations
of bail or release be made no later than the preliminary appearance
stage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 10.19 RCW
to read as follows:
Bail for the release of a person arrested and detained for a felony
offense must be determined on an individualized basis by a judicial
officer.

--- END ---