BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.33.040 and 2004 c 64 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Every petition filed in proceedings under this chapter shall
contain a statement alleging whether the child is or may be an Indian
child as defined in 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1903. If the child is an Indian
child as defined under the Indian child welfare act, the provisions of
the act shall apply.
(b) Every order or decree entered in any proceeding under this
chapter shall contain a finding that the Indian child welfare act does
or does not apply. Where there is a finding that the Indian child
welfare act does apply, the decree or order must also contain a finding
that all notice requirements and evidentiary requirements under the
Indian child welfare act have been satisfied.
(c) In proceedings under this chapter, the adoption facilitator
shall file a sworn statement documenting efforts to determine whether
an Indian child as defined under the Indian child welfare act, 25
U.S.C. Sec. 1903, is involved.
(d) Whenever the court or the petitioning party knows or has reason
to know that an Indian child is involved in any termination,
relinquishment, or placement proceeding under this chapter, the
petitioning party shall promptly provide notice to the child's parent
or Indian custodian and to the agent designated by the child's Indian
tribe to receive such notices. Notice shall be by certified mail with
return receipt requested. If the identity or location of the parent or
Indian custodian and the tribe cannot be determined, notice shall be
given to the secretary of the interior in the manner described in 25
C.F.R. 23.11. If the child may be a member of more than one tribe, the
petitioning party shall send notice to all tribes the petitioner has
reason to know may be affiliated with the child.
(e) The notice shall: (i) Contain a statement notifying the parent
or custodian and the tribe of the pending proceeding; and (ii) notify
the tribe of the tribe's right to intervene and/or request that the
case be transferred to tribal court.
(f) No termination, relinquishment, or placement proceeding shall
be held until at least ten days after receipt of notice by the tribe.
If the tribe requests, the court shall grant the tribe up to twenty
additional days to prepare for such proceeding.
(2) Every petition filed in proceedings under this chapter shall
contain a statement alleging whether the ((Soldiers and Sailors))
servicemembers civil relief act of ((1940)) 2003, 50 U.S.C. Sec. 501 et
seq. applies to the proceeding. Every order or decree entered in any
proceeding under this chapter shall contain a finding that the
((Soldiers and Sailors)) servicemembers civil relief act of ((1940))
2003 does or does not apply.
(3) Every petition filed in proceedings under this chapter must
contain a statement alleging whether the Washington service members'
civil relief act, chapter 38.42 RCW, applies to the proceeding. Every
order or decree entered in any proceedings under this chapter must
contain a finding that the Washington service members' civil relief
act, chapter 38.42 RCW, does or does not apply.

--- END ---