BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that in times of
severe economic recession, the state has a special obligation to help
unemployed and low-income citizens access the training and education
necessary to help them find and keep living wage jobs. The legislature
also finds that during times of recession, when state revenues are at
their lowest, demand for education and training are at their highest,
making it especially important for the legislature to set clear goals
and make the most efficient use of limited state resources.
(2) The legislature therefore intends to expand training and
education programs, which have proven to be successful, to help
Washington citizens receive the training they need. These programs
include the worker retraining program, the opportunity grant program,
and the opportunity internship program. The legislature further
intends to create more effective intake and outreach systems to reach
the greatest number of citizens and connect them to the resources they
need, including college, apprenticeship, and preapprenticeship.
(3) The legislature also intends to empower employers to make
voluntary donations and invest in the training and education necessary
to guarantee the availability of a skilled workforce. The legislature
finds that, following enactment of legislation during the 2010 session,
a modernization incentive payment of approximately ninety-eight million
dollars will be transferred into the unemployment trust fund. This
payment will be in addition to amounts previously made available to the
state by section 903 of the social security act (Reed act) and by
section 2003 of the American recovery and reinvestment act of 2009, of
which more than sixty million dollars will be unspent at the end of the
2009-2011 biennium and more than thirty million dollars will be unspent
at the end of the 2011-2013 biennium. The legislature also finds that,
in times of severe economic recession, it is especially important for
the legislature to prioritize the use of these amounts to make possible
investments in training and education.

Sec. 2 RCW 28C.04.390 and 1999 c 121 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The college board worker retraining program funds shall be used
for training programs and related support services, including financial
aid, counseling, referral to training resources, job referral, and job
development that:
(a) Are consistent with the unified plan for workforce development;
(b) Provide increased enrollments for dislocated workers;
(c) Provide customized training opportunities for dislocated
workers; and
(d) Provide increased enrollments and support services, including
financial aid for those students not receiving unemployment insurance
benefits, that do not replace or supplant any existing enrollments,
programs, support services, or funding sources.
(2) The college board shall develop a plan for use of the worker
retraining program funds in conjunction with the workforce training
customer advisory committee established in subsection (3) of this
section. In developing the plan the college board shall:
(a) Provide that applicants for worker retraining program funds
shall solicit financial support for training programs and give priority
in receipt of funds to those applicants which are most successful in
matching public dollars with financial support;
(b) Provide that applicants for worker retraining program funds
shall develop training programs in partnership with local businesses,
industry associations, labor, and other partners as appropriate and
give priority in receipt of funds to those applicants who develop
customized training programs in partnership with local businesses,
industry associations, and labor organizations;
(c) Give priority in receipt of funds to those applicants serving
rural areas;
(d) Ensure that applicants receiving worker retraining program
funds gather information from local workforce development councils on
employer workforce needs, including the needs of businesses with less
than twenty-five employees; ((and))
(e) Provide for specialized vocational training at a private career
school or college at the request of a recipient eligible under
subsection (1)(b) of this section. Available tuition for the training
is limited to the amount that would otherwise be payable per enrolled
quarter to a public institution; and
(f) Give priority in receipt of funds to those applicants working
toward careers in the aerospace, health care, advanced manufacturing,
construction, and renewable energy industries; high-demand occupations
in strategic industry clusters identified in the state comprehensive
plan and the workforce development councils' local comprehensive plans
for workforce educational training as identified in RCW 28C.18.080 and
28C.18.150; and occupations and industries identified by community and
technical colleges in collaboration with local workforce development
councils. For purposes of this section, health care includes long-term
care.
(3) The executive director of the college board shall appoint a
workforce training customer advisory committee by July 1, 1999, to:
(a) Assist in the development of the plan for the use of the
college board worker retraining program funds and recommend guidelines
to the college board for the operation of worker retraining programs;
(b) Recommend selection criteria for worker retraining programs and
grant applicants for receipt of worker retraining program grants;
(c) Provide advice to the college board on other workforce
development activities of the community and technical colleges;
(d) Recommend selection criteria for job skills grants, consistent
with criteria established in this chapter and chapter 121, Laws of
1999. Such criteria shall include a prioritization of job skills
applicants in rural areas;
(e) Recommend guidelines to the college board for the operation of
the job skills program; and
(f) Recommend grant applicants for receipt of job skills program
grants.
(4) Members of the workforce training customer advisory committee
shall consist of three college system representatives selected by the
executive director of the college board, three representatives of
business selected from nominations provided by statewide business
organizations, and three representatives of labor selected from
nominations provided by a statewide labor organization representing a
cross-section of workers in the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
By July 1, 2010, and within existing resources, the college board
may create a single web site for the purpose of advertising the
availability of opportunity express funding to Washington citizens;
explaining that opportunity express helps people who want to pursue
college and apprenticeship for certain targeted industries; and
explaining that opportunity express includes the following tracks:
Worker retraining for unemployed adults; training programs approved by
the commissioner of the employment security department, training
programs administered by labor and management partnerships, and
training programs prioritized by industry, for unemployed adults and
incumbent workers; opportunity internships for high school students;
and opportunity grants for low- income adults. The web site may also
direct interested individuals to the appropriate local intake office.
The web site may also include a link to the Washington state department
of labor and industries apprenticeship program.

Sec. 4 RCW 28C.18.164 and 2009 c 238 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Opportunity internship consortia may apply to the board to
offer an opportunity internship program.
(a) The board, in consultation with the Washington state
apprenticeship and training council, may select those consortia that
demonstrate the strongest commitment and readiness to implement a high
quality opportunity internship program for low-income high school
students. The board shall place a priority on consortia with
demonstrated experience working with similar populations of students
and demonstrated capacity to assist a large number of students through
the progression of internship or preapprenticeship, high school
graduation, postsecondary education, and retention in a high-demand
occupation. The board shall place a priority on programs that
emphasize secondary career and technical education and nonbaccalaureate
postsecondary education; however, programs that target four-year
postsecondary degrees are eligible to participate.
(b)(i) Except as provided in (b)(ii) of this subsection (1), the
board shall enter into a contract with each consortium selected to
participate in the program. No more than ten consortia per year shall
be selected to participate in the program, and to the extent possible,
the board shall assure a geographic distribution of consortia in
regions across the state emphasizing a variety of targeted industries.
Each consortium may select no more than one hundred low-income high
school students per year to participate in the program.
(ii) For fiscal years 2011 through 2013, the board shall enter into
a contract with each consortium selected to participate in the program.
No more than twelve consortia per year shall be selected to participate
in the program, and to the extent possible, the board shall assure a
geographic distribution of consortia in regions across the state
emphasizing a variety of targeted industries. No more than five
thousand low-income high school students per year may be selected to
participate in the program.
(2) Under the terms of an opportunity internship program contract,
an opportunity internship consortium shall commit to the following
activities which shall be conducted using existing federal, state,
local, or private funds available to the consortium:
(a) Identify high-demand occupations in targeted industries for
which opportunity internships or preapprenticeships shall be developed
and provided;
(b) Develop and implement the components of opportunity
internships, including paid or unpaid internships or preapprenticeships
of at least ninety hours in length in high-demand occupations with
employers in the consortium, mentoring and guidance for students who
participate in the program, assistance with applications for
postsecondary programs and financial aid, and a guarantee of a job
interview with a participating employer for all opportunity internship
graduates who successfully complete a postsecondary program of study;
(c) Once the internship or preapprenticeship components have been
developed, conduct outreach efforts to inform low-income high school
students about high-demand occupations, the opportunity internship
program, options for postsecondary programs of study, and the
incentives and opportunities provided to students who participate in
the program;
(d) Obtain appropriate documentation of the low-income status of
students who participate in the program;
(e) Maintain communication with opportunity internship graduates of
the consortium who enroll in postsecondary programs of study; and
(f) Submit an annual report to the board on the progress of and
participation in the opportunity internship program of the consortium.
(3) Opportunity internship consortia are encouraged to:
(a) Provide paid opportunity internships or preapprenticeships,
including during the summer months to encourage students to stay
enrolled in high school;
(b) Work with high schools to offer opportunity internships as
approved worksite learning experiences where students can earn high
school credit;
(c) Designate the local workforce development council as fiscal
agent for the opportunity internship program contract;
(d) Work with area high schools to incorporate the opportunity
internship program into comprehensive guidance and counseling programs
such as the navigation 101 program; and
(e) Coordinate the opportunity internship program with other
workforce development and postsecondary education programs, including
opportunity grants, the college bound scholarship program, federal
workforce investment act initiatives, and college access challenge
grants.
(4) The board shall seek federal funds that may be used to support
the opportunity internship program, including providing the incentive
payments under RCW 28C.18.168.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 50.24 RCW
to read as follows:
A separate and identifiable account, which shall be known as the
opportunity express account, is established. Moneys in the account may
be spent only after appropriation. Moneys in the account shall be used
only for the worker retraining program, training programs approved by
the commissioner of the employment security department, training
programs administered by labor and management partnerships, industry-prioritized training programs, training programs that facilitate career
progression in health care occupations, the opportunity internship
program, and the opportunity grant program, and for administrative
costs related to these programs and collection of voluntary
contributions under this section. Moneys in the account shall be used
to supplement, not supplant, existing funding for the opportunity grant
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---