BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Providing students with the opportunity to graduate from high
school with the knowledge and skills to be successful in today's world
is now clearly part of Washington's definition of a basic education.
Some students will only achieve this objective with supplemental
interventions, support, and counseling;
(b) Dropout prevention is a fundamental strategy for strengthening
our society, building our economy, reducing crime, reducing government
spending, and increasing individual freedom and opportunity;
(c) For every dropout prevented, the chances of that person
committing a crime are reduced by twenty percent, and that person
stands to increase his or her lifetime earnings by three hundred
thousand dollars in today's dollars. In addition, for every dropout
prevented, taxpayers save an estimated ten thousand five hundred
dollars per year for each year of the individual's life between the
ages of twenty and sixty-five;
(d) There are known and proven strategies to reduce the dropout
rate, including ones that are successful for high risk and troubled
students, but these proven models have never been brought to scale; and
(e) Grants and project-based funding will never provide a
sustainable source of resources to support dropout prevention
strategies.
(2) Therefore, the state should use a market-based approach and
make a long-term commitment to recognize and reward demonstrated
success in reducing the dropout rate by investing the savings generated
from each prevented dropout in the public schools.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.175
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Effective July 1, 2013, the dropout prevention recognition
program is created as provided in this section and sections 3 through
6 of this act to provide a financial award for high schools that
demonstrate reduction from one school year to the next in high school
dropouts, based on a measure of dropout prevention that has been
statistically adjusted for student demographics and made reliable over
time.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in
consultation with the state board of education, shall:
(a) Calculate the annual extended graduation rate for each high
school, which is the rate at which a class of students enters high
school as freshmen and graduates with a high school diploma, including
students who receive a high school diploma after the year they were
expected to graduate;
(b) Adjust the rate for student transfers and statistically adjust
the rate for student demographics in the high school, including the
number of students eligible for free and reduced price meals, special
education and English language learner students, students of various
racial and ethnic backgrounds, and student mobility, which shall be the
"adjusted extended graduation rate";
(c) Adjust the calculation to prevent the rate from being affected
by fluctuations in the size of a class of students and to create a
reliable measure over time;
(d) Calculate the change in the adjusted extended graduation rate
for each school year compared to the prior school year; and
(e) Translate the change in the adjusted extended graduation rate
into a number of students that the change in rate represents, which if
a positive number shall be the "adjusted number of students prevented
from dropping out."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.175
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Annually beginning in the 2013-14 school year, for each
adjusted number of students prevented from dropping out as defined
under section 2 of this act, a high school shall be eligible for a
dropout prevention recognition award of ten thousand five hundred
dollars, which amount shall be adjusted annually for inflation after
2013-14 using the implicit price deflator. The dropout prevention
recognition award represents the annual estimated savings to the
taxpayers realized when a student avoids dropping out.
(a) Fifty percent of an award under this section shall be allocated
to the eligible high school to be used for dropout prevention
activities in the school as specified in subsection (2) of this
section. The principal of the high school shall determine the use of
funds after consultation with parents and certificated and classified
staff of the school.
(b) Fifty percent of an award under this section shall be allocated
to the school district in which the eligible high school is located to
be used for dropout prevention activities as specified in subsection
(2) of this section in the high school or in other schools in the
district.
(c) The eligible high school and school district must account for
the use of award funds separately from funds received from state
funding formulas or other sources. Funds may be expended over a three-year period.
(d) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may
withhold distribution of award funds under this section to an otherwise
eligible high school or school district if the superintendent of public
instruction issues a finding that the school or school district has
willfully manipulated the graduation rates, for example by expelling,
suspending, transferring, or refusing to enroll students at-risk of
dropping out of school.
(2) High schools and school districts may use dropout prevention
recognition award funds to support any of the following dropout
prevention and reengagement activities, offered directly by the school
or district or under contract with education agencies or community-based organizations including but not limited to educational service
districts, workforce development councils, and boys and girls clubs:
(a) Use of graduation coaches as defined in section 4 of this act;
(b) Opportunity internship activities under RCW 28C.18.164;
(c) Dropout reengagement programs provided by community-based
organizations or community and technical colleges;
(d) Extended school day, extended school year, and tutoring
programs for students identified as at-risk of dropping out of school,
including instruction to assist these students in meeting graduation
requirements in mathematics and science;
(e) Outreach and counseling targeted to students identified as at-risk of dropping out of school, or who have dropped out of school, to
encourage them to consider learning alternatives such as
preapprenticeship programs, skill centers, running start, technical
high schools, and other options for completing a high school diploma;
(f) Preapprenticeship programs or running start for the trades
initiatives under RCW 49.04.190;
(g) Mentoring programs for students;
(h) Development and use of dropout early warning data systems;
(i) Counseling, resource and referral services, and intervention
programs to address social, behavioral, and health factors associated
with dropping out of school;
(j) Implementing programs for in-school suspension or other
strategies to avoid excluding middle and high school students from the
school whenever possible;
(k) Parent engagement activities such as home visits and off-campus
parent support group meetings related to dropout prevention and
reengagement; and
(l) Early learning programs for prekindergarten students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.175
RCW to read as follows:
For the purposes of section 3 of this act, a "graduation coach"
means a certificated staff person assigned to identify and provide
intervention services to students who have dropped out or are at-risk
of dropping out of school or of not graduating on time through the
following activities:
(1) Monitoring and advising on individual student progress toward
graduation;
(2) Providing student support services and case management;
(3) Motivating students to focus on a graduation plan;
(4) Encouraging parent and community involvement;
(5) Connecting parents and students with appropriate school and
community resources;
(6) Securing supplemental academic services for students;
(7) Implementing schoolwide dropout prevention programs and
interventions; and
(8) Analyzing data to identify at-risk students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28A.175
RCW to read as follows:
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
regularly inform high schools and school districts about the
opportunities under sections 2 through 6 of this act and the activities
that have been demonstrated to increase the likelihood of a school
receiving a dropout prevention recognition award. The office shall
make every effort to keep dropout prevention and reduction of the
dropout rate a top priority for school directors, administrators, and
teachers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 28A.175
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The dropout prevention recognition program account is created
in the state treasury.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2013, funds must be appropriated from the
state general fund each fiscal year and deposited in the dropout
prevention recognition program account in an amount equal to one
percent of the state appropriation from the state general fund to
support basic education under RCW 28A.150.260(3), (4), and (8) for that
fiscal year.
(3) Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation and
do not lapse at the end of the fiscal year.
(4) Expenditures from the account may be made only to provide
dropout prevention recognition program awards under section 3 of this
act. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
allocate the award funds to eligible high schools and school districts
from the funds appropriated for this purpose.
(5) If insufficient funds are available in the account to provide
a full award for each eligible high school and school district, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall prorate the
awards across all eligible schools and school districts and notify the
governor and the legislature of the amount of the shortfall.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 By July 31, 2012, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall calculate an adjusted number
of students prevented from dropping out as defined under section 2 of
this act for each high school in the state and shall notify the high
schools of what their dropout prevention recognition award under
section 3 of this act would be in the 2012-13 school year if the
program were in effect in that year. The office shall notify all high
schools that the implementation of the award program in the 2013-14
school year is based on performance improvements in the 2012-13 school
year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The office of the superintendent of public
instruction, in consultation with the state board of education, must
submit the methodology and preliminary results from the calculation of
the adjusted extended graduation rate and the adjusted number of
students dropping out as required under section 2 of this act to the
education committees of the legislature for review by December 31,
2011, and provide the legislature an opportunity to act before the
methodology is adopted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act may be known and cited as the
dropout prevention act.

--- END ---