BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If a victim injured as a result of a criminal act has been
qualified for receiving benefits for mental health services under the
crime victims' compensation program under chapter 7.68 RCW, the person
may continue to receive appropriate mental health services from his or
her current mental health treatment provider after becoming eligible
for medical assistance or medical care services under this chapter.
The treatment provider must be licensed or certified and in good
standing under Title 18 RCW.
(2) Initial payment for mental health services provided in
subsection (1) of this section shall be paid to the provider by the
crime victims' compensation program under chapter 7.68 RCW. The
department shall reimburse the crime victims' compensation program as
provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) If the injured victim in subsection (1) of this section is a
medicaid assistance client, and federal financial participation is not
available, the department shall reimburse the crime victims'
compensation program with state funds only to assist in providing
continuity of mental health treatment to the victim. Reimbursement
shall be set at the applicable medical assistance or medical care
services payment rate.

Sec. 2 RCW 7.68.130 and 1995 c 33 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Benefits payable pursuant to this chapter shall be reduced by
the amount of any other public or private insurance available, less a
proportionate share of reasonable attorneys' fees and costs, if any,
incurred by the victim in obtaining recovery from the insurer.
Calculation of a proportionate share of attorneys' fees and costs shall
be made under the formula established in RCW 51.24.060. The department
or the victim may require court approval of costs and attorneys' fees
or may petition a court for determination of the reasonableness of
costs and attorneys' fees.
(2) Benefits payable after 1980 to victims injured or killed before
1980 shall be reduced by any other public or private insurance
including but not limited to social security.
(3) Payment by the department under this chapter shall be secondary
to other insurance benefits, notwithstanding the provision of any
contract or coverage to the contrary. In the case of private life
insurance proceeds, the first forty thousand dollars of the proceeds
shall not be considered for purposes of any reduction in benefits.
(4) The crime victims' compensation program shall be the primary
payer for mental health services provided to a medical assistance or
medical care services client, if that client is a crime victim who
qualifies for mental health treatment under this chapter and has
established a relationship with a treatment provider prior to obtaining
medical assistance or medical care services benefits. The program
shall receive full reimbursement under section 1 of this act.
(5) For the purposes of this section, the collection methods
available under RCW 7.68.125(4) apply.

--- END ---