BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.02.075 and 1995 c 403 s 1007 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall collect a fee of fifteen dollars on each
master application. The entire master application fee shall be
deposited in the master license fund.
(2) The department shall collect a fee of nine dollars on each
renewal application. Renewal application fees shall be deposited in
the master license fund.
(3)(a) Subject to (b) of this subsection, the department shall
collect a voluntary donation of five dollars on each master business
application and each renewal application. The voluntary donations must
be deposited in the business assistance account created in RCW
28B.30.531 and be used by the small business development center
administrator or the administrator's designee for business assistance
purposes as provided in RCW 28B.30.530.
(b) The voluntary donation provided for under (a) of this
subsection may not be collected from any master business applicant or
applicant for renewal who actively opts not to participate in the
voluntary donation program. The department shall ensure that the
opportunity to opt out of the voluntary donation program under this
subsection is made clear to master business applicants and applicants
for renewal, and the opportunity to opt out of the voluntary donation
program must be provided by the department at each application or
renewal.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.02.080 and 1992 c 107 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
All fees and donations collected under the system shall be
deposited with the state treasurer. Upon issuance or renewal of the
master license or supplemental licenses, the department shall
distribute the fees, except for fees covered under RCW 19.02.210
((and)), for fees covered under RCW 19.80.075, and for donations
collected under RCW 19.02.075(3), to the appropriate accounts under the
applicable statutes for those agencies' licenses.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.30.530 and 2009 c 486 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board of regents of Washington State University shall
establish the Washington State University small business development
center.
(2) The center shall provide management and technical assistance
including but not limited to training, counseling, and research
services to small businesses throughout the state. The center shall
work with the department of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce, the state board for community and technical
colleges, the higher education coordinating board, the workforce
training and education coordinating board, the employment security
department, the Washington state economic development commission,
associate development organizations, and workforce development councils
to:
(a) Integrate small business development centers with other state
and local economic development and workforce development programs;
(b) Target the centers' services to small businesses;
(c) Tailor outreach and services at each center to the needs and
demographics of entrepreneurs and small businesses located within the
service area;
(d) Establish and expand small business development center
satellite offices when financially feasible; and
(e) Coordinate delivery of services to avoid duplication.
(3) The administrator of the center may contract with other public
or private entities for the provision of specialized services.
(4) The small business development center may accept and disburse
federal grants or federal matching funds or other funds or donations
from any source when made, granted, or donated to carry out the
center's purposes. When drawing on funds from the business assistance
account created in RCW ((30.60.010)) 28B.30.531, the center must first
use the funds to make increased management and technical assistance
available to existing small businesses and start-up businesses at
satellite offices. The funds may also be used to develop and expand
assistance programs such as small business planning workshops and small
business counseling.
(5) The legislature directs the small business development center
to request United States small business administration approval of a
special emphasis initiative, as permitted under 13 C.F.R. 130.340(c) as
of April 1, 2009, to target assistance to Washington state's smaller
businesses. This initiative would be negotiated and included in the
first cooperative agreement application process that occurs after July
26, 2009.
(6) By December 1, 2009, and December 1, 2010, respectively, the
center shall provide a written progress report and a final report to
the appropriate committees of the legislature with respect to the
requirements in subsections (2) and (5) of this section and the amount
and use of funding received through the business assistance account.
The reports must also include data on the number, location, staffing,
and budget levels of satellite offices; affiliations with community
colleges, associate development organizations or other local
organizations; the number, size, and type of small businesses assisted;
and the types of services provided. The reports must also include
information on the outcomes achieved, such as jobs created or retained,
private capital invested, and return on the investment of state and
federal dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act take effect
October 1, 2010.

--- END ---