BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Outdoor car washing has the potential to
result in high loads of nutrients, metals, and hydrocarbons draining
directly into Washington waters as a result of the detergent and
chemical-rich water used to wash cars flowing into storm drains.
(2) The legislature finds that vehicle washing activities affect
local water quality and drinking water quality, and that the water from
car washes and the chemicals in many detergents are harmful to fish and
other aquatic life.
(3) The legislature intends to make Washington waters cleaner and
healthier by educating the public on how they can reduce the pollution
from car washes from entering into watersheds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department and the Puget Sound partnership must use
existing funds to increase public awareness and education regarding the
effects of charity car washes on water quality and drinking water
quality. The department and the Puget Sound partnership must provide
educational materials and guidance to nonprofit organizations and
educational institutions on how to properly conduct a charity car wash
that would minimize the car wash's effects on water quality and
drinking water quality. The guidance must include what equipment is
necessary for car washes to minimize their effects on water quality and
drinking water quality, as well as education on storm water pollution.
(2) The department and the Puget Sound partnership shall, as part
of their existing storm water assistance programs, provide the option
of acquiring kits that would provide charity car washes with the
necessary equipment mentioned in their guidance from subsection (1) of
this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.71.400 and 2007 c 341 s 23 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Puget Sound recovery account is created in the state treasury.
To the account shall be deposited such funds as the legislature directs
or appropriates to the account. Federal grants, gifts, or other
financial assistance received by the Puget Sound partnership and other
state agencies from nonstate sources for the specific purpose of
recovering Puget Sound may be deposited into the account. Moneys in
the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from
the account may be used for the protection and recovery of Puget Sound,
including providing car wash kits, as authorized under section 2 of
this act, to nonprofit organizations.

--- END ---