BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that beverage
containers that are not recycled contribute to unnecessary waste,
including wasted raw materials such as glass, metals, and petroleum
products, which take up scarce landfill space. The legislature finds
that requiring a deposit on all beverage containers will provide a
necessary incentive for the collection and recycling of such
containers. The legislature further finds that the collection and
recycling of raw materials is an economically efficient and
environmentally benign action to reduce waste and increase available
landfill space, collect reusable resources, encourage innovation of
those resources, and improve the sustainability of Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Beverage" includes beer or other malt beverages, wine,
liquors, water and flavored water, mineral waters, soda water and
similar carbonated soft drinks in liquid form, sports drinks, coffees,
teas, juices, and other beverages intended for human consumption.
(2)(a) "Beverage container" means the individual, separate, sealed
glass, metal, or plastic bottle or can containing a beverage in a
quantity less than or equal to three fluid liters.
(b) "Beverage container" does not include cartons, foil pouches,
and drink boxes.
(3) "Board" means the liquor control board.
(4) "Dealer" includes: (a) Every person, firm, or corporation who
engages in the sale of beverages in beverage containers to a consumer;
or (b) a redemption center certified under section 8 of this act.
(5) "Distributor" includes any person, firm, or corporation who
engages in the sale or offer for sale of beverages in beverage
containers to a dealer.
(6) "Importer" includes any dealer or manufacturer who directly
imports beverage containers into this state.
(7) "Manufacturer" means every person bottling, canning, or
otherwise filling beverage containers for sale to distributors,
importers, or dealers.
(8) "Place of business" means the location at which a dealer sells
or offers for sale beverages in beverage containers to consumers.
(9) "Redemption center" means any person offering to pay the refund
value of an empty beverage container to a person, or any person who
contracts with one or more dealers or distributors to collect, sort,
and obtain the refund value and handling fee of empty beverage
containers for, or on behalf of, such a dealer or distributor.
(10) "Use or consumption" means the exercise of any right or power
incident to the ownership thereof, other than the sale or the keeping
or retention of a beverage for the purposes of sale.
(11) "Water and flavored water" means any beverage identified
through the use of letters, words, or symbols on its product label as
a type of water.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 No person, firm, or corporation may sell or
offer for sale a beverage container in this state unless the deposit on
the beverage container has a refund value of not less than five cents
which is clearly indicated on the beverage container as provided in
section 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Except as provided in section 6 of this act:
(1) A dealer shall accept at his or her place of business from any
person any empty beverage containers that contained the kind of
beverage sold by the dealer and shall pay to that person the refund
value of each beverage container as established by section 3 of this
act.
(2) A distributor or importer may not refuse to accept from a
dealer any empty beverage containers of the kind, size, and brands sold
by the distributor or importer, or refuse to pay the dealer the refund
value of a beverage as established by section 3 of this act.
(3) The manufacturer, distributor, or importer of any beverage sold
shall ensure that all dealers and redemption centers that redeem
beverage containers are paid the refund value for those beverage
containers and that those beverage containers are collected from the
dealer or redemption center at reasonable times and intervals as
determined by rule by the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Any manufacturer, distributor, and importer
that fails to pay a dealer or redemption center the refund value of
beverage containers and to collect beverage containers as required by
section 4(3) of this act is liable to the dealer or redemption center
for treble the unpaid refund value and treble the collection costs
incurred by the dealer or redemption center for any beverage containers
that were not collected as required.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) A dealer may refuse to accept from any
person, and a distributor or importer may refuse to accept from a
dealer, any empty beverage container that does not state on the
beverage container a refund value as established by section 3 of this
act.
(2) A dealer may refuse to accept and to pay the refund value of:
(a) Any beverage container visibly containing or contaminated by a
substance other than water, residue of the original contents, or
ordinary dust.
(b)(i) More than one hundred forty-four individual beverage
containers returned by any one person during one day, if the dealer
occupies a space of five thousand or more square feet in a single area.
(ii) More than fifty individual beverage containers returned by any
one person during one day, if the dealer occupies a space of less than
five thousand square feet in a single area.
(c) Any beverage container that is damaged to the extent that the
brand appearing on the container cannot be identified.
(d)(i) In order to refuse containers under (a), (b)(i), or (c) of
this subsection, if a dealer occupies a space of five thousand or more
square feet in a single area, the dealer must post in each area where
containers are received a clearly visible and legible sign containing
the following information:

"NOTICE

Washington state law allows a dealer to refuse to accept:

1. Beverage containers visibly containing or contaminated by a
substance other than water, residue of the original contents,
or ordinary dust;

2. More than one hundred forty-four individual beverage
containers from any one person during one day; or

3. Beverage containers that are damaged to the extent that the
brand appearing on the container cannot be identified."

(ii) In order to refuse containers under (a), (b)(ii), or (c) of
this subsection, if a dealer occupies a space of less than five
thousand or more square feet in a single area, the dealer must post in
each area where containers are received a clearly visible and legible
sign containing the following information:

"NOTICE

Washington state law allows a dealer to refuse to accept:

1. Beverage containers visibly containing or contaminated by a
substance other than water, residue of the original contents,
or ordinary dust;

2. More than fifty individual beverage containers from any one
person during one day; or

3. Beverage containers that are damaged to the extent that the
brand appearing on the container cannot be identified."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Every beverage container sold or offered
for sale in this state by a distributor or dealer must clearly indicate
by permanently marking, embossing, or stamping the container, or by
printing as part of the product label, or other method securely
affixing to the beverage container, the refund value of the container.
(2) A person may not sell or offer for sale at retail in this state
beverage containers connected to each other by a separate holding
device constructed of plastic rings or other material that will not
decompose by photobiodegradation, chemical degradation, or
biodegradation within one hundred twenty days of disposal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) To facilitate the return of empty
beverage containers and to serve dealers of beverages, any person may
establish a redemption center, subject to the approval of the board, at
which any person may return empty beverage containers and receive
payment of the refund value of the beverage containers.
(2) Application for approval of a redemption center must be filed
with the board. The application must include:
(a) The name and address of the person responsible for the
establishment and operation of the redemption center;
(b) The kind of beverage containers that will be accepted at the
redemption center;
(c) The names and addresses of the dealers to be served by the
redemption center; and
(d) Any additional information as the board may require.
(3) The board shall approve a redemption center if it finds the
redemption center will provide convenient service to persons for the
return of empty beverage containers. The order of the board approving
a redemption center must state the dealers to be served by the
redemption center and the kind of empty beverage containers that the
redemption center must accept. The order may contain other provisions
to ensure the redemption center will provide a convenient service to
the public as the board may determine.
(4) The board may review approval of a redemption center at any
time. After written notice to the person responsible for the
establishment and operation of the redemption center, and to the
dealers served by the redemption center, the board may withdraw
approval of a redemption center if the board finds there has not been
compliance with the board's order approving the redemption center or if
the redemption center no longer provides a convenient service to the
public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 In addition to the authority granted to the
board under this chapter, the board may by rule establish rules
necessary and appropriate for the administration of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---