BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.136.011 and 2006 c 197 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that scarce public resources, including
tax preferences, are regularly used to promote state and local economic
development. The legislature finds that tax preferences should be
subject to the same rigorous requirements for efficiency and
accountability as are other expenditure programs. In addition, the
businesses benefiting from these exemptions, deductions, credits,
deferrals, subsidies, and preferential rates, should be expected in
return to demonstrate a certain level of commitment to our communities
and citizens.
(2) The legislature recognizes that tax preferences are enacted to
meet objectives which are determined to be in the public interest.
However, some tax preferences may not be efficient or equitable tools
for the achievement of current public policy objectives. Given the
changing nature of the economy and tax structures of other states, the
legislature finds that periodic performance audits of tax preferences
are needed to measure the public good created in the state by such
preferences and to determine if their continued existence will serve
the public interest.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.136.055 and 2006 c 197 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall review
tax preferences according to the schedule developed under RCW
43.136.045. The committee shall consider, but not be limited to, the
following factors in the review:
(a) The classes of individuals, types of organizations, or types of
industries whose state tax liabilities are directly affected by the tax
preference;
(b) Public policy objectives that might provide a justification for
the tax preference, including but not limited to the legislative
history, any legislative intent, or the extent to which the tax
preference encourages business growth or relocation into this state,
promotes growth or retention of high wage jobs, ((or)) provides
employment opportunities for the existing state workforce, increases
tax receipts, helps stabilize and strengthen communities or otherwise
provides a positive return on the state's investment of resources;
(c) Evidence that the existence of the tax preference has
contributed to the achievement of any of the public policy objectives;
(d) The extent to which continuation of the tax preference might
contribute to any of the public policy objectives;
(e) The extent to which the tax preference may provide unintended
benefits to an individual, organization, or industry other than those
the legislature intended;
(f) The extent to which terminating the tax preference may have
negative effects on the category of taxpayers that currently benefit
from the tax preference, and the extent to which resulting higher taxes
may have negative effects on employment and the economy;
(g) The feasibility of modifying the tax preference to provide for
adjustment or recapture of the tax benefits of the tax preference if
the objectives are not fulfilled;
(h) Fiscal impacts of the tax preference, including past impacts
and expected future impacts if it is continued. For the purposes of
this subsection, "fiscal impact" includes an analysis of the general
effects of the tax preference on the overall state economy, including,
but not limited to, the effects of the tax preference on the
consumption and expenditures of persons and businesses within the
state;
(i) The extent to which termination of the tax preference would
affect the distribution of liability for payment of state taxes;
(j) Consideration of similar tax preferences adopted in other
states, and potential public policy benefits that might be gained by
incorporating corresponding provisions in Washington.
(2) For each tax preference, the committee shall provide a
recommendation as to whether the tax preference should be continued
without modification, modified, scheduled for sunset review at a future
date, or terminated immediately. The committee may recommend
accountability standards for the future review of a tax preference.

--- END ---