BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.48.082 and 2006 c 89 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this section and
RCW 49.48.083 through 49.48.086:
(1) "Citation" means a written determination by the department that
a wage payment requirement has been violated.
(2) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(3) "Determination of compliance" means a written determination by
the department that wage payment requirements have not been violated.
(4) "Director" means the director of the department of labor and
industries, or the director's authorized representative.
(5) "Employee" has the meaning provided in: (a) RCW 49.46.010 for
purposes of a wage payment requirement set forth in RCW 49.46.020 or
49.46.130; and (b) RCW 49.12.005 for purposes of a wage payment
requirement set forth in RCW 49.48.010, 49.52.050, or 49.52.060.
(6) "Employer" has the meaning provided in RCW 49.46.010 for
purposes of a wage payment requirement set forth in RCW 49.46.020,
49.46.130, 49.48.010, 49.52.050, or 49.52.060.
(7) "Notice of assessment" means a written notice by the department
that, based on a citation, the employer shall pay the amounts assessed
under RCW 49.48.083.
(8) "Wage" has the meaning provided in RCW 49.46.010.
(9) "Wage complaint" means a complaint from an employee to the
department that asserts that an employer has violated one or more wage
payment requirements and that is reduced to writing.
(10) "Wage payment requirement" means a wage payment requirement
set forth in RCW 49.46.020, 49.46.130, 49.48.010, 49.52.050, or
49.52.060, and any related rules adopted by the department.
(11) "Willful" means a knowing and intentional action that is
neither accidental nor the result of a bona fide dispute, as evaluated
under the standards applicable to wage payment violations under RCW
49.52.050(2).
(12) "Business practice of disregard for wage law" means that an
employer has willfully contravened wage payment requirements at least
twice, including actions pertaining to an employee's current complaint,
in the five years preceding the date of filing of the employee's
complaint.
(13) "Repeat violator" means any employer that has been the subject
of a final and binding citation and notice of assessment within five
years of the date of issue of the most recent citation and notice of
assessment.
(14) "Successor" means any person to whom an employer quitting,
selling out, exchanging, or disposing of a business sells or otherwise
conveys in bulk and not in the ordinary course of the employer's
business, a major part of the materials, supplies, merchandise,
inventory, fixtures, or equipment of the employer's business.

Sec. 2 RCW 49.48.083 and 2006 c 89 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If an employee files a wage complaint with the department, the
department shall investigate the wage complaint. Unless otherwise
resolved, the department shall issue either a citation and notice of
assessment or a determination of compliance((: (a))) no later than
sixty days after the date on which the department received the wage
complaint, unless the department extends this time period for good
cause((; and (b) no later than three years after the date on which the
cause of action accrued, unless a longer period of time applies under
law. Such cause of action for wage claims accrues from the date when
the wages are due)). The department may not investigate a claim unless
it is filed within three years of the date when the last wages were
owed. The department shall send the citation and notice of assessment
or the determination of compliance to both the employer and the
employee by service of process or certified mail to their last known
addresses. The wages and interest owed must be calculated from the
first date wages were owed to the employee, except that the department
may not order the employer to pay any wages and interest that were owed
more than three years before the date the claim was filed with the
department.
(2) If the department determines that an employer has violated a
wage payment requirement and issues to the employer a citation and
notice of assessment, the department may order the employer to pay
employees all wages owed, including interest of one percent per month
on all wages owed, to the employee.
(3) If the department determines that the violation of the wage
payment requirement was a willful violation, the department also may
order the employer to pay the department a civil penalty as specified
in (a) of this subsection.
(a) A civil penalty for a willful violation of a wage payment
requirement shall be not less than ((five hundred)) one thousand
dollars or an amount equal to ten percent of the total amount of unpaid
wages, whichever is greater. The maximum civil penalty for a willful
violation of a wage payment requirement shall be twenty thousand
dollars.
(b) The department may not assess a civil penalty if the employer
reasonably relied on: (i) A rule related to any wage payment
requirement; (ii) a written order, ruling, approval, opinion, advice,
determination, or interpretation of the director; or (iii) an
interpretive or administrative policy issued by the department and
filed with the office of the code reviser. In accordance with the
department's retention schedule obligations under chapter 40.14 RCW,
the department shall maintain a complete and accurate record of all
written orders, rulings, approvals, opinions, advice, determinations,
and interpretations for purposes of determining whether an employer is
immune from civil penalties under (b)(ii) of this subsection.
(c) The department shall waive any civil penalty assessed against
an employer under this section if the director determines that the
employer has provided payment to the employee of all wages that the
department determined that the employer owed to the employee, including
interest, within ten business days of the employer's receipt of the
citation and notice of assessment from the department. However, the
department may not waive a civil penalty assessed under this section
against a repeat violator, and the department may, but is not required
to, waive a civil penalty assessed against an employer under this
section if the department determines that an employer has a business
practice of disregard for wage laws.
(d) The department may waive at any time a civil penalty assessed
under this section, in whole or in part, if the director determines
that the employer paid all wages owed to an employee. However, the
department may not waive a civil penalty assessed under this section
against a repeat violator.
(e) The department shall deposit civil penalties paid under this
section in the supplemental pension fund established under RCW
51.44.033.
(4) Upon payment by an employer, and acceptance by an employee, of
all wages and interest assessed by the department in a citation and
notice of assessment issued to the employer, the fact of such payment
by the employer, and of such acceptance by the employee, shall: (a)
Constitute a full and complete satisfaction by the employer of all
specific wage payment requirements addressed in the citation and notice
of assessment; and (b) bar the employee from initiating or pursuing any
court action or other judicial or administrative proceeding based on
the specific wage payment requirements addressed in the citation and
notice of assessment. The citation and notice of assessment shall
include a notification and summary of the specific requirements of this
subsection.
(5) The applicable statute of limitations for civil actions is
tolled during any wage complaint investigation by the department of an
employee's wage complaint against an employer. For the purposes of
this subsection, the department's investigation begins on the date the
employee files the wage complaint with the department and ends when the
department notifies the employer and the employee in writing that the
claim has been otherwise resolved or that the employee has elected to
terminate the department's administrative action.

Sec. 3 RCW 49.48.084 and 2006 c 89 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person, firm, or corporation aggrieved by a citation and
notice of assessment or a determination of compliance issued by the
department under RCW 49.48.083 may appeal the citation and notice of
assessment ((or)), the determination of compliance, or the assessment
of civil penalty for repeat violations or business practice of
disregard for wage law to the director by filing a notice of appeal
with the director within thirty days of the department's issuance of
the citation and notice of assessment or the determination of
compliance. A citation and notice of assessment or a determination of
compliance not appealed within thirty days is final and binding, and
not subject to further appeal.
(2) A notice of appeal filed with the director under this section
shall stay the effectiveness of the citation and notice of assessment
((or)), the determination of compliance, or the assessment of civil
penalty for repeat violations or business practice of disregard for
wage law pending final review of the appeal by the director as provided
for in chapter 34.05 RCW.
(3) Upon receipt of a notice of appeal, the director shall assign
the hearing to an administrative law judge of the office of
administrative hearings to conduct the hearing and issue an initial
order. The hearing and review procedures shall be conducted in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, and the standard of review by the
administrative law judge of an appealed citation and notice of
assessment or an appealed determination of compliance shall be de novo.
Any party who seeks to challenge an initial order shall file a petition
for administrative review with the director within thirty days after
service of the initial order. The director shall conduct
administrative review in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.
(4) The director shall issue all final orders after appeal of the
initial order. The final order of the director is subject to judicial
review in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.
(5) Orders that are not appealed within the time period specified
in this section and chapter 34.05 RCW are final and binding, and not
subject to further appeal.
(6) An employer who fails to allow adequate inspection of records
in an investigation by the department under this chapter within a
reasonable time period may not use such records in any appeal under
this section to challenge the correctness of any determination by the
department of wages owed or penalty assessed.

Sec. 4 RCW 49.48.086 and 2006 c 89 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After a final order is issued under RCW 49.48.084, if an
employer defaults in the payment of: (a) Any wages determined by the
department to be owed to an employee, including interest; or (b) any
civil penalty ordered by the department under RCW 49.48.083, the
director may file with the clerk of any county within the state a
warrant in the amount of the payment plus any filing fees. The clerk
of the county in which the warrant is filed shall immediately designate
a superior court cause number for the warrant, and the clerk shall
cause to be entered in the judgment docket under the superior court
cause number assigned to the warrant, the name of the employer
mentioned in the warrant, the amount of payment due on it plus any
filing fees, and the date when the warrant was filed. The aggregate
amount of the warrant as docketed becomes a lien upon the title to, and
interest in, all real and personal property of the employer against
whom the warrant is issued, the same as a judgment in a civil case
docketed in the office of the clerk. The sheriff shall proceed upon
the warrant in all respects and with like effect as prescribed by law
with respect to execution or other process issued against rights or
property upon judgment in a court of competent jurisdiction. The
warrant so docketed is sufficient to support the issuance of writs of
garnishment in favor of the state in a manner provided by law in case
of judgment, wholly or partially unsatisfied. The clerk of the court
is entitled to a filing fee which will be added to the amount of the
warrant. A copy of the warrant shall be mailed to the employer within
three days of filing with the clerk.
(2)(a) The director may issue to any person, firm, corporation,
other entity, municipal corporation, political subdivision of the
state, a public corporation, or any agency of the state, a notice and
order to withhold and deliver property of any kind when he or she has
reason to believe that there is in the possession of the person, firm,
corporation, other entity, municipal corporation, political subdivision
of the state, public corporation, or agency of the state, property that
is or will become due, owing, or belonging to an employer upon whom a
notice of assessment has been served by the department for payments or
civil penalties due to the department. The effect of a notice and
order is continuous from the date the notice and order is first made
until the liability out of which the notice and order arose is
satisfied or becomes unenforceable because of lapse of time. The
department shall release the notice and order when the liability out of
which the notice and order arose is satisfied or becomes unenforceable
by reason of lapse of time and shall notify the person against whom the
notice and order was made that the notice and order has been released.
(b) The notice and order to withhold and deliver must be served by
the sheriff of the county or by the sheriff's deputy, by certified
mail, return receipt requested, or by the director. A person, firm,
corporation, other entity, municipal corporation, political subdivision
of the state, public corporation, or agency of the state upon whom
service has been made shall answer the notice within twenty days
exclusive of the day of service, under oath and in writing, and shall
make true answers to the matters inquired of in the notice and order.
Upon service of the notice and order, if the party served possesses any
property that may be subject to the claim of the department, the party
shall promptly deliver the property to the director. The director
shall hold the property in trust for application on the employer's
indebtedness to the department, or for return without interest, in
accordance with a final determination of a petition for review. In the
alternative, the party shall furnish a good and sufficient surety bond
satisfactory to the director conditioned upon final determination of
liability. If a party served and named in the notice fails to answer
the notice within the time prescribed in this section, the court may
render judgment by default against the party for the full amount
claimed by the director in the notice, together with costs. If a
notice is served upon an employer and the property subject to it is
wages, the employer may assert in the answer all exemptions provided
for by chapter 6.27 RCW to which the wage earner is entitled.
(3) In addition to the procedure for collection of wages owed,
including interest, and civil penalties as set forth in this section,
the department may recover wages owed, including interest, and civil
penalties assessed under RCW 49.48.083 in a civil action brought in a
court of competent jurisdiction of the county where the violation is
alleged to have occurred.
(4) Whenever any employer quits business, sells out, exchanges, or
otherwise disposes of the employer's business or stock of goods, any
person who becomes a successor to the business becomes liable for the
full amount of any outstanding citation and notice of assessment or
penalty against the employer's business under this chapter. If the
citation and notice of assessment or penalty is not paid in full by the
employer within ten days of the date of the sale, exchange, or
disposal, the successor is liable for the payment of the full amount of
the citation and notice of assessment or penalty, and payment thereof
by the successor must, to the extent thereof, be deemed a payment upon
the purchase price. If the payment is greater in amount than the
purchase price, the amount of the difference becomes a debt due the
successor from the employer.
(5) This section does not affect other collection remedies that are
otherwise provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 49.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall assess a civil penalty against any repeat
violator in an amount of not less than one thousand dollars or an
amount equal to ten percent of the total amount of unpaid wages,
whichever is greater. The maximum civil penalty for a repeat violator
is twenty thousand dollars.
(2) The department may assess a civil penalty of not less than one
thousand dollars and not more than twenty thousand dollars where the
department determines by a preponderance of the evidence that an
employer shows a business practice of disregard for wage law. The
penalty amount must be consistent with the severity of the violation,
as determined by reference to factors not limited to:
(a) The number of complaints against the employer under this
chapter in the previous five years;
(b) The credibility of the complaints;
(c) The similarity of the complaints;
(d) The number of separate alleged violations within the
complaints;
(e) Evidence that the employer willfully violated the provisions of
this chapter;
(f) Evidence that the employer remedies violations only when the
department becomes involved; and
(g) Evidence that the employer attempts to discourage employees
from filing wage complaints with the department.

--- END ---