BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 53.08.245 and 1985 c 125 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It shall be in the public purpose for all port districts to
engage in economic development programs. In addition, port districts
may contract with nonprofit corporations in furtherance of this and
other acts relating to economic development.
(2)(a) Economic development programs may include those programs for
job training and placement, preapprenticeship training or educational
programs associated with port tenants, customers, and local economic
development related to port activities that are sponsored by a port,
operated by a nonprofit entity and are in existence on the effective
date of this section.
(b) As a contract condition, a sponsoring port must require any
nonprofit entity that operates programs such as those described in (a)
of this subsection to submit annually quantitative information on
program outcomes including: The number of workers trained, recruited,
and placed in jobs; the types of jobs and range of compensation; the
number and types of businesses that are served; and any other tangible
benefits realized by the port, the workers, businesses, and the public.

--- END ---