BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that new federal
regulations requiring reporting of greenhouse gas emissions conflict
with state rules. The legislature envisioned that once federal
greenhouse gas reporting requirements were in place, the state
provisions would be eliminated so that the employers of Washington did
not have dual reporting requirements that place them at an economic
disadvantage to out-of-state companies.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature that companies that
comply with the federal greenhouse gas reporting requirements do not
have to submit different paperwork to the Washington state department
of ecology or comply with any additional state requirements.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.94.151 and 2008 c 14 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board of any activated authority or the department, may
classify air contaminant sources, by ordinance, resolution, rule or
regulation, which in its judgment may cause or contribute to air
pollution, according to levels and types of emissions and other
characteristics which cause or contribute to air pollution, and may
require registration or reporting or both for any such class or
classes. Classifications made pursuant to this section may be for
application to the area of jurisdiction of such authority, or the state
as a whole or to any designated area within the jurisdiction, and shall
be made with special reference to effects on health, economic and
social factors, and physical effects on property.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, any
person operating or responsible for the operation of air contaminant
sources of any class for which the ordinances, resolutions, rules or
regulations of the department or board of the authority, require
registration or reporting shall register therewith and make reports
containing information as may be required by such department or board
concerning location, size and height of contaminant outlets, processes
employed, nature of the contaminant emission and such other information
as is relevant to air pollution and available or reasonably capable of
being assembled. In the case of emissions of greenhouse gases as
defined in RCW 70.235.010 the department shall adopt rules requiring
reporting of those emissions. The department or board may require that
such registration or reporting be accompanied by a fee, and may
determine the amount of such fee for such class or classes: PROVIDED,
That the amount of the fee shall only be to compensate for the costs of
administering such registration or reporting program which shall be
defined as initial registration and annual or other periodic reports
from the source owner providing information directly related to air
pollution registration, on-site inspections necessary to verify
compliance with registration requirements, data storage and retrieval
systems necessary for support of the registration program, emission
inventory reports and emission reduction credits computed from
information provided by sources pursuant to registration program
requirements, staff review, including engineering or other reliable
analysis for accuracy and currentness, of information provided by
sources pursuant to registration program requirements, clerical and
other office support provided in direct furtherance of the registration
program, and administrative support provided in directly carrying out
the registration program: PROVIDED FURTHER, That any such registration
made with either the board or the department shall preclude a further
registration and reporting with any other board or the department,
except that emissions of greenhouse gases as defined in RCW 70.235.010
must be reported as required under subsection (5) of this section.
All registration program and reporting fees collected by the
department shall be deposited in the air pollution control account.
All registration program fees collected by the local air authorities
shall be deposited in their respective treasuries.
(3) If a registration or report has been filed for a grain
warehouse or grain elevator as required under this section,
registration, reporting, or a registration program fee shall not, after
January 1, 1997, again be required under this section for the warehouse
or elevator unless the capacity of the warehouse or elevator as listed
as part of the license issued for the facility has been increased since
the date the registration or reporting was last made. If the capacity
of the warehouse or elevator listed as part of the license is
increased, any registration or reporting required for the warehouse or
elevator under this section must be made by the date the warehouse or
elevator receives grain from the first harvest season that occurs after
the increase in its capacity is listed in the license.
This subsection does not apply to a grain warehouse or grain
elevator if the warehouse or elevator handles more than ten million
bushels of grain annually.
(4) For the purposes of subsection (3) of this section:
(a) A "grain warehouse" or "grain elevator" is an establishment
classified in standard industrial classification (SIC) code 5153 for
wholesale trade for which a license is required and includes, but is
not limited to, such a licensed facility that also conducts cleaning
operations for grain;
(b) A "license" is a license issued by the department of
agriculture licensing a facility as a grain warehouse or grain elevator
under chapter 22.09 RCW or a license issued by the federal government
licensing a facility as a grain warehouse or grain elevator for
purposes similar to those of licensure for the facility under chapter
22.09 RCW; and
(c) "Grain" means a grain or a pulse.
(5)(a) The department shall adopt rules requiring the reporting of
emissions of greenhouse gases as defined in RCW 70.235.010. The rules
must include a de minimis amount of emissions below which reporting
will not be required for both indirect and direct emissions. The rules
must require that emissions of greenhouse gases resulting from the
burning of fossil fuels be reported separately from emissions of
greenhouse gases resulting from the burning of biomass. Except as
provided in (b) of this subsection, the department shall, under the
authority granted in subsection (1) of this section, adopt rules
requiring any owner or operator: (i) Of a fleet of on-road motor
vehicles that as a fleet emit at least twenty-five hundred metric tons
of greenhouse gas annually in the state to report the emissions of
greenhouse gases generated from or emitted by that fleet; or (ii) of a
source or combination of sources that emit at least ten thousand metric
tons of greenhouse gas annually in the state to report their total
annual emissions of greenhouse gases. In calculating emissions of
greenhouse gases for purposes of determining whether or not reporting
is required, only direct emissions shall be included. For purposes of
reporting emissions of greenhouse gases in chapter 14, Laws of 2008,
"source" means any stationary source as defined in RCW 70.94.030, or
mobile source used for transportation of people or cargo. The
emissions of greenhouse gases must be reported as carbon dioxide
equivalents. The rules must require that persons report 2009 emissions
starting in 2010. The rules must establish an annual reporting
schedule that takes into account the time needed to allow the owner or
operator reporting emissions of greenhouse gases to gather the
information needed and to verify the emissions being reported.
However, in no event may reports be submitted later than October 31st
of the year in which the report is due. The department may phase in
the reporting requirements for sources or combinations of sources under
(a)(ii) of this subsection until the reporting threshold is met, which
must be met by January 1, 2012. The department may from time to time
amend the rules to include other persons that emit less than the annual
greenhouse gas emissions levels set out in this subsection if necessary
to comply with any federal reporting requirements for emissions of
greenhouse gases.
(b) In its rules, the department may defer the reporting
requirement under (a) of this subsection for emissions associated with
interstate and international commercial aircraft, rail, truck, or
marine vessels until (i) there is a federal requirement to report these
emissions; or (ii) the department finds that there is a generally
accepted reporting protocol for determining interstate emissions from
these sources.
(c) The department shall share any reporting information reported
to it with the local air authority in which the owner or operator
reporting under the rules adopted by the department operates.
(d) Except for owners and operators required to report greenhouse
gas emissions to the United States environmental protection agency
under 40 C.F.R. Part 98, as adopted on September 22, 2009, the fee
provisions in subsection (2) of this section apply to reporting of
emissions of greenhouse gases. Owners and operators required to report
under (a) of this subsection who fail to report or pay the fee required
in subsection (2) of this section are subject to enforcement penalties
under this chapter. The department shall enforce the reporting rule
requirements unless it approves a local air authority's request to
enforce the requirements for sources operating within the authority's
jurisdiction.
(e) The energy facility site evaluation council shall,
simultaneously with the department, adopt rules that impose greenhouse
gas reporting requirements in site certifications on owners or
operators of a facility permitted by the energy facility site
evaluation council. The greenhouse gas reporting requirements imposed
by the energy facility site evaluation council must be the same as the
greenhouse gas reporting requirements imposed by the department. The
department shall share any information reported to it from facilities
permitted by the energy facility site evaluation council with the
council, including notice of a facility that has failed to report as
required. The energy facility site evaluation council shall contract
with the department to monitor the reporting requirements adopted under
this section.
(f) In developing its rules, the department shall, with the
assistance of the department of transportation, identify a mechanism to
report an aggregate estimate of the annual emissions of greenhouse
gases generated from or emitted by otherwise unreported on-road motor
vehicles.
(g) The inclusion or failure to include any person, source, classes
of persons or sources, or types of emissions of greenhouse gases into
the department's rules for reporting under this section does not
indicate whether such a person, source, or category is appropriate for
inclusion in the multisector market-based system designed under RCW
((70.235.020)) 70.235.030.
(h) Owners and operators who are required to report greenhouse gas
emissions to the United States environmental protection agency under 40
C.F.R. Part 98, as adopted on September 22, 2009, may submit their
report concurrently to the United States environmental protection
agency and to the department to satisfy the reporting requirements
under this section.
(i) Should the federal government adopt rules sufficient to track
progress toward the emissions reductions required by chapter 14, Laws
of 2008 governing the reporting of greenhouse gases, the department
shall amend its rules, as necessary, to seek consistency with the
federal rules to ensure duplicate reporting is not required. Nothing
in this section requires the department to increase the reporting
threshold established in (a) of this subsection or otherwise require
the department's rules be identical to the federal rules in scope.
(((i))) (j) The definitions in RCW 70.235.010 apply throughout this
subsection (5) unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

--- END ---