BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that significant
changes have been made in recent years to improve Washington's
mathematics standards. Additional mathematics coursework, at a more
rigorous level, will be required for high school graduation. However,
efforts to increase the rigor of middle and high school mathematics
will ultimately not be successful unless students in elementary school
are more engaged and better prepared in mathematics. Success in this
objective is more likely to occur, and in a shorter time frame, if
students have the opportunity to receive instruction from a teacher
with special skills in both mathematics content and instructional
strategies focused on the learning needs of elementary students. At
least seven other states, including Michigan, Ohio, Virginia, and
Arizona, have created an endorsement for elementary mathematics
teachers. Therefore, the legislature intends to provide for both a
staffing allocation and an endorsement pathway for elementary
mathematics specialists to be deployed in schools.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.150.260 and 2009 c 548 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
The purpose of this section is to provide for the allocation of
state funding that the legislature deems necessary to support school
districts in offering the minimum instructional program of basic
education under RCW 28A.150.220. The allocation shall be determined as
follows:
(1) The governor shall and the superintendent of public instruction
may recommend to the legislature a formula for the distribution of a
basic education instructional allocation for each common school
district.
(2) The distribution formula under this section shall be for
allocation purposes only. Except as may be required under chapter
28A.165, 28A.180, or 28A.155 RCW, or federal laws and regulations,
nothing in this section requires school districts to use basic
education instructional funds to implement a particular instructional
approach or service. Nothing in this section requires school districts
to maintain a particular classroom teacher-to-student ratio or other
staff-to-student ratio or to use allocated funds to pay for particular
types or classifications of staff. Nothing in this section entitles an
individual teacher to a particular teacher planning period.
(3)(a) To the extent the technical details of the formula have been
adopted by the legislature, the distribution formula for the basic
education instructional allocation shall be based on minimum staffing
and nonstaff costs the legislature deems necessary to support
instruction and operations in prototypical schools serving high,
middle, and elementary school students as provided in this section.
The use of prototypical schools for the distribution formula does not
constitute legislative intent that schools should be operated or
structured in a similar fashion as the prototypes. Prototypical
schools illustrate the level of resources needed to operate a school of
a particular size with particular types and grade levels of students
using commonly understood terms and inputs, such as class size, hours
of instruction, and various categories of school staff. It is the
intent that the funding allocations to school districts be adjusted
from the school prototypes based on the actual number of annual average
full-time equivalent students in each grade level at each school in the
district and not based on the grade-level configuration of the school
to the extent that data is available. The allocations shall be further
adjusted from the school prototypes with minimum allocations for small
schools and to reflect other factors identified in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(b) For the purposes of this section, prototypical schools are
defined as follows:
(i) A prototypical high school has six hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in grades nine through twelve;
(ii) A prototypical middle school has four hundred thirty-two
average annual full-time equivalent students in grades seven and eight;
and
(iii) A prototypical elementary school has four hundred average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through
six.
(c) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school
shall be based on the number of full-time equivalent classroom teachers
needed to provide instruction over the minimum required annual
instructional hours under RCW 28A.150.220 and provide at least one
teacher planning period per school day, and based on an average class
size as specified in the omnibus appropriations act. The omnibus
appropriations act shall at a minimum specify:
(i) Basic average class size;
(ii) Basic average class size in schools where more than fifty
percent of the students are eligible for free and reduced-price meals;
(iii) Average class size for exploratory and preparatory career and
technical education, laboratory science, advanced placement, and
international baccalaureate courses; and
(iv) Average class size in grades kindergarten through three.
(d) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school
shall include allocations for the following types of staff in addition
to classroom teachers:
(i) Principals, including assistant principals, and other
certificated building-level administrators;
(ii) Teacher librarians, performing functions including information
literacy, technology, and media to support school library media
programs;
(iii) Student health services, a function that includes school
nurses, whether certificated instructional or classified employee, and
social workers;
(iv) Guidance counselors, performing functions including parent
outreach and graduation advisor;
(v) Professional development coaches, such as elementary
mathematics specialists described in section 3 of this act;
(vi) Teaching assistance, which includes any aspect of educational
instructional services provided by classified employees;
(vii) Office support, technology support, and other
noninstructional aides;
(viii) Custodians, warehouse, maintenance, laborer, and
professional and technical education support employees; and
(ix) Classified staff providing student and staff safety.
(4)(a) The minimum allocation for each school district shall
include allocations per annual average full-time equivalent student for
the following materials, supplies, and operating costs: Student
technology; utilities; curriculum, textbooks, library materials, and
instructional supplies; instructional professional development for both
certificated and classified staff; other building-level costs including
maintenance, custodial, and security; and central office
administration.
(b) The annual average full-time equivalent student amounts in (a)
of this subsection shall be enhanced based on full-time equivalent
student enrollment in exploratory career and technical education
courses for students in grades seven through twelve; laboratory science
courses for students in grades nine through twelve; preparatory career
and technical education courses for students in grades nine through
twelve offered in a high school; and preparatory career and technical
education courses for students in grades eleven and twelve offered
through a skill center.
(5) The allocations provided under subsections (3) and (4) of this
section shall be enhanced as follows to provide additional allocations
for classroom teachers and maintenance, supplies, and operating costs:
(a) To provide supplemental instruction and services for
underachieving students through the learning assistance program under
RCW 28A.165.005 through 28A.165.065, allocations shall be based on the
percent of students in each school who are eligible for free and
reduced-price meals. The minimum allocation for the learning
assistance program shall provide an extended school day and extended
school year for each level of prototypical school and a per student
allocation for maintenance, supplies, and operating costs.
(b) To provide supplemental instruction and services for students
whose primary language is other than English, allocations shall be
based on the number of students in each school who are eligible for and
enrolled in the transitional bilingual instruction program under RCW
28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080. The minimum allocation for each level
of prototypical school shall provide for supplemental instruction based
on percent of the school day a student is assumed to receive
supplemental instruction and a per student allocation for maintenance,
supplies, and operating costs.
(6) The allocations provided under subsections (3) and (4) of this
section shall be enhanced to provide additional allocations to support
programs for highly capable students under RCW 28A.185.010 through
28A.185.030, based on two and three hundred fourteen one-thousandths
percent of each school district's full-time equivalent enrollment. The
minimum allocation for the programs shall provide an extended school
day and extended school year for each level of prototypical school and
a per student allocation for maintenance, supplies, and operating
costs.
(7) The allocations under subsections (3)(b), (c)(i), and (d), (4),
and (8) of this section shall be enhanced as provided under RCW
28A.150.390 on an excess cost basis to provide supplemental
instructional resources for students with disabilities.
(8) The distribution formula shall include allocations to school
districts to support certificated and classified staffing of central
office administration. The minimum allocation shall be calculated as
a percentage, identified in the omnibus appropriations act, of the
total allocations for staff under subsections (3) and (6) of this
section for all schools in the district.
(9)(a) For the purposes of allocations for prototypical high
schools and middle schools under subsections (3) and (5) of this
section that are based on the percent of students in the school who are
eligible for free and reduced-price meals, the actual percent of such
students in a school shall be adjusted by a factor identified in the
omnibus appropriations act to reflect underreporting of free and
reduced-price meal eligibility among middle and high school students.
(b) Allocations or enhancements provided under subsections (3) and
(4) of this section for exploratory and preparatory career and
technical education courses shall be provided only for courses approved
by the office of the superintendent of public instruction under chapter
28A.700 RCW.
(10)(a) This formula for distribution of basic education funds
shall be reviewed biennially by the superintendent and governor. The
recommended formula shall be subject to approval, amendment or
rejection by the legislature.
(b) In the event the legislature rejects the distribution formula
recommended by the governor, without adopting a new distribution
formula, the distribution formula for the previous school year shall
remain in effect.
(c) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average
number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as
provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the first school day of each
month, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW
28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing
school district. The definition of full-time equivalent student shall
be determined by rules of the superintendent of public instruction and
shall be included as part of the superintendent's biennial budget
request. The definition shall be based on the minimum instructional
hour offerings required under RCW 28A.150.220. Any revision of the
present definition shall not take effect until approved by the house
ways and means committee and the senate ways and means committee.
(d) The office of financial management shall make a monthly review
of the superintendent's reported full-time equivalent students in the
common schools in conjunction with RCW 43.62.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The professional educator standards board shall develop
standards for and adopt a specialty endorsement for elementary
mathematics specialists by July 1, 2011.
(2) An elementary mathematics specialist is a certificated
elementary teacher with a specialty endorsement under this section. An
elementary mathematics specialist may provide direct instruction to
students using an itinerant teacher model where the specialist rotates
from classroom to classroom within the school, or may serve as a coach
by demonstrating best practices to the regularly assigned classroom
teacher using a researched-based coaching model. The legislature
encourages school districts to give a priority to schools with large
numbers of students who are struggling in mathematics when assigning
elementary mathematics specialists and to use a model that best meets
the needs of the school.
(3) The standards shall include demonstration of enhanced
mathematics content knowledge and skills necessary to coach teachers
endorsed in elementary education in:
(a) Providing students in grades kindergarten through six with deep
knowledge and understanding of the essential academic learning
requirements in mathematics;
(b) Demonstrating knowledge and skills in a variety of
instructional strategies designed to engage elementary students in
learning mathematics and encourage them to enjoy and be interested in
the subject; and
(c) Demonstrating knowledge and skills in instructional strategies
targeted for students struggling with mathematics.
(4) To the maximum extent possible, the additional knowledge and
skills for the specialty endorsement under this section shall be
performance-based and require a minimum of additional coursework. To
the extent possible, any coursework required should be widely
accessible to elementary teachers across the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 2 of this act takes effect September
1, 2011.

--- END ---