BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state
institutions of higher education are providing a high quality education
to the citizens of the state. The legislature further finds that to
meet goals of the strategic master plan for higher education the state
needs a higher education system that is capable of delivering many more
degrees. The legislature also finds that expansion of the system
should be based on the proven demands of the citizens and the
marketplace, a concept called "expand on demand." The legislature
further finds that the higher education coordinating board, in
collaboration with the state board for community and technical
colleges, the two-year and four-year institutions of higher education,
and other stakeholders developed a system design plan that contains
seven guiding principles for system expansion, focuses near-term
enrollment growth at university branch campuses, comprehensive
universities, and university centers where existing capacity is
available without new state capital investment, establishes a process
for evaluating major new capital expansion, and creates a fund for
innovation to foster change and innovation in higher education
delivery. The legislature finds that the strategies in the plan
support the concept of expand on demand and would increase degree
production by first reinvesting in higher education to use existing
capacity while also providing long-term strategies to guide decisions
on when and where to build new campuses, significantly expand existing
sites, and change missions of existing institutions.
The legislature endorses the system design plan, approved by the
higher education coordinating board in November 2009, and adopts the
recommendations and strategies in the plan.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.50.020 and 2009 c 64 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The purpose of this chapter is to provide for the dramatically
increasing number of students requiring high standards of education
either as a part of the continuing higher education program or for
occupational education and training, or for adult basic skills and
literacy education, by creating a new, independent system of community
and technical colleges which will:
(1) Offer an open door to every citizen, regardless of his or her
academic background or experience, at a cost normally within his or her
economic means;
(2) Ensure that each college district shall offer thoroughly
comprehensive educational, training, and service programs to meet the
needs of both the communities and students served by combining high
standards of excellence in academic transfer courses; realistic and
practical courses in occupational education, both graded and ungraded;
community services of an educational, cultural, and recreational
nature; and adult education, including basic skills and general,
family, and workforce literacy programs and services;
(3) Provide for basic skills and literacy education, and
occupational education and technical training at technical colleges in
order to prepare students for careers in a competitive workforce;
(4) Provide or coordinate related and supplemental instruction for
apprentices at community and technical colleges;
(5) Provide administration by state and local boards which will
avoid unnecessary duplication of facilities or programs; and which will
encourage efficiency in operation and creativity and imagination in
education, training, and service to meet the needs of the community and
students;
(6) Allow for the growth, improvement, flexibility and modification
of the community colleges and their education, training, and service
programs as future needs occur; and
(7) Establish firmly that((, except on a pilot basis)) as provided
under RCW 28B.50.810, community colleges are, for purposes of academic
training, two year institutions, and are an independent, unique, and
vital section of our state's higher education system, separate from
both the common school system and other institutions of higher
learning((, and never to be considered for conversion into four-year
liberal arts colleges)).

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.50.810 and 2008 c 166 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((By April 2006,)) The college board ((shall)) may select
((four)) community or technical colleges to develop and offer programs
of study leading to ((an)) applied baccalaureate degrees. ((At least
one of the four pilot programs chosen must lead to a baccalaureate of
applied science degree which builds on an associate of applied science
degree. The college board shall convene a task force that includes
representatives of both the community and technical colleges to develop
objective selection criteria.
(2) By February 2008, the college board shall select up to three
colleges to develop and offer programs of study leading to an applied
baccalaureate degree. At least one of the colleges selected must be a
technical college. The college board shall use the objective selection
criteria developed under subsections (1) and (3) of this section to
make the selection.
(3))) Colleges may submit ((an)) applications to ((become a pilot
college under this section)) the college board. The college board and
the higher education coordinating board shall review the applications
and select the ((pilot)) colleges using objective criteria, including,
but not limited to:
(a) The college demonstrates the capacity to make a long-term
commitment of resources to build and sustain a high quality program;
(b) The college has or can readily engage faculty appropriately
qualified to develop and deliver a high quality curriculum at the
baccalaureate level;
(c) The college can demonstrate demand for the proposed program
from a sufficient number of students within its service area to make
the program cost-effective and feasible to operate;
(d) The college can demonstrate that employers demand the level of
technical training proposed within the program, making it cost-effective for students to seek the degree; and
(e) The proposed program fills a gap in options available for
students because it is not offered by a public four-year institution of
higher education in the college's geographic area.
(((4))) (2) A college selected ((as a pilot college)) under this
section may develop the curriculum for and design and deliver courses
leading to an applied baccalaureate degree. However, degree programs
developed under this section are subject to approval by the college
board under RCW 28B.50.090 and by the higher education coordinating
board under RCW 28B.76.230 before a ((pilot)) college may enroll
students in upper division courses. ((A pilot college approved under
subsection (1) of this section may not enroll students in upper
division courses before the fall academic quarter of 2006. A pilot
college approved under subsection (2) of this section may not enroll
students in upper division courses before the fall academic quarter of
2009.))

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.76.020 and 1985 c 370 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((For the purposes of this chapter:)) The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the higher education coordinating board((; and)).
(2) "Four-year institutions" means the University of Washington,
Washington State University, Central Washington University, Eastern
Washington University, Western Washington University, and The Evergreen
State College.
(3) "Major expansion" means expansion of the higher education
system that requires significant new capital investment, including
building new institutions, campuses, branches, or centers or
significant expansion of existing campuses, branches, or centers.
(4) "Mission change" means a change in the level of degree awarded
or institutional type not currently authorized in statute.

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.76.230 and 2005 c 258 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall develop a comprehensive and ongoing assessment
process to analyze the need for additional degrees and programs,
additional off-campus centers and locations for degree programs, and
consolidation or elimination of programs by the four-year institutions.
Major expansion and proposed mission changes may be proposed by the
board, any public institution of higher education, or by a state or
local government.
(2) As part of the needs assessment process, the board shall
examine:
(a) Projections of student, employer, and community demand for
education and degrees, including liberal arts degrees, on a regional
and statewide basis;
(b) Current and projected degree programs and enrollment at public
and private institutions of higher education, by location and mode of
service delivery; and
(c) Data from the workforce training and education coordinating
board and the state board for community and technical colleges on the
supply and demand for workforce education and certificates and
associate degrees.
(3) Every two years the board shall produce, jointly with the state
board for community and technical colleges and the workforce training
and education coordinating board, an assessment of the number and type
of higher education and training credentials required to match employer
demand for a skilled and educated workforce. The assessment shall
include the number of forecasted net job openings at each level of
higher education and training and the number of credentials needed to
match the forecast of net job openings.
(4) The board shall determine whether certain major lines of study
or types of degrees, including applied degrees or research-oriented
degrees, shall be assigned uniquely to some institutions or
institutional sectors in order to create centers of excellence that
focus resources and expertise.
(5) The following activities are subject to approval by the board:
(a) New degree programs by a four-year institution;
(b) Creation of any off-campus program by a four-year institution;
(c) Purchase or lease of major off-campus facilities by a four-year
institution or a community or technical college;
(d) Creation of higher education centers and consortia;
(e) New degree programs and creation of off-campus programs by an
independent college or university in collaboration with a community or
technical college; and
(f) Applied baccalaureate degree programs developed by colleges
under RCW 28B.50.810.
(6) Institutions seeking board approval under this section must
demonstrate that the proposal is justified by the needs assessment
developed under this section. Institutions must also demonstrate how
the proposals align with or implement the statewide strategic master
plan for higher education under RCW 28B.76.200.
(7) The board shall develop clear guidelines and objective
decision-making criteria regarding approval of proposals under this
section, which must include review and consultation with the
institution and other interested agencies and individuals.
(8) The board shall periodically recommend consolidation or
elimination of programs at the four-year institutions, based on the
needs assessment analysis.
(9) In the case of a proposed major expansion or mission change,
the needs assessment process under subsection (2) of this section
constitutes a threshold inquiry. If the board determines that the need
for the proposed major expansion or mission change has not been
justified, the inquiry is concluded. If the board determines that the
need for the proposed major expansion or mission change has been
sufficiently established, the board, in consultation with any directly
involved institutions and other interested agencies and individuals,
shall proceed to examine the viability of the proposal using criteria
including, but not limited to:
(a) The specific scope of the project including the capital
investment requirements, the number of full-time equivalent students
anticipated, and the number of academic programs planned;
(b) The existence of an efficient and sustainable financial plan;
(c) The extent to which existing resources can be leveraged;
(d) The current and five-year projected student population,
faculty, and staff to support the proposed programs, institution, or
innovation;
(e) The plans to accommodate expected growth over a twenty-year
time frame;
(f) The extent to which new or existing partnerships and
collaborations are a part of the proposal; and
(g) The feasibility of any proposed innovations to accelerate
degree production.
(10) After the board completes its evaluation of the proposed major
expansion or mission change using the needs assessment under subsection
(2) of this section and viability determination under subsection (9) of
this section, the board shall make a recommendation to either proceed,
modify, or not proceed with the proposed major expansion or mission
change. The board's recommendation shall be presented to the governor
and the legislature.

Sec. 6 RCW 28B.120.005 and 1999 c 169 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds that encouraging collaboration among the
various educational sectors to meet statewide productivity and
educational attainment needs as described in the system design plan
developed by the higher education coordinating board will strengthen
the entire educational system, kindergarten through twelfth grade and
higher education. The legislature also recognizes that the most
effective way to develop innovative and collaborative programs is to
encourage institutions to develop them voluntarily, in line with
established state goals. Through a system of competitive grants, the
legislature shall encourage the development of innovative and
collaborative and cost-effective solutions to issues of critical
statewide need, including:
(1) Raising educational attainment and planning and piloting
innovative initiatives to reach new locations and populations;
(2) Recognizing needs of special populations of students, including
access and completion efforts targeting underrepresented populations;
(((2))) (3) Furthering the development of learner-centered,
technology-assisted course delivery, including expansion of online and
hybrid coursework, open courseware, and other uses of technology;
(((3))) (4) Furthering the development of competency-based
measurements of student achievement to be used as the basis for
awarding degrees and certificates; ((and
(4))) (5) Increasing the collaboration among both public and
private sector institutions of higher education; and
(6) Improving productivity through innovations such as accelerated
programs and alternative scheduling.

Sec. 7 RCW 28B.120.010 and 1999 c 169 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
The Washington fund for innovation and quality in higher education
program is established. The higher education coordinating board shall
administer the program ((for the purpose of awarding grants in which a
four-year institution of higher education is named as the lead
institution. The state board for community and technical colleges
shall administer the program for the purpose of awarding grants in
which a community or technical college is named as the lead
institution)) and shall work in close collaboration with the state
board for community and technical colleges and other local and regional
entities. Through this program the higher education coordinating
board((s)) may award on a competitive basis incentive grants to state
public or private nonprofit institutions of higher education or
consortia of institutions to encourage ((cooperative)) programs
designed to address specific system problems. ((Grants shall not
exceed a two-year period.)) Each institution or consortia of
institutions receiving the award shall contribute some financial
support, either by covering part of the costs for the program during
its implementation, or by assuming continuing support at the end of the
grant period. ((Strong priority will be given to proposals that
involve more than one sector of education, and to proposals that show
substantive institutional commitment.)) Institutions are encouraged to
solicit nonstate funds to support these cooperative programs.

Sec. 8 RCW 28B.120.020 and 1999 c 169 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The higher education coordinating board shall have the following
powers and duties in administering the program for those proposals in
which a four-year institution of higher education is named as the lead
institution and fiscal agent:
(1) To adopt rules necessary to carry out the program;
(2) ((To establish one or more review committees to assist in the
evaluation of proposals for funding. The review committee shall
include individuals with significant experience in higher education in
areas relevant to one or more of the funding period priorities and
shall include representatives from both the four-year and two-year
sectors of higher education;
(3))) To award grants no later than September 1st in those years
when funding is available by June 30th;
(((4))) (3) To establish each biennium specific guidelines for
submitting grant proposals consistent with RCW 28B.120.005 and
consistent with the strategic master plan for higher education, the
system design plan, the overall goals of the program and ((consistent
with)) the guidelines established by the state board for community and
technical colleges under RCW 28B.120.025. ((During the 1999-01
biennium the guidelines shall be consistent with the following desired
outcomes of:
(a) Minority and diversity initiatives that encourage the
participation of minorities in higher education, including students
with disabilities;
(b) K-12 teacher preparation models that encourage collaboration
between higher education and K-12 to improve the preparedness of
teachers, including provisions for higher education faculty involved
with teacher preparation to spend time teaching in K-12 schools;
(c) Collaborative instructional programs involving K-12, community
and technical colleges, and four-year institutions of higher education
to develop a three-year degree program, or reduce the time to degree;
(d) Contracts with public or private institutions or businesses to
provide services or the development of collaborative programs;
(e) Articulation and transfer activities to smooth the transfer of
students from K-12 to higher education, or from the community colleges
and technical colleges to four-year institutions;
(f) Projects that further the development of learner-centered,
technology-assisted course delivery; and
(g) Projects that further the development of competency-based
measurements of student achievement to be used as the basis for
awarding degrees and certificates.))
After June 30, 2001, and each biennium thereafter, the board shall
determine funding priorities for ((collaborative)) proposals for the
biennium in consultation with the governor, the legislature, the office
of the superintendent of public instruction, the state board for
community and technical colleges, the workforce training and education
coordinating board, higher education institutions, educational
associations, and business and community groups consistent with
statewide needs;
(((5))) (4) To solicit grant proposals and provide information to
the institutions of higher education about the program; and
(((6))) (5) To establish reporting, evaluation, accountability,
monitoring, and dissemination requirements for the recipients of the
grants awarded by the higher education coordinating board.

--- END ---