BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 25.15.070 and 1994 c 211 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In order to form a limited liability company, one or more
persons must execute a certificate of formation. The certificate of
formation shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state and
set forth:
(a) The name of the limited liability company;
(b) The address of the registered office and the name and address
of the registered agent for service of process required to be
maintained by RCW 25.15.020;
(c) The address of the principal place of business of the limited
liability company;
(d) If the limited liability company is to have a specific date of
dissolution, the latest date on which the limited liability company is
to dissolve;
(e) If management of the limited liability company is vested in a
manager or managers, a statement to that effect;
(f) Any other matters the members decide to include therein; and
(g) The name and address of each person executing the certificate
of formation.
(2) Effect of filing:
(a) Unless a delayed effective date is specified, a limited
liability company is formed when its certificate of formation is filed
by the secretary of state. A delayed effective date for a certificate
of formation may be no later than the ninetieth day after the date it
is filed.
(b) The secretary of state's filing of the certificate of formation
is conclusive proof that the persons executing the certificate
satisfied all conditions precedent to the formation ((except in a
proceeding by the state to cancel the certificate)).
(c) A limited liability company formed under this chapter shall be
a separate legal entity((, the existence of which as a separate legal
entity shall continue until cancellation of the limited liability
company's certificate of formation)).

Sec. 2 RCW 25.15.085 and 2002 c 74 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each document required by this chapter to be filed in the
office of the secretary of state shall be executed in the following
manner, or in compliance with the rules established to facilitate
electronic filing under RCW 25.15.007, except as set forth in RCW
25.15.105(4)(b):
(a) Each original certificate of formation must be signed by the
person or persons forming the limited liability company;
(b) A reservation of name may be signed by any person;
(c) A transfer of reservation of name must be signed by, or on
behalf of, the applicant for the reserved name;
(d) A registration of name must be signed by any member or manager
of the foreign limited liability company;
(e) A certificate of amendment or restatement must be signed by at
least one manager, or by a member if management of the limited
liability company is reserved to the members;
(f) A certificate of ((cancellation)) dissolution must be signed by
the person or persons authorized to wind up the limited liability
company's affairs pursuant to RCW 25.15.295(((1))) (3);
(g) If a surviving domestic limited liability company is filing
articles of merger, the articles of merger must be signed by at least
one manager, or by a member if management of the limited liability
company is reserved to the members, or if the articles of merger are
being filed by a surviving foreign limited liability company, limited
partnership, or corporation, the articles of merger must be signed by
a person authorized by such foreign limited liability company, limited
partnership, or corporation; and
(h) A foreign limited liability company's application for
registration as a foreign limited liability company doing business
within the state must be signed by any member or manager of the foreign
limited liability company.
(2) Any person may sign a certificate, articles of merger, limited
liability company agreement, or other document by an attorney-in-fact
or other person acting in a valid representative capacity, so long as
each document signed in such manner identifies the capacity in which
the signator signed.
(3) The person executing the document shall sign it and state
beneath or opposite the signature the name of the person and capacity
in which the person signs. The document must be typewritten or
printed, and must meet such legibility or other standards as may be
prescribed by the secretary of state.
(4) The execution of a certificate or articles of merger by any
person constitutes an affirmation under the penalties of perjury that
the facts stated therein are true.

Sec. 3 RCW 25.15.095 and 2002 c 74 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The original signed copy, together with a duplicate copy that
may be either a signed, photocopied, or conformed copy, of the
certificate of formation or any other document required to be filed
pursuant to this chapter, except as set forth under RCW 25.15.105 or
unless a duplicate is not required under rules adopted under RCW
25.15.007, shall be delivered to the secretary of state. If the
secretary of state determines that the documents conform to the filing
provisions of this chapter, he or she shall, when all required filing
fees have been paid:
(a) Endorse on each signed original and duplicate copy the word
"filed" and the date of its acceptance for filing;
(b) Retain the signed original in the secretary of state's files;
and
(c) Return the duplicate copy to the person who filed it or the
person's representative.
(2) If the secretary of state is unable to make the determination
required for filing by subsection (1) of this section at the time any
documents are delivered for filing, the documents are deemed to have
been filed at the time of delivery if the secretary of state
subsequently determines that:
(a) The documents as delivered conform to the filing provisions of
this chapter; or
(b) Within twenty days after notification of nonconformance is
given by the secretary of state to the person who delivered the
documents for filing or the person's representative, the documents are
brought into conformance.
(3) If the filing and determination requirements of this chapter
are not satisfied completely within the time prescribed in subsection
(2)(b) of this section, the documents shall not be filed.
(4) Upon the filing of a certificate of amendment (or judicial
decree of amendment) or restated certificate in the office of the
secretary of state, or upon the future effective date or time of a
certificate of amendment (or judicial decree thereof) or restated
certificate, as provided for therein, the certificate of formation
shall be amended or restated as set forth therein. ((Upon the filing
of a certificate of cancellation (or a judicial decree thereof), or
articles of merger which act as a certificate of cancellation, or upon
the future effective date or time of a certificate of cancellation (or
a judicial decree thereof) or of articles of merger which act as a
certificate of cancellation, as provided for therein, or as specified
in RCW 25.15.290, the certificate of formation is canceled.))

Sec. 4 RCW 25.15.270 and 2009 c 437 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A limited liability company is dissolved and its affairs shall be
wound up upon the first to occur of the following:
(1)(a) The dissolution date, if any, specified in the certificate
of formation. If a dissolution date is not specified in the
certificate of formation, the limited liability company's existence
will continue until the first to occur of the events described in
subsections (2) through (6) of this section. If a dissolution date is
specified in the certificate of formation, the certificate of formation
may be amended and the existence of the limited liability company may
be extended by vote of all the members.
(b) This subsection does not apply to a limited liability company
formed under RCW 30.08.025 or 32.08.025;
(2) The happening of events specified in a limited liability
company agreement;
(3) The written consent of all members;
(4) Unless the limited liability company agreement provides
otherwise, ninety days following an event of dissociation of the last
remaining member, unless those having the rights of assignees in the
limited liability company under RCW 25.15.130(1) have, by the ninetieth
day, voted to admit one or more members, voting as though they were
members, and in the manner set forth in RCW 25.15.120(1);
(5) The entry of a decree of judicial dissolution under RCW
25.15.275; or
(6) The ((expiration of five years after the effective date of
dissolution under RCW 25.15.285 without the reinstatement))
administrative dissolution of the limited liability company by the
secretary of state under RCW 25.15.285(2), unless the limited liability
company is reinstated by the secretary of state under RCW 25.15.290.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 25.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) After dissolution occurs under RCW 25.15.270, the limited
liability company may deliver to the secretary of state for filing a
certificate of dissolution signed in accordance with RCW 25.15.085.
(2) A certificate of dissolution filed under subsection (1) of this
section must set forth:
(a) The name of the limited liability company; and
(b) A statement that the limited liability company is dissolved
under RCW 25.15.270.

Sec. 6 RCW 25.15.290 and 2009 c 437 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A limited liability company that has been administratively
dissolved under RCW 25.15.285 may apply to the secretary of state for
reinstatement within five years after the effective date of
dissolution. The application must be delivered to the secretary of
state for filing and state:
(a) ((Recite)) The name of the limited liability company and the
effective date of its administrative dissolution;
(b) ((State)) That the ground or grounds for dissolution either did
not exist or have been eliminated; and
(c) ((State)) That the limited liability company's name satisfies
the requirements of RCW 25.15.010.
(2) If the secretary of state determines that ((the)) an
application contains the information required by subsection (1) of this
section and that the name is available, the secretary of state shall
reinstate the limited liability company and give the limited liability
company written notice, as provided in RCW 25.15.285(1), of the
reinstatement that recites the effective date of reinstatement. If the
name is not available, the limited liability company must file with its
application for reinstatement an amendment to its certificate of
formation reflecting a change of name.
(3) When ((the)) reinstatement ((is)) becomes effective, it relates
back to and takes effect as of the effective date of the administrative
dissolution and the limited liability company may resume carrying on
its ((business)) activities as if the administrative dissolution had
never occurred.
(((4) If an application for reinstatement is not made within the
five-year period set forth in subsection (1) of this section, or if the
application made within this period is not granted, the limited
liability company's certificate of formation is deemed canceled.))

Sec. 7 RCW 25.15.293 and 2009 c 437 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A limited liability company ((voluntarily)) dissolved under RCW
25.15.270 (2) or (3) that has filed a certificate of dissolution under
section 5 of this act may ((apply to the secretary of state for
reinstatement)) revoke its dissolution within one hundred twenty days
((after the effective date)) of filing its certificate of dissolution.
((The application must:
(a) Recite the name of the limited liability company and the
effective date of its voluntary dissolution;
(b) State that the ground or grounds for voluntary dissolution have
been eliminated; and
(c) State that the limited liability company's name satisfies the
requirements of RCW 25.15.010.
(2) If the secretary of state determines that the application
contains the information required by subsection (1) of this section and
that the name is available, the secretary of state shall reinstate the
limited liability company and give the limited liability company
written notice of the reinstatement that recites the effective date of
reinstatement. If the name is not available, the limited liability
company must file with its application for reinstatement an amendment
to its certificate of formation reflecting a change of name.
(3) When the reinstatement is effective, it relates back to and
takes effect as of the effective date of the voluntary dissolution and
the limited liability company may resume carrying on its business as if
the voluntary dissolution had never occurred.
(4) If an application for reinstatement is not made within the one
hundred twenty-day period set forth in subsection (1) of this section,
or if the application made within this period is not granted, the
secretary of state shall cancel the limited liability company's
certificate of formation.))
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, revocation of
dissolution must be approved in the same manner as the dissolution was
approved unless that approval permitted revocation in some other
manner, in which event the dissolution may be revoked in the manner
permitted.
(b) If dissolution occurred upon the happening of events specified
in the limited liability company agreement, revocation of dissolution
must be approved in the manner necessary to amend the provisions of the
limited liability company agreement specifying the events of
dissolution.
(3) After the revocation of dissolution is approved, the limited
liability company may revoke the dissolution and the certificate of
dissolution by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a
certificate of revocation of dissolution, together with a copy of its
certificate of dissolution, that set forth:
(a) The name of the limited liability company and a statement that
the name satisfies the requirements of RCW 25.15.010; if the name is
not available, the limited liability company must file a certificate of
amendment changing its name with the certificate of revocation of
dissolution;
(b) The effective date of the dissolution that was revoked;
(c) The date that the revocation of dissolution was approved;
(d) If the limited liability company's managers revoked the
dissolution, a statement to that effect;
(e) If the limited liability company's managers revoked a
dissolution approved by the company's members, a statement that
revocation was permitted by action by the managers alone pursuant to
that approval; and
(f) If member approval was required to revoke the dissolution, a
statement that revocation of the dissolution was duly approved by the
members in accordance with subsection (2) of this section.
(4) Revocation of dissolution and revocation of the certificate of
dissolution are effective upon the filing of the certificate of
revocation of dissolution.
(5) When the revocation of dissolution and revocation of the
certificate of dissolution are effective, they relate back to and take
effect as of the effective date of the dissolution and the limited
liability company resumes carrying on its activities as if the
dissolution had never occurred.

Sec. 8 RCW 25.15.295 and 1994 c 211 s 806 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1) Unless otherwise provided in a limited liability company
agreement, a manager who has not wrongfully dissolved a limited
liability company or, if none, the members or a person approved by the
members or, if there is more than one class or group of members, then
by each class or group of members, in either case, by members
contributing, or required to contribute, more than fifty percent of the
agreed value (as stated in the records of the limited liability company
required to be kept pursuant to RCW 25.15.135) of the contributions
made, or required to be made, by all members, or by the members in each
class or group, as appropriate, may wind up the limited liability
company's affairs. The superior courts, upon cause shown, may wind up
the limited liability company's affairs upon application of any member
or manager, his or her legal representative or assignee, and in
connection therewith, may appoint a receiver.
(2) Upon dissolution of a limited liability company and until the
filing of a certificate of cancellation as provided in RCW 25.15.080,
the persons winding up the limited liability company's affairs may, in
the name of, and for and on behalf of, the limited liability company,
prosecute and defend suits, whether civil, criminal, or administrative,
gradually settle and close the limited liability company's business,
dispose of and convey the limited liability company's property,
discharge or make reasonable provision for the limited liability
company's liabilities, and distribute to the members any remaining
assets of the limited liability company.))
(1) A limited liability company continues after dissolution only
for the purpose of winding up its activities.
(2) In winding up its activities, the limited liability company:
(a) May file a certificate of dissolution with the secretary of
state to provide notice that the limited liability company is
dissolved, preserve the limited liability company's business or
property as a going concern for a reasonable time, prosecute and defend
actions and proceedings, whether civil, criminal, or administrative,
transfer the limited liability company's property, settle disputes, and
perform other necessary acts; and
(b) Shall discharge the limited liability company's liabilities,
settle and close the limited liability company's activities, and
marshal and distribute the assets of the company.
(3) Unless otherwise provided in a limited liability company
agreement, the persons responsible for managing the business and
affairs of a limited liability company under RCW 25.15.150 are
responsible for winding up the activities of a dissolved limited
liability company. If a dissolved limited liability company does not
have any managers or members, the legal representative of the last
person to have been a member may wind up the activities of the
dissolved limited liability company, in which event the legal
representative is a manager for the purposes of RCW 25.15.155.
(4) If the persons responsible for winding up the activities of a
dissolved limited liability company under subsection (3) of this
section decline or fail to wind up the limited liability company's
activities, a person to wind up the dissolved limited liability
company's activities may be appointed by the consent of the transferees
owning a majority of the rights to receive distributions as transferees
at the time consent is to be effective. A person appointed under this
subsection:
(a) Is a manager for the purposes of RCW 25.15.155; and
(b) Shall promptly amend the certificate of formation to state:
(i) The name of the person who has been appointed to wind up the
limited liability company; and
(ii) The street and mailing address of the person.
(5) The superior court may order judicial supervision of the
winding up, including the appointment of a person to wind up the
dissolved limited liability company's activities, if:
(a) On application of a member, the applicant establishes good
cause; or
(b) On application of a transferee, a limited liability company
does not have any managers or members and within a reasonable time
following the dissolution no person has been appointed pursuant to
subsection (3) or (4) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 25.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A dissolved limited liability company that has filed a
certificate of dissolution with the secretary of state may dispose of
the known claims against it by following the procedure described in
subsection (2) of this section.
(2) A dissolved limited liability company may notify its known
claimants of the dissolution in a record. The notice must:
(a) Specify the information required to be included in a known
claim;
(b) Provide a mailing address to which the known claim must be
sent;
(c) State the deadline for receipt of the known claim, which may
not be fewer than one hundred twenty days after the date the notice is
received by the claimant; and
(d) State that the known claim will be barred if not received by
the deadline.
(3) A known claim against a dissolved limited liability company is
barred if the requirements of subsection (2) of this section are met
and:
(a) The known claim is not received by the specified deadline; or
(b) In the case of a known claim that is timely received but
rejected by the dissolved limited liability company, the claimant does
not commence an action to enforce the known claim against the limited
liability company within ninety days after the receipt of the notice of
rejection.
(4) For purposes of this section, "known claim" means any claim or
liability that either:
(a)(i) Has matured sufficiently, before or after the effective date
of the dissolution, to be legally capable of assertion against the
dissolved limited liability company, whether or not the amount of the
claim or liability is known or determinable; or (ii) is unmatured,
conditional, or otherwise contingent but may subsequently arise under
any executory contract to which the dissolved limited liability company
is a party, other than under an implied or statutory warranty as to any
product manufactured, sold, distributed, or handled by the dissolved
limited liability company; and
(b) As to which the dissolved limited liability company has
knowledge of the identity and the mailing address of the holder of the
claim or liability and, in the case of a matured and legally assertable
claim or liability, actual knowledge of existing facts that either (i)
could be asserted to give rise to, or (ii) indicate an intention by the
holder to assert, such a matured claim or liability.

Sec. 10 RCW 25.15.303 and 2006 c 325 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in section 9 of this act, the dissolution of a
limited liability company does not take away or impair any remedy
available to or against that limited liability company, its managers,
or its members for any right or claim existing, or any liability
incurred at any time, whether prior to or after dissolution, unless an
action or other proceeding thereon is not commenced within three years
after the ((effective date)) filing of the certificate of dissolution.
Such an action or proceeding by or against the limited liability
company may be prosecuted or defended by the limited liability company
in its own name.

Sec. 11 RCW 25.15.340 and 1994 c 211 s 907 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A foreign limited liability company doing business in this
state may not maintain any action, suit, or proceeding in this state
until it has registered in this state, and has paid to this state all
fees and penalties for the years or parts thereof, during which it did
business in this state without having registered.
(2) Neither the failure of a foreign limited liability company to
register in this state ((does not impair)) nor the issuance of a
certificate of cancellation with respect to a foreign limited liability
company's registration in this state impairs:
(a) The validity of any contract or act of the foreign limited
liability company;
(b) The right of any other party to the contract to maintain any
action, suit, or proceeding on the contract; or
(c) ((Prevent)) The foreign limited liability company from
defending any action, suit, or proceeding in any court of this state.
(3) A member or a manager of a foreign limited liability company is
not liable for the obligations of the foreign limited liability company
solely by reason of the limited liability company's having done
business in this state without registration.

Sec. 12 RCW 25.15.805 and 1994 c 211 s 1302 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The secretary of state shall adopt rules establishing fees
which shall be charged and collected for:
(a) Filing of a certificate of formation for a domestic limited
liability company or an application for registration of a foreign
limited liability company;
(b) Filing of a certificate of ((cancellation)) dissolution for a
domestic ((or foreign)) limited liability company;
(c) Filing a certificate of cancellation for a foreign limited
liability company;
(d) Filing of a certificate of amendment or restatement for a
domestic or foreign limited liability company;
(((d))) (e) Filing an application to reserve, register, or transfer
a limited liability company name;
(((e))) (f) Filing any other certificate, statement, or report
authorized or permitted to be filed;
(((f))) (g) Copies, certified copies, certificates, service of
process filings, and expedited filings or other special services.
(2) In the establishment of a fee schedule, the secretary of state
shall, insofar as is possible and reasonable, be guided by the fee
schedule provided for corporations governed by Title 23B RCW. Fees for
copies, certified copies, certificates of record, and service of
process filings shall be as provided for in RCW 23B.01.220.
(3) All fees collected by the secretary of state shall be deposited
with the state treasurer pursuant to law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 RCW 25.15.080 (Cancellation of certificate)
and 1994 c 211 s 203 are each repealed.

--- END ---