BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In 2009, the legislature changed the name of the department of
community, trade, and economic development to the department of
commerce and directed the agency to organize around a concise core
mission aligned with the state's economic development plan and around
jobs. In accordance with that legislation, chapter 565, Laws of 2009,
in November 2009 the department of commerce submitted a plan that
establishes a mission of growing and improving jobs in the state. The
plan also outlines agency priorities, efficiencies, and program
transfers that will help to advance the new mission.
(2) The purposes of this act are: (a) To implement portions of the
department of commerce plan by transferring certain programs from the
department of commerce to other state agencies whose missions are more
closely aligned with the core functions of those programs; (b) to
direct strategic initiatives and targeted actions focused on the
mission of growing and improving jobs; (c) to direct the department to
establish a separate division to contain community services and housing
programs, and to work with the legislature on future plans for these
programs; (d) to direct creation of a central point of access within
the department for small business and entrepreneurial assistance; and
(e) to direct development of a statewide clean energy strategy. This
act also directs additional efficiencies in state government, which
will better enable the department of commerce to focus on its new
mission.
(3) The legislature finds that the department of commerce has
conducted a credible process to identify the most critical economic
needs of our state. The legislature recognizes that to sustain a
world-class innovation economy on a foundation of strong communities
requires continuous improvement and focus on the fundamentals. The
legislature finds that the state's reputation as a center of
innovative, cutting edge research and development will form the
foundation of whole new markets, product categories, and industry
clusters. The legislature therefore affirms the department's mission,
to focus on growing and improving jobs, and supports the eight
priorities identified by the department in its 2009 report to the
legislature: (a) Improving the state's competitiveness; (b)
strengthening education and workforce training; (c) investing in
infrastructure; (d) increasing regulatory efficiency; (e) building
community capacity; (f) focusing on rural economic development; (g)
engaging with key industry sectors; and (h) helping small businesses
succeed.
(4)(a) The legislature recognizes that small businesses and
entrepreneurs are a foundation of the state's economy yet they
encounter many barriers to achieving long-term stability and growth.
Gaining access to capital, complying with complex government
regulations, and competing successfully for market opportunities are
among the challenges they face. The legislature finds that state
government must enhance its commitment to helping small businesses and
entrepreneurs thrive, including finding ways to integrate and
coordinate existing programs to make them more accessible and
effective. The legislature further finds that the mission of the
department of commerce to growing and improving jobs in Washington
makes it particularly well-suited to take a leadership role in these
efforts.
(b) The legislature therefore directs the department of commerce,
beginning in fiscal year 2011, to create a central point of access
within the department for small business and entrepreneurial
assistance, and in collaboration with other agencies and partners over
time, to (i) consolidate and expand small business financing services;
(ii) develop and implement regulatory assistance initiatives; and (iii)
institute innovative systems to connect small businesses and
entrepreneurs to a broad array of technical assistance resources at the
local, state, and federal levels.
(c) The department shall report to appropriate legislative
committees by December 1, 2010, on the milestones achieved and the
future actions planned to meet the priorities described in subsections
(3) and (4) of this section.
(5)(a) The legislature recognizes that there are many strong
community services and housing programs currently operating within the
department and serving our most vulnerable individuals, families, and
communities. The legislature finds that some of these programs can
readily be transferred beginning on July 1, 2010, to other mission-aligned agencies in state government. However, the legislature finds
that to maintain the strength and credibility of the majority of the
department's community services and housing programs, it is necessary
to create a separate division for them within the department and to
develop a plan to establish a separate state government agency for them
in the future.
(b) The legislature directs the department of commerce to establish
a single division to contain community services and housing programs
that deliver essential services to individuals, families, and
communities. Services provided by the division shall include, but are
not limited to: (i) Homeless housing and assistance programs including
transitional housing, emergency shelter grants, independent youth
housing, housing assistance for persons with mental illness, and
housing opportunities for people with AIDS; (ii) affordable housing
development programs including the housing trust fund and low-income
home energy assistance; (iii) farm worker housing; (iv) crime victims'
advocacy and sexual assault services; (v) community mobilization
against substance abuse and violence; (vi) asset building for working
families; (vii) local and community projects including the building
communities fund, building for the arts, and youth recreational
facilities grants; (viii) dispute resolution centers; (ix) the
Washington families fund; (x) community services block grants; (xi)
community development block grants; (xii) child care facility fund;
(xiii) WorkFirst community jobs; (xiv) long-term care ombudsman; (xv)
state drug task forces; (xvi) justice assistance grants; (xvii)
children and families of incarcerated parents; and (xviii) the
Washington new Americans program.
(c) The economic development committees in the house of
representatives and the senate shall, in consultation with the governor
and the department: (i) Solicit information and advice from
representatives of community, social services, and housing
organizations at the local and state levels, including minority
communities, people with disabilities, and other vulnerable
populations; and (ii) develop a plan for consideration and action in
the 2011 legislative session to establish a separate state government
agency whose mission is focused on community services and housing.

PART I
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH--PUBLIC HEALTH
Sec. 101 RCW 70.05.125 and 2009 c 479 s 48 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The county public health account is created in the state
treasury. Funds deposited in the county public health account shall be
distributed by the state treasurer to each local public health
jurisdiction based upon amounts certified to it by the department of
((community, trade, and economic development)) health in consultation
with the Washington state association of counties. The account shall
include funds distributed under RCW 82.14.200(8) and such funds as are
appropriated to the account from the state general fund, the public
health services account under RCW 43.72.902, and such other funds as
the legislature may appropriate to it.
(2)(a) The ((director)) secretary of the department of ((community,
trade, and economic development)) health shall certify the amounts to
be distributed to each local public health jurisdiction using 1995 as
the base year of actual city contributions to local public health.
(b) Only if funds are available and in an amount no greater than
available funds under RCW 82.14.200(8), the department of community,
trade, and economic development shall adjust the amount certified under
(a) of this subsection to compensate for any annexation of an area with
fifty thousand residents or more to any city as a result of a petition
during calendar year 1996 or 1997, or for any city that became newly
incorporated as a result of an election during calendar year 1994 or
1995. The amount to be adjusted shall be equal to the amount which
otherwise would have been lost to the health jurisdiction due to the
annexation or incorporation as calculated using the jurisdiction's 1995
funding formula.
(c) The county treasurer shall certify the actual 1995 city
contribution to the department. Funds in excess of the base shall be
distributed proportionately among the health jurisdictions based on
incorporated population figures as last determined by the office of
financial management.
(3) Moneys distributed under this section shall be expended
exclusively for local public health purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 (1) All powers, duties, and functions of
the department of commerce pertaining to county public health
assistance are transferred to the department of health. All references
to the director or the department of commerce in the Revised Code of
Washington shall be construed to mean the secretary or the department
of health when referring to the functions transferred in this section.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the department of
commerce pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall be delivered to the custody of the department of health. All
cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other
tangible property employed by the department of commerce in carrying
out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be made
available to the department of health. All funds, credits, or other
assets held in connection with the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be assigned to the department of health.
(b) Any appropriations made to the department of commerce for
carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on
the effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to the
department of health.
(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any
personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment,
or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers
and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the
director of financial management shall make a determination as to the
proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the department of commerce engaged in
performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred are
transferred to the jurisdiction of the department of health. All
employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service
law, are assigned to the department of health to perform their usual
duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights,
subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance
with the laws and rules governing state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the department of
commerce pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall be continued and acted upon by the department of health. All
existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall
be performed by the department of health.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the department of commerce shall not affect the validity of any act
performed before the effective date of this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) All classified employees of the department of commerce assigned
to the department of health under this section whose positions are
within an existing bargaining unit description at the department of
health shall become a part of the existing bargaining unit at the
department of health and shall be considered an appropriate inclusion
or modification of the existing bargaining unit under the provisions of
chapter 41.80 RCW.

PART II
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH--DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
Sec. 201 RCW 43.330.210 and 2009 c 565 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The developmental disabilities endowment governing board is
established to design and administer the developmental disabilities
endowment. To the extent funds are appropriated for this purpose, the
((director)) secretary of the department ((of commerce)) shall provide
staff and administrative support to the governing board.
(1) The governing board shall consist of seven members as follows:
(a) Three of the members, who shall be appointed by the governor,
shall be persons who have demonstrated expertise and leadership in
areas such as finance, actuarial science, management, business, or
public policy.
(b) Three members of the board, who shall be appointed by the
governor, shall be persons who have demonstrated expertise and
leadership in areas such as business, developmental disabilities
service design, management, or public policy, and shall be family
members of persons with developmental disabilities.
(c) The seventh member of the board, who shall serve as chair of
the board, shall be appointed by the remaining six members of the
board.
(2) Members of the board shall serve terms of four years and may be
appointed for successive terms of four years at the discretion of the
appointing authority. However, the governor may stagger the terms of
the initial six members of the board so that approximately one-fourth
of the members' terms expire each year.
(3) Members of the board shall be compensated for their service
under RCW 43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as
provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(4) The board shall meet periodically as specified by the call of
the chair, or a majority of the board.
(5) Members of the governing board and the state investment board
shall not be considered an insurer of the funds or assets of the
endowment trust fund or the individual trust accounts. Neither of
these two boards or their members shall be liable for the action or
inaction of the other.
(6) Members of the governing board and the state investment board
are not liable to the state, to the fund, or to any other person as a
result of their activities as members, whether ministerial or
discretionary, except for willful dishonesty or intentional violations
of law. The department and the state investment board, respectively,
may purchase liability insurance for members.

Sec. 202 RCW 43.330.240 and 2009 c 565 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department ((of commerce)) shall adopt rules for the
implementation of policies established by the governing board in RCW
43.330.200 through 43.330.230 (as recodified by this act). Such rules
will be consistent with those statutes and chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 The following sections are each recodified
as sections in chapter 43.70 RCW:
RCW 43.330.195
RCW 43.330.200
RCW 43.330.205
RCW 43.330.210
RCW 43.330.220
RCW 43.330.225
RCW 43.330.230
RCW 43.330.240

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 (1) All powers, duties, and functions of
the department of commerce pertaining to the developmental disabilities
endowment are transferred to the department of health. All references
to the director or the department of commerce in the Revised Code of
Washington shall be construed to mean the secretary or the department
of health when referring to the functions transferred in this section.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the department of
commerce pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall be delivered to the custody of the department of health. All
cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other
tangible property employed by the department of commerce in carrying
out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be made
available to the department of health. All funds, credits, or other
assets held in connection with the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be assigned to the department of health.
(b) Any appropriations made to the department of commerce for
carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on
the effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to the
department of health.
(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any
personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment,
or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers
and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the
director of financial management shall make a determination as to the
proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the department of commerce engaged in
performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred are
transferred to the jurisdiction of the department of health. All
employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service
law, are assigned to the department of health to perform their usual
duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights,
subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance
with the laws and rules governing state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the department of
commerce pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall be continued and acted upon by the department of health. All
existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall
be performed by the department of health.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the department of commerce shall not affect the validity of any act
performed before the effective date of this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) All classified employees of the department of commerce assigned
to the department of health under this section whose positions are
within an existing bargaining unit description at the department of
health shall become a part of the existing bargaining unit at the
department of health and shall be considered an appropriate inclusion
or modification of the existing bargaining unit under the provisions of
chapter 41.80 RCW.

PART III
BUILDING CODE COUNCIL
Sec. 301 RCW 19.27.070 and 1995 c 399 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is hereby established a state building code council to be
appointed by the governor.
(1) The state building code council shall consist of fifteen
members, two of whom shall be county elected legislative body members
or elected executives and two of whom shall be city elected legislative
body members or mayors. One of the members shall be a local government
building code enforcement official and one of the members shall be a
local government fire service official. Of the remaining nine members,
one member shall represent general construction, specializing in
commercial and industrial building construction; one member shall
represent general construction, specializing in residential and
multifamily building construction; one member shall represent the
architectural design profession; one member shall represent the
structural engineering profession; one member shall represent the
mechanical engineering profession; one member shall represent the
construction building trades; one member shall represent manufacturers,
installers, or suppliers of building materials and components; one
member shall be a person with a physical disability and shall represent
the disability community; and one member shall represent the general
public. At least six of these fifteen members shall reside east of the
crest of the Cascade mountains. The council shall include: Two
members of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the
house, one from each caucus; two members of the senate appointed by the
president of the senate, one from each caucus; and an employee of the
electrical division of the department of labor and industries, as ex
officio, nonvoting members with all other privileges and rights of
membership. Terms of office shall be for three years. The council
shall elect a member to serve as chair of the council for one-year
terms of office. Any member who is appointed by virtue of being an
elected official or holding public employment shall be removed from the
council if he or she ceases being such an elected official or holding
such public employment. Before making any appointments to the building
code council, the governor shall seek nominations from recognized
organizations which represent the entities or interests listed in this
subsection. Members serving on the council on July 28, 1985, may
complete their terms of office. Any vacancy shall be filled by
alternating appointments from governmental and nongovernmental entities
or interests until the council is constituted as required by this
subsection.
(2) Members shall not be compensated but shall receive
reimbursement for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.
(3) The department of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) general administration shall provide administrative and
clerical assistance to the building code council.

Sec. 302 RCW 19.27.097 and 1995 c 399 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each applicant for a building permit of a building
necessitating potable water shall provide evidence of an adequate water
supply for the intended use of the building. Evidence may be in the
form of a water right permit from the department of ecology, a letter
from an approved water purveyor stating the ability to provide water,
or another form sufficient to verify the existence of an adequate water
supply. In addition to other authorities, the county or city may
impose conditions on building permits requiring connection to an
existing public water system where the existing system is willing and
able to provide safe and reliable potable water to the applicant with
reasonable economy and efficiency. An application for a water right
shall not be sufficient proof of an adequate water supply.
(2) Within counties not required or not choosing to plan pursuant
to RCW 36.70A.040, the county and the state may mutually determine
those areas in the county in which the requirements of subsection (1)
of this section shall not apply. The departments of health and ecology
shall coordinate on the implementation of this section. Should the
county and the state fail to mutually determine those areas to be
designated pursuant to this subsection, the county may petition the
department of ((community, trade, and economic development)) general
administration to mediate or, if necessary, make the determination.
(3) Buildings that do not need potable water facilities are exempt
from the provisions of this section. The department of ecology, after
consultation with local governments, may adopt rules to implement this
section, which may recognize differences between high-growth and low-growth counties.

Sec. 303 RCW 19.27.150 and 1995 c 399 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every month a copy of the United States department of commerce,
bureau of the census' "report of building or zoning permits issued and
local public construction" or equivalent report shall be transmitted by
the governing bodies of counties and cities to the department of
((community, trade, and economic development)) general administration.

Sec. 304 RCW 19.27A.020 and 2009 c 423 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state building code council shall adopt rules to be known
as the Washington state energy code as part of the state building code.
(2) The council shall follow the legislature's standards set forth
in this section to adopt rules to be known as the Washington state
energy code. The Washington state energy code shall be designed to:
(a) Construct increasingly energy efficient homes and buildings
that help achieve the broader goal of building zero fossil-fuel
greenhouse gas emission homes and buildings by the year 2031;
(b) Require new buildings to meet a certain level of energy
efficiency, but allow flexibility in building design, construction, and
heating equipment efficiencies within that framework; and
(c) Allow space heating equipment efficiency to offset or
substitute for building envelope thermal performance.
(3) The Washington state energy code shall take into account
regional climatic conditions. Climate zone 1 shall include all
counties not included in climate zone 2. Climate zone 2 includes:
Adams, Chelan, Douglas, Ferry, Grant, Kittitas, Lincoln, Okanogan, Pend
Oreille, Spokane, Stevens, and Whitman counties.
(4) The Washington state energy code for residential buildings
shall be the 2006 edition of the Washington state energy code, or as
amended by rule by the council.
(5) The minimum state energy code for new nonresidential buildings
shall be the Washington state energy code, 2006 edition, or as amended
by the council by rule.
(6)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the Washington
state energy code for residential structures shall preempt the
residential energy code of each city, town, and county in the state of
Washington.
(b) The state energy code for residential structures does not
preempt a city, town, or county's energy code for residential
structures which exceeds the requirements of the state energy code and
which was adopted by the city, town, or county prior to March 1, 1990.
Such cities, towns, or counties may not subsequently amend their energy
code for residential structures to exceed the requirements adopted
prior to March 1, 1990.
(7) The state building code council shall consult with the
department of ((community, trade, and economic development)) general
administration as provided in RCW 34.05.310 prior to publication of
proposed rules. The director of the department of ((community, trade,
and economic development)) general administration shall recommend to
the state building code council any changes necessary to conform the
proposed rules to the requirements of this section.
(8) The state building code council shall evaluate and consider
adoption of the international energy conservation code in Washington
state in place of the existing state energy code.
(9) The definitions in RCW 19.27A.140 apply throughout this
section.

Sec. 305 RCW 19.27A.140 and 2009 c 423 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply to RCW 19.27A.130 through
19.27A.190 and 19.27A.020 unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Benchmark" means the energy used by a facility as recorded
monthly for at least one year and the facility characteristics
information inputs required for a portfolio manager.
(2) "Conditioned space" means conditioned space, as defined in the
Washington state energy code.
(3) "Consumer-owned utility" includes a municipal electric utility
formed under Title 35 RCW, a public utility district formed under Title
54 RCW, an irrigation district formed under chapter 87.03 RCW, a
cooperative formed under chapter 23.86 RCW, a mutual corporation or
association formed under chapter 24.06 RCW, a port district formed
under Title 53 RCW, or a water-sewer district formed under Title 57
RCW, that is engaged in the business of distributing electricity to one
or more retail electric customers in the state.
(4) "Cost-effectiveness" means that a project or resource is
forecast:
(a) To be reliable and available within the time it is needed; and
(b) To meet or reduce the power demand of the intended consumers at
an estimated incremental system cost no greater than that of the least-cost similarly reliable and available alternative project or resource,
or any combination thereof.
(5) "Council" means the state building code council.
(6) (("Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(7))) "Embodied energy" means the total amount of fossil fuel
energy consumed to extract raw materials and to manufacture, assemble,
transport, and install the materials in a building and the life-cycle
cost benefits including the recyclability and energy efficiencies with
respect to building materials, taking into account the total sum of
current values for the costs of investment, capital, installation,
operating, maintenance, and replacement as estimated for the lifetime
of the product or project.
(((8))) (7) "Energy consumption data" means the monthly amount of
energy consumed by a customer as recorded by the applicable energy
meter for the most recent twelve-month period.
(((9))) (8) "Energy service company" has the same meaning as in RCW
43.19.670.
(((10))) (9) "General administration" means the department of
general administration.
(((11))) (10) "Greenhouse gas" and "greenhouse gases" includes
carbon dioxide, methane, nitrous oxide, hydrofluorocarbons,
perfluorocarbons, and sulfur hexafluoride.
(((12))) (11) "Investment grade energy audit" means an intensive
engineering analysis of energy efficiency and management measures for
the facility, net energy savings, and a cost-effectiveness
determination.
(((13))) (12) "Investor-owned utility" means a corporation owned by
investors that meets the definition of "corporation" as defined in RCW
80.04.010 and is engaged in distributing either electricity or natural
gas, or both, to more than one retail electric customer in the state.
(((14))) (13) "Major facility" means any publicly owned or leased
building, or a group of such buildings at a single site, having ten
thousand square feet or more of conditioned floor space.
(((15))) (14) "National energy performance rating" means the score
provided by the energy star program, to indicate the energy efficiency
performance of the building compared to similar buildings in that
climate as defined in the United States environmental protection agency
"ENERGY STAR® Performance Ratings Technical Methodology."
(((16))) (15) "Net zero energy use" means a building with net
energy consumption of zero over a typical year.
(((17))) (16) "Portfolio manager" means the United States
environmental protection agency's energy star portfolio manager or an
equivalent tool adopted by the department of general administration.
(((18))) (17) "Preliminary energy audit" means a quick evaluation
by an energy service company of the energy savings potential of a
building.
(((19))) (18) "Qualifying public agency" includes all state
agencies, colleges, and universities.
(((20))) (19) "Qualifying utility" means a consumer-owned or
investor-owned gas or electric utility that serves more than twenty-five thousand customers in the state of Washington.
(((21))) (20) "Reporting public facility" means any of the
following:
(a) A building or structure, or a group of buildings or structures
at a single site, owned by a qualifying public agency, that exceed ten
thousand square feet of conditioned space;
(b) Buildings, structures, or spaces leased by a qualifying public
agency that exceeds ten thousand square feet of conditioned space,
where the qualifying public agency purchases energy directly from the
investor-owned or consumer-owned utility;
(c) A wastewater treatment facility owned by a qualifying public
agency; or
(d) Other facilities selected by the qualifying public agency.
(((22))) (21) "State portfolio manager master account" means a
portfolio manager account established to provide a single shared
portfolio that includes reports for all the reporting public
facilities.

Sec. 306 RCW 19.27A.150 and 2009 c 423 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) To the extent that funding is appropriated specifically for the
purposes of this section, the department of commerce shall develop and
implement a strategic plan for enhancing energy efficiency in and
reducing greenhouse gas emissions from homes, buildings, districts, and
neighborhoods. The strategic plan must be used to help direct the
future code increases in RCW 19.27A.020, with targets for new buildings
consistent with RCW 19.27A.160. The strategic plan will identify
barriers to achieving net zero energy use in homes and buildings and
identify how to overcome these barriers in future energy code updates
and through complementary policies.
(2) The department of commerce must complete and release the
strategic plan to the legislature and the council by December 31, 2010,
and update the plan every three years.
(3) The strategic plan must include recommendations to the council
on energy code upgrades. At a minimum, the strategic plan must:
(a) Consider development of aspirational codes separate from the
state energy code that contain economically and technically feasible
optional standards that could achieve higher energy efficiency for
those builders that elected to follow the aspirational codes in lieu of
or in addition to complying with the standards set forth in the state
energy code;
(b) Determine the appropriate methodology to measure achievement of
state energy code targets using the United States environmental
protection agency's target finder program or equivalent methodology;
(c) Address the need for enhanced code training and enforcement;
(d) Include state strategies to support research, demonstration,
and education programs designed to achieve a seventy percent reduction
in annual net energy consumption as specified in RCW 19.27A.160 and
enhance energy efficiency and on-site renewable energy production in
buildings;
(e) Recommend incentives, education, training programs and
certifications, particularly state-approved training or certification
programs, joint apprenticeship programs, or labor-management
partnership programs that train workers for energy-efficiency projects
to ensure proposed programs are designed to increase building
professionals' ability to design, construct, and operate buildings that
will meet the seventy percent reduction in annual net energy
consumption as specified in RCW 19.27A.160;
(f) Address barriers for utilities to serve net zero energy homes
and buildings and policies to overcome those barriers;
(g) Address the limits of a prescriptive code in achieving net zero
energy use homes and buildings and propose a transition to performance-based codes;
(h) Identify financial mechanisms such as tax incentives, rebates,
and innovative financing to motivate energy consumers to take action to
increase energy efficiency and their use of on-site renewable energy.
Such incentives, rebates, or financing options may consider the role of
government programs as well as utility-sponsored programs;
(i) Address the adequacy of education and technical assistance,
including school curricula, technical training, and peer-to-peer
exchanges for professional and trade audiences;
(j) Develop strategies to develop and install district and
neighborhood-wide energy systems that help meet net zero energy use in
homes and buildings;
(k) Identify costs and benefits of energy efficiency measures on
residential and nonresidential construction; and
(l) Investigate methodologies and standards for the measurement of
the amount of embodied energy used in building materials.
(4) The department of commerce and the council shall convene a work
group with the affected parties to inform the initial development of
the strategic plan.

Sec. 307 RCW 19.27A.180 and 2009 c 423 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
By December 31, 2009, to the extent that funding is appropriated
specifically for the purposes of this section, the department of
commerce shall develop and recommend to the legislature a methodology
to determine an energy performance score for residential buildings and
an implementation strategy to use such information to improve the
energy efficiency of the state's existing housing supply. In
developing its strategy, the department of commerce shall seek input
from providers of residential energy audits, utilities, building
contractors, mixed use developers, the residential real estate
industry, and real estate listing and form providers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 (1) All powers, duties, and functions of
the department of commerce pertaining to administrative and support
services for the state building code council are transferred to the
department of general administration. All references to the director
or the department of commerce in the Revised Code of Washington shall
be construed to mean the director or the department of general
administration when referring to the functions transferred in this
section. Policy and planning assistance functions performed by the
department of commerce remain with the department of commerce.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the department of
commerce pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall be delivered to the custody of the department of general
administration. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor
vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the department of
commerce in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall be made available to the department of general administration.
All funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with the powers,
functions, and duties transferred shall be assigned to the department
of general administration.
(b) Any appropriations made to the department of commerce for
carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on
the effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to the
department of general administration.
(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any
personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment,
or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers
and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the
director of financial management shall make a determination as to the
proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the department of commerce engaged in
performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred are
transferred to the jurisdiction of the department of general
administration. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the
state civil service law, are assigned to the department of general
administration to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as
formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be
appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing
state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the department of
commerce pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall be continued and acted upon by the department of general
administration. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in
full force and shall be performed by the department of general
administration.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the department of commerce shall not affect the validity of any act
performed before the effective date of this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) All classified employees of the department of commerce assigned
to the department of general administration under this section whose
positions are within an existing bargaining unit description at the
department of general administration shall become a part of the
existing bargaining unit at the department of general administration
and shall be considered an appropriate inclusion or modification of the
existing bargaining unit under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW.

PART IV
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE--ENERGY POLICY
Sec. 401 RCW 43.21F.010 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 108 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that energy drives the entire modern
economy from petroleum for vehicles to electricity to light homes and
businesses. The legislature further finds that the nation and the
world have started the transition to a clean energy economy, with
significant improvements in energy efficiency and investments in new
clean and renewable energy resources and technologies.
(2) The legislature finds and declares that it is the continuing
purpose of state government, consistent with other essential
considerations of state policy, to foster wise and efficient energy use
and to promote energy self-sufficiency through the use of indigenous
and renewable energy sources, consistent with the promotion of reliable
energy sources, the general welfare, and the protection of
environmental quality.
(3) The legislature further declares that the goals of the state's
energy strategy are to:
(a) Maintain competitive energy prices that have been an
instrumental part of our state's economic success to date;
(b) Increase competitiveness by fostering a clean energy economy
and jobs through business and workforce development; and
(c) Meet the state's obligations to reduce greenhouse gas
emissions.

Sec. 402 RCW 43.21F.025 and 2009 c 565 s 27 are each reenacted
and amended to read as follows:
(1) "Assistant director" means the assistant director of the
department of commerce responsible for energy policy activities;
(2) "Department" means the department of commerce;
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of commerce;
(4) "Distributor" means any person, private corporation,
partnership, individual proprietorship, utility, including investor-owned utilities, municipal utility, public utility district, joint
operating agency, or cooperative, which engages in or is authorized to
engage in the activity of generating, transmitting, or distributing
energy in this state;
(5) "Energy" means petroleum or other liquid fuels; natural or
synthetic fuel gas; solid carbonaceous fuels; fissionable nuclear
material; electricity; solar radiation; geothermal resources;
hydropower; organic waste products; wind; tidal activity; any other
substance or process used to produce heat, light, or motion; or the
savings from nongeneration technologies, including conservation or
improved efficiency in the usage of any of the sources described in
this subsection;
(6) "Person" means an individual, partnership, joint venture,
private or public corporation, association, firm, public service
company, political subdivision, municipal corporation, government
agency, public utility district, joint operating agency, or any other
entity, public or private, however organized; and
(7) "State energy strategy" means the document ((and energy policy
direction)) developed ((under section 1, chapter 201, Laws of 1991
including any related appendices)) and updated by the department as
required in section 404 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 A new section is added to chapter 43.21F
RCW to read as follows:
The state shall use the following principles to guide development
and implementation of the state's energy strategy and to meet the goals
specified in RCW 43.21F.010:
(1) Pursue all cost-effective energy efficiency and conservation as
the state's preferred energy resource;
(2) Ensure that the state's energy system meets the health,
welfare, and economic needs of its citizens with particular emphasis on
meeting the needs of low-income and vulnerable populations;
(3) Maintain and enhance economic competitiveness by ensuring an
affordable and reliable supply of energy resources and by supporting
clean energy technology innovation, access to clean energy markets
worldwide, and clean energy business and workforce development;
(4) Reduce dependence on fossil fuel energy sources through
improved efficiency and development of cleaner energy sources, such as
bioenergy, natural gas, and other low-carbon energy sources;
(5) Improve efficiency of transportation energy use through
advances in vehicle technology, increased system efficiencies,
development of electricity, biofuels, and other clean fuels, and land
use policies that improve transportation choices;
(6) Meet the state's statutory climate change goals and targets and
other environmental requirements as the state develops and uses energy
resources;
(7) Build on the advantage provided by the state's clean regional
electrical grid by expanding and integrating additional carbon-free
generation and improving the transmission capacity serving the state;
(8) Make state government a model for energy efficiency, use of
clean and renewable energy, and greenhouse gas-neutral operations;
(9) During energy shortage emergencies, give priority in the
allocation of energy resources to maintaining the public health,
safety, and welfare of the state's citizens and industry in order to
minimize adverse impacts on their physical, social, and economic well-being;
(10) Develop and disseminate impartial and objective energy
information and analysis, while taking full advantage of the
capabilities of the state's institutions of higher education;
(11) Actively seek to maximize federal and other nonstate funding
and support to the state for energy efficiency, renewable energy,
emerging energy technologies, and other activities of benefit to the
state's overall energy future; and
(12) Ensure that the state energy strategy provides primary
guidance for consistent implementation of the state's energy policy by
all agencies of the state.

Sec. 404 RCW 43.21F.090 and 1996 c 186 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) By December 1, 2010, and every five years thereafter, the
department ((shall review the state energy strategy as developed under
section 1, chapter 201, Laws of 1991, periodically with the guidance of
an advisory committee. For each review, an advisory committee shall be
established with a membership resembling as closely as possible the
original energy strategy advisory committee specified under section 1,
chapter 201, Laws of 1991. Upon completion of a public hearing
regarding the advisory committee's advice and recommendations for
revisions to the energy strategy, a written report shall be conveyed by
the department to the governor and the appropriate legislative
committees. Any advisory committee established under this section
shall be dissolved within three months after their written report is
conveyed.)) of commerce shall produce and present to the legislature
for consideration and approval a fully updated and revised state energy
strategy and implementation report with the guidance of an advisory
committee. The strategy shall, to the maximum extent feasible, examine
the state's entire energy system and provide specific recommendations
for both further development of state analytical capabilities and
policies as well as implementation recommendations. The strategy may
also provide recommendations for legislation necessary to facilitate
implementation of the strategy to the governor and legislature. In
addition, the department shall review related processes and documents
relevant to a state energy strategy including but not limited to prior
state energy strategies, the work of the clean energy leadership
council, the climate advisory and action teams, the evergreen jobs
committee, and the northwest power and conservation council. The
strategy must build upon and be consistent with all relevant and
applicable statutorily authorized energy and climate policies, goals,
and programs, and may include recommendations for legislation.
(b) The initial state energy strategy update, and each future
update or revision, must be approved by the legislature by concurrent
resolution before the department may implement the strategy. In
addition, the department's authority to implement the strategy is
subject to availability of amounts appropriated for this purpose in the
omnibus operating and capital appropriations acts.
(c) The department may periodically review and update the state
energy strategy as necessary. The department shall engage an advisory
committee as required in this section when updating the strategy.
(d) The director shall appoint an advisory committee with a
membership reflecting a balance of the interests in energy generation,
distribution, and uses, including: Residential, commercial,
industrial, and agricultural users; electric and natural gas utilities,
both consumer-owned and investor-owned; petroleum and natural gas
industries; local governments; civic and environmental organizations;
key public agencies; and other interested stakeholders. Upon
completion of a public hearing regarding the advisory committee's
advice and recommendations for revisions to the energy strategy, a
written report must be conveyed by the department to the governor and
the appropriate legislative committees. Any advisory committee
established under this section must be dissolved within three months
after the written report is conveyed.
(2) To assist in updates of the state energy strategy, the
department of commerce shall actively seek both in-kind and financial
support for this process from the United States department of energy
and its national laboratories, other public agencies, private sector
entities, foundations, and other energy organizations. In order to
avoid competition among Washington state agencies, the department of
commerce shall coordinate the search for such external support, unless
it delegates its responsibility in specific instances to another state
agency. The department of commerce shall develop a work plan for
update of the strategy that reflects the levels of activities and
deliverables commensurate with the level of funding and in-kind support
available from state and nonstate sources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 405 RCW 43.21F.015 (State policy) and 1994 c
207 s 3 & 1981 c 295 s 1 are each repealed.

PART V
CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION--DRUG
PROSECUTION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
Sec. 501 RCW 36.27.100 and 1995 c 399 s 41 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature recognizes that, due to the magnitude or volume of
offenses in a given area of the state, there is a recurring need for
supplemental assistance in the prosecuting of drug and drug-related
offenses that can be directed to the area of the state with the
greatest need for short-term assistance. A statewide drug prosecution
assistance program is created within the ((department of community,
trade, and economic development)) criminal justice training commission
to assist county prosecuting attorneys in the prosecution of drug and
drug-related offenses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 (1) All powers, duties, and functions of
the department of commerce pertaining to the drug prosecution
assistance program are transferred to the criminal justice training
commission. All references to the director or the department of
commerce in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean
the director or the criminal justice training commission when referring
to the functions transferred in this section.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the department of
commerce pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall be delivered to the custody of the criminal justice training
commission. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles,
and other tangible property employed by the department of commerce in
carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be
made available to the criminal justice training commission. All funds,
credits, or other assets held in connection with the powers, functions,
and duties transferred shall be assigned to the criminal justice
training commission.
(b) Any appropriations made to the department of commerce for
carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on
the effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to the
criminal justice training commission.
(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any
personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment,
or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers
and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the
director of financial management shall make a determination as to the
proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the department of commerce engaged in
performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred are
transferred to the jurisdiction of the criminal justice training
commission. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the
state civil service law, are assigned to the criminal justice training
commission to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as
formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be
appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing
state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the department of
commerce pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall be continued and acted upon by the criminal justice training
commission. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in
full force and shall be performed by the criminal justice training
commission.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the department of commerce shall not affect the validity of any act
performed before the effective date of this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) All classified employees of the department of commerce assigned
to the criminal justice training commission under this section whose
positions are within an existing bargaining unit description at the
criminal justice training commission shall become a part of the
existing bargaining unit at the criminal justice training commission
and shall be considered an appropriate inclusion or modification of the
existing bargaining unit under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW.

PART VI
WASHINGTON UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION--ENERGY
Sec. 601 RCW 80.50.030 and 2001 c 214 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is created and established the energy facility site
evaluation council.
(2)(a) The chair of the council shall be appointed by the governor
with the advice and consent of the senate, shall have a vote on matters
before the council, shall serve for a term coextensive with the term of
the governor, and is removable for cause. The chair may designate a
member of the council to serve as acting chair in the event of the
chair's absence. The salary of the chair shall be determined under RCW
43.03.040. The chair is a "state employee" for the purposes of chapter
42.52 RCW. As applicable, when attending meetings of the council,
members may receive reimbursement for travel expenses in accordance
with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, and are eligible for compensation
under RCW 43.03.250.
(b) The chair or a designee shall execute all official documents,
contracts, and other materials on behalf of the council. The
Washington ((state department of community, trade, and economic
development)) utilities and transportation commission shall provide all
administrative and staff support for the council. The ((director of
the department of community, trade, and economic development))
commission has supervisory authority over the staff of the council and
shall employ such personnel as are necessary to implement this chapter.
Not more than three such employees may be exempt from chapter 41.06
RCW. The council shall otherwise retain its independence in exercising
its powers, functions, and duties and its supervisory control over
nonadministrative staff support. Membership, powers, functions, and
duties of the Washington state utilities and transportation commission
and the council shall otherwise remain as provided by law.
(3)(a) The council shall consist of the directors, administrators,
or their designees, of the following departments, agencies,
commissions, and committees or their statutory successors:
(i) Department of ecology;
(ii) Department of fish and wildlife;
(iii) Department of ((community, trade, and economic development))
commerce;
(iv) Utilities and transportation commission; and
(v) Department of natural resources.
(b) The directors, administrators, or their designees, of the
following departments, agencies, and commissions, or their statutory
successors, may participate as councilmembers at their own discretion
provided they elect to participate no later than sixty days after an
application is filed:
(i) Department of agriculture;
(ii) Department of health;
(iii) Military department; and
(iv) Department of transportation.
(c) Council membership is discretionary for agencies that choose to
participate under (b) of this subsection only for applications that are
filed with the council on or after May 8, 2001. For applications filed
before May 8, 2001, council membership is mandatory for those agencies
listed in (b) of this subsection.
(4) The appropriate county legislative authority of every county
wherein an application for a proposed site is filed shall appoint a
member or designee as a voting member to the council. The member or
designee so appointed shall sit with the council only at such times as
the council considers the proposed site for the county which he or she
represents, and such member or designee shall serve until there has
been a final acceptance or rejection of the proposed site.
(5) The city legislative authority of every city within whose
corporate limits an energy plant is proposed to be located shall
appoint a member or designee as a voting member to the council. The
member or designee so appointed shall sit with the council only at such
times as the council considers the proposed site for the city which he
or she represents, and such member or designee shall serve until there
has been a final acceptance or rejection of the proposed site.
(6) For any port district wherein an application for a proposed
port facility is filed subject to this chapter, the port district shall
appoint a member or designee as a nonvoting member to the council. The
member or designee so appointed shall sit with the council only at such
times as the council considers the proposed site for the port district
which he or she represents, and such member or designee shall serve
until there has been a final acceptance or rejection of the proposed
site. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply if the port
district is the applicant, either singly or in partnership or
association with any other person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 (1) All administrative powers, duties, and
functions of the department of commerce pertaining to the energy
facility site evaluation council are transferred to the Washington
utilities and transportation commission. All references to the
director or the department of commerce in the Revised Code of
Washington shall be construed to mean the Washington utilities and
transportation commission when referring to the functions transferred
in this section.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the department of
commerce pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall be delivered to the custody of the Washington utilities and
transportation commission. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment,
motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the department
of commerce in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be made available to the Washington utilities and
transportation commission. All funds, credits, or other assets held in
connection with the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be
assigned to the Washington utilities and transportation commission.
(b) Any appropriations made to the department of commerce for
carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on
the effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to the
Washington utilities and transportation commission.
(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any
personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment,
or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers
and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the
director of financial management shall make a determination as to the
proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the department of commerce engaged in
performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred are
transferred to the jurisdiction of the Washington utilities and
transportation commission. All employees classified under chapter
41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the Washington
utilities and transportation commission to perform their usual duties
upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to
any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the
laws and rules governing state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the department of
commerce pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall be continued and acted upon by the Washington utilities and
transportation commission. All existing contracts and obligations
shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the Washington
utilities and transportation commission.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the department of commerce shall not affect the validity of any act
performed before the effective date of this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) All classified employees of the department of commerce assigned
to the Washington utilities and transportation commission under this
section whose positions are within an existing bargaining unit
description at the Washington utilities and transportation commission
shall become a part of the existing bargaining unit at the Washington
utilities and transportation commission and shall be considered an
appropriate inclusion or modification of the existing bargaining unit
under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW.

PART VII
MUNICIPAL RESEARCH COUNCIL
Sec. 701 RCW 43.110.030 and 2000 c 227 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The ((municipal research council)) department of commerce shall
contract for the provision of municipal research and services to
cities, towns, and counties. Contracts for municipal research and
services shall be made with state agencies, educational institutions,
or private consulting firms, that in the judgment of ((council
members)) the department are qualified to provide such research and
services. Contracts for staff support may be made with state agencies,
educational institutions, or private consulting firms that in the
judgment of the ((council members)) department are qualified to provide
such support.
(2) Municipal research and services shall consist of:
(((1))) (a) Studying and researching city, town, and county
government and issues relating to city, town, and county government;
(((2))) (b) Acquiring, preparing, and distributing publications
related to city, town, and county government and issues relating to
city, town, and county government;
(((3))) (c) Providing educational conferences relating to city,
town, and county government and issues relating to city, town, and
county government; and
(((4))) (d) Furnishing legal, technical, consultative, and field
services to cities, towns, and counties concerning planning, public
health, utility services, fire protection, law enforcement, public
works, and other issues relating to city, town, and county government.
(3) Requests for legal services by county officials shall be sent
to the office of the county prosecuting attorney. Responses by the
((municipal research council)) department of commerce to county
requests for legal services shall be provided to the requesting
official and the county prosecuting attorney.
(4) The ((activities, programs, and services of the municipal
research council shall be carried on in cooperation)) department of
commerce shall coordinate with the association of Washington cities and
the Washington state association of counties in carrying out the
activities in this section. Services to cities and towns shall be
based upon the moneys appropriated to the ((municipal research
council)) department from the city and town research services account
under RCW 43.110.060. Services to counties shall be based upon the
moneys appropriated to the ((municipal research council)) department
from the county research services account under RCW 43.110.050.

Sec. 702 RCW 43.110.060 and 2002 c 38 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
The city and town research services account is created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account shall consist of amounts transferred
under RCW 66.08.190(2) and any other transfers or appropriations to the
account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after an
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for city
and town research.
All unobligated moneys remaining in the account at the end of the
fiscal biennium shall be distributed by the treasurer to the
incorporated cities and towns of the state in the same manner as the
distribution under RCW 66.08.190(1)(b)(iii).
((The treasurer may disburse amounts appropriated to the municipal
research council from the city and town research services account by
warrant or check to the contracting parties on invoices or vouchers
certified by the chair of the municipal research council or his or her
designee.)) Payments to public agencies may be made in advance of
actual work contracted for, at the discretion of the ((council))
department of commerce.

Sec. 703 RCW 43.110.080 and 2006 c 328 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The ((municipal research council)) department of commerce shall
contract for the provision of research and services to special purpose
districts. A contract shall be made with a state agency, educational
institution, or private consulting firm, that in the judgment of
((council members)) the department is qualified to provide such
research and services.
(2) Research and services to special purpose districts shall
consist of:
(a) Studying and researching issues relating to special purpose
district government;
(b) Acquiring, preparing, and distributing publications related to
special purpose districts; and
(c) Furnishing legal, technical, consultative, and field services
to special purpose districts concerning issues relating to special
purpose district government.
(3) The ((activities, programs, and services of the municipal
research council to special purpose districts shall be carried on in
cooperation)) department of commerce shall coordinate with the
associations representing the various special purpose districts with
respect to carrying out the activities in this section. Services to
special purpose districts shall be based upon the moneys appropriated
to the ((municipal research council)) department of commerce from the
special purpose district research services account under RCW
43.110.090.

Sec. 704 RCW 43.15.020 and 2009 c 560 s 27 are each amended to
read as follows:
The lieutenant governor serves as president of the senate and is
responsible for making appointments to, and serving on, the committees
and boards as set forth in this section.
(1) The lieutenant governor serves on the following boards and
committees:
(a) Capitol furnishings preservation committee, RCW 27.48.040;
(b) Washington higher education facilities authority, RCW
28B.07.030;
(c) Productivity board, also known as the employee involvement and
recognition board, RCW 41.60.015;
(d) State finance committee, RCW 43.33.010;
(e) State capitol committee, RCW 43.34.010;
(f) Washington health care facilities authority, RCW 70.37.030;
(g) State medal of merit nominating committee, RCW 1.40.020;
(h) Medal of valor committee, RCW 1.60.020; and
(i) Association of Washington generals, RCW 43.15.030.
(2) The lieutenant governor, and when serving as president of the
senate, appoints members to the following boards and committees:
(a) Civil legal aid oversight committee, RCW 2.53.010;
(b) Office of public defense advisory committee, RCW 2.70.030;
(c) Washington state gambling commission, RCW 9.46.040;
(d) Sentencing guidelines commission, RCW 9.94A.860;
(e) State building code council, RCW 19.27.070;
(f) Women's history consortium board of advisors, RCW 27.34.365;
(g) Financial ((literacy)) education public-private partnership,
RCW 28A.300.450;
(h) Joint administrative rules review committee, RCW 34.05.610;
(i) Capital projects advisory review board, RCW 39.10.220;
(j) Select committee on pension policy, RCW 41.04.276;
(k) Legislative ethics board, RCW 42.52.310;
(l) Washington citizens' commission on salaries, RCW 43.03.305;
(m) Legislative oral history committee, RCW 44.04.325;
(n) State council on aging, RCW 43.20A.685;
(o) State investment board, RCW 43.33A.020;
(p) Capitol campus design advisory committee, RCW 43.34.080;
(q) Washington state arts commission, RCW 43.46.015;
(r) Information services board, RCW 43.105.032;
(s) K-20 educational network board, RCW 43.105.800;
(t) ((Municipal research council, RCW 43.110.010;
(u))) Council for children and families, RCW 43.121.020;
(((v))) (u) PNWER-Net working subgroup under chapter 43.147 RCW;
(((w))) (v) Community economic revitalization board, RCW
43.160.030;
(((x))) (w) Washington economic development finance authority, RCW
43.163.020;
(((y))) (x) Life sciences discovery fund authority, RCW 43.350.020;
(((z))) (y) Legislative children's oversight committee, RCW
44.04.220;
(((aa))) (z) Joint legislative audit and review committee, RCW
44.28.010;
(((bb))) (aa) Joint committee on energy supply and energy
conservation, RCW 44.39.015;
(((cc))) (bb) Legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee, RCW 44.48.010;
(((dd))) (cc) Agency council on coordinated transportation, RCW
47.06B.020;
(((ee))) (dd) Manufactured housing task force, RCW 59.22.090;
(((ff))) (ee) Washington horse racing commission, RCW 67.16.014;
(((gg))) (ff) Correctional industries board of directors, RCW
72.09.080;
(((hh))) (gg) Joint committee on veterans' and military affairs,
RCW 73.04.150;
(((ii))) (hh) Joint legislative committee on water supply during
drought, RCW 90.86.020;
(((jj))) (ii) Statute law committee, RCW 1.08.001; and
(((kk))) (jj) Joint legislative oversight committee on trade
policy, RCW 44.55.020.

Sec. 705 RCW 35.21.185 and 1995 c 21 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is the purpose of this section to provide a means whereby
all cities and towns may obtain, through a single source, information
regarding ordinances of other cities and towns that may be of
assistance to them in enacting appropriate local legislation.
(2) For the purposes of this section, (a) "clerk" means the city or
town clerk or other person who is lawfully designated to perform the
recordkeeping function of that office, and (b) "((municipal research
council)) department" means the ((municipal research council created by
chapter 43.110 RCW)) department of commerce.
(3) The clerk of every city and town is directed to provide to the
((municipal research council)) department or its designee, promptly
after adoption, a copy of each of its regulatory ordinances and such
other ordinances or kinds of ordinances as may be described in a list
or lists promulgated by the ((municipal research council)) department
or its designee from time to time, and may provide such copies without
charge. The ((municipal research council)) department may provide that
information to the entity with which it contracts for the provision of
municipal research and services, in order to provide a pool of
information for all cities and towns in the state of Washington.
(4) This section is intended to be directory and not mandatory.

Sec. 706 RCW 35.102.040 and 2006 c 301 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The cities, working through the association of Washington
cities, shall form a model ordinance development committee made up of
a representative sampling of cities that as of July 27, 2003, impose a
business and occupation tax. This committee shall work through the
association of Washington cities to adopt a model ordinance on
municipal gross receipts business and occupation tax. The model
ordinance and subsequent amendments shall be adopted using a process
that includes opportunity for substantial input from business
stakeholders and other members of the public. Input shall be solicited
from statewide business associations and from local chambers of
commerce and downtown business associations in cities that levy a
business and occupation tax.
(b) The ((municipal research council)) department of commerce shall
contract to post the model ordinance on an internet web site and to
make paper copies available for inspection upon request. The
department of revenue and the department of licensing shall post copies
of or links to the model ordinance on their internet web sites.
Additionally, a city that imposes a business and occupation tax must
make copies of its ordinance available for inspection and copying as
provided in chapter 42.56 RCW.
(c) The definitions and tax classifications in the model ordinance
may not be amended more frequently than once every four years, however
the model ordinance may be amended at any time to comply with changes
in state law. Any amendment to a mandatory provision of the model
ordinance must be adopted with the same effective date by all cities.
(2) A city that imposes a business and occupation tax must adopt
the mandatory provisions of the model ordinance. The following
provisions are mandatory:
(a) A system of credits that meets the requirements of RCW
35.102.060 and a form for such use;
(b) A uniform, minimum small business tax threshold of at least the
equivalent of twenty thousand dollars in gross income annually. A city
may elect to deviate from this requirement by creating a higher
threshold or exemption but it shall not deviate lower than the level
required in this subsection. If a city has a small business threshold
or exemption in excess of that provided in this subsection as of
January 1, 2003, and chooses to deviate below the threshold or
exemption level that was in place as of January 1, 2003, the city must
notify all businesses licensed to do business within the city at least
one hundred twenty days prior to the potential implementation of a
lower threshold or exemption amount;
(c) Tax reporting frequencies that meet the requirements of RCW
35.102.070;
(d) Penalty and interest provisions that meet the requirements of
RCW 35.102.080 and 35.102.090;
(e) Claim periods that meet the requirements of RCW 35.102.100;
(f) Refund provisions that meet the requirements of RCW 35.102.110;
and
(g) Definitions, which at a minimum, must include the definitions
enumerated in RCW 35.102.030 and 35.102.120. The definitions in
chapter 82.04 RCW shall be used as the baseline for all definitions in
the model ordinance, and any deviation in the model ordinance from
these definitions must be described by a comment in the model
ordinance.
(3) Except for the deduction required by RCW 35.102.160 and the
system of credits developed to address multiple taxation under
subsection (2)(a) of this section, a city may adopt its own provisions
for tax exemptions, tax credits, and tax deductions.
(4) Any city that adopts an ordinance that deviates from the
nonmandatory provisions of the model ordinance shall make a description
of such differences available to the public, in written and electronic
form.

Sec. 707 RCW 36.70B.220 and 2005 c 274 s 272 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each county and city having populations of ten thousand or more
that plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall designate permit assistance staff
whose function it is to assist permit applicants. An existing employee
may be designated as the permit assistance staff.
(2) Permit assistance staff designated under this section shall:
(a) Make available to permit applicants all current local
government regulations and adopted policies that apply to the subject
application. The local government shall provide counter copies thereof
and, upon request, provide copies according to chapter 42.56 RCW. The
staff shall also publish and keep current one or more handouts
containing lists and explanations of all local government regulations
and adopted policies;
(b) Establish and make known to the public the means of obtaining
the handouts and related information; and
(c) Provide assistance regarding the application of the local
government's regulations in particular cases.
(3) Permit assistance staff designated under this section may
obtain technical assistance and support in the compilation and
production of the handouts under subsection (2) of this section from
the ((municipal research council and the department of community,
trade, and economic development)) department of commerce.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 708 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 43.110.010 (Council created -- Membership -- Terms -- Travel
expenses) and 2001 c 290 s 1, 1997 c 437 s 1, 1990 c 104 s 1, 1983 c 22
s 1, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 129, 1975 1st ex.s. c 218 s 1, & 1969 c
108 s 2;
(2) RCW 43.110.040 (Local government regulation and policy
handouts -- Technical assistance) and 1996 c 206 s 10; and
(3) RCW 43.110.070 (Hazardous liquid and gas pipeline -- Model
ordinance and franchise agreement) and 2000 c 191 s 8.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 709 (1) The municipal research council is
hereby abolished and its powers, duties, and functions are hereby
transferred to the department of commerce. All references to the
municipal research council in the Revised Code of Washington shall be
construed to mean the department of commerce.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the municipal research
council shall be delivered to the custody of the department of
commerce. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles,
and other tangible property employed by the municipal research council
shall be made available to the department of commerce. All funds,
credits, or other assets held by the municipal research council shall
be assigned to the department of commerce.
(b) Any appropriations made to the municipal research council
shall, on the effective date of this section, be transferred and
credited to the department of commerce.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any funds, books,
documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible
property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance
of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial
management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and
certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All rules and all pending business before the municipal
research council shall be continued and acted upon by the department of
commerce. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full
force and shall be performed by the department of commerce.
(4) The transfer of the powers, duties, and functions of the
municipal research council shall not affect the validity of any act
performed before the effective date of this section.
(5) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

PART VIII
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 801 RCW 43.63A.150 is decodified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---