BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.33.088 and 2007 c 47 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A purchaser of privately owned timber in an amount in excess of
two hundred thousand board feet in a voluntary sale made in the
ordinary course of business shall, on or before the last day of the
month following the purchase of the timber, report the particulars of
the purchase to the department as required in subsection (2) of this
section.
(2) The report required in subsection (1) of this section must
contain all information relevant to the value of the timber purchased
including, but not limited to, the following, as applicable:
Purchaser's name ((and)), address, and contact information; seller's
name, address, and contact information; sale date((,)); termination
date in sale agreement((,)); total sale price((,)); legal description
of sale area, sale name if applicable; forest practice
application/harvest permit number if available; total acreage involved
in the sale((,)); estimated net volume of timber purchased((, legal
description of the area involved in the sale,)) by tree species and log
grade; and description and value of property improvements. For the
purposes of this subsection property improvements may include, but are
not limited to: Road construction or road improvements ((required or
completed, timber cruise data, and timber thinning data)),
reforestation, land clearing, stock piling of rock, or any other agreed
upon property improvement. A report may be submitted in any reasonable
form or, at the purchaser's option, by submitting relevant excerpts of
the timber sales contract. A purchaser may comply by submitting the
information in the following form:

Purchaser's name, address, and contact information: . . . . . . . . . . . .
((Purchaser's)) Seller's name, address, and contact information: . . . . . . . . . . . .
Sale date: . . . . . . . . . . . .
Termination date: . . . . . . . . . . . .
Total sale price: . . . . . . . . . . . .
Legal description of sale area: . . . . . . . . . . . .
Sale name (if applicable): . . . . . . . . . . . .
Forest practice application/Harvest permit
number (if available): . . . . . . . . . . . .
Total acreage involved: . . . . . . . . . . . .
Estimated net volume of timber purchased by tree species
and log grade: . . . . . . . . . . . .
((Legal description of sale area: . . . . . . . . . . . . ))
Description and value of property improvements, such as road
construction or road improvements, reforestation, land clearing, stock
piling of rock, or any other agreed upon property improvement: . . . . . . . . . . . .
((Timber cruise data: . . . . . . . . . . . .
Timber thinning data: . . . . . . . . . . . . ))

(3) A purchaser of privately owned timber involved in a purchase
described in subsection (1) of this section, who fails to report a
purchase as required, may be liable for a penalty of two hundred fifty
dollars for each failure to report, as determined by the department.
(4) Privately purchased timber reports are confidential taxpayer
information under RCW 82.32.330.
(5) This section expires July 1, ((2010)) 2014.

--- END ---