BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known as the Lakewood law
enforcement officers memorial act.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.76.050 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 47 s 20 are each
amended to read as follows:
As used in RCW 9A.76.070, 9A.76.080, ((and)) 9A.76.090, and section
3 of this act, a person "renders criminal assistance" if, with intent
to prevent, hinder, or delay the apprehension or prosecution of another
person who he knows has committed a crime or juvenile offense or is
being sought by law enforcement officials for the commission of a crime
or juvenile offense or has escaped from a detention facility, he:
(1) Harbors or conceals such person; or
(2) Warns such person of impending discovery or apprehension; or
(3) Provides such person with money, transportation, disguise, or
other means of avoiding discovery or apprehension; or
(4) Prevents or obstructs, by use of force, deception, or threat,
anyone from performing an act that might aid in the discovery or
apprehension of such person; or
(5) Conceals, alters, or destroys any physical evidence that might
aid in the discovery or apprehension of such person; or
(6) Provides such person with a weapon.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 9A.76 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of rendering aggravated criminal assistance
in the first degree if he or she renders criminal assistance to a
person who has committed or is being sought for murder in the first
degree of a peace officer and, if the person who has committed or is
being sought for the offense were to be convicted or plead guilty of
the offense, the person would become a persistent offender under the
provisions of RCW 9.94A.570.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, rendering
aggravated criminal assistance in the first degree is a class B felony.
(b) Rendering aggravated criminal assistance in the first degree is
a class C felony, if it is established by a preponderance of the
evidence that the actor is a relative as defined in RCW 9A.76.060.

--- END ---