BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.30 RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington State University extension energy program shall
provide information, technical assistance, and consultation on physical
plant operation, maintenance, and construction issues to state and
local governments, tribal governments, and nonprofit organizations
through its plant operations support program. The Washington State
University extension energy program may not enter into facilities
design or construction contracts on behalf of state or local government
agencies, tribal governments, or nonprofit organizations. The plant
operations support program created in this section must be funded by
voluntary subscription charges, service fees, and other funding
acquired by or provided to Washington State University for such
purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 43.82.160 (Plant operation and support
program--Information and technical assistance--Voluntary charges and
fees) and 1997 c 96 s 3 are each repealed.

--- END ---