BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 59.30.020 and 2007 c 431 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Complainant" means a landlord, community owner, or tenant, who
has a complaint alleging a violation of chapter 59.20 RCW;
(2) "Department" means the department of licensing;
(3) "Director" means the director of licensing;
(4) "Landlord" or "community owner" means the owner of a mobile
home park or a manufactured housing community and includes the agents
of a landlord;
(5) "Manufactured home" means a single-family dwelling built
according to the United States department of housing and urban
development manufactured home construction and safety standards act,
which is a national preemptive building code. A manufactured home
also: (a) Includes plumbing, heating, air conditioning, and electrical
systems; (b) is built on a permanent chassis; and (c) can be
transported in one or more sections with each section at least eight
feet wide and forty feet long when transported, or when installed on
the site is three hundred twenty square feet or greater;
(6) "Mobile home" means a factory-built dwelling built prior to
June 15, 1976, to standards other than the United States department of
housing and urban development code, and acceptable under applicable
state codes in effect at the time of construction or introduction of
the home into the state. Mobile homes have not been built since the
introduction of the United States department of housing and urban
development manufactured home construction and safety act;
(7) "Manufactured/mobile home" means either a manufactured home or
a mobile home;
(8) "Manufactured/mobile home lot" means a portion of a
manufactured/mobile home community designated as the location of one
mobile home, manufactured home, or park model and its accessory
buildings, and intended for the exclusive use as a primary residence by
the occupants of that mobile home, manufactured home, or park model;
(9) "Mobile home park," "manufactured housing community," or
"manufactured/mobile home community" means any real property that is
rented or held out for rent to others for the placement of two or more
mobile homes, manufactured homes, or park models((, or recreational
vehicles)) for the primary purpose of production of income, except
where the real property is rented or held out for rent for seasonal
recreational purposes only and is not used for year-round occupancy;
(10) "Owner" means one or more persons, jointly or severally, in
whom is vested:
(a) All or part of the legal title to the real property; or
(b) All or part of the beneficial ownership, and a right to present
use and enjoyment of the real property;
(11) "Park model" means a recreational vehicle intended for
permanent or semipermanent installation and is used as a permanent
residence;
(12) "Recreational vehicle" means a travel trailer, motor home,
truck camper, or camping trailer that is primarily designed and used as
((a permanent residence located in a mobile home park or manufactured
housing community)) temporary living quarters, is either self-propelled
or mounted on or drawn by another vehicle, is transient, is not
occupied as a primary residence, and is not immobilized or permanently
affixed to a mobile home lot;
(13) "Respondent" means a landlord, community owner, or tenant,
alleged to have committed (([a])) (a) violation of chapter 59.20 RCW;
(14) "Tenant" means any person, except a transient as defined in
RCW 59.20.030, who rents a mobile home lot.

--- END ---