BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the
department of social and health services current geographical
classifications for setting vendor rates for supported living providers
creates a disparity in compensation rates between Snohomish county
providers and King county providers, despite the fact that Snohomish
and King counties share the same client base and the same pool of
supported living workers. Although Snohomish and King counties are
often classified as part of the same metropolitan area for funding
purposes, the current department classifications provide significantly
higher rates for King county vendors, resulting in significantly higher
compensation for King county supported living workers. Snohomish
county workers are attracted by King county's higher compensation,
causing an unsustainably high turnover of these important service
providers in Snohomish county.
(2) The legislature further finds that stabilizing the turnover of
supported living workers in Snohomish county would provide better
structure and security for the adults with developmental disabilities
who rely on the care and services provided by supported living workers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 71A.10 RCW
to read as follows:
Whenever vendor rates for supported living providers are
established, or otherwise affected by legislative action, the
legislature must reduce the disparity in vendor rates between King
county supported living providers and Snohomish county supported living
providers, until the vendor rates for King county supported living
providers and Snohomish county supported living providers are equal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---