BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.54.050 and 1997 c 439 s 2 and 1997 c 32 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
In conjunction with the programs provided for in RCW 90.54.040(1),
whenever it appears necessary to the director in carrying out the
policy of this chapter, the department may by rule adopted pursuant to
chapter 34.05 RCW:
(1) Reserve and set aside waters for beneficial utilization in the
future((,)); and
(2)(a) When sufficient information and data are ((lacking))
available to allow for the making of sound decisions, withdraw various
waters of the state from additional appropriations ((until such data
and information are available)).
(b) Prior to withdrawing waters of the state from additional
appropriations, the department shall ensure future water users have the
ability to acquire sufficient water for all uses authorized under RCW
90.44.050. The department must have reasonable evidence that the
program that provides future water users with sufficient water is
accessible, easy to use, and operational. The department may utilize
programs such as: A mechanism to bank water; a local water plan
resembling the water plan authorized in chapter 90.92 RCW; water
storage facilities; voluntary regional agreements resembling the
voluntary regional agreement as authorized in chapter 90.90 RCW; or any
other program suitable for providing sufficient water.
(c) Before proposing the adoption of rules to withdraw waters of
the state from additional appropriation, the department shall consult
with the standing committees of the house of representatives and the
senate having jurisdiction over water resource management issues.
Prior to the adoption of a rule under this section, the department
shall conduct a public hearing in each county in which waters relating
to the rule are located. The public hearing shall be preceded by a
notice placed in a newspaper of general circulation published within
each of said counties. Rules adopted hereunder shall be subject to
review in accordance with the provisions of RCW 34.05.240.

--- END ---