BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 76.04.015 and 1993 c 196 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may, at its discretion, appoint trained
personnel possessing the necessary qualifications to carry out the
duties and supporting functions of the department and may determine
their respective salaries.
(2) The department shall have direct charge of and supervision of
all matters pertaining to the forest fire service of the state.
(3) The department shall:
(a) Enforce all laws within this chapter;
(b) Be empowered to take charge of and direct the work of
suppressing forest fires;
(c)(i) Investigate the origin and cause of all forest fires to
determine whether either a criminal act or negligence by any person,
firm, or corporation caused the starting, spreading, or existence of
the fire. In conducting investigations, the department shall work
cooperatively, to the extent possible, with utilities, property owners,
and other interested parties to identify and preserve evidence. Except
as provided otherwise in this subsection, the department in conducting
investigations is authorized, without court order, to take possession
or control of relevant evidence found in plain view and belonging to
any person, firm, or corporation. To the extent possible, the
department shall notify the person, firm, or corporation of its intent
to take possession or control of the evidence. The person, firm, or
corporation shall be afforded reasonable opportunity to view the
evidence and, before the department takes possession or control of the
evidence, also shall be afforded reasonable opportunity to examine,
document, and photograph it. If the person, firm, or corporation
objects in writing to the department's taking possession or control of
the evidence, the department must either return the evidence within
seven days after the day on which the department is provided with the
written objections or obtain a court order authorizing the continued
possession or control.
(ii) Absent a court order authorizing otherwise, the department may
not take possession or control of evidence over the objection of the
owner of the evidence if((: (i))) the evidence is used by the owner in
conducting a business or in providing an electric utility service((;))
and (((ii))) the department's taking possession or control of the
evidence would substantially and materially interfere with the
operation of the business or provision of electric utility service.
(iii) Absent a court order authorizing otherwise, the department
may not take possession or control of evidence over the objection of an
electric utility when the evidence is not owned by the utility but has
caused damage to property owned by the utility. However, this
((paragraph)) subsection (3)(c)(iii) does not apply if the department
has notified the utility of its intent to take possession or control of
the evidence and provided the utility with reasonable time to examine,
document, and photograph the evidence.
(iv) Only personnel qualified to work on electrical equipment may
take possession or control of evidence owned or controlled by an
electric utility;
(d) Furnish notices or information to the public calling attention
to forest fire dangers and the penalties for violation of this chapter;
(e) Be familiar with all timbered and cut-over areas of the state;
and
(f) Regulate and control the official actions of its employees, the
wardens, and the rangers.
(4) The department may:
(a) Authorize all needful and proper expenditures for forest
protection;
(b) Adopt rules consistent with this section for the prevention,
control, and suppression of forest fires as it considers necessary
including but not limited to: Fire equipment and materials; use of
personnel; and fire prevention standards and operating conditions
including a provision for reducing these conditions where justified by
local factors such as location and weather;
(c) Remove at will the commission of any ranger or suspend the
authority of any warden;
(d) Inquire into:
(i) The extent, kind, value, and condition of all timber lands
within the state;
(ii) The extent to which timber lands are being destroyed by fire
and the damage thereon.
(5) Any rules adopted under this section for the suppression of
forest fires must include a mechanism by which a local fire
mobilization radio frequency, consistent with RCW 43.43.963, is
identified and made available during the initial response to any forest
fire that crosses jurisdictional lines so that all responders have
access to communications during the response. Different initial
response frequencies may be identified and used as appropriate in
different geographic response areas. If the fire radio communication
needs escalate beyond the capability of the identified local radio
frequency, the use of other available designated interoperability radio
frequencies may be used.
(6) When the department considers it to be in the best interest of
the state, it may cooperate with any agency of another state, the
United States or any agency thereof, the Dominion of Canada or any
agency or province thereof, and any county, town, corporation,
individual, or Indian tribe within the state of Washington in forest
firefighting and patrol.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.43.963 and 1997 c 49 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Regions within the state are initially established as follows
but may be adjusted as necessary by the state fire marshal:
(((1))) (a) Northwest region - Whatcom, Skagit, Snohomish, San
Juan, and Island counties;
(((2))) (b) Northeast region - Okanogan, Ferry, Stevens, Pend
Oreille, Spokane, and Lincoln counties;
(((3))) (c) Olympic region - Clallam and Jefferson counties;
(((4))) (d) South Puget Sound region - Kitsap, Mason, King, and
Pierce counties;
(((5))) (e) Southeast region - Chelan, Douglas, Kittitas, Grant,
Adams, Whitman, Yakima, Klickitat, Benton, Franklin, Walla Walla,
Columbia, Garfield, and Asotin counties;
(((6))) (f) Central region - Grays Harbor, Thurston, Pacific, and
Lewis counties; and
(((7))) (g) Southwest region - Wahkiakum, Cowlitz, Clark, and
Skamania counties.
(2)(a) There is created a regional fire defense board within each
((of these)) region((s there is created a regional fire defense board))
created in subsection (1) of this section.
(b) The regional fire defense boards shall consist of two members
from each county in the region. One member from each county shall be
appointed by the county fire chiefs' association or, in the event there
is no such county association, by the county's legislative authority.
Each county's office of emergency management or, in the event there is
no such office, the county's legislative authority shall select the
second representative to the regional board. The department of natural
resources fire control chief shall appoint a representative from each
department of natural resources region to serve as a member of the
appropriate regional fire defense board.
(c) Members of each regional board will select a chairperson and
secretary as officers. Members serving on the regional boards do so in
a voluntary capacity and are not eligible for reimbursement for
meeting-related expenses from the state.
(3)(a) Regional defense boards shall develop regional fire service
plans that include provisions for organized fire agencies to respond
across municipal, county, or regional boundaries.
(b) Each regional plan shall be consistent with the incident
command system, the Washington state fire services mobilization plan,
the requirements of this section, and regional response plans already
adopted and in use in the state. The regional boards shall work with
the relevant local government entities to facilitate development of
intergovernmental agreements if any such agreements are required to
implement a regional fire service plan.
(c) Each regional fire service plan must include a mechanism by
which a local fire mobilization radio frequency, consistent with RCW
76.04.015, is identified and made available during the initial response
to any forest fire that crosses jurisdictional lines so that all
responders have access to communications during the response.
Different initial response frequencies may be identified and used as
appropriate in different geographic response areas. If the fire radio
communication needs escalate beyond the capability of the identified
local radio frequency, the use of other available designated
interoperability radio frequencies may be used.
(d) Each regional fire service plan shall be approved by the fire
protection policy board before implementation.

--- END ---