BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 84.40 RCW
to read as follows:
The county assessor must reduce the fair market value of real
property to reflect the impact of restrictions or emergency rules
imposed by the department of ecology that result in the real property
owner being unable to fully exercise a groundwater right exempt from
the permit requirement under RCW 90.44.050. The levy for each taxing
district in any year must be reduced as necessary to prevent reductions
under this section from resulting in a higher tax rate than would have
occurred in the absence of the reductions under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2011 and thereafter.

--- END ---