BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that since 2004,
school districts have been permitted to restore full funding for
Initiative 728 and Initiative 732 in the levy base. The intent of the
legislature is to extend the expiration date for this provision and
also to restore in the base funding received for staffing enhancements
in grades kindergarten through four.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.52.0531 and 2009 c 4 s 908 are each amended to read
as follows:
The maximum dollar amount which may be levied by or for any school
district for maintenance and operation support under the provisions of
RCW 84.52.053 shall be determined as follows:
(1) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1997, the
maximum dollar amount shall be calculated pursuant to the laws and
rules in effect in November 1996.
(2) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and
thereafter, the maximum dollar amount shall be the sum of (a) plus or
minus (b) and (c) of this subsection minus (d) of this subsection:
(a) The district's levy base as defined in subsections (3) and (4)
of this section multiplied by the district's maximum levy percentage as
defined in subsection (5) of this section;
(b) For districts in a high/nonhigh relationship, the high school
district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the nonhigh school
district's maximum levy amount shall be increased by an amount equal to
the estimated amount of the nonhigh payment due to the high school
district under RCW 28A.545.030(3) and 28A.545.050 for the school year
commencing the year of the levy;
(c) For districts in an interdistrict cooperative agreement, the
nonresident school district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and
the resident school district's maximum levy amount shall be increased
by an amount equal to the per pupil basic education allocation included
in the nonresident district's levy base under subsection (3) of this
section multiplied by:
(i) The number of full-time equivalent students served from the
resident district in the prior school year; multiplied by:
(ii) The serving district's maximum levy percentage determined
under subsection (5) of this section; increased by:
(iii) The percent increase per full-time equivalent student as
stated in the state basic education appropriation section of the
biennial budget between the prior school year and the current school
year divided by fifty-five percent;
(d) The district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced by the
maximum amount of state matching funds for which the district is
eligible under RCW 28A.500.010.
(3) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 2005 and
thereafter, a district's levy base shall be the sum of allocations in
(a) through (c) of this subsection received by the district for the
prior school year and the amounts determined under subsection (4) of
this section, including allocations for compensation increases, plus
the sum of such allocations multiplied by the percent increase per full
time equivalent student as stated in the state basic education
appropriation section of the biennial budget between the prior school
year and the current school year and divided by fifty-five percent. A
district's levy base shall not include local school district property
tax levies or other local revenues, or state and federal allocations
not identified in (a) through (c) of this subsection.
(a) The district's basic education allocation as determined
pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350;
(b) State and federal categorical allocations for the following
programs:
(i) Pupil transportation;
(ii) Special education;
(iii) Education of highly capable students;
(iv) Compensatory education, including but not limited to learning
assistance, migrant education, Indian education, refugee programs, and
bilingual education;
(v) Food services; and
(vi) Statewide block grant programs; and
(c) Any other federal allocations for elementary and secondary
school programs, including direct grants, other than federal impact aid
funds and allocations in lieu of taxes.
(4)(a) For levy collections in calendar years 2005 through ((2011))
2017, in addition to the allocations included under subsection (3)(a)
through (c) of this section, a district's levy base shall also include
the following:
(((a))) (i)(A) For levy collections in calendar year 2010, the
difference between the allocation the district would have received in
the current school year had RCW 84.52.068 not been amended by chapter
19, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess. and the allocation the district received
in the current school year pursuant to RCW ((84.52.068. The office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall offset the amount added
to a district's levy base pursuant to this subsection (4)(a) by any
additional per student allocations included in a district's levy base
pursuant to the enactment of an initiative to the people subsequent to
June 10, 2004)) 28A.505.220;
(B) For levy collections in calendar years 2011 through 2017, the
difference between the allocation rate the district would have received
in the prior school year using the Initiative 728 rate and the
allocation rate the district received in the prior school year pursuant
to RCW 28A.505.220 multiplied by the full-time equivalent student
enrollment used to calculate the Initiative 728 allocation for the
prior school year; and
(((b))) (ii) The difference between the allocations the district
would have received the prior school year ((had RCW 28A.400.205 not
been amended by chapter 20, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess.)) using the
Initiative 732 base and the allocations the district actually received
the prior school year pursuant to RCW 28A.400.205((. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall offset the amount added to
a district's levy base pursuant to this subsection (4)(b) by any
additional salary increase allocations included in a district's levy
base pursuant to the enactment of an initiative to the people
subsequent to June 10, 2004)).
(b) For levy collections in calendar years 2011 through 2017, in
addition to the allocations included under subsections (3)(a) through
(c) and (4)(a) of this section, a district's levy base shall also
include the difference between an allocation of fifty-three and two-tenths certificated instructional staff units per thousand full-time
equivalent students in grades kindergarten through four enrolled in the
prior school year and the allocation of certificated instructional
staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades
kindergarten through four that the district actually received in the
prior school year, except that the levy base for a school district
whose allocation in the 2009-10 school year was less than fifty-three
and two-tenths certificated instructional staff units per thousand
full-time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through four shall
include the difference between the allocation the district actually
received in the 2009-10 school year and the allocation the district
actually received in the prior school year.
(5) A district's maximum levy percentage shall be twenty-two
percent in 1998 and twenty-four percent in 1999 and every year
thereafter; plus, for qualifying districts, the grandfathered
percentage determined as follows:
(a) For 1997, the difference between the district's 1993 maximum
levy percentage and twenty percent; and
(b) For 1998 and thereafter, the percentage calculated as follows:
(i) Multiply the grandfathered percentage for the prior year times
the district's levy base determined under subsection (3) of this
section;
(ii) Reduce the result of (b)(i) of this subsection by any levy
reduction funds as defined in subsection (6) of this section that are
to be allocated to the district for the current school year;
(iii) Divide the result of (b)(ii) of this subsection by the
district's levy base; and
(iv) Take the greater of zero or the percentage calculated in
(b)(iii) of this subsection.
(6) "Levy reduction funds" shall mean increases in state funds from
the prior school year for programs included under subsections (3) and
(4) of this section: (a) That are not attributable to enrollment
changes, compensation increases, or inflationary adjustments; and (b)
that are or were specifically identified as levy reduction funds in the
appropriations act. If levy reduction funds are dependent on formula
factors which would not be finalized until after the start of the
current school year, the superintendent of public instruction shall
estimate the total amount of levy reduction funds by using prior school
year data in place of current school year data. Levy reduction funds
shall not include moneys received by school districts from cities or
counties.
(7) ((For the purposes of this section,)) The definitions in this
subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(a) "Prior school year" means the most recent school year completed
prior to the year in which the levies are to be collected.
(((8) For the purposes of this section,)) (b) "Current school year"
means the year immediately following the prior school year.
(((9))) (c) "Initiative 728 rate" means the allocation rate at
which the student achievement program would have been funded under
chapter 3, Laws of 2001, if all annual adjustments to the initial 2001
allocation had been made in previous years and in each subsequent year
as provided for under chapter 3, Laws of 2001.
(d) "Initiative 732 base" means the prior year's state allocation
for annual salary cost-of-living increases for district employees in
the state-funded salary base as it would have been calculated under
chapter 4, Laws of 2001, if each annual cost-of-living increase
allocation had been provided in previous years and in each subsequent
year.
(8) Funds collected from transportation vehicle fund tax levies
shall not be subject to the levy limitations in this section.
(((10))) (9) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop
rules and regulations and inform school districts of the pertinent data
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
(((11))) (10) For calendar year 2009, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall recalculate school district
levy authority to reflect levy rates certified by school districts for
calendar year 2009.

Sec. 3 2006 c 119 s 3 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
This act expires January 1, ((2012)) 2018.

Sec. 4 2009 c 4 s 909 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
Section 908 of this act expires January 1, ((2012)) 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 2 of this act expires January 1,
2018.

--- END ---