BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Health plans issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2011,
that include coverage for prescribed durable medical equipment and
mobility enhancing equipment must include the sales tax or use tax
calculation in plan payment, consistent with the application of sales
tax in chapter 82.08 RCW or use tax in chapter 82.12 RCW.
(2) The payment for covered durable medical equipment and mobility
enhancing equipment must:
(a) Reflect the negotiated provider agreement for the prescribed
equipment; and
(b) Separately identify the sales tax or use tax calculation that
is included in the payment if the provider submitting a claim or
invoice for reimbursement submits to the health plan a claim or invoice
with a separate line item for the geographically adjusted sales tax.
(3) The following definitions apply to this section unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Durable medical equipment" means equipment, including repair
and replacement parts for durable medical equipment that:
(i) Can withstand repeated use;
(ii) Is primarily and customarily used to serve a medical purpose;
(iii) Generally is not useful to a person in the absence of illness
or injury; and
(iv) Is not worn in or on the body.
(b) "Mobility enhancing equipment" means equipment, including
repair and replacement parts for mobility enhancing equipment that:
(i) Is primarily and customarily used to provide or increase the
ability to move from one place to another and that is appropriate for
use either in a home or a motor vehicle;
(ii) Is not generally used by persons with normal mobility; and
(iii) Does not include any motor vehicle or equipment on a motor
vehicle normally provided by a motor vehicle manufacturer.

--- END ---