BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 54.16.280 and 2002 c 276 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any district is hereby authorized, within limits established by the
Constitution of the state of Washington, to assist the owners of
structures or equipment in financing the acquisition and installation
of materials and equipment, for compensation or otherwise, for the
conservation or more efficient use of energy in such structures or
equipment pursuant to an energy conservation plan adopted by the
district if the cost per unit of energy saved or produced by the use of
such materials and equipment is less than the cost per unit of energy
produced by the next least costly new energy resource which the
district could acquire to meet future demand. Any financing authorized
under this chapter shall only be used for conservation purposes in
existing structures, and such financing shall not be used for any
purpose which results in a conversion from one energy source to
another. For the purposes of this section, "conservation purposes in
existing structures" may include projects to allow a district's
customers to generate all or a portion of their own electricity through
the on-site installation of a distributed electricity generation system
that uses as its fuel solar, wind, geothermal, or hydropower, or other
renewable resource that is available on-site and not from a commercial
source. Such projects shall not be considered "a conversion from one
energy source to another" which is limited to the change or
substitution of one commercial energy supplier for another commercial
energy supplier. Except where otherwise authorized, such assistance
shall be limited to:
(1) Providing an inspection of the structure or equipment, either
directly or through one or more inspectors under contract, to determine
and inform the owner of the estimated cost of purchasing and installing
conservation materials and equipment for which financial assistance
will be approved and the estimated life cycle savings in energy costs
that are likely to result from the installation of such materials or
equipment;
(2) Providing a list of businesses who sell and install such
materials and equipment within or in close proximity to the service
area of the district, each of which businesses shall have requested to
be included and shall have the ability to provide the products in a
workmanlike manner and to utilize such materials in accordance with the
prevailing national standard((s.));
(3) Arranging to have approved conservation materials and equipment
installed by a private contractor whose bid is acceptable to the owner
of the residential structure and verifying such installation; ((and))
(4) Arranging or providing financing for the purchase and
installation of approved conservation materials and equipment. Such
materials and equipment shall be purchased from a private business and
shall be installed by a private business or the owner((.)); and
(5) Pay back shall be in the form of incremental additions to the
utility bill, billed either together with use charge or separately.
Loans shall not exceed ((one)) two hundred ((twenty)) forty months in
length.

Sec. 2 RCW 87.03.017 and 1982 c 42 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any irrigation district engaged in the distribution of energy is
hereby authorized, within limits established by the Constitution of the
state of Washington, to assist the owners of residential structures in
financing the acquisition and installation of materials and equipment,
for compensation or otherwise, for the conservation or more efficient
use of energy in such structures pursuant to an energy conservation
plan adopted by the irrigation district if the cost per unit of energy
saved or produced by the use of such materials and equipment is less
than the cost per unit of energy produced by the next least costly new
energy resource which the irrigation district could acquire to meet
future demand. Except where otherwise authorized, such assistance
shall be limited to:
(1) Providing an inspection of the residential structure, either
directly or through one or more inspectors under contract, to determine
and inform the owner of the estimated cost of purchasing and installing
conservation materials and equipment for which financial assistance
will be approved and the estimated life cycle savings in energy costs
that are likely to result from the installation of such materials or
equipment.
(2) Providing a list of businesses who sell and install such
materials and equipment within or in close proximity to the service
area of the irrigation district, each of which businesses shall have
requested to be included and shall have the ability to provide the
products in a workmanlike manner and to utilize such materials in
accordance with the prevailing national standards.
(3) Arranging to have approved conservation materials and equipment
installed by a private contractor whose bid is acceptable to the owner
of the residential structure and verifying such installation.
(4) Arranging or providing financing for the purchase and
installation of approved conservation materials and equipment. Such
materials and equipment shall be purchased from a private business and
shall be installed by a private business or the owner.
(5) Pay back shall be in the form of incremental additions to the
utility bill, billed either together with use charge or separately.
Loans shall not exceed ((one)) two hundred ((twenty)) forty months in
length.

--- END ---