BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.92.017 and 1989 c 421 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any city or town engaged in the sale or distribution of water is
hereby authorized, within limits established by the Constitution of the
state of Washington, to assist the owners of structures in financing
the acquisition and installation of fixtures, systems, and equipment,
for compensation or otherwise, for the conservation or more efficient
use of water in the structures under a water conservation plan adopted
by the city or town if the cost per unit of water saved or conserved by
the use of the fixtures, systems, and equipment is less than the cost
per unit of water supplied by the next least costly new water source
available to the city or town to meet future demand. Except where
otherwise authorized, assistance shall be limited to:
(1) Providing an inspection of the structure, either directly or
through one or more inspectors under contract, to determine and inform
the owner of the estimated cost of purchasing and installing
conservation fixtures, systems, and equipment for which financial
assistance will be approved and the estimated life cycle savings to the
water system and the consumer that are likely to result from the
installation of the fixtures, systems, or equipment;
(2) Providing a list of businesses that sell and install the
fixtures, systems, and equipment within or in close proximity to the
service area of the city or town, each of which businesses shall have
requested to be included and shall have the ability to provide the
products in a workmanlike manner and to utilize the fixtures, systems,
and equipment in accordance with the prevailing national standards;
(3) Arranging to have approved conservation fixtures, systems, and
equipment installed by a private contractor whose bid is acceptable to
the owner of the structure and verifying the installation; and
(4) Arranging or providing financing for the purchase and
installation of approved conservation fixtures, systems, and equipment.
The fixtures, systems, and equipment shall be purchased or installed by
a private business, the owner, or the utility.
Pay back shall be in the form of incremental additions to the
utility bill, billed either together with use charge or separately.
Loans shall not exceed ((one)) two hundred ((twenty)) forty months in
length.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.94.460 and 1992 c 25 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any county engaged in the sale or distribution of water is hereby
authorized, within limits established by the Constitution of the state
of Washington, to assist the owners of structures that are provided
water service by the county in financing the acquisition and
installation of fixtures, systems, and equipment, for compensation or
otherwise, for the conservation or more efficient use of water in the
structures under a water conservation plan adopted by the county if the
cost per unit of water saved or conserved by the use of the fixtures,
systems, and equipment is less than the cost per unit of water supplied
by the next least costly new water source available to the county to
meet future demand. Except where otherwise authorized, assistance
shall be limited to:
(1) Providing an inspection of the structure, either directly or
through one or more inspectors under contract, to determine and inform
the owner of the estimated cost of purchasing and installing
conservation fixtures, systems, and equipment for which financial
assistance will be approved and the estimated life cycle savings to the
water system and the consumer that are likely to result from the
installation of the fixtures, systems, or equipment;
(2) Providing a list of businesses that sell and install the
fixtures, systems, and equipment within or in close proximity to the
service area of the county, each of which businesses shall have
requested to be included and shall have the ability to provide the
products in a workmanlike manner and to utilize the fixtures, systems,
and equipment in accordance with the prevailing national standards;
(3) Arranging to have approved conservation fixtures, systems, and
equipment installed by a private contractor whose bid is acceptable to
the owner of the structure and verifying the installation; and
(4) Arranging or providing financing for the purchase and
installation of approved conservation fixtures, systems, and equipment.
The fixtures, systems, and equipment shall be purchased or installed by
a private business, the owner, or the utility.
Pay back shall be in the form of incremental additions to the
utility bill, billed either together with (([the])) the use charge or
separately. Loans shall not exceed ((one)) two hundred ((twenty))
forty months in length.

Sec. 3 RCW 57.08.160 and 1996 c 230 s 324 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any district is hereby authorized, within limits established by the
Constitution of the state of Washington, to assist the owners of
structures in financing the acquisition and installation of fixtures,
systems, and equipment, for compensation or otherwise, for the
conservation or more efficient use of water in the structures under a
water conservation plan adopted by the district if the cost per unit of
water saved or conserved by the use of the fixtures, systems, and
equipment is less than the cost per unit of water supplied by the next
least costly new water source available to the district to meet future
demand. Except where otherwise authorized, assistance shall be limited
to:
(1) Providing an inspection of the structure, either directly or
through one or more inspectors under contract, to determine and inform
the owner of the estimated cost of purchasing and installing
conservation fixtures, systems, and equipment for which financial
assistance will be approved and the estimated life cycle savings to the
water system and the consumer that are likely to result from the
installation of the fixtures, systems, or equipment;
(2) Providing a list of businesses that sell and install the
fixtures, systems, and equipment within or in close proximity to the
service area of the city or town, each of which businesses shall have
requested to be included and shall have the ability to provide the
products in a workmanlike manner and to utilize the fixtures, systems,
and equipment in accordance with the prevailing national standards;
(3) Arranging to have approved conservation fixtures, systems, and
equipment installed by a private contractor whose bid is acceptable to
the owner of the structure and verifying the installation; and
(4) Arranging or providing financing for the purchase and
installation of approved conservation fixtures, systems, and equipment.
The fixtures, systems, and equipment shall be purchased or installed by
a private business, the owner, or the utility.
Pay back shall be in the form of incremental additions to the
utility bill, billed either together with the use charge or separately.
Loans shall not exceed ((one)) two hundred ((twenty)) forty months in
length.

--- END ---