BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the September 9, 2009, study of the
financial health of the Washington state retirement system by the state
actuary has revealed a substantial deterioration in the financial
strength and stability of the state retirement system plans. The study
identified many factors that combined to cause the health of the plans
to deteriorate, including large investment losses, delayed and
suspended contributions, and increased benefits.
(2)(a) Consistent with these findings, the legislature intends to
prohibit any benefit increases in the Washington state retirement
systems from being enacted until the development of a risk analysis
system by the office of the state actuary. It is anticipated that a
risk analysis system will be complete by December 31, 2012.
(b) This prohibition encompasses all of the state retirement
systems administered by the department of retirement systems, including
the public employees' retirement system, the public safety employees'
retirement system, the law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
retirement system, the school employees' retirement system, the
teachers' retirement system, and the Washington state patrol retirement
system.
(3) The select committee on pension policy may not recommend any
increases in pension benefits to the retirement systems listed in
subsection (2)(b) of this section until the earlier of December 31,
2011, or the completion of the risk assessment by the office of the
state actuary.

--- END ---