BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 3.34.140 and 1984 c 258 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any district judge may hold a session in any district in the state,
at the request of the judge or majority of judges in the district if
the visiting judge determines that the state of business in his or her
district allows the judge to be absent. The county legislative
authority in which the district court is located shall first approve
the temporary absence and the judge pro tempore shall not be required
to serve during the judge's absence. A visiting judge shall be
entitled to reimbursement for subsistence, lodging, and travel expenses
in accordance with the rates applicable to state officers under RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now or hereafter amended while so acting, to
be paid by the visited district. These expenses shall not be paid to
the visiting judge unless the legislative authority of the county in
which the visited district is located has approved the payment before
the visit. In addition a visiting part-time district court judge shall
be entitled to compensation for judicial services so long as the
legislative authority of the county in which the visited district is
located has approved the payment before the visit.

--- END ---