BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.162.005 and 2007 c 232 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that ((Washington's innovation and trade-driven economy has provided tremendous opportunities for citizens of
the state, but that there is no guarantee that globally competitive
firms will continue to grow and locate in the state. The current
economic development system is fragmented among numerous programs,
councils, centers, and organizations with inadequate overall
coordination and insufficient guidance built into the system to ensure
that the system is responsive to its customers. The current economic
development system's data-gathering and evaluation methods are
inconsistent and unable to provide adequate information for determining
how well the system is performing on a regular basis so the system may
be held accountable for its outcomes.
The legislature also finds that developing a comprehensive economic
development strategic plan to guide the operation of effective economic
development programs, including workforce training, infrastructure
development, small business assistance, technology transfer, and export
assistance, is vital to the state's efforts to increase the
competitiveness of state businesses, encourage employment growth,
increase state revenues, and generate economic well-being. There is a
need for responsive and consistent involvement of the private sector in
the state's economic development efforts. The legislature finds that
there is a need for the development of coordination criteria for
business recruitment, expansion, and retention activities carried out
by the state and local entities. It is the intent of the legislature
to create an economic development commission that will provide
planning, coordination, evaluation, monitoring, and policy analysis and
development for the state economic development system as a whole, and
advice to the governor and legislature concerning the state economic
development system)) in order to achieve long-term global
competitiveness, prosperity, and economic opportunity for all the
state's citizens, Washington state must become the most attractive,
creative, and fertile investment environment for innovation in the
world.
The legislature finds that the state must take a strategic approach
to fostering an innovation economy, and that success will be driven by
public and private sector leaders who are committed to developing and
advocating a shared vision and collaborating across organizational and
geographic boundaries.
The legislature intends therefore that (1) the Washington economic
development commission be comprised of business, labor, academic,
association, and government leaders, and (2) the commission's mission
be to create and regularly update a comprehensive statewide economic
development strategy to guide the state's investments in economic
development activities including: Infrastructure, talent and workforce
development, technology transfer, trade, access to capital, and
entrepreneurship.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.162.010 and 2007 c 232 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington state economic development commission is
established to ((oversee the economic development strategies and
policies of the department of community, trade, and economic
development)) assist the governor and legislature by providing
leadership, direction, and guidance on a long-term and systematic
approach to economic development that will result in enduring global
competitiveness, prosperity, and economic opportunity for all the
state's citizens.
(2)(a) The ((Washington state economic development)) commission
shall consist of ((eleven voting)) twenty-three members. Fifteen of
the members shall be voting members appointed by the governor as
follows: ((Six)) Eight representatives of the private sector, one
representative of labor from east of the crest of the Cascade mountains
and one representative of labor from west of the crest of the Cascade
mountains, one representative of port districts, one representative of
four-year state public higher education, one representative ((for)) of
state community or technical colleges, one representative of nonprofit
trade associations engaged in economic development, and one
representative of associate development organizations. The nonvoting
ex officio members are: The director of the department of ((community,
trade, and economic development)) commerce, the director of the
workforce training and education coordinating board, the commissioner
of the employment security department, and the secretary of the
department of transportation ((and)). The voting ex officio members
are the chairs and ranking minority members of the standing committees
of the house of representatives and the senate overseeing economic
development policies ((shall serve as nonvoting ex officio members)).
(b) Members may not designate alternates, substitutes, or
surrogates. However, members may participate in a meeting by
conference telephone or similar communications equipment so that all
persons participating in the meeting can hear each other at the same
time. Participation by that method constitutes presence in person at
a meeting.
(c) The chair of the commission shall be a voting member ((selected
by the governor with the consent of the senate, and shall serve at the
pleasure of the governor. In selecting the chair, the governor shall
seek a person who understands the future economic needs of the state
and nation and the role the state's economic development system has in
meeting those needs)) elected by members of the commission to a two-
year term. The chair may be reelected to serve additional terms. The
chair or vice-chair may not be the director of an executive branch
agency or a member of the legislature. A vice-chair shall also be
elected by members of the commission and shall exercise the duties of
the commission chair in his or her absence.
(((b))) (d) In making the appointments, the governor shall consult
with the commission and with organizations that have an interest in
economic development, including, but not limited to, industry
associations, labor organizations, minority business associations,
economic development councils, chambers of commerce, port associations,
tribes, and the chairs of the legislative committees with jurisdiction
over economic development.
(((c))) (e) The members shall be representative of the geographic
regions of the state, including eastern and central Washington, as well
as represent the ethnic diversity of the state. Private sector members
shall represent existing and emerging industries, small businesses,
women-owned businesses, and minority-owned businesses. Members of the
commission shall serve statewide interests while preserving their
diverse perspectives, and shall be recognized leaders in their fields
with demonstrated experience in economic development, innovation, or
disciplines related to economic development.
(3) Members appointed by the governor shall serve at the pleasure
of the governor for not more than two consecutive three-year terms,
except that, as determined by the governor, the terms of four of the
appointees on the commission on the effective date of this section
expire in 2011, the terms of four of the appointees on the commission
on the effective date of this section expire in 2012, and the terms of
three of the appointees on the commission on the effective date of this
section expire in 2013. Thereafter all terms shall be for three years.
Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original
appointments.
(4) The commission may establish committees as it desires, and may
invite nonmembers of the commission to serve as committee members.
(5) The executive director of the commission shall be appointed by
the governor with the consent of the ((voting members of the))
commission. The salary of the executive director shall be set by the
governor with the consent of the commission. The governor may dismiss
the executive director only with the approval of a majority vote of the
commission. The commission, by a majority vote, may dismiss the
executive director with the approval of the governor. The commission
shall evaluate the performance of the executive director in a manner
consistent with the process used by the governor to evaluate the
performance of agency directors.
(6) The commission may adopt ((rules)) policies and procedures for
its own governance.
(7) As used in this chapter, "commission" means the Washington
state economic development commission unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.162.015 and 2007 c 232 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The commission shall employ an executive director.)) The
executive director of the commission shall serve as its chief executive
officer ((of the commission and)). Subject to available resources and
in accordance with commission direction, the executive director shall:
(a) Administer the provisions of this chapter((, employ such
personnel as may be necessary to implement the purposes of this
chapter, utilize staff of existing operating agencies to the fullest
extent possible, and employ outside consulting and service agencies
when appropriate)).
(2) The executive director may not be the chair of the commission.
(3) The executive director shall));
(b) Appoint necessary staff who shall be exempt from the provisions
of chapter 41.06 RCW. The executive director's appointees shall serve
at the executive director's pleasure on such terms and conditions as
the executive director determines but subject to chapter 42.52 RCW((.
(4) The executive director shall));
(c) Appoint ((and employ such other)) employees ((as may be
required for the proper discharge of the functions of the commission))
who shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW; and
(d) Contract with additional persons who have specific technical
expertise if needed to carry out a specific, time-limited project.
(((5))) (2) The executive director shall exercise ((such))
additional ((powers)) authority, other than rule making, as may be
delegated by the commission.
(3) The executive director must develop for commission review and
approval an annual commission budget and work plan in accordance with
the omnibus appropriations bill approved by the legislature, and must
present a fiscal report to the commission quarterly for its review and
comment.
(4) The executive director of the commission shall report solely to
the governor and the commissioners on matters pertaining to commission
operations.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.162.020 and 2009 c 151 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The Washington state economic development commission shall:
(1) Concentrate its major efforts on planning, coordination,
evaluation, policy analysis, and recommending improvements to the
state's economic development system using, but not limited to, the
"Next Washington" plan and the global competitiveness council
recommendations;
(2) Develop and maintain on a biennial basis a state comprehensive
plan for economic development, including but not limited to goals,
objectives, and priorities for the state economic development system;
identify the elements local associate development organizations must
include in their countywide economic development plans; and review the
state system for consistency with the state comprehensive plan. The
plan shall include the industry clusters in the state and the strategic
clusters targeted by the commission for economic development efforts.
The commission shall consult with the workforce training and education
coordinating board and include labor market and economic information by
the employment security department in developing the list of clusters
and strategic clusters that meet the criteria identified by the working
group convened by the economic development commission and the workforce
training and education coordinating board under chapter 43.330 RCW. In
developing the state comprehensive plan for economic development, the
commission shall use, but may not be limited to: Economic, labor
market, and populations trend reports in office of financial management
forecasts; the annual state economic climate report prepared by the
economic climate council; joint office of financial management and
employment security department labor force, industry employment, and
occupational forecasts; the results of scientifically based outcome
evaluations; the needs of industry associations, industry clusters,
businesses, and employees as evidenced in formal surveys and other
input;
(3) Establish and maintain an inventory of the programs of the
state economic development system and related state programs; perform
a biennial assessment of the ongoing and strategic economic development
needs of the state; and assess the extent to which the economic
development system and related programs represent a consistent,
coordinated, efficient, and integrated approach to meet such needs; and
(4) Produce a biennial report to the governor and the legislature
on progress by the commission in coordinating the state's economic
development system and meeting the other obligations of this chapter,
as well as include recommendations for any statutory changes necessary
to enhance operational efficiencies or improve coordination.
The commission may delegate to the executive director any of the
functions of this section.)) (1) The commission shall concentrate its
major efforts on strategic planning, policy research and analysis,
advocacy, evaluation, and promoting coordination and collaboration.
(2)(a) During each regular legislative session, the commission
shall consult with appropriate legislative committees about the state's
economic development needs and opportunities.
(b) By June 15th of each even-numbered year, the commission shall
submit to the governor and legislature a biennial comprehensive
statewide economic development strategy. The strategy may include:
(i) An assessment of the state's economic vitality;
(ii) Recommended goals, objectives, and priorities for the next
biennium, and the future;
(iii) A common set of outcomes and benchmarks for the economic
development system as a whole;
(iv) Recommendations for removing barriers and promoting
collaboration among participants in the innovation ecosystem;
(v) An inventory of existing relevant programs compiled by the
commission from materials submitted by agencies;
(vi) Recommendations for expanding, discontinuing, or redirecting
existing programs, or adding new programs; and
(vii) Recommendations of best practices and public and private
sector roles in implementing the strategy.
(3) By June 15th of every odd-numbered year, the commission shall
develop and submit to the governor and legislature a written update to
the biennial strategic plan.
(4) In developing the biennial strategic plan for economic
development and the annual update, the commission shall consult,
collaborate, and coordinate with relevant state agencies, private
sector business, nonprofit organizations involved in economic
development, trade associations, and relevant local organizations in
order to avoid duplication of effort.
(5) State agencies shall cooperate with the commission and provide
information as the commission may reasonably request.
(6) The commission must develop a biennial budget request for
approval by the office of financial management. The department of
commerce must forward the commission's budget request to the office of
financial management with the department's budget package. The
commission must adopt an annual budget and work plan in accordance with
the omnibus appropriations bill approved by the legislature.
(7)(a) The commission and the department of commerce shall jointly
develop and adopt a memorandum of understanding to outline and
establish clear lines of authority and responsibility between them
related to budget and administrative services.
(b) The memorandum of understanding shall not provide any
additional grant of authorities to the commission or the department
that is not already provided for by statute, nor diminish any
authorities or powers granted to either party by statute.
(c) Periodically, but not less often than biannually, the
commission and department of commerce shall review the memorandum of
understanding and, if necessary, recommend changes to the other party.
(d) As provided generally under RCW 43.162.015, the executive
director of the commission shall report solely to the governor and the
commissioners on matters pertaining to commission operations.
(8) To maintain its objectivity and concentration on strategic
planning, policy research and analysis, and evaluation, the commission
shall not take an administrative role in the delivery of services.
However, subject to available resources and consistent with its work
plan, the commission or the executive director may conduct outreach
activities such as regional forums and best practices seminars.
(9) The commission must evaluate its own performance on a regular
basis.
(10) The commission may accept gifts, grants, donations,
sponsorships, or contributions from any federal, state, or local
governmental agency or program, or any private source, and expend the
same for any purpose consistent with this chapter.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.162.025 and 2007 c 232 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Subject to available funds, the Washington state economic
development commission may:
(1) Periodically review for consistency with the state
comprehensive plan for economic development the policies and plans
established for:
(a) Business and technical assistance by the small business
development center, the Washington manufacturing service, the
Washington technology center, associate development organizations, the
department of community, trade, and economic development, and the
office of minority and women-owned business enterprises;
(b) Export assistance by the small business export finance
assistance center, the international marketing program for agricultural
commodities and trade, the department of agriculture, the center for
international trade in forest products, associate development
organizations, and the department of community, trade, and economic
development; and
(c) Infrastructure development by the department of community,
trade, and economic development and the department of transportation;
(2) Review and make recommendations to the office of financial
management and the legislature on budget requests and legislative
proposals relating to the state economic development system for
purposes of consistency with the state comprehensive plan for economic
development;
(3) Provide for coordination among the different agencies,
organizations, and components of the state economic development system
at the state level and at the regional level;
(4) Advocate for the state economic development system and for
meeting the needs of industry associations, industry clusters,
businesses, and employees;
(5) Identify partners and develop a plan to develop a consistent
and reliable database on participation rates, costs, program
activities, and outcomes from publicly funded economic development
programs in this state by January 1, 2011.
(a) In coordination with the development of the database, the
commission shall establish standards for data collection and
maintenance for providers in the economic development system in a
format that is accessible to use by the commission. The commission
shall require a minimum of common core data to be collected by each
entity providing economic development services with public funds and
shall develop requirements for minimum common core data in consultation
with the economic climate council, the office of financial management,
and the providers of economic development services;
(b) The commission shall establish minimum common standards and
metrics for program evaluation of economic development programs, and
monitor such program evaluations; and
(c) The commission shall, beginning no later than January 1, 2012,
periodically administer, based on a schedule established by the
commission, scientifically based outcome evaluations of the state
economic development system including, but not limited to, surveys of
industry associations, industry cluster associations, and businesses
served by publicly funded economic development programs; matches with
employment security department payroll and wage files; and matches with
department of revenue tax files; and
(6) Evaluate proposals for expenditure from the economic
development strategic reserve account and recommend expenditures from
the account.
The commission may delegate to the director any of the functions of
this section.)) Subject to available resources, the governor or
legislature may direct the commission, from time to time, to undertake
additional research and policy analysis, assessments, or other special
projects related to its mission.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.162.030 and 2007 c 232 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Creation of the ((Washington state economic development))
commission shall not be construed to modify any authority or budgetary
responsibility of the governor or the department of ((community, trade,
and economic development)) commerce.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.162 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington state economic development commission account is
created in the state treasury. All receipts from gifts, grants,
donations, sponsorships, or contributions under RCW 43.162.020 must be
deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used by the
Washington state economic development commission only for purposes
related to carrying out the mission, roles, and responsibilities of the
commission.
(2) Whenever any money, from the federal government or from other
sources, that was not anticipated in the budget approved by the
legislature, has actually been received and is designated to be spent
for a specific purpose, the executive director shall use the
unanticipated receipts process as provided in RCW 43.79.270 to request
authority to spend the money.

--- END ---