BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An opportunity employment and education center is established
within the Seattle community college district.
(2) The center shall:
(a) House various educational and social service providers and
integrate access to employment, counseling, and public benefit programs
and services as well as education, training, financial aid and
counseling services offered through community colleges;
(b) Identify and form partnerships with community-based
organizations that enhance the services and supports provided to
individuals using the center; and
(c) Provide services including but not limited to employment
security and workforce development council worksource services; job
listing, referral, and placement; job coaching; employment counseling,
testing, and career planning; unemployment insurance claim filing
assistance; cash grant programs run by the department of social and
health services; the basic food program; housing assistance; child
support assistance; child care subsidies; WorkFirst and temporary
assistance to needy families; general assistance and supplemental
security income facilitation; vocational rehabilitation services and
referrals; medicaid and medical services; alcoholism and drug addiction
treatment and support act referrals; case management and mental health
referrals; community college financial aid; support services; college
counseling services related to career pathways and basic skills
resources for English language learners; high school completion; and
adult basic education; and
(d) In partnership with the state board for community and technical
colleges, jointly develop evaluation criteria and performance
indicators that demonstrate the degree to which the center is
successfully integrating services and improving service delivery.
(3) The chancellor of the Seattle community college district and
technical colleges, or the chancellor's designee, shall convene an
opportunity policy work group charged with governing the opportunity
employment and education center. The work group membership shall
include, but not be limited to, representatives of the King county
workforce development council, north Seattle community college, the
employment security department, and the department of social and health
services. A chair shall be chosen from among the work group's
membership on an annual basis, with the chairmanship rotating among
participating agencies. The work group shall:
(a) Determine protocols for service delivery, develop operating
policies and procedures, develop cross-agency training for agency
employees located at the center, and develop a plan for a common
information technology framework that could allow for interagency
access to files and information, including any common application and
screening systems that facilitate access to state, federal, and local
social service and educational programs, within current resources and
to the extent federal privacy laws allow;
(b) Develop a release of information form that may be voluntarily
completed by opportunity center clients to facilitate the information
sharing outlined in subsection (3)(a) of this section. The form is
created to aid agencies housed at the opportunity center in determining
client eligibility for various social and educational services. The
form shall address the types of information to be shared, the agencies
with which personal information can be shared, the length of time
agencies may keep shared information on file, and any other issue areas
identified by the opportunity policy work group to comply with all
applicable federal and state laws;
(c) Review national best practices for program operation and
provide training to program providers both before opening the center
and on an ongoing basis; and
(d) Jointly develop integrated solutions to provide more
cost-efficient and customer friendly service delivery.
(4) Participating agencies shall identify and apply for any federal
waivers necessary to facilitate the intended goals and operation of the
center.
(5) The state board for community and technical colleges shall
report to legislative committees with subject areas of commerce and
labor, human services, and higher education on the following:
(a) By December 1, 2010, the board, in partnership with
participating agencies, shall provide recommendations on a proposed
site for an additional opportunity employment and education center; and
(b) By December 1, 2011, and annually thereafter, the board shall
provide an evaluation of existing centers based on performance criteria
identified by the board and the opportunity policy work group. The
report shall also include data on any federal and state legislative
barriers to integration.
(6) All future opportunity centers shall be governed by the
provisions in this section and are subject to the same reporting
requirements.

--- END ---