BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.71.230 and 2007 c 341 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The leadership council shall have the power and duty to:
(a) Provide leadership and have responsibility for the functions of
the partnership, including adopting, revising, and guiding the
implementation of the action agenda, allocating funds for Puget Sound
recovery, research, data collection, and providing progress and other
reports, setting strategic priorities and benchmarks, adopting and
applying accountability measures, and making appointments to the board
and panel;
(b) Adopt rules, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW;
(c) Create subcommittees and advisory committees as appropriate to
assist the council;
(d) Enter into, amend, and terminate contracts with individuals,
corporations, nonprofit organizations, or research institutions to
effectuate the purposes of this chapter;
(e) Make grants to governmental and nongovernmental entities to
effectuate the purposes of this chapter, including those purposes
described in (a) of this subsection;
(f) Receive such gifts, grants, and endowments, in trust or
otherwise, for the use and benefit of the partnership to effectuate the
purposes of this chapter;
(g) Promote extensive public awareness, education, and
participation in Puget Sound protection and recovery;
(h) Work collaboratively with the Hood Canal coordinating council
established in chapter 90.88 RCW on Hood Canal-specific issues;
(i) Maintain complete and consolidated financial information to
ensure that all funds received and expended to implement the action
agenda have been accounted for; and
(j) ((Such other powers and)) Perform other duties as are necessary
and appropriate to carry out the provisions of this chapter, including
the establishment of nonprofit organizations.
(2) The council may delegate functions to the chair and to the
executive director, however the council may not delegate its decisional
authority regarding developing or amending the action agenda.
(3) The council shall work closely with existing organizations and
all levels of government to ensure that the action agenda and its
implementation are scientifically sound, efficient, and achieve
necessary results to accomplish recovery of Puget Sound to health by
2020.
(4) The council shall support, engage, and foster collaboration
among watershed groups to assist in the recovery of Puget Sound.
(5) When working with federally recognized Indian tribes to develop
and implement the action agenda, the council shall conform to the
procedures and standards required in a government-to-governmental
relationship with tribes under the 1989 Centennial Accord between the
state of Washington and the sovereign tribal governments in the state
of Washington.
(6) Members of the council shall be compensated in accordance with
RCW 43.03.220 and be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

--- END ---