BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The home visiting services account is created in the custody
of the state treasurer. Revenues to the account shall consist of
appropriations by the legislature and all other sources deposited in
the account.
(b) Expenditures from the account shall be used for state matching
funds for the purposes of the program established in this section
including administrative expenses. Only the director, or the
director's designee, may authorize expenditures from the account.
Authorizations for expenditures may be given only after private funds
are committed and available.
(c) Expenditures from the account are exempt from the
appropriations and allotment provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW. However,
amounts used for program administration by the department are subject
to the allotment and budgetary controls of chapter 43.88 RCW, and an
appropriation is required for these expenditures.
(2) The department must expend moneys from the account to provide
state matching funds for partnership activities to implement home
visiting services and administer the infrastructure necessary to
develop, support, and evaluate evidence-based, research-based, and
promising home visiting programs.
(3) Activities eligible for funding through the account include,
but are not limited to:
(a) Home visiting services that achieve one or more of the
following: (i) Enhancing child development and well-being by
alleviating the effects on child development of poverty and other known
risk factors; (ii) reducing the incidence of child abuse and neglect;
or (iii) promoting school readiness for young children and their
families; and
(b) Development and maintenance of the infrastructure for home
visiting programs, including training, quality improvement, and
evaluation.
(4) Beginning July 1, 2010, the department shall contract with the
nongovernmental private-public partnership designated in RCW 43.215.070
to administer programs funded through the home visiting services
account. The department shall monitor performance and provide periodic
reports on the use outcomes of the home visiting services account.
(5) The nongovernmental private-public partnership shall, in the
administration of the programs:
(a) Fund programs through a competitive bid process; and
(b) Convene an advisory committee of early learning and home
visiting experts, including one representative from the department, to
advise the partnership regarding research and the distribution of funds
from the account to eligible programs.
(6) To promote continuity for families receiving home visiting
services through programs funded on the effective date of this section,
those programs funded under chapter 43.121 RCW shall be funded through
June 30, 2012, based on availability of funds and the achievement of
stated performance goals. This section does not require any program to
receive continuous funding beyond June 30, 2012. Organizations that
may receive program funding include local health departments;
nonprofit, neighborhood-based, community, regional, or statewide
organizations; and federally recognized Indian tribes located in the
state.

--- END ---