BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.86.010 and 1996 c 179 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Agency relationship" means the agency relationship created
under this chapter or by written agreement between a licensee and a
buyer and/or seller relating to the performance of real estate
brokerage services by the licensee.
(2) "Agent" means a licensee who has entered into an agency
relationship with a buyer or seller.
(3) "Business opportunity" means and includes a business, business
opportunity, and goodwill of an existing business, or any one or
combination thereof.
(4) "Buyer" means an actual or prospective purchaser in a real
estate transaction, or an actual or prospective tenant in a real estate
rental or lease transaction, as applicable.
(5) "Buyer's agent" means a licensee who has entered into an agency
relationship with only the buyer in a real estate transaction, and
includes subagents engaged by a buyer's agent.
(6) "Confidential information" means information from or concerning
a principal of a licensee that:
(a) Was acquired by the licensee during the course of an agency
relationship with the principal;
(b) The principal reasonably expects to be kept confidential;
(c) The principal has not disclosed or authorized to be disclosed
to third parties;
(d) Would, if disclosed, operate to the detriment of the principal;
and
(e) The principal personally would not be obligated to disclose to
the other party.
(7) "Designated broker" means:
(a) A natural person who owns a sole proprietorship real estate
firm; or
(b) A natural person with a controlling interest in the firm who is
designated by a legally recognized business entity to act as a
designated broker on behalf of the real estate firm, and whose managing
broker's license receives an endorsement from the department of
"designated broker," as this term is defined in chapter 18.85 RCW.
(8) "Dual agent" means a licensee who has entered into an agency
relationship with both the buyer and seller in the same transaction.
(((8))) (9) "Licensee" means a ((real estate)) broker, ((associate
real estate)) managing broker, or ((real estate salesperson)) real
estate firm, as those terms are defined in chapter 18.85 RCW.
(((9))) (10) "Material fact" means information that substantially
adversely affects the value of the property or a party's ability to
perform its obligations in a real estate transaction, or operates to
materially impair or defeat the purpose of the transaction. The fact
or suspicion that the property, or any neighboring property, is or was
the site of a murder, suicide or other death, rape or other sex crime,
assault or other violent crime, robbery or burglary, illegal drug
activity, gang-related activity, political or religious activity, or
other act, occurrence, or use not adversely affecting the physical
condition of or title to the property is not a material fact.
(((10))) (11) "Principal" means a buyer or a seller who has entered
into an agency relationship with a licensee.
(((11))) (12) "Real estate brokerage services" means the rendering
of services for which a real estate license is required under chapter
18.85 RCW.
(((12))) (13) "Real estate firm" means a recognized business
entity, as that term is defined in chapter 18.85 RCW.
(14) "Real estate transaction" or "transaction" means an actual or
prospective transaction involving a purchase, sale, option, or exchange
of any interest in real property or a business opportunity, or a lease
or rental of real property. For purposes of this chapter, a
prospective transaction does not exist until a written offer has been
signed by at least one of the parties.
(((13))) (15) "Seller" means an actual or prospective seller in a
real estate transaction, or an actual or prospective landlord in a real
estate rental or lease transaction, as applicable.
(((14))) (16) "Seller's agent" means a licensee who has entered
into an agency relationship with only the seller in a real estate
transaction, and includes subagents engaged by a seller's agent.
(((15))) (17) "Subagent" means a licensee who is engaged to act on
behalf of a principal by the principal's agent where the principal has
authorized the agent in writing to appoint subagents.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.86.020 and 1997 c 217 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A licensee who performs real estate brokerage services for a
buyer is a buyer's agent unless the:
(a) Licensee has entered into a written agency agreement with the
seller, in which case the licensee is a seller's agent;
(b) Licensee has entered into a subagency agreement with the
seller's agent, in which case the licensee is a seller's agent;
(c) Licensee has entered into a written agency agreement with both
parties, in which case the licensee is a dual agent;
(d) Licensee is the seller or one of the sellers; or
(e) Parties agree otherwise in writing after the licensee has
complied with RCW 18.86.030(1)(f).
(2) In a transaction in which different licensees affiliated with
the same ((broker)) firm represent different parties, the firm's
designated broker is a dual agent, and must obtain the written consent
of both parties as required under RCW 18.86.060. In such a case, each
licensee shall solely represent the party with whom the ((licensee))
broker or managing broker has an agency relationship, unless all
parties agree in writing that both licensees are dual agents.
(3) A licensee may work with a party in separate transactions
pursuant to different relationships, including, but not limited to,
representing a party in one transaction and at the same time not
representing that party in a different transaction involving that
party, if the licensee complies with this chapter in establishing the
relationships for each transaction.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.86.040 and 1997 c 217 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless additional duties are agreed to in writing signed by a
seller's agent, the duties of a seller's agent are limited to those set
forth in RCW 18.86.030 and the following, which may not be waived
except as expressly set forth in (e) of this subsection:
(a) To be loyal to the seller by taking no action that is adverse
or detrimental to the seller's interest in a transaction;
(b) To timely disclose to the seller any conflicts of interest;
(c) To advise the seller to seek expert advice on matters relating
to the transaction that are beyond the agent's expertise;
(d) Not to disclose any confidential information from or about the
seller, except under subpoena or court order, even after termination of
the agency relationship; and
(e) Unless otherwise agreed to in writing after the seller's agent
has complied with RCW 18.86.030(1)(f), to make a good faith and
continuous effort to find a buyer for the property; except that a
seller's agent is not obligated to seek additional offers to purchase
the property while the property is subject to an existing contract for
sale.
(2)(a) The showing of properties not owned by the seller to
prospective buyers or the listing of competing properties for sale by
a seller's agent does not in and of itself breach the duty of loyalty
to the seller or create a conflict of interest.
(b) The representation of more than one seller by different
licensees affiliated with the same ((broker)) firm in competing
transactions involving the same buyer does not in and of itself breach
the duty of loyalty to the sellers or create a conflict of interest.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.86.050 and 1997 c 217 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless additional duties are agreed to in writing signed by a
buyer's agent, the duties of a buyer's agent are limited to those set
forth in RCW 18.86.030 and the following, which may not be waived
except as expressly set forth in (e) of this subsection:
(a) To be loyal to the buyer by taking no action that is adverse or
detrimental to the buyer's interest in a transaction;
(b) To timely disclose to the buyer any conflicts of interest;
(c) To advise the buyer to seek expert advice on matters relating
to the transaction that are beyond the agent's expertise;
(d) Not to disclose any confidential information from or about the
buyer, except under subpoena or court order, even after termination of
the agency relationship; and
(e) Unless otherwise agreed to in writing after the buyer's agent
has complied with RCW 18.86.030(1)(f), to make a good faith and
continuous effort to find a property for the buyer; except that a
buyer's agent is not obligated to: (i) Seek additional properties to
purchase while the buyer is a party to an existing contract to
purchase; or (ii) show properties as to which there is no written
agreement to pay compensation to the buyer's agent.
(2)(a) The showing of property in which a buyer is interested to
other prospective buyers by a buyer's agent does not in and of itself
breach the duty of loyalty to the buyer or create a conflict of
interest.
(b) The representation of more than one buyer by different
licensees affiliated with the same ((broker)) firm in competing
transactions involving the same property does not in and of itself
breach the duty of loyalty to the buyers or create a conflict of
interest.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.86.060 and 1997 c 217 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a licensee
may act as a dual agent only with the written consent of both parties
to the transaction after the dual agent has complied with RCW
18.86.030(1)(f), which consent must include a statement of the terms of
compensation.
(2) Unless additional duties are agreed to in writing signed by a
dual agent, the duties of a dual agent are limited to those set forth
in RCW 18.86.030 and the following, which may not be waived except as
expressly set forth in (e) and (f) of this subsection:
(a) To take no action that is adverse or detrimental to either
party's interest in a transaction;
(b) To timely disclose to both parties any conflicts of interest;
(c) To advise both parties to seek expert advice on matters
relating to the transaction that are beyond the dual agent's expertise;
(d) Not to disclose any confidential information from or about
either party, except under subpoena or court order, even after
termination of the agency relationship;
(e) Unless otherwise agreed to in writing after the dual agent has
complied with RCW 18.86.030(1)(f), to make a good faith and continuous
effort to find a buyer for the property; except that a dual agent is
not obligated to seek additional offers to purchase the property while
the property is subject to an existing contract for sale; and
(f) Unless otherwise agreed to in writing after the dual agent has
complied with RCW 18.86.030(1)(f), to make a good faith and continuous
effort to find a property for the buyer; except that a dual agent is
not obligated to: (i) Seek additional properties to purchase while the
buyer is a party to an existing contract to purchase; or (ii) show
properties as to which there is no written agreement to pay
compensation to the dual agent.
(3)(a) The showing of properties not owned by the seller to
prospective buyers or the listing of competing properties for sale by
a dual agent does not in and of itself constitute action that is
adverse or detrimental to the seller or create a conflict of interest.
(b) The representation of more than one seller by different
licensees affiliated with the same ((broker)) firm in competing
transactions involving the same buyer does not in and of itself
constitute action that is adverse or detrimental to the sellers or
create a conflict of interest.
(4)(a) The showing of property in which a buyer is interested to
other prospective buyers or the presentation of additional offers to
purchase property while the property is subject to a transaction by a
dual agent does not in and of itself constitute action that is adverse
or detrimental to the buyer or create a conflict of interest.
(b) The representation of more than one buyer by different
licensees affiliated with the same ((broker)) firm in competing
transactions involving the same property does not in and of itself
constitute action that is adverse or detrimental to the buyers or
create a conflict of interest.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.86.080 and 1997 c 217 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In any real estate transaction, the ((broker's)) firm's
compensation may be paid by the seller, the buyer, a third party, or by
sharing the compensation between ((brokers)) firms.
(2) An agreement to pay or payment of compensation does not
establish an agency relationship between the party who paid the
compensation and the licensee.
(3) A seller may agree that a seller's agent may share with another
((broker)) firm the compensation paid by the seller.
(4) A buyer may agree that a buyer's agent may share with another
((broker)) firm the compensation paid by the buyer.
(5) A ((broker)) firm may be compensated by more than one party for
real estate brokerage services in a real estate transaction, if those
parties consent in writing at or before the time of signing an offer in
the transaction.
(6) A buyer's agent or dual agent may receive compensation based on
the purchase price without breaching any duty to the buyer.
(7) Nothing contained in this chapter negates the requirement that
an agreement authorizing or employing a licensee to sell or purchase
real estate for compensation or a commission be in writing and signed
by the seller or buyer.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.86.090 and 1996 c 179 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A principal is not liable for an act, error, or omission by an
agent or subagent of the principal arising out of an agency
relationship:
(a) Unless the principal participated in or authorized the act,
error, or omission; or
(b) Except to the extent that: (i) The principal benefited from
the act, error, or omission; and (ii) the court determines that it is
highly probable that the claimant would be unable to enforce a judgment
against the agent or subagent.
(2) A licensee is not liable for an act, error, or omission of a
subagent under this chapter, unless the licensee participated in or
authorized the act, error or omission. This subsection does not limit
the liability of a ((real estate)) designated broker for an act, error,
or omission by ((an associate real estate)) any affiliated broker or
((real estate salesperson licensed to that)) managing broker.

Sec. 8 RCW 18.86.100 and 1996 c 179 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless otherwise agreed to in writing, a principal does not
have knowledge or notice of any facts known by an agent or subagent of
the principal that are not actually known by the principal.
(2) Unless otherwise agreed to in writing, a licensee does not have
knowledge or notice of any facts known by a subagent that are not
actually known by the licensee. This subsection does not limit the
knowledge imputed to a ((real estate)) designated broker of any facts
known by ((an associate real estate)) any affiliated broker or ((real
estate salesperson licensed to such)) managing broker.

Sec. 9 RCW 18.86.120 and 1997 c 217 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The pamphlet required under RCW 18.86.030(1)(f) shall consist of
the entire text of RCW 18.86.010 through 18.86.030 and 18.86.040
through 18.86.110 with a separate cover page. The pamphlet shall be 8
1/2 by 11 inches in size, the text shall be in print no smaller than
10-point type, the cover page shall be in print no smaller than 12-
point type, and the title of the cover page "The Law of Real Estate
Agency" shall be in print no smaller than 18-point type. The cover
page shall be in the following form:

The Law of Real Estate Agency

This pamphlet describes your legal rights in dealing
with a real estate ((broker or salesperson)) licensee.
Please read it carefully before signing any documents.

The following is only a brief summary of the attached law:

Sec. 1. Definitions. Defines the specific terms used in the
law.

Sec. 2. Relationships between Licensees and the Public. States
that a licensee who works with a buyer or tenant represents
that buyer or tenant -- unless the licensee is the listing agent,
a seller's subagent, a dual agent, the seller personally or the
parties agree otherwise. Also states that in a transaction
involving two different licensees affiliated with the same
((broker)) firm, the designated broker is a dual agent and each
((licensee)) broker or managing broker solely represents his or
her client -- unless the parties agree in writing that both
licensees are dual agents.

Sec. 3. Duties of a Licensee Generally. Prescribes the duties
that are owed by all licensees, regardless of who the licensee
represents. Requires disclosure of the licensee's agency
relationship in a specific transaction.

Sec. 4. Duties of a Seller's Agent. Prescribes the additional
duties of a licensee representing the seller or landlord only.

Sec. 5. Duties of a Buyer's Agent. Prescribes the additional
duties of a licensee representing the buyer or tenant only.

Sec. 6. Duties of a Dual Agent. Prescribes the additional
duties of a licensee representing both parties in the same
transaction, and requires the written consent of both parties
to the licensee acting as a dual agent.

Sec. 7. Duration of Agency Relationship. Describes when an
agency relationship begins and ends. Provides that the duties
of accounting and confidentiality continue after the
termination of an agency relationship.

Sec. 8. Compensation. Allows ((brokers)) firms to share
compensation with cooperating ((brokers)) firms. States that
payment of compensation does not necessarily establish an
agency relationship. Allows ((brokers)) firms to receive
compensation from more than one party in a transaction with the
parties' consent.

Sec. 9. Vicarious Liability. Eliminates the common law
liability of a party for the conduct of the party's agent or
subagent, unless the agent or subagent is insolvent. Also
limits the liability of a ((broker)) firm for the conduct of a
subagent ((associated)) affiliated with a different ((broker))
firm.

Sec. 10. Imputed Knowledge and Notice. Eliminates the common
law rule that notice to or knowledge of an agent constitutes
notice to or knowledge of the principal.

Sec. 11. Interpretation. This law replaces the fiduciary
duties owed by an agent to a principal under the common law, to
the extent that it conflicts with the common law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---