BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9A.16 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that voluntary intoxication from alcohol and
drugs and the pain and suffering that often result are increasingly
serious problems which have reached a crisis point both in this state
and throughout the nation. The overwhelming prevalence of alcohol and
drug use and their critical connections with crime and violence are
obvious and irrefutable. In Mont. v. Egelhoff, 518 U.S. 37; 116 S. Ct.
2013; 135 L. Ed. 2d 361 (1996), the United States supreme court
addressed the relevancy of voluntary intoxication to considerations of
mens rea. In Egelhoff, the court noted the long common law tradition
of excluding intoxication evidence and held that the combination of
that tradition, the number of states that still employed the common law
doctrine, and the deference accorded to states in instituting their
criminal justice systems justified the evidentiary restriction. The
legislature finds that it has the constitutional prerogative to define
crimes, that their definitions control unless an express constitutional
provision unambiguously requires otherwise, that excluding evidence of
intoxication in criminal cases deters the commission of crimes while
intoxicated, and that under both state and federal rules of evidence,
there are a number of evidentiary exclusions that have been found
constitutional, including the danger of misleading the jury or unfair
prejudice, and various hearsay exclusions. The legislature further
finds that individuals are personally responsible for the choices they
make and the forces they set in motion, and that a person who is in a
voluntarily intoxicated condition or state is criminally responsible
for his or her conduct. The legislature intends by this act to
unequivocally and solely provide a legislative redefinition of the mens
rea element for specific and general intent crimes where voluntary
intoxication is alleged as part of a defense, that a voluntary
intoxicated condition or state is not a defense to any criminal
offense, and that voluntary intoxication may not be taken into
consideration in determining the existence of a mental state which is
an element of the offense unless the defendant proves that he or she
did not know that it was an intoxicating substance when he or she
consumed the substance causing the condition or state. The legislature
does not intend by this act to shift the burden of the prosecution to
the defendant, nor does it intend to reduce the burden of the
prosecution in proving the defendant intentionally, knowingly, or
recklessly committed the crime under circumstances that would otherwise
establish intent, knowledge, or recklessness but for the defendant's
voluntary intoxication.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.16.090 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.16.090 are
each amended to read as follows:
(1) No act committed by a person while in a state of voluntary
intoxication shall be deemed less criminal by reason of ((his)) the
person's condition((, but whenever the actual existence of any
particular mental state is a necessary element to constitute a
particular species or degree of crime, the fact of his intoxication may
be taken into consideration in determining such mental state)).
Voluntary intoxication is not a defense to any criminal charge, nor may
the fact of voluntary intoxication be used by a defendant to
demonstrate the lack of any particular mental state that is an element
of a crime charged. Nothing in this section prohibits the prosecution
from introducing evidence of a defendant's intoxication.
(2) This section applies to voluntary intoxication produced by any
agent including, but not limited to, alcohol or any drug.

Sec. 3 RCW 9A.08.010 and 2009 c 549 s 1002 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Kinds of Culpability Defined.
(a) INTENT. A person acts with intent or intentionally when ((he
or she)):
(i) The person acts with the objective or purpose to accomplish a
result which constitutes a crime; or
(ii) The person is voluntarily intoxicated and acts in a manner
that would be considered intentional if the person were not
intoxicated.
(b) KNOWLEDGE. A person knows or acts knowingly or with knowledge
when:
(i) ((he or she)) The person is aware of a fact, facts, or
circumstances or result described by a statute defining an offense;
((or))
(ii) ((he or she)) The person has information which would lead a
reasonable person in the same situation to believe that facts exist
which facts are described by a statute defining an offense; or
(iii) The person is voluntarily intoxicated and acts in a manner
that would be considered knowing if the person were not intoxicated.
(c) RECKLESSNESS. A person is reckless or acts recklessly when
((he or she)):
(i) The person knows of and disregards a substantial risk that a
wrongful act may occur and ((his or her)) the disregard of such
substantial risk is a gross deviation from conduct that a reasonable
person would exercise in the same situation; or
(ii) The person is voluntarily intoxicated and acts in a manner
that would be considered reckless if the person were not intoxicated.
(d) CRIMINAL NEGLIGENCE. A person is criminally negligent or acts
with criminal negligence when ((he or she)) the person fails to be
aware of a substantial risk that a wrongful act may occur and ((his or
her)) the failure to be aware of such substantial risk constitutes a
gross deviation from the standard of care that a reasonable person
would exercise in the same situation.
(2) Substitutes for Criminal Negligence, Recklessness, and
Knowledge. When a statute provides that criminal negligence suffices
to establish an element of an offense, such element also is established
if a person acts intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly. When
recklessness suffices to establish an element, such element also is
established if a person acts intentionally or knowingly. When acting
knowingly suffices to establish an element, such element also is
established if a person acts intentionally.
(3) Culpability as Determinant of Grade of Offense. When the grade
or degree of an offense depends on whether the offense is committed
intentionally, knowingly, recklessly, or with criminal negligence, its
grade or degree shall be the lowest for which the determinative kind of
culpability is established with respect to any material element of the
offense.
(4) Requirement of ((Wilfulness)) Willfulness Satisfied by Acting
Knowingly. A requirement that an offense be committed ((wilfully))
willfully is satisfied if a person acts knowingly with respect to the
material elements of the offense, unless a purpose to impose further
requirements plainly appears.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act applies prospectively only and not
retroactively. It applies only to causes of action that arise on or
after the effective date of this act.

--- END ---