BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.30 RCW
under the subchapter heading "online insurance verification system" to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this subchapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Commercial automobile insurance coverage" means any insurance
coverage provided to an insured, regardless of the number of vehicles
or entities covered, under a commercial insurance coverage form and
rated using either a commercial manual or rating rule and without
regard to vehicle type and ownership.
(2) "Commercial motor vehicle" means any motor vehicle registered
in this state and insured under commercial automobile insurance
coverage.
(3) "Insurer" means an insurance company licensed or authorized to
do business in this state.
(4) "Online insurance verification system" or "system" means an
online insurance verification system using web services.
(5) "Personal motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle registered in
this state and insured under personal automobile insurance coverage and
not under commercial automobile insurance coverage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.30 RCW
under the subchapter heading "online insurance verification system" to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish, within two years of the
effective date of this act, an online insurance verification system
using web services for motor vehicles registered in this state. In
establishing this system, the department shall:
(a) Consult regularly with representatives of insurers in
determining the objectives and details of the system;
(b) Provide for a testing period of more than nine months prior to
the establishment date required in subsection (1) of this section;
(c) Publish a detailed user guide; and
(d) Establish and maintain a contact person for insurers.
(2) In establishing this system, the department may enter into
contracts with vendors or contractors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.30 RCW
under the subchapter heading "online insurance verification system" to
read as follows:
The online insurance verification system must:
(1) Be accessible by authorized personnel of the department for
direct inquiry. Access to the courts, insurers, and law enforcement
must be through authorized personnel of the department;
(2) Be capable of verifying, on an on demand basis minus reasonable
down time for system maintenance as agreed upon by the state and the
insurer that is within reasonable experientially based timeframes, the
liability insurance status of a vehicle with the insurer listed on any
insurance identification card or in the department's records. This
verification must be made available through the internet or other
similar electronic systems and must be consistent with insurance
industry specifications and standards;
(3) Be able to make insurance verification inquiries to insurers
using multiple data elements including, but not limited to, national
association of insurance commissioners code, vehicle identification
numbers, policy numbers, or other data elements agreed to by the
department and an insurer;
(4) Provide sufficient measures for data security; and
(5) Utilize open and agreed upon data and data transmission
standards and standard schema.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 46.30 RCW
under the subchapter heading "online insurance verification system" to
read as follows:
(1) Each insurer shall:
(a) Cooperate with the department in establishing and operating the
online insurance verification system;
(b) Maintain the data necessary to verify the existence of
mandatory liability coverage provided to its customers pursuant to the
required time period for the online insurance verification system;
(c) Maintain internet or similar service, pursuant to the
requirements established for the online insurance verification system,
through which online insurance verification can occur;
(d) Provide adequate security consistent with insurance industry
standards; and
(e) Provide commercial automobile insurance customers with an
insurance identification card clearly reflecting that the vehicle is
insured under a commercial motor vehicle policy.
(2) Each insurer is immune from civil and administrative liability
for good faith efforts to comply with this subchapter.
(3) Nothing in this subchapter prohibits an insurer from using the
services of a vendor to facilitate the establishment and operation of
the online insurance verification system required under this
subchapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 46.30 RCW
under the subchapter heading "online insurance verification system" to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall:
(a) Cooperate with insurers in establishing and operating the
system;
(b) Maintain the list of authorized requesting entities and
individuals and incorporate that list as part of the system;
(c) Conduct a pilot project to test the system prior to the
establishment date required under section 2(1) of this act;
(d) Establish and maintain the systems necessary to make
verification requests to insurers using the data elements agreed to by
the department and the insurers;
(e) For all information transmitted or received, implement and
maintain strict system and data security measures consistent with
applicable standards;
(f) Keep all appropriate state agencies informed on the
implementation status, functionality, and service interruptions of the
system;
(g) Provide alternative methods, as determined by the department,
of reporting for small insurers writing policies for no more than five
hundred vehicles in the state;
(h) Work with insurers on issues related to the system to ensure
equitable resolution;
(i) Maintain historical records of system data for eighteen months;
and
(j) Provide a method to separately track motor vehicles owned by a
qualified self-insured.
(2) Nothing in this subchapter prohibits the department from using
the services of a vendor to facilitate the establishment and operation
of an online insurance verification system required under this
subchapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 46.30 RCW
under the subchapter heading "online insurance verification system" to
read as follows:
The department shall report to the transportation committees of the
legislature by July 1, 2014, regarding the operation of the online
insurance verification system including, but not limited to, the costs
of system implementation and the effectiveness of the program in
reducing the number of uninsured drivers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---