BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The department of fish and wildlife
shall develop a legislative proposal consistent with this section for
consideration during the 2012 legislative session that would authorize
a permit-only commercial salmonid fishery in the portion of the
Columbia river between Cape Disappointment and the Bonneville dam using
a fishing gear type currently not authorized for use in the area or for
the species authorized in the new fishery.
(2) The new fishery must be limited to one that at least partially
affects a species or run of salmonid:
(a) That is, as of the effective date of this section, listed as
threatened or endangered under the federal endangered species act;
(b) That is not meeting designated spawner and broodstock
management objectives; and
(c) For which a fish hatchery located in Washington is in operation
that produces harvestable, externally marked fish that complements the
naturally occurring in-migration of the targeted salmonid species.
(3) The director of the department of fish and wildlife must
utilize the authority provided in RCW 77.65.400 to initiate an
experimental fishery that must be used to gather data and insight
supporting the legislative proposal produced under this section.
(4) The permit-only fishery proposed for creation in the
legislative proposal produced under this section must promote the
harvest of hatchery-origin fish by utilizing fishing gear designed to
maximize the harvest of hatchery-origin fish while minimizing the
mortality to wild fish listed under the federal endangered species act.
(5) In implementing this section, the department of fish and
wildlife must form and consult with a formal steering committee
composed of individuals who are licensed to fish commercially for
salmonid species in the Columbia river. The department of fish and
wildlife may also invite representatives of tribal government, the
federal government, the state of Oregon, and private citizens deemed by
the director to have qualifications useful to the steering committee or
the department.
(6) The director of the department of fish and wildlife must
initiate contact with the director of the agency for the state of
Oregon with jurisdiction over commercial fishing in the Columbia river
and invite the state of Oregon to participate in the process
established in this section. If the state of Oregon agrees to
participate, the Washington department of fish and wildlife must
include Oregon as a full partner in the research and attempt to design
the research questions in a manner that is useful to unified management
between the two states on the Columbia river.
(7) The final proposed legislation developed under this section
must be delivered to the appropriate committees of the legislature,
consistent with RCW 43.01.036, by November 21, 2011. The proposed
legislative language must be accompanied by a formal supporting report
designed to aid the legislature in its deliberations that contains, at
a minimum, the following:
(a) An explanation of the process or processes utilized to test the
gear type or types included in the proposed legislation;
(b) An assessment of the effectiveness and mortality rates of the
gear type or types included in the proposed legislation, including an
explanation of the methodology used to determine effectiveness and
mortality and a comparison between the mortality rates of the tested
gear types and that of fishing with gear types that rely on capture by
hooks and physical sorting of the individual fish;
(c) An assessment of the cost to the license holder of the gear
type or types included in the proposed legislation, including the costs
of any necessary vessel retrofitting, additional workforce, additional
vessel hours, or other direct or indirect costs necessitated by the new
gear type;
(d) An assessment of the likelihood of success of any new proposed
gear type based on its economic feasibility;
(e) An approximation of the additional amount of hatchery fish, if
any, that the new proposed gear type or types will allow a licensed
fisher to retain;
(f) The identification of barriers still existing to full
implementation of a fishery based on the proposed gear types;
(g) An assessment of the economic impact, positive or negative,
that the proposed new fishery may have on the local communities
situated adjacent to the affected portion of the Columbia river; and
(h) A conclusion based on the lessons learned through the
implementation of this section and additional proposed steps forward in
maximizing the capture of hatchery fish.
(8) Neither the department of fish and wildlife nor the fish and
wildlife commission may authorize the use of any gear type for salmonid
fishing on the Columbia river not allowed during the 2009 license year
from the effective date of this section until July 31, 2012, unless the
gear type allowance is part of the process established by this section.
(9) This section expires July 31, 2012.

--- END ---