BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 59.20 RCW
to read as follows:
For manufactured/mobile homes with stick-built garages and raised
ridgelines on the roofs that were built, required to be built, or
otherwise approved by the landlord, the following conditions apply:
(1) The landlord shall provide the tenants with a minimum of
twenty-four months' notice when there will be a change of land use of
the mobile home park including, but not limited to, a conversion to a
use other than for a mobile home park cooperative or mobile home park
subdivision.
(2) A notice of sale must be delivered to the tenants ninety days
before the landlord advertises or lists, or a public notice advertises,
that a manufactured/mobile home community is for sale.

Sec. 2 RCW 59.20.030 and 2008 c 116 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Abandoned" as it relates to a mobile home, manufactured home,
or park model owned by a tenant in a mobile home park, mobile home park
cooperative, or mobile home park subdivision or tenancy in a mobile
home lot means the tenant has defaulted in rent and by absence and by
words or actions reasonably indicates the intention not to continue
tenancy;
(2) "Eligible organization" includes local governments, local
housing authorities, nonprofit community or neighborhood-based
organizations, federally recognized Indian tribes in the state of
Washington, and regional or statewide nonprofit housing assistance
organizations;
(3) "Housing authority" or "authority" means any of the public body
corporate and politic created in RCW 35.82.030;
(4) "Landlord" means the owner of a mobile home park and includes
the agents of a landlord;
(5) "Local government" means a town government, city government,
code city government, or county government in the state of Washington;
(6) "Manufactured home" means a single-family dwelling built
according to the United States department of housing and urban
development manufactured home construction and safety standards act,
which is a national preemptive building code. A manufactured home
also: (a) Includes plumbing, heating, air conditioning, and electrical
systems; (b) is built on a permanent chassis; and (c) can be
transported in one or more sections with each section at least eight
feet wide and forty feet long when transported, or when installed on
the site is three hundred twenty square feet or greater;
(7) "Manufactured/mobile home" means either a manufactured home or
a mobile home;
(8) "Mobile home" means a factory-built dwelling built prior to
June 15, 1976, to standards other than the United States department of
housing and urban development code, and acceptable under applicable
state codes in effect at the time of construction or introduction of
the home into the state. Mobile homes have not been built since the
introduction of the United States department of housing and urban
development manufactured home construction and safety act;
(9) "Mobile home lot" means a portion of a mobile home park or
manufactured housing community designated as the location of one mobile
home, manufactured home, or park model and its accessory buildings, and
intended for the exclusive use as a primary residence by the occupants
of that mobile home, manufactured home, or park model;
(10) "Mobile home park," "manufactured housing community," or
"manufactured/mobile home community" means any real property which is
rented or held out for rent to others for the placement of two or more
mobile homes, manufactured homes, or park models for the primary
purpose of production of income, except where such real property is
rented or held out for rent for seasonal recreational purpose only and
is not intended for year-round occupancy;
(11) "Mobile home park cooperative" or "manufactured housing
cooperative" means real property consisting of common areas and two or
more lots held out for placement of mobile homes, manufactured homes,
or park models in which both the individual lots and the common areas
are owned by an association of shareholders which leases or otherwise
extends the right to occupy individual lots to its own members;
(12) "Mobile home park subdivision" or "manufactured housing
subdivision" means real property, whether it is called a subdivision,
condominium, or planned unit development, consisting of common areas
and two or more lots held for placement of mobile homes, manufactured
homes, or park models in which there is private ownership of the
individual lots and common, undivided ownership of the common areas by
owners of the individual lots;
(13) "Notice of sale" means a notice required under RCW 59.20.300
to be delivered to all tenants of a manufactured/mobile home community
and other specified parties within fourteen days after the date on
which any advertisement, multiple listing, or public notice advertises
that a manufactured/mobile home community is for sale, or as required
in section 1(2) of this act;
(14) "Park model" means a recreational vehicle intended for
permanent or semi-permanent installation and is used as a primary
residence;
(15) "Qualified sale of manufactured/mobile home community" means
the sale, as defined in RCW 82.45.010, of land and improvements
comprising a manufactured/mobile home community that is transferred in
a single purchase to a qualified tenant organization or to an eligible
organization for the purpose of preserving the property as a
manufactured/mobile home community;
(16) "Qualified tenant organization" means a formal organization of
tenants within a manufactured/mobile home community, with the only
requirement for membership consisting of being a tenant;
(17) "Recreational vehicle" means a travel trailer, motor home,
truck camper, or camping trailer that is primarily designed and used as
temporary living quarters, is either self-propelled or mounted on or
drawn by another vehicle, is transient, is not occupied as a primary
residence, and is not immobilized or permanently affixed to a mobile
home lot;
(18) "Tenant" means any person, except a transient, who rents a
mobile home lot;
(19) "Transient" means a person who rents a mobile home lot for a
period of less than one month for purposes other than as a primary
residence;
(20) "Occupant" means any person, including a live-in care
provider, other than a tenant, who occupies a mobile home, manufactured
home, or park model and mobile home lot.

Sec. 3 RCW 59.20.080 and 2003 c 127 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A landlord shall not terminate or fail to renew a tenancy of a
tenant or the occupancy of an occupant, of whatever duration except for
one or more of the following reasons:
(a) Substantial violation, or repeated or periodic violations of
the rules of the mobile home park as established by the landlord at the
inception of the tenancy or as assumed subsequently with the consent of
the tenant or for violation of the tenant's duties as provided in RCW
59.20.140. The tenant shall be given written notice to cease the rule
violation immediately. The notice shall state that failure to cease
the violation of the rule or any subsequent violation of that or any
other rule shall result in termination of the tenancy, and that the
tenant shall vacate the premises within fifteen days: PROVIDED, That
for a periodic violation the notice shall also specify that repetition
of the same violation shall result in termination: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That in the case of a violation of a "material change" in park rules
with respect to pets, tenants with minor children living with them, or
recreational facilities, the tenant shall be given written notice under
this chapter of a six month period in which to comply or vacate;
(b) Nonpayment of rent or other charges specified in the rental
agreement, upon five days written notice to pay rent and/or other
charges or to vacate;
(c) Conviction of the tenant of a crime, commission of which
threatens the health, safety, or welfare of the other mobile home park
tenants. The tenant shall be given written notice of a fifteen day
period in which to vacate;
(d) Failure of the tenant to comply with local ordinances and state
laws and regulations relating to mobile homes, manufactured homes, or
park models or mobile home, manufactured homes, or park model living
within a reasonable time after the tenant's receipt of notice of such
noncompliance from the appropriate governmental agency;
(e) Change of land use of the mobile home park including, but not
limited to, conversion to a use other than for mobile homes,
manufactured homes, or park models or conversion of the mobile home
park to a mobile home park cooperative or mobile home park subdivision:
PROVIDED, That the landlord shall give the tenants twelve months'
notice, or twenty-four months' notice as required in section 1(1) of
this act, in advance of the effective date of such change, except that
for the period of six months following April 28, 1989, the landlord
shall give the tenants eighteen months' notice in advance of the
proposed effective date of such change;
(f) Engaging in "criminal activity." "Criminal activity" means a
criminal act defined by statute or ordinance that threatens the health,
safety, or welfare of the tenants. A park owner seeking to evict a
tenant or occupant under this subsection need not produce evidence of
a criminal conviction, even if the alleged misconduct constitutes a
criminal offense. Notice from a law enforcement agency of criminal
activity constitutes sufficient grounds, but not the only grounds, for
an eviction under this subsection. Notification of the seizure of
illegal drugs under RCW 59.20.155 is evidence of criminal activity and
is grounds for an eviction under this subsection. The requirement that
any tenant or occupant register as a sex offender under RCW 9A.44.130
is grounds for eviction under this subsection. If criminal activity is
alleged to be a basis of termination, the park owner may proceed
directly to an unlawful detainer action;
(g) The tenant's application for tenancy contained a material
misstatement that induced the park owner to approve the tenant as a
resident of the park, and the park owner discovers and acts upon the
misstatement within one year of the time the resident began paying
rent;
(h) If the landlord serves a tenant three fifteen-day notices
within a twelve-month period to comply or vacate for failure to comply
with the material terms of the rental agreement or park rules. The
applicable twelve-month period shall commence on the date of the first
violation;
(i) Failure of the tenant to comply with obligations imposed upon
tenants by applicable provisions of municipal, county, and state codes,
statutes, ordinances, and regulations, including this chapter. The
landlord shall give the tenant written notice to comply immediately.
The notice must state that failure to comply will result in termination
of the tenancy and that the tenant shall vacate the premises within
fifteen days;
(j) The tenant engages in disorderly or substantially annoying
conduct upon the park premises that results in the destruction of the
rights of others to the peaceful enjoyment and use of the premises.
The landlord shall give the tenant written notice to comply
immediately. The notice must state that failure to comply will result
in termination of the tenancy and that the tenant shall vacate the
premises within fifteen days;
(k) The tenant creates a nuisance that materially affects the
health, safety, and welfare of other park residents. The landlord
shall give the tenant written notice to cease the conduct that
constitutes a nuisance immediately. The notice must state that failure
to cease the conduct will result in termination of the tenancy and that
the tenant shall vacate the premises in five days;
(l) Any other substantial just cause that materially affects the
health, safety, and welfare of other park residents. The landlord
shall give the tenant written notice to comply immediately. The notice
must state that failure to comply will result in termination of the
tenancy and that the tenant shall vacate the premises within fifteen
days; or
(m) Failure to pay rent by the due date provided for in the rental
agreement three or more times in a twelve-month period, commencing with
the date of the first violation, after service of a five-day notice to
comply or vacate.
(2) Within five days of a notice of eviction as required by
subsection (1)(a) of this section, the landlord and tenant shall submit
any dispute to mediation. The parties may agree in writing to
mediation by an independent third party or through industry mediation
procedures. If the parties cannot agree, then mediation shall be
through industry mediation procedures. A duty is imposed upon both
parties to participate in the mediation process in good faith for a
period of ten days for an eviction under subsection (1)(a) of this
section. It is a defense to an eviction under subsection (1)(a) of
this section that a landlord did not participate in the mediation
process in good faith.
(3) Chapters 59.12 and 59.18 RCW govern the eviction of
recreational vehicles, as defined in RCW 59.20.030, from mobile home
parks. This chapter governs the eviction of mobile homes, manufactured
homes, park models, and recreational vehicles used as a primary
residence from a mobile home park.

--- END ---