BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The auditor shall establish an annual assessment and performance
grading program. The program shall consist of conducting annual
performance assessments and grading state agency performance. Areas to
be assessed shall include quality management, productivity, fiscal
efficiency, program effectiveness, contract management and oversight,
internal audit, internal and external customer satisfaction, statutory
and regulatory compliance, and technology systems and online services.
As part of this program, the auditor shall:
(1) Consult with and seek input from elected officials, state
employees including front-line employees, and professionals with a
background in performance management for establishing the grading
standards. In developing the criteria, the auditor shall consider
already developed best practices and audit criteria used by government
or nongovernment organizations. Before the assessment, the agencies
must be given the criteria for the assessment and the standards for
grading;
(2) Contract or partner with public or private entities that have
expertise in either public sector reviews or technical expertise, or
both, in individual assessment areas to perform the assessments and
grading of all state agencies. The auditor may contract or partner
with more than one entity for different assessment areas; and
(3) Submit the results of the assessment and grading program to the
governor, the office of financial management, appropriate legislative
committees, and the public by December 15th of each year. The results
of the annual assessments and performance grading must be posted on the
internet.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.08.020 and 2009 c 469 s 802 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is levied and there shall be collected a tax on each
retail sale in this state equal to six and five-tenths percent of the
selling price.
(2) There is levied and there shall be collected an additional tax
on each retail car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is
licensed in this state, equal to five and nine-tenths percent of the
selling price. The revenue collected under this subsection shall be
deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW
47.66.070.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2003, there is levied and collected an
additional tax of three-tenths of one percent of the selling price on
each retail sale of a motor vehicle in this state, other than retail
car rentals taxed under subsection (2) of this section. The revenue
collected under this subsection shall be deposited in the multimodal
transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.
(4) For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, "motor vehicle"
has the meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320, but does not include farm
tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and 46.04.181,
off-road and nonhighway vehicles as defined in RCW 46.09.020, and
snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.10.010.
(5) Beginning on December 8, 2005, 0.16 percent of the taxes
collected under subsection (1) of this section shall be dedicated to
funding comprehensive performance audits required under RCW 43.09.470
and the performance assessments and scorecard program in section 1 of
this act. The revenue identified in this subsection shall be deposited
in the performance audits of government account created in RCW
43.09.475.
(6) The taxes imposed under this chapter shall apply to successive
retail sales of the same property.
(7)(a) Until January 1, 2011, the tax imposed in subsection (3) of
this section and the dedication of revenue provided for in subsection
(5) of this section((,)) do not apply with respect to the sales of new
passenger cars, light duty trucks, and medium duty passenger vehicles,
which utilize hybrid technology and have a United States environmental
protection agency estimated highway gasoline mileage rating of at least
forty miles per gallon.
(b) As used in this subsection, "hybrid technology" means
propulsion units powered by both electricity and gasoline.
(8) The rates provided in this section apply to taxes imposed under
chapter 82.12 RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.08.020 and 2006 c 1 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) There is levied and there shall be collected a tax on each
retail sale in this state equal to six and five-tenths percent of the
selling price.
(2) There is levied and there shall be collected an additional tax
on each retail car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is
licensed in this state, equal to five and nine-tenths percent of the
selling price. The revenue collected under this subsection shall be
deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW
47.66.070.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2003, there is levied and collected an
additional tax of three-tenths of one percent of the selling price on
each retail sale of a motor vehicle in this state, other than retail
car rentals taxed under subsection (2) of this section. The revenue
collected under this subsection shall be deposited in the multimodal
transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.
(4) For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, "motor vehicle"
has the meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320, but does not include farm
tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and 46.04.181,
off-road and nonhighway vehicles as defined in RCW 46.09.020, and
snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.10.010.
(5) Beginning on December 8, 2005, 0.16 percent of the taxes
collected under subsection (1) of this section shall be dedicated to
funding comprehensive performance audits required under RCW 43.09.470
and the performance assessments and scorecard program in section 1 of
this act. The revenue identified in this subsection shall be deposited
in the performance audits of government account created in RCW
43.09.475.
(6) The taxes imposed under this chapter shall apply to successive
retail sales of the same property.
(7) The rates provided in this section apply to taxes imposed under
chapter 82.12 RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.12.0201 and 2006 c 1 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Beginning on December 8, 2005, 0.16 percent of the taxes collected
under RCW 82.12.020 based on the rate in RCW 82.08.020(1) shall be
dedicated to funding comprehensive performance audits under RCW
43.09.470 and the performance assessments and scorecard program under
section 1 of this act. Revenue identified in this section shall be
deposited in the performance audits of government account created in
RCW 43.09.475.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 2 of this act expires January 1,
2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 3 of this act takes effect January
1, 2011.

--- END ---