BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any person or business entity that is awarded a sole source
contract from a state agency of twenty-five thousand dollars or more,
or two or more contracts totaling twenty-five thousand dollars in the
aggregate in a twelve-month period, must file a report with the
commission detailing contributions made in the twelve months before the
contract award. The report must:
(a) Include an itemized list of the contributions made to a
candidate or holder of a state office, a caucus political committee, or
a bona fide political party by the contract recipient, a principal
associated with the contract recipient, including a subcontractor or
consultant, a spouse or registered domestic partner of a principal, or
a political committee sponsored by the recipient or a principal of the
contract recipient; and
(b) Be filed no later than fifteen days after the signing of the
contract.
(2) The commission shall post on its web site information regarding
political contributions made by persons awarded sole source contracts
of twenty-five thousand dollars or more.
(3) A state agency that awards a sole source contract of twenty-five thousand dollars or more, or two or more contracts to the same
contractor that totals twenty-five thousand dollars or more in the
aggregate, shall, no later than five days after the date of the
contract award, notify the commission of the name and street address,
city, state, and zip code of the recipient, the amount of the award,
and a description of the contract.
(4) For purposes of this section, sole source contracts include
contracts for goods and services awarded under chapter 43.19 RCW,
personal service contracts under chapter 39.29 RCW, or public works
contracts under chapter 39.04 RCW. Contracts awarded under exemptions
due to declared emergencies as provided by law are exempt from this
section.
(5) For purposes of this section, "sponsored by" means any person
who alone or in conjunction with other persons makes, directs, or
authorizes contributions, expenditures, or strategic or policy
decisions on behalf of the committee.

--- END ---