BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 54.12.080 and 2008 c 218 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Commissioners of public utility districts ((are eligible to))
shall receive salaries as follows:
(a) Each public utility district commissioner of a district
operating utility properties shall receive a salary of one thousand
((four)) eight hundred dollars per month, as adjusted for inflation by
the office of financial management in subsection (6) of this section,
during a calendar year if the district received total gross revenue of
over fifteen million dollars during the fiscal year ending June 30th
before the calendar year. ((However, the board of commissioners of
such a public utility district may pass a resolution increasing the
rate of salary up to one thousand eight hundred dollars per month.))
(b) Each public utility district commissioner of a district
operating utility properties shall receive a salary of one thousand
three hundred dollars per month, as adjusted for inflation by the
office of financial management in subsection (6) of this section,
during a calendar year if the district received total gross revenue of
from two million dollars to fifteen million dollars during the fiscal
year ending June 30th before the calendar year. ((However, the board
of commissioners of such a public utility district may pass a
resolution increasing the rate of salary up to one thousand three
hundred dollars per month.))
(c) Commissioners of other districts shall ((serve without))
receive a salary((. However, the board of commissioners of such a
public utility district may pass a resolution providing for salaries
not exceeding)) of six hundred dollars per month, as adjusted for
inflation by the office of financial management in subsection (6) of
this section, for each commissioner.
(2) In addition to salary, all districts ((may)) shall provide ((by
resolution)) for the payment of per diem compensation to each
commissioner at a rate ((not exceeding)) of ninety dollars, as adjusted
for inflation by the office of financial management in subsection (6)
of this section, for each day or portion thereof spent in actual
attendance at official meetings of the district commission or in
performance of other official services or duties on behalf of the
district, to include meetings of the commission of his or her district
or meetings attended by one or more commissioners of two or more
districts called to consider business common to them, but such
compensation paid during any one year to a commissioner shall not
exceed twelve thousand six hundred dollars, as adjusted for inflation
by the office of financial management in subsection (6) of this
section. Per diem compensation shall not be paid for services of a
ministerial or professional nature.
(3) Any commissioner may waive all or any portion of his or her
compensation payable under this section as to any month or months
during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the
district as provided in this section. The waiver, to be effective,
must be filed any time after the commissioner's election and prior to
the date on which the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver
shall specify the month or period of months for which it is made.
(4) Each district commissioner shall be reimbursed for reasonable
expenses actually incurred in connection with such business and
meetings, including his or her subsistence and lodging and travel while
away from his or her place of residence.
(5) Any district providing group insurance for its employees,
covering them, their immediate family, and dependents, may provide
insurance for its commissioner with the same coverage.
(6) The dollar thresholds for salaries and per diem compensation
established in this section must be adjusted for inflation by the
office of financial management every five years, beginning July 1,
2008, based upon changes in the consumer price index during that time
period. "Consumer price index" means, for any calendar year, that
year's annual average consumer price index, for Washington state, for
wage earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of
labor and statistics, United States department of labor. If the bureau
of labor and statistics develops more than one consumer price index for
areas within the state, the index covering the greatest number of
people, covering areas exclusively within the boundaries of the state,
and including all items shall be used for the adjustments for inflation
in this section. The office of financial management must calculate the
new dollar threshold and transmit it to the office of the code reviser
for publication in the Washington State Register at least one month
before the new dollar threshold is to take effect.
(7) A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special
purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation
authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation
for attending an official meeting or conducting official services or
duties while representing more than one of his or her districts.
However, such commissioner may receive additional per diem compensation
if approved by resolution of all boards of the affected commissions.

--- END ---