BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as the
Washington state right to protection act of 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature finds that the United States
was founded on principles of freedom, including freedom from
persecution by government. The federal and state governments were not
intended to have the powers they have accumulated over the past few
decades. Washington citizens have the right of self-defense to protect
themselves and others, as established in the United States and
Washington state Constitutions and recognized in District of Columbia
v. Heller, 554 U.S. ---, 128 S. Ct. 2783 (2008). No governmental
entity has the authority to supersede these constitutional guarantees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any law abiding citizen of Washington state has the right under
the United States and Washington state Constitutions to protect
themselves and others including, but not limited to:
(a) The use of firearms and ammunition;
(b) The use of mace or other repellants; and
(c) Any other means necessary and appropriate to stop an aggressor.
(2) Any law abiding citizen of Washington state has the right to
defend himself or herself, unless he or she is in the act of committing
a crime, without interference from federal or state agencies.
(3) Law abiding citizens of Washington state shall not have their
firearms, ammunition, or other means of ensuring their constitutional
rights of self-defense waived, restricted, or otherwise burdened by any
governmental agency nor shall their firearms, ammunition, or other
means of ensuring their constitutional rights of self-defense be
marked, tracked, or traced with distinguishing symbols or radio
frequency identification dust, chips, tags, paint, or any other direct
identifiers.
(4) All law abiding citizens of Washington state have a
constitutional right to privacy in their homes and vehicles, and other
places of domicile and means of transportation, and to remain
unmolested therein as long as they are not in the act of committing a
crime.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Any federal law, rule, order, or other act
by the federal government violating the provisions of this act is
hereby declared to be invalid in this state, is not recognized by and
is specifically rejected by this state, and is considered as null and
void and of no effect in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---