BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as the
Washington state sovereignty and federal tax escrow account act of
2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 By this act the legislature intends to:
Create the federal tax escrow account in the state treasury to provide
that moneys collected by the state for payment to the federal
government are paid into the account; provide that any private person
liable for a federal tax must pay the tax into the account; provide
that should the federal government, including, but not limited to, the
federal courts, act toward the state of Washington or any of its
citizens in a manner deemed unconstitutional by the Washington state
legislature, the state treasury must withhold a certain portion of the
funds due the federal government; provide that if the federal
government takes any punitive action against the state in any manner
for failure to comply with a federal statute or directive of any kind
that the Washington state legislature deems unconstitutional, the state
treasury must withhold from payment a certain portion of the funds due
the federal government; provide sanctions for failure to comply with
such provisions; provide that state officials must comply with such
provisions without regard to any action taken by the federal
government; provide for a special session of the Washington state
legislature; provide that unconstitutional measures taken by the
federal authorities constitute an action against the state of
Washington and must be met with all necessary measures to safeguard the
sovereignty of the state and the constitutional rights of its citizens;
provide for retroactive application; provide for the expenditure of
funds withheld from the federal government; provide for other matters
relative to the foregoing; provide an effective date; and repeal all
conflicting laws.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The legislature finds that the
Constitution of the United States is a compact between the people of
the sovereign states creating a general or federal government as their
agent and endowing it with only enumerated powers. That the general or
federal government is not, and can never be, the sole and exclusive
authority in determining what powers were enumerated, or delegated, and
what powers were reserved to the states and to the people thereof.
(2)(a) The tenth amendment to the Constitution of the United States
states: "The powers not delegated to the United States by the
Constitution, nor prohibited by it to the States, are reserved to the
States respectively, or to the people."
(b) The Washington state legislature finds that the tenth amendment
to the Constitution of the United States defines the entire scope of
federal power as being limited to that specifically delegated in the
Constitution and no more.
(3) The Washington state legislature finds that the congress of the
United States has the power to lay and collect taxes pursuant only to
clause 1 of Section 8 of Article 1; and clauses 4 and 5 of Section 9 of
Article 1 of the Constitution of the United States.
(4) The Washington state legislature finds that the federal
government, its agencies or agents, including the congress of the
United States, does not have the power under the Constitution of the
United States to withhold from the states the benefits of those taxes
as stated in subsection (2)(b) of this section by the use of federal
mandates or other means that fall outside the scope of the powers
delegated to the federal government by the Constitution of the United
States.
(5) In consideration of the continuing unconstitutional federal
mandates, directives, laws, court orders, and other usurpations that
withhold the benefits of those taxes as stated in subsection (2)(b) of
this section to the states, the state of Washington reasserts its claim
of sovereignty pursuant to the original compact between the several
states and the tenth amendment to the Constitution of the United
States.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Consumer tax" means any tax imposed by the federal government
on any beer, liquor, wine, or similar alcoholic beverage, tobacco,
gasoline, or any other consumer goods.
(2) "Excise tax" means any tax restricted by Article II, section 40
of the state Constitution.
(3) "Federal tax escrow account" means the federal tax escrow
account created in section 5 of this act.
(4) "Person" means natural persons, corporations, partnerships,
limited liability companies, associations, and other legal entities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The federal tax escrow account is
created in the state treasury. All federal tax moneys collected by the
state of Washington on behalf of the federal government, or any of its
agencies or agents, must be deposited by the state treasurer into the
federal tax escrow account.
(2) The state treasurer, on a quarterly basis, must disburse the
funds to the appropriate federal recipient if the Washington state
legislature deems that the federal government, and its agencies or
agents, have acted in a constitutional manner toward the state of
Washington or its citizens. If, as a result of state action taken
pursuant to this chapter, the federal government imposes or mandates
any financial sanctions or penalties or otherwise acts in a punitive
manner toward the state of Washington and its citizens, the state
treasurer must withhold from payment all or part of the quarterly
disbursement that otherwise would be disbursed or transferred to the
appropriate federal recipient.
(3) Funds that are withheld by the state treasurer from the federal
recipient must be transferred to and deposited in the state general
fund for general use.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Any person liable for any federal excise
or consumer tax must remit such tax when due along with a federal
taxpayer identification number, if applicable, to the state treasurer
for deposit into the federal tax escrow account created in section 5 of
this act. A social security number, according to statute, is not to be
defined as a federal tax identification number.
(2) All moneys collected under this section must be transmitted to
the state treasurer, who, as a fiduciary agent, must credit such funds
to the federal tax escrow account on behalf of the person who remitted
the tax.
(3) The state treasurer must submit to the federal internal revenue
service, or other such tax-collecting agencies that the congress of the
United States may from time to time establish, the names and tax
identification numbers, where applicable and excluding social security
numbers, of, and the amounts deposited by, persons liable for any
federal excise or consumer tax so that the federal internal revenue
service can credit the state of Washington's taxpayers for federal tax
obligations.
(4) Upon the effective date of this act, no federal agent or agents
may operate within the borders of the state of Washington, as described
in section 7 of this act, for the purpose of collecting taxes or of
exacting punitive measures because of the exercise by the state of
Washington of any provision or provisions of this chapter.
(5) Except as provided in section 5(2) of this act, the state
treasurer must transfer at the end of each quarter the moneys held in
the federal tax escrow account, less any interest earned on the
deposit, to the appropriate federal recipient in payment of the tax
obligations of those persons who remitted the tax funds to the state
treasurer.
(6) If the federal government, or any of its agencies or agents,
impose sanctions on or take punitive actions of any sort against the
state of Washington for failing to enact legislation called for by a
mandate from the federal government, or any of its agencies or agents,
a vote must be taken by the state legislature as to the
constitutionality of the sanctions or punitive actions. By a simple
majority vote in each house of the state legislature, if the federal
government, or any of its agencies or agents, is found to be operating
beyond the scope of its constitutionally delegated powers, and
therefore unlawfully, the state treasurer must be notified in writing
within two days by the attorney general of the vote of each house of
the state legislature, and the state legislature must instruct the
state treasurer to carry out the procedure specified in section 5(2) of
this act.
(7) It must be determined by a simple majority vote in each house
of the state legislature when the federal government, or its agencies
or agents, have properly rescinded or removed any sanctions or have
ceased punitive actions against Washington state and its citizens.
Until both houses of the state legislature have determined by a simple
majority vote that the federal government, or its agencies or agents,
are operating within the scope of its constitutionally delegated
powers, and therefore lawfully, the state treasurer must disburse or
transfer no funds from the federal tax escrow account to the federal
tax recipient.
(8) Any person liable for any federal excise or consumer tax who
fails to forward the federal tax moneys to the state treasurer is
subject to penalties assessed according to the applicable state laws.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The governor, members of each house of
the state legislature, judges, the attorney general, the secretary of
state, the state treasurer, the state auditor, and all other state
officers and employees must implement the provisions of this chapter
regardless of any sanctions, threats, punitive actions, federal court
orders, or other measures brought to bear against them by any and all
federal authorities and their agencies or agents.
(2) If the federal government, or its agencies or agents, impose
any sanctions on or execute any punitive action against the state or
any of its citizens while the state legislature is not in session, the
governor must call the state legislature into special session for the
purpose of implementing the appropriate provision of this chapter.
(3) Any action by the federal government, or its agencies or
agents, including the president of the United States, the congress of
the United States, and the federal courts, against any person in
Washington state for compliance with the provisions of this chapter is
considered a hostile and unconstitutional action against Washington
state and its citizens, and the state of Washington will by all
necessary measures act to preserve its sovereignty.
(4) The Washington state legislature, by a simple majority vote in
each house, must determine how the moneys transferred from the federal
tax escrow account to the state general fund, including accrued
interest, are to be used for the benefit of the people of Washington
state. These moneys must be used only for the benefit of the people of
Washington state.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.84.092 and 2009 c 479 s 31, 2009 c 472 s 5, and
2009 c 451 s 8 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is ((hereby)) established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate
share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily
balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search
and rescue account, the budget stabilization account, the capitol
building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia
river basin water supply development account, the common school
construction fund, the county arterial preservation account, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of licensing services
account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the
developmental disabilities community trust account, the drinking water
assistance account, the drinking water assistance administrative
account, the drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern
Washington University capital projects account, the education
construction fund, the education legacy trust account, the election
account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account,
the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College
capital projects account, the federal forest revolving account, the
federal tax escrow account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the freight
congestion relief account, the freight mobility investment account, the
freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective
fund, the public health services account, the health system capacity
account, the personal health services account, the high capacity
transportation account, the state higher education construction
account, the higher education construction account, the highway bond
retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety
account, the high occupancy toll lanes operations account, the
industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement
account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial
retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account,
the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax
account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
multimodal transportation account, the municipal criminal justice
assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization
account, the natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land
account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual
surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement
system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan
revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health
supplemental account, the public transportation systems account, the
public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction
account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puyallup tribal
settlement account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the
recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program
account, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust
account, the rural Washington loan fund, the site closure account, the
small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C
account, the special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance
account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state
investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled
trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state route
number 520 corridor account, the supplemental pension account, the
Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system
plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and
plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco
settlement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account),
the transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the
transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement
board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure
account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain
injury account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of
Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building
account, the urban arterial trust account, the volunteer firefighters'
and reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer
firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington
fruit express account, the Washington judicial retirement system
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3
account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the
Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the
normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the
scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All
earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4) shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund
pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This chapter applies to all federal actions
within the state of Washington, including, but not limited to, the
collection of federal excise and consumer taxes upon the date which it
is enacted. Because the Constitution of the United States has been
the fundamental law of the land since its ratification by the requisite
nine states in 1788, this chapter must be enforced retroactively to
repeal any unconstitutional federal laws, mandates, edicts, and court
orders that have been imposed on the state of Washington and its
citizens.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The provisions of this chapter control in
the event of a conflict between the provisions of this chapter and
other state or local laws and regulations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Any federal law, rule, order, or other act
by the federal government violating the provisions of this chapter is
invalid in this state, is not recognized by and is specifically
rejected by this state, and is considered as null and void and of no
effect in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 7 and 9 through 11 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 83 RCW.

--- END ---