BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as the
Washington state sheriff first act of 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature intends to ensure maximum
cooperation between federal agencies and employees and local law
enforcement authorities; to ensure that federal agencies and employees
who carry out arrests, searches, and seizures in this state receive the
best local knowledge and expertise available; and to prevent
misadventure affecting Washington citizens and their constitutionally
protected rights that result from lack of cooperation or communication
between federal agencies and employees operating in Washington and
properly constituted local law enforcement authorities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The sheriff may prohibit a federal
employee who is not designated by Washington law as a Washington peace
officer from making an arrest, search, or seizure in this state without
the written permission of the sheriff of the county in which the
arrest, search, or seizure will occur unless:
(a) The arrest, search, or seizure will take place on a federal
enclave for which jurisdiction has been lawfully ceded to the United
States of America by Washington state;
(b) The federal employee witnesses the commission of a crime the
nature of which requires an immediate arrest as authorized by law;
(c) The arrest, search, or seizure is in fresh pursuit, as
described in chapters 10.89 and 10.93 RCW;
(d) The intended subject of the arrest, search, or seizure is an
employee of the sheriff's office or is an elected county or state
officer; or
(e) The federal employee has probable cause to believe that the
subject of the arrest, search, or seizure has close connections with
the sheriff to the extent that such connections are more likely than
not to result in the subject being informed of the impending arrest,
search, or seizure.
(2)(a) A permission request to the county sheriff or to the
attorney general, as appropriate, must contain:
(i) The name of the subject of the arrest, search, or seizure;
(ii) A clear statement of probable cause for the arrest, search, or
seizure or a federal arrest, search, or seizure warrant that contains
a clear statement of probable cause;
(iii) A description of specific assets, if any, to be searched for
or seized;
(iv) A statement of the date and time that the arrest, search, or
seizure is to be attempted; and
(v) The address or location where the intended arrest, search, or
seizure is to be attempted.
(b) The request may be in letter form, either typed or handwritten,
but must be countersigned with the original signature of the county
sheriff or designee of the sheriff, or by the attorney general or
designee of the attorney general, to constitute valid permission. The
permission is valid for forty-eight hours after it is signed. The
sheriff shall keep a copy of the permission request on file.
(3) The county sheriff or the attorney general, as appropriate, may
refuse permission for any reason that he or she considers sufficient.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A federal agency or employee shall
obtain the written permission of the attorney general for the arrest,
search, or seizure of an employee of the sheriff's office or an elected
county or state officer pursuant to section 3(1)(d) of this act unless
the resulting delay in obtaining the permission would more likely than
not cause serious harm to one or more individuals or to a community, or
would more likely than not cause flight of the subject of the arrest,
search, or seizure in order to avoid prosecution. The request for
permission must include a written statement, under oath, describing the
federal agency's or employee's probable cause that the elements of
section 3(1)(d) of this act are met.
(2) A federal agency or employee shall obtain the written
permission of the attorney general for the arrest, search, or seizure
of a subject who has close connections with the sheriff pursuant to
section 3(1)(e) of this act unless the resulting delay in obtaining the
permission would more likely than not cause serious harm to one or more
individuals or to a community, or would more likely than not cause
flight of the subject of the arrest, search, or seizure in order to
avoid prosecution. The request for permission must include a written
statement, under oath, describing the federal agency's or employee's
probable cause that the elements of section 3(1)(e) of this act are
met.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) An arrest, search, or seizure or
attempted arrest, search, or seizure in violation of the provisions of
this act is unlawful, and individuals involved must be charged with any
applicable criminal offenses by the prosecuting attorney, if probable
cause exists that such a violation has occurred.
(2) The prosecuting attorney has no discretion not to prosecute
once a claim of violation of this act has been made by the county
sheriff or the attorney general, as appropriate, and supported by
probable cause.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Any federal law, rule, order, or other act
by the federal government violating the provisions of this act is
hereby declared to be invalid in this state, is not recognized by and
is specifically rejected by this state, and is considered as null and
void and of no effect in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 3 and 6 of this act are each added
to chapter 36.28 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 4 and 5 of this act are each added
to chapter 10.79 RCW.

--- END ---