BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as the
Washington right to anonymous political speech act of 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the rights of citizens to free
speech, to privacy, and to peaceably assemble and petition the
government for redress of grievances are among the most fundamental
rights protected by the United States Constitution and the Washington
state Constitution. Inherent within these rights is the right of
individuals to engage in anonymous speech, speech that has played an
important role in the progress of mankind, such as the Federalist
papers. The United States supreme court has recognized there is
nothing inherently suspect with an individual wanting to keep his or
her support for an issue private noting that the decision in favor of
anonymity may be motivated by fear of economic or official retaliation,
by concern about social ostracism, or merely by a desire to preserve as
much of one's privacy as possible. The public release of initiative
and referendum petitions containing the names and addresses of
Washington residents pursuant to Washington's public records act
threatens to undermine the goals of these fundamental rights as
protected by the United States Constitution and the Washington state
Constitution to encourage uninhibited, robust, and wide open debate,
and will create a reasonable probability of exposing those individuals
to a significant risk of threats, harassment, and reprisals. By
publicly disseminating the names of individuals signing an initiative
or referendum petition, individuals and organizations may hope to make
it personally, economically, and politically unpopular to advocate a
particular position on sensitive, controversial issues of critical
importance.
(2) The legislature further finds clearly and unambiguously that
there has been a privacy policy in place in Washington state for over
ninety years. From 1912 until 2006, citizens exercising their
political free speech rights by affixing their names, signatures, and
home addresses on ballot measure petitions in Washington were protected
and every secretary of state until recent times protected citizens'
privacy. In 1973, the secretary of state was sued by a state senator
for refusing to turn over the names, signatures, and home addresses of
citizens who signed petitions to cap politicians' pay. The secretary
of state in that case made clear the office's longstanding practice,
supported by attorney general opinions issued in 1938 and 1956, of not
releasing such information saying it had long been their office's
policy to not release the names of citizens signing initiative or
referendum petitions, that the release of such information had no legal
value, that the release of such information could have deep political
ramifications to those individuals who signed the petitions, and that
he or she would not violate the public trust by releasing such
information. The attorney general's office further made clear that the
public records act, Initiative 276 which passed the previous year,
required the attorney general to redact that personal information,
stating that section 26, chapter 1, Laws of 1973 (Initiative 276)
provided that to the extent required to prevent an unreasonable
invasion of personal privacy, an agency shall delete identifying
details when it makes available or publishes any public record.
(3) The legislature recognizes that although current law provides
for the limited exposure of petition signatures to public scrutiny
during the signature counting and verification process, it restricts
that exposure to the least intrusive extent possible in order to
maintain the maximum extent of privacy possible for the individual
providing his or her name, signature, and home address on the petition.
(4) The legislature intends by this act to reiterate and reaffirm
that the state of Washington lacks a compelling interest sufficient to
justify the public disclosure of information in initiative and
referendum petitions, that the release of the names and addresses of
persons who sign such petitions constitutes an unreasonable burden on
an individual's rights to free speech, to privacy, and to peaceably
assemble and petition the government for redress of grievances, that if
the law were to be applied in a manner to require the public disclosure
of the names and addresses of petition signers the result would
significantly inhibit communication with voters about proposed
political change such an application is not warranted by other state
interests, such as administrative efficiency, fraud detection, and
informing voters, alleged to justify the release of such information,
and would result in compelled political speech which is politically and
legally unacceptable.
(5) The legislature does not agree with or accept the secretary of
state's or attorney general's understanding and position on the law or
legislative intent in Doe #1, John, et al. v. Reed, Wa Sec. of State,
et al, 09A356-10-19-09, and reasserts and clarifies that the law of
this state, including the Washington public records act, RCW 42.56.001,
et seq., was never intended to and does not require or authorize the
release of initiative and referendum petitions containing the names and
addresses of Washington residents, rather it is intended and designed
to protect the privacy of citizens who sign initiative and referendum
petitions and to prevent the release of such information. To prevent
any potential miscarriages of the law, the legislature finds it is
necessary to amend chapter 42.56 RCW. This amendment is intended to be
curative in nature only.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
Nothing in this chapter or other provision of law requires or
authorizes the release of the name, signature, and/or address of any
individual who signs an initiative or referendum petition. Signature
petitions for initiatives or referenda are exempt from public
inspection and copying.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.72.230 and 2003 c 111 s 1823 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes there is a legitimate reason under
this section for limited public inspection of an initiative or
referendum petition by persons representing the advocates and opponents
of the proposed measure as observers to ensure governmental officials
who are verifying and canvassing the names of the legal voters on a
petition are properly examining the signatures in order to determine
that petitions with a sufficient number of valid signatures move
forward and that petitions with an insufficient number of valid
signatures do not move forward, so long as such observers make no
record of the names, addresses, or other information on the petitions
or related records during the verification process, except upon the
order of the superior court of Thurston county. Such an inspection is
exclusively for the limited purpose of making sure governmental
officials are properly doing their jobs and does not allow one private
citizen to invade the privacy of another private citizen.
(2) Upon the filing of an initiative or referendum petition, the
secretary of state shall proceed to verify and canvass the names of the
legal voters on the petition. The verification and canvass of
signatures on the petition may be observed by persons representing the
advocates and opponents of the proposed measure so long as they make no
record of the names, addresses, or other information on the petitions
or related records during the verification process except upon the
order of the superior court of Thurston county. The secretary of state
may limit the number of observers to not less than two on each side, if
in his or her opinion, a greater number would cause undue delay or
disruption of the verification process. Any such limitation shall
apply equally to both sides. The secretary of state may use any
statistical sampling techniques for this verification and canvass which
have been adopted by rule as provided by chapter 34.05 RCW. No
petition will be rejected on the basis of any statistical method em-
ployed, and no petition will be accepted on the basis of any
statistical method employed if such method indicates that the petition
contains fewer than the requisite number of signatures of legal voters.
If the secretary of state finds the same name signed to more than one
petition, he or she shall reject all but the first such valid
signature. For an initiative to the legislature, the secretary of
state shall transmit a certified copy of the proposed measure to the
legislature at the opening of its session and, as soon as the
signatures on the petition have been verified and canvassed, the
secretary of state shall send to the legislature a certificate of the
facts relating to the filing, verification, and canvass of the
petition.
(3) Signature petitions are exempt from public inspection and
copying in accordance with section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The provisions of this act control in the
event of a conflict between the provisions of this section and other
state or local laws and regulations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---