BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.56.310 and 2003 c 111 s 1424 are each amended to
read as follows:
On the Tuesday after the first Monday of November in the year in
which a president of the United States is to be elected, there shall be
elected ((as many electors of president and vice president of the
United States as there are senators and representatives in Congress
allotted to this state)) one presidential elector from each
congressional district and two electors from the state at-large. Each
elector may have an alternate to stand in for the elector in case of
death, refusal to act, or neglect to attend the electors meeting.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.56.320 and 2009 c 264 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
In the year in which a presidential election is held, each major
political party and each minor political party or independent candidate
convention held under chapter 29A.20 RCW that nominates candidates for
president and vice president of the United States shall nominate
presidential electors and alternates for this state. The party or
convention shall file with the secretary of state a certificate signed
by the presiding officer of the convention at which the presidential
electors were chosen, listing the names and addresses of the
presidential electors. Each presidential elector and alternate shall
execute and file with the secretary of state a pledge that, as an
elector, he or she will vote for the candidates nominated by that
party. The names of presidential electors shall not appear on the
ballots. The votes cast for candidates for president and vice
president of each political party shall be counted for the candidates
for presidential electors of that political party((; however, if the
interstate compact entitled the "agreement among the states to elect
the president by national popular vote," as set forth in RCW
29A.56.300, governs the appointment of the presidential electors for a
presidential election as provided in clause 9 of Article III of that
compact, then the final appointment of presidential electors for that
presidential election shall be in accordance with that compact)). The
congressional district presidential elector shall be the elector from
the political party whose presidential and vice presidential candidates
received the most number of votes in the congressional district. The
at-large presidential electors shall be electors from the political
party for the presidential and vice presidential candidates who
received the most number of votes in the state.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.56.340 and 2003 c 111 s 1427 are each amended to
read as follows:
The electors of the president and vice president shall convene at
the seat of government on the day fixed by federal statute, at the hour
of twelve o'clock noon of that day. If there is any vacancy in the
office of an elector ((occasioned by death, refusal to act, neglect to
attend, or otherwise, the electors present shall immediately proceed to
fill it by voice vote, and plurality of votes)), the elector's
designated alternate shall be recognized as the elector. When all of
the electors have appeared and the vacancies have been filled they
shall constitute the college of electors of the state of Washington,
and shall proceed to perform the duties required of them by the
Constitution and laws of the United States. Any elector who votes for
a person or persons not nominated by the party of which he or she is an
elector is subject to a civil penalty of up to one thousand dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 29A.56.300 (States' agreement -- Presidential election--National popular vote) and 2009 c 264 s 2; and
(2) 2009 c 264 s 1 (uncodified).

--- END ---