BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 10.77 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A defendant who offers a timely defense of insanity under RCW
10.77.030 may be found "guilty and mentally ill" at trial if the trier
of fact finds that:
(a) The state has proven beyond a reasonable doubt that the
defendant is guilty of the crime charged;
(b) The defendant has failed to prove by a preponderance of the
evidence the asserted insanity defense; and
(c) The defendant or the state has proven by a preponderance of the
evidence that the defendant was mentally ill at the time of the
commission of the offense and that the defendant's actions at the time
of the commission of the offense were affected by symptoms of mental
illness.
(2) A defendant who waives the right to trial may plead guilty and
mentally ill. No plea of guilty and mentally ill shall be accepted by
the court unless the defendant has undergone examination by a
psychologist or psychiatrist, and following a review of the medical
evidence and a hearing on the defendant's mental condition, the court
is satisfied that there is a factual basis for the plea of guilty and
mentally ill. If the court refuses to accept a defendant's plea of
guilty and mentally ill, the defendant shall be permitted to withdraw
the plea.
(3) For the purposes of sentencing, a finding of guilty and
mentally ill shall be treated the equivalent as a finding of guilty.
A defendant who is found guilty and mentally ill may receive any
sentence, including a standard range sentence or an exceptional
sentence, which could have lawfully been imposed if the defendant were
found guilty of the same offense.
(4) A defendant who is sentenced as guilty and mentally ill shall
be under the jurisdiction of the department of corrections. If the
defendant's sentence calls for a term of confinement, the defendant
shall be committed to the custody of the department of social and
health services, which shall place the defendant in a secure mental
health facility for an initial period of mental health treatment and
evaluation. Following this period, the defendant shall be discharged
to the custody of the department of corrections for the balance of the
defendant's sentence.
(a) A defendant in the custody of the department of social and
health services who cooperates with treatment shall remain in the
custody of the department of social and health services only for such
time as is reasonably necessary to stabilize the defendant's condition
and determine an appropriate course of treatment for the defendant
within the department of corrections. A defendant who refuses to
cooperate with treatment must be discharged to the custody of the
department of corrections. The decision to discharge the defendant to
the custody of the department of corrections shall be made at the sole
discretion of the department of social and health services.
(b) The department of social and health services shall discharge a
defendant under this subsection within ninety days, or submit written
justification to the department of corrections why continued treatment
is necessary in order to achieve the goals in (a) of this subsection.
Lack of success in treatment, which is proximately caused by the
defendant, is not justification for failing to discharge a defendant.
At the time of discharge, the department of social and health services
shall provide the department of corrections with a report describing
the defendant's condition and recommended course of treatment, and will
provide the department of corrections with any requested medical
information relating to the treatment of the defendant.
(c) A defendant committed to the custody of the department of
social and health services under this section shall not be confined for
longer than the confinement term of the defendant's sentence, and shall
be eligible for earned release time under RCW 9.94A.728, as determined
jointly by the department of corrections and the department of social
and health services.
(d) A defendant committed to the custody of the department of
social and health services under this section shall not be eligible for
unescorted privileges on the grounds or outside the grounds of a secure
mental health facility without the written permission of the secretary
of the department of corrections or the secretary's designee.
(5) The department of corrections and department of social and
health services may adopt rules or make agreements necessary for the
implementation of this section.
(6) For the purposes of this section, the terms "mental illness"
and "mentally ill" refer to a substantial disorder of thought, mood, or
behavior that has a substantial adverse effect on the defendant's
cognitive or volitional functions, but not rising to the level of
insanity under RCW 9A.12.010.

Sec. 2 RCW 10.77.040 and 1998 c 297 s 33 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever the issue of insanity is submitted to the jury, the court
shall instruct the jury to return a special verdict in substantially
the following form:

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.501 and 2009 c 376 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall supervise every offender convicted of a
misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor offense who is sentenced to probation
in superior court, pursuant to RCW 9.92.060, 9.95.204, or 9.95.210, for
an offense included in (a) and (b) of this subsection. The superior
court shall order probation for:
(a) Offenders convicted of fourth degree assault, violation of a
domestic violence court order pursuant to RCW 10.99.040, 10.99.050,
26.09.300, 26.10.220, 26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070, or 74.34.145,
and who also have a prior conviction for one or more of the following:
(i) A violent offense;
(ii) A sex offense;
(iii) A crime against a person as provided in RCW 9.94A.411;
(iv) Fourth degree assault; or
(v) Violation of a domestic violence court order; and
(b) Offenders convicted of:
(i) Sexual misconduct with a minor second degree;
(ii) Custodial sexual misconduct second degree;
(iii) Communication with a minor for immoral purposes; and
(iv) Failure to register pursuant to RCW 9A.44.130.
(2) Misdemeanor and gross misdemeanor offenders supervised by the
department pursuant to this section shall be placed on community
custody.
(3) The department shall supervise every felony offender sentenced
to community custody whose risk assessment, conducted pursuant to
subsection (6) of this section, classifies the offender as one who is
at a high risk to reoffend.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the
department shall supervise an offender sentenced to community custody
regardless of risk classification if the offender:
(a) Has a current conviction for a sex offense or a serious violent
offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;
(b) Has been identified by the department as a dangerous mentally
ill offender pursuant to RCW 72.09.370;
(c) Has an indeterminate sentence and is subject to parole pursuant
to RCW 9.95.017;
(d) Was found guilty and mentally ill under section 1 of this act;
(e) Was sentenced under RCW 9.94A.650, 9.94A.660, or 9.94A.670; or
(((e))) (f) Is subject to supervision pursuant to RCW 9.94A.745.
(5) The department is not authorized to, and may not, supervise any
offender sentenced to a term of community custody or any probationer
unless the offender or probationer is one for whom supervision is
required under subsection (1), (2), (3), or (4) of this section.
(6) The department shall conduct a risk assessment for every felony
offender sentenced to a term of community custody who may be subject to
supervision under this section.

--- END ---