BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 72.36.010 and 1959 c 28 s 72.36.010 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) There is established at Orting, Pierce county, an institution
which shall be known as the Washington soldiers' home.
(2) The department is authorized to work with public or private
entities on projects to make the best use of the soldiers' home
property and facilities. These projects may include, but are not
limited to, the renovation and long-term lease of the Garfield barracks
building on the soldiers' home campus.
(3) All long-term leases of the soldiers' home property shall be
subject to the requirements of RCW 43.82.010, except that such leases
may run for up to seventy-five years.

--- END ---