BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.33.070 and 1984 c 155 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for any parent or
alleged father under eighteen years of age in any proceeding under this
chapter. The court may appoint a guardian ad litem for a child adoptee
or any incompetent party in any proceeding under this chapter. The
guardian ad litem for a parent or alleged father, in addition to
determining what is in the best interest of the party, shall make an
investigation and report to the court concerning whether any written
consent to adoption or petition for relinquishment signed by the parent
or alleged father was signed voluntarily and with an understanding of
the consequences of the action. If the child to be relinquished is a
dependent child under chapter 13.34 RCW and the minor parent is
represented by an attorney or guardian ad litem in the dependency
proceeding, the court may rely on the minor parent's dependency court
attorney or guardian ad litem to make a report to the court as provided
in this subsection.
(2) The court in the county in which a petition is filed shall
direct who shall pay the fees of a guardian ad litem or attorney
appointed under this chapter and shall approve the payment of the fees.
If the court orders the parties to pay the fees of the guardian ad
litem, the fees must be established pursuant to the procedures in RCW
26.12.183.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.09.220 and 1993 c 289 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The court may order an investigation and report concerning
parenting arrangements for the child, or may appoint a guardian ad
litem pursuant to RCW 26.12.175, or both. The investigation and report
may be made by the guardian ad litem, court-appointed special advocate,
the staff of the juvenile court, or other professional social service
organization experienced in counseling children and families.
(b) An investigator is a person appointed as an investigator under
RCW 26.12.050(1)(b) or any other third-party professional ordered or
appointed by the court to provide an opinion, assessment, or evaluation
regarding the creation or modification of a parenting plan.
(2) In preparing the report concerning a child, the investigator or
person appointed under subsection (1) of this section may consult any
person who may have information about the child and the potential
parenting or custodian arrangements. Upon order of the court, the
investigator or person appointed under subsection (1) of this section
may refer the child to professional personnel for diagnosis. The
investigator or person appointed under subsection (1) of this section
may consult with and obtain information from medical, psychiatric, or
other expert persons who have served the child in the past without
obtaining the consent of the parent or the child's custodian; but the
child's consent must be obtained if the child has reached the age of
twelve, unless the court finds that the child lacks mental capacity to
consent. If the requirements of subsection (3) of this section are
fulfilled, the ((investigator's)) report by the investigator or person
appointed under subsection (1) of this section may be received in
evidence at the hearing.
(3) The investigator or person appointed under subsection (1) of
this section shall ((mail the investigator's)) provide his or her
report to counsel and to any party not represented by counsel at least
ten days prior to the hearing unless a shorter time is ordered by the
court for good cause shown. The investigator or person appointed under
subsection (1) of this section shall make available to counsel and to
any party not represented by counsel ((the investigator's)) his or her
file of underlying data and reports, complete texts of diagnostic
reports made to the investigator or appointed person pursuant to the
provisions of subsection (2) of this section, and the names and
addresses of all persons whom ((the investigator)) he or she has
consulted. Any party to the proceeding may call the investigator or
person appointed under subsection (1) of this section and any person
whom the investigator or appointed person has consulted for cross-examination. A party may not waive the right of cross-examination
prior to the hearing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 26.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The court may appoint an investigator in addition to a guardian
ad litem or court-appointed special advocate under RCW 26.12.175 and
26.12.177 to assist the court and make recommendations.
(2) An investigator is a person appointed as an investigator under
RCW 26.12.050(1)(b) or any other third-party professional ordered or
appointed by the court to provide an opinion, assessment, or evaluation
regarding the creation or modification of a parenting plan.
(3) Investigators who are not supervised by a guardian ad litem or
by a court-appointed special advocate program must comply with the
training requirements applicable to guardians ad litem or court-appointed special advocates as provided under this chapter and court
rule.

Sec. 4 RCW 26.12.175 and 2009 c 480 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The court may appoint a guardian ad litem to represent the
interests of a minor or dependent child when the court believes the
appointment of a guardian ad litem is necessary to protect the best
interests of the child in any proceeding under this chapter. The court
may appoint a guardian ad litem from the court-appointed special
advocate program, if that program exists in the county. The court
shall attempt to match a child with special needs with a guardian ad
litem who has specific training or education related to the child's
individual needs. The family court services professionals may also
make a recommendation to the court regarding whether a guardian ad
litem should be appointed for the child.
(b) The guardian ad litem's role is to investigate and report
factual information regarding the issues ordered to be reported or
investigated to the court. The guardian ad litem shall always
represent the best interests of the child. Guardians ad litem ((and
investigators)) under this title may make recommendations based upon
his or her investigation, which the court may consider and weigh in
conjunction with the recommendations of all of the parties. If a child
expresses a preference regarding the parenting plan, the guardian ad
litem shall report the preferences to the court, together with the
facts relative to whether any preferences are being expressed
voluntarily and the degree of the child's understanding. The court may
require the guardian ad litem to provide periodic reports to the
parties regarding the status of his or her investigation. The guardian
ad litem shall file his or her report at least sixty days prior to
trial.
(c) The parties to the proceeding may file with the court written
responses to any report filed by the guardian ad litem ((or
investigator)). The court shall consider any written responses to a
report filed by the guardian ad litem ((or investigator)), including
any factual information or recommendations provided in the report.
(d) The court shall enter an order for costs, fees, and
disbursements to cover the costs of the guardian ad litem. The court
may order either or both parents to pay for the costs of the guardian
ad litem, according to their ability to pay. If both parents are
indigent, the county shall bear the cost of the guardian, subject to
appropriation for guardians' ad litem services by the county
legislative authority. Guardians ad litem who are not volunteers shall
provide the parties with an itemized accounting of their time and
billing for services each month.
(2)(a) If the guardian ad litem appointed is from the county court-appointed special advocate program, the program shall supervise any
guardian ad litem assigned to the case. The court-appointed special
advocate program shall be entitled to notice of all proceedings in the
case.
(b) The legislative authority of each county may authorize creation
of a court-appointed special advocate program. The county legislative
authority may adopt rules of eligibility for court-appointed special
advocate program services that are not inconsistent with this section.
(3) Each guardian ad litem program for compensated guardians ad
litem and each court-appointed special advocate program shall maintain
a background information record for each guardian ad litem in the
program. The background information record shall include, but is not
limited to, the following information:
(a) Level of formal education;
(b) General training related to the guardian ad litem's duties;
(c) Specific training related to issues potentially faced by
children in dissolution, custody, paternity, and other family law
proceedings;
(d) Specific training or education related to child disability or
developmental issues;
(e) Number of years' experience as a guardian ad litem;
(f) Number of appointments as a guardian ad litem and county or
counties of appointment;
(g) The names of any counties in which the person was removed from
a guardian ad litem registry pursuant to a grievance action, and the
name of the court and the cause number of any case in which the court
has removed the person for cause;
(h) Founded allegations of abuse or neglect as defined in RCW
26.44.020;
(i) The results of an examination that shall consist of a
background check as allowed through the Washington state criminal
records privacy act under RCW 10.97.050 and the Washington state patrol
criminal identification system under RCW 43.43.832 through 43.43.834.
This background check shall be done through the Washington state patrol
criminal identification section; and
(j) Criminal history, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, for the period
covering ten years prior to the appointment.
The background information record shall be updated annually. As a
condition of appointment, the guardian ad litem's background
information record shall be made available to the court. If the
appointed guardian ad litem is not a member of a guardian ad litem
program the person appointed as guardian ad litem shall provide the
background information record to the court.
Upon appointment, the guardian ad litem, court-appointed special
advocate program or guardian ad litem program, shall provide the
parties or their attorneys with a copy of the background information
record. The portion of the background information record containing
the results of the criminal background check and the criminal history
shall not be disclosed to the parties or their attorneys. The
background information record shall not include identifying information
that may be used to harm a guardian ad litem, such as home addresses
and home telephone numbers, and for volunteer guardians ad litem the
court may allow the use of maiden names or pseudonyms as necessary for
their safety.
(4) When a court-appointed special advocate or volunteer guardian
ad litem is requested on a case, the program shall give the court the
name of the person it recommends. The court shall immediately appoint
the person recommended by the program.
(5) If a party in a case reasonably believes the court-appointed
special advocate or volunteer guardian ad litem is inappropriate or
unqualified, the party may request a review of the appointment by the
program. The program must complete the review within five judicial
days and remove any appointee for good cause. If the party seeking the
review is not satisfied with the outcome of the review, the party may
file a motion with the court for the removal of the court-appointed
special advocate or volunteer guardian ad litem on the grounds the
advocate or volunteer is inappropriate or unqualified.

Sec. 5 RCW 26.12.177 and 2009 c 480 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All guardians ad litem ((and investigators)) appointed under
this title must comply with the training requirements established under
RCW 2.56.030(15), prior to their appointment in cases under Title 26
RCW, except that volunteer guardians ad litem or court-appointed
special advocates may comply with alternative training requirements
approved by the administrative office of the courts that meet or exceed
the statewide requirements. In cases involving allegations of limiting
factors under RCW 26.09.191, the guardians ad litem ((and
investigators)) appointed under this title must have additional
relevant training under RCW 2.56.030(15) ((and as recommended under RCW
2.53.040,)) when it is available.
(2)(a) Each guardian ad litem program for compensated guardians ad
litem shall establish a rotational registry system for the appointment
of guardians ad litem ((and investigators)) under this title. If a
judicial district does not have a program the court shall establish the
rotational registry system. Guardians ad litem ((and investigators))
under this title shall be selected from the registry except in
exceptional circumstances as determined and documented by the court.
The parties may make a joint recommendation for the appointment of a
guardian ad litem from the registry.
(b) In judicial districts with a population over one hundred
thousand, a list of three names shall be selected from the registry and
given to the parties along with the background information record as
specified in RCW 26.12.175(3), including their hourly rate for
services. Each party may, within three judicial days, strike one name
from the list. If more than one name remains on the list, the court
shall make the appointment from the names on the list. In the event
all three names are stricken the person whose name appears next on the
registry shall be appointed.
(c) If a party reasonably believes that the appointed guardian ad
litem is inappropriate or unqualified, charges an hourly rate higher
than what is reasonable for the particular proceeding, or has a
conflict of interest, the party may, within three judicial days from
the appointment, move for substitution of the appointed guardian ad
litem by filing a motion with the court.
(d) Under this section, within either registry referred to in (a)
of this subsection, a subregistry may be created that consists of
guardians ad litem under contract with the department of social and
health services' division of child support. Guardians ad litem on such
a subregistry shall be selected and appointed in state-initiated
paternity cases only.
(e) The superior court shall remove any person from the guardian ad
litem registry who has been found to have misrepresented his or her
qualifications.
(3) The rotational registry system shall not apply to court-appointed special advocate programs.

--- END ---