BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.36.120 and 1992 c 145 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person eighteen years of age or older is guilty of the crime
of assault of a child in the first degree if the child is under the age
of thirteen and the person:
(a) Commits the crime of assault in the first degree, as defined in
RCW 9A.36.011, against the child; or
(b) Intentionally assaults the child and either:
(i) ((Recklessly)) Negligently inflicts great bodily harm; or
(ii) Causes substantial bodily harm, and the person has previously
engaged in a pattern or practice either of (A) assaulting the child
which has resulted in bodily harm that is greater than transient
physical pain or minor temporary marks, or (B) causing the child
physical pain or agony that is equivalent to that produced by torture.
(2) Assault of a child in the first degree is a class A felony.

--- END ---