BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.36.120 and 1992 c 145 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person eighteen years of age or older is guilty of the crime
of assault of a child in the first degree if the child is under the age
of thirteen and the person:
(a) Commits the crime of assault in the first degree, as defined in
RCW 9A.36.011, against the child; ((or))
(b) Intentionally assaults the child and ((either:
(i))) recklessly inflicts great bodily harm; ((or
(ii))) (c) Causes substantial bodily harm, and the person has
previously engaged in a pattern or practice ((either)) of (((A)))
assaulting the child which has resulted in bodily harm that is greater
than transient physical pain or minor temporary marks((,)); or
(((B))) (d) Causes substantial bodily harm, and the person has
previously engaged in a pattern or practice of causing the child
physical pain or agony that is equivalent to that produced by torture.
(2) Assault of a child in the first degree is a class A felony.

--- END ---