BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that a critical factor
in the eventual successful outcome of a K-12 education is for students
to begin school ready, both intellectually and socially, to learn. The
legislature also finds that, due to a variety of factors, some young
children need supplemental instruction in preschool to assure that they
have the opportunity to participate meaningfully and reach the
necessary levels of achievement in the regular program of basic
education. The legislature further finds that children who participate
in high quality preschool programs have improved educational and life
outcomes and are more likely to graduate from high school and pursue
higher education, experience successful employment opportunities, and
have increased earnings. Therefore the legislature intends to
establish a program of early learning for educationally at-risk
children and, beginning September 1, 2011, to include this program
within the overall program of basic education under Article IX of the
state Constitution.
The legislature also finds that the state early childhood education
and assistance program was established to help children from low-income
families be prepared for kindergarten, and that the program has been a
successful model for achieving that goal. Therefore, the legislature
intends that the first phase of implementing the basic education
program of early learning for children who are educationally at risk
shall be accomplished by utilizing the program standards and
eligibility criteria in the early childhood education and assistance
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Community-based early learning providers" includes for-profit
and nonprofit licensed providers of child care and preschool programs.
(2) "Department" means the department of early learning.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department.
(4) "Program" means the program of early learning established in
section 3 of this act for children who are determined to be
educationally at risk pursuant to section 4 of this act.
(5) "Superintendent" means the superintendent of public
instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 PROGRAM STANDARDS. (1) An early learning
program is established, beginning September 1, 2011, within the state's
overall program of basic education to provide voluntary preschool
opportunities for children three and four years of age who are
educationally at risk. The program must be a comprehensive program
providing early childhood education and family support, options for
parental involvement, and health information, screening, and referral
services, as family need is determined. Participation in the program
is voluntary. On a space available basis, the program may allow
enrollment of children who are not otherwise eligible by assessing a
fee.
(2) The first phase of the program shall be implemented by
utilizing the program standards and eligibility criteria in the early
childhood education and assistance program.
(3) Subsequent phases of the program including, but not limited to,
program standards and eligibility processes, shall be defined by the
legislature after receiving the recommendations from the superintendent
and the director required in section 10 of this act.
(4) The superintendent and the director jointly shall adopt rules
for the following program components, as appropriate and necessary
during the phased implementation of the program:
(a) A process for conducting individual evaluations to determine
program eligibility for children who do not qualify under section
4(1)(c) (i) or (ii) of this act, but who may be at risk of being
unprepared for kindergarten for other reasons;
(b) Minimum program standards, including lead teacher, assistant
teacher, and staff qualifications;
(c) Approval of program providers;
(d) Accountability and adherence to performance standards; and
(e) A method for allowing, on a space available basis, enrollment
of children who are not otherwise eligible by assessing fees.
(5) The department has administrative responsibility for:
(a) Approving and contracting with providers according to rules
developed jointly by the superintendent and the director under this
section;
(b) In partnership with school districts, monitoring program
quality and assuring the program is responsive to the needs of eligible
children;
(c) Assuring that program providers work cooperatively with school
districts to coordinate the transition from preschool to kindergarten
so that children and their families are well-prepared and supported;
and
(d) Providing technical assistance to contracted providers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 ELIGIBILITY. (1)(a) The legislature intends
that eligibility for enrollment in the program be based on risk factors
which, in the absence of effective intervention, have been identified
by research to correlate with an increased probability of poor
educational outcomes. The legislature also intends that children who
do not qualify on the basis of risk factors, but who are determined to
be at risk of being unprepared for kindergarten based on an individual
evaluation, will be eligible for the program.
(b) During the initial phase of implementation, the standards in
RCW 43.215.405(3) used for eligibility determinations in the early
childhood education and assistance program shall be used to determine
eligibility for the program.
(c) During subsequent phases of implementation, the following
criteria shall be used for eligibility determinations:
(i) The child's household income is at or below one hundred ten
percent of the federal poverty level, as published annually by the
federal department of health and human services, and the child's
circumstances include one or more risk factors to be determined by the
legislature after receiving recommendations required in subsection
(2)(a) of this section;
(ii) The child's circumstances include one or more risk factors to
be determined by the legislature after receiving recommendations
required in subsection (2)(a) of this section; or
(iii) The child has been determined to be at risk of being
unprepared for kindergarten based on an individual evaluation conducted
by a school district according to a process approved by the legislature
after receiving recommendations required in subsection (2)(b) of this
section.
(d) After the individual evaluation process is approved by the
legislature and implemented:
(i) School districts, in collaboration with approved early learning
providers, shall conduct the evaluations to determine a child's
eligibility for participation in the program; and
(ii) A three year old child who is determined eligible on the basis
of an individual evaluation may remain in the program for a second year
as a four year old.
(2) The superintendent and the director jointly shall develop
recommendations for legislative approval regarding:
(a) Risk factors demonstrated by research to correlate with an
increased probability of poor educational outcomes which could be used
to determine program eligibility following the initial phase of program
implementation including, but not limited to:
(i) The child has limited English proficiency; and
(ii) The child's family is receiving child welfare services under
chapter 13.34 RCW;
(b) An evaluation process for use in eligibility determinations for
children who are not eligible under subsection (1)(c)(i) or (ii) of
this section, but who may be at risk of being unprepared for
kindergarten for other reasons. The evaluation process must be aligned
with the state's early learning benchmarks and the kindergarten
assessment described in section 616, chapter 564, Laws of 2009; and
(c) A schedule for implementing the individual evaluation process
throughout the state, including training for school district personnel
and approved early learning providers.
(3) The superintendent and the director shall report the
recommendations required under subsection (2) of this section to the
appropriate committees of the legislature not later than November 15,
2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 FUNDING AND STATEWIDE IMPLEMENTATION. (1)
Funding for the program of early learning established under this
chapter must be appropriated to the superintendent. Allocations must
be made on the basis of eligible children enrolled with eligible
providers.
(2) The program shall be implemented in phases, with the intent
that full implementation be achieved in the 2017-18 school year.
(3) For the initial phase of the early learning program in school
years 2011-12 and 2012-13, funding shall consist of appropriation to
the superintendent of amounts that would otherwise have been
appropriated for the early childhood education and assistance program
formerly implemented by the department. The legislature shall
appropriate funding to the superintendent for implementation of the
early learning program at a level not less than the 2009-2011 budget
for the early childhood education and assistance program.
(4) Beginning in the 2013-14 school year, additional funding for
the program must be phased in beginning in school districts having the
highest poverty levels, defined as those school districts with the
highest percentages of enrolled students qualifying for free and
reduced price lunch support in the prior school year.
(5) Funding shall continue to be phased in incrementally each year
until full statewide implementation of the early learning program is
achieved in the 2017-18 school year.
(6) School districts and approved community-based early learning
providers may contract with the department to provide services under
the program. The department shall collaborate with school districts,
community-based providers, and educational service districts to promote
an adequate supply of approved providers. A school district may not be
required to contract for the provision of services under the program
unless no approved community-based provider is available within the
district to provide services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
(1) For the program of early learning established in section 3 of
this act, school districts:
(a) Shall work cooperatively with program providers to coordinate
the transition from preschool to kindergarten so that children and
their families are well-prepared and supported;
(b) Shall, in collaboration with providers approved by the
department of early learning, conduct individual evaluations to
determine program eligibility for children who do not qualify under
section 4(1)(c) (i) or (ii) of this act but who may be at risk of being
unprepared for kindergarten for other reasons; and
(c) May contract with the department of early learning to deliver
services under the program.
(2) If, however, at the time the program of early learning
established in section 3 of this act is phased into a school district,
no approved provider is available within the school district to
contract for delivery of services under the program, the school
district is required to contract with the department of early learning
to deliver the program to eligible children.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction and the director of
the department jointly shall adopt rules for the following program
components, as appropriate and necessary during the phased
implementation of the program:
(a) Individual evaluations to determine program eligibility for
children not eligible under section 4(1)(c) (i) or (ii) of this act;
(b) Minimum program standards, including instructor and staff
qualifications;
(c) Approval of program providers; and
(d) Accountability and adherence to performance standards.
(2) The department shall have administrative responsibility for:
(a) Approving and contracting with providers according to rules
developed jointly by the superintendent of public instruction and the
director under this section;
(b) In partnership with school districts, monitoring program
quality and assuring the program is responsive to the needs of eligible
children; and
(c) Providing technical assistance to contracted providers.

Sec. 8 RCW 28A.150.200 and 2009 c 548 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The program of basic education established under this chapter
is deemed by the legislature to comply with the requirements of Article
IX, section 1 of the state Constitution, which states that "It is the
paramount duty of the state to make ample provision for the education
of all children residing within its borders, without distinction or
preference on account of race, color, caste, or sex," and is adopted
pursuant to Article IX, section 2 of the state Constitution, which
states that "The legislature shall provide for a general and uniform
system of public schools."
(2) The legislature defines the program of basic education under
this chapter as that which is necessary to provide the opportunity to
develop the knowledge and skills necessary to meet the state-established high school graduation requirements that are intended to
allow students to have the opportunity to graduate with a meaningful
diploma that prepares them for postsecondary education, gainful
employment, and citizenship. Basic education by necessity is an
evolving program of instruction intended to reflect the changing
educational opportunities that are needed to equip students for their
role as productive citizens and includes the following:
(a) The instructional program of basic education the minimum
components of which are described in RCW 28A.150.220;
(b) The program of education provided by chapter 28A.190 RCW for
students in residential schools as defined by RCW 28A.190.020 and for
juveniles in detention facilities as identified by RCW 28A.190.010;
(c) The program of education provided by chapter 28A.193 RCW for
individuals under the age of eighteen who are incarcerated in adult
correctional facilities; ((and))
(d) Transportation and transportation services to and from school
for eligible students as provided under RCW 28A.160.150 through
28A.160.180; and
(e) The program of early learning established in section 3 of this
act.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.215.020 and 2007 c 394 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of early learning is created as an executive
branch agency. The department is vested with all powers and duties
transferred to it under this chapter and such other powers and duties
as may be authorized by law.
(2) The primary duties of the department are to implement state
early learning policy and to coordinate, consolidate, and integrate
child care and early learning programs in order to administer programs
and funding as efficiently as possible. The department's duties
include, but are not limited to, the following:
(a) To support both public and private sectors toward a
comprehensive and collaborative system of early learning that serves
parents, children, and providers and to encourage best practices in
child care and early learning programs;
(b) To make early learning resources available to parents and
caregivers;
(c) To carry out activities, including providing clear and easily
accessible information about quality and improving the quality of early
learning opportunities for young children, in cooperation with the
nongovernmental private-public partnership;
(d) To administer child care and early learning programs;
(e) To standardize internal financial audits, oversight visits,
performance benchmarks, and licensing criteria, so that programs can
function in an integrated fashion;
(f) To support the implementation of the nongovernmental private-public partnership and cooperate with that partnership in pursuing its
goals including providing data and support necessary for the successful
work of the partnership;
(g) To work cooperatively and in coordination with the early
learning council;
(h) To collaborate with the K-12 school system at the state and
local levels to ensure appropriate connections and smooth transitions
between early learning and K-12 programs; ((and))
(i) To develop and adopt rules, jointly with the superintendent of
public instruction, for administration of the program of early learning
established in section 3 of this act; and
(j) Upon the development of an early learning information system,
to make available to parents timely inspection and licensing action
information through the internet and other means.
(3) The department's programs shall be designed in a way that
respects and preserves the ability of parents and legal guardians to
direct the education, development, and upbringing of their children.
The department shall include parents and legal guardians in the
development of policies and program decisions affecting their children.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 REPORT AND RECOMMENDATIONS. (1) The
superintendent of public instruction and the director of the department
of early learning shall develop recommendations, including proposed
legislation as appropriate and necessary, to achieve statewide
implementation of the basic education program of early learning for
children three and four years of age who are educationally at risk.
The superintendent and the director shall report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by January 1, 2011:
(a) Program standards for a developmentally appropriate curriculum
to include:
(i) Physical well-being, health, and motor development;
(ii) Social and emotional development;
(iii) Cognition and general knowledge;
(iv) Language, literacy, numeracy, and communication.
(b) Service standards for family support and health-related
services to include:
(i) Working with parents to access appropriate medical, dental, and
other health screenings for children;
(ii) Providing opportunities for parental involvement, education,
and leadership development; and
(iii) Family contact designed to assist the child's family in:
(A) Assessing family strengths and needs;
(B) Setting family goals and reviewing progress;
(C) Accessing community resources; and
(D) Coordinating transitions between the program, child care, home,
and kindergarten.
(c) A plan for providing technical assistance necessary to support
providers delivering services in early childhood education and
assistance programs and head start programs in becoming approved
providers of the program.
(d) A strategy to optimize phased implementation of the program on
a schedule substantially similar to the implementation of full day
kindergarten after a review of the locations where early childhood
education and assistance programs are operating.
(e) The need for transportation services for the program based on
an analysis of the transportation services and arrangements being
utilized in early childhood education and assistance programs and the
need to address future transportation services during subsequent phases
of implementation.
(f) Options for developing socioeconomically diverse, mixed
classrooms.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction, the director of the
department of early learning, and the director of the office of
financial management, or their respective designees, shall report to
the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 15, 2010,
with recommendations for a budgeting and funding allocation method for
the program based on enrolled eligible students. Recommendations must
include a proposed schedule of implementation consistent with section
5 (2) and (3) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 2 through 5 and 13 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 28A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Section 8 of this act takes effect
September 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The following acts or parts of acts, as now
existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed, effective September
1, 2011:
(1) RCW 43.215.410 (Early childhood education and assistance
program -- Admission and funding) and 2006 c 265 s 211, 1994 c 166 s 4,
1988 c 174 s 3, & 1985 c 418 s 3; and
(2) RCW 43.215.415 (Early childhood education and assistance
program -- Eligible providers -- State-funded support -- Requirements) and
1994 c 166 s 5, 1988 c 174 s 4, & 1985 c 418 s 4.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 This act may be known as the ready for
school act of 2010.

--- END ---