BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The department of health and the office
of the superintendent of public instruction shall jointly develop a
school-based vaccination guide to be used by schools that elect to
operate a school-based vaccination clinic.
(2) The department of health shall convene a working group to
develop the school-based vaccination guide. The working group shall
include representatives of:
(a) The Washington state chapter of the American academy of
pediatrics;
(b) The Washington academy of family physicians;
(c) Urban and rural school districts;
(d) The office of the superintendent of public instruction; and
(e) The state medicaid medical director.
(3) Before January 1, 2011, the department of health and the office
of the superintendent of public instruction shall submit to the
governor and the appropriate committees of the senate and house of
representatives the school-based vaccination guide.
(4) The department of health and the office of the superintendent
of public instruction may seek, receive, and spend money received
through an appropriation, grant, donation, or reimbursement from any
public or private source to establish and distribute the school-based
vaccination guide.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act expires July 1, 2011.

--- END ---