BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes that
inconsistent practices in and among counties in Washington have
resulted in few children being notified of their right to request legal
counsel in their dependency and termination proceedings under RCW
13.34.100.
(2) The legislature recognizes that when children are provided
attorneys in their dependency and termination proceedings, it is
imperative to provide them with well-trained advocates so that their
legal rights around health, safety, and well-being are protected.
Attorneys, who have different skills and obligations than guardians ad
litem and court-appointed special advocates, especially in forming a
confidential and privileged relationship with a child, should be
trained in meaningful and effective child advocacy, the child welfare
system and services available to a child client, child and adolescent
brain development, child and adolescent mental health, and the distinct
legal rights of dependent youth, among other things. Well-trained
attorneys can provide legal counsel to a child on issues such as
placement options, visitation rights, educational rights, access to
services while in care and services available to a child upon aging out
of care. Well-trained attorneys for a child can:
(a) Ensure the child's voice is considered in judicial proceedings;
(b) Engage the child in his or her legal proceedings;
(c) Explain to the child his or her legal rights;
(d) Assist the child, through the attorney's counseling role, to
consider the consequences of different decisions; and
(e) Encourage accountability, when appropriate, among the different
systems that provide services to children.

Sec. 2 RCW 13.34.100 and 2009 c 480 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for a child who is
the subject of an action under this chapter, unless a court for good
cause finds the appointment unnecessary. The requirement of a guardian
ad litem may be deemed satisfied if the child is represented by
independent counsel in the proceedings. The court shall attempt to
match a child with special needs with a guardian ad litem who has
specific training or education related to the child's individual needs.
(2) If the court does not have available to it a guardian ad litem
program with a sufficient number of volunteers, the court may appoint
a suitable person to act as guardian ad litem for the child under this
chapter. Another party to the proceeding or the party's employee or
representative shall not be so appointed.
(3) Each guardian ad litem program shall maintain a background
information record for each guardian ad litem in the program. The
background information record shall include, but is not limited to, the
following information:
(a) Level of formal education;
(b) General training related to the guardian ad litem's duties;
(c) Specific training related to issues potentially faced by
children in the dependency system;
(d) Specific training or education related to child disability or
developmental issues;
(e) Number of years' experience as a guardian ad litem;
(f) Number of appointments as a guardian ad litem and the county or
counties of appointment;
(g) The names of any counties in which the person was removed from
a guardian ad litem registry pursuant to a grievance action, and the
name of the court and the cause number of any case in which the court
has removed the person for cause;
(h) Founded allegations of abuse or neglect as defined in RCW
26.44.020;
(i) The results of an examination of state and national criminal
identification data. The examination shall consist of a background
check as allowed through the Washington state criminal records privacy
act under RCW 10.97.050, the Washington state patrol criminal
identification system under RCW 43.43.832 through 43.43.834, and the
federal bureau of investigation. The background check shall be done
through the Washington state patrol criminal identification section and
must include a national check from the federal bureau of investigation
based on the submission of fingerprints; and
(j) Criminal history, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, for the period
covering ten years prior to the appointment.
The background information record shall be updated annually. As a
condition of appointment, the guardian ad litem's background
information record shall be made available to the court. If the
appointed guardian ad litem is not a member of a guardian ad litem
program a suitable person appointed by the court to act as guardian ad
litem shall provide the background information record to the court.
Upon appointment, the guardian ad litem, or guardian ad litem
program, shall provide the parties or their attorneys with a copy of
the background information record. The portion of the background
information record containing the results of the criminal background
check and the criminal history shall not be disclosed to the parties or
their attorneys. The background information record shall not include
identifying information that may be used to harm a guardian ad litem,
such as home addresses and home telephone numbers, and for volunteer
guardians ad litem the court may allow the use of maiden names or
pseudonyms as necessary for their safety.
(4) The appointment of the guardian ad litem shall remain in effect
until the court discharges the appointment or no longer has
jurisdiction, whichever comes first. The guardian ad litem may also be
discharged upon entry of an order of guardianship.
(5) A guardian ad litem through counsel, or as otherwise authorized
by the court, shall have the right to present evidence, examine and
cross-examine witnesses, and to be present at all hearings. A guardian
ad litem shall receive copies of all pleadings and other documents
filed or submitted to the court, and notice of all hearings according
to court rules. The guardian ad litem shall receive all notice
contemplated for a parent or other party in all proceedings under this
chapter.
(6)(a) Pursuant to this subsection, the department or supervising
agency and the child's guardian ad litem shall each notify a child of
his or her right to request counsel and shall ask the child whether he
or she wishes to have counsel. The department or supervising agency
and the child's guardian ad litem shall notify the child and make this
inquiry immediately after:
(i) The date of the child's twelfth birthday;
(ii) Assignment of a case involving a child age twelve or older; or
(iii) July 1, 2010, for a child who turned twelve years old before
July 1, 2010.
(b) The department or supervising agency and the child's guardian
ad litem shall repeat the notification and inquiry at least annually
and upon the filing of any motion or petition affecting the child's
placement, services, or familial relationships.
(c) The notification and inquiry is not required if the child has
already been appointed counsel.
(d) The department or supervising agency shall note in the child's
individual service and safety plan, and the guardian ad litem shall
note in his or her report to the court, that the child was notified of
the right to request counsel and indicate the child's position
regarding appointment of counsel.
(e) At the first regularly scheduled hearing after:
(i) The date of the child's twelfth birthday;
(ii) The date that a dependency petition is filed pursuant to this
chapter on a child age twelve or older; or
(iii) July 1, 2010, for a child who turned twelve years old before
July 1, 2010;
the court shall inquire whether the child has received notice of
his or her right to request legal counsel from the department or
supervising agency and the child's guardian ad litem. The court shall
make an additional inquiry at the first regularly scheduled hearing
after the child's fifteenth birthday. No inquiry is necessary if the
child has already been appointed counsel.
(f) If the child requests legal counsel and is age twelve or older,
or if the guardian ad litem or the court determines that the child
needs to be independently represented by counsel, the court may appoint
an attorney to represent the child's position.
(7) For the purposes of child abuse prevention and treatment act
(42 U.S.C. Secs. 5101 et seq.) grants to this state under P.L. 93-247,
or any related state or federal legislation, a person appointed
pursuant to ((RCW 13.34.100)) this section shall be deemed a guardian
ad litem to represent the best interests of the minor in proceedings
before the court.
(8) When a court-appointed special advocate or volunteer guardian
ad litem is requested on a case, the program shall give the court the
name of the person it recommends. The program shall attempt to match
a child with special needs with a guardian ad litem who has specific
training or education related to the child's individual needs. The
court shall immediately appoint the person recommended by the program.
(9) If a party in a case reasonably believes the court-appointed
special advocate or volunteer guardian ad litem is inappropriate or
unqualified, the party may request a review of the appointment by the
program. The program must complete the review within five judicial
days and remove any appointee for good cause. If the party seeking the
review is not satisfied with the outcome of the review, the party may
file a motion with the court for the removal of the court-appointed
special advocate or volunteer guardian ad litem on the grounds the
advocate or volunteer is inappropriate or unqualified.

Sec. 3 RCW 13.34.105 and 2008 c 267 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless otherwise directed by the court, the duties of the
guardian ad litem for a child subject to a proceeding under this
chapter, including an attorney specifically appointed by the court to
serve as a guardian ad litem, include but are not limited to the
following:
(a) To investigate, collect relevant information about the child's
situation, and report to the court factual information regarding the
best interests of the child;
(b) To meet with, interview, or observe the child, depending on the
child's age and developmental status, and report to the court any views
or positions expressed by the child on issues pending before the court;
(c) To monitor all court orders for compliance and to bring to the
court's attention any change in circumstances that may require a
modification of the court's order;
(d) To report to the court information on the legal status of a
child's membership in any Indian tribe or band;
(e) Court-appointed special advocates and guardians ad litem may
make recommendations based upon an independent investigation regarding
the best interests of the child, which the court may consider and weigh
in conjunction with the recommendations of all of the parties; ((and))
(f) To represent and be an advocate for the best interests of the
child; and
(g) To inform the child, if the child is twelve years old or older,
of his or her right to request counsel and to ask the child whether he
or she wishes to have counsel, pursuant to RCW 13.34.100(6). The
guardian ad litem shall report to the court that the child was notified
of this right and indicate the child's position regarding appointment
of counsel. The guardian ad litem shall report to the court his or her
independent recommendation as to whether appointment of counsel is in
the best interest of the child.
(2) A guardian ad litem shall be deemed an officer of the court for
the purpose of immunity from civil liability.
(3) Except for information or records specified in RCW
13.50.100(7), the guardian ad litem shall have access to all
information available to the state or agency on the case. Upon
presentation of the order of appointment by the guardian ad litem, any
agency, hospital, school organization, division or department of the
state, doctor, nurse, or other health care provider, psychologist,
psychiatrist, police department, or mental health clinic shall permit
the guardian ad litem to inspect and copy any records relating to the
child or children involved in the case, without the consent of the
parent or guardian of the child, or of the child if the child is under
the age of thirteen years, unless such access is otherwise specifically
prohibited by law.
(4) A guardian ad litem may release confidential information,
records, and reports to the office of the family and children's
ombudsman for the purposes of carrying out its duties under chapter
43.06A RCW.
(5) The guardian ad litem shall release case information in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 13.50.100.

Sec. 4 RCW 13.34.215 and 2009 c 520 s 36 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A child may petition the juvenile court to reinstate the
previously terminated parental rights of his or her parent under the
following circumstances:
(a) The child was previously found to be a dependent child under
this chapter;
(b) The child's parent's rights were terminated in a proceeding
under this chapter;
(c) The child has not achieved his or her permanency plan within
three years of a final order of termination; and
(d) The child must be at least twelve years old at the time the
petition is filed. Upon the child's motion for good cause shown, or on
its own motion, the court may hear a petition filed by a child younger
than twelve years old.
(2) If the child is eligible to petition the juvenile court under
subsection (1) of this section and a parent whose rights have been
previously terminated contacts the department or supervising agency or
the child's guardian ad litem regarding reinstatement, the department
or supervising agency or the guardian ad litem must notify the eligible
child about his or her right to petition for reinstatement of parental
rights.
(3) A child seeking to petition under this section shall be
provided counsel at no cost to the child.
(((3))) (4) The petition must be signed by the child in the absence
of a showing of good cause as to why the child could not do so.
(((4))) (5) If, after a threshold hearing to consider the parent's
apparent fitness and interest in reinstatement of parental rights, the
court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the best interests
of the child may be served by reinstatement of parental rights, the
juvenile court shall order that a hearing on the merits of the petition
be held.
(((5))) (6) The court shall give prior notice for any proceeding
under this section, or cause prior notice to be given, to the
department or the supervising agency, the child's attorney, and the
child. The court shall also order the department or supervising agency
to give prior notice of any hearing to the child's former parent whose
parental rights are the subject of the petition, any parent whose
rights have not been terminated, the child's current foster parent,
relative caregiver, guardian or custodian, and the child's tribe, if
applicable.
(((6))) (7) The juvenile court shall conditionally grant the
petition if it finds by clear and convincing evidence that the child
has not achieved his or her permanency plan and is not likely to
imminently achieve his or her permanency plan and that reinstatement of
parental rights is in the child's best interest. In determining
whether reinstatement is in the child's best interest the court shall
consider, but is not limited to, the following:
(a) Whether the parent whose rights are to be reinstated is a fit
parent and has remedied his or her deficits as provided in the record
of the prior termination proceedings and prior termination order;
(b) The age and maturity of the child, and the ability of the child
to express his or her preference;
(c) Whether the reinstatement of parental rights will present a
risk to the child's health, welfare, or safety; and
(d) Other material changes in circumstances, if any, that may have
occurred which warrant the granting of the petition.
(((7))) (8) In determining whether the child has or has not
achieved his or her permanency plan or whether the child is likely to
achieve his or her permanency plan, the department or supervising
agency shall provide the court, and the court shall review, information
related to any efforts to achieve the permanency plan including efforts
to achieve adoption or a permanent guardianship.
(((8))) (9)(a) If the court conditionally grants the petition under
subsection (((6))) (7) of this section, the case will be continued for
six months and a temporary order of reinstatement entered. During this
period, the child shall be placed in the custody of the parent. The
department or supervising agency shall develop a permanency plan for
the child reflecting the plan to be reunification and shall provide
transition services to the family as appropriate.
(b) If the child must be removed from the parent due to abuse or
neglect allegations prior to the expiration of the conditional six-month period, the court shall dismiss the petition for reinstatement of
parental rights if the court finds the allegations have been proven by
a preponderance of the evidence.
(c) If the child has been successfully placed with the parent for
six months, the court order reinstating parental rights remains in
effect and the court shall dismiss the dependency.
(((9))) (10) After the child has been placed with the parent for
six months, the court shall hold a hearing. If the placement with the
parent has been successful, the court shall enter a final order of
reinstatement of parental rights, which shall restore all rights,
powers, privileges, immunities, duties, and obligations of the parent
as to the child, including those relating to custody, control, and
support of the child. The court shall dismiss the dependency and
direct the clerk's office to provide a certified copy of the final
order of reinstatement of parental rights to the parent at no cost.
(((10))) (11) The granting of the petition under this section does
not vacate or otherwise affect the validity of the original termination
order.
(((11))) (12) Any parent whose rights are reinstated under this
section shall not be liable for any child support owed to the
department pursuant to RCW 13.34.160 or Title 26 RCW or costs of other
services provided to a child for the time period from the date of
termination of parental rights to the date parental rights are
reinstated.
(((12))) (13) A proceeding to reinstate parental rights is a
separate action from the termination of parental rights proceeding and
does not vacate the original termination of parental rights. An order
granted under this section reinstates the parental rights to the child.
This reinstatement is a recognition that the situation of the parent
and child have changed since the time of the termination of parental
rights and reunification is now appropriate.
(((13))) (14) This section is retroactive and applies to any child
who is under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court at the time of the
hearing regardless of the date parental rights were terminated.
(((14))) (15) The state, the department, the supervising agency,
and its employees are not liable for civil damages resulting from any
act or omission in the provision of services under this section, unless
the act or omission constitutes gross negligence. This section does
not create any duty and shall not be construed to create a duty where
none exists. This section does not create a cause of action against
the state, the department, the supervising agency, or its employees
concerning the original termination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 By December 31, 2010, and within available
resources, the administrative office of the courts, working in
coordination with the state supreme court commission on children in
foster care, shall develop recommendations for voluntary training and
caseload standards for attorneys who represent youth in dependency
proceedings under chapter 13.34 RCW. The administrative office of the
courts shall report its recommendations to the appropriate committees
of the legislature by December 31, 2010.

--- END ---