BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 34.05.030 and 2006 c 300 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter shall not apply to:
(a) The state militia, or
(b) The board of clemency and pardons, or
(c) The department of corrections or the indeterminate sentencing
review board with respect to persons who are in their custody or are
subject to the jurisdiction of those agencies.
(2) The provisions of RCW 34.05.410 through 34.05.598 shall not
apply:
(a) To adjudicative proceedings of the board of industrial
insurance appeals except as provided in RCW 7.68.110 and 51.48.131;
(b) Except for actions pursuant to chapter 46.29 RCW, to the
denial, suspension, or revocation of a driver's license by the
department of licensing;
(c) To the department of labor and industries where another statute
expressly provides for review of adjudicative proceedings of a
department action, order, decision, or award before the board of
industrial insurance appeals;
(d) To actions of the Washington personnel resources board or the
director of personnel;
(e) To adjustments by the department of revenue of the amount of
the surcharge imposed under RCW 82.04.261; ((or))
(f) To the extent they are inconsistent with any provisions of
chapter 43.43 RCW; or
(g) To the adjudicative proceedings of the office of open records.
(3) Unless a party makes an election for a formal hearing pursuant
to RCW 82.03.140 or 82.03.190, RCW 34.05.410 through 34.05.598 do not
apply to a review hearing conducted by the board of tax appeals.
(4) The rule-making provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
(a) Reimbursement unit values, fee schedules, arithmetic conversion
factors, and similar arithmetic factors used to determine payment rates
that apply to goods and services purchased under contract for clients
eligible under chapter 74.09 RCW; and
(b) Adjustments by the department of revenue of the amount of the
surcharge imposed under RCW 82.04.261.
(5) All other agencies, whether or not formerly specifically
excluded from the provisions of all or any part of the Administrative
Procedure Act, shall be subject to the entire act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There is established an independent office of open records.
The office must:
(a) Provide impartial administrative reviews of appeals by persons
or agencies entitled to relief under this chapter;
(b) Provide information relating to the implementation and
enforcement of this chapter;
(c) Adopt rules pursuant to the administrative procedure act,
chapter 34.05 RCW, to provide clear guidelines for an appeal process
before the office of public records from decisions of agencies subject
to this chapter. The provisions of RCW 34.05.410 through 34.05.598 do
not apply to the office of public records for this appeal process;
(d) Provide training courses on this chapter for agencies, public
officials, and public employees, and make training materials available
at no charge on its web site;
(e) Employ or contract with attorneys to serve as administrative
law judges to review appeals. Each administrative law judge must
comply with all of the following:
(i) Complete a training course provided by the office before acting
as an administrative law judge; and
(ii) Comply with the procedures under section 3 of this act; and
(f) Annually report on its activities and findings to the governor
and the legislature and recommend legislation, as the office deems
appropriate.
(2) The office of open records shall be supervised by an executive
director, appointed by the governor within ninety days of the effective
date of this section, subject to consent of the senate. The initial
executive director must be appointed within ninety days of the
effective date of this section. The term is five years, subject to
reappointment. The executive director must be admitted to practice law
in the state of Washington, and may be removed for cause. Compensation
shall be fixed by the governor after recommendation of the state
committee on agency officials' salaries.
(a) The executive director shall appoint attorneys admitted to
practice law in the state of Washington to act as administrative law
judges, and additional clerical, technical, and professional staff as
may be appropriate, and may contract for additional services as
necessary for the performance of the executive director's duties. The
salaries of administrative law judges shall be determined by the
executive director after recommendation of the state committee on
agency officials' salaries.
(b) The office of open records may contract with the office of
administrative hearings to use its facilities, equipment,
administrative law judges, and clerical and technical staff to create
efficiencies and cost savings.
(c) The executive director shall serve as the chief administrator,
shall ensure that the duties of the office are carried out, shall
monitor cases appealed to the office, and may review appeals in
accordance with section 3 of this act.
(d) The appropriation for the office of open records shall be a
separate line item recommended directly by the executive director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Persons described in this subsection may file an appeal with
the office of open records.
(a) A person entitled to seek relief under RCW 42.56.550 may file
a written appeal with the office within thirty days of the date of the
agency's claim of exemption or the last production of a record on a
partial or installment basis. At any time before the production or
denial of records, a person entitled to seek relief under RCW 42.56.550
may file an appeal challenging the reasonable estimate of the time
required to respond to the request pursuant to RCW 42.56.520.
(b) A person entitled to seek relief under RCW 42.56.540 may file
a written appeal with the office within ten business days of the date
of the agency's notice of intended disclosure by an agency.
(c) A agency entitled to seek relief under RCW 42.56.540 may file
a written appeal with the office within thirty days of the date of the
agency's claim of exemption or the last production of a record on a
partial or installment basis, or within ten business days of the date
of the agency's notice of intended disclosure by another agency
possessing the requested public records.
(d) For persons or agencies seeking injunctive relief under RCW
42.56.540 the office may issue a temporary restraining order that
enjoins the agency from disclosure under this chapter until such time
the office renders a final order pursuant to this section.
(e) Any person or agency filing an appeal or intervening in an
appeal must pay the office a filing fee of thirty-five dollars. The
fee must be waived by order of an administrative law judge upon a
showing that the person filing the appeal is indigent.
(2)(a) The office of open records shall assign an administrative
law judge to review appeals and issue final orders granting or denying
relief under this chapter. At the discretion of the executive
director, an administrative law judge may confer with legal counsel and
other employees of the office who do not otherwise participate in the
case.
(b)(i) The administrative law judge may grant a timely request to
intervene in an appeal under this section if:
(A) A person is entitled to seek relief under RCW 42.56.540 or
42.56.550;
(B) No hearing has been held;
(C) The administrative law judge has not yet issued final order;
and
(D) The party seeking to intervene in an appeal offers information
that will assist with resolving the appeal without undue delay.
(ii) Copies of the written request to intervene in an appeal shall
be provided to all parties in the appeal by the person or agency
submitting the request. A decision by the administrative law judge to
grant or deny a request to intervene is not subject to judicial review.
(c) Unless a hearing is set, the administrative law judge shall
issue final order that must be mailed to the parties within thirty days
of receipt of the appeal filed with the office.
(d) The office shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW
prescribing procedures for an expedited review of an appeal with the
issuance of a final order in fewer than thirty days for circumstances
including but not limited to: Whether there is a clear legal issue
presented on appeal, undisputed facts, and an urgent need for
resolution that will be frustrated by delay. A decision by the office
to grant or deny an expedited review is not subject to judicial review.
(e) At any time before the office issues a final order, any person
or agency may submit a written request for a hearing. The
administrative law judge may order a hearing if further information
will be beneficial according to criteria established by rule adopted by
the office pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. The order granting or
denying a hearing is not subject to judicial review. The
administrative law judge may extend the deadline for a final order
beyond thirty days in order to hold a hearing. The administrative law
judge must issue a final order within thirty days after the hearing.
(f) Upon setting a hearing, the administrative law judge shall set
a schedule for the submission of documents, testimony, or other
evidence in support of any party's position. The administrative law
judge may limit the nature and extent of admissible evidence for the
sufficiency of issuing a final order. The administrative law judge may
issue subpoenas and may enter protective orders. The administrative
law judge shall decide whether to permit the taking of depositions, the
requesting of admissions, and all other procedures authorized by rules
26 through 36 of the superior court civil rules. The administrative
law judge shall condition use of discovery on a showing of necessity
and unavailability by other means. The administrative law judge shall
consider: (i) Whether all parties are represented by counsel; (ii)
whether undue expense or delay in bringing the case to hearing will
result; (iii) whether the discovery will promote the orderly and prompt
conduct of the proceeding; and (iv) whether the interests of justice
will be promoted. Discovery orders, protective orders, and subpoenas
may be enforced by the office in a superior court in the county where
the hearing is conducted.
(g) The administrative law judge may accept or order the submission
of any records, or portions thereof, for in camera review. Records
reviewed in camera for appeals before the office are exempt from
disclosure under this chapter.
(h) Before issuing a final order, the office must require the
parties to an appeal to meet and confer for the purpose of
simplification or settlement of issues by agreement. The office may
order mediation where all parties agree to mediation for any issue.
The administrative law judge may stay appeals and time limits required
under this section pursuant to a mediation order for the duration of
the mediation.
(i) The office may not award any costs, attorneys' fees, or
penalties.
(j) The executive director may designate certain final orders as
precedents according to criteria established by rule adopted pursuant
to chapter 34.05 RCW. All other final orders are without precedent for
determining other cases involving similar facts or issues. All final
orders shall be made immediately and publicly available on the web site
of the office.
(3)(a) Appeals to the office of open records are not the exclusive
remedy for enforcement of the provisions of this chapter. Any person
may initiate an action in court under RCW 42.56.540 or 42.56.550.
However, if an appeal is filed first with the office, the office
retains primary jurisdiction.
(b) Subject to judicial review, the final orders of the
administrative law judges are binding on all parties to an appeal
before the office, and are enforceable in a superior court.
(c) Judicial review of a final order of the office must be filed
with a superior court within thirty days after the entry of the final
order, and venue shall be determined consistent with the provisions of
RCW 42.56.550. Judicial review of a final order of the office by a
superior court shall be de novo.
(d) The office may not be named as a defendant for any judicial
review of a final order to a superior court.
(e) A superior court may award a person who prevails on judicial
review against an agency all costs, including reasonable attorneys'
fees, and penalties in accordance with RCW 42.56.550(4). However, a
superior court may not award any costs or attorneys' fees incurred or
accrued for appeals before the office.

Sec. 4 RCW 42.56.550 and 2005 c 483 s 5 and 2005 c 274 s 288 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon the motion of any person having been denied an opportunity
to inspect or copy a public record by an agency, the superior court in
the county in which a record is maintained may require the responsible
agency to show cause why it has refused to allow inspection or copying
of a specific public record or class of records. The burden of proof
shall be on the agency to establish that refusal to permit public
inspection and copying is in accordance with a statute that exempts or
prohibits disclosure in whole or in part of specific information or
records.
(2) Upon the motion of any person who believes that an agency has
not made a reasonable estimate of the time that the agency requires to
respond to a public record request, the superior court in the county in
which a record is maintained may require the responsible agency to show
that the estimate it provided is reasonable. The burden of proof shall
be on the agency to show that the estimate it provided is reasonable.
(3) Judicial review of all agency actions taken or challenged under
RCW 42.56.030 through 42.56.520 shall be de novo. Courts shall take
into account the policy of this chapter that free and open examination
of public records is in the public interest, even though such
examination may cause inconvenience or embarrassment to public
officials or others. Courts may examine any record in camera in any
proceeding brought under this section. The court may conduct a hearing
based solely on affidavits.
(4) Any person who prevails against an agency in any action in the
courts seeking the right to inspect or copy any public record or the
right to receive a response to a public record request within a
reasonable amount of time shall be awarded all costs, including
reasonable attorneys' fees, incurred in connection with such legal
action. In addition, it shall be within the discretion of the court to
award such person an amount not less than five dollars and not to
exceed one hundred dollars for each day that he or she was denied the
right to inspect or copy said public record. However, in no event may
a court award a penalty unless such person received a final order from
the office of open records before prevailing against an agency in court
pursuant to this subsection.
(5) For actions under this section against counties, the venue
provisions of RCW 36.01.050 apply.
(6) Actions under this section must be filed within one year of the
agency's claim of exemption or the last production of a record on a
partial or installment basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 RCW 42.56.530 (Review of agency denial) and
1992 c 139 s 10 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 and 3 through 5 of this act take
effect January 1, 2011.

--- END ---