BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Employers must allow employees a thirty-minute meal break, on
the employee's time, if the employee works five or more consecutive
hours. Meal breaks must begin no less than two hours or more than five
hours from the beginning of the shift. Meal breaks are on the
employer's time when the employee is required by the employer to remain
on duty on the premises or at a prescribed work site in the interest of
the employer.
(2) Employers must allow employees working three or more hours
longer than a normal work day at least one thirty-minute meal break
prior to or during the overtime period.
(3) Employers must allow employees a rest break of ten minutes, on
the employer's time, for each four hours of working time. Rest breaks
must be scheduled as near as possible to the midpoint of the work
period. Employers may not require employees to work more than three
hours without a rest break.
(4)(a) Where the nature of the work allows employees to take
intermittent rest breaks equivalent to ten minutes for each four hours
worked, employers may obtain a waiver of the scheduled rest break
requirements of subsection (3) of this section from the director. The
director shall develop by rule a process for employers to apply for
waivers from the department.
(b) An employer that allowed employees to take intermittent rest
breaks before or on the effective date of this section may continue the
practice while the employer applies for a waiver from the department.
Starting on July 1, 2012, however, an employer must obtain a waiver
from the department to substitute intermittent rest breaks for the
scheduled rest breaks required under subsection (3) of this section.

--- END ---