BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70C.020 and 2009 c 419 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Energy overlay zone" means a formal plan enacted by the county
legislative authority that establishes suitable areas for siting
renewable resource projects based on currently available resources and
existing infrastructure with sensitivity to adverse environmental
impact.
(2) "Land use decision" means a final determination by a local
jurisdiction's body or officer with the highest level of authority to
make the determination, including those with authority to hear appeals,
on:
(a) An application for a project permit or other governmental
approval required by law before real property may be improved,
developed, modified, sold, transferred, or used, but excluding
applications for permits or approvals to use, vacate, or transfer
streets, parks, and similar types of public property; excluding
applications for legislative approvals such as area-wide rezones and
annexations; and excluding applications for business licenses;
(b) An interpretative or declaratory decision regarding the
application to a specific property of zoning or other ordinances or
rules regulating the improvement, development, modification,
maintenance, or use of real property; and
(c) The enforcement by a local jurisdiction of ordinances
regulating the improvement, development, modification, maintenance, or
use of real property. However, when a local jurisdiction is required
by law to enforce the ordinances in a court of limited jurisdiction, a
petition may not be brought under this chapter.
Where a local jurisdiction allows or requires a motion for
reconsideration to the highest level of authority making the
determination, and a timely motion for reconsideration has been filed,
the land use decision occurs on the date a decision is entered on the
motion for reconsideration, and not the date of the original decision
for which the motion for reconsideration was filed.
(3) "Local jurisdiction" means a county, city, or incorporated
town.
(4) "Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation,
association, public or private organization, or governmental entity or
agency.
(5) "Renewable resources" has the same meaning provided in RCW
19.280.020.

--- END ---