BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.215.020 and 2007 c 394 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of early learning is created as an executive
branch agency. The department is vested with all powers and duties
transferred to it under this chapter and such other powers and duties
as may be authorized by law.
(2) The primary duties of the department are to implement state
early learning policy and to coordinate, consolidate, and integrate
child care and early learning programs in order to administer programs
and funding as efficiently as possible. The department's duties
include, but are not limited to, the following:
(a) To support both public and private sectors toward a
comprehensive and collaborative system of early learning that serves
parents, children, and providers and to encourage best practices in
child care and early learning programs;
(b) To make early learning resources available to parents and
caregivers;
(c) To carry out activities, including providing clear and easily
accessible information about quality and improving the quality of early
learning opportunities for young children, in cooperation with the
nongovernmental private-public partnership;
(d) To administer child care and early learning programs;
(e) To serve as the state lead agency for Part C of the federal
individuals with disabilities education act (IDEA);
(f) To standardize internal financial audits, oversight visits,
performance benchmarks, and licensing criteria, so that programs can
function in an integrated fashion;
(((f))) (g) To support the implementation of the nongovernmental
private-public partnership and cooperate with that partnership in
pursuing its goals including providing data and support necessary for
the successful work of the partnership;
(((g))) (h) To work cooperatively and in coordination with the
early learning council;
(((h))) (i) To collaborate with the K-12 school system at the state
and local levels to ensure appropriate connections and smooth
transitions between early learning and K-12 programs; and
(((i))) (j) Upon the development of an early learning information
system, to make available to parents timely inspection and licensing
action information through the internet and other means.
(3) The department's programs shall be designed in a way that
respects and preserves the ability of parents and legal guardians to
direct the education, development, and upbringing of their children.
The department shall include parents and legal guardians in the
development of policies and program decisions affecting their children.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.198.020 and 2009 c 381 s 33 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is established an advisory council in the department of
social and health services for the purpose of advancing the development
of a comprehensive and effective statewide system to provide prompt and
effective early interventions for children in the state who are deaf or
hard of hearing and their families.
(2) Members of the advisory council shall have training,
experience, or interest in hearing loss in children. Membership shall
include, but not be limited to, the following: Pediatricians;
audiologists; teachers of the deaf and hard of hearing; parents of
children who are deaf or hard of hearing; a representative from the
Washington state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss; and
representatives of the ((infant toddler early intervention)) early
support program in the department of ((social and health services))
early learning, the department of health, and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) All powers, duties, and functions of the
department of social and health services pertaining to administration
of the infant and toddler early intervention program are transferred to
the department of early learning. The program shall be renamed the
early support program.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the department of
social and health services pertaining to the powers, functions, and
duties transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the department
of early learning. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor
vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the department of
social and health services in carrying out the powers, functions, and
duties transferred shall be made available to the department of early
learning. All funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with
the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be assigned to the
department of early learning.
(b) Any appropriations made to the department of social and health
services for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall, on the effective date of this section, be transferred and
credited to the department of early learning.
(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any
personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment,
or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers
and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the
director of financial management shall make a determination as to the
proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the department of social and health services
engaged in performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred are
transferred to the jurisdiction of the department of early learning.
All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil
service law, are assigned to the department of early learning to
perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any
loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate
thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil
service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the department of
social and health services pertaining to the powers, functions, and
duties transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the department
of early learning. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain
in full force and shall be performed by the department of early
learning.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the department of social and health services shall not affect the
validity of any act performed before the effective date of this
section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) All classified employees of the department of social and health
services assigned to the department of early learning under this
section whose positions are within an existing bargaining unit
description at the department of early learning shall become a part of
the existing bargaining unit at the department of early learning and
shall be considered an appropriate inclusion or modification of the
existing bargaining unit under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---