BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.385 and 2008 c 282 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Beginning January 1, 2009, any person licensed under this
chapter who is convicted of ((any offense involving the use,
consumption, or possession of alcohol while operating a motor vehicle
in)) a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504((, other than vehicular
homicide or vehicular assault)) or an equivalent local or out-of-state
statute or ordinance, or a violation of RCW 46.61.520(1)(a) or
46.61.522(1)(b), or who has had or will have his or her license
suspended, revoked, or denied under RCW 46.20.3101, may submit to the
department an application for an ignition interlock driver's license.
The department, upon receipt of the prescribed fee and upon determining
that the petitioner is eligible to receive the license, may issue an
ignition interlock driver's license.
(b) A person may apply for an ignition interlock driver's license
anytime, including immediately after receiving the notices under RCW
46.20.308 or after his or her license is suspended, revoked, or denied.
A person receiving an ignition interlock driver's license waives his or
her right to a hearing or appeal under RCW 46.20.308.
(c) An applicant under this subsection shall provide proof to the
satisfaction of the department that a functioning ignition interlock
device has been installed on all vehicles operated by the person.
(i) The department shall require the person to maintain the device
on all vehicles operated by the person and shall restrict the person to
operating only vehicles equipped with the device, for the remainder of
the period of suspension, revocation, or denial. The installation of
an ignition interlock device is not necessary on vehicles owned,
leased, or rented by a person's employer and on those vehicles whose
care and/or maintenance is the temporary responsibility of the
employer, and driven at the direction of a person's employer as a
requirement of employment during working hours. The person must
provide the department with a declaration pursuant to RCW 9A.72.085
from his or her employer stating that the person's employment requires
the person to operate a vehicle owned by the employer or other persons
during working hours.
(ii) Subject to any periodic renewal requirements established by
the department under this section and subject to any applicable
compliance requirements under this chapter or other law, an ignition
interlock driver's license granted upon a suspension or revocation
under RCW 46.61.5055 or 46.20.3101 extends through the remaining
portion of any concurrent or consecutive suspension or revocation that
may be imposed as the result of administrative action and criminal
conviction arising out of the same incident.
(iii) The time period during which the person is licensed under
this section shall apply on a day-for-day basis toward satisfying the
period of time the ignition interlock device restriction is required
under RCW 46.20.720 and 46.61.5055.
(2) An applicant for an ignition interlock driver's license who
qualifies under subsection (1) of this section is eligible to receive
a license only if((:
(a) Within seven years immediately preceding the date of the
offense that gave rise to the present conviction or incident, the
applicant has not committed vehicular homicide under RCW 46.61.520 or
vehicular assault under RCW 46.61.522; and
(b))) the applicant files satisfactory proof of financial
responsibility under chapter 46.29 RCW.
(3) Upon receipt of evidence that a holder of an ignition interlock
driver's license granted under this subsection no longer has a
functioning ignition interlock device installed on all vehicles
operated by the driver, the director shall give written notice by
first-class mail to the driver that the ignition interlock driver's
license shall be canceled. ((The effective date of cancellation shall
be fifteen days from the date of mailing the notice.)) If at any time
before the cancellation goes into effect the driver submits evidence
that a functioning ignition interlock device has been installed on all
vehicles operated by the driver, the cancellation shall be stayed. If
the cancellation becomes effective, the driver may obtain, at no
additional charge, a new ignition interlock driver's license upon
submittal of evidence that a functioning ignition interlock device has
been installed on all vehicles operated by the driver.
(4) A person aggrieved by the decision of the department on the
application for an ignition interlock driver's license may request a
hearing as provided by rule of the department.
(5) The director shall cancel an ignition interlock driver's
license ((upon receipt of)) after receiving notice that the holder
thereof has been convicted of operating a motor vehicle in violation of
its restrictions, no longer meets the eligibility requirements, or
((of)) has been convicted of or found to have committed a separate
offense or any other act or omission that under this chapter would
warrant suspension or revocation of a regular driver's license. The
department must give notice of the cancellation ((is effective as of
the date of the conviction, and continues with the same force and
effect as any suspension or revocation under this title)) as provided
under RCW 46.20.245. A person whose ignition interlock driver's
license has been canceled under this section may reapply for a new
ignition interlock driver's license if he or she is otherwise qualified
under this section and pays the fee required under RCW 46.20.380.
(6)(a) Unless costs are waived by the ignition interlock company or
the person is indigent under RCW 10.101.010, the applicant shall pay
the cost of installing, removing, and leasing the ignition interlock
device and shall pay an additional fee of twenty dollars per month.
Payments shall be made directly to the ignition interlock company. The
company shall remit the additional twenty-dollar fee to the department.
(b) The department shall deposit the proceeds of the twenty-dollar
fee into the ignition interlock device revolving account. Expenditures
from the account may be used only to administer and operate the
ignition interlock device revolving account program. The department
shall adopt rules to provide monetary assistance according to greatest
need and when funds are available.
(7) The department shall adopt rules to implement ignition
interlock licensing. The department shall consult with the
administrative office of the courts, the state patrol, the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs, ignition interlock
companies, and any other organization or entity the department deems
appropriate.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.391 and 2008 c 282 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person licensed under this chapter who is convicted of an
offense relating to motor vehicles for which suspension or revocation
of the driver's license is mandatory, other than vehicular homicide,
vehicular assault, driving while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug, or being in actual physical control of a motor
vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug,
may submit to the department an application for a temporary restricted
driver's license. The department, upon receipt of the prescribed fee
and upon determining that the petitioner is eligible to receive the
license, may issue a temporary restricted driver's license and may set
definite restrictions as provided in RCW 46.20.394.
(2)(a) A person licensed under this chapter whose driver's license
is suspended administratively due to failure to appear or pay a traffic
ticket under RCW 46.20.289; a violation of the financial responsibility
laws under chapter 46.29 RCW; or for multiple violations within a
specified period of time under RCW 46.20.291, may apply to the
department for an occupational driver's license.
(b) If the suspension is for failure to respond, pay, or comply
with a notice of traffic infraction or conviction, the applicant must
enter into a payment plan with the court.
(c) An occupational driver's license issued to an applicant
described in (a) of this subsection shall be valid for the period of
the suspension or revocation.
(3) An applicant for an occupational or temporary restricted
driver's license who qualifies under subsection (1) or (2) of this
section is eligible to receive such license only if:
(a) Within seven years immediately preceding the date of the
offense that gave rise to the present conviction or incident, the
applicant has not committed vehicular homicide under RCW 46.61.520 or
vehicular assault under RCW 46.61.522; and
(b) The applicant demonstrates that it is necessary for him or her
to operate a motor vehicle because he or she:
(i) Is engaged in an occupation or trade that makes it essential
that he or she operate a motor vehicle;
(ii) Is undergoing continuing health care or providing continuing
care to another who is dependent upon the applicant;
(iii) Is enrolled in an educational institution and pursuing a
course of study leading to a diploma, degree, or other certification of
successful educational completion;
(iv) Is undergoing substance abuse treatment or is participating in
meetings of a twelve-step group such as Alcoholics Anonymous that
requires the petitioner to drive to or from the treatment or meetings;
(v) Is fulfilling court-ordered community service responsibilities;
(vi) Is in a program that assists persons who are enrolled in a
WorkFirst program pursuant to chapter 74.08A RCW to become gainfully
employed and the program requires a driver's license;
(vii) Is in an apprenticeship, on-the-job training, or welfare-to-work program; or
(viii) Presents evidence that he or she has applied for a position
in an apprenticeship or on-the-job training program for which a
driver's license is required to begin the program, provided that a
license granted under this provision shall be in effect for no longer
than fourteen days; and
(c) The applicant files satisfactory proof of financial
responsibility under chapter 46.29 RCW; and
(d) Upon receipt of evidence that a holder of an occupational
driver's license granted under this subsection is no longer enrolled in
an apprenticeship or on-the-job training program, the director shall
give written notice by first-class mail to the driver that the
occupational driver's license shall be canceled. ((The effective date
of cancellation shall be fifteen days from the date of mailing the
notice.)) If at any time before the cancellation goes into effect the
driver submits evidence of continued enrollment in the program, the
cancellation shall be stayed. If the cancellation becomes effective,
the driver may obtain, at no additional charge, a new occupational
driver's license upon submittal of evidence of enrollment in another
program that meets the criteria set forth in this subsection; and
(e) The department shall not issue an occupational driver's license
under (b)(iv) of this subsection if the applicant is able to receive
transit services sufficient to allow for the applicant's participation
in the programs referenced under (b)(iv) of this subsection.
(4) A person aggrieved by the decision of the department on the
application for an occupational or temporary restricted driver's
license may request a hearing as provided by rule of the department.
(5) The director shall cancel an occupational or temporary
restricted driver's license ((upon receipt of)) after receiving notice
that the holder thereof has been convicted of operating a motor vehicle
in violation of its restrictions, no longer meets the eligibility
requirements, or ((of)) has been convicted of or found to have
committed a separate offense or any other act or omission that under
this chapter ((46.20 RCW)) would warrant suspension or revocation of a
regular driver's license. The department must give notice of the
cancellation ((is effective as of the date of the conviction, and
continues with the same force and effect as any suspension or
revocation under this title)) as provided under RCW 46.20.245. A
person whose occupational or temporary restricted driver's license has
been canceled under this section may reapply for a new occupational or
temporary restricted driver's license if he or she is otherwise
qualified under this section and pays the fee required under RCW
46.20.380.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.20.720 and 2008 c 282 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The court may order that after a period of suspension,
revocation, or denial of driving privileges, and for up to as long as
the court has jurisdiction, any person convicted of any offense
involving the use, consumption, or possession of alcohol while
operating a motor vehicle may drive only a motor vehicle equipped with
a functioning ignition interlock. The court shall establish a specific
calibration setting at which the interlock will prevent the vehicle
from being started. The court shall also establish the period of time
for which interlock use will be required.
(2) Under RCW 46.61.5055((, 10.05.020, or section 18 of this act))
and subject to the exceptions listed in that statute, the court shall
order any person convicted of ((an alcohol-related)) a violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance ((or
participating in a deferred prosecution program under RCW 10.05.020 or
section 18 of this act for an alcohol-related violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance)) to apply for
an ignition interlock driver's license from the department under RCW
46.20.385 and to have a functioning ignition interlock device installed
on all motor vehicles operated by the person.
(3) The department shall require that, after any applicable period
of suspension, revocation, or denial of driving privileges, a person
may drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition
interlock device if the person is convicted of ((an alcohol-related))
a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local or
out-of-state statute or ordinance.
The department may waive the requirement for the use of such a
device if it concludes that such devices are not reasonably available
in the local area. The installation of an ignition interlock device is
not necessary on vehicles owned, leased, or rented by a person's
employer and on those vehicles whose care and/or maintenance is the
temporary responsibility of the employer, and driven at the direction
of a person's employer as a requirement of employment during working
hours. The person must provide the department with a declaration
pursuant to RCW 9A.72.085 from his or her employer stating that the
person's employment requires the person to operate a vehicle owned by
the employer or other persons during working hours.
The ignition interlock device shall be calibrated to prevent the
motor vehicle from being started when the breath sample provided has an
alcohol concentration of 0.025 or more. Except as provided in
subsection (4) of this section, the period of time of the restriction
will be as follows:
(a) For a person who has not previously been restricted under this
section, a period of one year;
(b) For a person who has previously been restricted under (a) of
this subsection, a period of five years;
(c) For a person who has previously been restricted under (b) of
this subsection, a period of ten years.
(4) A restriction imposed under subsection (3) of this section
shall remain in effect until the department receives a declaration from
the person's ignition interlock device vendor, in a form provided or
approved by the department, certifying that there have been none of the
following incidents in the four consecutive months prior to the date of
release:
(a) An attempt to start the vehicle with a breath alcohol
concentration of 0.04 or more;
(b) Failure to take or pass any required retest; or
(c) Failure of the person to appear at the ignition interlock
device vendor when required for maintenance, repair, calibration,
monitoring, inspection, or replacement of the device.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.61.5055 and 2008 c 282 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), a
person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504
and who has no prior offense within seven years shall be punished as
follows:
(a) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less
than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to
take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than one day nor more than one
year. Twenty-four consecutive hours of the imprisonment may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of
this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the
offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory
minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in
writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the
facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based. In lieu of the
mandatory minimum term of imprisonment required under this subsection
(1)(a)(i), the court may order not less than fifteen days of electronic
home monitoring. The offender shall pay the cost of electronic home
monitoring. The county or municipality in which the penalty is being
imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the
offender's electronic home monitoring device to include an alcohol
detection breathalyzer, and the court may restrict the amount of
alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on
electronic home monitoring; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than three hundred fifty dollars nor
more than five thousand dollars. Three hundred fifty dollars of the
fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds the
offender to be indigent; or
(b) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at
least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a
test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than two days nor more than one
year. Two consecutive days of the imprisonment may not be suspended or
deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory
minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's
physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence
is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in writing the reason
for granting the suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the
suspension or deferral is based. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term
of imprisonment required under this subsection (1)(b)(i), the court may
order not less than thirty days of electronic home monitoring. The
offender shall pay the cost of electronic home monitoring. The county
or municipality in which the penalty is being imposed shall determine
the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home
monitoring device to include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and the
court may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume
during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than
five thousand dollars. Five hundred dollars of the fine may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be
indigent.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), a
person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504
and who has one prior offense within seven years shall be punished as
follows:
(a) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less
than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to
take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than thirty days nor more than one
year and sixty days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall
pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or
municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the
cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home
monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and may
restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time
the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Thirty days of
imprisonment and sixty days of electronic home monitoring may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of
this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the
offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory
minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in
writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the
facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than
five thousand dollars. Five hundred dollars of the fine may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be
indigent; or
(b) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at
least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a
test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than forty-five days nor more than
one year and ninety days of electronic home monitoring. The offender
shall pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or
municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the
cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home
monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and may
restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time
the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Forty-five days of
imprisonment and ninety days of electronic home monitoring may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of
this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the
offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory
minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in
writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the
facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than seven hundred fifty dollars nor
more than five thousand dollars. Seven hundred fifty dollars of the
fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds the
offender to be indigent.
(3) Except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), a
person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504
and who has two or three prior offenses within seven years shall be
punished as follows:
(a) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less
than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to
take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than ninety days nor more than one
year and one hundred twenty days of electronic home monitoring. The
offender shall pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The
county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall
determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's
electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection
breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may
consume during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring.
Ninety days of imprisonment and one hundred twenty days of electronic
home monitoring may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds
that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a
substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being.
Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the
court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or
deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based;
and
(ii) By a fine of not less than one thousand dollars nor more than
five thousand dollars. One thousand dollars of the fine may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be
indigent; or
(b) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at
least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a
test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than one hundred twenty days nor
more than one year and one hundred fifty days of electronic home
monitoring. The offender shall pay for the cost of the electronic
monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being
imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the
offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol
detection breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the
offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home
monitoring. One hundred twenty days of imprisonment and one hundred
fifty days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or
deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory
minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's
physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence
is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in writing the reason
for granting the suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the
suspension or deferral is based; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than one thousand five hundred dollars
nor more than five thousand dollars. One thousand five hundred dollars
of the fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds the
offender to be indigent.
(4) A person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504 shall be punished under chapter 9.94A RCW if: (a) The person
has four or more prior offenses within ten years; or (b) the person has
ever previously been convicted of: (i) A violation of RCW 46.61.520
committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;
(ii) a violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while under the influence
of intoxicating liquor or any drug; or (iii) an out-of-state offense
comparable to the offense specified in (b)(i) or (ii) of this
subsection.
(5)(a) The court shall require any person convicted of ((an
alcohol-related)) a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an
equivalent local ordinance to apply for an ignition interlock driver's
license from the department ((under RCW 46.20.385)) and to have a
functioning ignition interlock device installed on all motor vehicles
operated by the person.
(b) The installation of an ignition interlock device is not
necessary on vehicles owned, leased, or rented by a person's employer
and on those vehicles whose care and/or maintenance is the temporary
responsibility of the employer, and driven at the direction of a
person's employer as a requirement of employment during working hours.
The person must provide the department with a declaration pursuant to
RCW 9A.72.085 from his or her employer stating that the person's
employment requires the person to operate a vehicle owned by the
employer or other persons during working hours.
(c) An ignition interlock device imposed under this section shall
be calibrated to prevent a motor vehicle from being started when the
breath sample provided has an alcohol concentration of 0.025 or more.
(d) The court may waive the requirement that a person ((obtain))
apply for an ignition interlock driver's license ((and operate only
vehicles equipped with a functioning ignition interlock device)) if the
court makes a specific finding in writing that:
(i) The person lives out-of-state and the devices are not
reasonably available in the person's local area((, that));
(ii) The person does not operate a vehicle((,)); or
(iii) The person is not eligible to receive an ignition interlock
driver's license under RCW 46.20.385 because the person is not a
resident of Washington, is a habitual traffic offender, has already
applied for or is already in possession of an ignition interlock
driver's license, has never had a driver's license, has been certified
under chapter 74.20A RCW as noncompliant with a child support order, or
is subject to any other condition or circumstance that makes the person
ineligible to obtain an ignition interlock driver's license.
(e) ((When the requirement)) If a court finds that a person is not
eligible to receive an ignition interlock driver's license under this
section, the court is not required to make any further subsequent
inquiry or determination as to the person's eligibility.
(f) If the court orders that a person ((obtain)) refrain from
consuming any alcohol and requires the person to apply for an ignition
interlock driver's license ((and operate only vehicles equipped with a
functioning ignition interlock device is waived by the court)), and the
person states that he or she does not operate a motor vehicle or the
person is ineligible to obtain an ignition interlock driver's license,
the court shall order the person to submit to alcohol monitoring
through an alcohol detection breathalyzer device, transdermal sensor
device, or other technology designed to detect alcohol in a person's
system. The person shall pay for the cost of the monitoring. The
county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall
determine the cost.
(((f))) (g) The period of time for which ignition interlock use or
alcohol monitoring is required will be as follows:
(i) For a person who has not previously been restricted under this
section, a period of one year;
(ii) For a person who has previously been restricted under (((f)))
(g)(i) of this subsection, a period of five years;
(iii) For a person who has previously been restricted under (((f)))
(g)(ii) of this subsection, a period of ten years.
(6) If a person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504 committed the offense while a passenger under the age of
sixteen was in the vehicle, the court shall:
(a) In any case in which the installation and use of an interlock
or other device is not mandatory under RCW 46.20.720 or other law,
order the use of such a device for not less than sixty days following
the restoration of the person's license, permit, or nonresident driving
privileges; and
(b) In any case in which the installation and use of such a device
is otherwise mandatory, order the use of such a device for an
additional sixty days.
(7) In exercising its discretion in setting penalties within the
limits allowed by this section, the court shall particularly consider
the following:
(a) Whether the person's driving at the time of the offense was
responsible for injury or damage to another or another's property; and
(b) Whether at the time of the offense the person was driving or in
physical control of a vehicle with one or more passengers.
(8) An offender punishable under this section is subject to the
alcohol assessment and treatment provisions of RCW 46.61.5056.
(9) The license, permit, or nonresident privilege of a person
convicted of driving or being in physical control of a motor vehicle
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs must:
(a) If the person's alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or if
for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered
under RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's
alcohol concentration:
(i) Where there has been no prior offense within seven years, be
suspended or denied by the department for ninety days;
(ii) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for two years; or
(iii) Where there have been two or more prior offenses within seven
years, be revoked or denied by the department for three years;
(b) If the person's alcohol concentration was at least 0.15:
(i) Where there has been no prior offense within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for one year;
(ii) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for nine hundred days; or
(iii) Where there have been two or more prior offenses within seven
years, be revoked or denied by the department for four years; or
(c) If by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered
under RCW 46.20.308, there is no test result indicating the person's
alcohol concentration:
(i) Where there have been no prior offenses within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for two years;
(ii) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for three years; or
(iii) Where there have been two or more previous offenses within
seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for four years.
The department shall grant credit on a day-for-day basis for any
portion of a suspension, revocation, or denial already served under
this subsection for a suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under
RCW 46.20.3101 arising out of the same incident.
For purposes of this subsection (9), the department shall refer to
the driver's record maintained under RCW 46.52.120 when determining the
existence of prior offenses.
(10) After expiration of any period of suspension, revocation, or
denial of the offender's license, permit, or privilege to drive
required by this section, the department shall place the offender's
driving privilege in probationary status pursuant to RCW 46.20.355.
(11)(a) In addition to any nonsuspendable and nondeferrable jail
sentence required by this section, whenever the court imposes less than
one year in jail, the court shall also suspend but shall not defer a
period of confinement for a period not exceeding five years. The court
shall impose conditions of probation that include: (i) Not driving a
motor vehicle within this state without a valid license to drive and
proof of financial responsibility for the future; (ii) not driving a
motor vehicle within this state while having an alcohol concentration
of 0.08 or more within two hours after driving; and (iii) not refusing
to submit to a test of his or her breath or blood to determine alcohol
concentration upon request of a law enforcement officer who has
reasonable grounds to believe the person was driving or was in actual
physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor. The court may impose conditions of
probation that include nonrepetition, installation of an ignition
interlock device on the probationer's motor vehicle, alcohol or drug
treatment, supervised probation, or other conditions that may be
appropriate. The sentence may be imposed in whole or in part upon
violation of a condition of probation during the suspension period.
(b) For each violation of mandatory conditions of probation under
(a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this subsection, the court shall order the
convicted person to be confined for thirty days, which shall not be
suspended or deferred.
(c) For each incident involving a violation of a mandatory
condition of probation imposed under this subsection, the license,
permit, or privilege to drive of the person shall be suspended by the
court for thirty days or, if such license, permit, or privilege to
drive already is suspended, revoked, or denied at the time the finding
of probation violation is made, the suspension, revocation, or denial
then in effect shall be extended by thirty days. The court shall
notify the department of any suspension, revocation, or denial or any
extension of a suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this
subsection.
(12) A court may waive the electronic home monitoring requirements
of this chapter when:
(a) The offender does not have a dwelling, telephone service, or
any other necessity to operate an electronic home monitoring system;
(b) The offender does not reside in the state of Washington; or
(c) The court determines that there is reason to believe that the
offender would violate the conditions of the electronic home monitoring
penalty.
Whenever the mandatory minimum term of electronic home monitoring
is waived, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the
waiver and the facts upon which the waiver is based, and shall impose
an alternative sentence with similar punitive consequences. The
alternative sentence may include, but is not limited to, additional
jail time, work crew, or work camp.
Whenever the combination of jail time and electronic home
monitoring or alternative sentence would exceed three hundred sixty-five days, the offender shall serve the jail portion of the sentence
first, and the electronic home monitoring or alternative portion of the
sentence shall be reduced so that the combination does not exceed three
hundred sixty-five days.
(13) An offender serving a sentence under this section, whether or
not a mandatory minimum term has expired, may be granted an
extraordinary medical placement by the jail administrator subject to
the standards and limitations set forth in RCW 9.94A.728(((4))) (3).
(14) For purposes of this section and RCW 46.61.502 and 46.61.504:
(a) A "prior offense" means any of the following:
(i) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or an equivalent
local ordinance;
(ii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.504 or an equivalent
local ordinance;
(iii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;
(iv) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;
(v) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.5249, 46.61.500, or
9A.36.050 or an equivalent local ordinance, if the conviction is the
result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW
46.61.520 or 46.61.522;
(vi) An out-of-state conviction for a violation that would have
been a violation of (a)(i), (ii), (iii), (iv), or (v) of this
subsection if committed in this state;
(vii) A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a
prosecution for a violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, or an
equivalent local ordinance; or
(viii) A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a
prosecution for a violation of RCW 46.61.5249, or an equivalent local
ordinance, if the charge under which the deferred prosecution was
granted was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW 46.61.520 or
46.61.522;
If a deferred prosecution is revoked based on a subsequent
conviction for an offense listed in this subsection (14)(a), the
subsequent conviction shall not be treated as a prior offense of the
revoked deferred prosecution for the purposes of sentencing;
(b) "Within seven years" means that the arrest for a prior offense
occurred within seven years ((of)) before or after the arrest for the
current offense; and
(c) "Within ten years" means that the arrest for a prior offense
occurred within ten years ((of)) before or after the arrest for the
current offense.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
If a person is required, as part of the person's judgment and
sentence, to install an ignition interlock device on all motor vehicles
operated by the person and the person is under the jurisdiction of the
municipality or county probation or supervision department, the
probation or supervision department must verify the initial
installation of an ignition interlock device. The municipality or
county probation or supervision department satisfies the requirement to
verify the initial installation if the municipality or county probation
or supervision department receives a written verification by a company
doing business in the state that it has installed the required device
on a vehicle owned or operated by the person. The municipality or
county shall have no further obligation to supervise the use of the
ignition interlock device by the person and shall not be civilly liable
for any injuries or damages caused by the person for failing to use an
ignition interlock device or for driving under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug or being in actual physical control of
a motor vehicle under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.20.410 and 2008 c 282 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person convicted for violation of any restriction of an
occupational driver's license((,)) or a temporary restricted driver's
license((, or an ignition interlock driver's license)) shall in
addition to the ((immediate revocation)) cancellation of such license
and any other penalties provided by law be fined not less than fifty
nor more than two hundred dollars or imprisoned for not more than six
months or both such fine and imprisonment.
(2) It is a gross misdemeanor for a person to violate any
restriction of an ignition interlock driver's license.

Sec. 7 RCW 46.20.342 and 2008 c 282 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person to drive a motor vehicle in this
state while that person is in a suspended or revoked status or when his
or her privilege to drive is suspended or revoked in this or any other
state. Any person who has a valid Washington driver's license is not
guilty of a violation of this section.
(a) A person found to be an habitual offender under chapter 46.65
RCW, who violates this section while an order of revocation issued
under chapter 46.65 RCW prohibiting such operation is in effect, is
guilty of driving while license suspended or revoked in the first
degree, a gross misdemeanor. Upon the first such conviction, the
person shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than ten days.
Upon the second conviction, the person shall be punished by
imprisonment for not less than ninety days. Upon the third or
subsequent conviction, the person shall be punished by imprisonment for
not less than one hundred eighty days. If the person is also convicted
of the offense defined in RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, when both
convictions arise from the same event, the minimum sentence of
confinement shall be not less than ninety days. The minimum sentence
of confinement required shall not be suspended or deferred. A
conviction under this subsection does not prevent a person from
petitioning for reinstatement as provided by RCW 46.65.080.
(b) A person who violates this section while an order of suspension
or revocation prohibiting such operation is in effect and while the
person is not eligible to reinstate his or her driver's license or
driving privilege, other than for a suspension for the reasons
described in (c) of this subsection, is guilty of driving while license
suspended or revoked in the second degree, a gross misdemeanor. For
the purposes of this subsection, a person is not considered to be
eligible to reinstate his or her driver's license or driving privilege
if the person is eligible to obtain an ignition interlock driver's
license but did not obtain such a license. This subsection applies
when a person's driver's license or driving privilege has been
suspended or revoked by reason of:
(i) A conviction of a felony in the commission of which a motor
vehicle was used;
(ii) A previous conviction under this section;
(iii) A notice received by the department from a court or diversion
unit as provided by RCW 46.20.265, relating to a minor who has
committed, or who has entered a diversion unit concerning an offense
relating to alcohol, legend drugs, controlled substances, or imitation
controlled substances;
(iv) A conviction of RCW 46.20.410, relating to the violation of
restrictions of an occupational driver's license, a temporary
restricted driver's license, or an ignition interlock driver's license;
(v) A conviction of RCW 46.20.345, relating to the operation of a
motor vehicle with a suspended or revoked license;
(vi) A conviction of RCW 46.52.020, relating to duty in case of
injury to or death of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;
(vii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.024, relating to attempting to
elude pursuing police vehicles;
(viii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.500, relating to reckless driving;
(ix) A conviction of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, relating to a
person under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;
(x) A conviction of RCW 46.61.520, relating to vehicular homicide;
(xi) A conviction of RCW 46.61.522, relating to vehicular assault;
(xii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.527(4), relating to reckless
endangerment of roadway workers;
(xiii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.530, relating to racing of
vehicles on highways;
(xiv) A conviction of RCW 46.61.685, relating to leaving children
in an unattended vehicle with motor running;
(xv) A conviction of RCW 46.61.740, relating to theft of motor
vehicle fuel;
(xvi) A conviction of RCW 46.64.048, relating to attempting,
aiding, abetting, coercing, and committing crimes;
(xvii) An administrative action taken by the department under
chapter 46.20 RCW; or
(xviii) A conviction of a local law, ordinance, regulation, or
resolution of a political subdivision of this state, the federal
government, or any other state, of an offense substantially similar to
a violation included in this subsection.
(c) A person who violates this section when his or her driver's
license or driving privilege is, at the time of the violation,
suspended or revoked solely because (i) the person must furnish proof
of satisfactory progress in a required alcoholism or drug treatment
program, (ii) the person must furnish proof of financial responsibility
for the future as provided by chapter 46.29 RCW, (iii) the person has
failed to comply with the provisions of chapter 46.29 RCW relating to
uninsured accidents, (iv) the person has failed to respond to a notice
of traffic infraction, failed to appear at a requested hearing,
violated a written promise to appear in court, or has failed to comply
with the terms of a notice of traffic infraction or citation, as
provided in RCW 46.20.289, (v) the person has committed an offense in
another state that, if committed in this state, would not be grounds
for the suspension or revocation of the person's driver's license, (vi)
the person has been suspended or revoked by reason of one or more of
the items listed in (b) of this subsection, but was eligible to
reinstate his or her driver's license or driving privilege at the time
of the violation, or (vii) the person has received traffic citations or
notices of traffic infraction that have resulted in a suspension under
RCW 46.20.267 relating to intermediate drivers' licenses, or any
combination of (i) through (vii), is guilty of driving while license
suspended or revoked in the third degree, a misdemeanor. For the
purposes of this subsection, a person is not considered to be eligible
to reinstate his or her driver's license or driving privilege if the
person is eligible to obtain an ignition interlock driver's license but
did not obtain such a license.
(2) Upon receiving a record of conviction of any person or upon
receiving an order by any juvenile court or any duly authorized court
officer of the conviction of any juvenile under this section, the
department shall:
(a) For a conviction of driving while suspended or revoked in the
first degree, as provided by subsection (1)(a) of this section, extend
the period of administrative revocation imposed under chapter 46.65 RCW
for an additional period of one year from and after the date the person
would otherwise have been entitled to apply for a new license or have
his or her driving privilege restored; or
(b) For a conviction of driving while suspended or revoked in the
second degree, as provided by subsection (1)(b) of this section, not
issue a new license or restore the driving privilege for an additional
period of one year from and after the date the person would otherwise
have been entitled to apply for a new license or have his or her
driving privilege restored; or
(c) Not extend the period of suspension or revocation if the
conviction was under subsection (1)(c) of this section. If the
conviction was under subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section and the
court recommends against the extension and the convicted person has
obtained a valid driver's license, the period of suspension or
revocation shall not be extended.

Sec. 8 RCW 46.20.740 and 2008 c 282 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall attach or imprint a notation on the
driving record of any person restricted under RCW 46.20.720 ((or)),
46.61.5055, or 10.05.140 stating that the person may operate only a
motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock device.
The department shall determine the person's eligibility for licensing
based upon written verification by a company doing business in the
state that it has installed the required device on a vehicle owned or
operated by the person seeking reinstatement. If, based upon
notification from the interlock provider or otherwise, the department
determines that an ignition interlock required under this section is no
longer installed or functioning as required, the department shall
suspend the person's license or privilege to drive. Whenever the
license or driving privilege of any person is suspended or revoked as
a result of noncompliance with an ignition interlock requirement, the
suspension shall remain in effect until the person provides notice
issued by a company doing business in the state that a vehicle owned or
operated by the person is equipped with a functioning ignition
interlock device.
(2) It is a gross misdemeanor for a person with such a notation on
his or her driving record to operate a motor vehicle that is not so
equipped.

Sec. 9 RCW 10.05.020 and 2008 c 282 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section ((or
section 18 of this act)), the petitioner shall allege under oath in the
petition that the wrongful conduct charged is the result of or caused
by alcoholism, drug addiction, or mental problems for which the person
is in need of treatment and unless treated the probability of future
recurrence is great, along with a statement that the person agrees to
pay the cost of a diagnosis and treatment of the alleged problem or
problems if financially able to do so. The petition shall also contain
a case history and written assessment prepared by an approved
alcoholism treatment program as designated in chapter 70.96A RCW if the
petition alleges alcoholism, an approved drug program as designated in
chapter 71.24 RCW if the petition alleges drug addiction, or by an
approved mental health center if the petition alleges a mental problem.
(2) In the case of a petitioner charged with a misdemeanor or gross
misdemeanor under chapter 9A.42 RCW, the petitioner shall allege under
oath in the petition that the petitioner is the natural or adoptive
parent of the alleged victim; that the wrongful conduct charged is the
result of parenting problems for which the petitioner is in need of
services; that the petitioner is in need of child welfare services
under chapter 74.13 RCW to improve his or her parenting skills in order
to better provide his or her child or children with the basic
necessities of life; that the petitioner wants to correct his or her
conduct to reduce the likelihood of harm to his or her minor children;
that in the absence of child welfare services the petitioner may be
unable to reduce the likelihood of harm to his or her minor children;
and that the petitioner has cooperated with the department of social
and health services to develop a plan to receive appropriate child
welfare services; along with a statement that the person agrees to pay
the cost of the services if he or she is financially able to do so.
The petition shall also contain a case history and a written service
plan from the department of social and health services.
(3) Before entry of an order deferring prosecution, a petitioner
shall be advised of his or her rights as an accused and execute, as a
condition of receiving treatment, a statement that contains: (a) An
acknowledgment of his or her rights; (b) an acknowledgment and waiver
of the right to testify, the right to a speedy trial, the right to call
witnesses to testify, the right to present evidence in his or her
defense, and the right to a jury trial; (c) a stipulation to the
admissibility and sufficiency of the facts contained in the written
police report; and (d) an acknowledgment that the statement will be
entered and used to support a finding of guilty if the court finds
cause to revoke the order granting deferred prosecution. The
petitioner shall also be advised that he or she may, if he or she
proceeds to trial and is found guilty, be allowed to seek suspension of
some or all of the fines and incarceration that may be ordered upon the
condition that he or she seek treatment and, further, that he or she
may seek treatment from public and private agencies at any time without
regard to whether or not he or she is found guilty of the offense
charged. He or she shall also be advised that the court will not
accept a petition for deferred prosecution from a person who: (i)
Sincerely believes that he or she is innocent of the charges; (ii)
sincerely believes that he or she does not, in fact, suffer from
alcoholism, drug addiction, or mental problems((, unless the petition
for deferred prosecution is under section 18 of this act)); or (iii) in
the case of a petitioner charged under chapter 9A.42 RCW, sincerely
believes that he or she does not need child welfare services.
(4) Before entering an order deferring prosecution, the court shall
make specific findings that: (a) The petitioner has stipulated to the
admissibility and sufficiency of the facts as contained in the written
police report; (b) the petitioner has acknowledged the admissibility of
the stipulated facts in any criminal hearing on the underlying offense
or offenses held subsequent to revocation of the order granting
deferred prosecution; (c) the petitioner has acknowledged and waived
the right to testify, the right to a speedy trial, the right to call
witnesses to testify, the right to present evidence in his or her
defense, and the right to a jury trial; and (d) the petitioner's
statements were made knowingly and voluntarily. Such findings shall be
included in the order granting deferred prosecution.

Sec. 10 RCW 10.05.090 and 2008 c 282 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
If a petitioner, who has been accepted for a deferred prosecution,
fails or neglects to carry out and fulfill any term or condition of the
petitioner's treatment plan or any term or condition imposed in
connection with the installation of an interlock or other device under
RCW 46.20.720 ((or 46.20.385)), the facility, center, institution, or
agency administering the treatment or the entity administering the use
of the device, shall immediately report such breach to the court, the
prosecutor, and the petitioner or petitioner's attorney of record,
together with its recommendation. The court upon receiving such a
report shall hold a hearing to determine whether the petitioner should
be removed from the deferred prosecution program. At the hearing,
evidence shall be taken of the petitioner's alleged failure to comply
with the treatment plan or device installation and the petitioner shall
have the right to present evidence on his or her own behalf. The court
shall either order that the petitioner continue on the treatment plan
or be removed from deferred prosecution. ((If the petitioner's
noncompliance is based on a violation of a term or condition imposed in
connection with the installation of an ignition interlock device under
RCW 46.20.385, the court shall either order that the petitioner comply
with the term or condition or be removed from deferred prosecution.))
If removed from deferred prosecution, the court shall enter judgment
pursuant to RCW 10.05.020 and, if the charge for which the deferred
prosecution was granted was a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor under
Title 46 RCW, shall notify the department of licensing of the removal
and entry of judgment.

Sec. 11 RCW 10.05.160 and 2008 c 282 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
The prosecutor may appeal an order granting deferred prosecution on
any or all of the following grounds:
(1) Prior deferred prosecution has been granted to the defendant;
(2) Failure of the court to obtain proof of insurance or a
treatment plan conforming to the requirements of this chapter;
(3) Failure of the court to comply with the requirements of RCW
10.05.100;
(4) Failure of the evaluation facility to provide the information
required in RCW 10.05.040 and 10.05.050, if the defendant has been
referred to the facility for treatment. If an appeal on such basis is
successful, the trial court may consider the use of another treatment
program;
(5) Failure of the court to order the installation of an ignition
interlock or other device under RCW ((46.20.720 or 46.20.385))
10.05.140.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act takes effect January 1, 2011.

--- END ---