BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.56.021 and 2007 c 136 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the entities listed in RCW 41.56.020, this
chapter applies to employees of institutions of higher education who
are exempted from civil service pursuant to RCW 41.06.070(2), including
supervisors, with the following exceptions:
(a) Executive employees, including all members of the governing
board of each institution of higher education and related boards; all
presidents and vice presidents; deans((, directors,)) and chairs; and
executive heads of major administrative or academic divisions;
(b) ((Managers who perform any of the following functions:
(i) Formulate, develop, or establish institutional policy, or
direct the work of an administrative unit;
(ii) Manage, administer, and control a program, including its
physical, financial, or personnel resources;
(iii) Have substantial responsibility for human resources
administration, legislative relations, public information, internal
audits and investigations, or the preparation and administration of
budgets;
(iv) Functionally is above the first level of supervision and
exercises authority that is not merely routine or clerical in nature
and requires the consistent use of independent judgment;
(c))) Managers who develop and establish policy for, and control
the financial and personnel resources of, major administrative or
academic divisions;
(c) Managers who head the department of human resources, labor
relations, administrative services, legislative relations, public
relations or public information, budget and finance, or facilities
operations, or who supervise other exempt staff;
(d) Employees who, in the regular course of their duties, act as a
principal assistant, administrative assistant, or personal assistant to
employees as defined by (a) of this subsection;
(((d))) (e) Confidential employees;
(((e))) (f) Employees who assist assistant attorneys general who
advise and represent managers or confidential employees in personnel or
labor relations matters, or who advise or represent the state in tort
actions.
(2) Employees subject to this section shall not be included in any
unit of employees certified under RCW 41.56.022, 41.56.024, or
41.56.203, chapter 41.76 RCW, or chapter 41.80 RCW. Employees whose
eligibility for collective bargaining is covered by chapter 28B.52,
41.76, or 41.80 RCW are exempt from the provisions of this chapter.
(3) Institutions of higher education and the exclusive bargaining
representatives shall not agree to any proposal that would prevent the
implementation of approved affirmative action plans or that would be
inconsistent with the comparable worth agreement that provided the
basis for the salary changes implemented beginning with the 1983-1985
biennium to achieve comparable worth.
(4) Institutions of higher education and the exclusive bargaining
representative shall not bargain over rights of management that, in
addition to all powers, duties, and rights established by
constitutional provision or statute, shall include but not be limited
to the following:
(a) The functions and programs of the institution, the use of
technology, and the structure of the organization;
(b) The institution's budget and the size of its workforce,
including determining the financial basis for layoffs;
(c) The right to direct and supervise employees;
(d) The right to take whatever actions are deemed necessary to
carry out the mission of the state and the institutions of higher
education during emergencies;
(e) Retirement plans and retirement benefits; or
(f) Health care benefits or other employee insurance benefits,
except as provided in RCW 41.80.020.

--- END ---