BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.103.010 and 2003 c 322 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that lead hazards associated with lead-based paint represent a significant and preventable environmental
health problem. Lead-based paint is the most widespread of the various
sources of lead exposure to the public. Census data show that one
million five hundred sixty thousand homes in Washington state were
built prior to 1978 when the sale of residential lead-based paint was
banned. These are homes that are believed to contain some lead-based
paint.
Lead negatively affects every system of the body. It is harmful to
individuals of all ages and is especially harmful to children, fetuses,
and adults of childbearing age. The effects of lead on a child's
cognitive, behavioral, and developmental abilities may necessitate
large expenditures of public funds for health care and special
education. The irreversible damage to children and subsequent
expenditures could be avoided if exposure to lead is reduced.
(2) The federal government regulates lead poisoning and lead hazard
reduction through:
(a)(i) The lead-based paint poisoning prevention act;
(ii) The lead contamination control act;
(iii) The safe drinking water act;
(iv) The resource conservation and recovery act of 1976; and
(v) The residential lead-based paint hazard reduction act of 1992;
and
(b) Implementing regulations of:
(i) The environmental protection agency;
(ii) The department of housing and urban development;
(iii) The occupational safety and health administration; and
(iv) The centers for disease control and prevention.
(3) In 1992, congress passed the federal residential lead-based
paint hazard reduction act, which allows states to provide for the
accreditation of lead-based paint activities programs, the
certification of persons completing such training programs, and the
licensing of lead-based paint activities contractors under standards
developed by the United States environmental protection agency.
(4) The legislature recognizes the state's need to protect the
public from exposure to lead hazards. A qualified and properly trained
workforce is needed to assist in the prevention, detection, reduction,
and elimination of hazards associated with lead-based paint. The
purpose of training workers, supervisors, inspectors, risk assessors,
((and)) project designers, renovators, and dust sampling technicians
engaged in lead-based paint activities is to protect building
occupants, particularly children ages six years and younger from
potential lead-based paint hazards and exposures both during and after
lead-based paint activities. Qualified and properly trained
individuals and firms will help to ensure lead-based paint activities
are conducted in a way that protects the health of the citizens of
Washington state and safeguards the environment. The state lead-based
paint activities program requires that all lead-based paint activities
be performed by certified personnel trained by an accredited program,
and that all lead-based paint activities meet minimum work practice
standards established by the department of ((community, trade, and
economic development)) commerce. Therefore, the lead-based paint
activities accreditation, training, and certification program shall be
established in accordance with this chapter. The lead-based paint
activities accreditation, training, and certification program shall be
administered by the department of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce and shall be used as a means to assure the
protection of the general public from exposure to lead hazards.
(5) For the welfare of the people of the state of Washington, this
chapter establishes a lead-based paint activities program within the
department of ((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce
to protect the general public from exposure to lead hazards and to
ensure the availability of a trained and qualified workforce to
identify and address lead-based paint hazards. The legislature
recognizes the department of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce is not a regulatory agency and may delegate
enforcement responsibilities under chapter 322, Laws of 2003 to local
governments or private entities.

Sec.2 RCW 70.103.020 and 2009 c 565 s 49 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Abatement" means any measure or set of measures designed to
permanently eliminate lead-based paint hazards.
(a) Abatement includes, but is not limited to:
(i) The removal of paint and dust, the permanent enclosure or
encapsulation of lead-based paint, the replacement of painted surfaces
or fixtures, or the removal or permanent covering of soil, when lead-based paint hazards are present in such paint, dust, or soil; and
(ii) All preparation, cleanup, disposal, and postabatement
clearance testing activities associated with such measures.
(b) Specifically, abatement includes, but is not limited to:
(i) Projects for which there is a written contract or other
documentation, which provides that an individual or firm will be
conducting activities in or to a residential dwelling or child-occupied
facility that:
(A) Shall result in the permanent elimination of lead-based paint
hazards; or
(B) Are designed to permanently eliminate lead-based paint hazards
and are described in (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection;
(ii) Projects resulting in the permanent elimination of lead-based
paint hazards, conducted by certified firms or individuals, unless such
projects are covered by (c) of this subsection;
(iii) Projects resulting in the permanent elimination of lead-based
paint hazards, conducted by firms or individuals who, through their
company name or promotional literature, represent, advertise, or hold
themselves out to be in the business of performing lead-based paint
activities as identified and defined by this section, unless such
projects are covered by (c) of this subsection; or
(iv) Projects resulting in the permanent elimination of lead-based
paint hazards, that are conducted in response to state or local
abatement orders.
(c) Abatement does not include renovation, remodeling, landscaping,
or other activities, when such activities are not designed to
permanently eliminate lead-based paint hazards, but, instead, are
designed to repair, restore, or remodel a given structure or dwelling,
even though these activities may incidentally result in a reduction or
elimination of lead-based paint hazards. Furthermore, abatement does
not include interim controls, operations and maintenance activities, or
other measures and activities designed to temporarily, but not
permanently, reduce lead-based paint hazards.
(2) "Accredited training program" means a training program that has
been accredited by the department to provide training for individuals
engaged in lead-based paint activities.
(3) "Certified abatement worker" means an individual who has been
trained by an accredited training program, meets all the qualifications
established by the department, and is certified by the department to
perform abatements.
(4) "Certified dust sampling technician" means an individual who
has been trained by an accredited training program, meets all the
qualifications established by the department, and is certified by the
department to conduct dust sampling for renovation projects.
(5) "Certified firm" includes a company, partnership, corporation,
sole proprietorship, association, agency, or other business entity that
meets all the qualifications established by the department and performs
lead-based paint activities to which the department has issued a
certificate.
(((5))) (6) "Certified inspector" means an individual who has been
trained by an accredited training program, meets all the qualifications
established by the department, and is certified by the department to
conduct inspections.
(((6))) (7) "Certified project designer" means an individual who
has been trained by an accredited training program, meets all the
qualifications established by the department, and is certified by the
department to prepare abatement project designs, occupant protection
plans, and abatement reports.
(((7))) (8) "Certified renovator" means an individual who has been
trained by an accredited training program, meets all the qualifications
established by the department, and is certified by the department to
perform renovations or direct workers in the performance of renovation
work.
(9) "Certified risk assessor" means an individual who has been
trained by an accredited training program, meets all the qualifications
established by the department, and is certified by the department to
conduct risk assessments and sample for the presence of lead in dust
and soil for the purposes of abatement clearance testing.
(((8))) (10) "Certified supervisor" means an individual who has
been trained by an accredited training program, meets all the
qualifications established by the department, and is certified by the
department to supervise and conduct abatements, and to prepare occupant
protection plans and abatement reports.
(((9))) (11) "Department" means the Washington state department of
commerce.
(((10))) (12) "Director" means the director of the Washington state
department of commerce.
(((11))) (13) "Federal laws and rules" means:
(a) Title IV, toxic substances control act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 2681 et
seq.) and the rules adopted by the United States environmental
protection agency under that law for authorization of state programs;
(b) Any regulations or requirements adopted by the United States
department of housing and urban development regarding eligibility for
grants to states and local governments; and
(c) Any other requirements adopted by a federal agency with
jurisdiction over lead-based paint hazards.
(((12))) (14) "Lead-based paint" means paint or other surface
coatings that contain lead equal to or in excess of 1.0 milligrams per
square centimeter or more than 0.5 percent by weight.
(((13))) (15) "Lead-based paint activity" includes inspection,
testing, risk assessment, lead-based paint hazard reduction project
design or planning, ((or)) abatement, or renovation of lead-based paint
hazards.
(((14))) (16) "Lead-based paint hazard" means any condition that
causes exposure to lead from lead-contaminated dust, lead-contaminated
soil, or lead-contaminated paint that is deteriorated or present in
accessible surfaces, friction surfaces, or impact surfaces that would
result in adverse human health effects as identified by the
administrator of the United States environmental protection agency
under the toxic substances control act, section 403.
(((15))) (17) "Person" includes an individual, corporation, firm,
partnership, or association, an Indian tribe, state, or political
subdivision of a state, and a state department or agency.
(((16))) (18) "Renovation" means the modification of any existing
structure, or portion thereof, that results in the disturbance of
painted surfaces, unless that activity is performed as part of an
abatement as defined in this section. The term includes but is not
limited to:
(a) The removal, modification, or repair of painted surface or
painted components;
(b) Modification of painted doors;
(c) Surface restoration;
(d) Window repair;
(e) Surface preparation, such as sanding, scraping, or activities
that generates paint dust;
(f) Removal of building components, such as walls, windows, or
other like structures;
(g) Weatherization projects, such as cutting holes in painted
surfaces to install blown-in insulation;
(h) Interim controls that disturb painted surfaces; or
(i) A renovation performed for the purposes of converting a
building or part of a building in target housing or a child-occupied
facility.
The term renovation as defined in this subsection (18) does not
include minor repair and maintenance activities.
(19) "Risk assessment" means:
(a) An on-site investigation to determine the existence, nature,
severity, and location of lead-based paint hazards; and
(b) The provision of a report by the individual or the firm
conducting the risk assessment, explaining the results of the
investigation and options for reducing lead-based paint hazards.
(((17))) (20) "State program" means a state administered lead-based
paint activities certification and training program that meets the
federal environmental protection agency requirements.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.103.030 and 2003 c 322 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall administer and enforce a state program for
worker training and certification, and training program accreditation,
which shall include those program elements necessary to assume
responsibility for federal requirements for a program as set forth in
Title IV of the toxic substances control act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 2601 et
seq.), the residential lead-based paint hazard reduction act of 1992
(42 U.S.C. Sec. 4851 et seq.), 40 C.F.R. Part 745, Subparts L and Q
(1996), and Title X of the housing and community development act of
1992 (P.L. 102-550). The department may delegate or enter into a
memorandum of understanding with local governments or private entities
for implementation of components of the state program.
(2) The department is authorized to adopt rules that are consistent
with federal requirements to implement a state program. Rules adopted
under this section shall:
(a) Establish minimum accreditation requirements for lead-based
paint activities for training providers;
(b) Establish work practice standards for conduct of lead-based
paint activities;
(c) Establish certification requirements for individuals and firms
engaged in lead-based paint activities including provisions for
recognizing certifications accomplished under existing certification
programs;
(d) Require the use of certified personnel in all lead-based paint
activities;
(e) Be revised as necessary to comply with federal law and rules
and to maintain eligibility for federal funding;
(f) Facilitate reciprocity and communication with other states
having a lead-based paint certification program;
(g) Provide for decertification, deaccreditation, and financial
assurance for a person certified by or a training provider accredited
by the department; and
(h) Be issued in accordance with the administrative procedure act,
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(3) The department may accept federal funds for the administration
of the program.
(4) This program shall equal, but not exceed, legislative authority
under federal requirements as set forth in Title IV of the toxic
substances control act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 2601 et seq.), the residential
lead-based paint hazard reduction act of 1992 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 4851 et
seq.), and Title X of the housing and community development act of 1992
(P.L. 102-550).
(5) Any rules adopted by the department shall be consistent with
federal laws, regulations, and requirements relating to lead-based
paint activities specified by the residential lead-based paint hazard
reduction act of 1992 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 4851 et seq.) and Title X of the
housing and community development act of 1992 (P.L. 102-550), and rules
adopted pursuant to chapter 70.105D RCW, to ensure consistency in
regulatory action. The rules may not be more restrictive than
corresponding federal and state regulations unless such stringency is
specifically authorized by this chapter.
(6) The department shall collect a fee in the amount of twenty-five
dollars for certification and recertification of lead paint firms,
inspectors, project developers, risk assessors, supervisors, ((and))
abatement workers, renovators, and dust sampling technicians.
(7) The department shall collect a fee in the amount of two hundred
dollars for the accreditation of lead paint training programs.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.103.040 and 2003 c 322 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall establish a program for certification of
persons involved in lead-based paint activities and for accreditation
of training providers in compliance with federal laws and rules.
(2) Rules adopted under this section shall:
(a) Establish minimum accreditation requirements for lead-based
paint activities for training providers;
(b) Establish work practice standards for conduct of lead-based
paint activities;
(c) Establish certification requirements for individuals and firms
engaged in lead-based paint activities including provisions for
recognizing certifications accomplished under existing certification
programs;
(d) Require the use of certified personnel in any lead-based paint
hazard reduction activity;
(e) Be revised as necessary to comply with federal law and rules
and to maintain eligibility for federal funding;
(f) Facilitate reciprocity and communication with other states
having a lead-based paint certification program;
(g) Provide for decertification, deaccreditation, and financial
assurance for a person certified or accredited by the department; and
(h) Be issued in accordance with the administrative procedure act,
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(3) This program shall equal, but not exceed, legislative authority
under federal requirements as set forth in Title IV of the toxic
substances control act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 2601 et seq.), the residential
lead-based paint hazard reduction act of 1992 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 4851 et
seq.), 40 C.F.R. Part 745 (1996), Subparts L and Q, and Title X of the
housing and community development act of 1992 (P.L. 102-550).
(4) Any rules adopted by the department shall be consistent with
federal laws, regulations, and requirements relating to lead-based
paint activities specified by the residential lead-based paint hazard
reduction act of 1992 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 4851 et seq.) and Title X of the
housing and community development act of 1992 (P.L. 102-550), and rules
adopted pursuant to chapter 70.105D RCW, to ensure consistency in
regulatory action. The rules may not be more restrictive than
corresponding federal and state regulations unless such stringency is
specifically authorized by this chapter.
(5) The department may accept federal funds for the administration
of the program.
(6) For the purposes of certification under the federal
requirements as set forth in section 2682 of the toxic substances
control act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 2682), the department may require
renovators and dust sampling technicians to apply for a certification
badge issued by the department. The department may impose a fee on the
applicant for processing the application. The application shall
include a photograph of the applicant and a fee in the amount imposed
by the department.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.103.050 and 2003 c 322 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall adopt rules to:
(1) Establish procedures and requirements for the accreditation of
lead-based paint activities training programs including, but not
limited to, the following:
(a) Training curriculum;
(b) Training hours;
(c) Hands-on training;
(d) Trainee competency and proficiency;
(e) Training program quality control;
(f) Procedures for the reaccreditation of training programs;
(g) Procedures for the oversight of training programs; and
(h) Procedures for the suspension, revocation, or modification of
training program accreditations, or acceptance of training offered by
an accredited training provider in another state or Indian tribe
authorized by the environmental protection agency;
(2) Establish procedures for the purposes of certification, for the
acceptance of training offered by an accredited training provider in a
state or Indian tribe authorized by the environmental protection
agency;
(3) Certify individuals involved in lead-based paint activities to
ensure that certified individuals are trained by an accredited training
program and possess appropriate educational or experience
qualifications for certification;
(4) Establish procedures for recertification;
(5) Require the conduct of lead-based paint activities in
accordance with work practice standards;
(6) Establish procedures for the suspension, revocation, or
modification of certifications;
(7) Establish requirements for the administration of third-party
certification exams;
(8) Use laboratories accredited under the environmental protection
agency's national lead laboratory accreditation program;
(9) Establish work practice standards for the conduct of lead-based
paint activities ((for:
(a) Inspection for presence of lead-based paint;
(b) Risk assessment; and
(c) Abatement)), as defined in RCW 70.103.020;
(10) Establish an enforcement response policy that shall include:
(a) Warning letters, notices of noncompliance, notices of
violation, or the equivalent;
(b) Administrative or civil actions, including penalty authority,
including accreditation or certification suspension, revocation, or
modification; and
(c) Authority to apply criminal sanctions or other criminal
authority using existing state laws as applicable.
The department shall prepare and submit a biennial report to the
legislature regarding the program's status, its costs, and the number
of persons certified by the program.

Sec. 6 RCW 70.103.080 and 2003 c 322 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department is designated as the official agency of this
state for purposes of cooperating with, and implementing the state
lead-based paint activities program under the jurisdiction of the
United States environmental protection agency.
(2) No individual or firm can perform, offer, or claim to perform
lead-based paint activities without certification from the department
to conduct these activities.
(3) The department may deny, suspend, or revoke a certificate for
failure to comply with the requirements of this chapter or any rule
adopted under this chapter. No person whose certificate is revoked
under this chapter shall be eligible to apply for a certificate for one
year from the effective date of the final order of revocation. A
certificate may be denied, suspended, or revoked on any of the
following grounds:
(a) A risk assessor, inspector, contractor, project designer,
((or)) worker, dust sampling technician, or renovator violates work
practice standards established by the United States environmental
protection agency or the United States department of housing and urban
development governing work practices and procedures; or
(b) The certificate was obtained by error, misrepresentation, or
fraud.
(4) Any person convicted of violating any of the provisions of this
chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor. A conviction is an unvacated
forfeiture of bail or collateral deposited to secure the defendant's
appearance in court, the payment of a fine, a plea of guilty, or a
finding of guilt on a violation of this chapter, regardless of whether
imposition of sentence is deferred or the penalty is suspended, and
shall be treated as a violation conviction for purposes of
certification forfeiture under this chapter. Violations of this
chapter include:
(a) Failure to comply with any requirement of this chapter;
(b) Failure or refusal to establish, maintain, provide, copy, or
permit access to records or reports as required;
(c) Obtaining certification through fraud or misrepresentation;
(d) Failure to obtain certification from the department and
performing work requiring certification at a job site; or
(e) Fraudulently obtaining certification and engaging in any lead-based paint activities requiring certification.

Sec. 7 RCW 70.103.090 and 2003 c 322 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department's duties under chapter 322, Laws of 2003 are
subject to authorization of the state program from the federal
government within two years of July 27, 2003. Chapter 322, Laws of
2003 expires if the federal environmental protection agency does not
authorize a state program within two years of July 27, 2003.
(2) The department's duties under chapter 322, Laws of 2003, as
amended, are subject to the availability of sufficient funding from the
federal government for this purpose. The director or his or her
designee shall seek funding of the department's efforts under this
chapter from the federal government. By October 15th of each year, the
director shall determine if sufficient federal funding has been
provided or guaranteed by the federal government. If the director
determines sufficient funding has not been provided, the department
shall:
(a) Cease efforts under this chapter due to the lack of federal
funding; and
(b) Inform the code reviser that it has ceased its efforts due to
the lack of federal funding.

--- END ---