BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 72.09.015 and 2009 c 521 s 165 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Adult basic education" means education or instruction designed
to achieve general competence of skills in reading, writing, and oral
communication, including English as a second language and preparation
and testing services for obtaining a high school diploma or a general
equivalency diploma.
(2) "Base level of correctional services" means the minimum level
of field services the department of corrections is required by statute
to provide for the supervision and monitoring of offenders.
(3) "Community custody" has the same meaning as that provided in
RCW 9.94A.030 and also includes community placement and community
supervision as defined in RCW 9.94B.020.
(4) "Contraband" means any object or communication the secretary
determines shall not be allowed to be: (a) Brought into; (b) possessed
while on the grounds of; or (c) sent from any institution under the
control of the secretary.
(5) "Correctional facility" means a facility or institution
operated directly or by contract by the secretary for the purposes of
incarcerating adults in total or partial confinement as defined in RCW
9.94A.030.
(6) "County" means a county or combination of counties.
(((6))) (7) "Department" means the department of corrections.
(((7))) (8) "Earned early release" means earned release as
authorized by RCW 9.94A.728.
(((8))) (9) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice that has
had multiple-site random controlled trials across heterogeneous
populations demonstrating that the program or practice is effective in
reducing recidivism for the population.
(((9))) (10) "Extended family visit" means an authorized visit
between an inmate and a member of his or her immediate family that
occurs in a private visiting unit located at the correctional facility
where the inmate is confined.
(((10))) (11) "Good conduct" means compliance with department rules
and policies.
(((11))) (12) "Good performance" means successful completion of a
program required by the department, including an education, work, or
other program.
(((12))) (13) "Immediate family" means the inmate's children,
stepchildren, grandchildren, great grandchildren, parents, stepparents,
grandparents, great grandparents, siblings, and a person legally
married to or in a state registered domestic partnership with an
inmate. "Immediate family" does not include an inmate adopted by
another inmate or the immediate family of the adopted or adopting
inmate.
(((13))) (14) "Indigent inmate," "indigent," and "indigency" mean
an inmate who has less than a ten-dollar balance of disposable income
in his or her institutional account on the day a request is made to
utilize funds and during the thirty days previous to the request.
(((14))) (15) "Individual reentry plan" means the plan to prepare
an offender for release into the community. It should be developed
collaboratively between the department and the offender and based on an
assessment of the offender using a standardized and comprehensive tool
to identify the offender's risks and needs. The individual reentry
plan describes actions that should occur to prepare individual
offenders for release from prison or jail, specifies the supervision
and services they will experience in the community, and describes an
offender's eventual discharge to aftercare upon successful completion
of supervision. An individual reentry plan is updated throughout the
period of an offender's incarceration and supervision to be relevant to
the offender's current needs and risks.
(((15))) (16) "Inmate" means a person committed to the custody of
the department, including but not limited to persons residing in a
correctional institution or facility and persons released from such
facility on furlough, work release, or community custody, and persons
received from another state, state agency, county, or federal
jurisdiction.
(((16))) (17) "Labor" means the period of time before a birth
during which contractions are of sufficient frequency, intensity, and
duration to bring about effacement and progressive dilation of the
cervix.
(18) "Physical restraint" means the use of any bodily force or
physical intervention to control an offender or limit an offender's
freedom of movement in a way that does not involve a mechanical
restraint. "Physical restraint" does not include momentary periods of
minimal physical restriction by direct person-to-person contact,
without the aid of mechanical restraint, accomplished with limited
force and designed to:
(a) Prevent an offender from completing an act that would result in
potential bodily harm to self or others or damage to property;
(b) Remove a disruptive offender who is unwilling to leave an area
voluntarily; or
(c) Guide an offender from one location to another.
(19) "Postpartum recovery" means (a) the entire period a woman or
youth is in the hospital, birthing center, or clinic after giving birth
and (b) an additional time period, if any, a treating physician
determines is necessary for healing after the woman or youth leaves the
hospital, birthing center, or clinic.
(20) "Privilege" means any goods or services, education or work
programs, or earned early release days, the receipt of which are
directly linked to an inmate's (a) good conduct; and (b) good
performance. Privileges do not include any goods or services the
department is required to provide under the state or federal
Constitution or under state or federal law.
(((17))) (21) "Promising practice" means a practice that presents,
based on preliminary information, potential for becoming a
research-based or consensus-based practice.
(((18))) (22) "Research-based" means a program or practice that has
some research demonstrating effectiveness, but that does not yet meet
the standard of evidence-based practices.
(((19))) (23) "Restraints" means anything used to control the
movement of a person's body or limbs and includes:
(a) Physical restraint; or
(b) Mechanical restraint including, but not limited to, metal
handcuffs, plastic ties, ankle restraints, leather cuffs, other
hospital-type restraints, tasers, or batons.
(24) "Secretary" means the secretary of corrections or his or her
designee.
(((20))) (25) "Significant expansion" includes any expansion into
a new product line or service to the class I business that results from
an increase in benefits provided by the department, including a
decrease in labor costs, rent, or utility rates (for water, sewer,
electricity, and disposal), an increase in work program space, tax
advantages, or other overhead costs.
(((21))) (26) "Superintendent" means the superintendent of a
correctional facility under the jurisdiction of the Washington state
department of corrections, or his or her designee.
(((22))) (27) "Transportation" means the conveying, by any means,
of an incarcerated pregnant woman or youth from the correctional
facility to another location from the moment she leaves the
correctional facility to the time of arrival at the other location, and
includes the escorting of the pregnant incarcerated woman or youth from
the correctional facility to the transport vehicle and from the vehicle
to the other location.
(28) "Unfair competition" means any net competitive advantage that
a business may acquire as a result of a correctional industries
contract, including labor costs, rent, tax advantages, utility rates
(water, sewer, electricity, and disposal), and other overhead costs.
To determine net competitive advantage, the correctional industries
board shall review and quantify any expenses unique to operating a for-profit business inside a prison.
(((23))) (29) "Vocational training" or "vocational education" means
"vocational education" as defined in RCW 72.62.020.
(((24))) (30) "Washington business" means an in-state manufacturer
or service provider subject to chapter 82.04 RCW existing on June 10,
2004.
(((25))) (31) "Work programs" means all classes of correctional
industries jobs authorized under RCW 72.09.100.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Except in extraordinary circumstances, no restraints of any
kind may be used on any pregnant woman or youth incarcerated in a
correctional facility during transportation to and from visits to
medical providers and court proceedings during the third trimester of
her pregnancy, or during postpartum recovery.
(b) While the pregnant woman or youth is in labor or in childbirth,
no restraints of any kind may be used unless specifically requested by
medical personnel.
(2) Extraordinary circumstances exist:
(a) Where a corrections officer makes an individualized
determination, based upon custody level or past behavior of the
pregnant woman or youth, that restraints will be necessary to prevent
escape or injury to herself, medical or correctional personnel, or
others. Under these circumstances, prior authorization must be
obtained from medical personnel before the use of restraints is
permitted. The authorization must identify the type of restraints that
are appropriate to address the risk of escape or injury;
(b) Where a corrections officer determines, based upon the current
behavior of the pregnant woman or youth, restraints are necessary to
prevent escape or injury to herself, medical or correctional personnel,
or others.
(3) If the doctor, nurse, or other health professional treating the
pregnant woman or youth requests that restraints not be used, the
corrections officer accompanying the pregnant woman or youth shall
immediately remove all restraints.
(4) Anytime restraints are used on a pregnant woman or youth, the
restraints must be the least restrictive available and the most
reasonable under the circumstances, but in no case shall leg irons or
waist chains be used on any pregnant woman or youth.
(5) No correctional personnel shall be present during the pregnant
woman's or youth's labor or childbirth while she is being attended to
by medical personnel, unless specifically requested by medical
personnel. If the employee's presence is requested by medical
personnel, the employee should be female if practicable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall provide an informational packet about the
requirements of this act to all medical staff and nonmedical staff who
are involved in the transportation of women and youth who are pregnant,
as well as other staff the secretary deems appropriate. The
informational packet provided to staff under this section shall be
developed as provided in section 10 of this act.
(2) The secretary shall cause the requirements of this act to be
provided to all women or youth who are pregnant, at the time the
department assumes custody of the person in a correctional facility.
In addition, the secretary shall cause a notice containing the
requirements of this act to be posted in locations in which medical
care is provided within the facilities.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.48.020 and 2009 c 411 s 3 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter the words and phrases in this section shall
have the meanings indicated unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Administration" means the direct application of a drug whether
by ingestion or inhalation, to the body of an inmate by a practitioner
or nonpractitioner jail personnel.
(2) "Correctional facility" means a facility operated by a
governing unit primarily designed, staffed, and used for the housing of
adult persons serving terms not exceeding one year for the purposes of
punishment, correction, and rehabilitation following conviction of a
criminal offense.
(3) "Deliver" or "delivery" means the actual, constructive, or
attempted transfer from one person to another of medication whether or
not there is an agency relationship.
(4) "Detention facility" means a facility operated by a governing
unit primarily designed, staffed, and used for the temporary housing of
adult persons charged with a criminal offense prior to trial or
sentencing and for the housing of adult persons for purposes of
punishment and correction after sentencing or persons serving terms not
to exceed ninety days.
(5) "Drug" and "legend drug" have the same meanings as provided in
RCW 69.41.010.
(6) "Governing unit" means the city and/or county or any
combinations of cities and/or counties responsible for the operation,
supervision, and maintenance of a jail.
(7) "Health care" means preventive, diagnostic, and rehabilitative
services provided by licensed health care professionals and/or
facilities; such care to include providing prescription drugs where
indicated.
(8) "Holding facility" means a facility operated by a governing
unit primarily designed, staffed, and used for the temporary housing of
adult persons charged with a criminal offense prior to trial or
sentencing and for the temporary housing of such persons during or
after trial and/or sentencing, but in no instance shall the housing
exceed thirty days.
(9) "Jail" means any holding, detention, special detention, or
correctional facility as defined in this section.
(10) "Labor" means the period of time before a birth during which
contractions are of sufficient frequency, intensity, and duration to
bring about effacement and progressive dilation of the cervix.
(11) "Major urban" means a county or combination of counties which
has a city having a population greater than twenty-six thousand based
on the 1978 projections of the office of financial management.
(((11))) (12) "Medication" means a drug, legend drug, or controlled
substance requiring a prescription or an over-the-counter or
nonprescription drug.
(((12))) (13) "Medication assistance" means assistance rendered by
nonpractitioner jail personnel to an inmate residing in a jail to
facilitate the individual's self-administration of a legend drug or
controlled substance or nonprescription medication. "Medication
assistance" includes reminding or coaching the individual, handing the
medication container to the individual, opening the individual's
medication container, using an enabler, or placing the medication in
the individual's hand.
(((13))) (14) "Medium urban" means a county or combination of
counties which has a city having a population equal to or greater than
ten thousand but less than twenty-six thousand based on the 1978
projections of the office of financial management.
(((14))) (15) "Nonpractitioner jail personnel" means appropriately
trained staff who are authorized to manage, deliver, or administer
prescription and nonprescription medication under RCW 70.48.490.
(((15))) (16) "Office" means the office of financial management.
(((16))) (17) "Physical restraint" means the use of any bodily
force or physical intervention to control an offender or limit an
offender's freedom of movement in a way that does not involve a
mechanical restraint. "Physical restraint" does not include momentary
periods of minimal physical restriction by direct person-to-person
contact, without the aid of mechanical restraint, accomplished with
limited force and designed to:
(a) Prevent an offender from completing an act that would result in
potential bodily harm to self or others or damage to property;
(b) Remove a disruptive offender who is unwilling to leave an area
voluntarily; or
(c) Guide an offender from one location to another.
(18) "Postpartum recovery" means (a) the entire period a woman or
youth is in the hospital, birthing center, or clinic after giving birth
and (b) an additional time period, if any, a treating physician
determines is necessary for healing after the woman or youth leaves the
hospital, birthing center, or clinic.
(19) "Practitioner" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
69.41.010.
(((17))) (20) "Restraints" means anything used to control the
movement of a person's body or limbs and includes:
(a) Physical restraint; or
(b) Mechanical restraint including, but not limited to, metal
handcuffs, plastic ties, ankle restraints, leather cuffs, other
hospital-type restraints, tasers, or batons.
(21) "Rural" means a county or combination of counties which has a
city having a population less than ten thousand based on the 1978
projections of the office of financial management.
(((18))) (22) "Special detention facility" means a minimum security
facility operated by a governing unit primarily designed, staffed, and
used for the housing of special populations of sentenced persons who do
not require the level of security normally provided in detention and
correctional facilities including, but not necessarily limited to,
persons convicted of offenses under RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504.
(23) "Transportation" means the conveying, by any means, of an
incarcerated pregnant woman or youth from the correctional facility to
another location from the moment she leaves the correctional facility
to the time of arrival at the other location, and includes the
escorting of the pregnant incarcerated woman or youth from the
correctional facility to the transport vehicle and from the vehicle to
the other location.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 70.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Except in extraordinary circumstances, no restraints of any
kind may be used on any pregnant woman or youth incarcerated in a
correctional facility or any facility covered by this chapter during
transportation to and from visits to medical providers and court
proceedings during the third trimester of her pregnancy, or during
postpartum recovery.
(b) While the pregnant woman or youth is in labor or in childbirth,
no restraints of any kind may be used unless specifically requested by
medical personnel.
(2) Extraordinary circumstances exist:
(a) Where a corrections officer makes an individualized
determination, based upon custody level or past behavior of the
pregnant woman or youth, that restraints will be necessary to prevent
escape or injury to herself, medical or correctional personnel, or
others. Under these circumstances, prior authorization must be
obtained from medical personnel before the use of restraints is
permitted. The authorization must identify the type of restraints that
are appropriate to address the risk of escape or injury;
(b) Where a corrections officer determines, based upon the current
behavior of the pregnant woman or youth, restraints are necessary to
prevent escape or injury to herself, medical or correctional personnel,
or others.
(3) If the doctor, nurse, or other health professional treating the
pregnant woman or youth requests that restraints not be used, the
corrections officer accompanying the pregnant woman or youth shall
immediately remove all restraints.
(4) Anytime restraints are used on a pregnant woman or youth the
restraints must be the least restrictive available and the most
reasonable under the circumstances, but in no case shall leg irons or
waist chains be used on any pregnant woman or youth.
(5) No correctional personnel shall be present during the pregnant
woman's or youth's labor or childbirth while she is being attended to
by medical personnel, unless specifically requested by medical
personnel. If the employee's presence is requested by medical
personnel, the employee should be female if practicable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 70.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The jail administrator or his or her designee or chief law
enforcement executive or his or her designee shall provide notice of
the requirements of this act to the appropriate staff at correctional
or detention facilities. Appropriate staff shall include all medical
staff and staff who are involved in the transport of women and youth
who are or may become pregnant, as well as such other staff as the
sheriff or police chief deems appropriate.
(2) The jail administrator or his or her designee or chief law
enforcement executive or his or her designee shall cause the
requirements of this act to be provided to all women or youth who are
or may become pregnant, at the time the county or city assumes custody
of the person in a correctional or detention facility. The jail
administrator or his or her designee or chief law enforcement executive
or his or her designee shall cause a notice containing the requirements
of this act to be posted in locations in which medical care is provided
within the facilities.

Sec. 7 RCW 13.40.020 and 2009 c 454 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Community-based rehabilitation" means one or more of the
following: Employment; attendance of information classes; literacy
classes; counseling, outpatient substance abuse treatment programs,
outpatient mental health programs, anger management classes, education
or outpatient treatment programs to prevent animal cruelty, or other
services; or attendance at school or other educational programs
appropriate for the juvenile as determined by the school district.
Placement in community-based rehabilitation programs is subject to
available funds;
(2) "Community-based sanctions" may include one or more of the
following:
(a) A fine, not to exceed five hundred dollars;
(b) Community restitution not to exceed one hundred fifty hours of
community restitution;
(3) "Community restitution" means compulsory service, without
compensation, performed for the benefit of the community by the
offender as punishment for committing an offense. Community
restitution may be performed through public or private organizations or
through work crews;
(4) "Community supervision" means an order of disposition by the
court of an adjudicated youth not committed to the department or an
order granting a deferred disposition. A community supervision order
for a single offense may be for a period of up to two years for a sex
offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030 and up to one year for other
offenses. As a mandatory condition of any term of community
supervision, the court shall order the juvenile to refrain from
committing new offenses. As a mandatory condition of community
supervision, the court shall order the juvenile to comply with the
mandatory school attendance provisions of chapter 28A.225 RCW and to
inform the school of the existence of this requirement. Community
supervision is an individualized program comprised of one or more of
the following:
(a) Community-based sanctions;
(b) Community-based rehabilitation;
(c) Monitoring and reporting requirements;
(d) Posting of a probation bond;
(5) "Confinement" means physical custody by the department of
social and health services in a facility operated by or pursuant to a
contract with the state, or physical custody in a detention facility
operated by or pursuant to a contract with any county. The county may
operate or contract with vendors to operate county detention
facilities. The department may operate or contract to operate
detention facilities for juveniles committed to the department.
Pretrial confinement or confinement of less than thirty-one days
imposed as part of a disposition or modification order may be served
consecutively or intermittently, in the discretion of the court;
(6) "Court," when used without further qualification, means the
juvenile court judge(s) or commissioner(s);
(7) "Criminal history" includes all criminal complaints against the
respondent for which, prior to the commission of a current offense:
(a) The allegations were found correct by a court. If a respondent
is convicted of two or more charges arising out of the same course of
conduct, only the highest charge from among these shall count as an
offense for the purposes of this chapter; or
(b) The criminal complaint was diverted by a prosecutor pursuant to
the provisions of this chapter on agreement of the respondent and after
an advisement to the respondent that the criminal complaint would be
considered as part of the respondent's criminal history. A
successfully completed deferred adjudication that was entered before
July 1, 1998, or a deferred disposition shall not be considered part of
the respondent's criminal history;
(8) "Department" means the department of social and health
services;
(9) "Detention facility" means a county facility, paid for by the
county, for the physical confinement of a juvenile alleged to have
committed an offense or an adjudicated offender subject to a
disposition or modification order. "Detention facility" includes
county group homes, inpatient substance abuse programs, juvenile basic
training camps, and electronic monitoring;
(10) "Diversion unit" means any probation counselor who enters into
a diversion agreement with an alleged youthful offender, or any other
person, community accountability board, youth court under the
supervision of the juvenile court, or other entity except a law
enforcement official or entity, with whom the juvenile court
administrator has contracted to arrange and supervise such agreements
pursuant to RCW 13.40.080, or any person, community accountability
board, or other entity specially funded by the legislature to arrange
and supervise diversion agreements in accordance with the requirements
of this chapter. For purposes of this subsection, "community
accountability board" means a board comprised of members of the local
community in which the juvenile offender resides. The superior court
shall appoint the members. The boards shall consist of at least three
and not more than seven members. If possible, the board should include
a variety of representatives from the community, such as a law
enforcement officer, teacher or school administrator, high school
student, parent, and business owner, and should represent the cultural
diversity of the local community;
(11) "Foster care" means temporary physical care in a foster family
home or group care facility as defined in RCW 74.15.020 and licensed by
the department, or other legally authorized care;
(12) "Institution" means a juvenile facility established pursuant
to chapters 72.05 and 72.16 through 72.20 RCW;
(13) "Intensive supervision program" means a parole program that
requires intensive supervision and monitoring, offers an array of
individualized treatment and transitional services, and emphasizes
community involvement and support in order to reduce the likelihood a
juvenile offender will commit further offenses;
(14) "Juvenile," "youth," and "child" mean any individual who is
under the chronological age of eighteen years and who has not been
previously transferred to adult court pursuant to RCW 13.40.110, unless
the individual was convicted of a lesser charge or acquitted of the
charge for which he or she was previously transferred pursuant to RCW
13.40.110 or who is not otherwise under adult court jurisdiction;
(15) "Juvenile offender" means any juvenile who has been found by
the juvenile court to have committed an offense, including a person
eighteen years of age or older over whom jurisdiction has been extended
under RCW 13.40.300;
(16) "Labor" means the period of time before a birth during which
contractions are of sufficient frequency, intensity, and duration to
bring about effacement and progressive dilation of the cervix;
(17) "Local sanctions" means one or more of the following: (a) 0-30 days of confinement; (b) 0-12 months of community supervision; (c)
0-150 hours of community restitution; or (d) $0-$500 fine;
(((17))) (18) "Manifest injustice" means a disposition that would
either impose an excessive penalty on the juvenile or would impose a
serious, and clear danger to society in light of the purposes of this
chapter;
(((18))) (19) "Monitoring and reporting requirements" means one or
more of the following: Curfews; requirements to remain at home,
school, work, or court-ordered treatment programs during specified
hours; restrictions from leaving or entering specified geographical
areas; requirements to report to the probation officer as directed and
to remain under the probation officer's supervision; and other
conditions or limitations as the court may require which may not
include confinement;
(((19))) (20) "Offense" means an act designated a violation or a
crime if committed by an adult under the law of this state, under any
ordinance of any city or county of this state, under any federal law,
or under the law of another state if the act occurred in that state;
(((20))) (21) "Physical restraint" means the use of any bodily
force or physical intervention to control an offender or limit an
offender's freedom of movement in a way that does not involve a
mechanical restraint. "Physical restraint" does not include momentary
periods of minimal physical restriction by direct person-to-person
contact, without the aid of mechanical restraint, accomplished with
limited force and designed to:
(a) Prevent an offender from completing an act that would result in
potential bodily harm to self or others or damage to property;
(b) Remove a disruptive offender who is unwilling to leave an area
voluntarily; or
(c) Guide an offender from one location to another.
(22) "Postpartum recovery" means (a) the entire period a woman or
youth is in the hospital, birthing center, or clinic after giving birth
and (b) an additional time period, if any, a treating physician
determines is necessary for healing after the woman or youth leaves the
hospital, birthing center, or clinic;
(23) "Probation bond" means a bond, posted with sufficient security
by a surety justified and approved by the court, to secure the
offender's appearance at required court proceedings and compliance with
court-ordered community supervision or conditions of release ordered
pursuant to RCW 13.40.040 or 13.40.050. It also means a deposit of
cash or posting of other collateral in lieu of a bond if approved by
the court;
(((21))) (24) "Respondent" means a juvenile who is alleged or
proven to have committed an offense;
(((22))) (25) "Restitution" means financial reimbursement by the
offender to the victim, and shall be limited to easily ascertainable
damages for injury to or loss of property, actual expenses incurred for
medical treatment for physical injury to persons, lost wages resulting
from physical injury, and costs of the victim's counseling reasonably
related to the offense. Restitution shall not include reimbursement
for damages for mental anguish, pain and suffering, or other intangible
losses. Nothing in this chapter shall limit or replace civil remedies
or defenses available to the victim or offender;
(((23))) (26) "Restraints" means anything used to control the
movement of a person's body or limbs and includes:
(a) Physical restraint; or
(b) Mechanical restraint including, but not limited to, metal
handcuffs, plastic ties, ankle restraints, leather cuffs, other
hospital-type restraints, tasers, or batons;
(27) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social
and health services. "Assistant secretary" means the assistant
secretary for juvenile rehabilitation for the department;
(((24))) (28) "Services" means services which provide alternatives
to incarceration for those juveniles who have pleaded or been
adjudicated guilty of an offense or have signed a diversion agreement
pursuant to this chapter;
(((25))) (29) "Sex offense" means an offense defined as a sex
offense in RCW 9.94A.030;
(((26))) (30) "Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes
for which the respondent committed the offense was for the purpose of
his or her sexual gratification;
(((27))) (31) "Surety" means an entity licensed under state
insurance laws or by the state department of licensing, to write
corporate, property, or probation bonds within the state, and justified
and approved by the superior court of the county having jurisdiction of
the case;
(((28))) (32) "Transportation" means the conveying, by any means,
of an incarcerated pregnant woman or youth from the correctional
facility to another location from the moment she leaves the
correctional facility to the time of arrival at the other location, and
includes the escorting of the pregnant incarcerated woman or youth from
the correctional facility to the transport vehicle and from the vehicle
to the other location.
(33) "Violation" means an act or omission, which if committed by an
adult, must be proven beyond a reasonable doubt, and is punishable by
sanctions which do not include incarceration;
(((29))) (34) "Violent offense" means a violent offense as defined
in RCW 9.94A.030;
(((30))) (35) "Youth court" means a diversion unit under the
supervision of the juvenile court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 13.40 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Except in extraordinary circumstances, no restraints of any
kind may be used on any pregnant youth incarcerated in an institution
or detention facility during transportation to and from visits to
medical providers and court proceedings during the third trimester of
her pregnancy, or during postpartum recovery.
(b) While the pregnant youth is in labor or in childbirth, no
restraints of any kind may be used unless specifically requested by
medical personnel.
(2) Extraordinary circumstances exist:
(a) Where a corrections officer makes an individualized
determination, based upon custody level or past behavior of the
pregnant youth, that restraints will be necessary to prevent escape or
injury to herself, medical or correctional personnel, or others. Under
these circumstances, prior authorization must be obtained from medical
personnel before the use of restraints is permitted. The authorization
must identify the type of restraints that are appropriate to address
the risk of escape or injury;
(b) Where a corrections officer determines, based upon the current
behavior of the youth, restraints are necessary to prevent escape or
injury to herself, medical or correctional personnel, or others.
(3) If the doctor, nurse, or other health professional treating the
pregnant youth requests that restraints not be used, the corrections
officer accompanying the pregnant youth shall immediately remove all
restraints.
(4) Anytime restraints are used on a youth the restraints must be
the least restrictive available and the most reasonable under the
circumstances, but in no case shall leg irons or waist chains be used
on any pregnant youth.
(5) No correctional personnel shall be present during the pregnant
youth's labor or childbirth while she is being attended to by medical
personnel, unless specifically requested by medical personnel. If the
employee's presence is requested by medical personnel, the employee
should be female if practicable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 13.40 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall:
(a) Provide an informational packet about the requirements of this
act to all medical staff and nonmedical staff who are involved in the
transportation of youth who are pregnant, as well as other staff as
appropriate. The informational packet provided to staff under this
section shall be developed as provided in section 10 of this act; and
(b) Cause the requirements of this act to be provided to all youth
who are or may become pregnant at the time the department assumes
custody of the person in the institution. In addition, the secretary
shall cause a notice containing the requirements of this act to be
posted in locations in which medical care is provided within the
institutions.
(2) The legislative authority shall:
(a) Provide notice of the requirements of this act to the
appropriate staff at detention facilities. Appropriate staff shall
include all medical staff and staff who are involved in the transport
of youth who are or may become pregnant, as well as such other staff as
appropriate; and
(b) Cause the requirements of this act to be provided to all youth
who are or may become pregnant, at the time the detention facility
assumes custody of the person. In addition, the legislative authority
shall cause a notice containing the requirements of this act to be
posted in locations in which medical care is provided within the
facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 70.48 RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the
department of corrections, the department of social and health
services, the juvenile rehabilitation administration, and the criminal
justice training commission shall jointly develop an informational
packet on the requirements of this act. The packet shall be ready for
distribution no later than September 1, 2010.

--- END ---