BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 53.06.040 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 55 are each
amended to read as follows:
Each port district which designates the Washington public ports
association as the agency through which the duties imposed by RCW
53.06.020 may be executed is authorized to pay dues and/or assessments
to said association from port district funds in any calendar year ((in
an amount not exceeding a sum equal to the amount which would be raised
by a levy of one cent per thousand dollars of assessed value against
the taxable property within the port district)).

--- END ---