BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that small and medium
sized businesses find it difficult to offer retirement plans because of
the complexity and costs. Businesses offering retirement plans have a
better ability to recruit and retain employees. The Washington
voluntary retirement accounts program provides a simple and cost-effective way for employers to offer an important employee benefit.
The legislature also finds that many workers do not have access to an
employment-based retirement plan. Workers who are unable to build up
pensions and savings risk living on low incomes in their old age and
are more likely to become dependent on state services. The Washington
voluntary retirement accounts program provides a simple and inexpensive
way for workers to save for retirement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this subchapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Director" means the director of retirement systems.
(2) "Enrollee" means any worker in this state that is enrolled in
the program.
(3) "Participating employer" means any private employer, with a
place of business in this state, and with employees that have enrolled
in the program.
(4) "Program" means the Washington voluntary retirement accounts
program created under section 3 of this act.
(5) "Qualified employee" means those workers that are defined by
the federal internal revenue service to be eligible to participate in
a specific retirement plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The Washington voluntary retirement accounts
program is created. The director is responsible for the implementation
and operation of the program, directly or by contract. Sections 4
through 6 of this act may not be implemented until appropriate federal
and/or philanthropic funds for start-up have been secured for deposit
into the Washington voluntary retirement accounts program
administrative account. Once start-up funding has been expended,
program implementation and operation is paid through fees on enrollee's
accounts. Funds from the department of retirement systems expense
account may not be used to administer the program or to obtain program
funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Prior to the enrollment of any private
sector worker or employer in the program, the director shall design a
plan for the operation of the program. The program consists of a two-tier system with one or more of the following: SIMPLE IRA-type program
or other internal revenue service approved employer plan, open to any
employer employing one hundred or fewer qualified employees who choose
to participate for their employees, and workplace-based individual
retirement accounts open to all workers. The director shall then seek
approval if necessary from the federal internal revenue service to
offer the plans and accounts to Washington employers and workers on a
tax-qualified basis. The plans and accounts must include the option
for enrollees to roll pretax contributions into an individual
retirement account or another eligible retirement plan after ceasing
participation in the program. A range of investment options must be
provided to meet the needs of investors with various levels of risk
tolerance and various ages. Funds offered should cover a range of
investment options from low risk to high risk and include options for
those who do not wish to actively manage their investments. The state
investment board shall provide investment options for participants to
choose from, and shall establish an investment plan for participants
who choose not to self-direct investments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Enrollment in the program is not an
entitlement and must not result in expenditures that exceed the amount
available in the Washington voluntary retirement accounts program
administrative account. If it appears that continued enrollment will
result in expenditures exceeding the amount available for a particular
fiscal year, the director may freeze new enrollments in the program and
establish a waiting list of eligible workers, or reduce enrollments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Following the design and approval of the
program under section 4 of this act, the director shall adopt all rules
necessary for the implementation and operation of the program. Rules
shall be written to comply with federal standards and may incorporate
federal recommendations that are in the best interests of enrollees and
the operations of the plan. As part of the rule development process,
the director shall consult with employers, workers, private sector
retirement plan administrators and providers, and any other individuals
or entities the director determines relevant to the development of an
effective and efficient method for operating the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The Washington voluntary retirement
accounts program principal account is created in the state treasury and
must be administered in compliance with applicable federal law and as
set forth in this section. The department may make arrangements with
financial institutions to serve as trustees or custodians of Washington
voluntary retirement accounts as may be required or advisable to comply
with applicable federal law and to provide for the efficient
implementation and administration of the program.
(2) The contributions elected by participating employees in
accordance with section 4 of this act must be paid into the Washington
voluntary retirement accounts program principal account and must be
sufficient to cover costs of administration and staffing in addition to
such other amounts as may be determined by the director. The account
may only be used to carry out the purposes of this subchapter.
(3) All moneys in the Washington voluntary retirement accounts
program principal account and the Washington voluntary retirement
accounts program administrative account, all property and rights
purchased therewith, and all income attributable thereto, is held in
trust by the state investment board, as set forth under RCW 43.33A.030,
for the exclusive benefit of the Washington voluntary retirement
accounts program participants and their beneficiaries, and,
notwithstanding any other provision of this or related acts, must be
held separate from other types of funds to the extent required by
federal law. Neither the participating employee, nor the participant's
beneficiary or beneficiaries, nor any other designee, has any right to
commute, sell, assign, transfer, or otherwise convey the right to
receive any payments under the program. These payments and rights are
nonassignable and nontransferable. Account balances are not subject to
attachment, garnishment, or execution and are not transferable by
operation of law in event of bankruptcy or insolvency, except to the
extent otherwise required by law.
(4) The state investment board has the full power to invest moneys
in the Washington voluntary retirement accounts program principal
account and the Washington voluntary retirement accounts program
administrative account in accordance with RCW 43.84.150, 43.33A.140,
and this subchapter, and cumulative investment directions received
under this subchapter. All investment and operating costs of the state
investment board associated with the investment of the program assets
must be paid under RCW 43.33A.160 and 43.84.160. With the exception of
these expenses, one hundred percent of all earnings from these
investments shall accrue directly to the Washington voluntary
retirement accounts program principal account.
(5)(a) No state board, commission, or agency, or any officer,
employee, or member thereof is liable for any loss or deficiency
resulting from participant investments selected under this subchapter.
(b) The state investment board, or any officer, employee, or member
thereof is not liable for any loss or deficiency resulting from
reasonable efforts to implement investment directions under this
subchapter.
(6) The Washington voluntary retirement accounts program
administrative account is created in the state treasury. Federal
appropriations or philanthropic grants received specifically for this
program must be deposited into the Washington voluntary retirement
accounts program administrative account. Expenses of the department
pertaining to the Washington voluntary retirement accounts program
including staffing and administrative expenses shall be paid out of the
Washington voluntary retirement accounts program administrative
account. Any excess balances credited to this account over
administrative expenses disbursed from this account shall be
transferred to the Washington voluntary retirement accounts program
principal account at such time and in such amounts as may be determined
by the director with the approval of the director of financial
management. Any deficiency into the Washington voluntary retirement
accounts program administrative account caused by an excess of
administrative expenses disbursed from this account shall be
transferred to this account from the Washington voluntary retirement
accounts program principal account.
(7)(a)(i) The director shall keep or cause to be kept full and
adequate accounts and records of the assets of each individual
participant, obligations, transactions, and affairs of the program.
The department shall account for and report on the investment of
program assets or may enter into an agreement with the state investment
board for accounting and reporting.
(ii) The director's duties related to individual participant
accounts include conducting the activities of trade instruction,
settlement activities, and direction of cash movement and related wire
transfers with the custodian bank and outside investment firms.
(iii) The director has sole responsibility for contracting with any
recordkeepers for individual participant accounts and shall manage the
performance of recordkeepers under those contracts. In establishing
contracts, the director shall give consideration to contracts that
assign primary liability for all tort and contract actions to the
contractor. In establishing the contracts, the department shall assume
secondary liability and joint and several liability must be preserved.
When considering a contract that assigns primary liability to the
contractor, the director shall determine the potential liability and
the costs and benefits of adding the liability considerations in this
subsection (7)(a)(iii) to contract language.
(b) The director may contract with private-sector financial
services firms to enroll eligible private-sector individuals and
workers in the Washington voluntary retirement accounts program. The
director may establish contracts with financial services firms for this
function.
(c)(i) The director's duties under (a)(ii) of this subsection do
not limit the authority of the state investment board to conduct its
responsibilities for asset management and balancing of program funds.
(ii) The state investment board has sole responsibility for
contracting with outside investment firms to provide investment
management for program funds and shall manage the performance of
investment managers under those contracts. In establishing contracts,
the state investment board shall give consideration to contracts that
assign primary liability for all tort and contract actions to the
contractor. In establishing the contracts, the state investment board
shall assume secondary liability and joint and several liability must
be preserved. When considering a contract that assigns primary
liability to the contractor, the state investment board shall determine
the potential liability and the costs and benefits of adding the
liability considerations in this subsection (7)(c)(ii) to contract
language.
(d) The state treasurer shall designate and define the terms of
engagement for the custodial banks.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.33A.070 and 1981 c 3 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
No member of the state investment board is liable for the
negligence, default, or failure of any other person or other member of
the board to perform the duties of the member's office and no member of
the board shall be considered or held to be an insurer of the funds or
assets of any of the trust and retirement funds, including funds or
assets of the voluntary retirement accounts program, nor is any
nonvoting member liable for actions performed with the exercise of
reasonable diligence within the scope of the member's authorized
activities as a member of the board.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.84.092 and 2009 c 479 s 31, 2009 c 472 s 5, and
2009 c 451 s 8 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate
share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily
balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search
and rescue account, the budget stabilization account, the capitol
building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia
river basin water supply development account, the common school
construction fund, the county arterial preservation account, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of licensing services
account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the
developmental disabilities community trust account, the drinking water
assistance account, the drinking water assistance administrative
account, the drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern
Washington University capital projects account, the education
construction fund, the education legacy trust account, the election
account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account,
the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College
capital projects account, the federal forest revolving account, the
ferry bond retirement fund, the freight congestion relief account, the
freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal
account, the grade crossing protective fund, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health
services account, the high capacity transportation account, the state
higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway
infrastructure account, the highway safety account, the high occupancy
toll lanes operations account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account,
the mobile home park relocation fund, the motor vehicle fund, the
motorcycle safety education account, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding
stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance
account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the
public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account,
the public facilities construction loan revolving account beginning
July 1, 2004, the public health supplemental account, the public
transportation systems account, the public works assistance account,
the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry
operations account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real
estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account,
the regional mobility grant program account, the resource management
cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural Washington
loan fund, the site closure account, the small city pavement and
sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife
account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees'
insurance reserve account, the state investment board expense account,
the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state
patrol highway account, the state route number 520 corridor account,
the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge
account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco
prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the
transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement
account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account,
the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation
partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tuition
recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund,
the University of Washington building account, the urban arterial trust
account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and
pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve
officers' administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account,
the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety
employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the Washington
voluntary retirement accounts program administrative account, the
Washington voluntary retirement accounts program principal account, the
water pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington
University capital projects account. Earnings derived from investing
balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific
permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be
allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be
distributed under this subsection (4) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Private employers shall provide employees
with the opportunity to enroll in the program, including providing for
payroll deductions for those employees that enroll in the program.
Employers with employees enrolled in the program are authorized to
contract with the enrolled employees to defer or contribute a portion
of the enrolled employees' compensation, in accordance with the program
rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The director shall report biennially to the
relevant committees of the legislature on the effectiveness and
efficiency of the program, including the levels of enrollment, the
financial status of the program, and the retirement savings levels of
participating enrollees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 7 and 10 through 12 of
this act are each added to chapter 41.50 RCW under the new subchapter
heading "Washington voluntary retirement accounts program."

--- END ---