BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 47.01.440 (Adoption of statewide goals to reduce annual per
capita vehicle miles traveled by 2050 -- Department's duties -- Reports to
the legislature) and 2008 c 14 s 8; and
(2) RCW 70.235.070 (Distribution of funds for infrastructure and
capital development projects -- Prerequisites) and 2009 c 519 s 9.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.580 and 2008 c 289 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department must develop and provide to counties and cities
a range of advisory climate change response methodologies, a computer
modeling program, and estimates of greenhouse gas emission reductions
resulting from specific measures. The advisory methodologies, computer
modeling program, and estimates must reflect regional and local
variations and the diversity of counties and cities planning under RCW
36.70A.040. Advisory methodologies, the computer modeling program,
estimates, and guidance developed under this section must be consistent
with recommendations developed by the advisory policy committee
established in section 4, chapter 289, Laws of 2008.
(2) ((The department, in complying with this section, must work
with the department of transportation on reductions of vehicle miles
traveled through efforts associated with, and independent of, the
process directed by RCW 47.01.440.
(3))) The department must complete and make available the advisory
climate change response methodologies, computer program, and estimates
required by this section by December 1, 2009. The advisory climate
change response methodologies, computer program, and estimates must be
updated two years before each completion date established in RCW
36.70A.130(4)(a).
(((4))) (3) This section expires January 1, 2011.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.01.078 and 2007 c 516 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
To support achievement of the policy goals described in RCW
47.04.280, the department shall:
(1) Maintain an inventory of the condition of structures and
corridors in most urgent need of retrofit or rehabilitation;
(2) Develop long-term financing tools that reliably provide ongoing
maintenance and preservation of the transportation infrastructure;
(3) Balance system safety and convenience through all phases of a
project to accommodate all users of the transportation system to
safely, reliably, and efficiently provide mobility to people and goods;
(4) ((Develop strategies to gradually reduce the per capita vehicle
miles traveled based on consideration of a range of reduction methods;
(5))) Consider efficiency tools, including high occupancy vehicle
and high occupancy toll lanes, corridor-specific and systemwide pricing
strategies, active traffic management, commute trip reduction, and
other demand management tools;
(((6))) (5) Promote integrated multimodal planning; and
(((7))) (6) Consider engineers and architects to design
environmentally sustainable, context-sensitive transportation systems.

--- END ---