BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.69.030 and 2009 c 350 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
((No)) Orders for a refund under this chapter ((shall be made
except)) are permitted only on a claim:
(1) Verified by the person who paid the tax, the person's guardian,
executor or administrator; ((and))
(2) Filed with the county treasurer within ((three)) five years
after the due date of the payment sought to be refunded; and
(3) Stating the statutory ground upon which the refund is claimed.

--- END ---