BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16.725 and 2009 c 470 s 710 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The creation of the board does not in any way preclude the
authority of the legislature to independently propose and enact special
license plate legislation.
(2) The board must review and either approve or reject special
license plate applications submitted by sponsoring organizations.
Legislative approval is required to authorize new special license
plates.
(3) Duties of the board include but are not limited to the
following:
(a) Review and approve the annual financial reports submitted by
sponsoring organizations with active special license plate series and
present those annual financial reports to the senate and house
transportation committees;
(b) Report annually to the senate and house transportation
committees on the special license plate applications that were
considered by the board;
(c) Issue approval and rejection notification letters to sponsoring
organizations, the department, the chairs of the senate and house of
representatives transportation committees, and the legislative sponsors
identified in each application. The letters must be issued within
seven days of making a determination on the status of an application;
(d) Review annually the number of plates sold for each special
license plate series created after January 1, 2003. The board may
submit a recommendation to discontinue a special plate series to the
chairs of the senate and house of representatives transportation
committees;
(e) Provide policy guidance and directions to the department
concerning the adoption of rules necessary to limit the number of
special license plates that an organization or a governmental entity
may apply for.
(4) Except as provided in chapter 72, Laws of 2008, in order to
assess the effects and impact of the proliferation of special license
plates, the legislature declares a temporary moratorium on the issuance
of any additional plates until July 1, 2011. During this period of
time, the special license plate review board created in RCW 46.16.705
and the department of licensing are prohibited from accepting,
reviewing, processing, or approving any applications. Additionally, no
special license plate may be enacted by the legislature during the
moratorium, unless the proposed license plate has been approved by the
board before February 15, 2005.

--- END ---