BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) An employer may not discharge from employment or discipline
an employee because the employee was absent from employment because he
or she: (i) Experienced symptoms of pandemic influenza; or (ii) needed
to obtain medical diagnosis or care for symptoms of pandemic influenza.
(b) An employer may require that such an absence be supported by a
certification issued by the employee's health care provider.
(c) This section applies during an influenza pandemic declared by
the secretary of the department of health.
(2)(a) An employee who believes he or she was discharged or
disciplined in violation of this section may file a complaint alleging
the violation with the director. The employee may allege a violation
only by filing such a complaint within ninety days of the alleged
violation.
(b) Upon receipt of the complaint, the director must cause an
investigation to be made as the director deems appropriate and must
determine whether this section has been violated. Notice of the
director's determination must be sent to the complainant and the
employer within ninety days of receipt of the complaint.
(c) If the director determines that this section was violated and
the employer fails to reinstate the employee or withdraw the
disciplinary action taken against the employee, whichever is
applicable, within thirty days of receipt of notice of the director's
determination, the employee may bring an action against the employer
alleging a violation of this section and seeking reinstatement or
withdrawal of the disciplinary action.
(d) In any action brought under this section, the superior court
shall have jurisdiction, for cause shown, to restrain violations under
this section and to order reinstatement of the employee or withdrawal
of the disciplinary action.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Employer" means an employer who had twenty or more full-time
equivalent employees in the previous year.
(b) "Reinstatement" means reinstatement with back pay, without loss
of seniority or benefits, and with removal of any related adverse
material from the employee's personnel file, if a file is maintained by
the employer.
(c) "Symptoms of pandemic influenza" means one or more symptoms of
pandemic influenza identified by the state health officer and specified
in the declaration of an influenza pandemic by the secretary of the
department of health.
(d) "Withdrawal of disciplinary action" means withdrawal of
disciplinary action with back pay, without loss of seniority or
benefits, and with removal of any related adverse material from the
employee's personnel file, if a file is maintained by the employer.
(4) The legislature declares that the public policies articulated
in this section depend on the procedures established in this section
and no civil or criminal action may be maintained relying on the public
policies articulated in this section without complying with the
procedures set forth in this section, and to that end all civil actions
and civil causes of action for such injuries and all jurisdiction of
the courts of this state over such causes are hereby abolished, except
as provided in this section.

--- END ---