BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington's
homeowners and utilities support voluntary and cost-effective measures
that improve the energy efficiency of existing homes. The legislature
also finds that energy audits and energy performance scoring methods
are available to assist homeowners in making informed decisions on
energy efficiency upgrades, and that Washington's local governments and
utilities are leaders in initiating pilot projects to use energy audits
and other strategies to improve the energy efficiency of existing
homes. The legislature also finds that state and local programs on
energy efficiency should be compatible with pending federal energy
legislation. It is the intent of the legislature to determine
appropriate strategies to improve the energy efficiency of existing
homes.

--- END ---