BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that public confidence
in the accurate resolution of matters in the criminal justice system is
of the highest importance, and that it is in the best interests of
public safety and individual liberty. The legislature further finds
that such accurate resolution of criminal matters is greatly
facilitated by valid and reliable forensic evidence. The legislature
recognizes, however, that pressures on forensics laboratories around
the country may compromise the reliability and validity of work done by
even the most competent and ethical forensic practitioners. The
legislature further recognizes that it is generally in the interest of
law enforcement, prosecutors, defense attorneys, the forensic and
general scientific communities, and the citizens of the state of
Washington that forensic evidence relied upon within the justice system
be scientifically valid and reliable, and that the public has
confidence in such validity and reliability.
The intent of this act is to facilitate the mission of Washington's
forensic laboratories to produce valid and reliable scientific evidence
by ensuring appropriate input and guidance from each of the interested
groups. Therefore, the legislature intends to add a criminal defense
attorney and a scientist from an established university in the state of
Washington to the forensic investigations council to increase the
council's ability to carry out its statutory duties and increase public
confidence in its work.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.103.040 and 1995 c 398 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The council shall consist of ((twelve)) fourteen members who shall
be selected as follows: One county coroner; one county prosecutor; one
county prosecutor who also serves as ex officio county coroner; one
county medical examiner; one county sheriff; one chief of police; the
chief of the state patrol; two members of a county legislative
authority; one pathologist who is currently in private practice;
((and)) two members of a city legislative authority; one attorney whose
practice of law includes significant experience representing clients
charged with criminal offenses; and one scientist with experience in
the areas of laboratory standards or quality assurance regulation and
monitoring who is a faculty member at a state university, regional
university, state college, or a nonprofit college or university that
has maintained its primary location in the state of Washington for a
minimum of twenty-five consecutive years and has an enrollment of at
least five hundred students.
The governor shall appoint members to the council from among the
nominees submitted for each position as follows: The Washington
association of county officials shall submit two nominees each for the
coroner position and the medical examiner position; the Washington
state association of counties shall submit two nominees each for the
two county legislative authority positions; the association of
Washington cities shall submit two nominees each for the two city
legislative authority positions; the Washington association of
prosecuting attorneys shall submit two nominees each for the county
prosecutor-ex officio county coroner and for the county prosecutor
position; the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs
shall submit two nominees each for the county sheriff position and the
chief of police position; ((and)) the Washington association of
pathologists shall submit two nominees for the private pathologist
position; the Washington association of criminal defense lawyers and
the Washington defender association shall jointly submit two nominees
for the criminal defense attorney position, one of whom must actively
manage or have significant experience in managing a public or private
criminal defense agency or association, the other must have experience
in cases involving DNA or other forensic evidence; and the president of
a state university, regional university, state college, or a nonprofit
college or university that has maintained its primary location in the
state of Washington for a minimum of twenty-five consecutive years and
has an enrollment of at least five hundred students may each forward to
the governor a nomination of a full-time member of the faculty at the
university or college at which the president serves, for consideration
as a member of the council. No president shall be required to submit
a nomination and the governor shall not be restricted to appointing a
member of the council from among individuals nominated by a president.

--- END ---