BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.101.060 and 1999 c 97 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission shall elect a chair and a vice-chair from among its
members. ((Seven)) A majority of the members of the commission shall
constitute a quorum. The governor shall summon the commission to its
first meeting.
Meetings may be called by the chair and shall be called by him or
her upon the written request of ((six)) one-third of the members.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.101.315 and 1997 c 351 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board on law enforcement training standards and education
consists of thirteen members, appointed by the executive director and
subject to approval by the commission. Members must be selected as
follows: (a) Three must represent county law enforcement agencies, at
least two of whom must be incumbent sheriffs; (b) three must represent
city police agencies, at least two of whom must be incumbent police
chiefs, one of whom shall be from a city under five thousand; (c) one
must represent community colleges; (d) one must represent the four-year
colleges and universities; (e) four must represent the council of
police officers, two of whom must be training officers; and (f) one
must represent tribal law enforcement in Washington. The six officers
under (a) and (b) of this subsection may be appointed by the executive
director only after the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs provides the director with the names of qualified officers. The
four officers under (e) of this subsection may be appointed by the
executive director only after the council of police officers provides
the director with the names of qualified officers.
(2) The board on correctional training standards and education
consists of ((fourteen)) eleven members, appointed by the executive
director and subject to approval by the commission. Members must be
selected as follows: (a) ((Three must be employed in the state
correctional system; (b))) Three must be employed in county or city
correctional systems; (((c))) (b) two must be employed in juvenile
corrections or probation, one ((at the local level)) by the state and
((the other at the state level)) one by a county or city; (((d))) (c)
two must be employed in community corrections; (((e))) (d) one must
represent community colleges; (((f))) (e) one must represent four-year
colleges and universities; and (((g))) (f) two must be additional
persons with experience and interest in correctional training standards
and education. At least ((one)) two of the members appointed under (a)
of this subsection ((and at least one of the members appointed under
(b) of this subsection)) must be currently employed as front line
correctional officers.

--- END ---