BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 7.68.060 and 2001 c 153 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of applying for benefits under this chapter,
the rights, privileges, responsibilities, duties, limitations and
procedures contained in RCW 51.28.020, 51.28.030, 51.28.040 and
51.28.060 shall apply: PROVIDED, That except for applications received
pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, no compensation of any kind
shall be available under this chapter if:
(a) An application for benefits is not received by the department
within ((two)) one year((s)) after the date the criminal act was
reported to a local police department or sheriff's office or the date
the rights of dependents or beneficiaries accrued, unless the director
has determined that "good cause" exists to expand the time permitted to
receive the application. "Good cause" shall be determined by the
department on a case-by-case basis and may extend the period of time in
which an application can be received for up to five years after the
date the criminal act was reported to a local police department or
sheriff's office or the date the rights of dependents or beneficiaries
accrued; or
(b) The criminal act is not reported by the victim or someone on
his or her behalf to a local police department or sheriff's office
within ((twelve months)) ninety days of its occurrence ((or, if it
could not reasonably have been reported within that period, within
twelve months of the time when a report could reasonably have been
made. In making determinations as to reasonable time limits, the
department shall give greatest weight to the needs of the victims)).
(2) This section shall apply only to criminal acts reported after
December 31, 1985.
(3) Because victims of childhood criminal acts may repress
conscious memory of such criminal acts far beyond the age of eighteen,
the rights of adult victims of childhood criminal acts shall accrue at
the time the victim discovers or reasonably should have discovered the
elements of the crime. In making determinations as to reasonable time
limits, the department shall give greatest weight to the needs of the
victim.
(4) A right to benefits under this chapter is available to any
victim of a person against whom the state initiates proceedings under
chapter 71.09 RCW. The right created under this subsection shall
accrue when the victim is notified of proceedings under chapter 71.09
RCW or the victim is interviewed, deposed, or testifies as a witness in
connection with the proceedings. An application for benefits under
this subsection must be received by the department within ((two)) one
year((s)) after the date the victim's right accrued unless the director
determines that good cause exists to expand the time to receive the
application. The director shall determine "good cause" on a case-by-case basis and may extend the period of time in which an application
can be received for up to five years after the date the right of the
victim accrued. Benefits under this subsection shall be limited to
compensation for costs or losses incurred on or after the date the
victim's right accrues for a claim allowed under this subsection.

Sec. 2 RCW 7.68.070 and 2009 c 38 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
The right to benefits under this chapter and the amount thereof
will be governed insofar as is applicable by the provisions contained
in chapter 51.32 RCW except as provided in this section, provided that
no more than fifty thousand dollars shall be paid per claim:
(1) The provisions contained in RCW 51.32.015, 51.32.030,
51.32.072, 51.32.073, 51.32.180, 51.32.190, and 51.32.200 are not
applicable to this chapter.
(2) Each victim injured as a result of a criminal act, including
criminal acts committed between July 1, 1981, and January 1, 1983, or
the victim's family or dependents in case of death of the victim, are
entitled to benefits in accordance with this chapter, subject to the
limitations under RCW 7.68.015. The rights, duties, responsibilities,
limitations, and procedures applicable to a worker as contained in RCW
51.32.010 are applicable to this chapter.
(3) The limitations contained in RCW 51.32.020 are applicable to
claims under this chapter. In addition thereto, no person or spouse,
child, or dependent of such person is entitled to benefits under this
chapter when the injury for which benefits are sought, was:
(a) The result of consent, provocation, or incitement by the
victim, unless an injury resulting from a criminal act caused the death
of the victim;
(b) Sustained while the crime victim was engaged in the attempt to
commit, or the commission of, a felony; or
(c) Sustained while the victim was confined in any county or city
jail, federal jail or prison or in any other federal institution, or
any state correctional institution maintained and operated by the
department of social and health services or the department of
corrections, prior to release from lawful custody; or confined or
living in any other institution maintained and operated by the
department of social and health services or the department of
corrections.
(4) The benefits established upon the death of a worker and
contained in RCW 51.32.050 shall be the benefits obtainable under this
chapter and provisions relating to payment contained in that section
shall equally apply under this chapter: PROVIDED, That benefits for
burial expenses shall not exceed ((the amount paid by the department in
case of the death of a worker as provided in chapter 51.32 RCW in any
claim: PROVIDED FURTHER, That if the criminal act results in the death
of a victim who was not gainfully employed at the time of the criminal
act, and who was not so employed for at least three consecutive months
of the twelve months immediately preceding the criminal act;
(a) Benefits payable to an eligible surviving spouse, where there
are no children of the victim at the time of the criminal act who have
survived the victim or where such spouse has legal custody of all of
his or her children, shall be limited to burial expenses and a lump sum
payment of seven thousand five hundred dollars without reference to
number of children, if any;
(b) Where any such spouse has legal custody of one or more but not
all of such children, then such burial expenses shall be paid, and such
spouse shall receive a lump sum payment of three thousand seven hundred
fifty dollars and any such child or children not in the legal custody
of such spouse shall receive a lump sum of three thousand seven hundred
fifty dollars to be divided equally among such child or children;
(c) If any such spouse does not have legal custody of any of the
children, the burial expenses shall be paid and the spouse shall
receive a lump sum payment of up to three thousand seven hundred fifty
dollars and any such child or children not in the legal custody of the
spouse shall receive a lump sum payment of up to three thousand seven
hundred fifty dollars to be divided equally among the child or
children;
(d) If no such spouse survives, then such burial expenses shall be
paid, and each surviving child of the victim at the time of the
criminal act shall receive a lump sum payment of three thousand seven
hundred fifty dollars up to a total of two such children and where
there are more than two such children the sum of seven thousand five
hundred dollars shall be divided equally among such children.
No other benefits may be paid or payable under these
circumstances)) five thousand dollars per claim.
(5) The benefits established in RCW 51.32.060 for permanent total
disability proximately caused by the criminal act shall be the benefits
obtainable under this chapter, and provisions relating to payment
contained in that section apply under this chapter: PROVIDED, That if
a victim becomes permanently and totally disabled as a proximate result
of the criminal act ((and was not gainfully employed at the time of the
criminal act)), the victim shall receive monthly during the period of
the disability the following percentages, where applicable, of the
average monthly wage determined as of the date of the criminal act
pursuant to RCW 51.08.018:
(a) If married at the time of the criminal act, twenty-nine percent
of the average monthly wage.
(b) If married with one child at the time of the criminal act,
thirty-four percent of the average monthly wage.
(c) If married with two children at the time of the criminal act,
thirty-eight percent of the average monthly wage.
(d) If married with three children at the time of the criminal act,
forty-one percent of the average monthly wage.
(e) If married with four children at the time of the criminal act,
forty-four percent of the average monthly wage.
(f) If married with five or more children at the time of the
criminal act, forty-seven percent of the average monthly wage.
(g) If unmarried at the time of the criminal act, twenty-five
percent of the average monthly wage.
(h) If unmarried with one child at the time of the criminal act,
thirty percent of the average monthly wage.
(i) If unmarried with two children at the time of the criminal act,
thirty-four percent of the average monthly wage.
(j) If unmarried with three children at the time of the criminal
act, thirty-seven percent of the average monthly wage.
(k) If unmarried with four children at the time of the criminal
act, forty percent of the average monthly wage.
(l) If unmarried with five or more children at the time of the
criminal act, forty-three percent of the average monthly wage.
(6) The benefits established in RCW 51.32.080 for permanent partial
disability shall be the benefits obtainable under this chapter, and
provisions relating to payment contained in that section equally apply
under this chapter, but shall not exceed seven thousand dollars per
claim.
(7) The benefits established in RCW 51.32.090 for temporary total
disability shall be the benefits obtainable under this chapter, and
provisions relating to payment contained in that section apply under
this chapter: PROVIDED, That no person is eligible for temporary total
disability benefits under this chapter if such person was not gainfully
employed at the time of the criminal act((, and was not so employed for
at least three consecutive months of the twelve months immediately
preceding the criminal act)).
(8) The benefits established in RCW 51.32.095 for continuation of
benefits during vocational rehabilitation shall be benefits obtainable
under this chapter, and provisions relating to payment contained in
that section apply under this chapter: PROVIDED, That benefits shall
not exceed five thousand dollars for any single injury.
(9) The provisions for lump sum payment of benefits upon death or
permanent total disability as contained in RCW 51.32.130 apply under
this chapter.
(10) The provisions relating to payment of benefits to, for or on
behalf of workers contained in RCW 51.32.040, 51.32.055, 51.32.100,
51.32.110, 51.32.120, 51.32.135, 51.32.140, 51.32.150, 51.32.160, and
51.32.210 are applicable to payment of benefits to, for or on behalf of
victims under this chapter.
(11) No person or spouse, child, or dependent of such person is
entitled to benefits under this chapter where the person making a claim
for such benefits has refused to give reasonable cooperation to state
or local law enforcement agencies in their efforts to apprehend and
convict the perpetrator(s) of the criminal act which gave rise to the
claim.
(12) In addition to other benefits provided under this chapter,
victims of sexual assault are entitled to receive appropriate
counseling. Fees for such counseling shall be determined by the
department in accordance with RCW 51.04.030, subject to the limitations
of RCW 7.68.080. Counseling services may include, if determined
appropriate by the department, counseling of members of the victim's
immediate family, other than the perpetrator of the assault.
(13) ((Except for medical benefits authorized under RCW 7.68.080,
no more than thirty thousand dollars shall be granted as a result of a
single injury or death, except that benefits granted as the result of
total permanent disability or death shall not exceed forty thousand
dollars.
(14))) Notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter and Title
51 RCW, benefits payable for total temporary disability under
subsection (7) of this section, shall be limited to fifteen thousand
dollars.
(((15))) (14) Any person who is responsible for the victim's
injuries, or who would otherwise be unjustly enriched as a result of
the victim's injuries, shall not be a beneficiary under this chapter.
(((16))) (15) Crime victims' compensation is not available to pay
for services covered under chapter 74.09 RCW or Title XIX of the
federal social security act, except to the extent that the costs for
such services exceed service limits established by the department of
social and health services or, during the 1993-95 fiscal biennium, to
the extent necessary to provide matching funds for federal medicaid
reimbursement.
(((17))) (16) In addition to other benefits provided under this
chapter, immediate family members of a homicide victim may receive
appropriate counseling to assist in dealing with the immediate, near-term consequences of the related effects of the homicide. Fees for
counseling shall be determined by the department in accordance with RCW
51.04.030, subject to the limitations of RCW 7.68.080. Payment of
counseling benefits under this section may not be provided to the
perpetrator of the homicide. The benefits under this subsection may be
provided only with respect to homicides committed on or after July 1,
1992.
(((18))) (17) A dependent mother, father, stepmother, or
stepfather, as defined in RCW 51.08.050, who is a survivor of her or
his child's homicide, who has been requested by a law enforcement
agency or a prosecutor to assist in the judicial proceedings related to
the death of the victim, and who is not domiciled in Washington state
at the time of the request, may receive a lump-sum payment upon arrival
in this state. Total benefits under this subsection may not exceed
seven thousand five hundred dollars. If more than one dependent parent
is eligible for this benefit, the lump-sum payment of seven thousand
five hundred dollars shall be divided equally among the dependent
parents.
(((19))) (18) A victim whose crime occurred in another state who
qualifies for benefits under RCW 7.68.060(4) may receive appropriate
mental health counseling to address distress arising from participation
in the civil commitment proceedings. Fees for counseling shall be
determined by the department in accordance with RCW 51.04.030, subject
to the limitations of RCW 7.68.080.
(19) A victim convicted of a felony within five years preceding the
criminal act for which they are applying, or if convicted of a felony
after applying, is not eligible for benefits under this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 7.68.085 (Cap on medical benefits--Alternative programs) and 2009 c 479 s 9, 1990 c 3 s 504, & 1989 1st
ex.s. c 5 s 3 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
April 1, 2010.

--- END ---