BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 7.68.015 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 5 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
The department of ((labor and industries)) social and health
services shall operate the crime victims' compensation program within
the appropriations and the conditions and limitations on the
appropriations provided for this program.

Sec. 2 RCW 7.68.020 and 2006 c 268 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following words and phrases as used in this chapter have the
meanings set forth in this section unless the context otherwise
requires.
(1) "Department" means the department of ((labor and industries))
social and health services for the purposes of applying Title 51 RCW as
provided in this chapter.
(2) "Criminal act" means an act committed or attempted in this
state which is: (a) Punishable as a federal offense that is comparable
to a felony or gross misdemeanor in this state; (b) punishable as a
felony or gross misdemeanor under the laws of this state; (c) an act
committed outside the state of Washington against a resident of the
state of Washington which would be compensable had it occurred inside
this state and the crime occurred in a state which does not have a
crime victims compensation program, for which the victim is eligible as
set forth in the Washington compensation law; or (d) an act of
terrorism as defined in 18 U.S.C. Sec. 2331, as it exists on May 2,
1997, committed outside of the United States against a resident of the
state of Washington, except as follows:
(i) The operation of a motor vehicle, motorcycle, train, boat, or
aircraft in violation of law does not constitute a "criminal act"
unless:
(A) The injury or death was intentionally inflicted;
(B) The operation thereof was part of the commission of another
non-vehicular criminal act as defined in this section;
(C) The death or injury was the result of the operation of a motor
vehicle after July 24, 1983, and a preponderance of the evidence
establishes that the death was the result of vehicular homicide under
RCW 46.61.520, or a conviction of vehicular assault under RCW
46.61.522, has been obtained: PROVIDED, That in cases where a probable
criminal defendant has died in perpetration of vehicular assault or, in
cases where the perpetrator of the vehicular assault is unascertainable
because he or she left the scene of the accident in violation of RCW
46.52.020 or, because of physical or mental infirmity or disability the
perpetrator is incapable of standing trial for vehicular assault, the
department may, by a preponderance of the evidence, establish that a
vehicular assault had been committed and authorize benefits;
(D) The injury or death was caused by a driver in violation of RCW
46.61.502; or
(E) The injury or death was caused by a driver in violation of RCW
46.61.655(7)(a), failure to secure a load in the first degree;
(ii) Neither an acquittal in a criminal prosecution nor the absence
of any such prosecution is admissible in any claim or proceeding under
this chapter as evidence of the noncriminal character of the acts
giving rise to such claim or proceeding, except as provided for in
(d)(i)(C) of this subsection;
(iii) Evidence of a criminal conviction arising from acts which are
the basis for a claim or proceeding under this chapter is admissible in
such claim or proceeding for the limited purpose of proving the
criminal character of the acts; and
(iv) Acts which, but for the insanity or mental irresponsibility of
the perpetrator, would constitute criminal conduct are deemed to be
criminal conduct within the meaning of this chapter.
(3) "Director" means the secretary of the department of social and
health services for the purposes of applying Title 51 RCW as provided
in this chapter.
(4) "Victim" means a person who suffers bodily injury or death as
a proximate result of a criminal act of another person, the victim's
own good faith and reasonable effort to prevent a criminal act, or his
or her good faith effort to apprehend a person reasonably suspected of
engaging in a criminal act. For the purposes of receiving benefits
pursuant to this chapter, "victim" is interchangeable with "employee"
or "worker" as defined in chapter 51.08 RCW as now or hereafter
amended.
(((4))) (5) "Child," "accredited school," "dependent,"
"beneficiary," "average monthly wage," (("director,")) "injury,"
"invalid," "permanent partial disability," and "permanent total
disability" have the meanings assigned to them in chapter 51.08 RCW as
now or hereafter amended.
(((5))) (6) "Gainfully employed" means engaging on a regular and
continuous basis in a lawful activity from which a person derives a
livelihood.
(((6))) (7) "Private insurance" means any source of recompense
provided by contract available as a result of the claimed injury or
death at the time of such injury or death, or which becomes available
any time thereafter.
(((7))) (8) "Public insurance" means any source of recompense
provided by statute, state or federal, available as a result of the
claimed injury or death at the time of such injury or death, or which
becomes available any time thereafter.

Sec. 3 RCW 7.68.030 and 2009 c 479 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be the duty of the director to establish and administer a
program of benefits to innocent victims of criminal acts within the
terms and limitations of this chapter. In so doing, the director
shall, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, adopt rules and
regulations necessary to the administration of this chapter, and the
provisions contained in chapter 51.04 RCW, including but not limited to
RCW 51.04.020, 51.04.030, 51.04.040, 51.04.050 and 51.04.100 as now or
hereafter amended, shall apply where appropriate in keeping with the
intent of this chapter. The director may apply for and, subject to
appropriation, expend federal funds under Public Law 98-473 and any
other federal program providing financial assistance to state crime
victim compensation programs. The federal funds shall be deposited in
the state general fund and may be expended only for purposes authorized
by applicable federal law.
The department shall use the applicable crime victims' rules
adopted by the department of labor and industries, until such time as
the department adopts its own rules.

Sec. 4 RCW 7.68.035 and 2009 c 479 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) When any person is found guilty in any superior court of
having committed a crime, except as provided in subsection (2) of this
section, there shall be imposed by the court upon such convicted person
a penalty assessment. The assessment shall be in addition to any other
penalty or fine imposed by law and shall be five hundred dollars for
each case or cause of action that includes one or more convictions of
a felony or gross misdemeanor and two hundred fifty dollars for any
case or cause of action that includes convictions of only one or more
misdemeanors.
(b) When any juvenile is adjudicated of any offense in any juvenile
offense disposition under Title 13 RCW, except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section, there shall be imposed upon the
juvenile offender a penalty assessment. The assessment shall be in
addition to any other penalty or fine imposed by law and shall be one
hundred dollars for each case or cause of action that includes one or
more adjudications for a felony or gross misdemeanor and seventy-five
dollars for each case or cause of action that includes adjudications of
only one or more misdemeanors.
(2) The assessment imposed by subsection (1) of this section shall
not apply to motor vehicle crimes defined in Title 46 RCW except those
defined in the following sections: RCW 46.61.520, 46.61.522,
46.61.024, 46.52.090, 46.70.140, 46.61.502, 46.61.504, 46.52.101,
46.20.410, 46.52.020, 46.10.130, 46.09.130, 46.61.5249, 46.61.525,
46.61.685, 46.61.530, 46.61.500, 46.61.015, 46.52.010, 46.44.180,
46.10.090(2), and 46.09.120(2).
(3) When any person accused of having committed a crime posts bail
in superior court pursuant to the provisions of chapter 10.19 RCW and
such bail is forfeited, there shall be deducted from the proceeds of
such forfeited bail a penalty assessment, in addition to any other
penalty or fine imposed by law, equal to the assessment which would be
applicable under subsection (1) of this section if the person had been
convicted of the crime.
(4) Such penalty assessments shall be paid by the clerk of the
superior court to the county treasurer who shall monthly transmit the
money as provided in RCW 10.82.070. Each county shall deposit fifty
percent of the money it receives per case or cause of action under
subsection (1) of this section and retains under RCW 10.82.070, not
less than one and seventy-five one-hundredths percent of the remaining
money it retains under RCW 10.82.070 and the money it retains under
chapter 3.62 RCW, and all money it receives under subsection (7) of
this section into a fund maintained exclusively for the support of
comprehensive programs to encourage and facilitate testimony by the
victims of crimes and witnesses to crimes. A program shall be
considered "comprehensive" only after approval of the department upon
application by the county prosecuting attorney. The department shall
approve as comprehensive only programs which:
(a) Provide comprehensive services to victims and witnesses of all
types of crime with particular emphasis on serious crimes against
persons and property. It is the intent of the legislature to make
funds available only to programs which do not restrict services to
victims or witnesses of a particular type or types of crime and that
such funds supplement, not supplant, existing local funding levels;
(b) Are administered by the county prosecuting attorney either
directly through the prosecuting attorney's office or by contract
between the county and agencies providing services to victims of crime;
(c) Make a reasonable effort to inform the known victim or his
surviving dependents of the existence of this chapter and the procedure
for making application for benefits;
(d) Assist victims in the restitution and adjudication process; and
(e) Assist victims of violent crimes in the preparation and
presentation of their claims to the department ((of labor and
industries)) under this chapter.
Before a program in any county west of the Cascade mountains is
submitted to the department for approval, it shall be submitted for
review and comment to each city within the county with a population of
more than one hundred fifty thousand. The department will consider if
the county's proposed comprehensive plan meets the needs of crime
victims in cases adjudicated in municipal, district or superior courts
and of crime victims located within the city and county.
(5) Upon submission to the department of a letter of intent to
adopt a comprehensive program, the prosecuting attorney shall retain
the money deposited by the county under subsection (4) of this section
until such time as the county prosecuting attorney has obtained
approval of a program from the department. Approval of the
comprehensive plan by the department must be obtained within one year
of the date of the letter of intent to adopt a comprehensive program.
The county prosecuting attorney shall not make any expenditures from
the money deposited under subsection (4) of this section until approval
of a comprehensive plan by the department. If a county prosecuting
attorney has failed to obtain approval of a program from the department
under subsection (4) of this section or failed to obtain approval of a
comprehensive program within one year after submission of a letter of
intent under this section, the county treasurer shall monthly transmit
one hundred percent of the money deposited by the county under
subsection (4) of this section to the state treasurer for deposit in
the state general fund.
(6) County prosecuting attorneys are responsible to make every
reasonable effort to insure that the penalty assessments of this
chapter are imposed and collected.
(7) Every city and town shall transmit monthly one and seventy-five
one-hundredths percent of all money, other than money received for
parking infractions, retained under RCW 3.50.100 and 35.20.220 to the
county treasurer for deposit as provided in subsection (4) of this
section.

Sec. 5 RCW 7.68.085 and 2009 c 479 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director ((of labor and industries)) shall institute a cap on
medical benefits of one hundred fifty thousand dollars per injury or
death. Payment for medical services in excess of the cap shall be made
available to any innocent victim under the same conditions as other
medical services and if the medical services are:
(1) Necessary for a previously accepted condition;
(2) Necessary to protect the victim's life or prevent deterioration
of the victim's previously accepted condition; and
(3) Not available from an alternative source.
For the purposes of this section, an individual will not be
required to use his or her assets other than funds recovered as a
result of a civil action or criminal restitution, for medical expenses
or pain and suffering, in order to qualify for an alternative source of
payment.
The director shall((, in cooperation with the department of social
and health services,)) establish ((by October 1, 1989,)) a process to
aid crime victims in identifying and applying for appropriate
alternative benefit programs, if any, administered by the department of
social and health services.

Sec. 6 RCW 7.68.145 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 176 s 7 are each amended
to read as follows:
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all law enforcement,
criminal justice, or other governmental agencies, or hospital; any
physician or other practitioner of the healing arts; or any other
organization or person having possession or control of any
investigative or other information pertaining to any alleged criminal
act or victim concerning which a claim for benefits has been filed
under this chapter, shall, upon request, make available to and allow
the reproduction of any such information by the section of the
department administering this chapter or other public employees in
their performance of their official duties under this chapter.
No person or organization, public or private, shall incur any legal
liability by reason of releasing any such information to the director
((of labor and industries)) or the section of the department which
administers this chapter or other public employees in the performance
of their official duties under this chapter.

Sec. 7 RCW 9.95.210 and 2005 c 362 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In granting probation, the superior court may suspend the
imposition or the execution of the sentence and may direct that the
suspension may continue upon such conditions and for such time as it
shall designate, not exceeding the maximum term of sentence or two
years, whichever is longer.
(2) In the order granting probation and as a condition thereof, the
superior court may in its discretion imprison the defendant in the
county jail for a period not exceeding one year and may fine the
defendant any sum not exceeding the statutory limit for the offense
committed, and court costs. As a condition of probation, the superior
court shall require the payment of the penalty assessment required by
RCW 7.68.035. The superior court may also require the defendant to
make such monetary payments, on such terms as it deems appropriate
under the circumstances, as are necessary: (a) To comply with any
order of the court for the payment of family support; (b) to make
restitution to any person or persons who may have suffered loss or
damage by reason of the commission of the crime in question or when the
offender pleads guilty to a lesser offense or fewer offenses and agrees
with the prosecutor's recommendation that the offender be required to
pay restitution to a victim of an offense or offenses which are not
prosecuted pursuant to a plea agreement; (c) to pay such fine as may be
imposed and court costs, including reimbursement of the state for costs
of extradition if return to this state by extradition was required; (d)
following consideration of the financial condition of the person
subject to possible electronic monitoring, to pay for the costs of
electronic monitoring if that monitoring was required by the court as
a condition of release from custody or as a condition of probation; (e)
to contribute to a county or interlocal drug fund; and (f) to make
restitution to a public agency for the costs of an emergency response
under RCW 38.52.430, and may require bonds for the faithful observance
of any and all conditions imposed in the probation.
(3) The superior court shall order restitution in all cases where
the victim is entitled to benefits under the crime victims'
compensation act, chapter 7.68 RCW. If the superior court does not
order restitution and the victim of the crime has been determined to be
entitled to benefits under the crime victims' compensation act, the
department of ((labor and industries)) social and health services, as
administrator of the crime victims' compensation program, may petition
the superior court within one year of imposition of the sentence for
entry of a restitution order. Upon receipt of a petition from the
department of ((labor and industries)) social and health services, the
superior court shall hold a restitution hearing and shall enter a
restitution order.
(4) In granting probation, the superior court may order the
probationer to report to the secretary of corrections or such officer
as the secretary may designate and as a condition of the probation to
follow the instructions of the secretary. If the county legislative
authority has elected to assume responsibility for the supervision of
superior court misdemeanant probationers within its jurisdiction, the
superior court misdemeanant probationer shall report to a probation
officer employed or contracted for by the county. In cases where a
superior court misdemeanant probationer is sentenced in one county, but
resides within another county, there must be provisions for the
probationer to report to the agency having supervision responsibility
for the probationer's county of residence.
(5) If the probationer has been ordered to make restitution and the
superior court has ordered supervision, the officer supervising the
probationer shall make a reasonable effort to ascertain whether
restitution has been made. If the superior court has ordered
supervision and restitution has not been made as ordered, the officer
shall inform the prosecutor of that violation of the terms of probation
not less than three months prior to the termination of the probation
period. The secretary of corrections will promulgate rules and
regulations for the conduct of the person during the term of probation.
For defendants found guilty in district court, like functions as the
secretary performs in regard to probation may be performed by probation
officers employed for that purpose by the county legislative authority
of the county wherein the court is located.
(6) The provisions of RCW 9.94A.501 apply to sentences imposed
under this section.

Sec. 8 RCW 72.09.095 and 1995 c 234 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each year the department shall transfer twenty-five percent of the
total annual revenues and receipts received in each institutional
betterment fund subaccount to the department of ((labor and
industries)) social and health services for the purpose of providing
direct benefits to crime victims through the crime victims'
compensation program as outlined in chapter 7.68 RCW. This transfer
takes priority over any expenditure of betterment funds and shall be
reflected on the monthly financial statements of each institution's
betterment fund subaccount.
Any funds so transferred to the department of ((labor and
industries)) social and health services shall be in addition to the
crime victims' compensation amount provided in an omnibus appropriation
bill. It is the intent of the legislature that the funds forecasted or
transferred pursuant to this section shall not reduce the funding
levels provided by appropriation.

Sec. 9 RCW 74.08A.010 and 2004 c 54 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A family that includes an adult who has received temporary
assistance for needy families for sixty months after July 27, 1997,
shall be ineligible for further temporary assistance for needy families
assistance.
(2) For the purposes of applying the rules of this section, the
department shall count any month in which an adult family member
received a temporary assistance for needy families cash assistance
grant unless the assistance was provided when the family member was a
minor child and not the head of the household or married to the head of
the household.
(3) The department shall refer recipients who require specialized
assistance to appropriate department programs, crime victims' programs
through the department of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce, or the crime victims' compensation program of
the department of ((labor and industries)) social and health services.
(4) The department may exempt a recipient and the recipient's
family from the application of subsection (1) of this section by reason
of hardship or if the recipient meets the family violence options of
section 402(A)(7) of Title IVA of the federal social security act as
amended by P.L. 104-193. The number of recipients and their families
exempted from subsection (1) of this section for a fiscal year shall
not exceed twenty percent of the average monthly number of recipients
and their families to which assistance is provided under the temporary
assistance for needy families program.
(5) The department shall not exempt a recipient and his or her
family from the application of subsection (1) of this section until
after the recipient has received fifty-two months of assistance under
this chapter.
(6) Beginning on October 31, 2005, the department shall provide
transitional food stamp assistance for a period of five months to a
household that ceases to receive temporary assistance for needy
families assistance and is not in sanction status. If necessary, the
department shall extend the household's food stamp certification until
the end of the transition period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 7.68 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All powers, duties, and functions of the department of labor
and industries pertaining to the crime victims' compensation program
are transferred to the department. All references to the director of
the department of labor and industries in the Revised Code of
Washington in context of the functions transferred in this section mean
the secretary of the department of social and health services. All
references to the supervisor of industrial insurance in the Revised
Code of Washington in the context of the functions transferred in this
section mean the head of the crime victims' compensation program within
the department of social and health services.
(2)(a) All:
(i) Reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or
written material in the possession of the department of labor and
industries pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred
in subsection (1) of this section shall be delivered to the custody of
the department;
(ii) Cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and
other tangible property employed by the department of labor and
industries in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be made available to the department;
(iii) Funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with the
powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be assigned to the
department.
(b) Any appropriations made to the department of labor and
industries for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall, on the effective date of this section, be
transferred and credited to the department to carry out the
responsibilities of the crime victims' compensation program.
(c) When a question arises as to the transfer of any funds, books,
documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible
property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance
of the duties and functions transferred, the director of the office of
financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and shall certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All rules and all pending business before the department of
labor and industries pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties
transferred in subsection (1) of this section shall be continued and
acted upon by the department. All existing contracts and obligations
shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the department.
(4) The transfer by this section of the powers, duties, and
functions of the department of labor and industries shall not affect
the validity of any act performed before the effective date of this
section.
(5) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of the office of
financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies
affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these
shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and
appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the
certification.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---