BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.14.450 and 2009 c 551 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A county legislative authority may ((submit an authorizing
proposition to the county voters at a primary or general election and,
if the proposition is approved by a majority of persons voting,))
authorize, fix, and impose a sales and use tax ((in accordance with the
terms of this chapter)) until December 31, 2014. To retain or impose
the tax after December 31, 2014, the county must submit an authorizing
proposition to the county voters at a primary or general election and
a majority of persons voting must approve the continuation or
imposition of the sales and use tax. The title of each ballot measure
must clearly state the purposes for which the proposed sales and use
tax will be used. ((Funds raised under this tax shall not supplant
existing funds used for these purposes, except as follows: Up to one
hundred percent may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar
year 2010; up to eighty percent may be used to supplant existing
funding in calendar year 2011; up to sixty percent may be used to
supplant existing funding in calendar year 2012; up to forty percent
may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar year 2013; and up
to twenty percent may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar
year 2014. For purposes of this subsection, existing funds means the
actual operating expenditures for the calendar year in which the ballot
measure is approved by voters. Actual operating expenditures excludes
lost federal funds, lost or expired state grants or loans,
extraordinary events not likely to reoccur, changes in contract
provisions beyond the control of the county or city receiving the
services, and major nonrecurring capital expenditures.)) The tax must
be imposed in accordance with this chapter and the rate of tax under
this section may not exceed three-tenths of one percent of the selling
price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the
case of a use tax.
(2) The tax authorized in this section is in addition to any other
taxes authorized by law and must be collected from those persons who
are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within the county.
(3) The retail sale or use of motor vehicles, and the lease of
motor vehicles for up to the first thirty-six months of the lease, are
exempt from tax imposed under this section.
(4) One-third of all money received under this section must be used
solely for criminal justice purposes, fire protection purposes, or
both. For the purposes of this subsection, "criminal justice purposes"
has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.14.340.
(5) Money received under this section must be shared between the
county and the cities as follows: Sixty percent must be retained by
the county and forty percent must be distributed on a per capita basis
to cities in the county.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.14.450 and 2007 c 380 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A county legislative authority may ((submit an authorizing
proposition to the county voters at a primary or general election and,
if the proposition is approved by a majority of persons voting,))
authorize, fix, and impose a sales and use tax ((in accordance with the
terms of this chapter)) until December 31, 2014. To retain or impose
the tax after December 31, 2014, the county must submit an authorizing
proposition to the county voters at a primary or general election and
a majority of persons voting must approve the continuation or
imposition of the sales and use tax. The title of each ballot measure
must clearly state the purposes for which the proposed sales and use
tax will be used. ((Funds raised under this tax shall not supplant
existing funds used for these purposes. For purposes of this
subsection, existing funds means the actual operating expenditures for
the calendar year in which the ballot measure is approved by voters.
Actual operating expenditures excludes lost federal funds, lost or
expired state grants or loans, extraordinary events not likely to
reoccur, changes in contract provisions beyond the control of the
county or city receiving the services, and major nonrecurring capital
expenditures.)) The tax must be imposed in accordance with this
chapter and the rate of tax under this section shall not exceed three-tenths of one percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax,
or value of the article used, in the case of a use tax.
(2) The tax authorized in this section is in addition to any other
taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons who
are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within the county.
(3) The retail sale or use of motor vehicles, and the lease of
motor vehicles for up to the first thirty-six months of the lease, are
exempt from tax imposed under this section.
(4) One-third of all money received under this section shall be
used solely for criminal justice purposes. For the purposes of this
subsection, "criminal justice purposes" means additional police
protection, mitigation of congested court systems, or relief of
overcrowded jails or other local correctional facilities.
(5) Money received under this section shall be shared between the
county and the cities as follows: Sixty percent shall be retained by
the county and forty percent shall be distributed on a per capita basis
to cities in the county.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.14.460 and 2009 c 551 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A county legislative authority may authorize, fix, and impose
a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter.
(2) The tax authorized in this section shall be in addition to any
other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons
who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon
the occurrence of any taxable event within the county. The rate of tax
shall equal one-tenth of one percent of the selling price in the case
of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of a use tax.
(3) Moneys collected under this section shall be used solely for
the purpose of providing for the operation or delivery of chemical
dependency or mental health treatment programs and services and for the
operation or delivery of therapeutic court programs and services. For
the purposes of this section, "programs and services" includes, but is
not limited to, treatment services, case management, and housing that
are a component of a coordinated chemical dependency or mental health
treatment program or service.
(4) All moneys collected under this section must be used solely for
the purpose of providing new or expanded programs and services as
provided in this section, except ((a portion of)) the moneys collected
under this section may be used to supplant existing funding for these
purposes in any county ((as follows: Up to fifty percent may be used
to supplant existing funding in calendar year 2010; up to forty percent
may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar year 2011; up to
thirty percent may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar
year 2012; up to twenty percent may be used to supplant existing
funding in calendar year 2013; and up to ten percent may be used to
supplant existing funding in)) through calendar year 2014. For the
purposes of this subsection, "existing funds" means the actual
operating expenditures for the calendar year in which the tax was first
imposed.
(5) Nothing in this section may be interpreted to prohibit the use
of moneys collected under this section for the replacement of lapsed
federal funding previously provided for the operation or delivery of
services and programs as provided in this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.14.460 and 2008 c 157 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A county legislative authority may authorize, fix, and impose
a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter.
(2) The tax authorized in this section shall be in addition to any
other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons
who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon
the occurrence of any taxable event within the county. The rate of tax
shall equal one-tenth of one percent of the selling price in the case
of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of a use tax.
(3) Moneys collected under this section shall be used solely for
the purpose of providing for the operation or delivery of new or
expanded chemical dependency or mental health treatment programs and
services and for the operation or delivery of new or expanded
therapeutic court programs and services. For the purposes of this
section, "programs and services" includes, but is not limited to,
treatment services, case management, and housing that are a component
of a coordinated chemical dependency or mental health treatment program
or service.
(4) Moneys collected under this section ((shall not)) may be used
to supplant existing funding for these purposes((, provided that
nothing in this section shall be interpreted to prohibit the use of
moneys collected under this section for the replacement of lapsed
federal funding previously provided for the operation or delivery of
services and programs as provided in this section)) through calendar
year 2014. For the purposes of this subsection, "existing funds" means
the actual operating expenditures for the calendar year in which the
tax was first imposed.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.14.340 and 1995 c 309 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of any county may fix and impose a
sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter,
provided that such sales and use tax is subject to repeal by
referendum, using the procedures provided in RCW 82.14.036. The
referendum procedure provided in RCW 82.14.036 is the exclusive method
for subjecting any county sales and use tax ordinance or resolution to
a referendum vote.
(2) The tax authorized in this section shall be in addition to any
other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons
who are taxable by the state pursuant to chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW
upon the occurrence of any taxable event within such county. The rate
of tax shall equal one-tenth of one percent of the selling price (in
the case of a sales tax) or value of the article used (in the case of
a use tax).
(3) When distributing moneys collected under this section, the
state treasurer shall distribute ten percent of the moneys to the
county in which the tax was collected. The remainder of the moneys
collected under this section shall be distributed to the county and the
cities within the county ratably based on population as last determined
by the office of financial management. In making the distribution
based on population, the county shall receive that proportion that the
unincorporated population of the county bears to the total population
of the county and each city shall receive that proportion that the city
incorporated population bears to the total county population.
(4) Moneys received from any tax imposed under this section shall
be expended exclusively for criminal justice purposes ((and shall not
be used to replace or supplant existing funding)). Criminal justice
purposes are defined as activities that substantially assist the
criminal justice system, which may include circumstances where
ancillary benefit to the civil justice system occurs, and which
includes domestic violence services such as those provided by domestic
violence programs, community advocates, and legal advocates, as defined
in RCW 70.123.020. ((Existing funding for purposes of this subsection
is defined as calendar year 1989 actual operating expenditures for
criminal justice purposes. Calendar year 1989 actual operating
expenditures for criminal justice purposes exclude the following:
Expenditures for extraordinary events not likely to reoccur, changes in
contract provisions for criminal justice services, beyond the control
of the local jurisdiction receiving the services, and major
nonrecurring capital expenditures.))
(5) In the expenditure of funds for criminal justice purposes as
provided in this section, cities and counties, or any combination
thereof, are expressly authorized to participate in agreements,
pursuant to chapter 39.34 RCW, to jointly expend funds for criminal
justice purposes of mutual benefit. Such criminal justice purposes of
mutual benefit include, but are not limited to, the construction,
improvement, and expansion of jails, court facilities, and juvenile
justice facilities.

--- END ---