BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.27.070 and 1995 c 399 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is hereby established a state building code council, to be
appointed by the governor.
(1) The state building code council shall consist of fifteen
members((,)):
(a) Two ((of whom shall)) members must be county elected
legislative body members or elected executives ((and));
(b) Two ((of whom shall)) members must be city elected legislative
body members or mayors((.));
(c) One ((of the members shall)) member must be a local government
building code enforcement official ((and));
(d) One ((of the members shall)) member must be a local government
fire service official((. Of the remaining nine members,));
(e) One member shall represent general construction, specializing
in commercial and industrial building construction;
(f) One member shall represent general construction, specializing
in residential and multifamily building construction;
(g) One member shall represent the architectural design profession;
(h) One member shall represent the structural engineering
profession;
(i) One member shall represent the mechanical engineering
profession;
(j) One member shall represent the construction building trades;
(k) One member shall represent manufacturers, installers, or
suppliers of building materials and components;
(l) One member ((shall)) must be a person with a physical
disability and shall represent the disability community; and
(m) One member shall represent the general public.
(2) At least six of these fifteen members shall reside east of the
crest of the Cascade mountains.
(3) The council shall include: Two members of the house of
representatives appointed by the speaker of the house, one from each
caucus; two members of the senate appointed by the president of the
senate, one from each caucus; and an employee of the electrical
division of the department of labor and industries, as ex officio,
nonvoting members with all other privileges and rights of membership.
(4)(a) Terms of office shall be for three years, or for so long as
the member remains qualified for the appointment.
(b) The council shall elect a member to serve as chair of the
council for one-year terms of office.
(c) Any member who is appointed by virtue of being an elected
official or holding public employment shall be removed from the council
if he or she ceases being such an elected official or holding such
public employment.
(d) Any member who is appointed to represent a specific private
sector industry must maintain sufficiently similar employment or
circumstances throughout the term of office to remain qualified to
represent the specified industry. Retirement or unemployment is not
cause for termination. However, if a councilmember enters into
employment outside of the industry he or she has been appointed to
represent, then he or she shall be removed from the council. If after
thirty days from the date of the new employment, the member remains on
the council, any vote taken by the council is null and void.
(5) Before making any appointments to the building code council,
the governor shall seek nominations from recognized organizations which
represent the entities or interests ((listed)) identified in this
((subsection)) section. ((Members serving on the council on July 28,
1985, may complete their terms of office. Any vacancy shall be filled
by alternating appointments from governmental and nongovernmental
entities or interests until the council is constituted as required by
this subsection.
(2))) (6) Members shall not be compensated but shall receive
reimbursement for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.
(((3))) (7) The department of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce shall provide administrative and clerical
assistance to the building code council.

--- END ---