BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART ONE
INTENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 The legislature intends to improve the
lives of persons who suffer from the adverse effects of domestic
violence and to require reasonable, coordinated measures to prevent
domestic violence from occurring. The legislature intends to give law
enforcement and the courts better tools to identify violent
perpetrators of domestic violence and hold them accountable. The
legislature intends to: Increase the safety afforded to individuals
who seek protection of public and private agencies involved in domestic
violence prevention; improve the ability of agencies to address the
needs of victims and their children and the delivery of services;
upgrade the quality of treatment programs; and enhance the ability of
the justice system to respond quickly and fairly to domestic violence.
In order to improve the lives of persons who have, or may suffer, the
effects of domestic violence the legislature intends to achieve more
uniformity in the decision-making processes at public and private
agencies that address domestic violence by reducing inconsistencies and
duplications allowing domestic violence victims to achieve safety and
stability in their lives.

PART TWO
LAW ENFORCEMENT/ARREST PROVISIONS
Sec. 201 RCW 10.31.100 and 2006 c 138 s 23 are each amended to
read as follows:
A police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has
committed or is committing a felony shall have the authority to arrest
the person without a warrant. A police officer may arrest a person
without a warrant for committing a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor
only when the offense is committed in the presence of the officer,
except as provided in subsections (1) through (10) of this section.
(1) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has committed or is committing a misdemeanor or gross
misdemeanor, involving physical harm or threats of harm to any person
or property or the unlawful taking of property or involving the use or
possession of cannabis, or involving the acquisition, possession, or
consumption of alcohol by a person under the age of twenty-one years
under RCW 66.44.270, or involving criminal trespass under RCW 9A.52.070
or 9A.52.080, shall have the authority to arrest the person.
(2) A police officer shall arrest and take into custody, pending
release on bail, personal recognizance, or court order, a person
without a warrant when the officer has probable cause to believe that:
(a) An order has been issued of which the person has knowledge
under RCW 26.44.063, or chapter 7.90, 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, 26.26,
26.50, or 74.34 RCW restraining the person and the person has violated
the terms of the order restraining the person from acts or threats of
violence, or restraining the person from going onto the grounds of or
entering a residence, workplace, school, or day care, or prohibiting
the person from knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within,
a specified distance of a location or, in the case of an order issued
under RCW 26.44.063, imposing any other restrictions or conditions upon
the person; or
(b) A foreign protection order, as defined in RCW 26.52.010, has
been issued of which the person under restraint has knowledge and the
person under restraint has violated a provision of the foreign
protection order prohibiting the person under restraint from contacting
or communicating with another person, or excluding the person under
restraint from a residence, workplace, school, or day care, or
prohibiting the person from knowingly coming within, or knowingly
remaining within, a specified distance of a location, or a violation of
any provision for which the foreign protection order specifically
indicates that a violation will be a crime; or
(c) The person is sixteen years or older and within the preceding
four hours has assaulted a family or household member as defined in RCW
10.99.020 and the officer believes: (i) A felonious assault has
occurred; (ii) an assault has occurred which has resulted in bodily
injury to the victim, whether the injury is observable by the
responding officer or not; or (iii) that any physical action has
occurred which was intended to cause another person reasonably to fear
imminent serious bodily injury or death. Bodily injury means physical
pain, illness, or an impairment of physical condition. When the
officer has probable cause to believe that family or household members
have assaulted each other, the officer is not required to arrest both
persons. The officer shall arrest the person whom the officer believes
to be the primary physical aggressor. In making this determination,
the officer shall make every reasonable effort to consider: (i) The
intent to protect victims of domestic violence under RCW 10.99.010;
(ii) the comparative extent of injuries inflicted or serious threats
creating fear of physical injury; and (iii) the history of domestic
violence ((between the)) of each person((s)) involved, including
whether the conduct was part of an ongoing pattern of abuse.
(3) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has committed or is committing a violation of any of the
following traffic laws shall have the authority to arrest the person:
(a) RCW 46.52.010, relating to duty on striking an unattended car
or other property;
(b) RCW 46.52.020, relating to duty in case of injury to or death
of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;
(c) RCW 46.61.500 or 46.61.530, relating to reckless driving or
racing of vehicles;
(d) RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, relating to persons under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;
(e) RCW 46.20.342, relating to driving a motor vehicle while
operator's license is suspended or revoked;
(f) RCW 46.61.5249, relating to operating a motor vehicle in a
negligent manner.
(4) A law enforcement officer investigating at the scene of a motor
vehicle accident may arrest the driver of a motor vehicle involved in
the accident if the officer has probable cause to believe that the
driver has committed in connection with the accident a violation of any
traffic law or regulation.
(5) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has committed or is committing a violation of RCW 79A.60.040
shall have the authority to arrest the person.
(6) An officer may act upon the request of a law enforcement
officer in whose presence a traffic infraction was committed, to stop,
detain, arrest, or issue a notice of traffic infraction to the driver
who is believed to have committed the infraction. The request by the
witnessing officer shall give an officer the authority to take
appropriate action under the laws of the state of Washington.
(7) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has committed or is committing any act of indecent exposure, as
defined in RCW 9A.88.010, may arrest the person.
(8) A police officer may arrest and take into custody, pending
release on bail, personal recognizance, or court order, a person
without a warrant when the officer has probable cause to believe that
an order has been issued of which the person has knowledge under
chapter 10.14 RCW and the person has violated the terms of that order.
(9) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has, within twenty-four hours of the alleged violation,
committed a violation of RCW 9A.50.020 may arrest such person.
(10) A police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person illegally possesses or illegally has possessed a firearm or
other dangerous weapon on private or public elementary or secondary
school premises shall have the authority to arrest the person.
For purposes of this subsection, the term "firearm" has the meaning
defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the term "dangerous weapon" has the meaning
defined in RCW 9.41.250 and 9.41.280(1) (c) through (e).
(11) Except as specifically provided in subsections (2), (3), (4),
and (6) of this section, nothing in this section extends or otherwise
affects the powers of arrest prescribed in Title 46 RCW.
(12) No police officer may be held criminally or civilly liable for
making an arrest pursuant to ((RCW 10.31.100)) subsection (2) or (8) of
this section if the police officer acts in good faith and without
malice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 A new section is added to chapter 36.28A
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) When funded, the Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs shall convene a work group to develop a model policy
regarding the reporting of domestic violence as defined in RCW
10.99.020 to law enforcement in cases where the victim is unable or
unwilling to make a report in the jurisdiction where the alleged crime
occurred.
(b) The model policy must include policies and procedures related
to:
(i) Collecting and securing evidence; and
(ii) Creating interlocal agreements between law enforcement
agencies.
(2) In developing the model policy under subsection (1)(a) of this
section, the association shall consult with appropriate stakeholders
and government agencies.

PART THREE
NO-CONTACT AND PROTECTION ORDERS
Sec. 301 RCW 10.99.045 and 2000 c 119 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A defendant arrested for an offense involving domestic violence
as defined by RCW 10.99.020 shall be required to appear in person
before a magistrate within one judicial day after the arrest.
(2) A defendant who is charged by citation, complaint, or
information with an offense involving domestic violence as defined by
RCW 10.99.020 and not arrested shall appear in court for arraignment in
person as soon as practicable, but in no event later than fourteen days
after the next day on which court is in session following the issuance
of the citation or the filing of the complaint or information.
(3)(a) At the time of the appearances provided in subsection (1) or
(2) of this section, the court shall determine the necessity of
imposing a no-contact order or other conditions of pretrial release
according to the procedures established by court rule for a preliminary
appearance or an arraignment. The court may include in the order any
conditions authorized under RCW 9.41.800 and 10.99.040.
(b) For the purposes of (a) of this subsection, the prosecutor
shall provide for the court's review:
(i) The defendant's criminal history, if any, that occurred in
Washington or any other state;
(ii) If available, the defendant's prior criminal history that
occurred in any tribal jurisdiction; and
(iii) The defendant's individual order history.
(c) For the purposes of (b) of this subsection, criminal history
includes all previous convictions and orders of deferred prosecution,
as reported through the judicial information system or otherwise
available to the court or prosecutor, current to within the period
specified in (d) of this subsection before the date of the appearance.
(d) The periods applicable to previous convictions and orders of
deferred prosecution are:
(i) One working day, in the case of previous actions of courts that
fully participate in the state judicial information system; and
(ii) Seven calendar days, in the case of previous actions of courts
that do not fully participate in the judicial information system. For
the purposes of this subsection, "fully participate" means regularly
providing records to and receiving records from the system by
electronic means on a daily basis.
(4) Appearances required pursuant to this section are mandatory and
cannot be waived.
(5) The no-contact order shall be issued and entered with the
appropriate law enforcement agency pursuant to the procedures outlined
in RCW 10.99.040 (2) and (((4))) (6).

Sec. 302 RCW 26.50.020 and 1992 c 111 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Any person may seek relief under this chapter by filing a
petition with a court alleging that the person has been the victim of
domestic violence committed by the respondent. The person may petition
for relief on behalf of himself or herself and on behalf of minor
family or household members.
(b) Any person thirteen years of age or older may seek relief under
this chapter by filing a petition with a court alleging that he or she
has been the victim of violence in a dating relationship and the
respondent is sixteen years of age or older.
(2)(a) A person under eighteen years of age who is sixteen years of
age or older may seek relief under this chapter and is not required to
seek relief by a guardian or next friend.
(b) A person under sixteen years of age who is seeking relief under
subsection (1)(b) of this section is required to seek relief by a
parent, guardian, guardian ad litem, or next friend.
(3) No guardian or guardian ad litem need be appointed on behalf of
a respondent to an action under this chapter who is under eighteen
years of age if such respondent is sixteen years of age or older.
(4) The court may, if it deems necessary, appoint a guardian ad
litem for a petitioner or respondent who is a party to an action under
this chapter.
(5) The courts defined in RCW 26.50.010(((3))) (4) have
jurisdiction over proceedings under this chapter. The jurisdiction of
district and municipal courts under this chapter shall be limited to
enforcement of RCW 26.50.110(1), or the equivalent municipal ordinance,
and the issuance and enforcement of temporary orders for protection
provided for in RCW 26.50.070 if: (a) A superior court has exercised
or is exercising jurisdiction over a proceeding under this title or
chapter 13.34 RCW involving the parties; (b) the petition for relief
under this chapter presents issues of residential schedule of and
contact with children of the parties; or (c) the petition for relief
under this chapter requests the court to exclude a party from the
dwelling which the parties share. When the jurisdiction of a district
or municipal court is limited to the issuance and enforcement of a
temporary order, the district or municipal court shall set the full
hearing provided for in RCW 26.50.050 in superior court and transfer
the case. If the notice and order are not served on the respondent in
time for the full hearing, the issuing court shall have concurrent
jurisdiction with the superior court to extend the order for
protection.
(6) An action under this chapter shall be filed in the county or
the municipality where the petitioner resides, unless the petitioner
has left the residence or household to avoid abuse. In that case, the
petitioner may bring an action in the county or municipality of the
previous or the new household or residence.
(7) A person's right to petition for relief under this chapter is
not affected by the person leaving the residence or household to avoid
abuse.

Sec. 303 RCW 26.50.060 and 2009 c 439 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon notice and after hearing, the court may provide relief as
follows:
(a) Restrain the respondent from committing acts of domestic
violence;
(b) Exclude the respondent from the dwelling that the parties
share, from the residence, workplace, or school of the petitioner, or
from the day care or school of a child;
(c) Prohibit the respondent from knowingly coming within, or
knowingly remaining within, a specified distance from a specified
location;
(d) On the same basis as is provided in chapter 26.09 RCW, the
court shall make residential provision with regard to minor children of
the parties. However, parenting plans as specified in chapter 26.09
RCW shall not be required under this chapter;
(e) Order the respondent to participate in a domestic violence
perpetrator treatment program approved under RCW 26.50.150;
(f) Order other relief as it deems necessary for the protection of
the petitioner and other family or household members sought to be
protected, including orders or directives to a peace officer, as
allowed under this chapter;
(g) Require the respondent to pay the administrative court costs
and service fees, as established by the county or municipality
incurring the expense and to reimburse the petitioner for costs
incurred in bringing the action, including reasonable attorneys' fees;
(h) Restrain the respondent from having any contact with the victim
of domestic violence or the victim's children or members of the
victim's household;
(i) Restrain the respondent from harassing, following, keeping
under physical or electronic surveillance, cyberstalking as defined in
RCW 9.61.260, and using telephonic, audiovisual, or other electronic
means to monitor the actions, location, or communication of a victim of
domestic violence, the victim's children, or members of the victim's
household. For the purposes of this subsection, "communication"
includes both "wire communication" and "electronic communication" as
defined in RCW 9.73.260;
(j) Require the respondent to submit to electronic monitoring. The
order shall specify who shall provide the electronic monitoring
services and the terms under which the monitoring must be performed.
The order also may include a requirement that the respondent pay the
costs of the monitoring. The court shall consider the ability of the
respondent to pay for electronic monitoring;
(((j))) (k) Consider the provisions of RCW 9.41.800;
(((k))) (l) Order possession and use of essential personal effects.
The court shall list the essential personal effects with sufficient
specificity to make it clear which property is included. Personal
effects may include pets. The court may order that a petitioner be
granted the exclusive custody or control of any pet owned, possessed,
leased, kept, or held by the petitioner, respondent, or minor child
residing with either the petitioner or respondent and may prohibit the
respondent from interfering with the petitioner's efforts to remove the
pet. The court may also prohibit the respondent from knowingly coming
within, or knowingly remaining within, a specified distance of
specified locations where the pet is regularly found; and
(((l))) (m) Order use of a vehicle.
(2) If a protection order restrains the respondent from contacting
the respondent's minor children the restraint shall be for a fixed
period not to exceed one year. This limitation is not applicable to
orders for protection issued under chapter 26.09, 26.10, or 26.26 RCW.
With regard to other relief, if the petitioner has petitioned for
relief on his or her own behalf or on behalf of the petitioner's family
or household members or minor children, and the court finds that the
respondent is likely to resume acts of domestic violence against the
petitioner or the petitioner's family or household members or minor
children when the order expires, the court may either grant relief for
a fixed period or enter a permanent order of protection.
If the petitioner has petitioned for relief on behalf of the
respondent's minor children, the court shall advise the petitioner that
if the petitioner wants to continue protection for a period beyond one
year the petitioner may either petition for renewal pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter or may seek relief pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 26.09 or 26.26 RCW.
(3) If the court grants an order for a fixed time period, the
petitioner may apply for renewal of the order by filing a petition for
renewal at any time within the three months before the order expires.
The petition for renewal shall state the reasons why the petitioner
seeks to renew the protection order. Upon receipt of the petition for
renewal the court shall order a hearing which shall be not later than
fourteen days from the date of the order. Except as provided in RCW
26.50.085, personal service shall be made on the respondent not less
than five days before the hearing. If timely service cannot be made
the court shall set a new hearing date and shall either require
additional attempts at obtaining personal service or permit service by
publication as provided in RCW 26.50.085 or by mail as provided in RCW
26.50.123. If the court permits service by publication or mail, the
court shall set the new hearing date not later than twenty-four days
from the date of the order. If the order expires because timely
service cannot be made the court shall grant an ex parte order of
protection as provided in RCW 26.50.070. The court shall grant the
petition for renewal unless the respondent proves by a preponderance of
the evidence that the respondent will not resume acts of domestic
violence against the petitioner or the petitioner's children or family
or household members when the order expires. The court may renew the
protection order for another fixed time period or may enter a permanent
order as provided in this section. The court may award court costs,
service fees, and reasonable attorneys' fees as provided in subsection
(1)(g) of this section.
(4) In providing relief under this chapter, the court may realign
the designation of the parties as "petitioner" and "respondent" where
the court finds that the original petitioner is the abuser and the
original respondent is the victim of domestic violence and may issue an
ex parte temporary order for protection in accordance with RCW
26.50.070 on behalf of the victim until the victim is able to prepare
a petition for an order for protection in accordance with RCW
26.50.030.
(5) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, no order
for protection shall grant relief to any party except upon notice to
the respondent and hearing pursuant to a petition or counter-petition
filed and served by the party seeking relief in accordance with RCW
26.50.050.
(6) The court order shall specify the date the order expires if
any. The court order shall also state whether the court issued the
protection order following personal service, service by publication, or
service by mail and whether the court has approved service by
publication or mail of an order issued under this section.
(7) If the court declines to issue an order for protection or
declines to renew an order for protection, the court shall state in
writing on the order the particular reasons for the court's denial.

Sec. 304 RCW 26.50.070 and 2000 c 119 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Where an application under this section alleges that
irreparable injury could result from domestic violence if an order is
not issued immediately without prior notice to the respondent, the
court may grant an ex parte temporary order for protection, pending a
full hearing, and grant relief as the court deems proper, including an
order:
(a) Restraining any party from committing acts of domestic
violence;
(b) Restraining any party from going onto the grounds of or
entering the dwelling that the parties share, from the residence,
workplace, or school of the other, or from the day care or school of a
child until further order of the court;
(c) Prohibiting any party from knowingly coming within, or
knowingly remaining within, a specified distance from a specified
location;
(d) Restraining any party from interfering with the other's custody
of the minor children or from removing the children from the
jurisdiction of the court;
(e) Restraining any party from having any contact with the victim
of domestic violence or the victim's children or members of the
victim's household; ((and))
(f) Considering the provisions of RCW 9.41.800; and
(g) Restraining the respondent from harassing, following, keeping
under physical or electronic surveillance, cyberstalking as defined in
RCW 9.61.260, and using telephonic, audiovisual, or other electronic
means to monitor the actions, location, or communication of a victim of
domestic violence, the victim's children, or members of the victim's
household. For the purposes of this subsection, "communication"
includes both "wire communication" and "electronic communication" as
defined in RCW 9.73.260.
(2) Irreparable injury under this section includes but is not
limited to situations in which the respondent has recently threatened
petitioner with bodily injury or has engaged in acts of domestic
violence against the petitioner.
(3) The court shall hold an ex parte hearing in person or by
telephone on the day the petition is filed or on the following judicial
day.
(4) An ex parte temporary order for protection shall be effective
for a fixed period not to exceed fourteen days or twenty-four days if
the court has permitted service by publication under RCW 26.50.085 or
by mail under RCW 26.50.123. The ex parte order may be reissued. A
full hearing, as provided in this chapter, shall be set for not later
than fourteen days from the issuance of the temporary order or not
later than twenty-four days if service by publication or by mail is
permitted. Except as provided in RCW 26.50.050, 26.50.085, and
26.50.123, the respondent shall be personally served with a copy of the
ex parte order along with a copy of the petition and notice of the date
set for the hearing.
(5) Any order issued under this section shall contain the date and
time of issuance and the expiration date and shall be entered into a
statewide judicial information system by the clerk of the court within
one judicial day after issuance.
(6) If the court declines to issue an ex parte temporary order for
protection the court shall state the particular reasons for the court's
denial. The court's denial of a motion for an ex parte order of
protection shall be filed with the court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 A new section is added to chapter 26.50
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In a proceeding in which a petition for an order for protection
under this chapter is sought, a court of this state may exercise
personal jurisdiction over a nonresident individual if:
(a) The individual is personally served with a petition within this
state;
(b) The individual submits to the jurisdiction of this state by
consent, entering a general appearance, or filing a responsive document
having the effect of waiving any objection to consent to personal
jurisdiction;
(c) The act or acts of the individual or the individual's agent
giving rise to the petition or enforcement of an order for protection
either:
(i) Occurred within this state; or
(ii) Occurred outside this state and are part of an ongoing pattern
of domestic violence or stalking that has an adverse effect on the
petitioner or a member of the petitioner's family or household and the
petitioner resides in this state;
(d) As a result of acts of domestic violence or stalking, the
petitioner or a member of the petitioner's family or household has
sought safety or protection in this state and currently resides in this
state; or
(e) There is any other basis consistent with RCW 4.28.185 or with
the Constitutions of this state and the United States.
(2) For the purposes of this section, an act or acts that "occurred
within this state" includes, but is not limited to, an oral or written
statement made or published by a person outside of this state to any
person in this state by means of the mail, interstate commerce, or
foreign commerce. Oral or written statements sent by electronic mail
or the internet are deemed to have "occurred within this state."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 A new section is added to chapter 7.90 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In a proceeding in which a petition for a sexual assault
protection order is sought under this chapter, a court of this state
may exercise personal jurisdiction over a nonresident individual if:
(a) The individual is personally served with a petition within this
state;
(b) The individual submits to the jurisdiction of this state by
consent, entering a general appearance, or filing a responsive document
having the effect of waiving any objection to consent to personal
jurisdiction;
(c) The act or acts of the individual or the individual's agent
giving rise to the petition or enforcement of a sexual assault
protection order either:
(i) Occurred within this state; or
(ii) Occurred outside this state and are part of an ongoing pattern
of sexual assaults or stalking that has an adverse effect on the
petitioner or a member of the petitioner's family or household and the
petitioner resides in this state;
(d) As a result of acts of stalking or a sexual assault, the
petitioner or a member of the petitioner's family or household has
sought safety or protection in this state and currently resides in this
state; or
(e) There is any other basis consistent with RCW 4.28.185 or with
the constitutions of this state and the United States.
(2) For the purposes of this section, an act or acts that "occurred
within this state" includes, but is not limited to, an oral or written
statement made or published by a person outside of this state to any
person in this state by means of the mail, interstate commerce, or
foreign commerce. Oral or written statements sent by electronic mail
or the internet are deemed to have "occurred within this state."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 A new section is added to chapter 10.14
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In a proceeding in which a petition for an order for protection
under this chapter is sought, a court of this state may exercise
personal jurisdiction over a nonresident individual if:
(a) The individual is personally served with a petition within this
state;
(b) The individual submits to the jurisdiction of this state by
consent, entering a general appearance, or filing a responsive document
having the effect of waiving any objection to consent to personal
jurisdiction;
(c) The act or acts of the individual or the individual's agent
giving rise to the petition or enforcement of an order for protection
either:
(i) Occurred within this state; or
(ii) Occurred outside this state and are part of an ongoing pattern
of harassment that has an adverse effect on the petitioner or a member
of the petitioner's family or household and the petitioner resides in
this state;
(d) As a result of acts of harassment, the petitioner or a member
of the petitioner's family or household has sought safety or protection
in this state and currently resides in this state; or
(e) There is any other basis consistent with RCW 4.28.185 or with
the constitutions of this state and the United States.
(2) For the purposes of this section, an act or acts that "occurred
within this state" includes, but is not limited to, an oral or written
statement made or published by a person outside of this state to any
person in this state by means of the mail, interstate commerce, or
foreign commerce. Oral or written statements sent by electronic mail
or the internet are deemed to have "occurred within this state."

Sec. 308 RCW 10.99.040 and 2000 c 119 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Because of the serious nature of domestic violence, the court
in domestic violence actions:
(a) Shall not dismiss any charge or delay disposition because of
concurrent dissolution or other civil proceedings;
(b) Shall not require proof that either party is seeking a
dissolution of marriage prior to instigation of criminal proceedings;
(c) Shall waive any requirement that the victim's location be
disclosed to any person, other than the attorney of a criminal
defendant, upon a showing that there is a possibility of further
violence: PROVIDED, That the court may order a criminal defense
attorney not to disclose to his or her client the victim's location;
and
(d) Shall identify by any reasonable means on docket sheets those
criminal actions arising from acts of domestic violence.
(2)(a) Because of the likelihood of repeated violence directed at
those who have been victims of domestic violence in the past, when any
person charged with or arrested for a crime involving domestic violence
is released from custody before arraignment or trial on bail or
personal recognizance, the court authorizing the release may prohibit
that person from having any contact with the victim. The jurisdiction
authorizing the release shall determine whether that person should be
prohibited from having any contact with the victim. If there is no
outstanding restraining or protective order prohibiting that person
from having contact with the victim, the court authorizing release may
issue, by telephone, a no-contact order prohibiting the person charged
or arrested from having contact with the victim or from knowingly
coming within, or knowingly remaining within, a specified distance of
a location.
(b) In issuing the order, the court shall consider the provisions
of RCW 9.41.800.
(c) The no-contact order shall also be issued in writing as soon as
possible. By January 1, 2011, the administrative office of the courts
shall develop a pattern form for all no-contact orders issued under
this chapter. A no-contact order issued under this chapter must
substantially comply with the pattern form developed by the
administrative office of the courts.
(3) At the time of arraignment the court shall determine whether a
no-contact order shall be issued or extended. The no-contact order
shall terminate if the defendant is acquitted or the charges are
dismissed. If a no-contact order is issued or extended, the court may
also include in the conditions of release a requirement that the
defendant submit to electronic monitoring. If electronic monitoring is
ordered, the court shall specify who shall provide the monitoring
services, and the terms under which the monitoring shall be performed.
Upon conviction, the court may require as a condition of the sentence
that the defendant reimburse the providing agency for the costs of the
electronic monitoring.
(4)(a) Willful violation of a court order issued under subsection
(2) or (3) of this section is punishable under RCW 26.50.110.
(b) The written order releasing the person charged or arrested
shall contain the court's directives and shall bear the legend:
"Violation of this order is a criminal offense under chapter 26.50 RCW
and will subject a violator to arrest; any assault, drive-by shooting,
or reckless endangerment that is a violation of this order is a felony.
You can be arrested even if any person protected by the order invites
or allows you to violate the order's prohibitions. You have the sole
responsibility to avoid or refrain from violating the order's
provisions. Only the court can change the order."
(c) A certified copy of the order shall be provided to the victim.
(5) If a no-contact order has been issued prior to charging, that
order shall expire at arraignment or within seventy-two hours if
charges are not filed. Such orders need not be entered into the
computer-based criminal intelligence information system in this state
which is used by law enforcement agencies to list outstanding warrants.
(6) Whenever a no-contact order is issued, modified, or terminated
under subsection (2) or (3) of this section, the clerk of the court
shall forward a copy of the order on or before the next judicial day to
the appropriate law enforcement agency specified in the order. Upon
receipt of the copy of the order the law enforcement agency shall enter
the order for one year or until the expiration date specified on the
order into any computer-based criminal intelligence information system
available in this state used by law enforcement agencies to list
outstanding warrants. Entry into the computer-based criminal
intelligence information system constitutes notice to all law
enforcement agencies of the existence of the order. The order is fully
enforceable in any jurisdiction in the state. Upon receipt of notice
that an order has been terminated under subsection (3) of this section,
the law enforcement agency shall remove the order from the computer-based criminal intelligence information system.
(7) All courts shall develop policies and procedures by January 1,
2011, to grant victims a process to modify or rescind a no-contact
order issued under this chapter. The administrative office of the
courts shall develop a model policy to assist the courts in
implementing the requirements of this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 A new section is added to chapter 2.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The administrative office of the courts shall develop
guidelines by December 1, 2011, for all courts to establish a process
to reconcile duplicate or conflicting no-contact or protection orders
issued by courts in this state.
(2) The guidelines developed under subsection (1) of this section
must include:
(a) A process to allow any party named in a no-contact or
protection order to petition for the purpose of reconciling duplicate
or conflicting orders; and
(b) A procedure to address no-contact and protection order data
sharing between court jurisdictions in this state.
(3) By January 1, 2011, the administrative office of the courts
shall provide a report back to the legislature concerning the progress
made to develop the guidelines required by this section.

PART FOUR
SENTENCING REFORMS
Sec. 401 RCW 9.94A.030 and 2009 c 375 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the indeterminate sentence review board created
under chapter 9.95 RCW.
(2) "Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit," or
"collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department,
means that the department, either directly or through a collection
agreement authorized by RCW 9.94A.760, is responsible for monitoring
and enforcing the offender's sentence with regard to the legal
financial obligation, receiving payment thereof from the offender, and,
consistent with current law, delivering daily the entire payment to the
superior court clerk without depositing it in a departmental account.
(3) "Commission" means the sentencing guidelines commission.
(4) "Community corrections officer" means an employee of the
department who is responsible for carrying out specific duties in
supervision of sentenced offenders and monitoring of sentence
conditions.
(5) "Community custody" means that portion of an offender's
sentence of confinement in lieu of earned release time or imposed as
part of a sentence under this chapter and served in the community
subject to controls placed on the offender's movement and activities by
the department.
(6) "Community protection zone" means the area within eight hundred
eighty feet of the facilities and grounds of a public or private
school.
(7) "Community restitution" means compulsory service, without
compensation, performed for the benefit of the community by the
offender.
(8) "Confinement" means total or partial confinement.
(9) "Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant to Title
10 or 13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of guilty, and
acceptance of a plea of guilty.
(10) "Crime-related prohibition" means an order of a court
prohibiting conduct that directly relates to the circumstances of the
crime for which the offender has been convicted, and shall not be
construed to mean orders directing an offender affirmatively to
participate in rehabilitative programs or to otherwise perform
affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts necessary to monitor
compliance with the order of a court may be required by the department.
(11) "Criminal history" means the list of a defendant's prior
convictions and juvenile adjudications, whether in this state, in
federal court, or elsewhere.
(a) The history shall include, where known, for each conviction (i)
whether the defendant has been placed on probation and the length and
terms thereof; and (ii) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and
the length of incarceration.
(b) A conviction may be removed from a defendant's criminal history
only if it is vacated pursuant to RCW 9.96.060, 9.94A.640, 9.95.240, or
a similar out-of-state statute, or if the conviction has been vacated
pursuant to a governor's pardon.
(c) The determination of a defendant's criminal history is distinct
from the determination of an offender score. A prior conviction that
was not included in an offender score calculated pursuant to a former
version of the sentencing reform act remains part of the defendant's
criminal history.
(12) "Criminal street gang" means any ongoing organization,
association, or group of three or more persons, whether formal or
informal, having a common name or common identifying sign or symbol,
having as one of its primary activities the commission of criminal
acts, and whose members or associates individually or collectively
engage in or have engaged in a pattern of criminal street gang
activity. This definition does not apply to employees engaged in
concerted activities for their mutual aid and protection, or to the
activities of labor and bona fide nonprofit organizations or their
members or agents.
(13) "Criminal street gang associate or member" means any person
who actively participates in any criminal street gang and who
intentionally promotes, furthers, or assists in any criminal act by the
criminal street gang.
(14) "Criminal street gang-related offense" means any felony or
misdemeanor offense, whether in this state or elsewhere, that is
committed for the benefit of, at the direction of, or in association
with any criminal street gang, or is committed with the intent to
promote, further, or assist in any criminal conduct by the gang, or is
committed for one or more of the following reasons:
(a) To gain admission, prestige, or promotion within the gang;
(b) To increase or maintain the gang's size, membership, prestige,
dominance, or control in any geographical area;
(c) To exact revenge or retribution for the gang or any member of
the gang;
(d) To obstruct justice, or intimidate or eliminate any witness
against the gang or any member of the gang;
(e) To directly or indirectly cause any benefit, aggrandizement,
gain, profit, or other advantage for the gang, its reputation,
influence, or membership; or
(f) To provide the gang with any advantage in, or any control or
dominance over any criminal market sector, including, but not limited
to, manufacturing, delivering, or selling any controlled substance
(chapter 69.50 RCW); arson (chapter 9A.48 RCW); trafficking in stolen
property (chapter 9A.82 RCW); promoting prostitution (chapter 9A.88
RCW); human trafficking (RCW 9A.40.100); or promoting pornography
(chapter 9.68 RCW).
(15) "Day fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing court that
equals the difference between the offender's net daily income and the
reasonable obligations that the offender has for the support of the
offender and any dependents.
(16) "Day reporting" means a program of enhanced supervision
designed to monitor the offender's daily activities and compliance with
sentence conditions, and in which the offender is required to report
daily to a specific location designated by the department or the
sentencing court.
(17) "Department" means the department of corrections.
(18) "Determinate sentence" means a sentence that states with
exactitude the number of actual years, months, or days of total
confinement, of partial confinement, of community custody, the number
of actual hours or days of community restitution work, or dollars or
terms of a legal financial obligation. The fact that an offender
through earned release can reduce the actual period of confinement
shall not affect the classification of the sentence as a determinate
sentence.
(19) "Disposable earnings" means that part of the earnings of an
offender remaining after the deduction from those earnings of any
amount required by law to be withheld. For the purposes of this
definition, "earnings" means compensation paid or payable for personal
services, whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonuses, or
otherwise, and, notwithstanding any other provision of law making the
payments exempt from garnishment, attachment, or other process to
satisfy a court-ordered legal financial obligation, specifically
includes periodic payments pursuant to pension or retirement programs,
or insurance policies of any type, but does not include payments made
under Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020 and 50.40.050,
or Title 74 RCW.
(20) "Domestic violence" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
10.99.020 and 26.50.010.
(21) "Drug offender sentencing alternative" is a sentencing option
available to persons convicted of a felony offense other than a violent
offense or a sex offense and who are eligible for the option under RCW
9.94A.660.
(((21))) (22) "Drug offense" means:
(a) Any felony violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of
a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.4013) or forged prescription for a
controlled substance (RCW 69.50.403);
(b) Any offense defined as a felony under federal law that relates
to the possession, manufacture, distribution, or transportation of a
controlled substance; or
(c) Any out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws
of this state would be a felony classified as a drug offense under (a)
of this subsection.
(((22))) (23) "Earned release" means earned release from
confinement as provided in RCW 9.94A.728.
(((23))) (24) "Escape" means:
(a) Sexually violent predator escape (RCW 9A.76.115), escape in the
first degree (RCW 9A.76.110), escape in the second degree (RCW
9A.76.120), willful failure to return from furlough (RCW 72.66.060),
willful failure to return from work release (RCW 72.65.070), or willful
failure to be available for supervision by the department while in
community custody (RCW 72.09.310); or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as an escape
under (a) of this subsection.
(((24))) (25) "Felony traffic offense" means:
(a) Vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW
46.61.522), eluding a police officer (RCW 46.61.024), felony hit-and-run injury-accident (RCW 46.52.020(4)), felony driving while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502(6)), or
felony physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504(6)); or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a felony
traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.
(((25))) (26) "Fine" means a specific sum of money ordered by the
sentencing court to be paid by the offender to the court over a
specific period of time.
(((26))) (27) "First-time offender" means any person who has no
prior convictions for a felony and is eligible for the first-time
offender waiver under RCW 9.94A.650.
(((27))) (28) "Home detention" means a program of partial
confinement available to offenders wherein the offender is confined in
a private residence subject to electronic surveillance.
(((28))) (29) "Legal financial obligation" means a sum of money
that is ordered by a superior court of the state of Washington for
legal financial obligations which may include restitution to the
victim, statutorily imposed crime victims' compensation fees as
assessed pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, court costs, county or interlocal
drug funds, court-appointed attorneys' fees, and costs of defense,
fines, and any other financial obligation that is assessed to the
offender as a result of a felony conviction. Upon conviction for
vehicular assault while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, RCW 46.61.522(1)(b), or vehicular homicide while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a),
legal financial obligations may also include payment to a public agency
of the expense of an emergency response to the incident resulting in
the conviction, subject to RCW 38.52.430.
(((29))) (30) "Most serious offense" means any of the following
felonies or a felony attempt to commit any of the following felonies:
(a) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or
criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A
felony;
(b) Assault in the second degree;
(c) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(d) Child molestation in the second degree;
(e) Controlled substance homicide;
(f) Extortion in the first degree;
(g) Incest when committed against a child under age fourteen;
(h) Indecent liberties;
(i) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(j) Leading organized crime;
(k) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(l) Manslaughter in the second degree;
(m) Promoting prostitution in the first degree;
(n) Rape in the third degree;
(o) Robbery in the second degree;
(p) Sexual exploitation;
(q) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving of
a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner;
(r) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of
any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of
any vehicle in a reckless manner;
(s) Any other class B felony offense with a finding of sexual
motivation;
(t) Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW
9.94A.825;
(u) Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to December 2,
1993, that is comparable to a most serious offense under this
subsection, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense
that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a
most serious offense under this subsection;
(v)(i) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW
9A.88.100(1) (a), (b), and (c), chapter 260, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess.
as it existed until July 1, 1979, RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c) as
it existed from July 1, 1979, until June 11, 1986, and RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(a), (b), and (d) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988;
(ii) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988,
if: (A) The crime was committed against a child under the age of
fourteen; or (B) the relationship between the victim and perpetrator is
included in the definition of indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through July 27, 1997,
or RCW 9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993,
through July 27, 1997;
(w) Any out-of-state conviction for a felony offense with a finding
of sexual motivation if the minimum sentence imposed was ten years or
more; provided that the out-of-state felony offense must be comparable
to a felony offense under Title 9 or 9A RCW and the out-of-state
definition of sexual motivation must be comparable to the definition of
sexual motivation contained in this section.
(((30))) (31) "Nonviolent offense" means an offense which is not a
violent offense.
(((31))) (32) "Offender" means a person who has committed a felony
established by state law and is eighteen years of age or older or is
less than eighteen years of age but whose case is under superior court
jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030 or has been transferred by the
appropriate juvenile court to a criminal court pursuant to RCW
13.40.110. In addition, for the purpose of community custody
requirements under this chapter, "offender" also means a misdemeanor or
gross misdemeanor probationer convicted of an offense included in RCW
9.94A.501(1) and ordered by a superior court to probation under the
supervision of the department pursuant to RCW 9.92.060, 9.95.204, or
9.95.210. Throughout this chapter, the terms "offender" and
"defendant" are used interchangeably.
(((32))) (33) "Partial confinement" means confinement for no more
than one year in a facility or institution operated or utilized under
contract by the state or any other unit of government, or, if home
detention or work crew has been ordered by the court, in an approved
residence, for a substantial portion of each day with the balance of
the day spent in the community. Partial confinement includes work
release, home detention, work crew, and a combination of work crew and
home detention.
(((33))) (34) "Pattern of criminal street gang activity" means:
(a) The commission, attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation of, or any
prior juvenile adjudication of or adult conviction of, two or more of
the following criminal street gang-related offenses:
(i) Any "serious violent" felony offense as defined in this
section, excluding Homicide by Abuse (RCW 9A.32.055) and Assault of a
Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120);
(ii) Any "violent" offense as defined by this section, excluding
Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130);
(iii) Deliver or Possession with Intent to Deliver a Controlled
Substance (chapter 69.50 RCW);
(iv) Any violation of the firearms and dangerous weapon act
(chapter 9.41 RCW);
(v) Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300);
(vi) Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310);
(vii) Malicious Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080);
(viii) Harassment where a subsequent violation or deadly threat is
made (RCW 9A.46.020(2)(b));
(ix) Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120);
(x) Any felony conviction by a person eighteen years of age or
older with a special finding of involving a juvenile in a felony
offense under RCW 9.94A.833;
(xi) Residential Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025);
(xii) Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030);
(xiii) Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070);
(xiv) Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080);
(xv) Theft of a Motor Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.065);
(xvi) Possession of a Stolen Motor Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.068);
(xvii) Taking a Motor Vehicle Without Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070);
(xviii) Taking a Motor Vehicle Without Permission 2 (RCW
9A.56.075);
(xix) Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120);
(xx) Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130);
(xxi) Intimidating a Witness (RCW 9A.72.110);
(xxii) Tampering with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120);
(xxiii) Reckless Endangerment (RCW 9A.36.050);
(xxiv) Coercion (RCW 9A.36.070);
(xxv) Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020); or
(xxvi) Malicious Mischief 3 (RCW 9A.48.090);
(b) That at least one of the offenses listed in (a) of this
subsection shall have occurred after July 1, 2008;
(c) That the most recent committed offense listed in (a) of this
subsection occurred within three years of a prior offense listed in (a)
of this subsection; and
(d) Of the offenses that were committed in (a) of this subsection,
the offenses occurred on separate occasions or were committed by two or
more persons.
(((34))) (35) "Persistent offender" is an offender who:
(a)(i) Has been convicted in this state of any felony considered a
most serious offense; and
(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (a) of this
subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least two separate
occasions, whether in this state or elsewhere, of felonies that under
the laws of this state would be considered most serious offenses and
would be included in the offender score under RCW 9.94A.525; provided
that of the two or more previous convictions, at least one conviction
must have occurred before the commission of any of the other most
serious offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or
(b)(i) Has been convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape
of a child in the first degree, child molestation in the first degree,
rape in the second degree, rape of a child in the second degree, or
indecent liberties by forcible compulsion; (B) any of the following
offenses with a finding of sexual motivation: Murder in the first
degree, murder in the second degree, homicide by abuse, kidnapping in
the first degree, kidnapping in the second degree, assault in the first
degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the first
degree, assault of a child in the second degree, or burglary in the
first degree; or (C) an attempt to commit any crime listed in this
subsection (((34))) (35)(b)(i); and
(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this
subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least one occasion,
whether in this state or elsewhere, of an offense listed in (b)(i) of
this subsection or any federal or out-of-state offense or offense under
prior Washington law that is comparable to the offenses listed in
(b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for rape of a child in the
first degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection
only when the offender was sixteen years of age or older when the
offender committed the offense. A conviction for rape of a child in
the second degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this
subsection only when the offender was eighteen years of age or older
when the offender committed the offense.
(((35))) (36) "Predatory" means: (a) The perpetrator of the crime
was a stranger to the victim, as defined in this section; (b) the
perpetrator established or promoted a relationship with the victim
prior to the offense and the victimization of the victim was a
significant reason the perpetrator established or promoted the
relationship; or (c) the perpetrator was: (i) A teacher, counselor,
volunteer, or other person in authority in any public or private school
and the victim was a student of the school under his or her authority
or supervision. For purposes of this subsection, "school" does not
include home-based instruction as defined in RCW 28A.225.010; (ii) a
coach, trainer, volunteer, or other person in authority in any
recreational activity and the victim was a participant in the activity
under his or her authority or supervision; or (iii) a pastor, elder,
volunteer, or other person in authority in any church or religious
organization, and the victim was a member or participant of the
organization under his or her authority.
(((36))) (37) "Private school" means a school regulated under
chapter 28A.195 or 28A.205 RCW.
(((37))) (38) "Public school" has the same meaning as in RCW
28A.150.010.
(((38))) (39) "Repetitive domestic violence offense" means any:
(a)(i) Domestic violence assault that is not a felony offense under
RCW 9A.36.041;
(ii) Domestic violence violation of a no contact order under
chapter 10.99 RCW that is not a felony offense;
(iii) Domestic violence violation of a protection order under
chapter 26.09, 26.10, 26.26, or 26.50 RCW that is not a felony offense;
(iv) Domestic violence harassment offense under RCW 9A.46.020 that
is not a felony offense; or
(v) Domestic violence stalking offense under 9A.46.110 that is not
a felony offense; or
(b) Any federal, out-of-state, tribal court, military, county, or
municipal conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state
would be classified as a repetitive domestic violence offense under (a)
of this subsection.
(40) "Restitution" means a specific sum of money ordered by the
sentencing court to be paid by the offender to the court over a
specified period of time as payment of damages. The sum may include
both public and private costs.
(((39))) (41) "Risk assessment" means the application of the risk
instrument recommended to the department by the Washington state
institute for public policy as having the highest degree of predictive
accuracy for assessing an offender's risk of reoffense.
(((40))) (42) "Serious traffic offense" means:
(a) Nonfelony driving while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502), nonfelony actual physical control
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.504), reckless driving (RCW 46.61.500), or hit-and-run an
attended vehicle (RCW 46.52.020(5)); or
(b) Any federal, out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for
an offense that under the laws of this state would be classified as a
serious traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.
(((41))) (43) "Serious violent offense" is a subcategory of violent
offense and means:
(a)(i) Murder in the first degree;
(ii) Homicide by abuse;
(iii) Murder in the second degree;
(iv) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(v) Assault in the first degree;
(vi) Kidnapping in the first degree;
(vii) Rape in the first degree;
(viii) Assault of a child in the first degree; or
(ix) An attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to
commit one of these felonies; or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a serious
violent offense under (a) of this subsection.
(((42))) (44) "Sex offense" means:
(a)(i) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW other than
RCW 9A.44.130(12);
(ii) A violation of RCW 9A.64.020;
(iii) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9.68A RCW other than
RCW 9.68A.080; or
(iv) A felony that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt,
criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit such crimes;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a sex
offense in (a) of this subsection;
(c) A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW
9.94A.835 or 13.40.135; or
(d) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a sex
offense under (a) of this subsection.
(((43))) (45) "Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes
for which the defendant committed the crime was for the purpose of his
or her sexual gratification.
(((44))) (46) "Standard sentence range" means the sentencing
court's discretionary range in imposing a nonappealable sentence.
(((45))) (47) "Statutory maximum sentence" means the maximum length
of time for which an offender may be confined as punishment for a crime
as prescribed in chapter 9A.20 RCW, RCW 9.92.010, the statute defining
the crime, or other statute defining the maximum penalty for a crime.
(((46))) (48) "Stranger" means that the victim did not know the
offender twenty-four hours before the offense.
(((47))) (49) "Total confinement" means confinement inside the
physical boundaries of a facility or institution operated or utilized
under contract by the state or any other unit of government for twenty-four hours a day, or pursuant to RCW 72.64.050 and 72.64.060.
(((48))) (50) "Transition training" means written and verbal
instructions and assistance provided by the department to the offender
during the two weeks prior to the offender's successful completion of
the work ethic camp program. The transition training shall include
instructions in the offender's requirements and obligations during the
offender's period of community custody.
(((49))) (51) "Victim" means any person who has sustained
emotional, psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or
property as a direct result of the crime charged.
(((50))) (52) "Violent offense" means:
(a) Any of the following felonies:
(i) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an
attempt to commit a class A felony;
(ii) Criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a
class A felony;
(iii) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(iv) Manslaughter in the second degree;
(v) Indecent liberties if committed by forcible compulsion;
(vi) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(vii) Arson in the second degree;
(viii) Assault in the second degree;
(ix) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(x) Extortion in the first degree;
(xi) Robbery in the second degree;
(xii) Drive-by shooting;
(xiii) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving
of a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a
reckless manner; and
(xiv) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of
any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of
any vehicle in a reckless manner;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a violent
offense in (a) of this subsection; and
(c) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a violent
offense under (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(((51))) (53) "Work crew" means a program of partial confinement
consisting of civic improvement tasks for the benefit of the community
that complies with RCW 9.94A.725.
(((52))) (54) "Work ethic camp" means an alternative incarceration
program as provided in RCW 9.94A.690 designed to reduce recidivism and
lower the cost of corrections by requiring offenders to complete a
comprehensive array of real-world job and vocational experiences,
character-building work ethics training, life management skills
development, substance abuse rehabilitation, counseling, literacy
training, and basic adult education.
(((53))) (55) "Work release" means a program of partial confinement
available to offenders who are employed or engaged as a student in a
regular course of study at school.

Sec. 402 RCW 9.94A.535 and 2008 c 276 s 303 and 2008 c 233 s 9
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The court may impose a sentence outside the standard sentence range
for an offense if it finds, considering the purpose of this chapter,
that there are substantial and compelling reasons justifying an
exceptional sentence. Facts supporting aggravated sentences, other
than the fact of a prior conviction, shall be determined pursuant to
the provisions of RCW 9.94A.537.
Whenever a sentence outside the standard sentence range is imposed,
the court shall set forth the reasons for its decision in written
findings of fact and conclusions of law. A sentence outside the
standard sentence range shall be a determinate sentence.
If the sentencing court finds that an exceptional sentence outside
the standard sentence range should be imposed, the sentence is subject
to review only as provided for in RCW 9.94A.585(4).
A departure from the standards in RCW 9.94A.589 (1) and (2)
governing whether sentences are to be served consecutively or
concurrently is an exceptional sentence subject to the limitations in
this section, and may be appealed by the offender or the state as set
forth in RCW 9.94A.585 (2) through (6).
(1) Mitigating Circumstances - Court to Consider
The court may impose an exceptional sentence below the standard
range if it finds that mitigating circumstances are established by a
preponderance of the evidence. The following are illustrative only and
are not intended to be exclusive reasons for exceptional sentences.
(a) To a significant degree, the victim was an initiator, willing
participant, aggressor, or provoker of the incident.
(b) Before detection, the defendant compensated, or made a good
faith effort to compensate, the victim of the criminal conduct for any
damage or injury sustained.
(c) The defendant committed the crime under duress, coercion,
threat, or compulsion insufficient to constitute a complete defense but
which significantly affected his or her conduct.
(d) The defendant, with no apparent predisposition to do so, was
induced by others to participate in the crime.
(e) The defendant's capacity to appreciate the wrongfulness of his
or her conduct, or to conform his or her conduct to the requirements of
the law, was significantly impaired. Voluntary use of drugs or alcohol
is excluded.
(f) The offense was principally accomplished by another person and
the defendant manifested extreme caution or sincere concern for the
safety or well-being of the victim.
(g) The operation of the multiple offense policy of RCW 9.94A.589
results in a presumptive sentence that is clearly excessive in light of
the purpose of this chapter, as expressed in RCW 9.94A.010.
(h) The defendant or the defendant's children suffered a continuing
pattern of physical or sexual abuse by the victim of the offense and
the offense is a response to that abuse.
(i) The current offense involved domestic violence, as defined in
RCW 10.99.020, and the defendant suffered a continuing pattern of
coercion, control, or abuse by the victim of the offense and the
offense is a response to that coercion, control, or abuse.
(2) Aggravating Circumstances - Considered and Imposed by the Court
The trial court may impose an aggravated exceptional sentence
without a finding of fact by a jury under the following circumstances:
(a) The defendant and the state both stipulate that justice is best
served by the imposition of an exceptional sentence outside the
standard range, and the court finds the exceptional sentence to be
consistent with and in furtherance of the interests of justice and the
purposes of the sentencing reform act.
(b) The defendant's prior unscored misdemeanor or prior unscored
foreign criminal history results in a presumptive sentence that is
clearly too lenient in light of the purpose of this chapter, as
expressed in RCW 9.94A.010.
(c) The defendant has committed multiple current offenses and the
defendant's high offender score results in some of the current offenses
going unpunished.
(d) The failure to consider the defendant's prior criminal history
which was omitted from the offender score calculation pursuant to RCW
9.94A.525 results in a presumptive sentence that is clearly too
lenient.
(3) Aggravating Circumstances - Considered by a Jury -Imposed by
the Court
Except for circumstances listed in subsection (2) of this section,
the following circumstances are an exclusive list of factors that can
support a sentence above the standard range. Such facts should be
determined by procedures specified in RCW 9.94A.537.
(a) The defendant's conduct during the commission of the current
offense manifested deliberate cruelty to the victim.
(b) The defendant knew or should have known that the victim of the
current offense was particularly vulnerable or incapable of resistance.
(c) The current offense was a violent offense, and the defendant
knew that the victim of the current offense was pregnant.
(d) The current offense was a major economic offense or series of
offenses, so identified by a consideration of any of the following
factors:
(i) The current offense involved multiple victims or multiple
incidents per victim;
(ii) The current offense involved attempted or actual monetary loss
substantially greater than typical for the offense;
(iii) The current offense involved a high degree of sophistication
or planning or occurred over a lengthy period of time; or
(iv) The defendant used his or her position of trust, confidence,
or fiduciary responsibility to facilitate the commission of the current
offense.
(e) The current offense was a major violation of the Uniform
Controlled Substances Act, chapter 69.50 RCW (VUCSA), related to
trafficking in controlled substances, which was more onerous than the
typical offense of its statutory definition: The presence of ANY of
the following may identify a current offense as a major VUCSA:
(i) The current offense involved at least three separate
transactions in which controlled substances were sold, transferred, or
possessed with intent to do so;
(ii) The current offense involved an attempted or actual sale or
transfer of controlled substances in quantities substantially larger
than for personal use;
(iii) The current offense involved the manufacture of controlled
substances for use by other parties;
(iv) The circumstances of the current offense reveal the offender
to have occupied a high position in the drug distribution hierarchy;
(v) The current offense involved a high degree of sophistication or
planning, occurred over a lengthy period of time, or involved a broad
geographic area of disbursement; or
(vi) The offender used his or her position or status to facilitate
the commission of the current offense, including positions of trust,
confidence or fiduciary responsibility (e.g., pharmacist, physician, or
other medical professional).
(f) The current offense included a finding of sexual motivation
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.835.
(g) The offense was part of an ongoing pattern of sexual abuse of
the same victim under the age of eighteen years manifested by multiple
incidents over a prolonged period of time.
(h) The current offense involved domestic violence, as defined in
RCW 10.99.020, and one or more of the following was present:
(i) The offense was part of an ongoing pattern of psychological,
physical, or sexual abuse of ((the)) a victim or multiple victims
manifested by multiple incidents over a prolonged period of time;
(ii) The offense occurred within sight or sound of the victim's or
the offender's minor children under the age of eighteen years; or
(iii) The offender's conduct during the commission of the current
offense manifested deliberate cruelty or intimidation of the victim.
(i) The offense resulted in the pregnancy of a child victim of
rape.
(j) The defendant knew that the victim of the current offense was
a youth who was not residing with a legal custodian and the defendant
established or promoted the relationship for the primary purpose of
victimization.
(k) The offense was committed with the intent to obstruct or impair
human or animal health care or agricultural or forestry research or
commercial production.
(l) The current offense is trafficking in the first degree or
trafficking in the second degree and any victim was a minor at the time
of the offense.
(m) The offense involved a high degree of sophistication or
planning.
(n) The defendant used his or her position of trust, confidence, or
fiduciary responsibility to facilitate the commission of the current
offense.
(o) The defendant committed a current sex offense, has a history of
sex offenses, and is not amenable to treatment.
(p) The offense involved an invasion of the victim's privacy.
(q) The defendant demonstrated or displayed an egregious lack of
remorse.
(r) The offense involved a destructive and foreseeable impact on
persons other than the victim.
(s) The defendant committed the offense to obtain or maintain his
or her membership or to advance his or her position in the hierarchy of
an organization, association, or identifiable group.
(t) The defendant committed the current offense shortly after being
released from incarceration.
(u) The current offense is a burglary and the victim of the
burglary was present in the building or residence when the crime was
committed.
(v) The offense was committed against a law enforcement officer who
was performing his or her official duties at the time of the offense,
the offender knew that the victim was a law enforcement officer, and
the victim's status as a law enforcement officer is not an element of
the offense.
(w) The defendant committed the offense against a victim who was
acting as a good samaritan.
(x) The defendant committed the offense against a public official
or officer of the court in retaliation of the public official's
performance of his or her duty to the criminal justice system.
(y) The victim's injuries substantially exceed the level of bodily
harm necessary to satisfy the elements of the offense. This aggravator
is not an exception to RCW 9.94A.530(2).
(z)(i)(A) The current offense is theft in the first degree, theft
in the second degree, possession of stolen property in the first
degree, or possession of stolen property in the second degree; (B) the
stolen property involved is metal property; and (C) the property damage
to the victim caused in the course of the theft of metal property is
more than three times the value of the stolen metal property, or the
theft of the metal property creates a public hazard.
(ii) For purposes of this subsection, "metal property" means
commercial metal property, private metal property, or nonferrous metal
property, as defined in RCW 19.290.010.
(aa) The defendant committed the offense with the intent to
directly or indirectly cause any benefit, aggrandizement, gain, profit,
or other advantage to or for a criminal street gang as defined in RCW
9.94A.030, its reputation, influence, or membership.

Sec. 403 RCW 9.94A.525 and 2008 c 231 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The offender score is measured on the horizontal axis of the
sentencing grid. The offender score rules are as follows:
The offender score is the sum of points accrued under this section
rounded down to the nearest whole number.
(1) A prior conviction is a conviction which exists before the date
of sentencing for the offense for which the offender score is being
computed. Convictions entered or sentenced on the same date as the
conviction for which the offender score is being computed shall be
deemed "other current offenses" within the meaning of RCW 9.94A.589.
(2)(a) Class A and sex prior felony convictions shall always be
included in the offender score.
(b) Class B prior felony convictions other than sex offenses shall
not be included in the offender score, if since the last date of
release from confinement (including full-time residential treatment)
pursuant to a felony conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and
sentence, the offender had spent ten consecutive years in the community
without committing any crime that subsequently results in a conviction.
(c) Except as provided in (e) of this subsection, class C prior
felony convictions other than sex offenses shall not be included in the
offender score if, since the last date of release from confinement
(including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to a felony
conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and sentence, the offender had
spent five consecutive years in the community without committing any
crime that subsequently results in a conviction.
(d) Except as provided in (e) of this subsection, serious traffic
convictions shall not be included in the offender score if, since the
last date of release from confinement (including full-time residential
treatment) pursuant to a felony conviction, if any, or entry of
judgment and sentence, the offender spent five years in the community
without committing any crime that subsequently results in a conviction.
(e) If the present conviction is felony driving while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502(6)) or
felony physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504(6)), prior convictions
of felony driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, felony physical control of a vehicle while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, and serious traffic
offenses shall be included in the offender score if: (i) The prior
convictions were committed within five years since the last date of
release from confinement (including full-time residential treatment) or
entry of judgment and sentence; or (ii) the prior convictions would be
considered "prior offenses within ten years" as defined in RCW
46.61.5055.
(f) This subsection applies to both adult and juvenile prior
convictions.
(3) Out-of-state convictions for offenses shall be classified
according to the comparable offense definitions and sentences provided
by Washington law. Federal convictions for offenses shall be
classified according to the comparable offense definitions and
sentences provided by Washington law. If there is no clearly
comparable offense under Washington law or the offense is one that is
usually considered subject to exclusive federal jurisdiction, the
offense shall be scored as a class C felony equivalent if it was a
felony under the relevant federal statute.
(4) Score prior convictions for felony anticipatory offenses
(attempts, criminal solicitations, and criminal conspiracies) the same
as if they were convictions for completed offenses.
(5)(a) In the case of multiple prior convictions, for the purpose
of computing the offender score, count all convictions separately,
except:
(i) Prior offenses which were found, under RCW 9.94A.589(1)(a), to
encompass the same criminal conduct, shall be counted as one offense,
the offense that yields the highest offender score. The current
sentencing court shall determine with respect to other prior adult
offenses for which sentences were served concurrently or prior juvenile
offenses for which sentences were served consecutively, whether those
offenses shall be counted as one offense or as separate offenses using
the "same criminal conduct" analysis found in RCW 9.94A.589(1)(a), and
if the court finds that they shall be counted as one offense, then the
offense that yields the highest offender score shall be used. The
current sentencing court may presume that such other prior offenses
were not the same criminal conduct from sentences imposed on separate
dates, or in separate counties or jurisdictions, or in separate
complaints, indictments, or informations;
(ii) In the case of multiple prior convictions for offenses
committed before July 1, 1986, for the purpose of computing the
offender score, count all adult convictions served concurrently as one
offense, and count all juvenile convictions entered on the same date as
one offense. Use the conviction for the offense that yields the
highest offender score.
(b) As used in this subsection (5), "served concurrently" means
that: (i) The latter sentence was imposed with specific reference to
the former; (ii) the concurrent relationship of the sentences was
judicially imposed; and (iii) the concurrent timing of the sentences
was not the result of a probation or parole revocation on the former
offense.
(6) If the present conviction is one of the anticipatory offenses
of criminal attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy, count each prior
conviction as if the present conviction were for a completed offense.
When these convictions are used as criminal history, score them the
same as a completed crime.
(7) If the present conviction is for a nonviolent offense and not
covered by subsection (11), (12), or (13) of this section, count one
point for each adult prior felony conviction and one point for each
juvenile prior violent felony conviction and 1/2 point for each
juvenile prior nonviolent felony conviction.
(8) If the present conviction is for a violent offense and not
covered in subsection (9), (10), (11), (12), or (13) of this section,
count two points for each prior adult and juvenile violent felony
conviction, one point for each prior adult nonviolent felony
conviction, and 1/2 point for each prior juvenile nonviolent felony
conviction.
(9) If the present conviction is for a serious violent offense,
count three points for prior adult and juvenile convictions for crimes
in this category, two points for each prior adult and juvenile violent
conviction (not already counted), one point for each prior adult
nonviolent felony conviction, and 1/2 point for each prior juvenile
nonviolent felony conviction.
(10) If the present conviction is for Burglary 1, count prior
convictions as in subsection (8) of this section; however count two
points for each prior adult Burglary 2 or residential burglary
conviction, and one point for each prior juvenile Burglary 2 or
residential burglary conviction.
(11) If the present conviction is for a felony traffic offense
count two points for each adult or juvenile prior conviction for
Vehicular Homicide or Vehicular Assault; for each felony offense count
one point for each adult and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior
conviction; for each serious traffic offense, other than those used for
an enhancement pursuant to RCW 46.61.520(2), count one point for each
adult and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior conviction; count one point
for each adult and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior conviction for
operation of a vessel while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug.
(12) If the present conviction is for homicide by watercraft or
assault by watercraft count two points for each adult or juvenile prior
conviction for homicide by watercraft or assault by watercraft; for
each felony offense count one point for each adult and 1/2 point for
each juvenile prior conviction; count one point for each adult and 1/2
point for each juvenile prior conviction for driving under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, actual physical control
of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, or operation of a vessel while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug.
(13) If the present conviction is for manufacture of
methamphetamine count three points for each adult prior manufacture of
methamphetamine conviction and two points for each juvenile manufacture
of methamphetamine offense. If the present conviction is for a drug
offense and the offender has a criminal history that includes a sex
offense or serious violent offense, count three points for each adult
prior felony drug offense conviction and two points for each juvenile
drug offense. All other adult and juvenile felonies are scored as in
subsection (8) of this section if the current drug offense is violent,
or as in subsection (7) of this section if the current drug offense is
nonviolent.
(14) If the present conviction is for Escape from Community
Custody, RCW 72.09.310, count only prior escape convictions in the
offender score. Count adult prior escape convictions as one point and
juvenile prior escape convictions as 1/2 point.
(15) If the present conviction is for Escape 1, RCW 9A.76.110, or
Escape 2, RCW 9A.76.120, count adult prior convictions as one point and
juvenile prior convictions as 1/2 point.
(16) If the present conviction is for Burglary 2 or residential
burglary, count priors as in subsection (7) of this section; however,
count two points for each adult and juvenile prior Burglary 1
conviction, two points for each adult prior Burglary 2 or residential
burglary conviction, and one point for each juvenile prior Burglary 2
or residential burglary conviction.
(17) If the present conviction is for a sex offense, count priors
as in subsections (7) through (11) and (13) through (16) of this
section; however count three points for each adult and juvenile prior
sex offense conviction.
(18) If the present conviction is for failure to register as a sex
offender under RCW 9A.44.130(11), count priors as in subsections (7)
through (11) and (13) through (16) of this section; however count three
points for each adult and juvenile prior sex offense conviction,
excluding prior convictions for failure to register as a sex offender
under RCW 9A.44.130(11), which shall count as one point.
(19) If the present conviction is for an offense committed while
the offender was under community custody, add one point. For purposes
of this subsection, community custody includes community placement or
postrelease supervision, as defined in chapter 9.94B RCW.
(20) If the present conviction is for Theft of a Motor Vehicle,
Possession of a Stolen Vehicle, Taking a Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 1, or Taking a Motor Vehicle Without Permission 2, count
priors as in subsections (7) through (18) of this section; however
count one point for prior convictions of Vehicle Prowling 2, and three
points for each adult and juvenile prior Theft 1 (of a motor vehicle),
Theft 2 (of a motor vehicle), Possession of Stolen Property 1 (of a
motor vehicle), Possession of Stolen Property 2 (of a motor vehicle),
Theft of a Motor Vehicle, Possession of a Stolen Vehicle, Taking a
Motor Vehicle Without Permission 1, or Taking a Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 2 conviction.
(21) If the present conviction is for a felony domestic violence
offense where domestic violence as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 was plead
and proven, count priors as in subsections (7) through (20) of this
section; however, count points as follows:
Count one point for each adult and juvenile prior conviction for a
repetitive domestic violence offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, where
domestic violence, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, was plead and proven.
(22) The fact that a prior conviction was not included in an
offender's offender score or criminal history at a previous sentencing
shall have no bearing on whether it is included in the criminal history
or offender score for the current offense. Prior convictions that were
not counted in the offender score or included in criminal history under
repealed or previous versions of the sentencing reform act shall be
included in criminal history and shall count in the offender score if
the current version of the sentencing reform act requires including or
counting those convictions. Prior convictions that were not included
in criminal history or in the offender score shall be included upon any
resentencing to ensure imposition of an accurate sentence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 A new section is added to chapter 10.99
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In sentencing for a crime of domestic violence as defined in
this chapter, courts of limited jurisdiction shall consider, among
other factors, whether:
(a) The defendant suffered a continuing pattern of coercion,
control, or abuse by the victim of the offense and the offense is a
response to that coercion, control, or abuse;
(b) The offense was part of an ongoing pattern of psychological,
physical, or sexual abuse of a victim or multiple victims manifested by
multiple incidents over a prolonged period of time; and
(c) The offense occurred within sight or sound of the victim's or
the offender's minor children under the age of eighteen years.
(2)(a) In sentencing for a crime of domestic violence as defined in
this chapter, the prosecutor shall provide for the court's review:
(i) The defendant's criminal history, if any, that occurred in
Washington or any other state;
(ii) If available, the defendant's prior criminal history that
occurred in any tribal jurisdiction; and
(iii) The defendant's individual order history.
(b) For the purposes of (a) of this subsection, criminal history
includes all previous convictions and orders of deferred prosecution,
as reported through the judicial information system or otherwise
available to the court or prosecutor, current to within the period
specified in (c) of this subsection before the date of sentencing.
(c) The periods applicable to previous convictions and orders of
deferred prosecution are:
(i) One working day, in the case of previous actions of courts that
fully participate in the state judicial information system; and
(ii) Seven calendar days, in the case of previous actions of courts
that do not fully participate in the judicial information system. For
the purposes of this subsection, "fully participate" means regularly
providing records to and receiving records from the system by
electronic means on a daily basis.

Sec. 405 RCW 3.66.068 and 2001 c 94 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
For a period not to exceed five years after imposition of sentence
for a defendant sentenced for a domestic violence offense or under RCW
46.61.5055 and two years after imposition of sentence for all other
offenses, the court has continuing jurisdiction and authority to
suspend or defer the execution of all or any part of its sentence upon
stated terms, including installment payment of fines. A defendant who
has been sentenced, or whose sentence has been deferred, and who then
fails to appear for any hearing to address the defendant's compliance
with the terms of probation when ordered to do so by the court, shall
have the term of probation tolled until such time as the defendant
makes his or her presence known to the court on the record. However,
the jurisdiction period in this section does not apply to the
enforcement of orders issued under RCW 46.20.720. For the purposes of
this section, "domestic violence offense" means a crime listed in RCW
10.99.020 that is not a felony offense.

Sec. 406 RCW 3.50.330 and 2001 c 94 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
For a period not to exceed five years after imposition of sentence
for a defendant sentenced for a domestic violence offense or under RCW
46.61.5055 and two years after imposition of sentence for all other
offenses, the court shall have continuing jurisdiction and authority to
suspend or defer the execution of all or any part of the sentence upon
stated terms, including installment payment of fines. A defendant who
has been sentenced, or whose sentence has been deferred, and who then
fails to appear for any hearing to address the defendant's compliance
with the terms of probation when ordered to do so by the court, shall
have the term of probation tolled until such time as the defendant
makes his or her presence known to the court on the record. However,
the jurisdiction period in this section does not apply to the
enforcement of orders issued under RCW 46.20.720. Any time before
entering an order terminating probation, the court may modify or revoke
its order suspending or deferring the imposition or execution of the
sentence. For the purposes of this section, "domestic violence
offense" means a crime listed in RCW 10.99.020 that is not a felony
offense.

Sec. 407 RCW 35.20.255 and 2005 c 400 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Judges of the municipal court, in their discretion, shall have
the power in all criminal proceedings within their jurisdiction
including violations of city ordinances, to defer imposition of any
sentence, suspend all or part of any sentence including installment
payment of fines, fix the terms of any such deferral or suspension, and
provide for such probation as in their opinion is reasonable and
necessary under the circumstances of the case, but in no case shall it
extend for more than five years from the date of conviction for a
defendant to be sentenced for a domestic violence offense or under RCW
46.61.5055 and two years from the date of conviction for all other
offenses. A defendant who has been sentenced, or whose sentence has
been deferred, and who then fails to appear for any hearing to address
the defendant's compliance with the terms of probation when ordered to
do so by the court, shall have the term of probation tolled until such
time as the defendant makes his or her presence known to the court on
the record. However, the jurisdiction period in this section does not
apply to the enforcement of orders issued under RCW 46.20.720. Any
time before entering an order terminating probation, the court may
modify or revoke its order suspending or deferring the imposition or
execution of the sentence. For the purposes of this subsection,
"domestic violence offense" means a crime listed in RCW 10.99.020 that
is not a felony offense.
(2)(a) If a defendant whose sentence has been deferred requests
permission to travel or transfer to another state, the director of
probation services or a designee thereof shall determine whether such
request is subject to RCW 9.94A.745, the interstate compact for adult
offender supervision. If such request is subject to the compact, the
director or designee shall:
(i) Notify the department of corrections of the defendant's
request;
(ii) Provide the department of corrections with the supporting
documentation it requests for processing an application for transfer;
(iii) Notify the defendant of the fee due to the department of
corrections for processing an application under the compact;
(iv) Cease supervision of the defendant while another state
supervises the defendant pursuant to the compact;
(v) Resume supervision if the defendant returns to this state
before the period of deferral expires.
(b) The defendant shall receive credit for time served while being
supervised by another state.
(c) If the probationer is returned to the state at the request of
the receiving state under rules of the interstate compact for adult
offender supervision, the department of corrections is responsible for
the cost of returning the probationer.
(d) The state of Washington, the department of corrections and its
employees, and any city and its employees are not liable for civil
damages resulting from any act or omission authorized or required under
this section unless the act or omission constitutes gross negligence.

PART FIVE
TREATMENT/SERVICES FOR PERPETRATORS AND VICTIMS
Sec. 501 RCW 26.50.150 and 1999 c 147 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any program that provides domestic violence treatment to
perpetrators of domestic violence must be certified by the department
of social and health services and meet minimum standards for domestic
violence treatment purposes. The department of social and health
services shall adopt rules for standards of approval of domestic
violence perpetrator programs ((that accept perpetrators of domestic
violence into treatment to satisfy court orders or that represent the
programs as ones that treat domestic violence perpetrators)). The
treatment must meet the following minimum qualifications:
(1) All treatment must be based upon a full, complete clinical
intake including but not limited to: Current and past violence
history; a lethality risk assessment; history of treatment from past
domestic violence perpetrator treatment programs; a complete diagnostic
evaluation; a substance abuse assessment; criminal history; assessment
of cultural issues, learning disabilities, literacy, and special
language needs; and a treatment plan that adequately and appropriately
addresses the treatment needs of the individual.
(2) To facilitate communication necessary for periodic safety
checks and case monitoring, the program must require the perpetrator to
sign the following releases:
(a) A release for the program to inform the victim and victim's
community and legal advocates that the perpetrator is in treatment with
the program, and to provide information, for safety purposes, to the
victim and victim's community and legal advocates;
(b) A release to prior and current treatment agencies to provide
information on the perpetrator to the program; and
(c) A release for the program to provide information on the
perpetrator to relevant legal entities including: Lawyers, courts,
parole, probation, child protective services, and child welfare
services.
(3) Treatment must be for a minimum treatment period defined by the
secretary of the department by rule. The weekly treatment sessions
must be in a group unless there is a documented, clinical reason for
another modality. Any other therapies, such as individual, marital, or
family therapy, substance abuse evaluations or therapy, medication
reviews, or psychiatric interviews, may be concomitant with the weekly
group treatment sessions described in this section but not a substitute
for it.
(4) The treatment must focus primarily on ending the violence,
holding the perpetrator accountable for his or her violence, and
changing his or her behavior. The treatment must be based on
nonvictim-blaming strategies and philosophies and shall include
education about the individual, family, and cultural dynamics of
domestic violence. If the perpetrator or the victim has a minor child,
treatment must specifically include education regarding the effects of
domestic violence on children, such as the emotional impacts of
domestic violence on children and the long-term consequences that
exposure to incidents of domestic violence may have on children.
(5) Satisfactory completion of treatment must be contingent upon
the perpetrator meeting specific criteria, defined by rule by the
secretary of the department, and not just upon the end of a certain
period of time or a certain number of sessions.
(6) The program must have policies and procedures for dealing with
reoffenses and noncompliance.
(7) All evaluation and treatment services must be provided by, or
under the supervision of, qualified personnel.
(8) The secretary of the department may adopt rules and establish
fees as necessary to implement this section.
(9) The department may conduct on-site monitoring visits as part of
its plan for certifying domestic violence perpetrator programs and
monitoring implementation of the rules adopted by the secretary of the
department to determine compliance with the minimum qualifications for
domestic violence perpetrator programs. The applicant or certified
domestic violence perpetrator program shall cooperate fully with the
department in the monitoring visit and provide all program and
management records requested by the department to determine the
program's compliance with the minimum certification qualifications and
rules adopted by the department.

PART SIX
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
Sec. 601 RCW 68.50.160 and 2007 c 156 s 24 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person has the right to control the disposition of his or her
own remains without the predeath or postdeath consent of another
person. A valid written document expressing the decedent's wishes
regarding the place or method of disposition of his or her remains,
signed by the decedent in the presence of a witness, is sufficient
legal authorization for the procedures to be accomplished.
(2) Prearrangements that are prepaid, or filed with a licensed
funeral establishment or cemetery authority, under RCW 18.39.280
through 18.39.345 and chapter 68.46 RCW are not subject to cancellation
or substantial revision by survivors. Absent actual knowledge of
contrary legal authorization under this section, a licensed funeral
establishment or cemetery authority shall not be held criminally nor
civilly liable for acting upon such prearrangements.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this subsection, if the
decedent has not made a prearrangement as set forth in subsection (2)
of this section or the costs of executing the decedent's wishes
regarding the disposition of the decedent's remains exceeds a reason-
able amount or directions have not been given by the decedent, the
right to control the disposition of the remains of a deceased person
vests in, and the duty of disposition and the liability for the
reasonable cost of preparation, care, and disposition of such remains
devolves upon the following in the order named:
(a) The surviving spouse or state registered domestic partner.
(b) The surviving adult children of the decedent.
(c) The surviving parents of the decedent.
(d) The surviving siblings of the decedent.
(e) A person acting as a representative of the decedent under the
signed authorization of the decedent.
(4) A person listed in subsection (3) of this section does not have
the right to control the disposition of a decedent's remains if the
person has been arrested for or charged with first or second degree
murder, homicide by abuse, or first or second degree manslaughter by
reason of the death of the decedent. The right to control the
disposition of the decedent's remains vests in an eligible person in
the next applicable class in accordance with subsection (3) of this
section.
(5) If a cemetery authority as defined in RCW 68.04.190 or a
funeral establishment licensed under chapter 18.39 RCW has made a good
faith effort to locate the person cited in subsection (3)(a) through
(e) of this section or the legal representative of the decedent's
estate, the cemetery authority or funeral establishment shall have the
right to rely on an authority to bury or cremate the human remains,
executed by the most responsible party available, and the cemetery
authority or funeral establishment may not be held criminally or
civilly liable for burying or cremating the human remains. In the
event any government agency provides the funds for the disposition of
any human remains and the government agency elects to provide funds for
cremation only, the cemetery authority or funeral establishment may not
be held criminally or civilly liable for cremating the human remains.
(((5))) (6) The liability for the reasonable cost of preparation,
care, and disposition devolves jointly and severally upon all kin of
the decedent in the same degree of kindred, in the order listed in
subsection (3) of this section, and upon the estate of the decedent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 A new section is added to chapter 2.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The administrative office of the courts shall, within
existing resources, convene a work group to address the issue of
transmitting information regarding revocation of concealed pistol
licenses, upon the entry of orders issued under chapter 10.99, 26.50,
or 26.52 RCW.
(b) The work group must include a superior court judge, a district
court judge, a municipal court judge, an attorney whose practice
includes a significant amount of time representing defendants in
criminal trials, and representatives from the following entities: The
Washington state patrol, the Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs, the prosecuting attorneys association, the department of
licensing, and the county clerks. Other members may be added as deemed
appropriate by the work group.
(2) The work group shall review the methods currently used to
transfer information between the courts, the county clerks, the
prosecutors, the department of licensing, the Washington state patrol,
and local law enforcement agencies regarding the suspension and
revocation of concealed pistol licenses.
(3) The goal of the work group is to identify methods to expedite
the transfer of information to enhance the safety of law enforcement
and the public.
(4) The work group shall report its recommendations to the affected
entities and the legislature not later than December 1, 2010. All
agency representatives shall cooperate fully with the work group's
efforts.

--- END ---