BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART ONE
INTENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 The legislature intends to improve the
lives of persons who suffer from the adverse effects of domestic
violence and to require reasonable, coordinated measures to prevent
domestic violence from occurring. The legislature intends to give law
enforcement and the courts better tools to identify violent
perpetrators of domestic violence and hold them accountable. The
legislature intends to: Increase the safety afforded to individuals
who seek protection of public and private agencies involved in domestic
violence prevention; improve the ability of agencies to address the
needs of victims and their children and the delivery of services;
upgrade the quality of treatment programs; and enhance the ability of
the justice system to respond quickly and fairly to domestic violence.
In order to improve the lives of persons who have, or may suffer, the
effects of domestic violence the legislature intends to achieve more
uniformity in the decision-making processes at public and private
agencies that address domestic violence by reducing inconsistencies and
duplications allowing domestic violence victims to achieve safety and
stability in their lives.

PART TWO
LAW ENFORCEMENT/ARREST PROVISIONS
Sec. 201 RCW 10.31.100 and 2006 c 138 s 23 are each amended to
read as follows:
A police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has
committed or is committing a felony shall have the authority to arrest
the person without a warrant. A police officer may arrest a person
without a warrant for committing a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor
only when the offense is committed in the presence of the officer,
except as provided in subsections (1) through (10) of this section.
(1) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has committed or is committing a misdemeanor or gross
misdemeanor, involving physical harm or threats of harm to any person
or property or the unlawful taking of property or involving the use or
possession of cannabis, or involving the acquisition, possession, or
consumption of alcohol by a person under the age of twenty-one years
under RCW 66.44.270, or involving criminal trespass under RCW 9A.52.070
or 9A.52.080, shall have the authority to arrest the person.
(2) A police officer shall arrest and take into custody, pending
release on bail, personal recognizance, or court order, a person
without a warrant when the officer has probable cause to believe that:
(a) An order has been issued of which the person has knowledge
under RCW 26.44.063, or chapter 7.90, 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, 26.26,
26.50, or 74.34 RCW restraining the person and the person has violated
the terms of the order restraining the person from acts or threats of
violence, or restraining the person from going onto the grounds of or
entering a residence, workplace, school, or day care, or prohibiting
the person from knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within,
a specified distance of a location or, in the case of an order issued
under RCW 26.44.063, imposing any other restrictions or conditions upon
the person; or
(b) A foreign protection order, as defined in RCW 26.52.010, has
been issued of which the person under restraint has knowledge and the
person under restraint has violated a provision of the foreign
protection order prohibiting the person under restraint from contacting
or communicating with another person, or excluding the person under
restraint from a residence, workplace, school, or day care, or
prohibiting the person from knowingly coming within, or knowingly
remaining within, a specified distance of a location, or a violation of
any provision for which the foreign protection order specifically
indicates that a violation will be a crime; or
(c) The person is sixteen years or older and within the preceding
four hours has assaulted a family or household member as defined in RCW
10.99.020 and the officer believes: (i) A felonious assault has
occurred; (ii) an assault has occurred which has resulted in bodily
injury to the victim, whether the injury is observable by the
responding officer or not; or (iii) that any physical action has
occurred which was intended to cause another person reasonably to fear
imminent serious bodily injury or death. Bodily injury means physical
pain, illness, or an impairment of physical condition. When the
officer has probable cause to believe that family or household members
have assaulted each other, the officer is not required to arrest both
persons. The officer shall arrest the person whom the officer believes
to be the primary physical aggressor. In making this determination,
the officer shall make every reasonable effort to consider: (i) The
intent to protect victims of domestic violence under RCW 10.99.010;
(ii) the comparative extent of injuries inflicted or serious threats
creating fear of physical injury; and (iii) the history of domestic
violence ((between the)) of each person((s)) involved, including
whether the conduct was part of an ongoing pattern of abuse.
(3) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has committed or is committing a violation of any of the
following traffic laws shall have the authority to arrest the person:
(a) RCW 46.52.010, relating to duty on striking an unattended car
or other property;
(b) RCW 46.52.020, relating to duty in case of injury to or death
of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;
(c) RCW 46.61.500 or 46.61.530, relating to reckless driving or
racing of vehicles;
(d) RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, relating to persons under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;
(e) RCW 46.20.342, relating to driving a motor vehicle while
operator's license is suspended or revoked;
(f) RCW 46.61.5249, relating to operating a motor vehicle in a
negligent manner.
(4) A law enforcement officer investigating at the scene of a motor
vehicle accident may arrest the driver of a motor vehicle involved in
the accident if the officer has probable cause to believe that the
driver has committed in connection with the accident a violation of any
traffic law or regulation.
(5) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has committed or is committing a violation of RCW 79A.60.040
shall have the authority to arrest the person.
(6) An officer may act upon the request of a law enforcement
officer in whose presence a traffic infraction was committed, to stop,
detain, arrest, or issue a notice of traffic infraction to the driver
who is believed to have committed the infraction. The request by the
witnessing officer shall give an officer the authority to take
appropriate action under the laws of the state of Washington.
(7) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has committed or is committing any act of indecent exposure, as
defined in RCW 9A.88.010, may arrest the person.
(8) A police officer may arrest and take into custody, pending
release on bail, personal recognizance, or court order, a person
without a warrant when the officer has probable cause to believe that
an order has been issued of which the person has knowledge under
chapter 10.14 RCW and the person has violated the terms of that order.
(9) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has, within twenty-four hours of the alleged violation,
committed a violation of RCW 9A.50.020 may arrest such person.
(10) A police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person illegally possesses or illegally has possessed a firearm or
other dangerous weapon on private or public elementary or secondary
school premises shall have the authority to arrest the person.
For purposes of this subsection, the term "firearm" has the meaning
defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the term "dangerous weapon" has the meaning
defined in RCW 9.41.250 and 9.41.280(1) (c) through (e).
(11) Except as specifically provided in subsections (2), (3), (4),
and (6) of this section, nothing in this section extends or otherwise
affects the powers of arrest prescribed in Title 46 RCW.
(12) No police officer may be held criminally or civilly liable for
making an arrest pursuant to ((RCW 10.31.100)) subsection (2) or (8) of
this section if the police officer acts in good faith and without
malice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 A new section is added to chapter 36.28A
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) When funded, the Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs shall convene a work group to develop a model policy
regarding the reporting of domestic violence as defined in RCW
10.99.020 to law enforcement in cases where the victim is unable or
unwilling to make a report in the jurisdiction where the alleged crime
occurred.
(b) The model policy must include policies and procedures related
to:
(i) Collecting and securing evidence; and
(ii) Creating interlocal agreements between law enforcement
agencies.
(2) In developing the model policy under subsection (1)(a) of this
section, the association shall consult with appropriate stakeholders
and government agencies.

PART THREE
NO-CONTACT AND PROTECTION ORDERS
Sec. 301 RCW 10.99.045 and 2000 c 119 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A defendant arrested for an offense involving domestic violence
as defined by RCW 10.99.020 shall be required to appear in person
before a magistrate within one judicial day after the arrest.
(2) A defendant who is charged by citation, complaint, or
information with an offense involving domestic violence as defined by
RCW 10.99.020 and not arrested shall appear in court for arraignment in
person as soon as practicable, but in no event later than fourteen days
after the next day on which court is in session following the issuance
of the citation or the filing of the complaint or information.
(3)(a) At the time of the appearances provided in subsection (1) or
(2) of this section, the court shall determine the necessity of
imposing a no-contact order or other conditions of pretrial release
according to the procedures established by court rule for a preliminary
appearance or an arraignment. The court may include in the order any
conditions authorized under RCW 9.41.800 and 10.99.040.
(b) For the purposes of (a) of this subsection, the prosecutor
shall provide for the court's review:
(i) The defendant's criminal history, if any, that occurred in
Washington or any other state;
(ii) If available, the defendant's prior criminal history that
occurred in any tribal jurisdiction; and
(iii) The defendant's individual order history.
(c) For the purposes of (b) of this subsection, criminal history
includes all previous convictions and orders of deferred prosecution,
as reported through the judicial information system or otherwise
available to the court or prosecutor, current to within the period
specified in (d) of this subsection before the date of the appearance.
(d) The periods applicable to previous convictions and orders of
deferred prosecution are:
(i) One working day, in the case of previous actions of courts that
fully participate in the state judicial information system; and
(ii) Seven calendar days, in the case of previous actions of courts
that do not fully participate in the judicial information system. For
the purposes of this subsection, "fully participate" means regularly
providing records to and receiving records from the system by
electronic means on a daily basis.
(4) Appearances required pursuant to this section are mandatory and
cannot be waived.
(5) The no-contact order shall be issued and entered with the
appropriate law enforcement agency pursuant to the procedures outlined
in RCW 10.99.040 (2) and (((4))) (6).

Sec. 302 RCW 26.50.020 and 1992 c 111 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Any person may seek relief under this chapter by filing a
petition with a court alleging that the person has been the victim of
domestic violence committed by the respondent. The person may petition
for relief on behalf of himself or herself and on behalf of minor
family or household members.
(b) Any person thirteen years of age or older may seek relief under
this chapter by filing a petition with a court alleging that he or she
has been the victim of violence in a dating relationship and the
respondent is sixteen years of age or older.
(2)(a) A person under eighteen years of age who is sixteen years of
age or older may seek relief under this chapter and is not required to
seek relief by a guardian or next friend.
(b) A person under sixteen years of age who is seeking relief under
subsection (1)(b) of this section is required to seek relief by a
parent, guardian, guardian ad litem, or next friend.
(3) No guardian or guardian ad litem need be appointed on behalf of
a respondent to an action under this chapter who is under eighteen
years of age if such respondent is sixteen years of age or older.
(4) The court may, if it deems necessary, appoint a guardian ad
litem for a petitioner or respondent who is a party to an action under
this chapter.
(5) The courts defined in RCW 26.50.010(((3))) (4) have
jurisdiction over proceedings under this chapter. The jurisdiction of
district and municipal courts under this chapter shall be limited to
enforcement of RCW 26.50.110(1), or the equivalent municipal ordinance,
and the issuance and enforcement of temporary orders for protection
provided for in RCW 26.50.070 if: (a) A superior court has exercised
or is exercising jurisdiction over a proceeding under this title or
chapter 13.34 RCW involving the parties; (b) the petition for relief
under this chapter presents issues of residential schedule of and
contact with children of the parties; or (c) the petition for relief
under this chapter requests the court to exclude a party from the
dwelling which the parties share. When the jurisdiction of a district
or municipal court is limited to the issuance and enforcement of a
temporary order, the district or municipal court shall set the full
hearing provided for in RCW 26.50.050 in superior court and transfer
the case. If the notice and order are not served on the respondent in
time for the full hearing, the issuing court shall have concurrent
jurisdiction with the superior court to extend the order for
protection.
(6) An action under this chapter shall be filed in the county or
the municipality where the petitioner resides, unless the petitioner
has left the residence or household to avoid abuse. In that case, the
petitioner may bring an action in the county or municipality of the
previous or the new household or residence.
(7) A person's right to petition for relief under this chapter is
not affected by the person leaving the residence or household to avoid
abuse.

Sec. 303 RCW 26.50.060 and 2009 c 439 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon notice and after hearing, the court may provide relief as
follows:
(a) Restrain the respondent from committing acts of domestic
violence;
(b) Exclude the respondent from the dwelling that the parties
share, from the residence, workplace, or school of the petitioner, or
from the day care or school of a child;
(c) Prohibit the respondent from knowingly coming within, or
knowingly remaining within, a specified distance from a specified
location;
(d) On the same basis as is provided in chapter 26.09 RCW, the
court shall make residential provision with regard to minor children of
the parties. However, parenting plans as specified in chapter 26.09
RCW shall not be required under this chapter;
(e) Order the respondent to participate in a domestic violence
perpetrator treatment program approved under RCW 26.50.150;
(f) Order other relief as it deems necessary for the protection of
the petitioner and other family or household members sought to be
protected, including orders or directives to a peace officer, as
allowed under this chapter;
(g) Require the respondent to pay the administrative court costs
and service fees, as established by the county or municipality
incurring the expense and to reimburse the petitioner for costs
incurred in bringing the action, including reasonable attorneys' fees;
(h) Restrain the respondent from having any contact with the victim
of domestic violence or the victim's children or members of the
victim's household;
(i) Restrain the respondent from harassing, following, keeping
under physical or electronic surveillance, cyberstalking as defined in
RCW 9.61.260, and using telephonic, audiovisual, or other electronic
means to monitor the actions, location, or communication of a victim of
domestic violence, the victim's children, or members of the victim's
household. For the purposes of this subsection, "communication"
includes both "wire communication" and "electronic communication" as
defined in RCW 9.73.260;
(j) Require the respondent to submit to electronic monitoring. The
order shall specify who shall provide the electronic monitoring
services and the terms under which the monitoring must be performed.
The order also may include a requirement that the respondent pay the
costs of the monitoring. The court shall consider the ability of the
respondent to pay for electronic monitoring;
(((j))) (k) Consider the provisions of RCW 9.41.800;
(((k))) (l) Order possession and use of essential personal effects.
The court shall list the essential personal effects with sufficient
specificity to make it clear which property is included. Personal
effects may include pets. The court may order that a petitioner be
granted the exclusive custody or control of any pet owned, possessed,
leased, kept, or held by the petitioner, respondent, or minor child
residing with either the petitioner or respondent and may prohibit the
respondent from interfering with the petitioner's efforts to remove the
pet. The court may also prohibit the respondent from knowingly coming
within, or knowingly remaining within, a specified distance of
specified locations where the pet is regularly found; and
(((l))) (m) Order use of a vehicle.
(2) If a protection order restrains the respondent from contacting
the respondent's minor children the restraint shall be for a fixed
period not to exceed one year. This limitation is not applicable to
orders for protection issued under chapter 26.09, 26.10, or 26.26 RCW.
With regard to other relief, if the petitioner has petitioned for
relief on his or her own behalf or on behalf of the petitioner's family
or household members or minor children, and the court finds that the
respondent is likely to resume acts of domestic violence against the
petitioner or the petitioner's family or household members or minor
children when the order expires, the court may either grant relief for
a fixed period or enter a permanent order of protection.
If the petitioner has petitioned for relief on behalf of the
respondent's minor children, the court shall advise the petitioner that
if the petitioner wants to continue protection for a period beyond one
year the petitioner may either petition for renewal pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter or may seek relief pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 26.09 or 26.26 RCW.
(3) If the court grants an order for a fixed time period, the
petitioner may apply for renewal of the order by filing a petition for
renewal at any time within the three months before the order expires.
The petition for renewal shall state the reasons why the petitioner
seeks to renew the protection order. Upon receipt of the petition for
renewal the court shall order a hearing which shall be not later than
fourteen days from the date of the order. Except as provided in RCW
26.50.085, personal service shall be made on the respondent not less
than five days before the hearing. If timely service cannot be made
the court shall set a new hearing date and shall either require
additional attempts at obtaining personal service or permit service by
publication as provided in RCW 26.50.085 or by mail as provided in RCW
26.50.123. If the court permits service by publication or mail, the
court shall set the new hearing date not later than twenty-four days
from the date of the order. If the order expires because timely
service cannot be made the court shall grant an ex parte order of
protection as provided in RCW 26.50.070. The court shall grant the
petition for renewal unless the respondent proves by a preponderance of
the evidence that the respondent will not resume acts of domestic
violence against the petitioner or the petitioner's children or family
or household members when the order expires. The court may renew the
protection order for another fixed time period or may enter a permanent
order as provided in this section. The court may award court costs,
service fees, and reasonable attorneys' fees as provided in subsection
(1)(g) of this section.
(4) In providing relief under this chapter, the court may realign
the designation of the parties as "petitioner" and "respondent" where
the court finds that the original petitioner is the abuser and the
original respondent is the victim of domestic violence and may issue an
ex parte temporary order for protection in accordance with RCW
26.50.070 on behalf of the victim until the victim is able to prepare
a petition for an order for protection in accordance with RCW
26.50.030.
(5) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, no order
for protection shall grant relief to any party except upon notice to
the respondent and hearing pursuant to a petition or counter-petition
filed and served by the party seeking relief in accordance with RCW
26.50.050.
(6) The court order shall specify the date the order expires if
any. The court order shall also state whether the court issued the
protection order following personal service, service by publication, or
service by mail and whether the court has approved service by
publication or mail of an order issued under this section.
(7) If the court declines to issue an order for protection or
declines to renew an order for protection, the court shall state in
writing on the order the particular reasons for the court's denial.

Sec. 304 RCW 26.50.070 and 2000 c 119 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Where an application under this section alleges that
irreparable injury could result from domestic violence if an order is
not issued immediately without prior notice to the respondent, the
court may grant an ex parte temporary order for protection, pending a
full hearing, and grant relief as the court deems proper, including an
order:
(a) Restraining any party from committing acts of domestic
violence;
(b) Restraining any party from going onto the grounds of or
entering the dwelling that the parties share, from the residence,
workplace, or school of the other, or from the day care or school of a
child until further order of the court;
(c) Prohibiting any party from knowingly coming within, or
knowingly remaining within, a specified distance from a specified
location;
(d) Restraining any party from interfering with the other's custody
of the minor children or from removing the children from the
jurisdiction of the court;
(e) Restraining any party from having any contact with the victim
of domestic violence or the victim's children or members of the
victim's household; ((and))
(f) Considering the provisions of RCW 9.41.800; and
(g) Restraining the respondent from harassing, following, keeping
under physical or electronic surveillance, cyberstalking as defined in
RCW 9.61.260, and using telephonic, audiovisual, or other electronic
means to monitor the actions, location, or communication of a victim of
domestic violence, the victim's children, or members of the victim's
household. For the purposes of this subsection, "communication"
includes both "wire communication" and "electronic communication" as
defined in RCW 9.73.260.
(2) Irreparable injury under this section includes but is not
limited to situations in which the respondent has recently threatened
petitioner with bodily injury or has engaged in acts of domestic
violence against the petitioner.
(3) The court shall hold an ex parte hearing in person or by
telephone on the day the petition is filed or on the following judicial
day.
(4) An ex parte temporary order for protection shall be effective
for a fixed period not to exceed fourteen days or twenty-four days if
the court has permitted service by publication under RCW 26.50.085 or
by mail under RCW 26.50.123. The ex parte order may be reissued. A
full hearing, as provided in this chapter, shall be set for not later
than fourteen days from the issuance of the temporary order or not
later than twenty-four days if service by publication or by mail is
permitted. Except as provided in RCW 26.50.050, 26.50.085, and
26.50.123, the respondent shall be personally served with a copy of the
ex parte order along with a copy of the petition and notice of the date
set for the hearing.
(5) Any order issued under this section shall contain the date and
time of issuance and the expiration date and shall be entered into a
statewide judicial information system by the clerk of the court within
one judicial day after issuance.
(6) If the court declines to issue an ex parte temporary order for
protection the court shall state the particular reasons for the court's
denial. The court's denial of a motion for an ex parte order of
protection shall be filed with the court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 A new section is added to chapter 26.50
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In a proceeding in which a petition for an order for protection
under this chapter is sought, a court of this state may exercise
personal jurisdiction over a nonresident individual if:
(a) The individual is personally served with a petition within this
state;
(b) The individual submits to the jurisdiction of this state by
consent, entering a general appearance, or filing a responsive document
having the effect of waiving any objection to consent to personal
jurisdiction;
(c) The act or acts of the individual or the individual's agent
giving rise to the petition or enforcement of an order for protection
either:
(i) Occurred within this state; or
(ii) Occurred outside this state and are part of a continuing
course of conduct having an adverse effect on a person in this state;
(d) As a result of the acts of the individual, the petitioner
resides in this state; or
(e) There is any other basis consistent with RCW 4.28.185 or with
the Constitutions of this state and the United States.
(2) For the purposes of this section, an act or acts that "occurred
within this state" includes, but is not limited to, an oral or written
statement made or published by a person outside of this state to any
person in this state by means of the mail, interstate commerce, or
foreign commerce. Oral or written statements sent by electronic mail
or the internet are deemed to have "occurred within this state."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 A new section is added to chapter 7.90 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In a proceeding in which a petition for a sexual assault
protection order is sought under this chapter, a court of this state
may exercise personal jurisdiction over a nonresident individual if:
(a) The individual is personally served with a petition within this
state;
(b) The individual submits to the jurisdiction of this state by
consent, entering a general appearance, or filing a responsive document
having the effect of waiving any objection to consent to personal
jurisdiction;
(c) The act or acts of the individual or the individual's agent
giving rise to the petition or enforcement of a sexual assault
protection order either:
(i) Occurred within this state; or
(ii) Occurred outside this state and are part of a continuing
course of conduct having an adverse effect on a person in this state;
(d) As a result of the acts of the individual, the petitioner
resides in this state; or
(e) There is any other basis consistent with RCW 4.28.185 or with
the constitutions of this state and the United States.
(2) For the purposes of this section, an act or acts that "occurred
within this state" includes, but is not limited to, an oral or written
statement made or published by a person outside of this state to any
person in this state by means of the mail, interstate commerce, or
foreign commerce. Oral or written statements sent by electronic mail
or the internet are deemed to have "occurred within this state."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 A new section is added to chapter 10.14
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In a proceeding in which a petition for an order for protection
under this chapter is sought, a court of this state may exercise
personal jurisdiction over a nonresident individual if:
(a) The individual is personally served with a petition within this
state;
(b) The individual submits to the jurisdiction of this state by
consent, entering a general appearance, or filing a responsive document
having the effect of waiving any objection to consent to personal
jurisdiction;
(c) The act or acts of the individual or the individual's agent
giving rise to the petition or enforcement of an order for protection
either:
(i) Occurred within this state; or
(ii) Occurred outside this state and are part of a continuing
course of conduct having an adverse effect on a person in this state;
(d) As a result of the acts of the individual, the petitioner
resides in this state; or
(e) There is any other basis consistent with RCW 4.28.185 or with
the constitutions of this state and the United States.
(2) For the purposes of this section, an act or acts that "occurred
within this state" includes, but is not limited to, an oral or written
statement made or published by a person outside of this state to any
person in this state by means of the mail, interstate commerce, or
foreign commerce. Oral or written statements sent by electronic mail
or the internet are deemed to have "occurred within this state."

Sec. 308 RCW 10.99.040 and 2000 c 119 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Because of the serious nature of domestic violence, the court
in domestic violence actions:
(a) Shall not dismiss any charge or delay disposition because of
concurrent dissolution or other civil proceedings;
(b) Shall not require proof that either party is seeking a
dissolution of marriage prior to instigation of criminal proceedings;
(c) Shall waive any requirement that the victim's location be
disclosed to any person, other than the attorney of a criminal
defendant, upon a showing that there is a possibility of further
violence: PROVIDED, That the court may order a criminal defense
attorney not to disclose to his or her client the victim's location;
and
(d) Shall identify by any reasonable means on docket sheets those
criminal actions arising from acts of domestic violence.
(2)(a) Because of the likelihood of repeated violence directed at
those who have been victims of domestic violence in the past, when any
person charged with or arrested for a crime involving domestic violence
is released from custody before arraignment or trial on bail or
personal recognizance, the court authorizing the release may prohibit
that person from having any contact with the victim. The jurisdiction
authorizing the release shall determine whether that person should be
prohibited from having any contact with the victim. If there is no
outstanding restraining or protective order prohibiting that person
from having contact with the victim, the court authorizing release may
issue, by telephone, a no-contact order prohibiting the person charged
or arrested from having contact with the victim or from knowingly
coming within, or knowingly remaining within, a specified distance of
a location.
(b) In issuing the order, the court shall consider the provisions
of RCW 9.41.800.
(c) The no-contact order shall also be issued in writing as soon as
possible. By January 1, 2011, the administrative office of the courts
shall develop a pattern form for all no-contact orders issued under
this chapter. A no-contact order issued under this chapter must
substantially comply with the pattern form developed by the
administrative office of the courts.
(3) At the time of arraignment the court shall determine whether a
no-contact order shall be issued or extended. The no-contact order
shall terminate if the defendant is acquitted or the charges are
dismissed. If a no-contact order is issued or extended, the court may
also include in the conditions of release a requirement that the
defendant submit to electronic monitoring. If electronic monitoring is
ordered, the court shall specify who shall provide the monitoring
services, and the terms under which the monitoring shall be performed.
Upon conviction, the court may require as a condition of the sentence
that the defendant reimburse the providing agency for the costs of the
electronic monitoring.
(4)(a) Willful violation of a court order issued under subsection
(2) or (3) of this section is punishable under RCW 26.50.110.
(b) The written order releasing the person charged or arrested
shall contain the court's directives and shall bear the legend:
"Violation of this order is a criminal offense under chapter 26.50 RCW
and will subject a violator to arrest; any assault, drive-by shooting,
or reckless endangerment that is a violation of this order is a felony.
You can be arrested even if any person protected by the order invites
or allows you to violate the order's prohibitions. You have the sole
responsibility to avoid or refrain from violating the order's
provisions. Only the court can change the order."
(c) A certified copy of the order shall be provided to the victim.
(5) If a no-contact order has been issued prior to charging, that
order shall expire at arraignment or within seventy-two hours if
charges are not filed. Such orders need not be entered into the
computer-based criminal intelligence information system in this state
which is used by law enforcement agencies to list outstanding warrants.
(6) Whenever a no-contact order is issued, modified, or terminated
under subsection (2) or (3) of this section, the clerk of the court
shall forward a copy of the order on or before the next judicial day to
the appropriate law enforcement agency specified in the order. Upon
receipt of the copy of the order the law enforcement agency shall enter
the order for one year or until the expiration date specified on the
order into any computer-based criminal intelligence information system
available in this state used by law enforcement agencies to list
outstanding warrants. Entry into the computer-based criminal
intelligence information system constitutes notice to all law
enforcement agencies of the existence of the order. The order is fully
enforceable in any jurisdiction in the state. Upon receipt of notice
that an order has been terminated under subsection (3) of this section,
the law enforcement agency shall remove the order from the computer-based criminal intelligence information system.
(7) All courts shall develop policies and procedures by January 1,
2011, to grant victims a process to modify or rescind a no-contact
order issued under this chapter. The administrative office of the
courts shall develop a model policy to assist the courts in
implementing the requirements of this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 A new section is added to chapter 2.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The administrative office of the courts shall develop
guidelines by December 1, 2011, for all courts to establish a process
to reconcile duplicate or conflicting no-contact or protection orders
issued by courts in this state.
(2) The guidelines developed under subsection (1) of this section
must include:
(a) A process to allow any party named in a no-contact or
protection order to petition for the purpose of reconciling duplicate
or conflicting orders; and
(b) A procedure to address no-contact and protection order data
sharing between court jurisdictions in this state.
(3) By January 1, 2011, the administrative office of the courts
shall provide a report back to the legislature concerning the progress
made to develop the guidelines required by this section.

Sec. 310 RCW 9.41.040 and 2009 c 293 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A person, whether an adult or juvenile, is guilty of the
crime of unlawful possession of a firearm in the first degree, if the
person owns, has in his or her possession, or has in his or her control
any firearm after having previously been convicted or found not guilty
by reason of insanity in this state or elsewhere of any serious offense
as defined in this chapter.
(b) Unlawful possession of a firearm in the first degree is a class
B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(2)(a) A person, whether an adult or juvenile, is guilty of the
crime of unlawful possession of a firearm in the second degree, if the
person does not qualify under subsection (1) of this section for the
crime of unlawful possession of a firearm in the first degree and the
person owns, has in his or her possession, or has in his or her control
any firearm:
(i) After having previously been convicted or found not guilty by
reason of insanity in this state or elsewhere of any felony not
specifically listed as prohibiting firearm possession under subsection
(1) of this section((, or));
(ii) After having previously been convicted or found not guilty by
reason of insanity in this state or elsewhere of any of the following
crimes when committed by one family or household member against
another, committed on or after July 1, 1993: Assault in the fourth
degree, coercion, stalking, reckless endangerment, criminal trespass in
the first degree, harassment, or violation of the provisions of a
protection order or no-contact order restraining the person or
excluding the person from a residence (RCW 26.50.060, 26.50.070,
26.50.130, or 10.99.040);
(((ii))) (iii) During any period of time that the person is subject
to an order issued under chapter 10.99, 26.50, or 26.52 RCW that:
(A) Was issued after a hearing of which the person received actual
notice, and at which the person had an opportunity to participate; and
(B) Restrains the person from causing physical harm or bodily
injury, assaulting, sexually assaulting, molesting, harassing,
threatening, or stalking, a family or household member of the person,
or a minor child of the family or household member;
(iv) After having previously been involuntarily committed for
mental health treatment under RCW 71.05.240, 71.05.320, 71.34.740,
71.34.750, chapter 10.77 RCW, or equivalent statutes of another
jurisdiction, unless his or her right to possess a firearm has been
restored as provided in RCW 9.41.047;
(((iii))) (v) If the person is under eighteen years of age, except
as provided in RCW 9.41.042; and/or
(((iv))) (vi) If the person is free on bond or personal
recognizance pending trial, appeal, or sentencing for a serious offense
as defined in RCW 9.41.010.
(b) Unlawful possession of a firearm in the second degree is a
class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(3) Notwithstanding RCW 9.41.047 or any other provisions of law, as
used in this chapter, a person has been "convicted", whether in an
adult court or adjudicated in a juvenile court, at such time as a plea
of guilty has been accepted, or a verdict of guilty has been filed,
notwithstanding the pendency of any future proceedings including but
not limited to sentencing or disposition, post-trial or post-factfinding motions, and appeals. Conviction includes a dismissal
entered after a period of probation, suspension or deferral of
sentence, and also includes equivalent dispositions by courts in
jurisdictions other than Washington state. A person shall not be
precluded from possession of a firearm if the conviction has been the
subject of a pardon, annulment, certificate of rehabilitation, or other
equivalent procedure based on a finding of the rehabilitation of the
person convicted or the conviction or disposition has been the subject
of a pardon, annulment, or other equivalent procedure based on a
finding of innocence. Where no record of the court's disposition of
the charges can be found, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that
the person was not convicted of the charge.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (1) or (2) of this section, a person
convicted or found not guilty by reason of insanity of an offense
prohibiting the possession of a firearm under this section other than
murder, manslaughter, robbery, rape, indecent liberties, arson,
assault, kidnapping, extortion, burglary, or violations with respect to
controlled substances under RCW 69.50.401 and 69.50.410, who received
a probationary sentence under RCW 9.95.200, and who received a
dismissal of the charge under RCW 9.95.240, shall not be precluded from
possession of a firearm as a result of the conviction or finding of not
guilty by reason of insanity. Notwithstanding any other provisions of
this section, if a person is prohibited from possession of a firearm
under subsection (1) or (2) of this section and has not previously been
convicted or found not guilty by reason of insanity of a sex offense
prohibiting firearm ownership under subsection (1) or (2) of this
section and/or any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or
with a maximum sentence of at least twenty years, or both, the
individual may petition a court of record to have his or her right to
possess a firearm restored:
(a) Under RCW 9.41.047; and/or
(b)(i) If the conviction or finding of not guilty by reason of
insanity was for a felony offense, after five or more consecutive years
in the community without being convicted or found not guilty by reason
of insanity or currently charged with any felony, gross misdemeanor, or
misdemeanor crimes, if the individual has no prior felony convictions
that prohibit the possession of a firearm counted as part of the
offender score under RCW 9.94A.525; or
(ii) If the conviction or finding of not guilty by reason of
insanity was for a nonfelony offense, after three or more consecutive
years in the community without being convicted or found not guilty by
reason of insanity or currently charged with any felony, gross
misdemeanor, or misdemeanor crimes, if the individual has no prior
felony convictions that prohibit the possession of a firearm counted as
part of the offender score under RCW 9.94A.525 and the individual has
completed all conditions of the sentence.
(5) In addition to any other penalty provided for by law, if a
person under the age of eighteen years is found by a court to have
possessed a firearm in a vehicle in violation of subsection (1) or (2)
of this section or to have committed an offense while armed with a
firearm during which offense a motor vehicle served an integral
function, the court shall notify the department of licensing within
twenty-four hours and the person's privilege to drive shall be revoked
under RCW 46.20.265.
(6) Nothing in chapter 129, Laws of 1995 shall ever be construed or
interpreted as preventing an offender from being charged and
subsequently convicted for the separate felony crimes of theft of a
firearm or possession of a stolen firearm, or both, in addition to
being charged and subsequently convicted under this section for
unlawful possession of a firearm in the first or second degree.
Notwithstanding any other law, if the offender is convicted under this
section for unlawful possession of a firearm in the first or second
degree and for the felony crimes of theft of a firearm or possession of
a stolen firearm, or both, then the offender shall serve consecutive
sentences for each of the felony crimes of conviction listed in this
subsection.
(7) Each firearm unlawfully possessed under this section shall be
a separate offense.

Sec. 311 RCW 9.41.800 and 2002 c 302 s 704 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any court when entering an order authorized under RCW
9A.46.080, 10.14.080, 10.99.040, 10.99.045, 26.09.050, 26.09.060,
26.10.040, 26.10.115, 26.26.130, 26.50.060, 26.50.070, or 26.26.590
shall, upon a showing by clear and convincing evidence, that a party
has: Used, displayed, or threatened to use a firearm or other
dangerous weapon in a felony, or previously committed any offense that
makes him or her ineligible to possess a firearm under the provisions
of RCW 9.41.040:
(a) Require the party to surrender any firearm or other dangerous
weapon;
(b) Require the party to surrender any concealed pistol license
issued under RCW 9.41.070;
(c) Prohibit the party from obtaining or possessing a firearm or
other dangerous weapon;
(d) Prohibit the party from obtaining or possessing a concealed
pistol license.
(2) Any court when entering an order authorized under RCW
9A.46.080, 10.14.080, 10.99.040, 10.99.045, 26.09.050, 26.09.060,
26.10.040, 26.10.115, 26.26.130, 26.50.060, 26.50.070, or 26.26.590
may, upon a showing by a preponderance of the evidence but not by clear
and convincing evidence, that a party has: Used, displayed, or
threatened to use a firearm or other dangerous weapon in a felony, or
previously committed any offense that makes him or her ineligible to
possess a pistol under the provisions of RCW 9.41.040:
(a) Require the party to surrender any firearm or other dangerous
weapon;
(b) Require the party to surrender a concealed pistol license
issued under RCW 9.41.070;
(c) Prohibit the party from obtaining or possessing a firearm or
other dangerous weapon;
(d) Prohibit the party from obtaining or possessing a concealed
pistol license.
(3) Any court when entering an order under RCW 10.99.040,
10.99.045, or 26.50.060 that restrains the party from causing physical
harm or bodily injury, assaulting, sexually assaulting, molesting,
harassing, threatening, or stalking, a family or household member of
the party, or a minor child of the family or household member, shall:
(a) Require the party to surrender any firearm or other dangerous
weapon; and
(b) Prohibit the party from obtaining or possessing a firearm or
other dangerous weapon.
(4) The court may order temporary surrender of a firearm or other
dangerous weapon without notice to the other party if it finds, on the
basis of the moving affidavit or other evidence, that irreparable
injury could result if an order is not issued until the time for
response has elapsed.
(((4))) (5) In addition to the provisions of subsections (1), (2),
((and)) (3), and (4) of this section, the court may enter an order
requiring a party to comply with the provisions in subsection (1) of
this section if it finds that the possession of a firearm or other
dangerous weapon by any party presents a serious and imminent threat to
public health or safety, or to the health or safety of any individual.
(((5))) (6) The requirements of subsections (1), (2), and (((4)))
(5) of this section may be for a period of time less than the duration
of the order.
(((6))) (7) The court may require the party to surrender any
firearm or other dangerous weapon in his or her immediate possession or
control or subject to his or her immediate possession or control to the
sheriff of the county having jurisdiction of the proceeding, the chief
of police of the municipality having jurisdiction, or to the restrained
or enjoined party's counsel or to any person designated by the court.

PART FOUR
SENTENCING REFORMS
Sec. 401 RCW 9.94A.535 and 2008 c 276 s 303 and 2008 c 233 s 9
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The court may impose a sentence outside the standard sentence range
for an offense if it finds, considering the purpose of this chapter,
that there are substantial and compelling reasons justifying an
exceptional sentence. Facts supporting aggravated sentences, other
than the fact of a prior conviction, shall be determined pursuant to
the provisions of RCW 9.94A.537.
Whenever a sentence outside the standard sentence range is imposed,
the court shall set forth the reasons for its decision in written
findings of fact and conclusions of law. A sentence outside the
standard sentence range shall be a determinate sentence.
If the sentencing court finds that an exceptional sentence outside
the standard sentence range should be imposed, the sentence is subject
to review only as provided for in RCW 9.94A.585(4).
A departure from the standards in RCW 9.94A.589 (1) and (2)
governing whether sentences are to be served consecutively or
concurrently is an exceptional sentence subject to the limitations in
this section, and may be appealed by the offender or the state as set
forth in RCW 9.94A.585 (2) through (6).
(1) Mitigating Circumstances - Court to Consider
The court may impose an exceptional sentence below the standard
range if it finds that mitigating circumstances are established by a
preponderance of the evidence. The following are illustrative only and
are not intended to be exclusive reasons for exceptional sentences.
(a) To a significant degree, the victim was an initiator, willing
participant, aggressor, or provoker of the incident.
(b) Before detection, the defendant compensated, or made a good
faith effort to compensate, the victim of the criminal conduct for any
damage or injury sustained.
(c) The defendant committed the crime under duress, coercion,
threat, or compulsion insufficient to constitute a complete defense but
which significantly affected his or her conduct.
(d) The defendant, with no apparent predisposition to do so, was
induced by others to participate in the crime.
(e) The defendant's capacity to appreciate the wrongfulness of his
or her conduct, or to conform his or her conduct to the requirements of
the law, was significantly impaired. Voluntary use of drugs or alcohol
is excluded.
(f) The offense was principally accomplished by another person and
the defendant manifested extreme caution or sincere concern for the
safety or well-being of the victim.
(g) The operation of the multiple offense policy of RCW 9.94A.589
results in a presumptive sentence that is clearly excessive in light of
the purpose of this chapter, as expressed in RCW 9.94A.010.
(h) The defendant or the defendant's children suffered a continuing
pattern of physical or sexual abuse by the victim of the offense and
the offense is a response to that abuse.
(i) The current offense involved domestic violence, as defined in
RCW 10.99.020, and the defendant suffered a continuing pattern of
coercion, control, or abuse by the victim of the offense and the
offense is a response to that coercion, control, or abuse.
(2) Aggravating Circumstances - Considered and Imposed by the Court
The trial court may impose an aggravated exceptional sentence
without a finding of fact by a jury under the following circumstances:
(a) The defendant and the state both stipulate that justice is best
served by the imposition of an exceptional sentence outside the
standard range, and the court finds the exceptional sentence to be
consistent with and in furtherance of the interests of justice and the
purposes of the sentencing reform act.
(b) The defendant's prior unscored misdemeanor or prior unscored
foreign criminal history results in a presumptive sentence that is
clearly too lenient in light of the purpose of this chapter, as
expressed in RCW 9.94A.010.
(c) The defendant has committed multiple current offenses and the
defendant's high offender score results in some of the current offenses
going unpunished.
(d) The failure to consider the defendant's prior criminal history
which was omitted from the offender score calculation pursuant to RCW
9.94A.525 results in a presumptive sentence that is clearly too
lenient.
(3) Aggravating Circumstances - Considered by a Jury -Imposed by
the Court
Except for circumstances listed in subsection (2) of this section,
the following circumstances are an exclusive list of factors that can
support a sentence above the standard range. Such facts should be
determined by procedures specified in RCW 9.94A.537.
(a) The defendant's conduct during the commission of the current
offense manifested deliberate cruelty to the victim.
(b) The defendant knew or should have known that the victim of the
current offense was particularly vulnerable or incapable of resistance.
(c) The current offense was a violent offense, and the defendant
knew that the victim of the current offense was pregnant.
(d) The current offense was a major economic offense or series of
offenses, so identified by a consideration of any of the following
factors:
(i) The current offense involved multiple victims or multiple
incidents per victim;
(ii) The current offense involved attempted or actual monetary loss
substantially greater than typical for the offense;
(iii) The current offense involved a high degree of sophistication
or planning or occurred over a lengthy period of time; or
(iv) The defendant used his or her position of trust, confidence,
or fiduciary responsibility to facilitate the commission of the current
offense.
(e) The current offense was a major violation of the Uniform
Controlled Substances Act, chapter 69.50 RCW (VUCSA), related to
trafficking in controlled substances, which was more onerous than the
typical offense of its statutory definition: The presence of ANY of
the following may identify a current offense as a major VUCSA:
(i) The current offense involved at least three separate
transactions in which controlled substances were sold, transferred, or
possessed with intent to do so;
(ii) The current offense involved an attempted or actual sale or
transfer of controlled substances in quantities substantially larger
than for personal use;
(iii) The current offense involved the manufacture of controlled
substances for use by other parties;
(iv) The circumstances of the current offense reveal the offender
to have occupied a high position in the drug distribution hierarchy;
(v) The current offense involved a high degree of sophistication or
planning, occurred over a lengthy period of time, or involved a broad
geographic area of disbursement; or
(vi) The offender used his or her position or status to facilitate
the commission of the current offense, including positions of trust,
confidence or fiduciary responsibility (e.g., pharmacist, physician, or
other medical professional).
(f) The current offense included a finding of sexual motivation
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.835.
(g) The offense was part of an ongoing pattern of sexual abuse of
the same victim under the age of eighteen years manifested by multiple
incidents over a prolonged period of time.
(h) The current offense involved domestic violence, as defined in
RCW 10.99.020, and one or more of the following was present:
(i) The offense was part of an ongoing pattern of psychological,
physical, or sexual abuse of ((the)) a victim or multiple victims
manifested by multiple incidents over a prolonged period of time;
(ii) The offense occurred within sight or sound of the victim's or
the offender's minor children under the age of eighteen years; or
(iii) The offender's conduct during the commission of the current
offense manifested deliberate cruelty or intimidation of the victim.
(i) The offense resulted in the pregnancy of a child victim of
rape.
(j) The defendant knew that the victim of the current offense was
a youth who was not residing with a legal custodian and the defendant
established or promoted the relationship for the primary purpose of
victimization.
(k) The offense was committed with the intent to obstruct or impair
human or animal health care or agricultural or forestry research or
commercial production.
(l) The current offense is trafficking in the first degree or
trafficking in the second degree and any victim was a minor at the time
of the offense.
(m) The offense involved a high degree of sophistication or
planning.
(n) The defendant used his or her position of trust, confidence, or
fiduciary responsibility to facilitate the commission of the current
offense.
(o) The defendant committed a current sex offense, has a history of
sex offenses, and is not amenable to treatment.
(p) The offense involved an invasion of the victim's privacy.
(q) The defendant demonstrated or displayed an egregious lack of
remorse.
(r) The offense involved a destructive and foreseeable impact on
persons other than the victim.
(s) The defendant committed the offense to obtain or maintain his
or her membership or to advance his or her position in the hierarchy of
an organization, association, or identifiable group.
(t) The defendant committed the current offense shortly after being
released from incarceration.
(u) The current offense is a burglary and the victim of the
burglary was present in the building or residence when the crime was
committed.
(v) The offense was committed against a law enforcement officer who
was performing his or her official duties at the time of the offense,
the offender knew that the victim was a law enforcement officer, and
the victim's status as a law enforcement officer is not an element of
the offense.
(w) The defendant committed the offense against a victim who was
acting as a good samaritan.
(x) The defendant committed the offense against a public official
or officer of the court in retaliation of the public official's
performance of his or her duty to the criminal justice system.
(y) The victim's injuries substantially exceed the level of bodily
harm necessary to satisfy the elements of the offense. This aggravator
is not an exception to RCW 9.94A.530(2).
(z)(i)(A) The current offense is theft in the first degree, theft
in the second degree, possession of stolen property in the first
degree, or possession of stolen property in the second degree; (B) the
stolen property involved is metal property; and (C) the property damage
to the victim caused in the course of the theft of metal property is
more than three times the value of the stolen metal property, or the
theft of the metal property creates a public hazard.
(ii) For purposes of this subsection, "metal property" means
commercial metal property, private metal property, or nonferrous metal
property, as defined in RCW 19.290.010.
(aa) The defendant committed the offense with the intent to
directly or indirectly cause any benefit, aggrandizement, gain, profit,
or other advantage to or for a criminal street gang as defined in RCW
9.94A.030, its reputation, influence, or membership.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 A new section is added to chapter 10.99
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In sentencing for a crime of domestic violence as defined in
this chapter, courts of limited jurisdiction shall consider, among
other factors, whether:
(a) The defendant suffered a continuing pattern of coercion,
control, or abuse by the victim of the offense and the offense is a
response to that coercion, control, or abuse;
(b) The offense was part of an ongoing pattern of psychological,
physical, or sexual abuse of a victim or multiple victims manifested by
multiple incidents over a prolonged period of time; and
(c) The offense occurred within sight or sound of the victim's or
the offender's minor children under the age of eighteen years.
(2)(a) In sentencing for a crime of domestic violence as defined in
this chapter, the prosecutor shall provide for the court's review:
(i) The defendant's criminal history, if any, that occurred in
Washington or any other state;
(ii) If available, the defendant's prior criminal history that
occurred in any tribal jurisdiction; and
(iii) The defendant's individual order history.
(b) For the purposes of (a) of this subsection, criminal history
includes all previous convictions and orders of deferred prosecution,
as reported through the judicial information system or otherwise
available to the court or prosecutor, current to within the period
specified in (c) of this subsection before the date of sentencing.
(c) The periods applicable to previous convictions and orders of
deferred prosecution are:
(i) One working day, in the case of previous actions of courts that
fully participate in the state judicial information system; and
(ii) Seven calendar days, in the case of previous actions of courts
that do not fully participate in the judicial information system. For
the purposes of this subsection, "fully participate" means regularly
providing records to and receiving records from the system by
electronic means on a daily basis.

Sec. 403 RCW 3.66.068 and 2001 c 94 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
For a period not to exceed five years after imposition of sentence
for a defendant sentenced for a domestic violence offense or under RCW
46.61.5055 and two years after imposition of sentence for all other
offenses, the court has continuing jurisdiction and authority to
suspend or defer the execution of all or any part of its sentence upon
stated terms, including installment payment of fines. A defendant who
has been sentenced, or whose sentence has been deferred, and who then
fails to appear for any hearing to address the defendant's compliance
with the terms of probation when ordered to do so by the court, shall
have the term of probation tolled until such time as the defendant
makes his or her presence known to the court on the record. However,
the jurisdiction period in this section does not apply to the
enforcement of orders issued under RCW 46.20.720. For the purposes of
this section, "domestic violence offense" means a crime listed in RCW
10.99.020 that is not a felony offense.

PART FIVE
TREATMENT/SERVICES FOR PERPETRATORS AND VICTIMS
Sec. 501 RCW 26.50.150 and 1999 c 147 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any program that provides domestic violence treatment to
perpetrators of domestic violence must be certified by the department
of social and health services and meet minimum standards for domestic
violence treatment purposes. The department of social and health
services shall adopt rules for standards of approval of domestic
violence perpetrator programs ((that accept perpetrators of domestic
violence into treatment to satisfy court orders or that represent the
programs as ones that treat domestic violence perpetrators)). The
treatment must meet the following minimum qualifications:
(1) All treatment must be based upon a full, complete clinical
intake including but not limited to: Current and past violence
history; a lethality risk assessment; history of treatment from past
domestic violence perpetrator treatment programs; a complete diagnostic
evaluation; a substance abuse assessment; criminal history; assessment
of cultural issues, learning disabilities, literacy, and special
language needs; and a treatment plan that adequately and appropriately
addresses the treatment needs of the individual.
(2) To facilitate communication necessary for periodic safety
checks and case monitoring, the program must require the perpetrator to
sign the following releases:
(a) A release for the program to inform the victim and victim's
community and legal advocates that the perpetrator is in treatment with
the program, and to provide information, for safety purposes, to the
victim and victim's community and legal advocates;
(b) A release to prior and current treatment agencies to provide
information on the perpetrator to the program; and
(c) A release for the program to provide information on the
perpetrator to relevant legal entities including: Lawyers, courts,
parole, probation, child protective services, and child welfare
services.
(3) Treatment must be for a minimum treatment period defined by the
secretary of the department by rule. The weekly treatment sessions
must be in a group unless there is a documented, clinical reason for
another modality. Any other therapies, such as individual, marital, or
family therapy, substance abuse evaluations or therapy, medication
reviews, or psychiatric interviews, may be concomitant with the weekly
group treatment sessions described in this section but not a substitute
for it.
(4) The treatment must focus primarily on ending the violence,
holding the perpetrator accountable for his or her violence, and
changing his or her behavior. The treatment must be based on
nonvictim-blaming strategies and philosophies and shall include
education about the individual, family, and cultural dynamics of
domestic violence. If the perpetrator or the victim has a minor child,
treatment must specifically include education regarding the effects of
domestic violence on children, such as the emotional impacts of
domestic violence on children and the long-term consequences that
exposure to incidents of domestic violence may have on children.
(5) Satisfactory completion of treatment must be contingent upon
the perpetrator meeting specific criteria, defined by rule by the
secretary of the department, and not just upon the end of a certain
period of time or a certain number of sessions.
(6) The program must have policies and procedures for dealing with
reoffenses and noncompliance.
(7) All evaluation and treatment services must be provided by, or
under the supervision of, qualified personnel.
(8) The secretary of the department may adopt rules and establish
fees as necessary to implement this section.
(9) The department may conduct on-site monitoring visits as part of
its plan for certifying domestic violence perpetrator programs and
monitoring implementation of the rules adopted by the secretary of the
department to determine compliance with the minimum qualifications for
domestic violence perpetrator programs. The applicant or certified
domestic violence perpetrator program shall cooperate fully with the
department in the monitoring visit and provide all program and
management records requested by the department to determine the
program's compliance with the minimum certification qualifications and
rules adopted by the department.

Sec. 502 RCW 7.68.020 and 2006 c 268 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following words and phrases as used in this chapter have the
meanings set forth in this section unless the context otherwise
requires.
(1) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(2) "Criminal act" means an act committed or attempted in this
state which is: (a) Punishable as a federal offense that is comparable
to a felony or gross misdemeanor in this state; (b) punishable as a
felony or gross misdemeanor under the laws of this state; (c) an act
committed outside the state of Washington against a resident of the
state of Washington which would be compensable had it occurred inside
this state and the crime occurred in a state which does not have a
crime victims compensation program, for which the victim is eligible as
set forth in the Washington compensation law; or (d) an act of
terrorism as defined in 18 U.S.C. Sec. 2331, as it exists on May 2,
1997, committed outside of the United States against a resident of the
state of Washington, except as follows:
(i) The operation of a motor vehicle, motorcycle, train, boat, or
aircraft in violation of law does not constitute a "criminal act"
unless:
(A) The injury or death was intentionally inflicted;
(B) The operation thereof was part of the commission of another
non-vehicular criminal act as defined in this section;
(C) The death or injury was the result of the operation of a motor
vehicle after July 24, 1983, and a preponderance of the evidence
establishes that the death was the result of vehicular homicide under
RCW 46.61.520, or a conviction of vehicular assault under RCW
46.61.522, has been obtained: PROVIDED, That in cases where a probable
criminal defendant has died in perpetration of vehicular assault or, in
cases where the perpetrator of the vehicular assault is unascertainable
because he or she left the scene of the accident in violation of RCW
46.52.020 or, because of physical or mental infirmity or disability the
perpetrator is incapable of standing trial for vehicular assault, the
department may, by a preponderance of the evidence, establish that a
vehicular assault had been committed and authorize benefits;
(D) The injury or death was caused by a driver in violation of RCW
46.61.502; or
(E) The injury or death was caused by a driver in violation of RCW
46.61.655(7)(a), failure to secure a load in the first degree;
(ii) Neither an acquittal in a criminal prosecution nor the absence
of any such prosecution is admissible in any claim or proceeding under
this chapter as evidence of the noncriminal character of the acts
giving rise to such claim or proceeding, except as provided for in
(d)(i)(C) of this subsection;
(iii) Evidence of a criminal conviction arising from acts which are
the basis for a claim or proceeding under this chapter is admissible in
such claim or proceeding for the limited purpose of proving the
criminal character of the acts; and
(iv) Acts which, but for the insanity or mental irresponsibility of
the perpetrator, would constitute criminal conduct are deemed to be
criminal conduct within the meaning of this chapter.
(3) "Victim" means a person who suffers bodily injury or death as
a proximate result of a criminal act of another person, the victim's
own good faith and reasonable effort to prevent a criminal act, or his
or her good faith effort to apprehend a person reasonably suspected of
engaging in a criminal act. For the purposes of receiving benefits
pursuant to this chapter, "victim" is interchangeable with "employee"
or "worker" as defined in chapter 51.08 RCW as now or hereafter
amended.
(4) "Child," "accredited school," "dependent," "beneficiary,"
"average monthly wage," "director," "injury," "invalid," "permanent
partial disability," and "permanent total disability" have the meanings
assigned to them in chapter 51.08 RCW as now or hereafter amended.
(5) "Gainfully employed" means engaging on a regular and continuous
basis in a lawful activity from which a person derives a livelihood.
(6) "Private insurance" means any source of recompense provided by
contract available as a result of the claimed injury or death at the
time of such injury or death, or which becomes available any time
thereafter.
(7) "Public insurance" means any source of recompense provided by
statute, state or federal, available as a result of the claimed injury
or death at the time of such injury or death, or which becomes
available any time thereafter.
(8) "Domestic violence offense" means any felony or nonfelony
domestic violence offense under chapter 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, 26.26, or
26.50 RCW.

Sec. 503 RCW 7.68.060 and 2001 c 153 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of applying for benefits under this chapter,
the rights, privileges, responsibilities, duties, limitations and
procedures contained in RCW 51.28.020, 51.28.030, 51.28.040 and
51.28.060 shall apply: PROVIDED, That except for applications received
pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, no compensation of any kind
shall be available under this chapter if:
(a) An application for benefits is not received by the department
within two years after the date the criminal act was reported to a
local police department or sheriff's office or the date the rights of
dependents or beneficiaries accrued, unless the director has determined
that "good cause" exists to expand the time permitted to receive the
application. "Good cause" shall be determined by the department on a
case-by-case basis and may extend the period of time in which an
application can be received for up to five years after the date the
criminal act was reported to a local police department or sheriff's
office or the date the rights of dependents or beneficiaries accrued;
or
(b) The criminal act is not reported by the victim or someone on
his or her behalf to a local police department or sheriff's office
within twelve months of its occurrence or, if it could not reasonably
have been reported within that period, within twelve months of the time
when a report could reasonably have been made. In making
determinations as to reasonable time limits, the department shall give
greatest weight to the needs of the victims.
(2) This section shall apply only to criminal acts reported after
December 31, 1985 and domestic violence offenses reported after July 1,
2010.
(3) Because victims of childhood criminal acts may repress
conscious memory of such criminal acts far beyond the age of eighteen,
the rights of adult victims of childhood criminal acts shall accrue at
the time the victim discovers or reasonably should have discovered the
elements of the crime. In making determinations as to reasonable time
limits, the department shall give greatest weight to the needs of the
victim.
(4) A right to benefits under this chapter is available to any
victim of a person against whom the state initiates proceedings under
chapter 71.09 RCW. The right created under this subsection shall
accrue when the victim is notified of proceedings under chapter 71.09
RCW or the victim is interviewed, deposed, or testifies as a witness in
connection with the proceedings. An application for benefits under
this subsection must be received by the department within two years
after the date the victim's right accrued unless the director
determines that good cause exists to expand the time to receive the
application. The director shall determine "good cause" on a case-by-case basis and may extend the period of time in which an application
can be received for up to five years after the date the right of the
victim accrued. Benefits under this subsection shall be limited to
compensation for costs or losses incurred on or after the date the
victim's right accrues for a claim allowed under this subsection.
(5)(a) A right to benefits under this chapter is available to any
child under the age of eighteen years old who: (i) Resides with a
person that has been a victim of a domestic violence offense; and (ii)
was a direct witness by sight or sound to the domestic violence offense
that occurred.
(b) The domestic violence offense must be reported by the victim or
someone on his or her behalf to a local police department or sheriff's
office within twelve months of its occurrence, or, if it could not
reasonably have been reported within that period, within twelve months
of the time when a report could reasonably have been made. Benefits
under this subsection are limited to compensation for domestic violence
treatment and counseling costs incurred as a result of a child being
the direct witness of the domestic violence offense occurring.

Sec. 504 RCW 7.68.070 and 2009 c 38 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The right to benefits under this chapter and the amount thereof
will be governed insofar as is applicable by the provisions contained
in chapter 51.32 RCW except as provided in this section:
(1) The provisions contained in RCW 51.32.015, 51.32.030,
51.32.072, 51.32.073, 51.32.180, 51.32.190, and 51.32.200 are not
applicable to this chapter.
(2) Each victim injured as a result of a criminal act, including
criminal acts committed between July 1, 1981, and January 1, 1983, or
the victim's family or dependents in case of death of the victim, are
entitled to benefits in accordance with this chapter, subject to the
limitations under RCW 7.68.015. The rights, duties, responsibilities,
limitations, and procedures applicable to a worker as contained in RCW
51.32.010 are applicable to this chapter.
(3) The limitations contained in RCW 51.32.020 are applicable to
claims under this chapter. In addition thereto, no person or spouse,
child, or dependent of such person is entitled to benefits under this
chapter when the injury for which benefits are sought, was:
(a) The result of consent, provocation, or incitement by the
victim, unless an injury resulting from a criminal act caused the death
of the victim;
(b) Sustained while the crime victim was engaged in the attempt to
commit, or the commission of, a felony; or
(c) Sustained while the victim was confined in any county or city
jail, federal jail or prison or in any other federal institution, or
any state correctional institution maintained and operated by the
department of social and health services or the department of
corrections, prior to release from lawful custody; or confined or
living in any other institution maintained and operated by the
department of social and health services or the department of
corrections.
(4) The benefits established upon the death of a worker and
contained in RCW 51.32.050 shall be the benefits obtainable under this
chapter and provisions relating to payment contained in that section
shall equally apply under this chapter: PROVIDED, That benefits for
burial expenses shall not exceed the amount paid by the department in
case of the death of a worker as provided in chapter 51.32 RCW in any
claim: PROVIDED FURTHER, That if the criminal act results in the death
of a victim who was not gainfully employed at the time of the criminal
act, and who was not so employed for at least three consecutive months
of the twelve months immediately preceding the criminal act;
(a) Benefits payable to an eligible surviving spouse, where there
are no children of the victim at the time of the criminal act who have
survived the victim or where such spouse has legal custody of all of
his or her children, shall be limited to burial expenses and a lump sum
payment of seven thousand five hundred dollars without reference to
number of children, if any;
(b) Where any such spouse has legal custody of one or more but not
all of such children, then such burial expenses shall be paid, and such
spouse shall receive a lump sum payment of three thousand seven hundred
fifty dollars and any such child or children not in the legal custody
of such spouse shall receive a lump sum of three thousand seven hundred
fifty dollars to be divided equally among such child or children;
(c) If any such spouse does not have legal custody of any of the
children, the burial expenses shall be paid and the spouse shall
receive a lump sum payment of up to three thousand seven hundred fifty
dollars and any such child or children not in the legal custody of the
spouse shall receive a lump sum payment of up to three thousand seven
hundred fifty dollars to be divided equally among the child or
children;
(d) If no such spouse survives, then such burial expenses shall be
paid, and each surviving child of the victim at the time of the
criminal act shall receive a lump sum payment of three thousand seven
hundred fifty dollars up to a total of two such children and where
there are more than two such children the sum of seven thousand five
hundred dollars shall be divided equally among such children.
No other benefits may be paid or payable under these circumstances.
(5) The benefits established in RCW 51.32.060 for permanent total
disability proximately caused by the criminal act shall be the benefits
obtainable under this chapter, and provisions relating to payment
contained in that section apply under this chapter: PROVIDED, That if
a victim becomes permanently and totally disabled as a proximate result
of the criminal act and was not gainfully employed at the time of the
criminal act, the victim shall receive monthly during the period of the
disability the following percentages, where applicable, of the average
monthly wage determined as of the date of the criminal act pursuant to
RCW 51.08.018:
(a) If married at the time of the criminal act, twenty-nine percent
of the average monthly wage.
(b) If married with one child at the time of the criminal act,
thirty-four percent of the average monthly wage.
(c) If married with two children at the time of the criminal act,
thirty-eight percent of the average monthly wage.
(d) If married with three children at the time of the criminal act,
forty-one percent of the average monthly wage.
(e) If married with four children at the time of the criminal act,
forty-four percent of the average monthly wage.
(f) If married with five or more children at the time of the
criminal act, forty-seven percent of the average monthly wage.
(g) If unmarried at the time of the criminal act, twenty-five
percent of the average monthly wage.
(h) If unmarried with one child at the time of the criminal act,
thirty percent of the average monthly wage.
(i) If unmarried with two children at the time of the criminal act,
thirty-four percent of the average monthly wage.
(j) If unmarried with three children at the time of the criminal
act, thirty-seven percent of the average monthly wage.
(k) If unmarried with four children at the time of the criminal
act, forty percent of the average monthly wage.
(l) If unmarried with five or more children at the time of the
criminal act, forty-three percent of the average monthly wage.
(6) The benefits established in RCW 51.32.080 for permanent partial
disability shall be the benefits obtainable under this chapter, and
provisions relating to payment contained in that section equally apply
under this chapter.
(7) The benefits established in RCW 51.32.090 for temporary total
disability shall be the benefits obtainable under this chapter, and
provisions relating to payment contained in that section apply under
this chapter: PROVIDED, That no person is eligible for temporary total
disability benefits under this chapter if such person was not gainfully
employed at the time of the criminal act, and was not so employed for
at least three consecutive months of the twelve months immediately
preceding the criminal act.
(8) The benefits established in RCW 51.32.095 for continuation of
benefits during vocational rehabilitation shall be benefits obtainable
under this chapter, and provisions relating to payment contained in
that section apply under this chapter: PROVIDED, That benefits shall
not exceed five thousand dollars for any single injury.
(9) The provisions for lump sum payment of benefits upon death or
permanent total disability as contained in RCW 51.32.130 apply under
this chapter.
(10) The provisions relating to payment of benefits to, for or on
behalf of workers contained in RCW 51.32.040, 51.32.055, 51.32.100,
51.32.110, 51.32.120, 51.32.135, 51.32.140, 51.32.150, 51.32.160, and
51.32.210 are applicable to payment of benefits to, for or on behalf of
victims under this chapter.
(11) No person or spouse, child, or dependent of such person is
entitled to benefits under this chapter where the person making a claim
for such benefits has refused to give reasonable cooperation to state
or local law enforcement agencies in their efforts to apprehend and
convict the perpetrator(s) of the criminal act which gave rise to the
claim.
(12) In addition to other benefits provided under this chapter,
victims of sexual assault are entitled to receive appropriate
counseling. Fees for such counseling shall be determined by the
department in accordance with RCW 51.04.030, subject to the limitations
of RCW 7.68.080. Counseling services may include, if determined
appropriate by the department, counseling of members of the victim's
immediate family, other than the perpetrator of the assault.
(13) Except for medical benefits authorized under RCW 7.68.080, no
more than thirty thousand dollars shall be granted as a result of a
single injury or death, except that benefits granted as the result of
total permanent disability or death shall not exceed forty thousand
dollars.
(14) Notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter and Title 51
RCW, benefits payable for total temporary disability under subsection
(7) of this section, shall be limited to fifteen thousand dollars.
(15) Any person who is responsible for the victim's injuries, or
who would otherwise be unjustly enriched as a result of the victim's
injuries, shall not be a beneficiary under this chapter.
(16) Crime victims' compensation is not available to pay for
services covered under chapter 74.09 RCW or Title XIX of the federal
social security act, except to the extent that the costs for such
services exceed service limits established by the department of social
and health services or, during the 1993-95 fiscal biennium, to the
extent necessary to provide matching funds for federal medicaid
reimbursement.
(17) In addition to other benefits provided under this chapter,
immediate family members of a homicide victim may receive appropriate
counseling to assist in dealing with the immediate, near-term
consequences of the related effects of the homicide. Fees for
counseling shall be determined by the department in accordance with RCW
51.04.030, subject to the limitations of RCW 7.68.080. Payment of
counseling benefits under this section may not be provided to the
perpetrator of the homicide. The benefits under this subsection may be
provided only with respect to homicides committed on or after July 1,
1992.
(18) A dependent mother, father, stepmother, or stepfather, as
defined in RCW 51.08.050, who is a survivor of her or his child's
homicide, who has been requested by a law enforcement agency or a
prosecutor to assist in the judicial proceedings related to the death
of the victim, and who is not domiciled in Washington state at the time
of the request, may receive a lump-sum payment upon arrival in this
state. Total benefits under this subsection may not exceed seven
thousand five hundred dollars. If more than one dependent parent is
eligible for this benefit, the lump-sum payment of seven thousand five
hundred dollars shall be divided equally among the dependent parents.
(19) A victim whose crime occurred in another state who qualifies
for benefits under RCW 7.68.060(4) may receive appropriate mental
health counseling to address distress arising from participation in the
civil commitment proceedings. Fees for counseling shall be determined
by the department in accordance with RCW 51.04.030, subject to the
limitations of RCW 7.68.080.
(20)(a) A child under the age of eighteen years old who: (i)
Resides with a person that is a victim of a domestic violence offense;
and (ii) was a direct witness by sight or sound to the domestic
violence offense occurring, qualifies for benefits under RCW
7.68.060(5) and may receive appropriate counseling and treatment to
address distress arising from the domestic violence offense where he or
she was a direct witness.
(b) The department shall determine fees for counseling and
treatment services, subject to the limitations of RCW 7.68.080.

PART SIX
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
Sec. 601 RCW 68.50.160 and 2007 c 156 s 24 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person has the right to control the disposition of his or her
own remains without the predeath or postdeath consent of another
person. A valid written document expressing the decedent's wishes
regarding the place or method of disposition of his or her remains,
signed by the decedent in the presence of a witness, is sufficient
legal authorization for the procedures to be accomplished.
(2) Prearrangements that are prepaid, or filed with a licensed
funeral establishment or cemetery authority, under RCW 18.39.280
through 18.39.345 and chapter 68.46 RCW are not subject to cancellation
or substantial revision by survivors. Absent actual knowledge of
contrary legal authorization under this section, a licensed funeral
establishment or cemetery authority shall not be held criminally nor
civilly liable for acting upon such prearrangements.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this subsection, if the
decedent has not made a prearrangement as set forth in subsection (2)
of this section or the costs of executing the decedent's wishes
regarding the disposition of the decedent's remains exceeds a reason-
able amount or directions have not been given by the decedent, the
right to control the disposition of the remains of a deceased person
vests in, and the duty of disposition and the liability for the
reasonable cost of preparation, care, and disposition of such remains
devolves upon the following in the order named:
(a) The surviving spouse or state registered domestic partner.
(b) The surviving adult children of the decedent.
(c) The surviving parents of the decedent.
(d) The surviving siblings of the decedent.
(e) A person acting as a representative of the decedent under the
signed authorization of the decedent.
(4) A person listed in subsection (3) of this section does not have
the right to control the disposition of a decedent's remains if the
person has been arrested for or charged with first or second degree
murder, homicide by abuse, or first or second degree manslaughter by
reason of the death of the decedent. The right to control the
disposition of the decedent's remains vests in an eligible person in
the next applicable class in accordance with subsection (3) of this
section.
(5) If a cemetery authority as defined in RCW 68.04.190 or a
funeral establishment licensed under chapter 18.39 RCW has made a good
faith effort to locate the person cited in subsection (3)(a) through
(e) of this section or the legal representative of the decedent's
estate, the cemetery authority or funeral establishment shall have the
right to rely on an authority to bury or cremate the human remains,
executed by the most responsible party available, and the cemetery
authority or funeral establishment may not be held criminally or
civilly liable for burying or cremating the human remains. In the
event any government agency provides the funds for the disposition of
any human remains and the government agency elects to provide funds for
cremation only, the cemetery authority or funeral establishment may not
be held criminally or civilly liable for cremating the human remains.
(((5))) (6) The liability for the reasonable cost of preparation,
care, and disposition devolves jointly and severally upon all kin of
the decedent in the same degree of kindred, in the order listed in
subsection (3) of this section, and upon the estate of the decedent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 A new section is added to chapter 2.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The administrative office of the courts shall, within
existing resources, convene a work group to address the issue of
transmitting information regarding revocation of concealed pistol
licenses, upon the entry of orders issued under chapter 10.99, 26.50,
or 26.52 RCW.
(b) The work group must include a superior court judge, a district
court judge, a municipal court judge, an attorney whose practice
includes a significant amount of time representing defendants in
criminal trials, and representatives from the following entities: The
Washington state patrol, the Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs, the prosecuting attorneys association, the department of
licensing, and the county clerks. Other members may be added as deemed
appropriate by the work group.
(2) The work group shall review the methods currently used to
transfer information between the courts, the county clerks, the
prosecutors, the department of licensing, the Washington state patrol,
and local law enforcement agencies regarding the suspension and
revocation of concealed pistol licenses.
(3) The goal of the work group is to identify methods to expedite
the transfer of information to enhance the safety of law enforcement
and the public.
(4) The work group shall report its recommendations to the affected
entities and the legislature not later than December 1, 2010. All
agency representatives shall cooperate fully with the work group's
efforts.

--- END ---