BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.285.030 and 2009 c 565 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Attorney general" means the Washington state office of the
attorney general.
(2) "Auditor" means: (a) The Washington state auditor's office or
its designee for qualifying utilities under its jurisdiction that are
not investor-owned utilities; or (b) an independent auditor selected by
a qualifying utility that is not under the jurisdiction of the state
auditor and is not an investor-owned utility.
(3) "Commission" means the Washington state utilities and
transportation commission.
(4) "Conservation" means any reduction in electric power
consumption resulting from increases in the efficiency of energy use,
production, or distribution.
(5) "Cost-effective" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
80.52.030.
(6) "Council" means the Washington state apprenticeship and
training council within the department of labor and industries.
(7) "Customer" means a person or entity that purchases electricity
for ultimate consumption and not for resale.
(8) "Department" means the department of commerce or its successor.
(9) "Distributed generation" means an eligible renewable resource
where the generation facility or any integrated cluster of such
facilities has a generating capacity of not more than five megawatts.
(10) "Eligible renewable resource" means:
(a) Electricity from a generation facility powered by a renewable
resource other than fresh water that commences operation after March
31, 1999, where: (i) The facility is located in the Pacific Northwest;
or (ii) the electricity from the facility is delivered into Washington
state on a real-time basis without shaping, storage, or integration
services; or
(b) Incremental electricity produced as a result of efficiency
improvements completed after March 31, 1999, to hydroelectric
generation projects owned by a qualifying utility and located in the
Pacific Northwest or to hydroelectric generation in irrigation pipes
and canals located in the Pacific Northwest, where the additional
generation in either case does not result in new water diversions or
impoundments.
(11) "Investor-owned utility" has the same meaning as defined in
RCW 19.29A.010.
(12) "Load" means the amount of kilowatt-hours of electricity
delivered in the most recently completed year by a qualifying utility
to its Washington retail customers.
(13) "Nonpower attributes" means all environmentally related
characteristics, exclusive of energy, capacity reliability, and other
electrical power service attributes, that are associated with the
generation of electricity from a renewable resource, including but not
limited to the facility's fuel type, geographic location, vintage,
qualification as an eligible renewable resource, and avoided emissions
of pollutants to the air, soil, or water, and avoided emissions of
carbon dioxide and other greenhouse gases.
(14) "Pacific Northwest" has the same meaning as defined for the
Bonneville power administration in section 3 of the Pacific Northwest
electric power planning and conservation act (94 Stat. 2698; 16 U.S.C.
Sec. 839a).
(15) "Public facility" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
39.35C.010.
(16) "Qualifying utility" means an electric utility, as the term
"electric utility" is defined in RCW 19.29A.010, that serves more than
twenty-five thousand customers in the state of Washington. The number
of customers served may be based on data reported by a utility in form
861, "annual electric utility report," filed with the energy
information administration, United States department of energy.
(17) "Renewable energy credit" means a tradable certificate of
proof of at least one megawatt-hour of an eligible renewable resource
where the generation facility is not powered by fresh water, the
certificate includes all of the nonpower attributes associated with
that one megawatt-hour of electricity, and the certificate is verified
by a renewable energy credit tracking system selected by the
department.
(18) "Renewable resource" means: (a) Water; (b) wind; (c) solar
energy; (d) geothermal energy; (e) landfill gas; (f) wave, ocean, or
tidal power; (g) gas from sewage treatment facilities; (h) biodiesel
fuel as defined in RCW 82.29A.135 that is not derived from crops raised
on land cleared from old growth or first-growth forests where the
clearing occurred after December 7, 2006; and (i) biomass energy based
on animal waste or solid organic fuels from wood, forest, or field
residues, or dedicated energy crops that do not include (i) wood pieces
that have been treated with chemical preservatives such as creosote,
pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic; (ii) black liquor by-product from paper production; (iii) wood from old growth forests; or
(iv) municipal solid waste.
(19) "Rule" means rules adopted by an agency or other entity of
Washington state government to carry out the intent and purposes of
this chapter.
(20) "Year" means the twelve-month period commencing January 1st
and ending December 31st.
(21) "Baseload renewable power facility" means a facility that
develops electric generation from a renewable resource that is designed
and intended to provide electricity at an annualized facility capacity
factor of at least sixty percent.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.285.040 and 2007 c 1 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each qualifying utility shall pursue all available conservation
that is cost-effective, reliable, and feasible.
(a) By January 1, 2010, using methodologies consistent with those
used by the Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning
council in its most recently published regional power plan, each
qualifying utility shall identify its achievable cost-effective
conservation potential through 2019. At least every two years
thereafter, the qualifying utility shall review and update this
assessment for the subsequent ten-year period.
(b) Beginning January 2010, each qualifying utility shall establish
and make publicly available a biennial acquisition target for cost-effective conservation consistent with its identification of achievable
opportunities in (a) of this subsection, and meet that target during
the subsequent two-year period. At a minimum, each biennial target
must be no lower than the qualifying utility's pro rata share for that
two-year period of its cost-effective conservation potential for the
subsequent ten-year period.
(c) In meeting its conservation targets, a qualifying utility may
count high-efficiency cogeneration owned and used by a retail electric
customer to meet its own needs. High-efficiency cogeneration is the
sequential production of electricity and useful thermal energy from a
common fuel source, where, under normal operating conditions, the
facility has a useful thermal energy output of no less than thirty-three percent of the total energy output. The reduction in load due to
high-efficiency cogeneration shall be: (i) Calculated as the ratio of
the fuel chargeable to power heat rate of the cogeneration facility
compared to the heat rate on a new and clean basis of a
best-commercially available technology combined-cycle natural gas-fired
combustion turbine; and (ii) counted towards meeting the biennial
conservation target in the same manner as other conservation savings.
(d) The commission may determine if a conservation program
implemented by an investor-owned utility is cost-effective based on the
commission's policies and practice.
(e) The commission may rely on its standard practice for review and
approval of investor-owned utility conservation targets.
(2)(a) Each qualifying utility shall use eligible renewable
resources or acquire equivalent renewable energy credits, or a
combination of both, to meet the following annual targets:
(i) At least three percent of its load by January 1, 2012, and each
year thereafter through December 31, 2015;
(ii) At least nine percent of its load by January 1, 2016, and each
year thereafter through December 31, 2019; and
(iii) At least fifteen percent of its load by January 1, 2020, and
each year thereafter.
(b) A qualifying utility may count distributed generation at double
the facility's electrical output if the utility: (i) Owns or has
contracted for the distributed generation and the associated renewable
energy credits; or (ii) has contracted to purchase the associated
renewable energy credits.
(c) A qualifying utility may count electrical power generated from
a baseload renewable power facility at double the facility's electrical
output if the utility develops or contracts with a baseload renewable
power facility that begins permitted construction in Washington state
in 2010.
(d) In meeting the annual targets in (a) of this subsection, a
qualifying utility shall calculate its annual load based on the average
of the utility's load for the previous two years.
(((d))) (e) A qualifying utility shall be considered in compliance
with an annual target in (a) of this subsection if: (i) The utility's
weather-adjusted load for the previous three years on average did not
increase over that time period; (ii) after December 7, 2006, the
utility did not commence or renew ownership or incremental purchases of
electricity from resources other than renewable resources other than on
a daily spot price basis and the electricity is not offset by
equivalent renewable energy credits; and (iii) the utility invested at
least one percent of its total annual retail revenue requirement that
year on eligible renewable resources, renewable energy credits, or a
combination of both.
(((e))) (f) The requirements of this section may be met for any
given year with renewable energy credits produced during that year, the
preceding year, or the subsequent year. Each renewable energy credit
may be used only once to meet the requirements of this section.
(((f))) (g) In complying with the targets established in (a) of
this subsection, a qualifying utility may not count:
(i) Eligible renewable resources or distributed generation where
the associated renewable energy credits are owned by a separate entity;
or
(ii) Eligible renewable resources or renewable energy credits
obtained for and used in an optional pricing program such as the
program established in RCW 19.29A.090.
(((g))) (h) Where fossil and combustible renewable resources are
cofired in one generating unit located in the Pacific Northwest where
the cofiring commenced after March 31, 1999, the unit shall be
considered to produce eligible renewable resources in direct proportion
to the percentage of the total heat value represented by the heat value
of the renewable resources.
(((h))) (i)(i) A qualifying utility that acquires an eligible
renewable resource or renewable energy credit may count that
acquisition at one and two-tenths times its base value:
(A) Where the eligible renewable resource comes from a facility
that commenced operation after December 31, 2005; and
(B) Where the developer of the facility used apprenticeship
programs approved by the council during facility construction.
(ii) The council shall establish minimum levels of labor hours to
be met through apprenticeship programs to qualify for this extra
credit.
(((i))) (j) A qualifying utility shall be considered in compliance
with an annual target in (a) of this subsection if events beyond the
reasonable control of the utility that could not have been reasonably
anticipated or ameliorated prevented it from meeting the renewable
energy target. Such events include weather-related damage, mechanical
failure, strikes, lockouts, and actions of a governmental authority
that adversely affect the generation, transmission, or distribution of
an eligible renewable resource under contract to a qualifying utility.
(3) Utilities that become qualifying utilities after December 31,
2006, shall meet the requirements in this section on a time frame
comparable in length to that provided for qualifying utilities as of
December 7, 2006.

--- END ---