BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Issuing company" means the company that provided the personal
electronic device to the consumer, the company providing service to the
personal electronic device, or the company that tracks or uses data
from a device owned by a consumer.
(2) "Personal electronic device" means a privately owned wireless
or portable electronic handheld piece of equipment that includes, but
is not limited to, existing and emerging mobile communications systems
and smart technologies, portable electronic book reading devices,
portable internet devices, and personal digital assistants. "Personal
electronic device" also includes any current or emerging wireless
handheld technologies or portable information technology systems that
may be used for word processing, wireless internet access, or image
capture or recording. "Personal electronic device" may also include
those electronic devices designed and sold with the intention of
establishing an ongoing relationship with a vendor, such as a
subscription to content or access.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, an issuing company may not sell content in connection
with a personal electronic device to a consumer that is not the owner
of the personal electronic device if the issuing company knows that:
(a) There is a dispute concerning the ownership of the personal
electronic device; and
(b) The personal electronic device used to belong to someone other
than the consumer who is attempting to purchase content for the
personal electronic device.
(2) This section does not apply to:
(a) An issuing company that attempts in good faith to contact at
least three times the owner of the personal electronic device as
indicated in the registration information associated with the personal
electronic device; or
(b) A relative or spouse of the owner of the personal electronic
device that attempts to purchase content for the personal electronic
device.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Within thirty days of receipt of proof
of the consumer's ownership of the personal electronic device and a
copy of a police report filed by the consumer, evidencing the
consumer's claim to be a victim of theft under chapter 9A.56 RCW, an
issuing company shall deactivate or disable the personal electronic
device, if feasible, so that the personal electronic device is
inoperable.
(2) The issuing company may decline to deactivate or disable a
consumer's personal electronic device if, in the exercise of good faith
and reasonable judgment after consulting with the law enforcement
agency that assisted the consumer in preparing the police report, the
issuing company believes the personal electronic device was not stolen.
(3) If the consumer recovers the personal electronic device after
reporting it stolen, the consumer must notify the issuing company and
law enforcement within five days of recovering the device.
(4) In order to facilitate the exercise of a consumer's right to
request that their personal electronic device be deactivated or
disabled, all police and sheriff's departments in Washington state
shall provide to the consumer, at the consumer's request, a copy of any
police report, filed by the consumer, evidencing the consumer's claim
to be a victim of theft under chapter 9A.56 RCW.
(5) An issuing company may not be held liable if, due to
misrepresentation by the consumer, the issuing company deactivates or
disables a personal electronic device possessed by a person that is, in
fact, the rightful owner of the electronic device.
(6) A consumer that misrepresents material facts in a police report
filed pursuant to this chapter may be liable for perjury under chapter
9A.72 RCW.
(7) Nothing in this section may be construed to require a law
enforcement agency to investigate reports claiming theft of a personal
electronic device.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act may be known and cited as the
consumer protection act for electronic devices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---