BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 38.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that recent flooding events over the last
several years have put citizens and businesses in devastating
situations that have resulted in extreme economic loss. This is
particularly acute in the Green river watershed where the army corps of
engineers has found the Howard Hanson dam to be structurally deficient.
While it is important for the state to provide public safety and
emergency response during an emergency resulting from a natural
disaster, it is equally important to provide emergency preparedness and
disaster mitigation information prior to an emergency, and recovery and
disaster mitigation help after an emergency; all of which will
contribute to making the public more prepared during an emergency
response.
(2) Washington state's topography, geography, location, and history
show that certain areas of the state are at particular risk to both
natural disasters and human-caused disasters. The economic impact from
the 2007 flood disasters alone in Washington were estimated at over
five hundred million dollars. Current conditions at the Howard Hanson
dam may cause overflows into the Green river valley area that greatly
exceed channel capacity. Critical flood control levees may overtop and
may weaken from saturation. Sudden changes in flood conditions are
possible, especially in levee-protected areas. These changes may
include rapidly rising water, Green river flooding, widespread
inundation, road closures, utility disruptions, loss of homes, and the
loss and closure of many businesses in the Renton, Tukwila, Auburn, and
Kent areas located in the Green river valley. The Green river valley
is one of the largest warehouse areas on the west coast. Severe
flooding has the potential to damage businesses throughout the state
and the western United States. In response, Washington state and local
governments have implemented all hazards emergency management and
disaster response plans. However, recent studies have revealed the
lack of a secure funding source that impedes the Green river valley's
ability to fully integrate and coordinate comprehensive disaster
preparedness planning.
(3) Recognizing that all disasters are local disasters, the
legislature intends to strengthen emergency response, mitigation,
preparation, and coordination by establishing a source of funding for
flood control and relocation of those private citizens and businesses
that may be displaced during a flood disaster.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The sum of twenty-five million dollars,
or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the
biennium ending June 30, 2011, from the state building construction
account to the Washington military department, working in cooperation
with the flood division of the department of ecology, the King county
flood control district, and other respective local governments, as
appropriate, to participate in flood hazard mitigation and response
projects for the Green river valley area.
(2) The Washington military department shall administer the Green
river flood assistance funds and establish rules for its administration
in consultation with the emergency management council and the
Washington state emergency management association. The Washington
military department shall:
(a) Use no more than five million dollars of the funds appropriated
for relocation costs (including, but not limited to, land acquisition)
of public facilities, infrastructure, and citizens and businesses that
are displaced by Green river flooding conditions; and
(b) Use no more than twenty million dollars of the funds
appropriated for costs that are directed at prevention, including levy
repair and strengthening, emergency response, including full access of
federal funds, mitigation, preparation, coordination, and recovery.
(3) Projects funded under this section shall include, but need not
be limited to, projects that will promote neighborhood level public
education on disaster preparedness.

Sec. 3 RCW 86.12.037 and 1921 c 185 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
No action shall be brought or maintained against any county, city,
or flood control zone district when acting alone or when acting jointly
with any other county, city, or flood control zone district under any
law, or any of its or their agents, officers, or employees, for any
noncontractual acts or omissions of such county or counties, city or
cities, flood control zone district or districts, or any of its or
their agents, officers, or employees, relating to the improvement,
protection, regulation, and control for flood prevention and navigation
purposes of any river or its tributaries and the beds, banks, and
waters thereof: PROVIDED, That nothing contained in this section shall
apply to or affect any action now pending or begun prior to the passage
of this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 86.15.080 and 1983 c 315 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
A zone or participating zone may:
(1) Exercise all the powers and immunities vested in a county for
flood water or storm water control purposes under the provisions of
chapters 86.12, 86.13, 36.89, and 36.94 RCW: PROVIDED, That in
exercising such powers, all actions shall be taken in the name of the
zone and title to all property or property rights shall vest in the
zone;
(2) Plan, construct, acquire, repair, maintain, and operate all
necessary equipment, facilities, improvements, and works to control,
conserve, and remove flood waters and storm waters and to otherwise
carry out the purposes of this chapter including, but not limited to,
protection of the quality of water sources;
(3) Take action necessary to protect life and property within the
district from flood water damage, including in the context of an
emergency, as defined in RCW 38.52.010, using covered volunteer
emergency workers, as defined in RCW 38.52.010 and 38.52.180(5)(a),
subject to and in accordance with the terms of RCW 38.52.180;
(4) Control, conserve, retain, reclaim, and remove flood waters and
storm waters, including waters of lakes and ponds within the district,
and dispose of the same for beneficial or useful purposes under such
terms and conditions as the board may deem appropriate, subject to the
acquisition by the board of appropriate water rights in accordance with
the statutes;
(5) Acquire necessary property, property rights, facilities, and
equipment necessary to the purposes of the zone by purchase, gift, or
condemnation: PROVIDED, That property of municipal corporations may
not be acquired without the consent of such municipal corporation;
(6) Sue and be sued in the name of the zone;
(7) Acquire or reclaim lands when incidental to the purposes of the
zone and dispose of such lands as are surplus to the needs of the zone
in the manner provided for the disposal of county property in chapter
36.34 RCW;
(8) Cooperate with or join with the state of Washington, United
States, another state, any agency, corporation or political subdivision
of the United States or any state, Canada, or any private corporation
or individual for the purposes of this chapter;
(9) Accept funds or property by loan, grant, gift or otherwise from
the United States, the state of Washington, or any other public or
private source;
(10) Remove debris, logs, or other material which may impede the
orderly flow of waters in streams or water courses: PROVIDED, That
such material shall become property of the zone and may be sold for the
purpose of recovering the cost of removal: PROVIDED FURTHER, That
valuable material or minerals removed from public lands shall remain
the property of the state;
(11) Provide grant funds to political subdivisions of the state
that are located within the boundaries of the zone, so long as the
grant funds are within the authorized purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---