BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 38.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that recent flooding events over the last
several years have put citizens and businesses in devastating
situations that have resulted in extreme economic loss. This is
particularly acute in the Green river watershed where the army corps of
engineers has found the Howard Hanson dam to be structurally deficient.
While it is important for the state to provide public safety and
emergency response during an emergency resulting from a natural
disaster, it is equally important to provide emergency preparedness and
disaster mitigation information prior to an emergency, and recovery and
disaster mitigation help after an emergency; all of which will
contribute to making the public more prepared during an emergency
response.
(2) Washington state's topography, geography, location, and history
show that certain areas of the state are at particular risk to both
natural disasters and human-caused disasters. The economic impact from
the 2007 flood disasters alone in Washington were estimated at over
five hundred million dollars. Current conditions at the Howard Hanson
dam may cause overflows into the Green river valley area that greatly
exceed channel capacity. Critical flood control levees may overtop and
may weaken from saturation. Sudden changes in flood conditions are
possible, especially in levee-protected areas. These changes may
include rapidly rising water, Green river flooding, widespread
inundation, road closures, utility disruptions, loss of homes, and the
loss and closure of many businesses in the Renton, Tukwila, Auburn, and
Kent areas located in the Green river valley. The Green river valley
is one of the largest warehouse areas on the west coast. Severe
flooding has the potential to damage businesses throughout the state
and the western United States. In response, Washington state and local
governments have implemented all hazards emergency management and
disaster response plans. However, recent studies have revealed the
lack of a secure funding source that impedes the Green river valley's
ability to fully integrate and coordinate comprehensive disaster
preparedness planning.
(3) Recognizing that all disasters are local disasters, the
legislature intends to strengthen emergency response, mitigation,
preparation, and coordination by establishing a source of funding for
flood control and relocation of those private citizens and businesses
that may be displaced during a flood disaster.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The sum of twenty-five million dollars,
or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the
biennium ending June 30, 2011, from the state building construction
account to the Washington military department, working in cooperation
with the flood division of the department of ecology, the King county
flood control district, and other respective local governments, as
appropriate, to participate in flood hazard mitigation and response
projects for the Green river valley area that are not eligible for
federal assistance. For those projects eligible for federal
assistance, this funding may be used as the nonfederal cost share for
projects.
(2) The Washington military department shall administer the Green
river flood assistance funds and establish procedures for its
administration in consultation with the Green river subcabinet. The
Washington military department shall:
(a) Use no more than five million dollars of the funds appropriated
for: (i) Relocation costs (including, but not limited to, land
acquisition) of public facilities and infrastructure, (ii) relocation
costs of citizens and businesses that are displaced by Green river
flooding conditions, and (iii) prevention, emergency response,
mitigation, preparation, coordination, and recovery costs; and
(b) Use no more than twenty million dollars of the funds
appropriated for costs associated with levy repair and strengthening,
consistent with the priorities established by the King county flood
district.
(3) Projects funded under this section shall include, but need not
be limited to, projects that will promote neighborhood level public
education on disaster preparedness.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---