BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.150 and 1972 ex.s. c 33 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever any highway has been divided into two or more roadways by
a gore point or gore zone, which are defined as the triangular area
dividing the lanes where highways either split or merge, or by leaving
an intervening space or by a physical barrier or clearly indicated
dividing section or by a median island not less than eighteen inches
wide formed either by solid yellow pavement markings or by a yellow
crosshatching between two solid yellow lines so installed as to control
vehicular traffic, every vehicle shall be driven only upon the right-hand roadway unless directed or permitted to use another roadway by
official traffic-control devices or police officers. No vehicle shall
be driven over, across, or within any such gore point or gore zone,
dividing space, barrier or section, or median island, except through an
opening in such physical barrier or dividing section or space or median
island, or at a crossover or intersection established by public
authority.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.16.160 and 2007 c 419 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The owner of a vehicle which under reciprocal relations with
another jurisdiction would be required to obtain a license registration
in this state or an unlicensed vehicle which would be required to
obtain a license registration for operation on public highways of this
state may, as an alternative to such license registration, secure and
operate such vehicle under authority of a trip permit issued by this
state in lieu of a Washington certificate of license registration, and
licensed gross weight if applicable. The licensed gross weight may not
exceed eighty thousand pounds for a combination of vehicles nor forty
thousand pounds for a single unit vehicle with three or more axles.
Trip permits are required for movement of mobile homes or park model
trailers and may only be issued if property taxes are paid in full.
For the purpose of this section, a vehicle is considered unlicensed if
the licensed gross weight currently in effect for the vehicle or
combination of vehicles is not adequate for the load being carried.
Vehicles registered under RCW 46.16.135 shall not be operated under
authority of trip permits in lieu of further registration within the
same registration year.
(2) Each trip permit shall authorize the operation of a single
vehicle at the maximum legal weight limit for such vehicle for a period
of three consecutive days commencing with the day of first use. No
more than three such permits may be used for any one vehicle in any
period of thirty consecutive days, except that in the case of a
recreational vehicle as defined in RCW 43.22.335, no more than two trip
permits may be used for any one vehicle in a one-year period. Every
permit shall identify, as the department may require, the vehicle for
which it is issued and shall be completed in its entirety and signed by
the operator before operation of the vehicle on the public highways of
this state. Correction of data on the permit such as dates, license
number, or vehicle identification number invalidates the permit. The
trip permit shall be displayed on the vehicle to which it is issued as
prescribed by the department.
(3) Vehicles operating under authority of trip permits are subject
to all laws, rules, and regulations affecting the operation of like
vehicles in this state.
(4) Prorate operators operating commercial vehicles on trip permits
in Washington shall retain the customer copy of such permit for four
years.
(5) Trip permits may be obtained from field offices of the
department of transportation, department of licensing, or other agents
appointed by the department. The fee for each trip permit is twenty
dollars. Five dollars from every twenty-dollar trip permit fee shall
be deposited into the state patrol highway account and must be used for
commercial motor vehicle inspections. For each permit issued, the fee
includes a filing fee as provided by RCW 46.01.140 and an excise tax of
one dollar. The remaining portion of the trip permit fee must be
deposited to the credit of the motor vehicle fund as an administrative
fee. If the filing fee amount of three dollars as prescribed in RCW
46.01.140 is increased or decreased after July 1, 2002, the
administrative fee must be increased or decreased by the same amount so
that the total trip permit would be adjusted equally to compensate.
These fees and taxes are in lieu of all other vehicle license fees and
taxes. No exchange, credits, or refunds may be given for trip permits
after they have been purchased.
(6) The department may appoint county auditors or businesses as
agents for the purpose of selling trip permits to the public. County
auditors or businesses so appointed may retain the filing fee collected
for each trip permit to defray expenses incurred in handling and
selling the permits.
(7) Commercial motor vehicles that are owned by a motor carrier
subject to RCW 46.32.080, must not be operated on trip permits
authorized by ((RCW 46.16.160)) this section or RCW 46.16.162 if the
motor carrier's department of transportation number has been placed out
of service by the Washington state patrol. A violation of or a failure
to comply with this subsection is a gross misdemeanor, subject to a
minimum monetary penalty of two thousand five hundred dollars for the
first violation and five thousand dollars for each subsequent
violation.
(8) Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, a
violation of or a failure to comply with any provision of this section
is a ((gross)) misdemeanor.
(9) The department of licensing may adopt rules as it deems
necessary to administer this section.
(10) A surcharge of five dollars is imposed on the issuance of trip
permits. The portion of the surcharge paid by motor carriers must be
deposited in the motor vehicle fund for the purpose of supporting
vehicle weigh stations, weigh-in-motion programs, and the commercial
vehicle information systems and networks program. The remaining
portion of the surcharge must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund
for the purpose of supporting congestion relief programs. All other
administrative fees and excise taxes collected under the provisions of
this chapter shall be forwarded by the department with proper
identifying detailed report to the state treasurer who shall deposit
the administrative fees to the credit of the motor vehicle fund and the
excise taxes to the credit of the general fund. Filing fees will be
forwarded and reported to the state treasurer by the department as
prescribed in RCW 46.01.140.

--- END ---