BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.104.050 and 2009 c 270 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
The designation of a revitalization area is subject to the
following limitations:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, no
revitalization area may have within its geographic boundaries any part
of a hospital benefit zone under chapter 39.100 RCW, any part of a
revenue development area created under chapter 39.102 RCW, any part of
an increment area under chapter 39.89 RCW, or any part of another
revitalization area under this chapter;
(b) A revitalization area's boundaries may include all or a portion
of an existing revenue development area or increment area if:
(i) The state of Washington has loaned money for environmental
cleanup on such area in order to stimulate redevelopment of
brownfields; and
(ii) The sponsoring local government determines that the creation
of a revitalization area is necessary for redevelopment and that the
redevelopment will likely result in increasing property tax revenue in
the increment area to an amount sufficient to repay the state of
Washington for the brownfield cleanup loans;
(2) A revitalization area is limited to contiguous tracts, lots,
pieces, or parcels of land without the creation of islands of property
not included in the revitalization area;
(3) The boundaries may not be drawn to purposely exclude parcels
where economic growth is unlikely to occur;
(4) The public improvements financed through bonds issued under RCW
39.104.110 must be located in the revitalization area;
(5) A revitalization area cannot comprise an area containing more
than twenty-five percent of the total assessed value of the taxable
real property within the boundaries of the sponsoring local government
at the time the revitalization area is created;
(6) The boundaries of the revitalization area may not be changed
for the time period that local property tax allocation revenues, local
sales and use taxes of participating local governments, and the local
sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.510 are used to pay bonds issued
under RCW 39.104.110 and public improvement costs within the
revitalization area on a pay-as-you-go basis, as provided under this
chapter; and
(7) A revitalization area must be geographically restricted to the
location of the public improvement and adjacent locations that the
sponsoring local government finds to have a high likelihood of
receiving direct positive business and economic impacts due to the
public improvement, such as a neighborhood or a block.

--- END ---