BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 86.12.037 and 1921 c 185 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
No action shall be brought or maintained against any county, city,
or flood control zone district when acting alone or when acting jointly
with any other county, city, or flood control zone district under any
law, or any of its or their agents, officers, or employees, for any
noncontractual acts or omissions of such county or counties, city or
cities, flood control zone district or districts, or any of its or
their agents, officers, or employees, relating to the improvement,
protection, regulation, and control for flood prevention and navigation
purposes of any river or its tributaries and the beds, banks, and
waters thereof: PROVIDED, That nothing contained in this section shall
apply to or affect any action now pending or begun prior to the passage
of this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 86.15.080 and 1983 c 315 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
A zone or participating zone may:
(1) Exercise all the powers and immunities vested in a county for
flood water or storm water control purposes under the provisions of
chapters 86.12, 86.13, 36.89, and 36.94 RCW: PROVIDED, That in
exercising such powers, all actions shall be taken in the name of the
zone and title to all property or property rights shall vest in the
zone;
(2) Plan, construct, acquire, repair, maintain, and operate all
necessary equipment, facilities, improvements, and works to control,
conserve, and remove flood waters and storm waters and to otherwise
carry out the purposes of this chapter including, but not limited to,
protection of the quality of water sources;
(3) Take action necessary to protect life and property within the
district from flood water damage, including in the context of an
emergency, as defined in RCW 38.52.010, using covered volunteer
emergency workers, as defined in RCW 38.52.010 and 38.52.180(5)(a),
subject to and in accordance with the terms of RCW 38.52.180;
(4) Control, conserve, retain, reclaim, and remove flood waters and
storm waters, including waters of lakes and ponds within the district,
and dispose of the same for beneficial or useful purposes under such
terms and conditions as the board may deem appropriate, subject to the
acquisition by the board of appropriate water rights in accordance with
the statutes;
(5) Acquire necessary property, property rights, facilities, and
equipment necessary to the purposes of the zone by purchase, gift, or
condemnation: PROVIDED, That property of municipal corporations may
not be acquired without the consent of such municipal corporation;
(6) Sue and be sued in the name of the zone;
(7) Acquire or reclaim lands when incidental to the purposes of the
zone and dispose of such lands as are surplus to the needs of the zone
in the manner provided for the disposal of county property in chapter
36.34 RCW;
(8) Cooperate with or join with the state of Washington, United
States, another state, any agency, corporation or political subdivision
of the United States or any state, Canada, or any private corporation
or individual for the purposes of this chapter;
(9) Accept funds or property by loan, grant, gift or otherwise from
the United States, the state of Washington, or any other public or
private source;
(10) Remove debris, logs, or other material which may impede the
orderly flow of waters in streams or water courses: PROVIDED, That
such material shall become property of the zone and may be sold for the
purpose of recovering the cost of removal: PROVIDED FURTHER, That
valuable material or minerals removed from public lands shall remain
the property of the state;
(11) Provide grant funds to political subdivisions of the state
that are located within the boundaries of the zone, so long as the
grant funds are within the authorized purposes of this chapter.

--- END ---