BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.150.100 and 2007 c 267 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) On or before July 1st of each year, direct practices must
submit annual statements((, beginning on October 1, 2007,)) to the
office of (([the])) the insurance commissioner specifying the number of
providers in each practice, total number of patients being served, the
average direct fee being charged, providers' names, and the business
address for each direct practice and any additional information as
required by the commissioner by rule. The form and content for the
annual statement must be ((developed in a manner prescribed)) as
required by the commissioner.
(2) A health care provider may not act as, or hold himself or
herself out to be, a direct practice in this state, nor may a direct
agreement be entered into with a direct patient in this state, unless
the provider submits the annual statement in subsection (1) of this
section to the commissioner.
(3) The commissioner shall report annually to the legislature on
direct practices including, but not limited to, participation trends,
complaints received, voluntary data reported by the direct practices,
and any necessary modifications to this chapter. The initial report
shall be due December 1, 2009.
(4) The commissioner may adopt rules to implement and administer
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 48.150.120 (Commissioner's study -- Report
to legislature) and 2007 c 267 s 14 are each repealed.

--- END ---