BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Mineral" means rock, stone, sand, and gravel.
(2) "Person" means "person" as defined in RCW 82.04.030.
(3) "Producer" means any person subject to tax under chapter 82.04
RCW who, from the person's own land or from the land of another under
a right or license granted by lease or other contract, either directly
or by contracting with others for the necessary labor or mechanical
services, severs minerals for sale or for commercial or industrial use.
(4) "Severance" or "sever" means the taking or producing from the
lands or waters of this state of any mineral by whatever means used.
(5) "Value" means "value of products" as defined in RCW 82.04.450.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The legislative body of any county, by
ordinance, may impose an excise tax upon the privilege of severing
minerals from the land or waters within the county. The tax is imposed
upon the entire production in the county regardless of the place of
sale or that delivery may be made outside the county or the state. The
tax authorized in this section is in addition to any other taxes
authorized by law.
(2) The tax imposed by this chapter on the severance of minerals is
the liability of the producer.
(3) The rate of the tax imposed is five percent, to be divided as
follows: One percent to the state general fund and four percent to the
county imposing the tax.
(4) The measure of the tax is the value of the minerals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Counties must contract, no less than
seventy-five days prior to the effective date of an ordinance imposing
the severance tax, for the administration and collection of the tax by
the department. The department will deduct an amount, as provided by
contract, not to exceed one percent of the taxes collected for
administration and collection expenses incurred by the department. The
remainder of any portion of any tax authorized by this chapter that is
collected by the department must be deposited in the county severance
taxation account created in the state treasury.
(2) The state treasurer must distribute moneys in the county
severance taxation account to counties imposing a county severance tax
authorized in section 2 of this act. Except as provided in RCW
43.08.190, all earnings of investments of balances in the county
severance taxation account must be credited to the county severance
taxation account and distributed monthly to the counties imposing the
tax.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The taxes imposed under this chapter are
due and payable monthly within twenty-five days after the end of the
month in which the taxable activity occurs. The department may relieve
any taxpayer from the obligation of filing a monthly return and may
require the return to cover other periods, but in no event may periodic
returns be filed for a period greater than one year. In such cases tax
returns and payments are due on or before the last day of the month
next succeeding the end of the period covered by the return. The
department must assign a reporting frequency for the tax authorized in
this chapter that coincides with the taxpayer's reporting frequency for
the tax imposed in chapter 82.04 RCW.
(2) The taxpayer must file a return, upon the forms, or
electronically as provided in RCW 82.32.080, setting forth the
information, as the department may require, showing the amount of tax
for which the taxpayer is liable for the reporting period. The
taxpayer must transmit the return and remit payment of the amount due
to the department by the due date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The following are exempt from the taxes
imposed under this chapter:
(1) The value of any minerals severed from the land or waters by a
person and moved from one place to another in the course of
construction on the same site.
(2) The value of any minerals owned by a producer exempt from tax
by reason of federal law or a compact negotiated by the state with a
tribal government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the tax
authorized in section 2 of this act. The department may adopt any
administrative rules necessary for the effective administration of this
chapter.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.84.092 and 2009 c 479 s 31, 2009 c 472 s 5, and
2009 c 451 s 8 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate
share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily
balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search
and rescue account, the budget stabilization account, the capitol
building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia
river basin water supply development account, the common school
construction fund, the county arterial preservation account, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the county severance taxation account, the data
processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account,
the department of licensing services account, the department of
retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities
community trust account, the drinking water assistance account, the
drinking water assistance administrative account, the drinking water
assistance repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital
projects account, the education construction fund, the education legacy
trust account, the election account, the energy freedom account, the
energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The
Evergreen State College capital projects account, the federal forest
revolving account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the freight
congestion relief account, the freight mobility investment account, the
freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective
fund, the public health services account, the health system capacity
account, the personal health services account, the high capacity
transportation account, the state higher education construction
account, the higher education construction account, the highway bond
retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety
account, the high occupancy toll lanes operations account, the
industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement
account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial
retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account,
the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax
account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
multimodal transportation account, the municipal criminal justice
assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization
account, the natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land
account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual
surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement
system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan
revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health
supplemental account, the public transportation systems account, the
public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction
account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puyallup tribal
settlement account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the
recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program
account, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust
account, the rural Washington loan fund, the site closure account, the
small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C
account, the special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance
account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state
investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled
trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state route
number 520 corridor account, the supplemental pension account, the
Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system
plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and
plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco
settlement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account),
the transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the
transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement
board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure
account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain
injury account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of
Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building
account, the urban arterial trust account, the volunteer firefighters'
and reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer
firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington
fruit express account, the Washington judicial retirement system
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3
account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the
Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the
normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the
scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All
earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4) shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund
pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---