BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
When a person who suffers from a mental health condition is
convicted of an offense, the court may waive imposition of legal
financial obligations if the court finds that:
(1) The offender's mental health condition was a direct cause of
the offender's commission of the offense;
(2) The offender's mental health condition substantially impairs
the offender's ability to pay legal financial obligations; and
(3) The offender:
(a) Is currently receiving support under supplemental security
income or social security disability insurance programs due to a mental
health condition;
(b) Is currently receiving support from the state under the general
assistance unemployable, general assistance expedited medicaid, or
temporary assistance for needy families programs, and has been
diagnosed with a mental health condition; or
(c) Was released within the prior six months from a mental health
treatment facility or other state institution where the offender
received treatment for a mental health condition.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.760 and 2008 c 231 s 35 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever a person is convicted in superior court, the court may
order the payment of a legal financial obligation as part of the
sentence. If the court determines that the offender suffers from a
mental health condition, the symptoms of which were a direct cause of
the offender's commission of the crime, the court may waive imposition
of legal financial obligations in accordance with section 1 of this
act. The court must on either the judgment and sentence or on a
subsequent order to pay, designate the total amount of a legal
financial obligation and segregate this amount among the separate
assessments made for restitution, costs, fines, and other assessments
required by law. On the same order, the court is also to set a sum
that the offender is required to pay on a monthly basis towards
satisfying the legal financial obligation. If the court fails to set
the offender monthly payment amount, the department shall set the
amount if the department has active supervision of the offender,
otherwise the county clerk shall set the amount. Upon receipt of an
offender's monthly payment, restitution shall be paid prior to any
payments of other monetary obligations. After restitution is
satisfied, the county clerk shall distribute the payment proportionally
among all other fines, costs, and assessments imposed, unless otherwise
ordered by the court.
(2) If the court determines that the offender, at the time of
sentencing, has the means to pay for the cost of incarceration, the
court may require the offender to pay for the cost of incarceration at
a rate of fifty dollars per day of incarceration, if incarcerated in a
prison, or the court may require the offender to pay the actual cost of
incarceration per day of incarceration, if incarcerated in a county
jail. In no case may the court require the offender to pay more than
one hundred dollars per day for the cost of incarceration. Payment of
other court-ordered financial obligations, including all legal
financial obligations and costs of supervision shall take precedence
over the payment of the cost of incarceration ordered by the court.
All funds recovered from offenders for the cost of incarceration in the
county jail shall be remitted to the county and the costs of
incarceration in a prison shall be remitted to the department.
(3) The court may add to the judgment and sentence or subsequent
order to pay a statement that a notice of payroll deduction is to be
issued immediately. If the court chooses not to order the immediate
issuance of a notice of payroll deduction at sentencing, the court
shall add to the judgment and sentence or subsequent order to pay a
statement that a notice of payroll deduction may be issued or other
income-withholding action may be taken, without further notice to the
offender if a monthly court-ordered legal financial obligation payment
is not paid when due, and an amount equal to or greater than the amount
payable for one month is owed.
If a judgment and sentence or subsequent order to pay does not
include the statement that a notice of payroll deduction may be issued
or other income-withholding action may be taken if a monthly legal
financial obligation payment is past due, the department or the county
clerk may serve a notice on the offender stating such requirements and
authorizations. Service shall be by personal service or any form of
mail requiring a return receipt.
(4) Independent of the department or the county clerk, the party or
entity to whom the legal financial obligation is owed shall have the
authority to use any other remedies available to the party or entity to
collect the legal financial obligation. These remedies include
enforcement in the same manner as a judgment in a civil action by the
party or entity to whom the legal financial obligation is owed.
Restitution collected through civil enforcement must be paid through
the registry of the court and must be distributed proportionately
according to each victim's loss when there is more than one victim.
The judgment and sentence shall identify the party or entity to whom
restitution is owed so that the state, party, or entity may enforce the
judgment. If restitution is ordered pursuant to RCW 9.94A.750(6) or
9.94A.753(6) to a victim of rape of a child or a victim's child born
from the rape, the Washington state child support registry shall be
identified as the party to whom payments must be made. Restitution
obligations arising from the rape of a child in the first, second, or
third degree that result in the pregnancy of the victim may be enforced
for the time periods provided under RCW 9.94A.750(6) and 9.94A.753(6).
All other legal financial obligations for an offense committed prior to
July 1, 2000, may be enforced at any time during the ten-year period
following the offender's release from total confinement or within ten
years of entry of the judgment and sentence, whichever period ends
later. Prior to the expiration of the initial ten-year period, the
superior court may extend the criminal judgment an additional ten years
for payment of legal financial obligations including crime victims'
assessments. All other legal financial obligations for an offense
committed on or after July 1, 2000, may be enforced at any time the
offender remains under the court's jurisdiction. For an offense
committed on or after July 1, 2000, the court shall retain jurisdiction
over the offender, for purposes of the offender's compliance with
payment of the legal financial obligations, until the obligation is
completely satisfied, regardless of the statutory maximum for the
crime. The department may only supervise the offender's compliance
with payment of the legal financial obligations during any period in
which the department is authorized to supervise the offender in the
community under RCW 9.94A.728, 9.94A.501, or in which the offender is
confined in a state correctional institution or a correctional facility
pursuant to a transfer agreement with the department, and the
department shall supervise the offender's compliance during any such
period. The department is not responsible for supervision of the
offender during any subsequent period of time the offender remains
under the court's jurisdiction. The county clerk is authorized to
collect unpaid legal financial obligations at any time the offender
remains under the jurisdiction of the court for purposes of his or her
legal financial obligations.
(5) In order to assist the court in setting a monthly sum that the
offender must pay during the period of supervision, the offender is
required to report to the department for purposes of preparing a
recommendation to the court. When reporting, the offender is required,
under oath, to respond truthfully and honestly to all questions
concerning present, past, and future earning capabilities and the
location and nature of all property or financial assets. The offender
is further required to bring all documents requested by the department.
(6) After completing the investigation, the department shall make
a report to the court on the amount of the monthly payment that the
offender should be required to make towards a satisfied legal financial
obligation.
(7)(a) During the period of supervision, the department may make a
recommendation to the court that the offender's monthly payment
schedule be modified so as to reflect a change in financial
circumstances. If the department sets the monthly payment amount, the
department may modify the monthly payment amount without the matter
being returned to the court. During the period of supervision, the
department may require the offender to report to the department for the
purposes of reviewing the appropriateness of the collection schedule
for the legal financial obligation. During this reporting, the
offender is required under oath to respond truthfully and honestly to
all questions concerning earning capabilities and the location and
nature of all property or financial assets. The offender shall bring
all documents requested by the department in order to prepare the
collection schedule.
(b) Subsequent to any period of supervision, or if the department
is not authorized to supervise the offender in the community, the
county clerk may make a recommendation to the court that the offender's
monthly payment schedule be modified so as to reflect a change in
financial circumstances. If the county clerk sets the monthly payment
amount, or if the department set the monthly payment amount and the
department has subsequently turned the collection of the legal
financial obligation over to the county clerk, the clerk may modify the
monthly payment amount without the matter being returned to the court.
During the period of repayment, the county clerk may require the
offender to report to the clerk for the purpose of reviewing the
appropriateness of the collection schedule for the legal financial
obligation. During this reporting, the offender is required under oath
to respond truthfully and honestly to all questions concerning earning
capabilities and the location and nature of all property or financial
assets. The offender shall bring all documents requested by the county
clerk in order to prepare the collection schedule.
(8) After the judgment and sentence or payment order is entered,
the department is authorized, for any period of supervision, to collect
the legal financial obligation from the offender. Subsequent to any
period of supervision or, if the department is not authorized to
supervise the offender in the community, the county clerk is authorized
to collect unpaid legal financial obligations from the offender. Any
amount collected by the department shall be remitted daily to the
county clerk for the purpose of disbursements. The department and the
county clerks are authorized, but not required, to accept credit cards
as payment for a legal financial obligation, and any costs incurred
related to accepting credit card payments shall be the responsibility
of the offender.
(9) The department or any obligee of the legal financial obligation
may seek a mandatory wage assignment for the purposes of obtaining
satisfaction for the legal financial obligation pursuant to RCW
9.94A.7701. Any party obtaining a wage assignment shall notify the
county clerk. The county clerks shall notify the department, or the
administrative office of the courts, whichever is providing the monthly
billing for the offender.
(10) The requirement that the offender pay a monthly sum towards a
legal financial obligation constitutes a condition or requirement of a
sentence and the offender is subject to the penalties for noncompliance
as provided in RCW 9.94B.040, 9.94A.737, or 9.94A.740.
(11)(a) Until January 1, 2004, the department shall mail
individualized monthly billings to the address known by the department
for each offender with an unsatisfied legal financial obligation.
(b) Beginning January 1, 2004, the administrative office of the
courts shall mail individualized monthly billings to the address known
by the office for each offender with an unsatisfied legal financial
obligation.
(c) The billing shall direct payments, other than outstanding cost
of supervision assessments under RCW 9.94A.780, parole assessments
under RCW 72.04A.120, and cost of probation assessments under RCW
9.95.214, to the county clerk, and cost of supervision, parole, or
probation assessments to the department.
(d) The county clerk shall provide the administrative office of the
courts with notice of payments by such offenders no less frequently
than weekly.
(e) The county clerks, the administrative office of the courts, and
the department shall maintain agreements to implement this subsection.
(12) The department shall arrange for the collection of unpaid
legal financial obligations during any period of supervision in the
community through the county clerk. The department shall either
collect unpaid legal financial obligations or arrange for collections
through another entity if the clerk does not assume responsibility or
is unable to continue to assume responsibility for collection pursuant
to subsection (4) of this section. The costs for collection services
shall be paid by the offender.
(13) The county clerk may access the records of the employment
security department for the purposes of verifying employment or income,
seeking any assignment of wages, or performing other duties necessary
to the collection of an offender's legal financial obligations.
(14) Nothing in this chapter makes the department, the state, the
counties, or any state or county employees, agents, or other persons
acting on their behalf liable under any circumstances for the payment
of these legal financial obligations or for the acts of any offender
who is no longer, or was not, subject to supervision by the department
for a term of community custody, and who remains under the jurisdiction
of the court for payment of legal financial obligations.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.753 and 2003 c 379 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
This section applies to offenses committed after July 1, 1985.
(1) When restitution is ordered, the court shall determine the
amount of restitution due at the sentencing hearing or within one
hundred eighty days except as provided in subsection (7) of this
section. The court may continue the hearing beyond the one hundred
eighty days for good cause. The court shall then set a minimum monthly
payment that the offender is required to make towards the restitution
that is ordered. The court should take into consideration the total
amount of the restitution owed, the offender's present, past, and
future ability to pay, as well as any assets that the offender may
have.
(2) During the period of supervision, the community corrections
officer may examine the offender to determine if there has been a
change in circumstances that warrants an amendment of the monthly
payment schedule. The community corrections officer may recommend a
change to the schedule of payment and shall inform the court of the
recommended change and the reasons for the change. The sentencing
court may then reset the monthly minimum payments based on the report
from the community corrections officer of the change in circumstances.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section,
restitution ordered by a court pursuant to a criminal conviction shall
be based on easily ascertainable damages for injury to or loss of
property, actual expenses incurred for treatment for injury to persons,
and lost wages resulting from injury. Restitution shall not include
reimbursement for damages for mental anguish, pain and suffering, or
other intangible losses, but may include the costs of counseling
reasonably related to the offense. The amount of restitution shall not
exceed double the amount of the offender's gain or the victim's loss
from the commission of the crime.
(4) For the purposes of this section, for an offense committed
prior to July 1, 2000, the offender shall remain under the court's
jurisdiction for a term of ten years following the offender's release
from total confinement or ten years subsequent to the entry of the
judgment and sentence, whichever period ends later. Prior to the
expiration of the initial ten-year period, the superior court may
extend jurisdiction under the criminal judgment an additional ten years
for payment of restitution. For an offense committed on or after July
1, 2000, the offender shall remain under the court's jurisdiction until
the obligation is completely satisfied, regardless of the statutory
maximum for the crime. The portion of the sentence concerning
restitution may be modified as to amount, terms, and conditions during
any period of time the offender remains under the court's jurisdiction,
regardless of the expiration of the offender's term of community
supervision and regardless of the statutory maximum sentence for the
crime. The court may not reduce the total amount of restitution
ordered because the offender may lack the ability to pay the total
amount. The offender's compliance with the restitution shall be
supervised by the department only during any period which the
department is authorized to supervise the offender in the community
under RCW 9.94A.728, 9.94A.501, or in which the offender is in
confinement in a state correctional institution or a correctional
facility pursuant to a transfer agreement with the department, and the
department shall supervise the offender's compliance during any such
period. The department is responsible for supervision of the offender
only during confinement and authorized supervision and not during any
subsequent period in which the offender remains under the court's
jurisdiction. The county clerk is authorized to collect unpaid
restitution at any time the offender remains under the jurisdiction of
the court for purposes of his or her legal financial obligations.
(5) Except as provided in section 1 of this act, restitution shall
be ordered whenever the offender is convicted of an offense which
results in injury to any person or damage to or loss of property or as
provided in subsection (6) of this section unless extraordinary
circumstances exist which make restitution inappropriate in the court's
judgment and the court sets forth such circumstances in the record. In
addition, restitution shall be ordered to pay for an injury, loss, or
damage if the offender pleads guilty to a lesser offense or fewer
offenses and agrees with the prosecutor's recommendation that the
offender be required to pay restitution to a victim of an offense or
offenses which are not prosecuted pursuant to a plea agreement.
(6) Restitution for the crime of rape of a child in the first,
second, or third degree, in which the victim becomes pregnant, shall
include: (a) All of the victim's medical expenses that are associated
with the rape and resulting pregnancy; and (b) child support for any
child born as a result of the rape if child support is ordered pursuant
to a civil superior court or administrative order for support for that
child. The clerk must forward any restitution payments made on behalf
of the victim's child to the Washington state child support registry
under chapter 26.23 RCW. Identifying information about the victim and
child shall not be included in the order. The offender shall receive
a credit against any obligation owing under the administrative or
superior court order for support of the victim's child. For the
purposes of this subsection, the offender shall remain under the
court's jurisdiction until the offender has satisfied support
obligations under the superior court or administrative order for the
period provided in RCW 4.16.020 or a maximum term of twenty-five years
following the offender's release from total confinement or twenty-five
years subsequent to the entry of the judgment and sentence, whichever
period is longer. The court may not reduce the total amount of
restitution ordered because the offender may lack the ability to pay
the total amount. The department shall supervise the offender's
compliance with the restitution ordered under this subsection.
(7) Regardless of the provisions of subsections (1) through (6) of
this section, and except as provided in section 1 of this act, the
court shall order restitution in all cases where the victim is entitled
to benefits under the crime victims' compensation act, chapter 7.68
RCW. If the court does not order restitution and the victim of the
crime has been determined to be entitled to benefits under the crime
victims' compensation act, the department of labor and industries, as
administrator of the crime victims' compensation program, may petition
the court within one year of entry of the judgment and sentence for
entry of a restitution order. Upon receipt of a petition from the
department of labor and industries, the court shall hold a restitution
hearing and shall enter a restitution order.
(8) In addition to any sentence that may be imposed, an offender
who has been found guilty of an offense involving fraud or other
deceptive practice or an organization which has been found guilty of
any such offense may be ordered by the sentencing court to give notice
of the conviction to the class of persons or to the sector of the
public affected by the conviction or financially interested in the
subject matter of the offense by mail, by advertising in designated
areas or through designated media, or by other appropriate means.
(9) This section does not limit civil remedies or defenses
available to the victim, survivors of the victim, or offender including
support enforcement remedies for support ordered under subsection (6)
of this section for a child born as a result of a rape of a child
victim. The court shall identify in the judgment and sentence the
victim or victims entitled to restitution and what amount is due each
victim. The state or victim may enforce the court-ordered restitution
in the same manner as a judgment in a civil action. Restitution
collected through civil enforcement must be paid through the registry
of the court and must be distributed proportionately according to each
victim's loss when there is more than one victim.

--- END ---