BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.22 RCW
to read as follows:
Any person who holds a city elected office for which he or she
receives compensation is prohibited from simultaneously holding an
elected state or legislative office for which he or she also receives
compensation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.23 RCW
to read as follows:
Any person who holds a city elected office for which he or she
receives compensation is prohibited from simultaneously holding an
elected state or legislative office for which he or she also receives
compensation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35.27 RCW
to read as follows:
Any person who holds a town elected office for which he or she
receives compensation is prohibited from simultaneously holding an
elected state or legislative office for which he or she also receives
compensation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 36.16 RCW
to read as follows:
Any person who holds a county elected office for which he or she
receives compensation is prohibited from simultaneously holding an
elected state or legislative office for which he or she also receives
compensation.

--- END ---