BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that despite a
recognized law prohibiting harassment, intimidation, and bullying of
students in public schools and despite widespread adoption of
antiharassment policies by school districts, harassment of students
continues and has not declined since the law was enacted. Furthermore,
students and parents continue to seek assistance against harassment,
and schools need to disseminate more widely their antiharassment
policies and procedures. The legislature intends to expand the tools,
information, and strategies that can be used to combat harassment,
intimidation, and bullying of students, and increase awareness of the
need for respectful learning communities in all public schools.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.300.285 and 2007 c 407 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By August 1, ((2003)) 2011, each school district shall adopt or
amend if necessary a policy((, within the scope of its authority,)) and
procedure that at a minimum incorporates the revised model policy and
procedure provided under subsection (4) of this section that prohibits
the harassment, intimidation, or bullying of any student. It is the
responsibility of each school district to share this policy with
parents or guardians, students, volunteers, and school employees in
accordance with rules adopted by the superintendent of public
instruction. Each school district shall designate one person in the
district as the primary contact regarding the antiharassment,
intimidation, or bullying policy. The primary contact shall receive
copies of all formal and informal complaints, have responsibility for
assuring the implementation of the policy and procedure, and serve as
the primary contact on the policy and procedures between the school
district, the office of the education ombudsman, and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.
(2) "Harassment, intimidation, or bullying" means any intentional
electronic, written, verbal, or physical act, including but not limited
to one shown to be motivated by any characteristic in RCW 9A.36.080(3),
or other distinguishing characteristics, when the intentional
electronic, written, verbal, or physical act:
(a) Physically harms a student or damages the student's property;
or
(b) Has the effect of substantially interfering with a student's
education; or
(c) Is so severe, persistent, or pervasive that it creates an
intimidating or threatening educational environment; or
(d) Has the effect of substantially disrupting the orderly
operation of the school.
Nothing in this section requires the affected student to actually
possess a characteristic that is a basis for the harassment,
intimidation, or bullying.
(3) The policy and procedure should be adopted or amended through
a process that includes representation of parents or guardians, school
employees, volunteers, students, administrators, and community
representatives. It is recommended that each such policy emphasize
positive character traits and values, including the importance of civil
and respectful speech and conduct, and the responsibility of students
to comply with the district's policy prohibiting harassment,
intimidation, or bullying.
(4)(a) By August 1, ((2002)) 2010, the superintendent of public
instruction, in consultation with representatives of parents, school
personnel, the office of the education ombudsman, and other interested
parties, shall provide to the education committees of the legislature
a revised and updated model harassment, intimidation, and bullying
prevention policy and procedure. If the legislature takes no action
during the 2011 legislative session regarding the policy and procedure,
the superintendent of public instruction shall provide to school
districts and educational service districts ((a)) the revised and
updated model harassment, intimidation, and bullying prevention policy
and procedure, along with training materials on the components that
((should)) must be included in any district policy and procedure. The
superintendent shall adopt rules regarding school districts'
communication of the policy and procedure to parents, students,
employees, and volunteers. Training materials shall be disseminated in
a variety of ways, including workshops and other staff developmental
activities, and through the office of the superintendent of public
instruction's web site, with a link to the safety center web page.
((On the web site:
(a))) (b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall post its model policy and procedure, recommended training
materials, and instructional materials((;)) on the web site.
(((b))) (c) The office of the superintendent of public instruction
has the authority to update with new technologies access to this
information in the safety center, to the extent resources are made
available((; and)).
(((c))) (d) Individual school districts shall have direct access to
the safety center web site to post a brief summary of their policies,
procedures, programs, partnerships, vendors, and instructional and
training materials, and to provide a link to the school district's web
site for further information.
(5) The Washington state school directors association, with the
assistance of the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
shall convene an advisory committee to develop a model policy
prohibiting acts of harassment, intimidation, or bullying that are
conducted via electronic means by a student while on school grounds and
during the school day. The policy shall include a requirement that
materials meant to educate parents and students about the seriousness
of cyberbullying be disseminated to parents or made available on the
school district's web site. The school directors association and the
advisory committee shall develop sample materials for school districts
to disseminate, which shall also include information on responsible and
safe internet use as well as what options are available if a student is
being bullied via electronic means, including but not limited to,
reporting threats to local police and when to involve school officials,
the internet service provider, or phone service provider. The school
directors association shall submit the model policy and sample
materials, along with a recommendation for local adoption, to the
governor and the legislature and shall post the model policy and sample
materials on its web site by January 1, 2008. Each school district
board of directors shall establish its own policy by August 1, 2008.
(6) As used in this section, "electronic" or "electronic means"
means any communication where there is the transmission of information
by wire, radio, optical cable, electromagnetic, or other similar means.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.06B RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to duties assigned under RCW 43.06B.020, the office
of the education ombudsman shall serve as the lead agency to provide
resources and tools to parents and families about public school
antiharassment policies and strategies.
(2)(a) The office of the education ombudsman and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall convene an ongoing
antiharassment work group to develop, recommend, and implement
strategies to improve school climate and create respectful learning
environments in all public schools in Washington. The work group
shall:
(i) Consider whether additional disaggregated data should be
collected regarding incidents of harassment or disciplinary actions;
(ii) Examine possible procedures for anonymous reporting of
incidents;
(iii) Identify curriculum and best practices for school districts
to improve school climate and create respectful learning environments;
(iv) Recommend best practices for informing parents about the
antiharassment policy and procedure and involving parents in improving
school climate; and
(v) Recommend training for district personnel who are designated as
the primary contact regarding the policy and procedure.
(b) The work group must include two members each of the house of
representatives and the senate and representatives from the state board
of education, the Washington state parent teacher association, school
directors, school administrators, principals, teachers, classified
school staff, youth, community organizations, and parents. The work
group shall submit a biennial progress and status report to the
governor and the education committees of the legislature, beginning
December 1, 2011.

--- END ---