BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Actions taken by the legislature on a wide
variety of issues have the ability to dramatically and subtly impact
local governments. Often the legislature has insufficient information
to gauge the potential burden proposed legislation may have on our
local governments. A better understanding of the fiscal impacts of
state legislation will enhance the formulation of policies, especially
considering the challenges of the current budget crisis. The
legislature finds that there is a need to improve the process of how
local government fiscal notes are prepared and requests a comprehensive
review of the current process and an assessment of potential options to
increase performance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
The department, in consultation with local governments and the
legislature, shall review the local government fiscal note program
under chapter 43.132 RCW by analyzing similar programs in other states,
studying and evaluating processes and procedures of the program, and
examining practices for communication between the program and local
governments, the office of financial management, and the legislature.
The department must report findings and recommendations to the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee by November
1, 2010. The report must identify effective practices for determining
local fiscal impact and provide recommendations to (1) improve
communications between the program and local governments, the office of
financial management, and the legislature; (2) prioritize requests for
local government fiscal notes that facilitate the process and provide
consistency and timeliness; (3) facilitate communication of local
government fiscal impact information and responding to requests in a
timely manner; and (4) retain qualified staff.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2010, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 2 of this act expires November 1,
2011.

--- END ---