BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 39.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For any public work estimated to cost over one million dollars,
the contract must contain a provision requiring the contractor to
submit certain information about off-site, prefabricated, nonstandard,
project specific items produced under the terms of the contract and
produced outside Washington. The information must be submitted to the
awarding agency and to the department of general administration within
ten days of delivery of the item under the contract. The information
that must be provided is:
(a) The total cost of the public works project;
(b) The contract value, including labor and materials, of the off-site, prefabricated, nonstandard, project specific items produced
outside Washington; and
(c) The name, address, and federal employer identification number
of the contractor that produced the off-site, prefabricated,
nonstandard, project specific items.
(2)(a) The required information under this section must be
submitted on forms made available by the department of general
administration.
(b) The department of general administration shall develop standard
contract language to meet the requirements of subsection (1)(a) of this
section and make the language available on its web site.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "off-site, prefabricated,
nonstandard, project specific items" means products or items that are:
(a) Made primarily of architectural or structural precast concrete,
fabricated steel, pipe and pipe systems, or sheet metal and sheet metal
duct work; (b) produced specifically for the public work and not
considered to be regularly available shelf items; (c) produced or
manufactured by labor expended to assemble or modify standard items;
and (d) produced at an off-site location.
(4) The department of general administration shall compile
information collected under this section and submit it on an annual
basis to the capital projects advisory review board created in RCW
39.10.220 for review and public hearing.
(5) This section applies to contracts entered into on or after
September 1, 2010, and expires December 31, 2015.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.04.350 and 2009 c 197 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Before award of a public works contract, a bidder must meet the
following responsibility criteria to be considered a responsible bidder
and qualified to be awarded a public works project. The bidder must:
(a) At the time of bid submittal, have a certificate of
registration in compliance with chapter 18.27 RCW;
(b) Have a current state unified business identifier number;
(c) If applicable, have industrial insurance coverage for the
bidder's employees working in Washington as required in Title 51 RCW;
an employment security department number as required in Title 50 RCW;
and a state excise tax registration number as required in Title 82 RCW;
(d) Not be disqualified from bidding on any public works contract
under RCW 39.06.010 or 39.12.065(3); ((and))
(e) If bidding on a public works project subject to the
apprenticeship utilization requirements in RCW 39.04.320, not have been
found out of compliance by the Washington state apprenticeship and
training council for working apprentices out of ratio, without
appropriate supervision, or outside their approved work processes as
outlined in their standards of apprenticeship under chapter 49.04 RCW
for the one-year period immediately preceding the date of the bid
solicitation; and
(f) Until December 31, 2015, not have violated section 1 of this
act more than one time.
(2) In addition to the bidder responsibility criteria in subsection
(1) of this section, the state or municipality may adopt relevant
supplemental criteria for determining bidder responsibility applicable
to a particular project which the bidder must meet.
(a) Supplemental criteria for determining bidder responsibility,
including the basis for evaluation and the deadline for appealing a
determination that a bidder is not responsible, must be provided in the
invitation to bid or bidding documents.
(b) In a timely manner before the bid submittal deadline, a
potential bidder may request that the state or municipality modify the
supplemental criteria. The state or municipality must evaluate the
information submitted by the potential bidder and respond before the
bid submittal deadline. If the evaluation results in a change of the
criteria, the state or municipality must issue an addendum to the
bidding documents identifying the new criteria.
(c) If the bidder fails to supply information requested concerning
responsibility within the time and manner specified in the bid
documents, the state or municipality may base its determination of
responsibility upon any available information related to the
supplemental criteria or may find the bidder not responsible.
(d) If the state or municipality determines a bidder to be not
responsible, the state or municipality must provide, in writing, the
reasons for the determination. The bidder may appeal the determination
within the time period specified in the bidding documents by presenting
additional information to the state or municipality. The state or
municipality must consider the additional information before issuing
its final determination. If the final determination affirms that the
bidder is not responsible, the state or municipality may not execute a
contract with any other bidder until two business days after the bidder
determined to be not responsible has received the final determination.
(3) The capital projects advisory review board created in RCW
39.10.220 shall develop suggested guidelines to assist the state and
municipalities in developing supplemental bidder responsibility
criteria. The guidelines must be posted on the board's web site.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The expiration of section 1 of this act does
not affect any request or proceeding instituted prior to the expiration
of section 1 of this act.

--- END ---