BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 16.57.160 and 2006 c 156 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director may adopt rules:
(1) Designating any point for mandatory inspection of cattle or
horses or the furnishing of proof that cattle or horses passing or
being transported through the point have been inspected or identified
and are lawfully being transported;
(2) ((Providing for self-inspection of twenty-five head or less of
cattle;
(3))) Providing for issuance of individual horse and cattle
identification certificates or other means of horse and cattle
identification; and
(((4))) (3) Designating the documents that constitute other
satisfactory proof of ownership for cattle and horses. ((A bill of
sale may not be designated as documenting satisfactory proof of
ownership for cattle.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 16.57 RCW
to read as follows:
The director may charge a fee of twenty-five dollars for
replacement copies of official brand inspection documents. The
director may increase by rule the fee established in this section. The
director may adopt rules governing issuing replacement official brand
inspection documents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 16.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person may not bring an animal into this state without first
having secured an official health certificate or certificate of
veterinary inspection, reviewed by the state veterinarian of the state
of origin, that the animal meets the health requirements of the state
of Washington. The director may exempt animals from this requirement
by rule.
(2) Livestock imported into this state that are destined for
immediate slaughter at a federally inspected slaughter facility where
federal disease control standards are applied may enter this state
without an official health certificate or certificate of veterinary
inspection. The livestock must be delivered within twelve hours after
entry to an approved, inspected feed lot for subsequent slaughter or to
a federally inspected slaughter establishment. A person may not: (a)
Divert the livestock en route to other than to an approved, inspected
feed lot for subsequent slaughter; (b) sell the livestock for any
purpose other than immediate slaughter; (c) fail to slaughter the
livestock or deliver the livestock to a slaughter establishment or
approved, inspected feed lot within twelve hours after entry; or (d)
for livestock for sale for immediate slaughter, fail to deliver the
livestock within twelve hours to a licensed public livestock market or
fail to deliver the livestock to a slaughter establishment or approved,
inspected feed lot within twelve hours after leaving the licensed
public livestock market.
(3) The director has the authority to monitor any livestock
entering the state without an official health certificate or
certificate of veterinary inspection. The director also has the
authority to monitor any livestock entering the state under a permit
requiring the livestock to be delivered to a federally inspected
slaughter establishment, or to an approved, inspected feed lot for
subsequent slaughter, or to another stated destination. Persons
importing, transporting, receiving, feeding, or housing such livestock
shall make the livestock and related records available for inspection
by the director.
(4) The department shall charge a time and mileage fee for
inspection of livestock and records during an investigation of
violations of this section. For purposes of this section, the time and
mileage fee is eighty-five dollars per hour and the current mileage
rate set by the office of financial management. The director may
increase by rule the initial fees established in this section as
necessary to cover costs of the investigations. All fees collected
under this section shall be deposited in an account in the agricultural
local fund and used to carry out the purposes of this chapter.
(5) The director may adopt and enforce rules necessary to carry out
the purpose and provisions of this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 16.36.060 and 2004 c 251 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director has the authority to enter ((the animal premises
of any animal owner)) a property at any reasonable time to conduct
tests, examinations, or inspections ((for disease conditions)), to take
samples, and to examine and copy records when there is reasonable cause
to investigate whether animals on the ((premises)) property or that
have been on the ((premises)) property are infected with or have been
exposed to ((a reportable)) disease. It is unlawful for any person to
interfere with the tests, inspections, or examinations, or to alter any
segregation or identification systems made in connection with the
tests, inspections, or examinations. ((When the director has
determined that there is probable cause that there is a serious risk
from disease or contamination, the director may seize those items
necessary to conduct the tests, inspections, or examinations.))
(2) The director has the authority to enter a property at any
reasonable time to investigate: (a) Whether livestock on the property
have been imported into this state in violation of import requirements
of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter or are in violation
of the conditions of an import permit; or (b) whether livestock on the
property have been imported without an official health certificate or
certificate of veterinary inspection and are destined for immediate
slaughter at a federally inspected slaughter facility or destined for
an approved, inspected feed lot for subsequent slaughter. In the
course of such an investigation, the director may conduct tests,
examinations, and inspections, take samples, and examine and copy
records. It is unlawful for any person to interfere with the tests,
inspections, or examinations, or to alter any segregation or
identification systems made in connection with the tests, inspections,
or examinations.
(3) If the director is denied access to ((the animal premises)) a
property or ((the)) animals for the purposes ((of conducting tests,
inspections, or examinations or the animal owner)) of this chapter or
a person fails to comply with an order of the director, the director
may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction for a search warrant.
The warrant may authorize access to any animal or ((animal premises))
property at reasonable times for purposes of conducting tests,
inspections, or examinations of any animal or ((animal premises, or))
property, examination and copying of records, and taking samples, and
may authorize seizure or destruction of property. ((The warrant shall
be issued upon probable cause being found by the court. It is
sufficient probable cause to show a potential threat to the
agricultural interests of this state or a potential threat which
seriously endangers animals, human health, the environment, or public
welfare.)) The court may upon such application, issue the search
warrant for the purposes requested. To show that access is denied, the
director shall file with the court an affidavit or declaration
containing a description of all attempts to notify and locate the owner
or the owner's agent and to secure consent.

--- END ---