BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.41.060 and 2009 c 555 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall have the general powers and authority granted
under the laws of this state to insurance companies, health care
service contractors, and health maintenance organizations, licensed or
registered to offer or provide the kinds of health coverage defined
under this title. In addition thereto, the board shall:
(a) Designate or establish the standard health questionnaire to be
used under RCW 48.41.100 and 48.43.018, including the form and content
of the standard health questionnaire and the method of its application.
The questionnaire must provide for an objective evaluation of an
individual's health status by assigning a discreet measure, such as a
system of point scoring to each individual. The questionnaire must not
contain any questions related to pregnancy, and pregnancy shall not be
a basis for coverage by the pool. The questionnaire shall be designed
such that it is reasonably expected to identify the eight percent of
persons who are the most costly to treat who are under individual
coverage in health benefit plans, as defined in RCW 48.43.005, in
Washington state or are covered by the pool, if applied to all such
persons;
(b) Obtain from a member of the American academy of actuaries, who
is independent of the board, a certification that the standard health
questionnaire meets the requirements of (a) of this subsection;
(c) Approve the standard health questionnaire and any modifications
needed to comply with this chapter. The standard health questionnaire
shall be submitted to an actuary for certification, modified as
necessary, and approved at least every thirty-six months. The
designation and approval of the standard health questionnaire by the
board shall not be subject to review and approval by the commissioner.
The standard health questionnaire or any modification thereto shall not
be used until ninety days after public notice of the approval of the
questionnaire or any modification thereto, except that the initial
standard health questionnaire approved for use by the board after March
23, 2000, may be used immediately following public notice of such
approval;
(d) Establish appropriate rates, rate schedules, rate adjustments,
expense allowances, claim reserve formulas and any other actuarial
functions appropriate to the operation of the pool. Rates shall not be
unreasonable in relation to the coverage provided, the risk experience,
and expenses of providing the coverage. Rates and rate schedules may
be adjusted for appropriate risk factors such as age and area variation
in claim costs and shall take into consideration appropriate risk
factors in accordance with established actuarial underwriting practices
consistent with Washington state individual plan rating requirements
under RCW 48.44.022 and 48.46.064;
(e)(i) Assess members of the pool in accordance with the provisions
of this chapter, and make advance interim assessments as may be
reasonable and necessary for the organizational or interim operating
expenses. Any interim assessments will be credited as offsets against
any regular assessments due following the close of the year.
(ii) Self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangements are subject
to assessment under this subsection only in the event that assessments
are not preempted by the employee retirement income security act of
1974, as amended, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 1001 et seq. The arrangements and the
commissioner shall initially request an advisory opinion from the
United States department of labor or obtain a declaratory ruling from
a federal court on the legality of imposing assessments on these
arrangements before imposing the assessment. Once the legality of the
assessments has been determined, the multiple employer welfare
arrangement certified by the insurance commissioner must begin payment
of these assessments.
(iii) If there has not been a final determination of the legality
of these assessments, then beginning on the earlier of (A) the date the
fourth multiple employer welfare arrangement has been certified by the
insurance commissioner, or (B) April 1, 2006, the arrangement shall
deposit the assessments imposed by this subsection into an interest
bearing escrow account maintained by the arrangement. Upon a final
determination that the assessments are not preempted by the employee
retirement income security act of 1974, as amended, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 1001
et seq., all funds in the interest bearing escrow account shall be
transferred to the board;
(f) Issue policies of health coverage in accordance with the
requirements of this chapter;
(g) Establish procedures for the administration of the premium
discount provided under RCW 48.41.200(3)(a)(iii);
(h) Contract with the Washington state health care authority for
the administration of the premium discounts provided under RCW
48.41.200(3)(a) (i) and (ii);
(i) Set a reasonable fee to be paid to an insurance producer
licensed in Washington state for submitting an acceptable application
for enrollment in the pool; ((and))
(j) Provide certification to the commissioner when assessments will
exceed the threshold level established in RCW 48.41.037; and
(k) Designate a health plan that meets the requirements of the
health coverage tax credit program created by the trade act of 2002
(P.L. 107-210) and adopt rules for the pool to administer the health
coverage tax credit program.
(2) In addition thereto, the board may:
(a) Enter into contracts as are necessary or proper to carry out
the provisions and purposes of this chapter including the authority,
with the approval of the commissioner, to enter into contracts with
similar pools of other states for the joint performance of common
administrative functions, or with persons or other organizations for
the performance of administrative functions;
(b) Sue or be sued, including taking any legal action as necessary
to avoid the payment of improper claims against the pool or the
coverage provided by or through the pool;
(c) Appoint appropriate legal, actuarial, and other committees as
necessary to provide technical assistance in the operation of the pool,
policy, and other contract design, and any other function within the
authority of the pool; and
(d) Conduct periodic audits to assure the general accuracy of the
financial data submitted to the pool, and the board shall cause the
pool to have an annual audit of its operations by an independent
certified public accountant.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require or
authorize the adoption of rules under chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.47.010 and 2009 c 568 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(((a) The legislature finds that limitations on access to health
care services for enrollees in the state, such as in rural and
underserved areas, are particularly challenging for the basic health
plan. Statutory restrictions have reduced the options available to the
administrator to address the access needs of basic health plan
enrollees. It is the intent of the legislature to authorize the
administrator to develop alternative purchasing strategies to ensure
access to basic health plan enrollees in all areas of the state,
including: (i) The use of differential rating for managed health care
systems based on geographic differences in costs; and (ii) limited use
of self-insurance in areas where adequate access cannot be assured
through other options.
(b) In developing alternative purchasing strategies to address
health care access needs, the administrator shall consult with
interested persons including health carriers, health care providers,
and health facilities, and with other appropriate state agencies
including the office of the insurance commissioner and the office of
community and rural health. In pursuing such alternatives, the
administrator shall continue to give priority to prepaid managed care
as the preferred method of assuring access to basic health plan
enrollees followed, in priority order, by preferred providers, fee for
service, and self-funding.
(2))) The legislature ((further)) finds that:
(a) A significant percentage of the population of this state ((does
not have reasonably available insurance or other coverage of the costs
of necessary basic health care services)) cannot afford to purchase
health care coverage without financial assistance; and
(b) This lack of basic health care coverage is detrimental to the
health of the individuals lacking coverage and to the public welfare,
and results in substantial expenditures for emergency and remedial
health care, often at the expense of health care providers, health care
facilities, and all purchasers of health care, including the state((;
and
(c) The use of managed health care systems has significant
potential to reduce the growth of health care costs incurred by the
people of this state generally, and by low-income pregnant women, and
at-risk children and adolescents who need greater access to managed
health care)).
(((3))) (2) The purpose of this chapter is to provide ((or make
more readily available necessary basic health care services in an
appropriate setting)) a state subsidy to working persons and others who
lack coverage((, at a cost to these persons that does not create
barriers to the utilization of necessary health care services. To that
end, this chapter establishes a program to be made available to those
residents not eligible for medicare who share in a portion of the cost
or who pay the full cost of receiving basic health care services from
a managed health care system)) to purchase health care coverage in the
private health insurance market or through an employer-based health
plan.
(((4))) (3) It is not the intent of this chapter to provide health
care services for those persons who are presently covered through
private employer-based health plans, nor to replace employer-based
health plans. However, the legislature recognizes that cost-effective
and affordable health plans may not always be available to small
business employers. Further, it is the intent of the legislature to
expand, wherever possible, the availability of private health care
coverage and to discourage the decline of employer-based coverage.
(((5)(a) It is the purpose of this chapter to acknowledge the
initial success of this program that has (i) assisted thousands of
families in their search for affordable health care; (ii) demonstrated
that low-income, uninsured families are willing to pay for their own
health care coverage to the extent of their ability to pay; and (iii)
proved that local health care providers are willing to enter into a
public-private partnership as a managed care system.
(b) As a consequence, the legislature intends to extend an option
to enroll to certain citizens above two hundred percent of the federal
poverty guidelines within the state who reside in communities where the
plan is operational and who collectively or individually wish to
exercise the opportunity to purchase health care coverage through the
basic health plan if the purchase is done at no cost to the state. It
is also the intent of the legislature to allow employers and other
financial sponsors to financially assist such individuals to purchase
health care through the program so long as such purchase does not
result in a lower standard of coverage for employees.
(c) The legislature intends that, to the extent of available funds,
the program be available throughout Washington state to subsidized and
nonsubsidized enrollees. It is also the intent of the legislature to
enroll subsidized enrollees first, to the maximum extent feasible.
(d))) (4) The legislature directs that the basic health plan
administrator identify enrollees who are likely to be eligible for
medical assistance and assist these individuals in applying for and
receiving medical assistance. The administrator and the department of
social and health services shall implement a seamless system to
coordinate eligibility determinations and benefit coverage for
enrollees of the basic health plan and medical assistance recipients.
Enrollees receiving medical assistance are not eligible for the
Washington basic health plan.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.47.015 and 2009 c 479 s 49 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The legislature finds that the basic health plan has been an
effective program in providing health coverage for uninsured residents.
Further, since 1993, substantial amounts of public funds have been
allocated for subsidized basic health plan enrollment.
(2) Effective January 1, 1996, basic health plan enrollees whose
income is less than one hundred twenty-five percent of the federal
poverty level shall pay at least a ten-dollar premium share.
(3))) No later than July 1, 1996, the administrator shall implement
procedures whereby hospitals licensed under chapters 70.41 and 71.12
RCW, health carrier, rural health care facilities regulated under
chapter 70.175 RCW, and community and migrant health centers funded
under RCW 41.05.220, may expeditiously assist patients and their
families in applying for basic health plan or medical assistance
coverage, and in submitting such applications directly to the health
care authority or the department of social and health services. The
health care authority and the department of social and health services
shall make every effort to simplify and expedite the application and
enrollment process.
(((4))) (2) No later than July 1, 1996, the administrator shall
implement procedures whereby disability insurance producers, licensed
under chapter 48.17 RCW, may expeditiously assist patients and their
families in applying for basic health plan or medical assistance
coverage, and in submitting such applications directly to the health
care authority or the department of social and health services.
((Insurance producers may receive a commission for each individual sale
of the basic health plan to anyone not signed up within the previous
five years and a commission for each group sale of the basic health
plan, if funding for this purpose is provided in a specific
appropriation to the health care authority. No commission shall be
provided upon a renewal. Commissions shall be determined based on the
estimated annual cost of the basic health plan, however, commissions
shall not result in a reduction in the premium amount paid to health
carriers. For purposes of this section "health carrier" is as defined
in RCW 48.43.005. The administrator may establish: (a) Minimum
educational requirements that must be completed by the insurance
producers; (b) an appointment process for insurance producers marketing
the basic health plan; or (c) standards for revocation of the
appointment of an insurance producer to submit applications for cause,
including untrustworthy or incompetent conduct or harm to the public.
The health care authority and the department of social and health
services shall make every effort to simplify and expedite the
application and enrollment process.))

Sec. 4 RCW 70.47.020 and 2009 c 568 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Administrator" means the Washington basic health plan
administrator, who also holds the position of administrator of the
Washington state health care authority.
(2) (("Health coverage tax credit eligible enrollee" means
individual workers and their qualified family members who lose their
jobs due to the effects of international trade and are eligible for
certain trade adjustment assistance benefits; or are eligible for
benefits under the alternative trade adjustment assistance program; or
are people who receive benefits from the pension benefit guaranty
corporation and are at least fifty-five years old.
(3) "Health coverage tax credit program" means the program created
by the Trade Act of 2002 (P.L. 107-210) that provides a federal tax
credit that subsidizes private health insurance coverage for displaced
workers certified to receive certain trade adjustment assistance
benefits and for individuals receiving benefits from the pension
benefit guaranty corporation.
(4) "Managed health care system" means: (a) Any health care
organization, including health care providers, insurers, health care
service contractors, health maintenance organizations, or any
combination thereof, that provides directly or by contract basic health
care services, as defined by the administrator and rendered by duly
licensed providers, to a defined patient population enrolled in the
plan and in the managed health care system; or (b) a self-funded or
self-insured method of providing insurance coverage to subsidized
enrollees provided under RCW 41.05.140 and subject to the limitations
under RCW 70.47.100(7).
(5) "Nonsubsidized enrollee" means an individual, or an individual
plus the individual's spouse or dependent children: (a) Who is not
eligible for medicare; (b) who is not confined or residing in a
government-operated institution, unless he or she meets eligibility
criteria adopted by the administrator; (c) who is accepted for
enrollment by the administrator as provided in RCW 48.43.018, either
because the potential enrollee cannot be required to complete the
standard health questionnaire under RCW 48.43.018, or, based upon the
results of the standard health questionnaire, the potential enrollee
would not qualify for coverage under the Washington state health
insurance pool; (d) who resides in an area of the state served by a
managed health care system participating in the plan; (e) who chooses
to obtain basic health care coverage from a particular managed health
care system; and (f) who pays or on whose behalf is paid the full costs
for participation in the plan, without any subsidy from the plan.
(6))) "Health benefit plan" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
48.43.005 or any plan provided by a self-funded multiple employer
welfare arrangement as defined in RCW 48.125.010 or by another benefit
arrangement defined in the federal employee retirement income security
act of 1974, as amended.
(3) "Premium" means a periodic payment, which an individual, their
employer, or another financial sponsor makes to ((the)) a health
benefit plan as consideration for enrollment in the health benefit plan
((as a subsidized enrollee, a nonsubsidized enrollee, or a health
coverage tax credit eligible enrollee.
(7) "Rate" means the amount, negotiated by the administrator with
and paid to a participating managed health care system, that is based
upon the enrollment of subsidized, nonsubsidized, and health coverage
tax credit eligible enrollees in the plan and in that system)).
(((8))) (4) "Subsidy" means ((the difference between the amount of
periodic payment the administrator makes to a managed health care
system on behalf of a subsidized enrollee plus the administrative cost
to the plan of providing the plan to that subsidized enrollee, and the
amount determined to be the subsidized enrollee's responsibility under
RCW 70.47.060(2))) payment or reimbursement to an enrollee toward the
purchase of a health benefit plan, and may include a net billing
arrangement with insurance carriers or a prospective or retrospective
payment for health benefit plan premiums.
(((9) "Subsidized)) (5) "Enrollee" means:
(a) An individual, or an individual plus the individual's spouse
((or dependent children)):
(i) Who is not eligible for medicare;
(ii) Who is not confined or residing in a government-operated
institution, unless he or she meets eligibility criteria adopted by the
administrator;
(iii) Who is a legal resident of the United States;
(iv) Who is not a full-time student who has received a temporary
visa to study in the United States;
(((iv) Who resides in an area of the state served by a managed
health care system participating in the plan;))
(v) Whose gross family income at the time of enrollment does not
exceed two hundred percent of the federal poverty level as adjusted for
family size and determined annually by the federal department of health
and human services;
(vi) Who ((chooses to obtain basic health care coverage from a
particular managed health care system in return for periodic payments
to the plan)) is at least thirty-five years of age; and
(vii) Who is not receiving medical assistance administered by the
department of social and health services; and
(b) An individual who meets the requirements in (a)(i) through
(iv), (vi), and (vii) of this subsection and who is a foster parent
licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW and whose gross family income at the
time of enrollment does not exceed three hundred percent of the federal
poverty level as adjusted for family size and determined annually by
the federal department of health and human services((; and
(c) To the extent that state funds are specifically appropriated
for this purpose, with a corresponding federal match, an individual, or
an individual's spouse or dependent children, who meets the
requirements in (a)(i) through (iv), (vi), and (vii) of this subsection
and whose gross family income at the time of enrollment is more than
two hundred percent, but less than two hundred fifty-one percent, of
the federal poverty level as adjusted for family size and determined
annually by the federal department of health and human services)).
(((10))) (6) "Washington basic health plan" or "plan" means the
system of enrollment and payment for ((basic health care services))
health insurance subsidies, administered by the plan administrator
((through participating managed health care systems, created by this
chapter)).

Sec. 5 RCW 70.47.030 and 2004 c 192 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) The basic health plan trust account is hereby established
in the state treasury. Any nongeneral fund-state funds collected for
this program shall be deposited in the basic health plan trust account
and may be expended without further appropriation. Moneys in the
account shall be used exclusively for the purposes of this chapter,
including payments to ((participating managed health care systems))
health benefit plans on behalf of enrollees in the plan and payment of
costs of administering the plan.
((During the 1995-97 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer
funds from the basic health plan trust account to the state general
fund.
(2) The basic health plan subscription account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from amounts due from or
on behalf of nonsubsidized enrollees and health coverage tax credit
eligible enrollees shall be deposited into the account. Funds in the
account shall be used exclusively for the purposes of this chapter,
including payments to participating managed health care systems on
behalf of nonsubsidized enrollees and health coverage tax credit
eligible enrollees in the plan and payment of costs of administering
the plan. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures.
(3) The administrator shall take every precaution to see that none
of the funds in the separate accounts created in this section or that
any premiums paid either by subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees are
commingled in any way, except that the administrator may combine funds
designated for administration of the plan into a single administrative
account.))

Sec. 6 RCW 70.47.040 and 1993 c 492 s 211 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The Washington basic health plan is created as a program within
the Washington state health care authority. The administrative head
and appointing authority of the plan shall be the administrator of the
Washington state health care authority. The administrator shall
appoint a medical director. The medical director and up to five other
employees of the plan shall be exempt from the civil service law,
chapter 41.06 RCW.
(2) The administrator shall employ such other staff as are
necessary to fulfill the responsibilities and duties of the
administrator, such staff to be subject to the civil service law,
chapter 41.06 RCW. In addition, the administrator may contract with
third parties for services necessary to carry out its activities where
this will promote economy, avoid duplication of effort, and make best
use of available expertise. Any such contractor or consultant shall be
prohibited from releasing, publishing, or otherwise using any
information made available to it under its contractual responsibility
without specific permission of the plan. The administrator may call
upon other agencies of the state to provide available information as
necessary to assist the administrator in meeting its responsibilities
under this chapter, which information shall be supplied as promptly as
circumstances permit.
(3) The administrator may appoint such technical or advisory
committees as he or she deems necessary. ((The administrator shall
appoint a standing technical advisory committee that is representative
of health care professionals, health care providers, and those directly
involved in the purchase, provision, or delivery of health care
services, as well as consumers and those knowledgeable of the ethical
issues involved with health care public policy.)) Individuals
appointed to any technical or other advisory committee shall serve
without compensation for their services as members, but may be
reimbursed for their travel expenses pursuant to RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.
(4) The administrator may apply for, receive, and accept grants,
gifts, and other payments, including property and service, from any
governmental or other public or private entity or person, and may make
arrangements as to the use of these receipts, including the undertaking
of special studies and other projects relating to health care costs and
access to health care.
(5) Whenever feasible, the administrator shall reduce the
administrative cost of operating the program by adopting joint policies
or procedures applicable to both the basic health plan and employee
health plans.

Sec. 7 RCW 70.47.060 and 2009 c 568 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The administrator has the following powers and duties:
(1) ((To design and from time to time revise a schedule of covered
basic health care services, including physician services, inpatient and
outpatient hospital services, prescription drugs and medications, and
other services that may be necessary for basic health care. In
addition, the administrator may, to the extent that funds are
available, offer as basic health plan services chemical dependency
services, mental health services, and organ transplant services. All
subsidized and nonsubsidized enrollees in any participating managed
health care system under the Washington basic health plan shall be
entitled to receive covered basic health care services in return for
premium payments to the plan. The schedule of services shall emphasize
proven preventive and primary health care and shall include all
services necessary for prenatal, postnatal, and well-child care.
However, with respect to coverage for subsidized enrollees who are
eligible to receive prenatal and postnatal services through the medical
assistance program under chapter 74.09 RCW, the administrator shall not
contract for such services except to the extent that such services are
necessary over not more than a one-month period in order to maintain
continuity of care after diagnosis of pregnancy by the managed care
provider. The schedule of services shall also include a separate
schedule of basic health care services for children, eighteen years of
age and younger, for those subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees who
choose to secure basic coverage through the plan only for their
dependent children. In designing and revising the schedule of
services, the administrator shall consider the guidelines for assessing
health services under the mandated benefits act of 1984, RCW 48.47.030,
and such other factors as the administrator deems appropriate. The
administrator shall encourage enrollees who have been continually
enrolled on basic health for a period of one year or more to complete
a health risk assessment and participate in programs approved by the
administrator that may include wellness, smoking cessation, and chronic
disease management programs. In approving programs, the administrator
shall consider evidence that any such programs are proven to improve
enrollee health status.
(2)(a) To design and implement a structure of periodic premiums due
the administrator from subsidized enrollees that is based upon gross
family income, giving appropriate consideration to family size and the
ages of all family members. The enrollment of children shall not
require the enrollment of their parent or parents who are eligible for
the plan. The structure of periodic premiums shall be applied to
subsidized enrollees entering the plan as individuals pursuant to
subsection (11) of this section and to the share of the cost of the
plan due from subsidized enrollees entering the plan as employees
pursuant to subsection (12) of this section.
(b) To determine the periodic premiums due the administrator from
subsidized enrollees under RCW 70.47.020(6)(b). Premiums due for
foster parents with gross family income up to two hundred percent of
the federal poverty level shall be set at the minimum premium amount
charged to enrollees with income below sixty-five percent of the
federal poverty level. Premiums due for foster parents with gross
family income between two hundred percent and three hundred percent of
the federal poverty level shall not exceed one hundred dollars per
month.
(c) To determine the periodic premiums due the administrator from
nonsubsidized enrollees. Premiums due from nonsubsidized enrollees
shall be in an amount equal to the cost charged by the managed health
care system provider to the state for the plan plus the administrative
cost of providing the plan to those enrollees and the premium tax under
RCW 48.14.0201.
(d) To determine the periodic premiums due the administrator from
health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees. Premiums due from
health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees must be in an amount
equal to the cost charged by the managed health care system provider to
the state for the plan, plus the administrative cost of providing the
plan to those enrollees and the premium tax under RCW 48.14.0201. The
administrator will consider the impact of eligibility determination by
the appropriate federal agency designated by the Trade Act of 2002
(P.L. 107-210) as well as the premium collection and remittance
activities by the United States internal revenue service when
determining the administrative cost charged for health coverage tax
credit eligible enrollees.
(e) An employer or other financial sponsor may, with the prior
approval of the administrator, pay the premium, rate, or any other
amount on behalf of a subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollee, by
arrangement with the enrollee and through a mechanism acceptable to the
administrator. The administrator shall establish a mechanism for
receiving premium payments from the United States internal revenue
service for health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees.
(f) To develop, as an offering by every health carrier providing
coverage identical to the basic health plan, as configured on January
1, 2001, a basic health plan model plan with uniformity in enrollee
cost-sharing requirements.
(g) To collect from all public employees a voluntary opt-in
donation of varying amounts through a monthly or one-time payroll
deduction as provided for in RCW 41.04.230. The donation must be
deposited in the health services account established in RCW 43.72.900
to be used for the sole purpose of maintaining enrollment capacity in
the basic health plan.
The administrator shall send an annual notice to state employees
extending the opportunity to participate in the opt-in donation program
for the purpose of saving enrollment slots for the basic health plan.
The first such notice shall be sent to public employees no later than
June 1, 2009.
The notice shall include monthly sponsorship levels of fifteen
dollars per month, thirty dollars per month, fifty dollars per month,
and any other amounts deemed reasonable by the administrator. The
sponsorship levels shall be named "safety net contributor," "safety net
hero," and "safety net champion" respectively. The donation amounts
provided shall be tied to the level of coverage the employee will be
purchasing for a working poor individual without access to health care
coverage.
The administrator shall ensure that employees are given an
opportunity to establish a monthly standard deduction or a one-time
deduction towards the basic health plan donation program. The basic
health plan donation program shall be known as the "save the safety net
program."
The donation permitted under this subsection may not be collected
from any public employee who does not actively opt in to the donation
program. Written notification of intent to discontinue participation
in the donation program must be provided by the public employee at
least fourteen days prior to the next standard deduction.
(3) To evaluate, with the cooperation of participating managed
health care system providers, the impact on the basic health plan of
enrolling health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees. The
administrator shall issue to the appropriate committees of the
legislature preliminary evaluations on June 1, 2005, and January 1,
2006, and a final evaluation by June 1, 2006. The evaluation shall
address the number of persons enrolled, the duration of their
enrollment, their utilization of covered services relative to other
basic health plan enrollees, and the extent to which their enrollment
contributed to any change in the cost of the basic health plan.
(4) To end the participation of health coverage tax credit eligible
enrollees in the basic health plan if the federal government reduces or
terminates premium payments on their behalf through the United States
internal revenue service.
(5) To design and implement a structure of enrollee cost-sharing
due a managed health care system from subsidized, nonsubsidized, and
health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees. The structure shall
discourage inappropriate enrollee utilization of health care services,
and may utilize copayments, deductibles, and other cost-sharing
mechanisms, but shall not be so costly to enrollees as to constitute a
barrier to appropriate utilization of necessary health care services.
(6))) To limit enrollment of persons who qualify for subsidies so
as to prevent an overexpenditure of appropriations for such purposes.
Whenever the administrator finds that there is danger of such an
overexpenditure, the administrator shall close enrollment until the
administrator finds the danger no longer exists((. Such a closure does
not apply to health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees who receive
a premium subsidy from the United States internal revenue service as
long as the enrollees qualify for the health coverage tax credit
program.));
(2) To prevent the risk of overexpenditure, the administrator may
disenroll persons receiving subsidies from the program based on
criteria adopted by the administrator. The criteria may include:
Length of continual enrollment on the program, income level, or
eligibility for other coverage. The administrator shall first attempt
to identify enrollees who are eligible for other coverage, and, working
with the department of social and health service as provided in RCW
70.47.010(((5)(d))) (4), transition enrollees eligible for medical
assistance to that coverage. The administrator shall develop criteria
for persons disenrolled under this subsection to reapply for the
program((.));
(((7) To limit the payment of subsidies to subsidized enrollees, as
defined in RCW 70.47.020. The level of subsidy provided to persons who
qualify may be based on the lowest cost plans, as defined by the
administrator.
(8) To adopt a schedule for the orderly development of the delivery
of services and availability of the plan to residents of the state,
subject to the limitations contained in RCW 70.47.080 or any act
appropriating funds for the plan.
(9) To solicit and accept applications from managed health care
systems, as defined in this chapter, for inclusion as eligible basic
health care providers under the plan for subsidized enrollees,
nonsubsidized enrollees, or health coverage tax credit eligible
enrollees. The administrator shall endeavor to assure that covered
basic health care services are available to any enrollee of the plan
from among a selection of two or more participating managed health care
systems. In adopting any rules or procedures applicable to managed
health care systems and in its dealings with such systems, the
administrator shall consider and make suitable allowance for the need
for health care services and the differences in local availability of
health care resources, along with other resources, within and among the
several areas of the state. Contracts with participating managed
health care systems shall ensure that basic health plan enrollees who
become eligible for medical assistance may, at their option, continue
to receive services from their existing providers within the managed
health care system if such providers have entered into provider
agreements with the department of social and health services.
(10) To receive periodic premiums from or on behalf of subsidized,
nonsubsidized, and health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees,
deposit them in the basic health plan operating account, keep records
of enrollee status, and authorize periodic payments to managed health
care systems on the basis of the number of enrollees participating in
the respective managed health care systems.
(11))) (3) To design a sliding scale schedule of monthly subsidies
to be provided to enrollees based upon enrollees' gross family income,
giving appropriate consideration to family size and age of enrollees;
(4) To administer directly or by contract a system of distributing
subsidies directly to enrollees or to health benefit plans on behalf of
enrollees;
(5) To accept applications from individuals ((residing in areas
served by the plan,)) on behalf of themselves and their spouses ((and
dependent children)), for enrollment in the Washington basic health
plan ((as subsidized, nonsubsidized, or health coverage tax credit
eligible enrollees)), to give priority to members of the Washington
national guard and reserves who served in Operation Enduring Freedom,
Operation Iraqi Freedom, or Operation Noble Eagle, and their spouses
and dependents, for enrollment in the Washington basic health plan, to
establish appropriate minimum-enrollment periods for enrollees as may
be necessary, and to determine, upon application and on a reasonable
schedule defined by the authority, or at the request of any enrollee,
eligibility due to current gross family income for sliding scale
((premiums)) subsidies. Funds received by a family as part of
participation in the adoption support program authorized under RCW
26.33.320 and ((74.13.100 through 74.13.145)) 74.13A.005 through
74.13A.080 shall not be counted toward a family's current gross family
income for the purposes of this chapter. When an enrollee fails to
report income or income changes accurately, the administrator shall
have the authority either to bill the enrollee for the amounts overpaid
by the state or to impose civil penalties of up to two hundred percent
of the amount of subsidy overpaid due to the enrollee incorrectly
reporting income. The administrator shall adopt rules to define the
appropriate application of these sanctions and the processes to
implement the sanctions provided in this subsection, within available
resources. No subsidy may be paid with respect to any enrollee whose
current gross family income exceeds twice the federal poverty level
or((, subject to RCW 70.47.110,)) who is a recipient of medical
assistance or medical care services under chapter 74.09 RCW. If a
number of enrollees drop their enrollment for no apparent good cause,
the administrator may establish appropriate rules or requirements that
are applicable to such individuals before they will be allowed to
reenroll in the plan((.
(12) To accept applications from business owners on behalf of
themselves and their employees, spouses, and dependent children, as
subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees, who reside in an area served by
the plan. The administrator may require all or the substantial
majority of the eligible employees of such businesses to enroll in the
plan and establish those procedures necessary to facilitate the orderly
enrollment of groups in the plan and into a managed health care system.
The administrator may require that a business owner pay at least an
amount equal to what the employee pays after the state pays its portion
of the subsidized premium cost of the plan on behalf of each employee
enrolled in the plan. Enrollment is limited to those not eligible for
medicare who wish to enroll in the plan and choose to obtain the basic
health care coverage and services from a managed care system
participating in the plan. The administrator shall adjust the amount
determined to be due on behalf of or from all such enrollees whenever
the amount negotiated by the administrator with the participating
managed health care system or systems is modified or the administrative
cost of providing the plan to such enrollees changes.
(13) To determine the rate to be paid to each participating managed
health care system in return for the provision of covered basic health
care services to enrollees in the system. Although the schedule of
covered basic health care services will be the same or actuarially
equivalent for similar enrollees, the rates negotiated with
participating managed health care systems may vary among the systems.
In negotiating rates with participating systems, the administrator
shall consider the characteristics of the populations served by the
respective systems, economic circumstances of the local area, the need
to conserve the resources of the basic health plan trust account, and
other factors the administrator finds relevant.
(14) To monitor the provision of covered services to enrollees by
participating managed health care systems in order to assure enrollee
access to good quality basic health care, to require periodic data
reports concerning the utilization of health care services rendered to
enrollees in order to provide adequate information for evaluation, and
to inspect the books and records of participating managed health care
systems to assure compliance with the purposes of this chapter. In
requiring reports from participating managed health care systems,
including data on services rendered enrollees, the administrator shall
endeavor to minimize costs, both to the managed health care systems and
to the plan. The administrator shall coordinate any such reporting
requirements with other state agencies, such as the insurance
commissioner and the department of health, to minimize duplication of
effort.));
(((15))) (6) To evaluate the effects this chapter has on private
employer-based health care coverage and to take appropriate measures
consistent with state and federal statutes that will discourage the
reduction of such coverage in the state((.));
(((16) To develop a program of proven preventive health measures
and to integrate it into the plan wherever possible and consistent with
this chapter.
(17) To provide, consistent with available funding, assistance for
rural residents, underserved populations, and persons of color.
(18))) (7) In consultation with appropriate state and local
government agencies, to establish criteria defining eligibility for
persons confined or residing in government-operated institutions((.));
(((19) To administer the premium discounts provided under RCW
48.41.200(3)(a) (i) and (ii) pursuant to a contract with the Washington
state health insurance pool.
(20))) (8) To give priority in enrollment to persons who
disenrolled from the program in order to enroll in medicaid, and
subsequently became ineligible for medicaid coverage.

Sec. 8 RCW 70.47.080 and 1993 c 492 s 213 are each amended to
read as follows:
((On and after July 1, 1988, the administrator shall accept for
enrollment applicants eligible to receive covered basic health care
services from the respective managed health care systems which are then
participating in the plan.
Thereafter,)) Effective January 1, 2011, the administrator shall
accept for enrollment applicants eligible for a health benefit plan
subsidy. The total ((subsidized)) enrollment shall not result in
expenditures that exceed the total amount that has been made available
by the legislature in any act appropriating funds to the plan. ((To
the extent that new funding is appropriated for expansion, the
administrator shall endeavor to secure participation contracts from
managed health care systems in geographic areas of the state that are
unserved by the plan at the time at which the new funding is
appropriated. In the selection of any such areas the administrator
shall take into account the levels and rates of unemployment in
different areas of the state, the need to provide basic health care
coverage to a population reasonably representative of the portion of
the state's population that lacks such coverage, and the need for
geographic, demographic, and economic diversity.
The administrator shall at all times closely monitor growth
patterns of enrollment so as not to exceed that consistent with the
orderly development of the plan as a whole, in any area of the state or
in any participating managed health care system. The annual or
biennial enrollment limitations derived from operation of the plan
under this section do not apply to nonsubsidized enrollees as defined
in RCW 70.47.020(5).))

Sec. 9 RCW 70.47.090 and 1987 1st ex.s. c 5 s 11 are each amended
to read as follows:
Any enrollee whose ((premium payments to the plan are delinquent or
who moves his or her residence out of an area served by the plan))
subsidy is not applied towards a health benefit plan may be dropped
from enrollment status. ((An enrollee whose premium is the
responsibility of the department of social and health services under
RCW 70.47.110 may not be dropped solely because of nonpayment by the
department.)) The administrator shall provide ((delinquent)) enrollees
with advance written notice of their removal from the plan and shall
provide for a hearing under chapters 34.05 and 34.12 RCW for any
enrollee who contests the decision to drop the enrollee from the plan.
((Upon removal of an enrollee from the plan, the administrator shall
promptly notify the managed health care system in which the enrollee
has been enrolled, and shall not be responsible for payment for health
care services provided to the enrollee (including, if applicable,
members of the enrollee's family) after the date of notification. A
managed health care system may contest the denial of payment for
coverage of an enrollee through a hearing under chapters 34.05 and
34.12 RCW.))

Sec. 10 RCW 70.47.150 and 2005 c 274 s 336 are each amended to
read as follows:
Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 42.56 RCW, (((1)))
records obtained, reviewed by, or on file with the plan containing
information concerning medical treatment of individuals shall be exempt
from public inspection and copying((; and (2) actuarial formulas,
statistics, and assumptions submitted in support of a rate filing by a
managed health care system or submitted to the administrator upon his
or her request shall be exempt from public inspection and copying in
order to preserve trade secrets or prevent unfair competition)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 70.47.070 (Benefits from other coverages not reduced) and
2009 c 568 s 4 & 1987 1st ex.s. c 5 s 9;
(2) RCW 70.47.100 (Participation by a managed health care system)
and 2009 c 568 s 5, 2004 c 192 s 4, 2000 c 79 s 35, & 1987 1st ex.s. c
5 s 12;
(3) RCW 70.47.110 (Enrollment of medical assistance recipients) and
1991 sp.s. c 4 s 3 & 1987 1st ex.s. c 5 s 13;
(4) RCW 70.47.115 (Enrollment of persons in timber impact areas)
and 1992 c 21 s 7 & 1991 c 315 s 22;
(5) RCW 70.47.120 (Administrator -- Contracts for services) and 1997
c 337 s 7 & 1987 1st ex.s. c 5 s 14;
(6) RCW 70.47.130 (Exemption from insurance code) and 2009 c 298 s
4, 2004 c 115 s 2, 2000 c 5 s 21, 1997 c 337 s 8, 1994 c 309 s 6, &
1987 1st ex.s. c 5 s 15;
(7) RCW 70.47.160 (Right of individuals to receive services -- Right
of providers, carriers, and facilities to refuse to participate in or
pay for services for reason of conscience or religion -- Requirements)
and 1995 c 266 s 3;
(8) RCW 70.47.200 (Mental health services -- Definition -- Coverage
required, when) and 2005 c 6 s 6;
(9) RCW 70.47.201 (Mental health services -- Rules) and 2005 c 6 s
11;
(10) RCW 70.47.210 (Prostate cancer screening) and 2006 c 367 s 7;
and
(11) RCW 70.47.900 (Short title) and 1987 1st ex.s. c 5 s 1.

--- END ---