BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that in the
process of governing, the state of Washington should not engage in
commercial activity in competition with its citizens. The legislature
finds that the competitive enterprise system, characterized by
individual freedom and initiative, is the nation's primary source of
economic strength, and that the growth of private enterprise is
essential to the health, welfare, and prosperity of the citizens of the
state of Washington. The legislature further finds that the role of
the private sector is to provide commercial products and services for
which there is demand in the marketplace, while the role of state
agencies is limited to performing functions that are in the public
interest and inherently governmental in nature.
(2) The legislature therefore declares it to be the general policy
of the state that state agencies are prohibited from providing to the
marketplace for a fee those products or services that could be obtained
from a private enterprise.
(3) This chapter may be known and cited as the freedom from
government competition act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) State agencies are prohibited from
engaging in commercial activities for a fee, unless they are granted an
exception by the office of financial management.
(2)(a) By September 1, 2010, the office of financial management
shall provide a process for state agencies to seek an exception on a
case-by-case basis from the prohibition in subsection (1) of this
section.
(b) The office of financial management may grant an exception under
this section only if a state agency presents clear and convincing
evidence that private enterprise has no reasonable capacity to
undertake the activity.
(c) By September 1, 2010, the office of financial management shall
provide a process, in accordance with all applicable provisions of
chapter 34.05 RCW, by which any person who believes that a state agency
has violated subsection (1) of this section may file a written
complaint with the office. Within thirty days of the complaint being
filed, the office of financial management must investigate and respond
in writing with its findings and determination.
(3) Beginning January 1, 2011, and annually thereafter, the office
of financial management must report to the legislature on any
exceptions made under this section and any complaints filed and
determined under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Commercial activity" means an activity that provides a product
or service that could be obtained from a private enterprise.
(2) "Private enterprise" means an individual, firm, partnership,
joint venture, corporation, association, or other legal entity located
in the United States that is engaged in business activity for profit.
(3) "State agency" means any office, board, commission, council,
authority, department, agency, institution within the executive branch
of state government, or institution of higher education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 28B.63.010 (Intent) and 1987 c 97 s 1;
(2) RCW 28B.63.020 (Definitions) and 1987 c 97 s 2;
(3) RCW 28B.63.030 (Development of policies and mechanisms for
defining and reviewing commercial activities) and 1987 c 97 s 3;
(4) RCW 28B.63.040 (Criteria for developing policies) and 1987 c 97
s 4; and
(5) RCW 28B.63.050 (Programs and activities exempt from chapter)
and 1987 c 97 s 5.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---