BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
machinery and equipment used directly in generating electricity at a
low-carbon generation facility or to sales of or charges made for labor
and services rendered in respect to installing such machinery and
equipment. The seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for the
seller's files.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Low-carbon generation facility" means: (i) A cogeneration
facility as defined in RCW 80.04.010 that when fully constructed,
provides at least five hundred megawatts of electrical or mechanical
power; or (ii) an electricity generation facility that emits less than
0.8 pounds of carbon dioxide per kilowatt hour of electricity
generated.
(b)(i) "Machinery and equipment" includes industrial fixtures,
devices, and support facilities that are integral and necessary to the
generation of electricity at a low-carbon generation facility.
(ii) "Machinery and equipment" does not include: (A) Hand-powered
tools; (B) property with a useful life of less than one year; (C)
repair parts required to restore machinery and equipment to normal
working order; (D) replacement parts that do not increase productivity,
improve efficiency, or extend the useful life of machinery and
equipment; (E) buildings; or (F) building fixtures that are not
integral and necessary to the generation of electricity that are
permanently affixed to and become a physical part of a building.
(c) "Used directly" means machinery and equipment that is used
directly in generating electricity at a low-carbon generation facility
if it provides any part of the process that generates electrical
energy, converts that energy to electricity, and stores, transforms, or
transmits that electricity for entry into or operation in parallel with
electric transmission and distribution systems.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of machinery and equipment used directly in generating electricity
at a low-carbon generation facility or to the use of labor and services
rendered in respect to installing such machinery and equipment.
(2) The definitions in section 1 of this act apply to this section.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2013.

Sec. 3 RCW 80.70.020 and 2004 c 224 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter apply to:
(a) New fossil-fueled thermal electric generation facilities with
station-generating capability of three hundred fifty thousand kilowatts
or more and fossil-fueled floating thermal electric generation
facilities of one hundred thousand kilowatts or more under RCW
80.50.020(((14))) (15)(a), for which an application for site
certification is made to the council after July 1, 2004;
(b) New fossil-fueled thermal electric generation facilities with
station-generating capability of more than twenty-five thousand
kilowatts, but less than three hundred fifty thousand kilowatts, except
for fossil-fueled floating thermal electric generation facilities under
the council's jurisdiction, for which an application for an order of
approval has been submitted after July 1, 2004;
(c) Fossil-fueled thermal electric generation facilities with
station-generating capability of three hundred fifty thousand kilowatts
or more that have an existing site certification agreement and, after
July 1, 2004, apply to the council to increase the output of carbon
dioxide emissions by fifteen percent or more through permanent changes
in facility operations or modification or equipment; and
(d) Fossil-fueled thermal electric generation facilities with
station-generating capability of more than twenty-five thousand
kilowatts, but less than three hundred fifty thousand kilowatts, except
for fossil-fueled floating thermal electric generation facilities under
the council's jurisdiction, that have an existing order of approval
and, after July 1, 2004, apply to the department or authority, as
appropriate, to permanently modify the facility so as to increase its
station-generating capability by at least twenty-five thousand
kilowatts or to increase the output of carbon dioxide emissions by
fifteen percent or more, whichever measure is greater.
(2)(a) A proposed site certification agreement submitted to the
governor under RCW 80.50.100 and a final site certification agreement
issued under RCW 80.50.100 shall include an approved carbon dioxide
mitigation plan.
(b) For fossil-fueled thermal electric generation facilities not
under jurisdiction of the council, the order of approval shall require
an approved carbon dioxide mitigation plan.
(c) Site certification agreement holders or order of approval
holders may request, at any time, a change in conditions of an approved
carbon dioxide mitigation plan if the council, department, or
authority, as appropriate, finds that the change meets all requirements
and conditions for approval of such plans.
(3) An applicant for a fossil-fueled thermal electric generation
facility shall include one or a combination of the following carbon
dioxide mitigation options as part of its mitigation plan:
(a) Payment to a third party to provide mitigation;
(b) Direct purchase of permanent carbon credits; or
(c) Investment in applicant-controlled carbon dioxide mitigation
projects, including combined heat and power (cogeneration).
(4) Fossil-fueled thermal electric generation facilities that
receive site certification approval or an order of approval shall
provide mitigation for twenty percent of the total carbon dioxide
emissions produced by the facility.
(5) If the certificate holder or order of approval holder chooses
to pay a third party to provide the mitigation, the mitigation rate
shall be one dollar and sixty cents per metric ton of carbon dioxide to
be mitigated. For a cogeneration plant, the monetary amount is based
on the difference between twenty percent of the total carbon dioxide
emissions and the cogeneration credit.
(a) Through rule making, the council may adjust the rate per ton
biennially as long as any increase or decrease does not exceed fifty
percent of the current rate. The department or authority shall use the
adjusted rate established by the council pursuant to this subsection
for fossil-fueled thermal electric generation facilities subject to the
provisions of this chapter.
(b) In adjusting the mitigation rate the council shall consider,
but is not limited to, the current market price of a ton of carbon
dioxide. The council's adjusted mitigation rate shall be consistent
with RCW 80.50.010(3).
(6) The applicant may choose to make to the third party a lump sum
payment or partial payment over a period of five years.
(a) Under the lump sum payment option, the payment amount is
determined by multiplying the total carbon dioxide emissions by the
twenty percent mitigation requirement under subsection (4) of this
section and by the per ton mitigation rate established under subsection
(5) of this section.
(b) No later than one hundred twenty days after the start of
commercial operation, the certificate holder or order of approval
holder shall make a one-time payment to the independent qualified
organization for the amount determined under subsection (5) of this
section.
(c) As an alternative to a one-time payment, the certificate holder
or order of approval holder may make a partial payment of twenty
percent of the amount determined under subsection (5) of this section
no later than one hundred twenty days after commercial operation and a
payment in the same amount or as adjusted according to subsection
(5)(a) of this section, on the anniversary date of the initial payment
in each of the following four years. With the initial payment, the
certificate holder or order of approval holder shall provide a letter
of credit or other comparable security acceptable to the council or the
department for the remaining eighty percent mitigation payment amount
including possible changes to the rate per metric ton from rule making
under subsection (5)(a) of this section.
(7) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to a low-carbon
generation facility as defined in section 1 of this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 80.80.040 and 2009 c 448 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2008, the greenhouse gas emissions
performance standard for all baseload electric generation for which
electric utilities enter into long-term financial commitments on or
after such date is the lower of:
(a) One thousand one hundred pounds of greenhouse gases per
megawatt-hour; or
(b) The average available greenhouse gas emissions output as
determined under RCW 80.80.050.
(2) This chapter does not apply to long-term financial commitments
with the Bonneville power administration.
(3) All baseload electric generation facilities in operation as of
June 30, 2008, are deemed to be in compliance with the greenhouse gas
emissions performance standard established under this section until the
facilities are the subject of long-term financial commitments. All
baseload electric generation that commences operation after June 30,
2008, and is located in Washington, must comply with the greenhouse gas
emissions performance standard established in subsection (1) of this
section.
(4) All electric generation facilities or power plants powered
exclusively by renewable resources, as defined in RCW 19.280.020, are
deemed to be in compliance with the greenhouse gas emissions
performance standard established under this section.
(5) All cogeneration facilities in the state that are fueled by
natural gas or waste gas or a combination of the two fuels((, and that
are in operation as of June 30, 2008,)) are deemed to be in compliance
with the greenhouse gas emissions performance standard established
under this section until the facilities are the subject of a new
ownership interest or are upgraded.
(6) In determining the rate of emissions of greenhouse gases for
baseload electric generation, the total emissions associated with
producing electricity shall be included.
(7) In no case shall a long-term financial commitment be determined
to be in compliance with the greenhouse gas emissions performance
standard if the commitment includes more than twelve percent of
electricity from unspecified sources.
(8) For a long-term financial commitment with multiple power
plants, each specified power plant must be treated individually for the
purpose of determining the annualized plant capacity factor and net
emissions, and each power plant must comply with subsection (1) of this
section, except as provided in subsections (3) through (5) of this
section.
(9) The department shall establish an output-based methodology to
ensure that the calculation of emissions of greenhouse gases for a
cogeneration facility recognizes the total usable energy output of the
process, and includes all greenhouse gases emitted by the facility in
the production of both electrical and thermal energy. In developing
and implementing the greenhouse gas emissions performance standard, the
department shall consider and act in a manner consistent with any rules
adopted pursuant to the public utilities regulatory policy act of 1978
(16 U.S.C. Sec. 824a-3), as amended.
(10) The following greenhouse gas emissions produced by baseload
electric generation owned or contracted through a long-term financial
commitment shall not be counted as emissions of the power plant in
determining compliance with the greenhouse gas emissions performance
standard:
(a) Those emissions that are injected permanently in geological
formations;
(b) Those emissions that are permanently sequestered by other means
approved by the department; and
(c) Those emissions sequestered or mitigated as approved under
subsection (16) of this section.
(11) In adopting and implementing the greenhouse gas emissions
performance standard, the department of ((community, trade, and
economic development)) commerce energy policy division, in consultation
with the commission, the department, the Bonneville power
administration, the western electricity ((coordination [coordinating]))
coordinating council, the energy facility site evaluation council,
electric utilities, public interest representatives, and consumer
representatives, shall consider the effects of the greenhouse gas
emissions performance standard on system reliability and overall costs
to electricity customers.
(12) In developing and implementing the greenhouse gas emissions
performance standard, the department shall, with assistance of the
commission, the department of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce energy policy division, and electric utilities,
and to the extent practicable, address long-term purchases of
electricity from unspecified sources in a manner consistent with this
chapter.
(13) The directors of the energy facility site evaluation council
and the department shall each adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW in
coordination with each other to implement and enforce the greenhouse
gas emissions performance standard. The rules necessary to implement
this section shall be adopted by June 30, 2008.
(14) In adopting the rules for implementing this section, the
energy facility site evaluation council and the department shall
include criteria to be applied in evaluating the carbon sequestration
plan, for baseload electric generation that will rely on subsection
(10) of this section to demonstrate compliance, but that will commence
sequestration after the date that electricity is first produced. The
rules shall include but not be limited to:
(a) Provisions for financial assurances, as a condition of plant
operation, sufficient to ensure successful implementation of the carbon
sequestration plan, including construction and operation of necessary
equipment, and any other significant costs;
(b) Provisions for geological or other approved sequestration
commencing within five years of plant operation, including full and
sufficient technical documentation to support the planned
sequestration;
(c) Provisions for monitoring the effectiveness of the
implementation of the sequestration plan;
(d) Penalties for failure to achieve implementation of the plan on
schedule;
(e) Provisions for an owner to purchase emissions reductions in the
event of the failure of a sequestration plan under subsection (16) of
this section; and
(f) Provisions for public notice and comment on the carbon
sequestration plan.
(15)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, as part of
its role enforcing the greenhouse gas emissions performance standard,
the department shall determine whether sequestration or a plan for
sequestration will provide safe, reliable, and permanent protection
against the greenhouse gases entering the atmosphere from the power
plant and all ancillary facilities.
(b) For facilities under its jurisdiction, the energy facility site
evaluation council shall contract for review of sequestration or the
carbon sequestration plan with the department consistent with the
conditions under (a) of this subsection, consider the adequacy of
sequestration or the plan in its adjudicative proceedings conducted
under RCW 80.50.090(3), and incorporate specific findings regarding
adequacy in its recommendation to the governor under RCW 80.50.100.
(16) A project under consideration by the energy facility site
evaluation council by July 22, 2007, is required to include all of the
requirements of subsection (14) of this section in its carbon
sequestration plan submitted as part of the energy facility site
evaluation council process. A project under consideration by the
energy facility site evaluation council by July 22, 2007, that receives
final site certification agreement approval under chapter 80.50 RCW
shall make a good faith effort to implement the sequestration plan. If
the project owner determines that implementation is not feasible, the
project owner shall submit documentation of that determination to the
energy facility site evaluation council. The documentation shall
demonstrate the steps taken to implement the sequestration plan and
evidence of the technological and economic barriers to successful
implementation. The project owner shall then provide to the energy
facility site evaluation council notification that they shall implement
the plan that requires the project owner to meet the greenhouse gas
emissions performance standard by purchasing verifiable greenhouse gas
emissions reductions from an electric generating facility located
within the western interconnection, where the reduction would not have
occurred otherwise or absent this contractual agreement, such that the
sum of the emissions reductions purchased and the facility's emissions
meets the standard for the life of the facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 80.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The council must complete action on any further amendments to
the certification issued for a low-carbon generation facility as
defined in section 1 of this act within sixty days. If the sixty-day
deadline is not satisfied due to council inaction, the amendments are
deemed approved.
(2) This section expires June 30, 2013.

--- END ---