BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
CIVIL JUSTICE REFORM
Joint and Several Liability
Sec. 101 RCW 4.22.070 and 1993 c 496 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In all actions involving fault of more than one entity, the
trier of fact shall determine the percentage of the total fault which
is attributable to every entity which caused the claimant's damages
except entities immune from liability to the claimant under Title 51
RCW. The sum of the percentages of the total fault attributed to at-fault entities shall equal one hundred percent. The entities whose
fault shall be determined include the claimant or person suffering
personal injury or incurring property damage, defendants, third-party
defendants, entities ((released by)) who have entered into a release,
covenant not to sue, covenant not to enforce judgment, or similar
agreement with the claimant, entities with any other individual defense
against the claimant, and entities immune from liability to the
claimant, but shall not include those entities immune from liability to
the claimant under Title 51 RCW. Judgment shall be entered against
each defendant except those entities who have ((been released by))
entered into a release, covenant not to sue, covenant not to enforce
judgment, or similar agreement with the claimant or are immune from
liability to the claimant or have prevailed on any other individual
defense against the claimant in an amount which represents that party's
proportionate share of the claimant's total damages. The liability of
each defendant shall be several only and shall not be joint except:
(a) A party shall be responsible for the fault of another person or
for payment of the proportionate share of another party where both were
acting in concert or when a person was acting as an agent or servant of
the party.
(b)(i) Except as provided in (b)(ii) of this subsection, if the
trier of fact determines that the claimant or party suffering bodily
injury or incurring property damages was not at fault, the defendants
against whom judgment is entered shall be jointly and severally liable
for the sum of their proportionate shares of the ((claimants
[claimant's])) claimant's total damages.
(ii) (b)(i) of this subsection does not apply to a health care
provider as defined in RCW 7.70.020 in an action for damages for injury
or death occurring as a result of health care or related services, or
the arranging for the provision of health care or related services,
whether brought under chapter 7.70 RCW, RCW 4.20.010, 4.20.020,
4.20.046, 4.24.010, or 48.43.545(1), any other applicable law, or any
combination thereof, with respect to judgments for noneconomic damages.
In all actions for damages for injury or death occurring as a result of
health care or related services, or the arranging for the provision of
health care or related services, the liability of a health care
provider for noneconomic damages is several only. For the purposes of
this subsection, "noneconomic damages" has the meaning given in RCW
4.56.250.
(2) If a defendant is jointly and severally liable under one of the
exceptions listed in subsection((s)) (1)(a) or (((1))) (b) of this
section, such defendant's rights to contribution against another
jointly and severally liable defendant, and the effect of settlement by
either such defendant, shall be determined under RCW 4.22.040,
4.22.050, and 4.22.060.
(3)(a) Nothing in this section affects any cause of action relating
to hazardous wastes or substances or solid waste disposal sites.
(b) Nothing in this section shall affect a cause of action arising
from the tortious interference with contracts or business relations.
(c) Nothing in this section shall affect any cause of action
arising from the manufacture or marketing of a fungible product in a
generic form which contains no clearly identifiable shape, color, or
marking.

Sec. 102 RCW 4.22.015 and 1981 c 27 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Fault" includes acts or omissions, including misuse of a product,
that are in any measure negligent or reckless toward the person or
property of the actor or others, or that subject a person to strict
tort liability or liability on a product liability claim. The term
also includes breach of warranty, unreasonable assumption of risk, and
unreasonable failure to avoid an injury or to mitigate damages. Legal
requirements of causal relation apply both to fault as the basis for
liability and to contributory fault.
A comparison of fault for any purpose under RCW 4.22.005 through
((4.22.060)) 4.22.070 shall involve consideration of both the nature of
the conduct of the parties to the action and the extent of the causal
relation between such conduct and the damages.

Noneconomic Damages
Sec. 103 RCW 4.56.250 and 1986 c 305 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Economic damages" means objectively verifiable monetary
losses, including medical expenses, loss of earnings, burial costs,
loss of use of property, cost of replacement or repair, cost of
obtaining substitute domestic services, loss of employment, and loss of
business or employment opportunities.
(b) "Noneconomic damages" means subjective, nonmonetary losses,
including((,)) but not limited to pain, suffering, inconvenience,
mental anguish, disability or disfigurement incurred by the injured
party, loss of ability to enjoy life, emotional distress, loss of
society and companionship, loss of consortium, injury to reputation and
humiliation, ((and)) destruction of the parent-child relationship, and
other nonpecuniary damages of any type.
(c) "Bodily injury" means physical injury, sickness, or disease,
including death.
(d) "Average annual wage" means the average annual wage in the
state of Washington as determined under RCW 50.04.355.
(2) In no action seeking damages for personal injury or death may
a claimant recover a judgment for noneconomic damages exceeding an
amount determined by multiplying 0.43 by the average annual wage and by
the life expectancy of the person incurring noneconomic damages, as the
life expectancy is determined by the life expectancy tables adopted by
the insurance commissioner. For purposes of determining the maximum
amount allowable for noneconomic damages, a claimant's life expectancy
shall not be less than fifteen years. The limitation contained in this
subsection applies to all claims for noneconomic damages made by a
claimant who incurred bodily injury. Claims for loss of consortium,
loss of society and companionship, destruction of the parent-child
relationship, and all other derivative claims asserted by persons who
did not sustain bodily injury are to be included within the limitation
on claims for noneconomic damages arising from the same bodily injury.
(3) If a case is tried to a jury, the jury shall not be informed of
the limitation contained in subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 A new section is added to chapter 4.56 RCW
to read as follows:
The prescribed cap on noneconomic damages in RCW 4.56.250 takes
effect upon the earliest of the following events: (1) The Washington
supreme court or other court of competent jurisdiction rules or affirms
that RCW 4.56.250 is constitutional; or (2) the ratification of a state
constitutional amendment that empowers the legislature to place limits
on the amount of noneconomic damages recoverable in any or all civil
causes of action.

Statute of Limitations Reform
Sec. 105 RCW 4.16.350 and 2006 c 8 s 302 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any civil action or arbitration for damages for injury or death
occurring as a result of health care or related services, or the
arranging for the provision of health care or related services, which
is provided after June 25, 1976, against((:
(1) A person licensed by this state to provide health care or
related services, including, but not limited to, a physician,
osteopathic physician, dentist, nurse, optometrist, podiatric physician
and surgeon, chiropractor, physical therapist, psychologist,
pharmacist, optician, physician's assistant, osteopathic physician's
assistant, nurse practitioner, or physician's trained mobile intensive
care paramedic, including, in the event such person is deceased, his
estate or personal representative;
(2) An employee or agent of a person described in subsection (1) of
this section, acting in the course and scope of his employment,
including, in the event such employee or agent is deceased, his estate
or personal representative; or
(3) An entity, whether or not incorporated, facility, or
institution employing one or more persons described in subsection (1)
of this section, including, but not limited to, a hospital, clinic,
health maintenance organization, or nursing home; or an officer,
director, employee, or agent thereof acting in the course and scope of
his employment, including, in the event such officer, director,
employee, or agent is deceased, his estate or personal
representative;)) a health care provider as defined in RCW 7.70.020, or
a health care institution, based upon alleged professional negligence
shall be commenced within three years of the act or omission alleged to
have caused the injury, death, or condition, or within one year of the
time the patient or his or her representative or custodial parent or
guardian discovered or reasonably should have discovered that the
injury, death, or condition was caused by said act or omission,
whichever period ((expires later, except that in no event shall an
action be commenced more than eight years after said act or omission:
PROVIDED, That the time for commencement of an action is tolled upon
proof of fraud, intentional concealment, or the presence of a foreign
body not intended to have a therapeutic or diagnostic purpose or
effect, until the date the patient or the patient's representative has
actual knowledge of the act of fraud or concealment, or of the presence
of the foreign body; the patient or the patient's representative has
one year from the date of the actual knowledge in which to commence a
civil action for damages.
For purposes of this section, notwithstanding RCW 4.16.190, the
knowledge of a custodial parent or guardian shall be imputed to a
person under the age of eighteen years, and such imputed knowledge
shall operate to bar the claim of such minor to the same extent that
the claim of an adult would be barred under this section. Any action
not commenced in accordance with this section shall be barred.
For purposes of this section, with respect to care provided after
June 25, 1976, and before August 1, 1986, the knowledge of a custodial
parent or guardian shall be imputed as of April 29, 1987, to persons
under the age of eighteen years)) occurs first.
(2) In no event may an action be commenced more than three years
after the act or omission alleged to have caused the injury or
condition except:
(a) Upon proof of fraud, intentional concealment, or the presence
of a foreign body not intended to have a therapeutic or diagnostic
purpose or effect, in which case the patient or the patient's
representative has one year from the date the patient or the patient's
representative or custodial parent or guardian has actual knowledge of
the act of fraud or concealment or of the presence of the foreign body
within which to commence a civil action for damages.
(b) In the case of a minor, upon proof that the minor's custodial
parent or guardian and the defendant or the defendant's insurer have
committed fraud or collusion in the failure to bring an action on
behalf of the minor, in which case the patient or the patient's
representative has one year from the date the patient or the patient's
representative other than the custodial parent or guardian who
committed the fraud or collusion has actual knowledge of the fraud or
collusion, or one year from the date of the minor's eighteenth
birthday, whichever provides a longer period.
(c) In the case of a minor under the full age of six years, in
which case the action on behalf of the minor must be commenced within
three years, or prior to the minor's eighth birthday, whichever
provides a longer period.
(3) For purposes of this section, the tolling provisions of RCW
4.16.190 do not apply.
(4) This section does not apply to a civil action based on
intentional conduct brought against those individuals or entities
specified in this section by a person for recovery of damages for
injury occurring as a result of childhood sexual abuse as defined in
RCW 4.16.340(5).
(5) This section applies to all causes of action for injury or
death occurring as a result of health care or related services, or the
arranging for the provision of health care or related services, filed
on or after the effective date of this section. However, any action
which, if filed on or after the effective date of this section, would
have been timely under former law, but now would be barred under the
chapter . . ., Laws of 2010 (this act) amendments contained in this
section, may be brought within one year following the effective date of
this section.
(6) Any action not commenced in accordance with this section is
barred.

Attorneys' Fees Upon Summary Judgment Dismissal
Sec. 106 RCW 7.70.150 and 2006 c 8 s 304 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In an action against ((an individual)) a health care provider
under this chapter for personal injury or wrongful death ((in which the
injury is alleged to have been caused by an act or omission that
violates the accepted standard of care, the plaintiff must file a
certificate of merit at the time of commencing the action. If the
action is commenced within forty-five days prior to the expiration of
the applicable statute of limitations, the plaintiff must file the
certificate of merit no later than forty-five days after commencing))
the court shall award reasonable attorneys' fees to a health care
provider who obtains a summary judgment dismissal. The fees shall also
be awarded to a health care provider who receives a voluntary dismissal
after filing a motion for summary judgment. Reasonable attorneys' fees
include all reasonable expenses incurred in defending the action.
(2) ((The certificate of merit must be executed by a health care
provider who meets the qualifications of an expert in the action. If
there is more than one defendant in the action, the person commencing
the action must file a certificate of merit for each defendant.
(3) The certificate of merit must contain a statement that the
person executing the certificate of merit believes, based on the
information known at the time of executing the certificate of merit,
that there is a reasonable probability that the defendant's conduct did
not follow the accepted standard of care required to be exercised by
the defendant.
(4) Upon motion of the plaintiff, the court may grant an additional
period of time to file the certificate of merit, not to exceed ninety
days, if the court finds there is good cause for the extension.
(5)(a) Failure to file a certificate of merit that complies with
the requirements of this section is grounds for dismissal of the case.
(b))) If a ((case is dismissed for failure to file a certificate of
merit that complies with the requirements of)) health care provider
recovers attorneys' fees under this section, the filing of the
((claim)) action against the health care provider shall not be used
against the health care provider in professional liability insurance
rate setting, personal credit history, or professional licensing and
credentialing.

Promoting Periodic Payments of Future Damages
NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 (1) The definitions in this subsection
apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(a) "Future damages" includes damages for future health care or
related services, care or custody, loss of future earnings, loss of
bodily function, or future pain and suffering of the judgment creditor.
(b) "Periodic payments" means the payment of money or delivery of
other property to the judgment creditor at regular intervals.
(2) In any action for damages for injury occurring as a result of
health care or related services, or for the arranging for the provision
of health care or related services, the court shall, at the request of
either party, enter a judgment ordering that money damages or its
equivalent for future damages of the judgment creditor be paid in whole
or in part by periodic payments rather than by a lump-sum payment if
the award equals or exceeds fifty thousand dollars in future damages.
In entering a judgment ordering the payment of future damages by
periodic payments, the court shall make a specific finding as to the
dollar amount of periodic payments which will compensate the judgment
creditor for such future damages. As a condition to authorizing
periodic payments of future damages, the court shall require the
judgment debtor who is not adequately insured to post security adequate
to ensure full payment of such damages awarded by the judgment. Upon
termination of periodic payments of future damages, the court shall
order the return of this security, or so much as remains, to the
judgment debtor.
(3)(a) The judgment ordering the payment of future damages by
periodic payments must specify the recipient or recipients of the
payments, the dollar amount of the payments, the interval between
payments, and the number of payments or the period of time over which
payments must be made. The payments are only subject to modification
in the event of the death of the judgment creditor.
(b) In the event that the court finds that the judgment debtor has
exhibited a continuing pattern of failing to make the payments, as
specified in (a) of this subsection, the court shall find the judgment
debtor in contempt of court and, in addition to the required periodic
payments, shall order the judgment debtor to pay the judgment creditor
all damages caused by the failure to make such periodic payments,
including court costs and attorneys' fees.
(4) In the event of the death of the judgment creditor, the court,
upon petition of any party in interest, shall modify the judgment to
eliminate future periodic payments of damages awarded for future
medical treatment, care or custody, loss of bodily function, or future
pain and suffering of the judgment creditor. However, money damages
awarded for loss of future earnings may not be reduced or payments
terminated by reason of the death of the judgment creditor, but must be
paid to persons to whom the judgment creditor owed a duty of support,
as provided by law, immediately prior to his or her death. In such
cases, the court that rendered the original judgment may, upon petition
of any party in interest, modify the judgment to award and apportion
the unpaid future damages in accordance with this subsection (4).
(5) Following the occurrence or expiration of all obligations
specified in the periodic payment judgment, any obligation of the
judgment debtor to make further payments ceases and any security given
under subsection (2) of this section reverts to the judgment debtor.
(6) For purposes of this section, the provisions of RCW 4.56.250 do
not apply.
(7) It is intended in enacting this section to authorize, in
actions for damages for injury occurring as a result of health care or
related services, or the arranging for the provision of health care or
related services, the entry of judgments that provide for the payment
of future damages through periodic payments rather than lump-sum
payments. By authorizing periodic payment judgments, it is further
intended that the courts will utilize such judgments to provide
compensation sufficient to meet the needs of an injured plaintiff and
those persons who are dependent on the plaintiff for whatever period is
necessary while eliminating the potential windfall from a lump-sum
recovery that was intended to provide for the care of an injured
plaintiff over an extended period who then dies shortly after the
judgment is paid, leaving the balance of the judgment award to persons
and purposes for which it was not intended. It is also intended that
all elements of the periodic payment program be specified with
certainty in the judgment ordering such payments and that the judgment
not be subject to modification at some future time that might alter the
specifications of the original judgment, except in the event of the
death of the judgment creditor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 A new section is added to chapter 7.04A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A contract for health care services that contains a provision
for arbitration of a claim against a health care provider arising from
the delivery of health care under chapter 7.70 RCW must have the
provision as the first article of the contract and must be expressed in
the following language:
"It is understood that any dispute as to medical malpractice that
is as to whether any medical services rendered under this contract were
unnecessary or unauthorized or were improperly, negligently, or
incompetently rendered, will be determined by submission to arbitration
as provided by Washington law, and not by a lawsuit or resort to court
process except as Washington law provides for judicial review of
arbitration proceedings. Both parties to this contract, by entering
into it, are giving up their constitutional right to have such a
dispute decided in a court of law before a jury, and instead are
accepting the use of arbitration."
(2) Immediately before the signature line provided for the
individual contracting for the medical services, there must appear the
following in at least ten-point bold red type:
"NOTICE: BY SIGNING THIS CONTRACT YOU ARE AGREEING TO HAVE ANY
ISSUE OF MEDICAL MALPRACTICE DECIDED BY NEUTRAL ARBITRATION AND YOU ARE
GIVING UP YOUR RIGHT TO A JURY OR COURT TRIAL. SEE ARTICLE ONE OF THIS
CONTRACT."
(3) Once signed, such a contract governs all subsequent open-book
account transactions for medical services for which the contract was
signed until or unless rescinded by written notice within thirty days
of signature. Written notice of such rescission may be given by a
guardian or other legal representative of the patient if the patient is
incapacitated or a minor.
(4) Where the contract is one for medical services to a minor, it
may not be disaffirmed if signed by the minor's parent or legal
guardian.
(5) Such a contract is not a contract of adhesion, nor
unconscionable, nor otherwise improper, where it complies with
subsections (1) through (3) of this section.
(6) Subsections (1) through (3) of this section do not apply to any
health benefit plan contract offered by an organization regulated under
Title 48 RCW that has been negotiated to contain an arbitration
agreement with subscribers and enrollees under such a contract.

Encouraging Early Settlement Offers
NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 The definitions in this section apply
throughout sections 110 through 114 of this act unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Allegedly responsible party" means a health care provider
alleged by the claimant to be responsible for at least some portion of
an injury to the claimant resulting from alleged professional
negligence in the provision of health care.
(2) "Amount recovered" means the total compensation, including the
reasonable value of nonmonetary compensation, that an attorney has
obtained on behalf of a claimant through settlement, arbitration, or
judgment, minus the reasonable costs and expenses incurred by the
attorney in prosecuting or settling the claim.
(3) "Claimant" means any natural person who, in his or her own
right, or vicariously, is seeking compensation in connection with a
claim under this chapter for personal injury or wrongful death as a
result of alleged professional negligence in the provision of health
care.
(4) "Collateral source" means compensation or benefits paid or
payable to the claimant or on the claimant's behalf, to compensate the
claimant for the injury complained of, regardless of the right of
recoupment of any other entity, through subrogation, trust agreement,
lien, or otherwise.
(5) "Contingent fee" means compensation, however calculated, that
is payable only if an amount is recovered.
(6) "Early settlement offer" means a settlement offer made in
accordance with section 110 of this act.
(7) "Economic damages" has the meaning provided in RCW 4.56.250.
(8) "Entity" includes an individual or person.
(9) "Noneconomic damages" has the meaning provided in RCW 4.56.250.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 (1) In any civil action for damages
brought under this chapter against a health care provider based on the
provision of health care, an allegedly responsible party may make an
early settlement offer at any time prior to one hundred twenty days
after the claim is filed with a court. To qualify as an early
settlement offer, the offer must include a good faith offer to
compensate the claimant for the claimant's current and future economic
damages suffered as a result of the allegedly responsible party's act
or omission, less collateral source benefits available to the claimant,
and for reasonable hourly attorneys' fees for the claimant. The early
settlement offer must be in writing and communicated to the claimant by
certified mail. The offer must remain open for acceptance for a
minimum of thirty days from the date the offer is received by the
claimant.
(2) An allegedly responsible party may amend or issue an additional
early settlement offer prior to one hundred twenty days after the
action is commenced. The claimant may extend the time for receiving
the offer beyond this period.
(3) An attorney who receives an early settlement offer shall
provide a true and complete copy of the offer to his or her client.
(4) A claimant who agrees in writing to an early settlement offer
may not bring or continue a civil action, based on the same alleged
occurrence, against the allegedly responsible party who made the early
settlement offer or any other allegedly responsible parties who joined
in the early settlement offer under subsection (5) of this section.
(5) An offer under subsection (1) of this section may include other
allegedly responsible parties who were involved in the events that gave
rise to the civil action, regardless of the theory of liability on
which the claim is based, with their consent. If, after an early
settlement offer is made and accepted, the participants in the offer
dispute their relative contributions to the payments to be made to the
claimant, such disputes shall be resolved through binding arbitration
in accordance with chapter 7.04A RCW.
(6) The claimant may reject an offer of compensation made under
subsection (1) of this section and elect to bring or maintain a civil
action for damages. Upon rejection of an offer of compensation that
complies with the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, the
claimant may recover damages in the civil action only if the claimant
proves by clear and convincing evidence that the allegedly responsible
party caused the injury by reckless, willful, or wanton conduct.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 111 (1) An attorney who represents a person
alleging personal injury or death resulting from the provision of
health care, and who represents the person on a contingent-fee basis,
shall send a demand for compensation by certified mail to each
allegedly responsible party prior to commencing a court action. In the
event that multiple allegedly responsible parties are known to the
attorney, a demand must be sent on the same date to each party. The
demand must specify the amount of compensation sought and must set
forth the material facts, documentary evidence, and other information
relevant to the demand, including:
(a) The name and address of the claimant or of the person on whose
behalf the claim is being made;
(b) A brief description of how the injury or loss occurred;
(c) The names and, if known, the addresses and telephone numbers of
all known witnesses to the injury or loss;
(d) Copies of photographs in the claimant's possession which relate
to the injury or loss;
(e) The basis for claiming that the party to whom the demand is
addressed is responsible or partially responsible for the injury or
loss;
(f) A description of the nature of the injury or loss, including
the dates and nature of the care or services provided, and the names
and addresses of all physicians and other health care providers that
provided medical care or services to the claimant or injured party;
(g) Medical records relating to the injury, including those
involving a prior injury or preexisting medical condition which would
be discoverable by the allegedly responsible party during the course of
litigation or, in lieu thereof, executed releases authorizing the
allegedly responsible party to obtain the records directly from those
health care providers who provided treatment to the claimant; and
(h) Documentation of any medical expenses, lost wages, personal
losses, and other economic and noneconomic damages suffered as a
consequence of the injury or loss.
(2) The attorney shall mail copies of each demand to the claimant
and to each allegedly responsible party.
(3) A claimant's attorney who learns of an additional allegedly
responsible party after making a demand for compensation under
subsection (1) of this section shall send a demand for compensation to
the newly discovered allegedly responsible party and simultaneously
mail a copy of the demand to each of the other allegedly responsible
parties and to the claimant.
(4) In the event that a claimant's attorney learns of an additional
allegedly responsible party more than ninety days after making a demand
for compensation under subsection (1) of this section, the attorney
shall not be required to send a demand to that party nor do the fee
limitations imposed under section 113 (1) and (2) of this act apply
with regard to an amount recovered from that party, except as provided
by this subsection. An attorney who fails as a result of a breach of
the standard of care to learn of an additional allegedly responsible
party within ninety days of sending a demand for compensation to
another allegedly responsible party shall not collect a fee in excess
of that allowed under section 113 (1) and (2) of this act with respect
to an amount recovered from the additional allegedly responsible party.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 112 An allegedly responsible party is under no
obligation to issue a response to a demand for compensation made under
section 111 of this act. The fact that a demand for compensation was
or was not made, the fact that an early settlement offer was or was not
made, and the amount of any demand or settlement offer made are
inadmissible at a trial arising from the injury or loss.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 113 (1) An attorney who represents a claimant
who has accepted an early settlement offer under section 110 of this
act shall not collect an amount as compensation for the attorney's
services that is more than the attorney's reasonable hourly fees for
the services performed.
(2) An attorney who represents a claimant who has rejected or
failed to accept an early settlement offer shall not collect a
contingent fee that is greater than twenty percent of the amount of the
early settlement offer plus the percentage of the amount recovered in
excess of the early settlement offer as was agreed to by the claimant
and the attorney.
(3) A claimant's attorney who has failed to make a demand for
compensation under section 111 of this act, or who has omitted from the
demand any information required under section 111 of this act of a
material nature which the attorney had in his or her possession, or
which was readily available to him or her, or of which the attorney had
knowledge, shall not collect a contingent fee greater than twenty
percent of the amount recovered.
(4) A claimant's attorney who has failed to provide his or her
client a true and complete copy of an early settlement offer received
by the attorney, as required under section 110 of this act, shall not
collect a contingent fee greater than twenty percent of the amount
recovered.
(5) An attorney shall disclose, plainly and in writing, to
claimants whom the attorney proposes to represent on a contingent-fee
basis: (a) The fee limitations imposed by this section; and (b) the
fact that such limitations are maximum limits and that the attorney and
claimant may negotiate a lower fee.
The attorney shall also provide to each claimant a copy of this
act.
(6) The fee limitations imposed by this section may not be waived.
(7) This section applies to all attorneys practicing in this state,
including attorneys prosecuting claims filed in federal court, to the
maximum extent permitted by federal law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 114 A fiduciary relationship applies with
respect to a fee agreement between an attorney and a claimant.

Sec. 115 RCW 7.70.070 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 56 s 12 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The court shall, in any action under this chapter, determine
the reasonableness of each party's attorneys fees. The court shall
take into consideration the following:
(((1))) (a) The time and labor required, the novelty and difficulty
of the questions involved, and the skill requisite to perform the legal
service properly;
(((2))) (b) The likelihood, if apparent to the client, that the
acceptance of the particular employment will preclude other employment
by the lawyer;
(((3))) (c) The fee customarily charged in the locality for similar
legal services;
(((4))) (d) The amount involved and the results obtained;
(((5))) (e) The time limitations imposed by the client or by the
circumstances;
(((6))) (f) The nature and length of the professional relationship
with the client;
(((7))) (g) The experience, reputation, and ability of the lawyer
or lawyers performing the services;
(((8))) (h) Whether the fee is fixed or contingent.
(2) An attorney's contingency fee is limited to the maximum
permissible fee allowed under section 113 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 116 In any action brought under this chapter
that is tried by jury, the judge shall present the following questions
to the jury after the jury has delivered its verdict in the proceeding.
The questions shall be considered and answered by the jury in a
deliberative process and the results announced in open court.
(1) Do you as a jury believe any pleading, claim, or issue in this
case was frivolous? To decide that a pleading, claim, or issue in this
case was frivolous you must decide at least one of the following in the
affirmative:
(a) The pleading, claim, or issue was primarily filed, brought, or
raised by a party for an improper purpose. "Improper purpose" means
that the pleading, claim, or issue was filed, brought, or raised with
the purpose of harassing, embarrassing, or coercing another party,
causing unnecessary delay, or needlessly increasing litigation costs.
(b) The pleading, claim, or issue was filed, brought, or raised in
bad faith. "Bad faith" means that the party either knew reasonable
grounds did not exist for filing, bringing, or raising the pleading,
claim, or issue, or the party acted with reckless disregard as to
whether or not reasonable grounds existed for filing, bringing, or
raising the pleading, claim, or issue.
(2) If your answers to the question in both (a) and (b) of
subsection (1) of this section are "No" do not proceed further. If
your answer is "Yes" to a question in either (a) or (b) of subsection
(1) of this section, you must make one of the following
recommendations:
(a) We recommend that . . . . . . (name of party) be required to
pay sanctions in the amount of . . . . . dollars, payable to . . . . .
(name of party) as a result of filing, bringing, or raising a frivolous
pleading, claim, or issue.
(b) We do not believe that a monetary sanction should be imposed
against . . . . . . (name of party) for filing, bringing, or raising a
frivolous pleading, claim, or issue.
(3) The court shall take the jury's recommendation under
consideration in deciding whether to impose sanctions against a party
for filing, bringing, or raising a frivolous pleading, claim, or issue.
The court shall enter into the record written findings and conclusions
in accepting or rejecting the jury's recommendations.
(4) In addition to any other remedies provided in RCW 4.84.185 or
by court rule, sanctions that may be imposed under this section at the
discretion of the court for filing, bringing, or raising a frivolous
pleading, claim, or issue include the payment of reasonable costs and
reasonable attorneys' fees of the other party caused in responding to
the frivolous pleading, claim, or issue, and a monetary penalty on the
party or party's attorney who brought the frivolous pleading, claim, or
issue, and the firm with which the attorney is employed or associated.

PART II
MEDICAL MALPRACTICE PREMIUM ASSISTANCE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 The department of health shall develop, in
consultation with the department of revenue, a program to provide
business and occupation tax credits for physicians who serve uninsured,
medicare, and medicaid patients in a private practice or a reduced fee
access program for the uninsured and shall submit proposed legislation
to the legislature by December 15, 2010.

PART III
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 Sections 107, 109 through 114, and 116 of
this act are each added to chapter 7.70 RCW.

--- END ---