BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that cleaning products
are necessary for creating and maintaining sanitary conditions in state
facilities and workplaces. However, chemicals contained in cleaning
products can be released to the environment during normal use by
evaporation of volatile components or by leaving residue on cleaned
surfaces. Choosing less hazardous cleaning products for use in our
workplaces and our facilities and taking steps to reduce exposure can
minimize harmful impacts to office and custodial workers, improve
indoor air quality, and reduce water and ambient air pollution.
Purchasing and appropriate use of products that perform well and that
have positive environmental attributes such as biodegradability, low
toxicity, low volatile organic compound content, reduced packaging, and
low life cycle energy use can reduce the environmental impact of
routine cleaning activities while also ensuring cleaning effectiveness.
Therefore, the legislature finds that the adoption of practices to
select, procure, and use environmentally preferred products will
benefit the environment and the health and safety of workers and
visitors to state facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of general administration.
(2) "Environmentally preferred cleaning product" means a cleaning
product that minimizes potential impacts to human health and the
environment consistent with maintenance of the effectiveness of these
products for the protection of public health and safety.
(3) "State agency" means any office, department, division, bureau,
board, commission, institution of higher education, K-12 school
district, and includes offices and departments of statewide separately
elected officials.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) All state agencies must purchase
environmentally preferred cleaning products or services. State
agencies may comply with this section by purchasing cleaning products
identified as environmentally preferred products under subsection (2)
of this section.
(2) The department of general administration, in consultation with
the department of health and the department of ecology, shall identify
and recommend environmentally preferred cleaning products for use by
state agencies. In identifying these products, the departments shall
consider nationally recognized accrediting information from multiple
sources, including but not limited to the United States environmental
protection agency's design for the environment (DfE), the ecologo
program, and green seal. Cleaning products listed for use by state
agencies must achieve a comparable level of performance to cleaning
products that are replaced by an agency with a listed product.
(3) The department of general administration, upon renewal of a
lease and for all new leases, must require lessors and building
managers who provide leased space to state agencies to use
environmentally preferred products and practices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 When there is a need to control the spread
of germs, infection, and disease in areas where high levels of bacteria
are present or in areas where mandated by law, the use of germicidals,
disinfectants, and antimicrobiological products to disinfect surfaces
may be used. The use of these products must be in accordance with
responsible cleaning procedure requirements, including:
(1) Controlled and efficient use;
(2) Proper dilution, mixing, and handling;
(3) Following label instructions;
(4) Monitoring of chemical quantities used; and
(5) Compliance with chemical hazard communication and personal
protective equipment use requirements under chapter 296-800 WAC.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Local governments are encouraged to review
their purchasing and use of cleaning products and select
environmentally preferred cleaning products. The department shall
encourage local governments that are members of the department's state
purchasing cooperative to achieve the goals of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 State agencies shall transition to
environmentally preferred cleaning products within six months of
publication in the Washington State Register of the list of
environmentally preferred cleaning products developed under section 3
of this act. The transition must take place in a manner that avoids
waste of existing inventories, accommodates establishment of supply
chains for new products, enables the training of personnel in
appropriate work practices, and allows the phase-out of products and
practices inconsistent with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---