BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.36.032 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 291 s 13 are each
amended to read as follows:
The real and personal property of ((the administrative offices of))
nonprofit recognized religious organizations ((shall be)) is exempt to
the extent that the property is used for ((the administration of the
religious programs of the organization and such other programs as would
be exempt under RCW 84.36.020 and 84.36.030 as now or hereafter
amended)) church purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2011 and thereafter.

--- END ---