BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 64.34.380 and 2008 c 115 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) An association is encouraged to establish a reserve account
to fund major maintenance, repair, and replacement of common elements,
including limited common elements that will require major maintenance,
repair, or replacement within thirty years. A reserve account shall be
established in the name of the association. The board of directors is
responsible for administering the reserve account.
(b) By January 1, 2015, an association with twenty-five or more
unit owners is encouraged to establish a reserve account and maintain
at least a seventy percent funding level in the reserve account as
determined by using the association's most current reserve study.
(2) Unless doing so would impose an unreasonable hardship, an
association shall prepare and update a reserve study, in accordance
with the association's governing documents and RCW 64.34.224(1). The
initial reserve study must be based upon a visual site inspection
conducted by a reserve study professional.
(3) Unless doing so would impose an unreasonable hardship, the
association shall update the reserve study annually. At least every
three years, an updated reserve study must be prepared and based upon
a visual site inspection conducted by a reserve study professional.
(4) This section and RCW 64.34.382 through 64.34.390 apply to
condominiums governed by chapter 64.32 RCW or this chapter and intended
in whole or in part for residential purposes. These sections do not
apply to condominiums consisting solely of units that are restricted in
the declaration to nonresidential use. An association's governing
documents may contain stricter requirements.

--- END ---