BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
A recipient of medical assistance under RCW 74.09.510 or medical
care services under RCW 74.09.035 must pay a copayment in the amount of
one dollar for each filled prescription for an over-the-counter cough
syrup containing guaifenesin or dextromethorphan or a combination of
guaifenesin and dextromethorphan.

--- END ---