BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.76.210 and 2008 c 205 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall collaborate with the four-year institutions
including the council of presidents, the community and technical
college system, and when appropriate the workforce training and
education coordinating board, the superintendent of public instruction,
and the independent higher educational institutions to identify budget
priorities and levels of funding for higher education, including the
two and four-year institutions of higher education and state financial
aid programs. It is the intent of the legislature that recommendations
from the board reflect not merely the sum of budget requests from
multiple institutions, but prioritized funding needs for the overall
system of higher education.
(2) By December of each odd-numbered year, the board shall
distribute guidelines which outline the board's fiscal priorities to
the institutions and the state board for community and technical
colleges.
(a) The institutions and the state board for community and
technical colleges shall submit an outline of their proposed operating
budgets to the board no later than July 1st of each even-numbered year.
Pursuant to guidelines developed by the board, operating budget
outlines submitted by the institutions and the state board for
community and technical colleges after January 1, 2007, shall include
all policy changes and enhancements that will be requested by the
institutions and the state board for community and technical colleges
in their respective biennial budget requests and shall include proposed
tuition and fee rates for the two-year period covered by the next
biennial operating budget. Operating budget outlines shall include a
description of each policy enhancement, the dollar amount requested,
and the fund source being requested.
(b) Capital budget outlines for the two-year institutions shall be
submitted by August 15th of each even-numbered year, and shall include
the prioritized ranking of the capital projects being requested, a
description of each capital project, and the amount and fund source
being requested.
(c) Capital budget outlines for the four-year institutions must be
submitted by August 15th of each even-numbered year, and must include:
The institutions' priority ranking of the project; the capital budget
category within which the project will be submitted to the office of
financial management in accordance with RCW 43.88D.010; a description
of each capital project; and the amount and fund source being
requested.
(d) The office of financial management shall reference these
reporting requirements in its budget instructions.
(3) The board shall review and evaluate the operating and capital
budget requests and proposed tuition and fee rates from four-year
institutions and the community and technical college system based on
how the requests align with the board's budget priorities, the missions
of the institutions, performance agreements adopted pursuant to RCW
28B.10.922, per-student funding goals developed pursuant to RCW
28B.15.068, and the statewide strategic master plan for higher
education under RCW 28B.76.200.
(4) The board shall submit recommendations on the proposed
operating budget and priorities to the office of financial management
by October 1st of each even-numbered year, and to the legislature by
January 1st of each odd-numbered year. The board's capital budget
recommendations for the community and technical college system and the
four-year institutions must be submitted to the office of financial
management by November 15th of each even-numbered year and to the
legislature by January 1st of each odd-numbered year. The board's
recommendations for the four-year institutions must include the
relative share of the higher education capital budget that the board
recommends be assigned to each project category, as defined in RCW
43.88D.010, and to minor works program and preservation.
(5) Institutions and the state board for community and technical
colleges shall submit any supplemental budget requests and revisions
and any proposed changes to tuition and fee rates to the board at the
same time they are submitted to the office of financial management.
The board shall submit recommendations on the proposed supplemental
budget requests and tuition and fee rates to the office of financial
management by November 1st and to the legislature by January 1st.

--- END ---