BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.99.040 and 2000 c 119 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Because of the serious nature of domestic violence, the court
in domestic violence actions:
(a) Shall not dismiss any charge or delay disposition because of
concurrent dissolution or other civil proceedings;
(b) Shall not require proof that either party is seeking a
dissolution of marriage prior to instigation of criminal proceedings;
(c) Shall waive any requirement that the victim's location be
disclosed to any person, other than the attorney of a criminal
defendant, upon a showing that there is a possibility of further
violence: PROVIDED, That the court may order a criminal defense
attorney not to disclose to his or her client the victim's location;
and
(d) Shall identify by any reasonable means on docket sheets those
criminal actions arising from acts of domestic violence.
(2)(a) Because of the likelihood of repeated violence directed at
those who have been victims of domestic violence in the past, a person
who is arrested and detained for a crime involving domestic violence
may not be released from custody on bail or personal recognizance prior
to the probable cause determination pursuant to the applicable criminal
court rules. When any person charged with or arrested for a crime
involving domestic violence is released from custody before arraignment
or trial on bail or personal recognizance, the court authorizing the
release may prohibit that person from having any contact with the
victim. The jurisdiction authorizing the release shall determine
whether that person should be prohibited from having any contact with
the victim. If there is no outstanding restraining or protective order
prohibiting that person from having contact with the victim, the court
authorizing release may issue, by telephone, a no-contact order
prohibiting the person charged or arrested from having contact with the
victim or from knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within,
a specified distance of a location.
(b) In issuing the order, the court shall consider the provisions
of RCW 9.41.800.
(c) The no-contact order shall also be issued in writing as soon as
possible.
(3) At the time of arraignment the court shall determine whether a
no-contact order shall be issued or extended. The no-contact order
shall terminate if the defendant is acquitted or the charges are
dismissed. If a no-contact order is issued or extended, the court may
also include in the conditions of release a requirement that the
defendant submit to electronic monitoring. If electronic monitoring is
ordered, the court shall specify who shall provide the monitoring
services, and the terms under which the monitoring shall be performed.
Upon conviction, the court may require as a condition of the sentence
that the defendant reimburse the providing agency for the costs of the
electronic monitoring.
(4)(a) Willful violation of a court order issued under subsection
(2) or (3) of this section is punishable under RCW 26.50.110.
(b) The written order releasing the person charged or arrested
shall contain the court's directives and shall bear the legend:
"Violation of this order is a criminal offense under chapter 26.50 RCW
and will subject a violator to arrest; any assault, drive-by shooting,
or reckless endangerment that is a violation of this order is a felony.
You can be arrested even if any person protected by the order invites
or allows you to violate the order's prohibitions. You have the sole
responsibility to avoid or refrain from violating the order's
provisions. Only the court can change the order."
(c) A certified copy of the order shall be provided to the victim.
(5) If a no-contact order has been issued prior to charging, that
order shall expire at arraignment or within seventy-two hours if
charges are not filed. Such orders need not be entered into the
computer-based criminal intelligence information system in this state
which is used by law enforcement agencies to list outstanding warrants.
(6) Whenever a no-contact order is issued, modified, or terminated
under subsection (2) or (3) of this section, the clerk of the court
shall forward a copy of the order on or before the next judicial day to
the appropriate law enforcement agency specified in the order. Upon
receipt of the copy of the order the law enforcement agency shall enter
the order for one year or until the expiration date specified on the
order into any computer-based criminal intelligence information system
available in this state used by law enforcement agencies to list
outstanding warrants. Entry into the computer-based criminal
intelligence information system constitutes notice to all law
enforcement agencies of the existence of the order. The order is fully
enforceable in any jurisdiction in the state. Upon receipt of notice
that an order has been terminated under subsection (3) of this section,
the law enforcement agency shall remove the order from the computer-based criminal intelligence information system.

--- END ---