BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A supplemental capital budget is hereby
adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the
several dollar amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as
shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby
appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during
the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending
June 30, 2011, out of the several funds specified in this act.

PART 1
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
Sec. 1001 2007 c 520 s 6042 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
Local/Community Projects (06-4-008)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The projects must comply with RCW 43.63A.125(2)(c) and other
requirements for community projects administered by the department.
(2) Funding for the Inland Northwest Science and Technology Center
shall be held in reserve until the balance of phase I funding has been
secured or committed from local government and community sources.
(3) The Washington state arts commission shall design a plaque that
shall be affixed to buildings or displayed as part of a project
receiving any appropriation from this section. The plaque shall
provide information to the public that the building or project has been
made possible by the tax dollars of Washington citizens. The
commission may contact the secretary of state to obtain approval for
use of the Washington seal in the design of the plaque. The final
design shall be approved by the chairs and ranking members of the house
of representatives capital budget committee and the senate ways and
means committee.
(4) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Projects Recommendation

7th street theatre $600,000

Alder creek pioneer association carousel museum $450,000

Asian counseling and referral service $2,000,000

Auburn veterans' memorial park improvements $50,000

Bailey Gatzert children's play area $75,000

Bridge for kids $850,000

Brookside school ADA playground equipment $25,000

Buena library $50,000

Camp prime time repairs--families with terminally ill
children $100,000

Cannon house $250,000

((Central area motivation program (CAMP) $250,000))

Cesar Chavez park $150,000

Chambers creek footbridge $177,000

Childhaven $150,000

Clark Lake park and retreat center $500,000

Colman school preconstruction activities $1,200,000

Colored women's association meeting house
preconstruction activities $60,000

Columbia breaks fire interpretive center $150,000

Community center at Greenbridge $400,000

Covington aquatics center HVAC systems $350,000

Crossroads community center and park $250,000

Cutter theater $71,000

Deming library preconstruction activities $85,000

Des Moines beach park historic buildings $300,000

Discovery park $1,000,000

East Whatcom regional resource center $1,750,000

Eatonville family park $50,000

El Centro de la Raza $900,000

Filipino community center $200,000

Financial assistance to the town of Hamilton $150,000

Food bank refrigeration projects $365,000

Foster creek $150,000

Fox theater $2,398,000

Garfield county agricultural museum $150,000

GC health clinic $12,000

Grand Army of the Republic cemetery $5,000

Granite Falls museum expansion $50,000

Greenbridge plaza in White Center $200,000

Habitat park south hill $400,000

Hidden river environmental education center $50,000

ICL education center $200,000

Japanese cultural and community center $200,000

Joel Pritchard park $2,500,000

Joe's creek project $856,000

Juanita creek channel and riparian restoration $500,000

Juanita highlands $275,000

Julia Butler Hansen home restoration $10,000

Kettle falls park $100,000

Kirkland nonmotorized facilities $200,000

LeRoi smelter smokestack monument $3,000

Lewis and Clark confluence project $2,000,000

McCaw hall $2,000,000

Meridian habitat park $400,000

Miners' memorial $36,500

Miracle league handicapped baseball $57,000

MOBIUS/Inland Northwest science and technology
center
$1,500,000

Mt. Baker theater $200,000

Mt. Vernon Jasper Gates statue $12,000

Multicultural center of Kitsap county $250,000

Nathaniel Orr home site museum interpretive center $29,000

Neighborhood house rainier vista $200,000

New Lakewood clinic $350,000

Northeast community center expansion $250,000

Northshore performing arts center $1,000,000

Northwest communities education center $1,000,000

Oak Harbor multi-purpose community and sports
facility
$50,000

Omak grandstand $250,000

Orting fire station $250,000

Pacific Northwest salmon center $1,000,000

Pacific science center $900,000

Performing arts center (PACE) $500,000

Pike Place Market health center emergency repairs $1,000,000

Port of Quincy $400,000

Puget Sound freight building warehouse--Thea Foss
waterway
$2,000,000

Puyallup river walking trail $200,000

Rainier historical heating system $75,000

Red mountain $200,000

Relocation of Sieke Japanese gardens $250,000

River walk and Sammamish river restoration $200,000

Roslyn city hall $150,000

Ruth Dykeman children's center $27,000

Sandman historical tug restoration $10,000

Seattle Aquarium $2,000,000

Seattle community center (1115 E. Pike street) $13,000

Seattle mental health emerald house $28,000

Seward park environmental and audubon center $400,000

((Snohomish senior center $150,000))

Sno-Valley senior activity center kitchen $50,000

Sound way property preservation $500,000

Spokane river whitewater course $400,000

Sumas ballpark $250,000

Synthetic sportsfield partnership at Robinswood park $400,000

Tall ships moorage $300,000

Tukwila kayak and canoe launching facility $20,000

Undeveloped woodlands linked to interurban nature
trail
$150,000

Vancouver museum $125,000

((Vancouver national historical reserve west barracks $1,000,000))

Veterans memorial museum $100,000

Wapato Lake renovations and water quality $250,000

West Seattle community resource center $500,000

West central community center $500,000

West Hylebos wetlands boardwalk $100,000

Wilson playfield land acquisition $200,000

Wing Luke Asian art museum $2,000,000

Youth housing/drop-in center $400,000

Total (($47,799,500))
$46,399,500

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,799,500))
$46,399,500

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,799,500))
$46,399,500

Sec. 1002 2009 c 497 s 1005 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
Local and Community Projects (20064008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: (1) $64,319 of the remaining
reappropriation for El Centro de la raza may be used for building
infrastructure. (2) $10,000 of the remaining reappropriation for
miracle league handicapped baseball may be used for pre-grading and
resurfacing construction. (3) $1,394,107 of the remaining
reappropriation for MOBIUS/inland northwest science and technology
center may be used for building design ((and)), construction, and
renovation.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,658,000))
$9,258,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,141,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,799,000))
$46,399,000

Sec. 1003 2008 c 328 s 1008 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
Local and Community Projects (08-4-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of
this section, the department shall not expend the appropriations in
this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have
been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount
sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project
that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the
legislature.
(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate
that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years,
either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement shall
not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or
appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that
does not include a construction or renovation component.
(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with
Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter
39.35D RCW.
(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and
shall not be advanced under any circumstances.
(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient
for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes
intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(2)(c).
(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned
and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay
state prevailing wages.
(7) The appropriation provided in this section for the bridge for
kids project shall not be released until the department obtains a
report from the project sponsor updating the cost of the project and
the current fund raising plan.
(8) The appropriation provided in this section for the Fox theater
shall be provided only under an agreement that the theater shall retain
its current name as the Fox theater.
(9) The appropriation in this section for the life support and
emergency medical services infrastructure build-out project is provided
solely for emergency medical services and medical care infrastructure
consistent with the adopted mission, goals, and capital plan of the
501(c)(3) life support.
(10) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Project Name Amount

800 MhZ interoperability public safety communication $1,000,000
Aberdeen union gospel mission $562,000
Arts west playhouse and gallery $150,000
Ashford cultural center and mountaineering museum $800,000
Asian counseling/referral services $2,000,000
Ballard corners park $125,000
Beaver mitigation of Little Spokane river $75,000
Benton City food bank $350,000
Bethel community center $1,000,000
Blueberry park improvements $5,000
Bothell crossroads/state route 522 realignment - land
acquisition and preconstruction activities $7,000,000
Bowen field $500,000
Bremerton downtown economic revitalization projects $5,000,000
Bridge for kids $500,000
Burbank water improvement $1,621,000
Burien town square $1,600,000
((Camp kilworth land acquisition - Federal Way $1,100,000))
Cannon house $750,000
Chambers creek pedestrian bridge $2,400,000
Chehalis middle school track improvement $350,000
Chehalis veterans wall of honor security enclosure $25,000
Chelan county public utility district monitor
domestic water system $800,000
Children's hospital $2,500,000
Cities of Camas and Washougal community/recreation
center preconstruction activities $500,000
City of Everett - senior center expansion and upgrade $400,000
City of Everett minor league baseball - aquasox $433,000
City of Kent event center $3,000,000
City of Mount Vernon downtown and waterfront
flood control $1,000,000
City of Puyallup riverwalk trail project $600,000
City of Tacoma minor league baseball - rainiers $2,500,000
City of Yakima minor league baseball $594,000
Civil war cemetery near volunteer park $5,000
Columbia Springs environmental learning center
preconstruction or construction activities $200,000
Confluence project $1,000,000
Counter balance park $100,000
Coupeville covered play area $113,000
Covered bridge park land acquisition (Grays river) $90,000
Cowlitz drug treatment center $580,000
Darrington water system improvements $100,000
Dawson place child advocacy center land
acquisition and renovation $650,000
Daybreak star in Discovery park $300,000
Dining car historic preservation $50,000
Discovery park - Fort Lawton $700,000
Duwamish education center $2,000,000
Duwamish longhouse $275,000
Eatonville family park $200,000
Evergreen school district health and biosciences academy $1,000,000
Federal Way little league field lighting $50,000
Ferndale boys and girls club - urgent needs
and preconstruction activities $200,000
Fish lake trail $1,000,000
Fort Dent sewer $450,000
Foss waterway $1,300,000
Fox theater $2,000,000
Friends of hidden river preconstruction activities $675,000
Goodwill of Tacoma $1,500,000
Granite Falls museum $30,000
High Point neighborhood center in West Seattle $1,000,000
Highline school district noise mitigation $5,000,000
Hill ward building removal $550,000
Innovative services northwest $1,900,000
Institute for community leadership $700,000
Jewish federation of greater Seattle $900,000
Kent alliance center $500,000
Kirkland public safety campus land acquisition
and preconstruction activities $750,000
((Kitsap SEED $1,100,000))
Klickitat law enforcement firing range $20,000
Kruckeberg botanical garden $150,000
Lake Stevens civic center $800,000
Lake Stevens senior center $300,000
Lake Waughop/department of ecology aquatic weeds $50,000
Library connection at greenbridge $200,000
Life support and emergency medical services
infrastructure build-out $2,700,000
Lions club renovation $160,000
Long lake nutrient reduction $300,000
Loon lake wood waste removal pilot study $350,000
Lucy Lopez center land acquisition $750,000
Maple Valley lake wilderness lodge and conference center $1,500,000
Maple Valley legacy site planning and
infrastructure development $3,000,000
McCaw hall $2,000,000
McDonald park $150,000
Mercer slough environmental center $1,500,000
Mill creek senior center $150,000
Mirabeau Point children's universal park $800,000
Mobius building design, construction, and renovation $1,900,000
Monroe rotary field $700,000
Morning star cultural center $300,000
Mountains to sound - SR18/I90 interchange $500,000
Nisei veterans committee $250,000
NORCOM public safety communication $750,000
Nordic heritage museum preconstruction activities $1,500,000
Northwest African American museum $650,000
Northwest harvest $3,000,000
Northwest stream center $300,000
Oak Harbor dredging preconstruction activities $59,000
Oak Harbor veterans memorial $50,000
Okanogan Valley equestrian and cultural heritage center $4,000,000
Palouse street safety improvements $210,000
Performing arts center eastside preconstruction
activities $2,500,000
Perry technical institute hanger $250,000
Pike Place market $1,070,000
Port of Benton transloader (railex) $1,000,000
Port of Walla Walla wine incubator $500,000
Poulsbo marine science center floating classroom $100,000
Prime time repairs (terminally ill children) $300,000
Puyallup town square $200,000
Rainier lifelong learning center $200,000
Richland Babe Ruth field complex $1,000,000
((Seatac World War I memorial plaza $200,000))
Seattle art museum $1,250,000
Seattle children's play garden $332,000
Seattle Chinese garden $500,000
Shoreline YMCA $800,000
Simon youth foundation resource center $150,000
Skagit recreation and event center $1,000,000
Snoqualmie railway history preconstruction activities $600,000
Somerset village - Snohomish Y $200,000
South Tacoma community center $1,200,000
Spokane county minor league baseball - Indians $2,000,000
Spokane Valley community center and foodbank $260,000
Spokane YWCA/YMCA joint project $3,500,000
Springwood youth center $500,000
SR 395/court street pedestrian overpass $400,000
Suquamish inviting house construction $1,000,000
Tacoma narrows bridge lights (($1,500,000))
$100,000
Tonasket viewing platform $100,000
Tanbara clinic - East Tacoma community $850,000
The Northwest maritime center $2,250,000
The Tri Cities minor league baseball $666,000
Thurston county small business incubator $750,000
Tokeland/North Cove water tank for fire $10,000
Town square grid - drexler drive $750,000
Tukwila southcenter parkway infrastructure $4,000,000
Turning point domestic violence shelter $700,000
University Place town square $1,000,000
VaHalla hall $750,000
((Vancouver national historic reserve $750,000))
Vernetta Smith Chehalis timberland library $500,000
Waitsburg flood control feasibility report $29,000
Walla Walla county health center annex $100,000
White Center heights park $500,000
White Salmon water improvement $1,500,000
Willapa harbor community center $300,000
Wing-It productions historic theater $20,000
Washington State University/Shoreline Community
College zero energy house $200,000
Yakima domestic violence shelter $200,000
Yakima downtown futures initiative phase 3 $1,000,000
Total (($134,694,000))
$130,144,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($134,694,000))
$130,144,000
Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($134,694,000))
$130,144,000

Sec. 1004 2009 c 497 s 1029 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
Local and Community Projects (20084001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The projects must comply with RCW 43.63A.125 and other
requirements for community projects administered by the department.
(2) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section
1008, chapter 328, Laws of 2008.
(3) $1,000,000 of the remaining reappropriation for the Evergreen
school district health and biosciences academy may be used for land
acquisition. If the facility is not constructed by June 30, 2015, the
school district shall reimburse the state an amount equal to $1,000,000
increased by the average percentage appreciation in property values for
undeveloped land in the surrounding area between the date the school
district acquired the property and June 30, 2015 or the date the school
district disposes of the property.
(4) $600,000 of the remaining reappropriation for the institute for
community leadership may be used for land acquisition.
(5) $250,000 of the remaining reappropriation for the Pacific
Northwest ilocandia association may be used for acquisition and
renovation.
(6) $200,000 of the remaining reappropriation for the library
connection at Greenbridge may be used for construction and equipment.
(7) $1,000,000 of the remaining reappropriation for the Evergreen
school district health and biosciences academy may be used for land
acquisition.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($61,200,000))
$56,650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $71,694,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($132,894,000))
$128,344,000

Sec. 1005 2008 c 328 s 1014 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
Community Development Fund (08-4-850)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The projects listed in this section must comply with RCW
43.63A.125(2)(c).
(2) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of
this section, the department shall not expend the appropriations in
this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have
been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount
sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project
that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the
legislature.
(3) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate
that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years,
either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does
not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or
appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that
does not include a construction or renovation component.
(4) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with
Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter
39.35D RCW.
(5) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only and
may not be advanced under any circumstances.
(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned
and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay
state prevailing wages.
(7) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Project Name Amount
CASA Latina $1,000,000
Divine alternatives for dads services (DADS) center $10,000
El Centro de la Raza center $821,000
Hilltop renaissance community - Centro Latino $1,950,000
Hilltop renaissance community - MLK development
association preconstruction activities $4,000,000
((HomeSight center $250,000))
Ilwaco community building $2,700,000
Japanese cultural center of Washington (($1,000,000))
$900,000
KCR Bremerton community services center $900,000
KDNA community center (Granger community center) $500,000
Korean women's association center $1,500,000
North helpline lake city court $350,000
Salishan housing community $2,900,000
Sea Mar family housing community $1,500,000
Spokane east central community center $150,000
Spokane emmanuel center $500,000
Spokane Northeast community center $1,000,000
Wapato Filipino American center $135,000
Total (($21,166,000))
$20,816,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,166,000))
$20,816,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,166,000))
$20,816,000

Sec. 1006 2009 c 497 s 1019 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
Public Works Trust Fund (20074005)

Reappropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($232,000,000))
$132,000,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $95,000,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($327,000,000))
$227,000,000
Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $327,000,000

Sec. 1007 2009 c 497 s 1023 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
Job Development Fund Grants (20074010)

The ((re))appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The ((re))appropriation is subject to the provisions of section
1032, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.
((The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The)) (2) $3,000,000 of the appropriation
is provided solely for a grant to the port of Grays Harbor for the bulk
liquid facility project.

Reappropriation:
Job Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,228,000))
$1,298,000

Appropriation:
((Job Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000))
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,697,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,702,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,930,000))
$41,697,000

Sec. 1008 2009 c 497 s 1030 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
Community Development Fund (20084850)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section
1014, chapter 328, Laws of 2008.
(2) $105,521 of the remaining reappropriation for El Centro de la
raza center may be used for building infrastructure.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,715,000))
$9,365,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,451,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,166,000))
$20,816,000

Sec. 1009 2009 c 497 s 1034 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
Quillayute Valley Wood-Fire Boiler (20084858)

Reappropriation:
Energy Freedom Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,000,000))
$20,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $980,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Sec. 1010 2009 c 497 s 1035 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
Snohomish County Biodiesel (20084859)

Reappropriation:
Energy Freedom Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($500,000))
$419,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $81,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Sec. 1011 2009 c 497 s 1039 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
Drinking Water State Revolving Fund Loan Program (30000005)

Appropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,000,000))
$10,930,000
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,201,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($39,201,000))
$42,131,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $215,974,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($255,175,000))
$258,105,000

Sec. 1012 2009 c 497 s 1040 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
Building for the Arts Grants (30000006)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Projects must be selected based on their readiness to proceed.
(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Admiral Theatre-No Theatre Left
Behind $140,000

((Artspace Everett Lofts $1,000,000))

Building a Foundation for Discovery $250,000

Campus Consolidation (Cornish) $375,000

Convert Key Bank to Everett's Plaza
Theatre $500,000

Cottage Renovation (Hedgebrook) $20,000

Downstairs at the 5th $800,000

Federal Way Performing Arts Center $325,000

Gateway Center (Lummi) $150,000

James Center for the Performing Arts
(Sequim) $150,000

Langston Hughes Performing Arts
Center $475,000

Legacy Project (Imagine) $200,000

Modular Classrooms for Dance
(Gladish) $30,000

Mt. Baker Theatre $1,000,000

Museum Expansion (Maryhill) $1,500,000

New Hands On Children's Museum $1,000,000

Reconstruction of First Stage
(Issaquah) $400,000

Seattle Opera Center $650,000

Stage Two (Whidbey) $450,000

Vashon Arts Center $1,115,000

Visual Arts Education Center
(Snohomish County) $1,000,000

Viva Vera Capital Campaign $70,000

Total (($11,600,000)) $10,600,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,600,000))
$10,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($59,600,000))
$58,600,000

Sec. 1013 2009 c 497 s 1045 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing
(30000013)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $7,000,000 of the appropriations is provided solely for
facilities housing low-income migrant, seasonal, or temporary
farmworkers. The operation of the facilities built under this section
shall be in compliance with 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1342. The department shall
work with the farmworker housing advisory committee to prioritize
funding of projects to the areas of highest need. Funding may also be
provided, to the extent qualified projects are submitted, for health
and safety projects. Any of this appropriation that is not obligated
by June 30, 2011, shall be added to the amount appropriated for the
general pool of projects.
(2) $3,000,000 of the appropriations is provided solely to promote
development of safe and affordable housing units for persons eligible
for services from the division of developmental disabilities within the
department of social and health services.
(3) $10,000 of the appropriations is provided solely to the
((Ballard food bank/Ballard homes for all coalition)) St. Luke's
Lutheran Church/Interfaith Task Force on Homelessness for the
construction of a mobile camp facility.
(4) $2,500,000 of the appropriations is provided solely for the
development of farm infrastructure improvements. Any of this
appropriation that is not obligated by June 30, 2011, must be added to
the amount appropriated for the general pool of projects.
(5) $1,000,000 from the taxable bonds account is provided solely
for the development or preservation of farmworker housing for migrant
and seasonal farmworkers located on private farms.
(6) (($5,000,000)) $10,000,000 of the appropriation ((from the
state building construction account)) is provided solely to build low-income housing units in underserved communities and to concurrently
develop capacity in these same communities. Underserved communities of
concern are those that have high levels of poverty, specifically,
thirty percent of the local median income; experience chronic
homelessness; and lack affordable housing. Underserved communities
include veterans, immigrants, refugees, and those communities of color
disproportionately impacted by chronic homelessness and lack of
affordable housing. The department shall collaborate with
representatives of underserved communities and organizations committed
to assistance in these efforts to prioritize and plan distribution of
funding.
(7) The department may not make loans from capital bond proceeds
appropriated in this section if the appropriations are also obligated
for other grants or loans or if the anticipated repayments of the loans
are from future state legislative appropriations.
(8) The legislature recognizes and supports the housing priorities
reflected in the American recovery and reinvestment act of 2009 with
the estimated amount of $144,000,000 provided solely for the following
programs:
(a) The community development fund's neighborhood stabilization
fund to purchase and rehabilitate foreclosed vacant properties and to
help create affordable housing and stabilize neighborhoods.
(b) The public housing capital fund to assist housing authorities
build and rehabilitate low-income housing stock. Housing authorities
are required to give priority consideration to the rehabilitation of
vacant rental units and capital projects that are already underway or
included in the five-year capital fund plans.
(c) HOME funding to the Washington state housing finance commission
for a competitive program pursuant to the qualified allocation plan to
owners of projects who have received or receive simultaneously an award
of low-income housing tax credits under section 42(h) of the internal
revenue code of 1986.
(d) Weatherization appropriated in section 1052 of this act for
grants and loans to local energy programs for weatherization of
multifamily and single family homes.
(9) $5,000,000 is provided solely for two geographically diverse
projects that serve disability lifeline clients who are homeless and
have a mental or behavioral health disorder. This housing must be
provided in coordination with community agencies who can offer
supportive services.
(10) $7,459,000 of the new appropriation from the Washington
housing trust account is provided solely to implement Substitute House
Bill No. 3177 (funds for certain affordable housing purposes). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2010, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(11) Up to $5,000,000 of the appropriation is for the department of
commerce to contract with the Washington state housing finance
commission to administer the Washington works housing program to
facilitate nonprofit entities' use of tax-exempt multifamily bonds
issued by the Washington state housing finance commission. The
projects receiving these funds shall meet the affordability requirement
for the period after initial bond indebtedness, as established in
section 2(2) of chapter . . ., Laws of 2010 (ESHB 2753).

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000
State Taxable Building Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($60,000,000))
$102,541,000
Washington Housing Trust Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,000,000))
$17,459,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($100,000,000))
$150,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($500,000,000))
$550,000,000

Sec. 1014 2009 c 497 s 1046 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
Community Schools (91000002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the following:
(1) The acquisition, rehabilitation, expansion, or improvement of
surplus school buildings to be converted into community facilities for
the delivery of nonresidential coordinated services for children and
families.
(a) Eligible applicants include local governments, nonprofit
organizations, nonprofit early learning providers, and tribal
governments. Only the following surplus schools may be eligible for
grant funding under this section: Fauntleroy school, University
Heights school, and Martin Luther King elementary school.
(b) As part of the grant process, applicants must submit a
comprehensive plan for the use of the surplus school that includes
information on the following:
(i) A list of partner entities that will assist the lead eligible
applicant to provide or coordinate services for children and families;
(ii) A memorandum of understanding between the lead eligible
applicant and each partner; and
(iii) An examination of capital and operating funding sources that
applicants intend to apply to the project and coordinated services at
each school to be served, whether such funding is derived from grants
under this section or from other federal, state, local, or private
sources.
(c) Project applicants must demonstrate that the proposed project
is ready to proceed, will make timely use of the funds, and requires
state funding to accomplish a discrete, usable phase of the project
that may include acquisition.
(d) If grant funds under this subsection are used for the
acquisition of surplus school facilities, the sale proceeds must be
used by the local school board disposing of such property for
renovation, replacement, or new construction of school facilities in
the district, but shall not be used as local match for projects
receiving state school construction assistance grants.
(e) In contracts for grants authorized under this subsection, the
department shall include provisions that require that capital
improvements must be held by the grantee for a specified period of time
appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities must be used
for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be
out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall
repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus
interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington
general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of
authorization of the grant.
(2) The construction of a non-mobile facility, accessible to
students in central and eastern Washington for the purpose of financial
literacy education, for the eastern and western Washington junior
achievement world initiative.
(3) $1,500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided
solely for acquisition of the Martin Luther King elementary school.
This is in addition to the amount provided for the Martin Luther King
elementary school in section 1033, chapter 497, Laws of 2009.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,000,000))
$6,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,000,000))
$6,500,000

Sec. 1015 2009 c 497 s 1048 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
Local and Community Projects (30000019)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate
that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years,
either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does
not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or
appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that
does not include a construction or renovation component.
(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with
Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter
39.35D RCW.
(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and
shall not be advanced under any circumstances.
(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient
for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes
intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(2)(c).
(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned
and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay
state prevailing wages.
(7) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Local Community Projects

7th St. Theater $330,000

Arc of Tri-Cities $900,000

Bellevue Clinic--Seattle Children's Hospital $2,000,000

Blessed Sacrament Food and Emergency Facilities Renovation $200,000

Children's Village Expansion Project $500,000

Clark County Food Distribution Facility $1,500,000

Coal Creek YMCA (Newcastle) $800,000

Dawson Place Child Advocacy Center $1,000,000

Federal Way National Little League Field Lighting Project and Monument Entry Sign $177,000

Harlequin Theater $235,000

Home Dialysis Center and Professional Workforce Training $250,000

Junior Achievement (Statewide JA World Initiative) $1,500,000

Kirkland Park Place Redevelopment $2,000,000

Livingston Baker Fire and Life Safety $750,000

Marshland Diking District $500,000

Marysville Boys & Girls Club $500,000

McClure Middle School Energy Saving Performance Contract Demonstration Project $1,000,000

Mountains to Sound Greenway $100,000

Mukilteo Boys & Girls Club $150,000

Neighborcare Health Clinic and Rainier Beach Medical Clinic $1,000,000

Parkland at Japanese Gulch $1,000,000

Petrovitsky Park Upgrade $750,000

Phoenix House $200,000

Poulsbo Marine Center $500,000

Public Broadcasting Frequency Expansion $223,000

((Ready by Five Early Learning Center $1,000,000))

Renovations to Mill Creek City Annex Building $30,000

Snohomish County Emergency Center $1,000,000

South Tacoma Community Center $1,000,000

Urban League Village at Colman School and Northwest African American Museum $100,000

West Hill/Skyway Area preconstruction activities $250,000

Whatcom Hospice House $700,000

Zina Linnik $950,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,245,000))
$22,095,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,245,000))
$22,095,000

Sec. 1016 2009 c 497 s 1050 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
Temporary Public Works Grant Program (92000021)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
grants for the specified public works projects and competitive public
works grant programs specified below. The public works board (board)
shall administer the following competitive public works grant programs
within the amounts specified, provided that up to ten percent of the
amounts provided for competitive grant programs may be transferred to
other competitive grant categories if acceptable applications for any
category do not total the amount available.
(1) $9,531,000 is provided solely for a competitive public works
grant program for local governments serving communities in rural
counties as defined in RCW 43.160.020. The board shall prioritize
applications for funding for this small community jobs program based on
the following criteria:
(a) The unemployment rate of the community;
(b) The ability of the applicant to complete the project promptly;
and
(c) The value the project presents to the community in lasting
improvements to public safety, environmental quality, recreation and
community life, or economic development.
(2) $9,531,000 is provided solely for a competitive public works
grant program for local governments serving high density urban
communities. The board shall prioritize applications for funding from
this urban vitality program based on the following criteria:
(a) The proposed project's ability to decrease the per capita
vehicle miles driven in the community by increasing access to mass
transit, supporting residential density in proximity to employment
opportunities, and improving the safety and appeal of walking and
biking in a community;
(b) The ability of the applicant to complete the project promptly;
and
(c) The local support for the project as indicated by the level of
local matching funds devoted to the project. Local matching funds do
not include funds from other state sources.
(3) The state taxable building construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for emergency loans under RCW
43.155.065.
(4) $23,535,000 is provided solely for the following list of
projects. The appropriation for Airway Heights wastewater treatment
plant is contingent upon a capacity agreement with the Kalispel Tribe
that precludes the need to build multiple wastewater treatment
facilities on the West Plains. If any project on the following list is
unable to show reasonable progress towards accomplishing the intended
project by December 31, 2010, the board may transfer the amount
allocated for the project to the competitive grant categories in
subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

Airway Heights Water Treatment Plant $1,000,000

Small Community Jobs - Assistance for Grand Coulee School $500,000

Small Community Jobs - Camano Island County Park Development $300,000

Small Community Jobs - Connell Infrastructure $1,100,000

Small Community Jobs - Dayton School Biomass Heating System $100,000

Small Community Jobs - Grandview Downtown Revitalization $500,000

Small Community Jobs - Green Acres Neighborhood Park $200,000

Small Community Jobs - Hoh Tribe Fire Station $623,000

Small Community Jobs - Longview Elementary Safety Underpass $250,000

Small Community Jobs - Mesa Playground $35,000

Small Community Jobs - Pasco Commercial Avenue Construction $800,000

Small Community Jobs - Union Gap School Crossing Improvement $227,000

Small Community Jobs - Yakima Downtown Futures $1,000,000

Small Community Jobs - Yelm Longmire Park $400,000

Urban Vitality - Federal Way Urban Infrastructure $5,000,000

Urban Vitality - Infrastructure for Puyallup (Parametrix) $2,000,000

Urban Vitality - Percival Landing $3,000,000

Urban Vitality - Redmond Square Development $2,000,000

Urban Vitality - Renton Hawks Landing $1,700,000

Water - Gig Harbor Waste Water Treatment $2,500,000

Water - Pine Terrace Water Association Project $300,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($42,597,000))
$34,097,000
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,500,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,597,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,597,000

Sec. 1017 2009 c 497 s 1054 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Cowlitz River Dredging (20082856)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $313,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $687,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,000,000))
$1,500,000

Sec. 1018 2009 c 497 s 1055 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Catastrophic Flood Relief (20084850)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,600,000 is provided solely for the Chehalis basin flood
control authority or other authorized local government groups to
develop governance agreements for development of flood hazard
mitigation measures throughout the basin. The agreements must be
executed by July 1, 2011. This is the maximum amount that may be
expended for this purpose.
(2) $1,700,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for the
Lewis county public utility district to administer studies for
development of flood hazard mitigation measures on the condition that
the requirement in subsection (1) of this section is met. Studies
funded by this reappropriation must consider dams and lowland temporary
water storage options.
(3) $200,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for an early
flood warning system.
(4) It is the intent of the legislature to fulfill the commitment
of section 101, chapter 179, Laws of 2008 and chapter 180, Laws of
2008, by appropriating funds when the federal match requirement is
needed.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,351,000))
$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,649,000))
$3,450,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($0))
$44,050,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1019 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Risk Pool (91000001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
a risk pool to complete projects within the scope described in budget
documents submitted as part of the governor's capital budget request
and consistent with legislative history. This section only applies to
projects included in this 2010 supplemental capital budget with reduced
appropriations. The office of financial management may allot portions
of this appropriation ten days after notifying the senate ways and
means committee and the house of representatives capital budget
committee. The notification must include an explanation of the need
and the amount for the allotment to complete the scope of an approved
project.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1020 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT. (1) Due to the downturn of
the economy and the direct effects on the state bond debt limit, the
legislature intends to reduce bond debt while focusing resources on
maintaining and creating jobs. Therefore, the legislature directs the
office of financial management to work with state agencies to achieve
savings in the amount of $42,291,000 by reducing previously approved
allotments or by withholding approval of planned allotments for those
projects that have not shown substantial progress under the criteria
established in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) A project is subject to allotment reduction or non-approval of
a planned allotment under this section if:
(a)(i) It is a state project administered by a state agency; or
(ii) It is a grant or a loan project for which a state agency
allocates funding to a non-state entity;
(b) Appropriations for the project were made in the 2009-11 or
previous omnibus capital appropriations acts from the state building
construction account, state taxable building construction account, or
any other debt limit bond account; and
(c) The project has failed to secure all required and appropriate
transaction elements necessary to execute contracts with the
administering state agency by November 30, 2010. Required and
appropriate transaction elements include, but are not limited to,
matching funds, permits, environmental reviews, and required contracts
and partnership agreements.
(3) Amounts attributable to allotment reductions or non-approval of
planned allotments made under this section must be placed in or remain
in unallotted status and remain unexpended.
(4) By December 31, 2010, the office of financial management must
report to the house of representatives capital budget committee and the
senate ways and means committee on the projects for which allotments
were reduced or for which approval was withheld, including a list of
the specific projects and related funds remaining in unallotted status.
(5) Agencies and prospective grant or loan recipients are
encouraged to reapply or request funds in the 2011-13 biennial capital
appropriations act for projects for which allotments were reduced or
not approved under this section.

Sec. 1021 2009 c 497 s 1067 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Legislative Building Improvements (20081011)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
the repair and patching of the outside of the legislative building.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $172,000
Appropriation:
((State Building Construction Account--State))
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,079,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,639,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,390,000

Sec. 1022 2009 c 497 s 1076 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Facility Oversight Program: Staffing (30000063)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the department of general administration to assist
the office of financial management with the development and
implementation of RCW 43.82.035 and 43.82.055.

Appropriation:
((State Building Construction Account--State))
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $740,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,597,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,337,000

Sec. 1023 2009 c 497 s 1065 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
O'Brien Building Improvements (20081007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Appropriation:
((State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,671,000))
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,220,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,481,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,329,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,981,000))
$11,201,000

Sec. 1024 2009 c 497 s 1071 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Capital Lake Plan Completion (20082953)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($200,000))
$50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($500,000))
$350,000

Sec. 1025 2009 c 497 s 1075 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Powerhouse: Improvements and Preservation (30000056)

Appropriation:
((State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,459,000))
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,240,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,459,000))
$1,240,000

Sec. 1026 2009 c 497 s 1081 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Pro Arts Building (91000002)

((The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Predesign and design funds are provided
solely to develop a new office building. Up to $225,000 may be used to
develop the predesign for the Pro Arts site to include a new office
building that may house tenants from the general administration
building including the office of financial management, the Puget Sound
partnership, the office of the state treasurer, and other small
commissions and agencies. The predesign shall be developed with
representatives from the capitol campus design advisory committee, the
department of general administration, and the office of financial
management. The predesign shall be used to develop the optimum use of
space for the Pro Arts site, identify any required mitigation, parking
requirements, schedule of construction, and cost of construction. The
predesign shall be provided to the appropriate fiscal committees of the
legislature and the office of financial management by February 1, 2010.
The allotment for design funds will be made after the predesign is
approved by the office of financial management and the appropriate
fiscal committees of the legislature.))

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$225,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$225,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1027 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Camp Murray New Primary Gate Entrance (30000482)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,270,000
Military Department Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,657,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,927,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,927,000

Sec. 1028 2009 c 497 s 1086 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Minor Works Preservation (30000002)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,069,000))
$8,672,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,709,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,778,000))
$10,381,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,700,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,478,000))
$29,081,000

Sec. 1029 2009 c 497 s 1087 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Minor Works Program (30000003)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . (($679,000))
$3,139,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,229,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,908,000))
$13,368,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1030 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Combined Support Maintenance Shop (20082006)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,736,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,164,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,900,000

(End of part)

PART 2
HUMAN SERVICES
Sec. 2001 2009 c 497 s 2001 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION
Replace Hawthorne Hall Dormitory (20082001)

((The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The office of financial management shall
allot funds for the dormitory construction at the criminal justice
training commission only after the recommendation of the steering
committee participating in the analysis in section 1057 of this act has
been provided to the legislative fiscal committees and submitted to the
office of financial management for review.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,745,000))

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $632,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,293,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($0))
$16,934,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,670,000))
$18,859,000

Sec. 2002 2009 c 497 s 2002 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION
School Mapping (30000011)

((The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature intends to complete half
of the remaining community and technical college mapping with this
appropriation and to appropriate funding for the remaining half of
unmapped square feet in community and technical colleges in the 2011-13
biennium.))

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($500,000))
$1,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($546,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,046,000))
$1,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2003 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES
Central Office Roof Replacement and Fall Restraint Upgrade
(30000012)

Appropriation:
Accident Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,250,000
Medical Aid Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,250,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Sec. 2004 2009 c 497 s 2027 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
Eastern State Hospital: Roof Replacements (30000846)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,085,000))
$922,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,088,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,173,000))
$2,010,000

Sec. 2005 2009 c 497 s 2014 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
Special Commitment Center: Utility Replacements (20081504)

The reappropriation and appropriation in this section are subject
to the following conditions and limitations: It is the intent of the
appropriation and reappropriation to replace essential utilities, such
as sanitary sewer, high voltage electrical, and fiber optic
communications, serving the special commitment center and McNeil
corrections center on McNeil Island by replacing the Island's
electrical feed from the shoreline landing to the McNeil corrections
center generator building, and continuing on to the special commitment
center. The department shall coordinate the work with the department
of corrections for the most cost-effective approach to the work.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,900,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,490,000))
$2,966,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,530,000))
$6,006,000

Sec. 2006 2009 c 497 s 2034 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Drinking Water Assistance Program (30000013)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $38,462,000 is provided from the American
recovery and reinvestment act of 2009.

Appropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,348,000))
$38,348,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account--Federal
American Recovery and Reinvestment Act . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,462,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($62,810,000))
$76,810,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($62,810,000))
$76,810,000

Sec. 2007 2009 c 497 s 2037 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
State Veterans Cemetery (20082004)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,815,000
Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,909,000
Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,010,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,825,000))
$9,734,000

Sec. 2008 2009 c 497 s 2067 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center for Women: Roof Replacement
(30000178)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,832,000))
$1,557,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,832,000))
$1,557,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2009 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: Housing Units, Kitchen, and Site
Work (30000482)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,990,000
Public Safety Reimbursable Bond Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $829,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,819,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,819,000

Sec. 2010 2009 c 497 s 2072 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Clallam Bay Corrections Center: Replace 5 Towers and Housing Roofs
(30000108)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The funding is provided solely for the
replacement of roofs on offender housing units.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,000,000))
$2,550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,000,000))
$2,550,000

Sec. 2011 2009 c 497 s 2075 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Monroe Corrections Center: Water Line Replacements (30000137)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,809,000))
$1,538,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,809,000))
$1,538,000

Sec. 2012 2009 c 497 s 2078 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: Kitchen Improvements (20061007)

((Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $402,000))

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $228,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($630,000))
$228,000

Sec. 2013 2009 c 497 s 2068 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
300 Minimum Security Bed Expansion - Three Locations (20082850)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($321,000))
$15,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $156,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($477,000))
$171,000

Sec. 2014 2009 c 497 s 2054 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: Replace Roofs (20081007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,200,000))
$180,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $589,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,789,000))
$769,000

Sec. 2015 2009 c 497 s 2064 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Mission Creek Corrections Center for Women: 100-Bed Expansion
(20082020)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,331,000))
$4,419,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,296,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,627,000))
$5,715,000

(End of part)

PART 3
NATURAL RESOURCES
Sec. 3001 2009 c 497 s 3059 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Kittitas Groundwater Study (30000029)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
By September 30, 2010, if, after consultation with major Yakima
basin governments and stakeholders, the department of ecology and
Kittitas county reach an agreement on a preferred approach, including
the appropriate geographic scope and administering entity, the
appropriation may be fully or partially redirected for the following
purposes:
(1) Funds may be provided to develop and implement water banking
and transfer methods and agreements that are fully protective of senior
water rights and that protect domestic groundwater users and improve
the profitability of farming operations. The legislature finds such
activities to be in the public interest because they can help sustain
the viability of the agricultural economy and enhance the certainty of
water supplies for domestic groundwater users.
(2) Funds may be provided to lease or purchase water rights to
create a reserve water supply for domestic groundwater users that have
a groundwater right with a priority date later than May 10, 1905, as
well as for all out-of-priority groundwater users. In securing water
for such domestic groundwater users, strong preference shall be given
to the use of water banking and transfer methods that provide
alternatives to permanent purchase and dry-up of agricultural water
rights in the basin, including dry-year options, water banking, long-term water supply lease agreements, long-term agricultural land
fallowing agreements, and reduced consumptive use through efficiency or
alternative cropping arrangements while maintaining historic return
flows.
(3) A portion of the appropriation may be used for administrative
costs, not to exceed four percent, and other costs associated with
leasing or acquiring and transferring the water rights. All costs
shall be fully recovered from participating domestic water users for
their prorated portion of the cost, including but not limited to the
costs of securing a water right or rights for this purpose, costs
associated with the development and implementation of alternative
agricultural water transfer methods, associated annual operational
costs, and federal water service contract costs owed to the United
States bureau of reclamation. Funds recovered in this manner shall be
deposited in the state and local improvement revolving fund and may be
used for any purpose provided in this section.

Appropriation:
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Sec. 3002 2009 c 497 s 3039 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Flood Protection Study (20082855)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is
provided solely for the department to conduct a study to determine the
number of decertified levees in the state and to identify strategies
for maintaining accreditation, re-accrediting, or recertifying ((the))
levees so that they ((provide)) are recognized by federal agencies as
providing optimum protection for the communities protected by the
levees. The department must prioritize areas to include in the study
based on population and the economic impact of potential flood damage.
The study must include the following components:
(1) A working group of levee managers, local agencies, and
stakeholders to advise and inform the study;
(2) ((A)) In-state examples of the costs and processes of technical
review of the structural integrity of levee systems;
(3) An inventory, map, and ((rate the effectiveness)) description
of the level of protection of existing levee systems; ((and))
(4) The development of strategies and actions needed to improve the
existing levee system and to ensure certification by the United States
army corps of engineers for one-hundred year flood protection;
(5) The identification of current funding sources and the amounts
available for levee improvements; and
(6) Recommendation for additional new funding sources and options.
(7) The study must be completed and a report provided to the
appropriate legislative committees by ((July)) December 1, 2010.
(8) The study under this section is exempt from the provisions of
section 602, chapter 3, Laws of 2010 and section 7, chapter 5, Laws of
2009.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $280,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $280,000

Sec. 3003 2009 c 497 s 3007 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (20052851)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,800,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,850,000))
$7,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,147,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,797,000))
$18,197,000

Sec. 3004 2009 c 497 s 3026 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (20084010)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($34,870,000))
$24,750,000
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,120,000
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,698,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,568,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,315,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,883,000

Sec. 3005 2009 c 497 s 3043 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (30000008)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: For the 2011 funding cycle, the department
must accept applications for the program until December 1, 2009. The
program must include competitive application processes for projects
relating to storm water systems, sewer systems, and septic systems
prioritized on a worst-case, first-need basis.

Appropriation:
((State Building Construction Account--State))
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,000,000

Sec. 3006 2009 c 497 s 3049 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Upper Columbia River Black Sand Beach Cleanup (30000016)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,000,000))
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,000,000))
$500,000

Sec. 3007 2009 c 497 s 3050 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Orphaned and Abandoned Site Cleanup Initiative (30000018)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,000,000))
$400,000
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $277,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,277,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,600,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,877,000

Sec. 3008 2009 c 497 s 3053 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Skykomish Cleanup and Restoration (30000020)

Appropriation:
((State Building Construction Account--State))
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,300,000
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,050,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,350,000

Sec. 3009 2009 c 497 s 3054 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Storm Water Retrofit and Low-Impact Development Grant Program
(30000097)

Appropriation:
((State Building Construction Account--State))
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account - Waste
Disposal Facilities . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,284,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account - Waste
Disposal Facilities, 1980 . . . . . . . . . . . . $325,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,609,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,609,000

Sec. 3010 2009 c 497 s 3047 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Coordinated Prevention Grants (30000013)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $4,270,000 of the appropriation is
provided solely for grants to local governments for local waste and
pollution prevention projects. Grants must fund new organics
composting and conversion, green building, and moderate risk waste
initiatives described in the state "beyond waste" plan, including
alternatives to backyard burning of organic materials.

Appropriation:
((State Building Construction Account--State))
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,680,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $135,680,000

Sec. 3011 2009 c 497 s 3060 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Remedial Action Grant Program (30000039)

Appropriation:
((State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,700,000))
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,200,000
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $180,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $217,700,000

Sec. 3012 2009 c 497 s 3020 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Breazeale Interpretive Center (20082856)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . (($270,000))
$419,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($225,000))
$76,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $495,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3013 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Settlement Funding to Clean Up Toxic Sites (30000145)

Appropriation:
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3014 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Cleanup Asarco Contamination on Vashon/Maury Islands and Mines
(91000009)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $15,000,000 of the cleanup settlement
account appropriation is provided solely for the department of ecology
to assist King County in the acquisition and remediation of property on
Vashon and Maury Islands. The properties are in the Tacoma smelter
plume area and are contaminated with arsenic and other heavy metals
from the Asarco smelter.

Appropriation:
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3015 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Clean Up Toxic Sites - Puget Sound (30000144)

Appropriation:
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3016 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Reducing Diesel Particle Emissions in Tacoma (30000139)

Appropriation:
Air Pollution Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3017 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Reducing Wood Smoke Particle Emissions in Tacoma (30000140)

Appropriation:
Air Pollution Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3018 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Storm Water Projects (91000014)

Appropriation:
Storm Water Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $101,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $101,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3019 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund Program Match (91000008)

Appropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3020 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund Program (30000142)

Appropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,000,000

Sec. 3021 2009 c 497 s 3048 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Swift Creek Natural Asbestos Cleanup (30000015)

Appropriation:
((State Building Construction Account--State))
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,800,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,800,000

Sec. 3022 2009 c 497 s 3044 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Reducing Health Threats from Woodstove Pollution (30000010)

Appropriation:
((State Building Construction Account--State))
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000

Sec. 3023 2009 c 497 s 3052 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Safe Soils Remediation Program (30000019)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,000,000))
$920,000
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,080,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Sec. 3024 2009 c 497 s 3093 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Flaming Geyser State Park Park-wide Infrastructure Redevelopment
(30000173)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,533,000))
$3,003,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,533,000))
$3,003,000

Sec. 3025 2009 c 497 s 3094 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Dash Point State Park Sanitary Sewer Collection System (30000269)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,820,000))
$3,247,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,820,000))
$3,247,000

Sec. 3026 2009 c 497 s 3090 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Illahee State Park Wastewater Treatment Upgrade (30000447)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,850,000))
$1,572,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,850,000))
$1,572,000

Sec. 3027 2009 c 497 s 3091 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Cama Beach State Park (30000101)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,265,000))
$2,775,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,265,000))
$2,775,000

Sec. 3028 2009 c 497 s 3085 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Federal Grant Authority (30000006)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . (($990,000))
$1,990,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,990,000))
$5,990,000

Sec. 3029 2009 c 497 s 3109 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD
Washington Wildlife and Recreation Program (20044002)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Any amount of the reappropriations that is
not obligated to a specific project may be used to fund alternate
projects approved by the legislature from the same account in biennia
succeeding that in which the moneys were originally appropriated.

Reappropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,499,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,789,000))
$4,319,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,288,000))
$5,818,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,712,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,000,000))
$44,530,000

Sec. 3030 2009 c 497 s 3133 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD
Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (20084011)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriations are provided solely for the approved list
of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2007-3 as developed on March
17, 2007, and LEAP capital document No. 2008-1 as developed on February
13, 2008.
(2) If additional funds are available after funding the farmlands
preservation account projects approved in subsection (1) of this
section, the committee may: Provide one-time grants of up to $25,000
each to counties requesting assistance in developing farmlands
preservation strategies for the purpose of seeking grants from the
farmlands preservation account in future grant cycles.
(3) Funds reappropriated for distribution according to the
provisions of RCW 79A.15.040(1)(c) must be allocated forty percent to
local government projects and sixty percent to state agency projects.
If the cumulative total of local government projects is less than forty
percent of the total distribution to this category, the difference may
be allocated to state agency projects.
(4) Up to $627,299 of the reappropriation from the riparian
protection account is provided solely for the Chehalis river surge
plain natural area preserve. This amount may not be expended for the
project until the department of natural resources has completed a
management plan for the preserve that maintains recreational access and
that management plan is presented to the house of representatives
capital budget and senate ways and means committees.

Reappropriation:
Farmlands Preservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,300,000))
$4,319,000
Riparian Protection Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,500,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,956,000
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,994,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($64,750,000))
$63,769,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($100,000,000))
$99,019,000

Sec. 3031 2009 c 497 s 3138 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000007)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2009-3, developed
March 9, 2009.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,025,000))
$555,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,470,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,025,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,100,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,125,000

Sec. 3032 2009 c 497 s 3168 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Mitigation Projects and Dedicated Funding (20082048)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Up to $2,300,000 of the reappropriation is
provided solely for capital projects and engineering to pay the total
cost of labor and materials provided by the department of fish and
wildlife.

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000

Appropriation:
General Fund--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Game Special Wildlife Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Game Special Wildlife Account--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,000,000))
$31,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,000,000))
$35,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,125,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $114,800,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($171,925,000))
$177,925,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3033 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP
Puget Sound Aquatic Cleanup and Restoration (30000004)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
the Carpenter creek estuary restoration project.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Sec. 3034 2009 c 497 s 3203 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Trust Land Transfer (30000066)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The total appropriation is provided to the department solely to
transfer from trust status, or enter into fifty year leases for,
certain trust lands of statewide significance deemed appropriate for
state park, fish and wildlife habitat, natural area preserve, natural
resources conservation area, open space, housing and essential
government services, or recreation purposes. The approved list of
properties for lease or transfer is identified in the LEAP capital
document No. 2009-2a, developed April 23, 2009.
(2) Property transferred under this section must be appraised and
transferred at fair market value. The value of the timber transferred
must be deposited by the department to the common school construction
account in the same manner as timber revenues from other common school
trust lands. No deduction may be made for the resource management cost
account under RCW 79.64.040. The value of the land transferred must be
deposited in the natural resources real property replacement account.
(3) Property subject to lease agreements under this section must be
appraised at fair market value. Lease terms must be fifty years with
options to renew for an additional fifty years. Lease payments must be
lump sum payments for the entire term of the lease at the beginning of
the lease. The department shall calculate such lump sum payments using
professional appraisal standards. These lease payments may not exceed
the fee simple purchase price based on current fair market value and
must be deposited by the department to the common school construction
account in the same manner as lease revenues from other common school
trust lands. No deduction may be made for the resource management cost
account under RCW 79.64.040.
(4) All reasonable costs incurred by the department to implement
this section are authorized to be paid out of the appropriations.
Authorized costs include the actual cost of appraisals, staff time,
environmental reviews, surveys, and other similar costs and shall not
exceed ((one and nine-tenths)) two and six-tenths percent of the
appropriation.
(5) Intergrant exchanges between common school and other trust
lands of equal value may occur if the exchange is in the interest of
each trust, as determined by the board of natural resources.
(6) Prior to or concurrent with conveyance of these properties, the
department, with full cooperation of the receiving agencies, shall
execute and record a real property instrument that dedicates the
transferred properties to the purposes identified in subsection (1) of
this section. Transfer and lease agreements for properties identified
in subsection (1) of this section must include terms that restrict the
use of the property to the intended purpose. Transfer and lease
agreements may include provisions for receiving agencies to request
alternative uses of the property, provided the alternative uses are
compatible with the original intended public purpose and the department
and legislature approves such uses.
(7) The department and receiving agencies shall work in good faith
to carry out the intent of this section. However, the department or
receiving agencies may remove a property from the transfer list based
on new, substantive information, if it is determined that transfer of
the property is not in the statewide interest of either the common
school trust or the receiving agency.
(8) The department shall execute trust land transfers that, after
the deduction of reasonable costs as provided in subsection (4) of this
section, eighty percent of the total value of transferred property is
timber value and is deposited in the common school construction
account. To achieve the eighty percent requirement, the department may
choose to lease properties originally intended as transfers.
(9) $4,189,000 of the amount appropriated is provided solely for
fifty-year leases of development rights from timber lands at risk of
conversion to non-timber land uses purchased from appropriations in the
2007-2009 fiscal period.
(10) ((On June 30, 2011,)) The state treasurer shall transfer all
remaining uncommitted funds from this appropriation to the common
school construction account and the appropriations in this section
shall be reduced by an equivalent amount.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,133,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,133,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3035 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Forest Biomass (91000003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the
purchase of forest biomass feedstock processing equipment appropriate
for forest biomass-to-energy projects in eastern Washington in areas
with a scarcity of primary wood processing facilities, or for making
grants on a competitive basis to local governments or nonprofit
entities in such local areas for purchase of such equipment. Equipment
purchased, either by the department or a grantee, must be made
available for lease, or other lawful means of conveyance, or be
operated directly, for use in forest biomass-to-energy projects in an
area of eastern Washington with a scarcity of primary wood processing
facilities. In providing for the use of such equipment, consideration
shall be given by the department or grantee in the opportunity for the
forest biomass-to-energy project to promote forest treatments to
improve forest health and/or remove hazardous buildup of forest fuels.
Consideration may also be given to generating jobs in counties with
high rates of unemployment.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3036 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Removal/Cleanup of Asarco Docks in Ruston/Commencement Bay
(91000004)

Appropriation:
Resource Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,050,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3037 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Forest and Fish Adaptive Management Program (91000006)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
The appropriation is provided solely for activities related to the
state's implementation of the forest and fish report as defined in
chapter 76.09 RCW and related activities, including but not limited to
adaptive management or monitoring.

Appropriation:
Storm Water Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

(End of part)

PART 4
TRANSPORTATION
Sec. 4001 2009 c 497 s 4008 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
Commute Trip Reduction for Thurston County State Agencies
(92000001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
implementation of chapter 427, Laws of 2009 (Substitute Senate Bill No.
6088 (commute trip reduction)).

Appropriation:
State Vehicle Parking Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($734,000))
$650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($734,000))
$650,000

(End of part)

PART 5
EDUCATION
Sec. 5001 2009 c 497 s 5007 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Vocational Skills Centers (20084300)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($58,546,000))
$55,546,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,161,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($73,707,000))
$70,707,000

Sec. 5002 2009 c 497 s 5008 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Northeast King County Skills Center (20084855)

Appropriation:
School Construction/Skills Center Building
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,049,000))
$8,643,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $550,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,599,000))
$9,193,000

Sec. 5003 2009 c 497 s 5009 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
North Central Technical Skills Center (20084861)

Appropriation:
School Construction/Skills Center Building
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,007,000))
$3,960,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,557,000))
$22,510,000

Sec. 5004 2009 c 497 s 5002 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
School Construction Assistance Grants (20084200)

The appropriation and the reappropriation in this section are
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
For school construction projects funded through the school
construction assistance grant program, the superintendent of public
instruction shall require mapping the design of new facilities and
remapping the design of facilities to be remodeled.

Reappropriation:
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $176,922,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $137,267,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $477,570,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $791,759,000

Sec. 5005 2009 c 497 s 5010 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Pierce County Skills Center (20084856)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $150,000 of the appropriation is for the relocation and
installation of two double portables for offices and classrooms.
(2) $150,000 of the appropriation is for fiber optics.

Reappropriation:
School Construction/Skills Center Building
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,563,000

Appropriation:
School Construction/Skills Center Building
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,000,000))
$8,950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $473,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,036,000))
$10,986,000

Sec. 5006 2009 c 497 s 5013 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Vocational Skills Center Minor Capital Projects (30000002)

Appropriation:
School Construction and Skill Centers Building
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,694,000))
$3,594,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,694,000))
$3,594,000

Sec. 5007 2009 c 497 s 5014 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
2009-11 School Construction Assistance Grant Program (30000031)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
develop a tracking system to increase accuracy in predicting the timing
of school district claims for reimbursement for school construction
assistance grants. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall also improve its communication with school districts
regarding the status of grant projects and create requirements
regarding the timing of reimbursement claims. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall submit a report on the
progress of the new tracking and communication system to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by November 15, 2009. The
report must include a list of school district capital projects
receiving state funding and each project's anticipated final
reimbursement date.
(2) In calculating square foot eligibility for state assistance
grants, kindergarten student headcount shall not be reduced by fifty
percent.
(3) For school construction projects funded through the school
construction assistance grant program, the superintendent of public
instruction shall require mapping the design of new facilities and
remapping the design of facilities to be remodeled.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($369,920,000))
$258,541,000
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($259,029,000))
$200,826,000
Common School Construction Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,500,000))
$1,700,000
School Construction and Skill Centers Building
Account--Bond--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($58,284,000))
$59,887,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($689,733,000))
$520,954,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,921,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,610,733,000))
$4,441,954,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5008 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Jobs Act for K-12 Public Schools (91000010)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is provided solely for grants to K-12 public
school districts for energy and operational cost savings improvements
and related projects that result in energy and utility and operational
cost savings. Related projects are those projects that must be
completed in order for the energy efficiency improvement to be
effective.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in
consultation with the department of general administration, the
department of commerce, and the Washington State University energy
program shall establish a competitive process to solicit and evaluate
applications from K-12 public school districts. Final grant awards
shall be determined by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction.
(3) Grants must be awarded in competitive rounds, as provided in
this subsection:
(a) Grants to K-12 public school districts, with at least five
percent of the total grant round for small K-12 school districts with
fewer than 1,000 full-time equivalent students.
(b) Grants shall be distributed in additional competitive rounds
the same as established in (a) of this subsection.
(4) Within each competitive round, projects must be weighted and
prioritized based on the following criteria and in the following order:
(a) Leverage ratio: In each round, the higher the leverage ratio
of nonstate funding sources to state jobs act grant, the higher the
project ranking.
(b) Energy savings: In each round, the higher the energy savings,
the higher the project ranking. Applicants must submit documentation
that demonstrates energy and operational cost savings resulting from
the installation of energy equipment and improvements. The
documentation must include, but is not limited to the following:
(i) A description of energy equipment and improvements; and
(ii) A description of energy and operational cost savings. The
energy savings analysis must be performed by a licensed engineer.
(c) Expediency of expenditure: Project readiness to spend funds
must be prioritized so that the legislative intent to expend funds
quickly is met.
(5) Projects that do not use energy savings performance contracting
must: (a) Verify energy and operational cost savings for ten years or
until energy and operational costs savings pay for the project,
whichever is shorter; (b) follow the department of general
administration's energy savings performance contracting project
guidelines; and (c) employ a licensed engineer for the energy audit and
construction. The department of general administration may require
third-party verification of savings if a project is not implemented by
an energy savings performance contractor selected by the department of
general administration through the request of qualifications process.
Third-party verification must be conducted either by an energy savings
performance contractor selected by the department of general
administration through a request for qualifications or by a project or
educational service district resource conservation manager.
(6) To intensify competition, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction may only award funds to the top eighty-five percent
of projects applying in a round until the office of the superintendent
of public instruction determines a final round is appropriate.
Projects that do not receive a grant award in one round may reapply in
subsequent rounds.
(7) Grant amounts awarded to each project must allow for the
maximum number of projects funded with the greatest energy and cost
benefit.
(8) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must use
bond proceeds to pay one-half of the preliminary audit, up to five
cents per square foot, if the project does not meet the school
district's predetermined cost-effectiveness criteria. The school
district must pay the other one-half of the cost of the preliminary
audit if the project does not meet the school district's predetermined
cost-effectiveness criteria. The energy savings performance contractor
shall not charge for an investment grade audit if the project does not
meet the school district's predetermined cost-effectiveness criteria.
The school district must pay the full price of an investment grade
audit if they do not proceed with a project that meets the school
district's predetermined cost-effectiveness criteria.
(9) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may
charge projects administrative fees. The office of the superintendent
of public instruction may pay the department of general administration
administrative fees in an amount determined through a memorandum of
understanding.
(10) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the
department of general administration must submit a joint report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature and the office of financial
management on the timing and use of the grant funds, program
administrative function, and administrative fees by the end of each
fiscal year, until the funds are fully expended and all savings
verification requirements are fulfilled.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5009 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING
LOSS
Lloyd Auditorium Emergency Repairs (30000012)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Sec. 5010 2009 c 497 s 5027 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Balmer Hall Reconstruction (20081004)

In conjunction with the appropriation in this section, University
of Washington is authorized to issue a bond or bonds in an amount not
to exceed $38,600,000 in value for construction of the facility
identified in this section. The bond must be financed from building
fee and trust land revenue deposited into the university's bond
retirement account in accordance with RCW 28B.20.700 through
28B.20.740.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,600,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($42,600,000))
$4,000,000

Sec. 5011 2009 c 497 s 5023 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Savery Hall Renovation (20061005)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,000,000))
$10,823,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,510,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($61,510,000))
$61,333,000

Sec. 5012 2009 c 497 s 5026 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Denny Hall Renovation (20081002)

((Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000))

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,200,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,992,000))
$49,692,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($53,692,000))
$52,892,000

Sec. 5013 2009 c 497 s 5037 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Lewis Hall Renovation (20081003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,000,000))
$478,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,585,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,585,000))
$25,063,000

Sec. 5014 2009 c 497 s 5030 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Tacoma (20082005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($34,000,000))
$30,775,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,150,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,044,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($57,194,000))
$53,969,000

Sec. 5015 2009 c 497 s 5035 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Tacoma - Land Acquisition (20092003)

In conjunction with the appropriation in this section, University
of Washington is authorized to issue a bond or bonds in an amount not
to exceed $2,000,000 for the purchase of the land identified in this
section. The bond must be financed from building fee and trust land
revenue deposited into the university's bond retirement account in
accordance with RCW 28B.20.700 through 28B.20.740.

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $469,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,531,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Sec. 5016 2009 c 497 s 5039 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (30000027)

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,529,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($26,000,000))
$23,471,000
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,175,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,175,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $146,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $180,175,000

Sec. 5017 2009 c 497 s 5047 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Vancouver - Applied Technology and Classroom Building
(20062950)

In conjunction with the appropriation in this section, Washington
State University is authorized to issue a bond or bonds in an amount
not to exceed $10,000,000 in value for construction of the facility
identified in this section. The bond must be financed from building
fee and trust land revenues deposited into the university's bond
retirement account in accordance with RCW 28B.30.700 through
28B.30.780.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($26,742,000))
$23,593,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,420,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,662,000))
$28,513,000

Sec. 5018 2009 c 497 s 5064 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Patterson Hall Remodel (20062002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($26,600,000))
$24,170,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,734,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,416,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($63,150,000))
$60,720,000

Sec. 5019 2009 c 497 s 5077 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Hogue Hall Renovation and Addition (20082003)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,265,000))
$19,468,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,837,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,102,000))
$41,305,000

Sec. 5020 2009 c 497 s 5094 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Laboratory and Art Annex Building Renovation (30000026)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,849,000))
$4,122,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,849,000))
$4,122,000

Sec. 5021 2009 c 497 s 5100 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Miller Hall Renovation (20041953)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($54,625,000))
$45,744,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,773,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($60,398,000))
$51,517,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5022 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Vancouver National Historic Reserve West Barracks (91000002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and
shall not be advanced under any circumstances.
(2)(a) The Washington state historical society shall include
provisions in the contract under this section that require that: (i)
Capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of
time that is appropriate to the amount of the grant; and (ii) the
facility be used to provide a public benefit.
(b) If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions
of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the
principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of
interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most
closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5023 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Vancouver National Historic Reserve Visitors Center (91000001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Sec. 5024 2003 1st sp. sess. c 26 s 726 (uncodified) is amended
to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Washington Heritage Project (04-4-004)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW
27.34.330.
(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Project Amount Recommended

American museum of radio $151,799

((Bigelow House preservation association $33,900))

City of Port Angeles $112,200

City of Roslyn $181,816

City of Sprague $98,000

Duwamish tribal service, inc. $350,000

Enumclaw plateau historical society $54,054

Fort Nisqually living history museum $350,000

Gallery one $115,500

Georgetown community council $50,000

Gig Harbor - peninsula historical society $140,000

Historic Seattle PDA $350,000

Ilwaco heritage foundation $179,400

Jefferson county public works $350,000

Lopez Island historical society $60,000

Museum of flight $350,000

Museum of history and industry $350,000

Northwest maritime center $350,000

Olympia Waldorf school $45,000

Spokane parks and recreation $136,000

Spokane symphony $56,925

Suquamish museum and tribal cultural center $7,000

Vashon parks $12,906

World kite museum and hall of fame $115,500

Subtotal (($4,000,000))
$3,966,000

Alternates

Vashon parks $24,818

Clymer museum $113,598

San Juan historical museum $8,800

Jefferson county historical society $115,500

City of Lynwood $37,835

City of Mt. Vernon $66,664

White river valley museum $115,500

Town of La Conner $2,376

Subtotal alternates $485,091

TOTAL (($4,485,091))
$4,451,191

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,000,000))
$3,966,100

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,000,000))
$3,966,100

Sec. 5025 2009 c 497 s 5115 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Washington Heritage Projects (20044004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($690,000))
$657,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,310,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,000,000))
$3,967,000

Sec. 5026 2006 c 371 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Statewide - Washington Heritage Project Grants (06-4-004)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW
27.34.330.
(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Project Amount Recommended
Whatcom museum of history and art $133,303
Fort Walla Walla museum $150,000
Northwest maritime center $345,000
Squaxin Island tribal museum library and research center $210,539
Confluence project $500,000
City of Tumwater $70,901
City of Tacoma $350,000
Fox theater $102,000
Shoreline historical museum $143,578
Metro park district of Tacoma $35,000
Seattle parks department $150,000
Armed forces and aerospace museum $295,000
City of Lynnwood $85,294
Meadowbrook farm interpretive center $72,149
Center for wooden boats $100,000
Bainbridge Island historical society $207,957
Quileute tribal council $150,000
Northwest railway museum $360,000
Port Gamble S'Klallam tribe $363,579
Concrete heritage museum association $12,750
Quincy Valley historical society and museum $23,300
Foss waterway development authority $250,000
Broadway center for the performing arts $225,000
((Village theatre $65,581))
White river valley museum $99,069
Cascade land conservancy $112,500
Nunez Gaona veterans park $51,000
Total (($4,663,500))
$4,597,919

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,663,500))
$4,597,919

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,663,500))
$20,597,919

Sec. 5027 2009 c 497 s 5116 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Statewide - Washington Heritage Project Grants (20064004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section ((733)) 212, chapter ((488)) 371, Laws of
((2005)) 2006.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,318,000))
$1,253,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,346,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,664,000))
$4,599,000

Sec. 5028 2009 c 497 s 6048 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Washington Heritage Grants (07-4-004)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW
27.34.330.

(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Project Amount Recommended

Cascade land conservancy $202,000
Suquamish museum and arts center $1,000,000
Moses Lake museum and arts center $1,000,000
White River Valley museum $245,000
The Tulalip tribe $1,000,000
City of Mukilteo $490,000
Lewis county historical museum $43,000
City of Gig Harbor $1,000,000
Bainbridge Island metro parks and recreation $70,000
Polson museum $171,000
Washington trust for historic preservation $83,000
((Historic Seattle PDA)) The center for wooden boats $500,000
City of Tacoma $77,000
City of Des Moines $1,000,000
Fort Walla Walla museum $1,000,000
Foss waterway seaport $300,000
LaConner quilt museum $125,000
Cowlitz River Valley historical society $158,000
Western forest industries museum $158,000
San Juan historical society $25,000
Central Washington fair association $48,000
Urban league of metro Seattle $650,000
The center for wooden boats $235,000
Jefferson county historical society $200,000
Mansfield museum $10,000
((Martin Luther King Ballet $50,000))
The northwest railway museum $75,000
Northpoint cooperative preschool $40,000

Total (($9,955,000))
$9,905,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,955,000))
$9,905,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,955,000))
$49,905,000

Sec. 5029 2009 c 497 s 5118 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Washington Heritage Grants (20074004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
project list in section 5137, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,630,000))
$7,580,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,370,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,000,000))
$9,950,000

Sec. 5030 2009 c 497 s 5120 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Washington Heritage Project Capital Grants (30000011)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW
27.34.330.
(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects.
(3) The 2011-13 projects must be selected based on their readiness
to proceed.

Project Recommended

Wenatchee Valley Museum $150,000

West Point Light Station $300,000

Des Moines Field House $420,000

Washington Hall $381,000

Percival Landing $567,000

Roslyn City Hall & Library $194,000

((Spokane County courthouse $500,000))

Snoqualmie Chapel car #5 $125,000

Edmonds Carnegie Library
museum $48,000

Ilwaco museum collections $41,000

Minkler Mansion $200,000

Cheney house for a museum $87,000

Longview Columbia theatre $1,000,000

Chinook School $350,000

Territorial Courthouse of 1858 $167,000

Hanford Interpretive Center $147,000

Carnegie Library Museum $883,000

Dynamite Train Canopy $50,000

King Street Station $750,000

Lakewood Carriage House $110,000

Lincoln School $175,000

Quincy Pioneer Church $195,000

Ezra Meeker Mansion $100,000

Port Townsend Storage Facility $450,000

Puyallup Church Spire $17,000

Morris House and Washington
Harbor School $27,000

Kalama Interpretive Center $212,000

Foss Waterway Seaport
Building $750,000

Pioneer State Bank Building $201,000

Kirkman House $32,000

Malo Sawmill $70,000

Stimson-Green Mansion $23,000

Lightship #83 $335,000

Masonic Temple Building $350,000

Wilkeson Centennial
Monument $10,000

Eddon Boatyard ways and dock $243,000

Commencement Restoration $86,000

Vessel Shenandoah $179,000

((Walt's Mill $75,000))

TOTAL (($10,000,000))
$9,425,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,000,000))
$9,425,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,000,000))
$49,425,000

Sec. 5031 2009 c 497 s 5174 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Seattle Central Community College: Wood Construction Center
(20081216)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,645,000))
$21,275,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $549,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,194,000))
$23,824,000

Sec. 5032 2009 c 497 s 5176 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Peninsula College: Business and Humanities Center (20081218)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,627,000))
$30,247,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,100,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($35,927,000))
$32,547,000

Sec. 5033 2009 c 497 s 5180 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Green River Community College - Trades and Industry Building
(20081222)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,625,000))
$1,707,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $127,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,737,000))
$29,655,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,500,000

Sec. 5034 2009 c 497 s 5182 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Skagit Valley College - Academic and Student Services Building
(20081224)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,116,000))
$1,730,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $101,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,949,000))
$29,335,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,201,000

Sec. 5035 2009 c 497 s 5183 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Lower Columbia College - Health and Science Building (20081225)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,969,000))
$2,187,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,405,000))
$37,187,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,874,000

Sec. 5036 2009 c 497 s 5184 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Grays Harbor College - Science and Math Building (20081226)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,583,000))
$2,292,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $231,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($40,478,000))
$41,769,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,337,000

Sec. 5037 2009 c 497 s 5217 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Seattle Central Community College - Seattle Maritime Academy
(30000120)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,839,000))
$1,337,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,483,000))
$16,985,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,322,000

Sec. 5038 2009 c 497 s 5218 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Yakima Valley Community College - Palmer Martin Building (30000121)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,464,000))
$997,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,509,000))
$13,976,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,973,000

Sec. 5039 2009 c 497 s 5219 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
North Seattle Community College - Technology Building Renewal
(30000129)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,976,000))
$2,084,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,337,000))
$23,229,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,313,000

Sec. 5040 2009 c 497 s 5220 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Green River Community College - Science Math and Technology
Building (30000130)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,700,000))
$1,315,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,545,000))
$15,930,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,245,000

Sec. 5041 2009 c 497 s 5204 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Tacoma Community College - Health Careers Center (20082701)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,946,000))
$1,811,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($35,565,000))
$36,700,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,766,000

Sec. 5042 2009 c 497 s 5205 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Bellevue Community College - Health Science Building (20082702)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,350,000))
$2,910,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $144,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,506,000))
$37,946,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,000,000

Sec. 5043 2009 c 497 s 5206 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Bates Technical College - Mohler Communications Technology Center
(20082703)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,755,000))
$1,192,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $153,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,398,000))
$23,961,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,326,000

Sec. 5044 2009 c 497 s 5208 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Clark College - Health and Advanced Technologies Building
(20082705)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,506,000))
$2,324,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $236,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,598,000))
$33,780,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,354,000

Sec. 5045 2009 c 497 s 5165 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Lake Washington Technical College - Allied Health Building
(20062697)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,986,000))
$24,770,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,029,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,915,000))
$26,699,000

Sec. 5046 2009 c 497 s 5177 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Spokane Falls Community College - Chemistry and Life Science
Building (20081219)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,800,000))
$21,007,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,320,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,320,000))
$23,527,000

Sec. 5047 2009 c 497 s 5178 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Spokane Community College - Technical Education Building (20081220)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,718,000))
$23,918,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $793,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,111,000))
$26,311,000

Sec. 5048 2009 c 497 s 5191 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Spokane Falls Community College - Music Building 15 Renovation
(20081320)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $475,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,806,000))
$11,264,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $667,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,948,000))
$12,406,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5049 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Green River Community College New Classrooms Facility Debt Service
(91000014)

Appropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,044,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,432,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,476,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5050 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Bellingham Tech College Inst Resource Center Debt Service
(91000013)

Appropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,438,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,876,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,314,000

Sec. 5051 2009 c 497 s 5190 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Spokane Community College - Building 7 Renovation (20081319)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $986,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,748,000))
$9,076,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,757,000))
$10,085,000

Sec. 5052 2009 c 497 s 5192 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Pierce College Fort Steilacoom - Cascade Core (20081321)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,000,000))
$14,204,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,042,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,242,000))
$16,446,000

Sec. 5053 2009 c 497 s 5168 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
North Seattle Community College - Employment Resource Center
(20062851)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,000,000))
$4,195,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,790,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,490,000))
$6,685,000

Sec. 5054 2009 c 497 s 5135 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Clark College - East County Satellite (20041689)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,000,000))
$4,780,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,876,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,876,000))
$29,656,000

Sec. 5055 2009 c 497 s 5195 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Bellevue Community College - L Building Emergency Repairs
(20081850)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,460,000))
$387,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $203,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,663,000))
$590,000

Sec. 5056 2009 c 497 s 5187 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
South Puget Sound Community College - Building 22 Renovation
(20081316)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,300,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,002,000))
$9,580,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,059,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,361,000))
$19,939,000

Sec. 5057 2009 c 497 s 5179 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Everett Community College - Index Hall Replacement (20081221)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,150,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,301,000))
$2,157,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,650,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($40,205,000))
$40,349,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,306,000

Sec. 5058 2009 c 497 s 5164 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Spokane Falls Community College - Campus Classrooms (20062696)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,450,000))
$883,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $434,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,884,000))
$1,317,000

Sec. 5059 2009 c 497 s 5167 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Clover Park Technical College - Allied Health Care Facility
(20062699)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,020,000))
$323,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,425,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,445,000))
$1,748,000

(End of part)

PART 6
MISCELLANEOUS AND SUPPLEMENTAL PROVISIONS
Sec. 6001 2009 c 497 s 6009 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL
CONTRACTS. The following agencies may enter into financial contracts,
paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or nonappropriated, for
the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts
indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section,
agencies shall use the most economical financial contract option
available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements,
lease-development with option to purchase agreements or financial
contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures made by an
agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue date of the
authorized financial contract and any certificates of participation
therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of the financial
contract and any certificates of participation therein to the extent
provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the state finance
committee.
State agencies may enter into agreements with the department of
general administration and the state treasurer's office to develop
requests to the legislature for acquisition of properties and
facilities through financial contracts. The agreements may include
charges for services rendered.
Those noninstructional facilities of higher education institutions
authorized in this section to enter into financial contracts are not
eligible for state funded maintenance and operations. Instructional
space that is available for regularly scheduled classes for academic
transfer, basic skills, and workforce training programs may be eligible
for state funded maintenance and operations.
(1) ((Department of corrections: Enter into a financing contract
for up to $17,958,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase or build work release beds,
violator beds, or other community-based re-entry facilities.
(2))) Community and technical colleges:
(a) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla
Community College for up to $1,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase up to 40
acres of land.
(b) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Bellingham
Technical College for up to $1,390,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to develop an
instructional resource center.
(c) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Bellingham
Technical College for up to $28,968,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to develop an
instructional resource center. The cost of this financing contract
shall be paid from the community and technical colleges capital
projects account. This facility shall be eligible for maintenance and
operations funding on the same terms as if constructed with state
general obligation bonds.
(d) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Edmonds Community
College for up to $5,000,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to provide space for allied
health and construction industry.
(e) Contingent upon the sale and purchase specified in section 5071
of this act, enter into a financing contract on behalf of Spokane
Community College for up to $3,400,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase the
Riverpoint One building.
(f) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of North Seattle
Community College for up to $8,900,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to develop an
employment resource center.
(g) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Everett Community
College for up to $25,000,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to develop a student fitness and
health center.
(h) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Wenatchee Valley
Community College for up to $2,700,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase a music and
art center.
(i) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Green River
Community College for up to $20,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to develop a 40,000
square foot addition to Green River Kent station.
(j) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla
Community College for up to $1,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the water and
environment center.
(k) Enter into a financing contract pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
on behalf of Green River Community College for up to $26,532,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves to construct a new classrooms
facility as specified in project 20061205. The cost of this financing
contract shall be paid from the community and technical colleges
capital projects account. This facility shall be eligible for
maintenance and operations funding on the same terms as if constructed
with state general obligation bonds.
(((3))) (2) Parks and recreation commission: Enter into a
financing contract for up to $2,500,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the Mount Spokane
lodge. The parks and recreation commission shall use energy savings
performance contracting if practicable. The lodge shall be operated by
a private concessionaire under a contract with the parks and recreation
commission that is a qualified management contract under the applicable
internal revenue service guidelines.
(((4))) (3) Department of general administration: Enter into a
financing contract for up to $27,144,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the rehabilitation
of the John L. O'Brien building, subject to approval of the project
scope by the speaker of the house of representatives and the chief
clerk of the house of representatives.
(((5))) (4) Department of ecology: Enter into a financing contract
for up to $11,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to rebuild the east wall of the
department of ecology's headquarters building in Lacey, Washington.
(5) Washington State University: Enter into a financing contract
for up to $15,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserve
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for a student information system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6002 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION--ENERGY SAVINGS
PERFORMANCE CONTRACTING. (1) The department of general administration,
in fulfilling its requirement to maintain a registry of energy service
contractors pursuant to RCW 39.35A.050, shall update the preapproved
list of energy services companies that are qualified to provide
services to public facilities in the state by June 30, 2010.
(2) The department of general administration must develop
guidelines that are consistent with national and international energy
savings performance standards for the implementation of energy savings
performance contracting projects June 30, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6003 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT. The office of financial
management budget instructions, required by chapter 43.88 RCW, must
instruct all agencies submitting budget requests for building
renovations and improvements and operating budget requests for facility
leases to conduct preliminary energy audits if proposed renovations or
improvements involve building envelope, heating, ventilating, air
conditioning, controls, and lighting. The budget instructions must
also direct agencies to contact the department of general
administration for assistance, if necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6004 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
DEBT AFFORDABILITY STUDY. The office of the state treasurer shall
prepare a debt affordability study by October 1, 2010, that provides an
assessment of the state's current debt portfolio and an analysis of the
impact of future debt issuance. The study must include but is not
limited to: An overview of the state's outstanding and projected debt;
the structure of the debt portfolio; the cost of existing debt; sources
of funds for interest, principal, or lease payments; and the purposes
for which debt instruments and financing contracts are issued. To
assist with this work, the office of the state treasurer shall convene
and staff a work group to include staff from the fiscal committees of
the state house of representatives and state senate and the office of
financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6005 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
The operating and maintenance costs associated with Tolmie state
park shall be shared equally by Thurston county, the state parks and
recreation commission, and the Nisqually tribe, when a memorandum of
understanding by all parties takes effect, until June 30, 2011. The
state parks and recreation commission shall transfer Tolmie state park
to Thurston county and the Nisqually tribe by June 30, 2011.

Sec. 6006 2008 c 5 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
Pursuant to chapter 43.155 RCW, the following project loans
recommended by the public works board are authorized to be made with
funds appropriated from the public works assistance account, and no
loan authorized in this act shall bear an interest rate greater than
one-half of one percent:
(1) Arlington--sanitary sewer project--expand and upgrade the
wastewater treatment plant and biosolids composting facility to meet
new discharge limitations, produce a higher quality effluent, and
accommodate future growth . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(2) Auburn--street project--reconstruct approximately 0.3 miles of
roadway with four travel lanes to bring up to current arterial and
truck route standards and modify intersection to optimize efficiency
and level of service . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000
(3) Blaine--sanitary sewer project--construct a new wastewater
treatment plant and section of outfall pipe to increase treatment
capacity, produce reuse quality water, and improve Puget Sound water
quality for shellfish . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(4) Bonney Lake--domestic water project--replace approximately
71,000 linear feet of leaky water mains to reduce current water loss by
ten percent . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,352,000
(5) Bonney Lake--sanitary sewer project--replace approximately
12,000 linear feet of failing interceptor sewer pipes . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,648,000
(6) Buckley--sanitary sewer project--rebuild the wastewater
treatment plant to provide nutrient removal and meet state and federal
discharge regulations and the construction of an
interceptor . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
(7) Camas--sanitary sewer project--construct improvements to the
wastewater treatment facilities to provide class A biosolids at the
main sewage pump station . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(8) Clark county--road project--construct new road segments, widen
roadways, improve and redesign intersections, and install and modify
traffic signals necessary to improve a major interchange with two
freeways . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(9) Clark regional wastewater district--sanitary sewer project--modify existing and construct new wastewater facilities to process
approximately 4.65 million gallons more of wastewater per day and
ensure treatment processes continue to be in compliance with current
regulations . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
(10) Coal creek utility district--sanitary sewer project--construct
sewer lift station, approximately 1,250 lineal feet of gravity sewer
main, and 500 feet of force main to provide public sewer to
approximately 25 properties on a lake that have private septic systems
that have failed or are in prefailure status . . . . . . . . . . . . $898,875
(11) College Place--domestic water project--construct two steel
tanks, a booster station, approximately 6,000 feet of transmission
line, 3,400 feet of water mains, three pressure reducing valves, and
associated telemetry to rectify a deficiency in fire flow and standby
water storage protection . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,710,051
(12) Cowlitz county public utility district No. 1--domestic water
project--construction of approximately six new groundwater supply
wells, 2,100 feet of raw water piping a new water treatment plant
producing approximately 20 million gallons per day of potable water,
and approximately 4,350 feet of transmission main to connect to the
system to replace current water supply that is being impacted by
increasing water sediment . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,213,000
(13) Ephrata--domestic water project--replace approximately 68,000
feet of failing water mains, 50,000 feet of failing water service
pipes, and the resurfacing of 20 miles of overlaying roadway, including
approximately 100 fire hydrants, 400 catch basins, 15 storm sewer
drywells, 22,000 feet of curb and gutter, and 16,000 feet of storm
sewer pipe . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,605,727
(14) Freeland water district--domestic water project--connect a new
well and new reservoir to the existing system, rehabilitate the
existing well, and install new equipment to increase system
reliability, redundancy, and capacity. Install new chlorination
equipment to improve water quality . . . . . . . . . . . . $347,516
(15) Gig Harbor--sanitary sewer project--improvements to the
wastewater treatment plant including new equipment and electrical work,
add a third clarifier, install ultraviolet disinfection, and extend and
upsize the outfall . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(16) Highline water district--domestic water project--construction
of 11,350 feet of transmission main and looping of pipes to eliminate
low pressures and fire flows and improve water quality, and create a
new pressure zone to correct high pressures . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,390,418
(17) Karcher creek sewer district--sanitary sewer project--install
a new sewer system, including a lift station and approximately 3,600
lineal feet of sewer main, in conjunction with a road project to
service approximately 17 homes that will lose their septic systems due
to the road project . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,358,130
(18) Kennewick--sanitary sewer project--construct improvements to
critical wastewater treatment plant processes to enhance reliability,
improve energy efficiency and redundancy, as well as increase the
capacity of the sludge pumping station . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,500,000
(19) Kent--street project--construct two bridges, one for the
roadway over a set of railroad tracks, and one for railroad tracks over
a lowered roadway. This will grade separate the tracks from the
roadway to provide safe and reliable operations twenty-four hours a
day . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(20) King county--sanitary sewer project--construct 13,100 lineal
feet of pipe to convey approximately 9 million gallons per day of
reclaimed water to reduce withdrawals of 250-acre feet per year from
the Sammamish river . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
(21) La Center--sanitary sewer project--upgrade wastewater
treatment plant to reduce the levels of nitrogen discharged in the
effluent and approximately doubling the operation of the plant and
producing class A reuse water . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(22) Lake Forest Park water district--domestic water project--replace approximately 6,915 lineal feet of undersized and corroded
water pipes to improve safety and reliability of the system by reducing
pipe failures and increasing fire flow . . . . . . . . . . . . $917,935
(23) Lake Stevens--sanitary sewer project--construct a new
wastewater treatment plant, 9,500 feet of interceptor line, a pump
station, and an outfall pipe in partnership with Lake Stevens sewer
district . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(24) Lake Stevens sewer district--sanitary sewer project--construct
a new wastewater treatment plant, 9,500 feet of interceptor line, a
pump station, and an outfall pipe in partnership with the city of Lake
Stevens . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(25) Lakewood--sanitary sewer project--construct 3 pump stations,
approximately 17,200 linear feet of force mains, 13,500 linear feet of
gravity collector pipe line, and 320 side sewer stubs to service two
neighborhoods currently served exclusively by septic
systems . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,840,000
(26) LOTT alliance--sanitary sewer project--construct approximately
7,400 feet of force main and replace existing pump station with new
1,000 gallon per minute pump station . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,003,807
(27) Mansfield--sanitary sewer project--expand and rehabilitate
wastewater treatment lagoons and effluent spray irrigation system as
well as remove the discharge of groundwater from basement sump pumps to
the collection system . . . . . . . . . . . . $235,600
(28) Midway sewer district--sanitary sewer project--replace
approximately 16,500 lineal feet of sewer mains and 50 manholes to
reduce infiltration and inflow . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,782,500
(29) Mount Vernon--sanitary sewer project--upgrade existing
wastewater treatment plant, including a new pretreatment facility, 4
additional clarifiers, upgrade aeration basins, installation of an
ultraviolet disinfection system, and odor control system . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(30) Newcastle--road project--reconstruct, widen, and signalize
approximately 5,200 linear feet of road to 2 lanes in each direction,
add left turn lanes, sidewalks, bicycle lanes, install lighting
systems, replace two-lane bridge with a four-lane bridge, and install
new traffic signals . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
(31) Olympia--sanitary sewer project--install approximately 6,500
linear feet of sewer mains and construct a lift station to serve 63
homes with failing on-site sewage systems . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,808,375
(32) Olympus Terrace sewer district--sanitary sewer project--rehabilitate approximately 9,350 linear feet of sewer trunkline,
construct approximately 9,800 linear feet of high-flow storm water
bypass piping for excess flow, construct approximately 4,150 linear
feet of road access, and restore creek habitat . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
(33) Omak--sanitary sewer project((--add 2 compost containers,
convert storage tank to sludge holding tank, and install a second
headworks screen to increase the wastewater treatment plant capacity by
35 percent)) . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000
(34) Port Angeles--sanitary sewer project--construct approximately
11,500 feet of sewer main, modify a storage tank, and modify the
wastewater treatment plant . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(35) Regional board of mayors--solid waste project--close landfill
site by capping and sealing with a soil cap . . . . . . . . . . . . $859,500
(36) Regional board of mayors--solid waste project--construct a new
solid waste transfer station, including structures and
equipment . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,541,000
(37) Ronald wastewater district--sanitary sewer project--rehabilitate 2 lift stations by replacing pumps, valves, fittings,
piping, odor control systems, and electrical equipment . . . . . . . . . . . . $955,400
(38) Seattle--domestic water project--replace floating pumps with
land-based pump station with a maximum capacity of approximately 250
million gallons per day, including 8 pumps, concrete structure, a
tunnel, approximately 4,000 feet of pipeline, and a standby
generator. . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(39) Sedro-Woolley--sanitary sewer project--rehabilitate or replace
4 interceptor segments totaling approximately 29,700 linear feet,
install 2 pump stations, and upgrade the secondary clarifier in order
to lift a building moratorium . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,023,491
(40) Shelton--sanitary sewer project--construct a satellite
reclamation plant with a capacity of approximately 0.4 million gallons
per day to produce class A reclaimed water, approximately 22,000 linear
feet of sewer pipelines, and approximately 25,000 linear feet of
reclaimed water force main . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,079,360
(41) Shelton--sanitary sewer project--replace approximately 38,480
linear feet of mainline sewers to reduce inflow and
infiltration . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,737,500
(42) Skagit county sewer district No. 2--sanitary sewer project--upgrade wastewater treatment plant to a water reclamation facility to
provide class A reclaimed water with a capacity of approximately 0.35
million gallons per day . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(43) Snohomish--sanitary sewer project--construct approximately
1,900 feet of sewer pipe, a new pump station with a capacity of
approximately 8,000 gallons per minute, and approximately 4,300 feet of
force main to reduce overflows . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
(44) Snohomish--sanitary sewer project((--upgrade existing
wastewater treatment plant including a new influent flow structure,
screens, aerators, effluent filtration, ultraviolet disinfection,
effluent pump station, improvements to the existing lagoons, and
electrical improvements)) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000
(45) Snohomish county--road project--construct a new, approximately
two-mile, two-lane truck route around the city of Granite Falls,
including 3 roundabouts to improve safety and air quality in the
downtown area . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(46) Southwest Suburban sewer district--sanitary sewer project--replace and/or slipline approximately 5,470 feet of trunk/interceptor
sewer main and construct a new lift station to reduce
overflows . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,268,250
(47) Tacoma--domestic water project--replace 3 open-topped concrete
reservoirs with 2 enclosed concrete reservoirs of approximately 33
million gallons each and related piping to comply with the safe
drinking water act and a bilateral compliance agreement . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(48) Tekoa--sanitary sewer system--reconstruct approximately 1,000
feet of failing sewer line and manholes to reduce significant
groundwater infiltration . . . . . . . . . . . . $135,115
(49) Three rivers regional wastewater authority--sanitary sewer
project--construct 2 clarifiers and associated piping to replace 2
failed clarifiers at the wastewater plant . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,630,750
(50) Washougal--sanitary sewer project--construct a new wastewater
treatment plant headworks, including a fine screen, grit removal, and
replace approximately 150 linear feet of gravity sewer, and make
improvements to the lagoons, including 450 linear feet of piping,
modify overflow structures, and a new pump . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,100,000
(51) Yakima--domestic water project--develop a new, approximately
3,000 gallon per minute, domestic water well, including drilling,
placement of casing, a new pump house, and connection to the existing
water distribution system in order to augment the water supply during
drought conditions . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,257,200
(52) Yakima--street project--construct 2 underpasses and
reconstruct 3 lanes on each roadway under a railroad mainline to
accommodate additional rail and reduce traffic and emergency response
delays and air pollution . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Sec. 6007 RCW 43.155.050 and 2009 c 564 s 940 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The public works assistance account is hereby established in
the state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance
account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature
or from any other lawful source. Money in the public works assistance
account shall be used to make loans and to give financial guarantees to
local governments for public works projects. Moneys in the account may
also be appropriated to provide for state match requirements under
federal law for projects and activities conducted and financed by the
board under the drinking water assistance account. Not more than
fifteen percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the
public works board from this account may be expended or obligated for
preconstruction loans, emergency loans, or loans for capital facility
planning under this chapter; of this amount, not more than ten percent
of the biennial capital budget appropriation may be expended for
emergency loans and not more than one percent of the biennial capital
budget appropriation may be expended for capital facility planning
loans. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the public works assistance account to the general fund
and the city-county assistance account such amounts as reflect the
excess fund balance of the account. During the 2009-2011 fiscal
biennium, sums in the public works assistance account may be used for
the water pollution control revolving fund program match in section
3019 of this act.
(2) The job development fund is hereby established in the state
treasury. Moneys in the job development fund may be spent only after
appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6008 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER--TRANSFERS
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to the
State General Fund for fiscal year 2010 . . . . . . . . . . . . $87,000,000
Washington State Heritage Center Account: For transfer
to the Thurston County Capital Facilities Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,700,000

Sec. 6009 RCW 43.160.080 and 2008 c 327 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
There shall be a fund in the state treasury known as the public
facilities construction loan revolving account, which shall consist of
all moneys collected under this chapter and any moneys appropriated to
it by law. Disbursements from the revolving account shall be on
authorization of the board. In order to maintain an effective
expenditure and revenue control, the public facilities construction
loan revolving account shall be subject in all respects to chapter
43.88 RCW. During the 2009-2011 biennium, sums in the public
facilities construction loan revolving account may be used for the
temporary public works grant program in section 1016 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6010 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
In developing its capital budget request for the 2011-13 biennium,
the department of natural resources shall develop a prioritization
process for purchasing easements currently eligible for purchase under
the forest riparian easement program. The process should prioritize
easements for landowners who: (1) Have the greatest proportion of
riparian management zones in their total aggregated ownership; (2) are
under the greatest pressures to convert their lands to nonforest land
use; and (3) provide the greatest ecological benefits from these
easements. By October 1, 2010, the department shall deliver to the
governor and the legislature policy recommendations to reflect this
prioritization process in statute.

Sec. 6011 2009 c 497 s 6004 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
(1) The office of financial management may ((authorize a)) transfer
((of)) appropriation authority provided for a capital project that is
in excess of the amount required for the completion of ((such)) the
project ((to another capital project for which the appropriation is
insufficient. No such transfer may be used to expand the capacity of
any facility beyond that intended in making the appropriation. Such
transfers may be effected only between capital appropriations to a
specific department, commission, agency, or institution of higher
education and only between capital projects that are funded from the
same fund or account. No transfers may occur between projects to local
government agencies except where the grants are provided within a
single omnibus appropriation and where such transfers are specifically
authorized by the implementing statutes that govern the grants.
(2) The office of financial management may find that an amount is
in excess of the amount required for the completion of a project only
if: (a) The project as defined in the notes to the budget document is
substantially complete and there are funds remaining; or (b) bids have
been let on a project and it appears to a substantial certainty that
the project as defined in the notes to the budget document can be
completed within the biennium for less than the amount appropriated in
this act.
(3))), based on the authorized scope, to the risk pool in section
1020.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the intent is that each
project be defined as proposed to the legislature in the governor's
budget document, unless it clearly appears from the legislative history
that the legislature intended to define the scope of a project in a
different way.
(((4) Transfers of funds to an agency's infrastructure savings
appropriation are subject to review and approval by the office of
financial management. Expenditures from an infrastructure savings
appropriation are limited to projects that have a primary purpose to
correct infrastructure deficiencies or conditions that: (a) Adversely
affect the ability to utilize the infrastructure for its current
programmatic use; (b) reduce the life expectancy of the infrastructure;
or (c) increase the operating costs of the infrastructure for its
current programmatic use. Eligible infrastructure projects may include
structures and surface improvements, site amenities, utility systems
outside building footprints and natural environmental changes or
requirements as part of an environmental regulation, a declaration of
emergency for an infrastructure issue in conformance with RCW
43.88.250, or infrastructure planning as part of a facility master
plan.
(5) A report of any transfer effected under this section, except
emergency projects or any transfer under $250,000, shall be filed with
the legislative fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives by the office of financial management at least thirty
days before the date the transfer is effected. The office of financial
management shall report all emergency or smaller transfers within
thirty days from the date of transfer.))
(3) The office of financial management shall not allot any portion
of a capital budget appropriation for: (a) Contingencies above the
amount required for completion of a project as described in budget
documents submitted as part of the governor's capital budget request or
consistent with legislative history; (b) proposed alternates submitted
in bid documents if agencies cannot document a programmatic need and an
operational budget savings resulting from the completion of the
alternate project component that would pay for the cost of the
alternate within eight years; or (c) for any equipment costs or project
scope beyond what was described in the budget documents submitted as
part of the governor's capital budget request.
(4) The office of financial management shall submit a monthly
report of approved allotments, subject to this section, by project.
The report shall include the accepted base bid and any approved
alternates with the analysis demonstrating sufficient operational
budget savings.

Sec. 6012 RCW 43.07.129 and 2007 c 523 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
The Washington state heritage center account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All moneys received under RCW
36.18.010(11) and 43.07.128 must be deposited in the account.
Expenditures from the account may be made only for the following
purposes:
(1) Payment of the certificate of participation issued for the
Washington state heritage center;
(2) Capital maintenance of the Washington state heritage center;
and
(3) Program operations that serve the public, relate to the
collections and exhibits housed in the Washington state heritage
center, or fulfill the missions of the state archives, state library,
and capital museum.
Only the secretary of state or the secretary of state's designee
may authorize expenditures from the account. An appropriation is not
required for expenditures, but the account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. During the 2009-2011 fiscal
biennium, the legislature may transfer from the heritage center account
to the Thurston county capital facilities account such amounts as
reflect excess fund balance in the account.

Sec. 6013 RCW 43.63A.510 and 1993 c 461 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall work with ((the departments of natural
resources, transportation, social and health services, corrections, and
general administration)) state and local governmental entities to
identify and catalog surplus or underutilized((, state-owned land and
property)) real property owned by these governmental entities suitable
for the development of affordable housing for extremely low-income,
very low-income, low-income, or moderate-income households. The state
and local governmental entities subject to the requirements of this
section are the departments of natural resources, transportation,
social and health services, corrections, ((and)) general administration
((shall)), and public lands, and the state parks and recreation
commission, counties, cities, and towns. These governmental entities
must provide an inventory of surplus or underutilized real property
that is owned or administered by each ((agency)) governmental entity
and is available for lease or sale. Each inventory must contain
descriptive information about each property that includes, if known,
the contact information for the property and the location, approximate
size, sale or lease price and terms, and current zoning classification
of the property. Each inventory must be updated at least once a year,
and printed and electronic copies of each inventory must be provided
upon request. The inventories ((shall)) must be provided to the
department by November 1, ((1993)) 2010, with inventory revisions
provided each November 1st thereafter.
(2) Surplus property for sale by the governmental entities subject
to the requirements of this section, and which is suitable for the
development of affordable housing, must be offered for at least the
first one hundred eighty days after its availability for sale,
exclusively to eligible organizations, for the purpose of developing
affordable housing. Eligible organizations have the right of first
opportunity to obtain these surplus properties by purchase, lease,
exchange, or donation, under reasonable option and conveyance
conditions, in return for a commitment to provide affordable housing
for at least thirty years. Governmental entities subject to this
section have the sole authority to determine: (a) Whether or not
property is surplus; (b) whether or not the property is suitable for
the development of affordable housing for extremely low-income, very
low-income, and low-income persons or families; and (c) what
constitutes reasonable option and conveyance conditions for the
purchase, lease, exchange, or donation of the property.
(3) A governmental entity that sells real property to an eligible
entity under this section may do so at a price that is less than fair
market value, provided that the affordable housing developed on the
property is occupied solely by individuals or families who are
extremely low, very low, or low income.
(4) Each governmental entity subject to the requirements of this
section must develop the criteria and procedures necessary for
inventorying surplus property and offering it for sale, lease,
exchange, or donation to eligible organizations.
(5) The department must present a written report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year regarding
the status of the surplus or underutilized real property inventory as
required under this section, and which must include a comprehensive
listing of all real property subject to the inventory during the
preceding year.
(6) Upon written request, the department shall provide a copy of
the inventory of state-owned and publicly owned lands and buildings to
parties interested in developing ((the sites)) property for affordable
housing.
(((3))) (7) As used in this section:
(a) "Affordable housing" means residential housing that is rented
or owned by a person who qualifies as ((a)) an extremely low-income,
very low-income, low-income, or moderate-income household or who is
from a special needs population, and whose monthly housing costs,
including utilities other than telephone, do not exceed thirty percent
of the household's monthly income.
(b) "Very low-income household" means a single person, family, or
unrelated persons living together whose income is at or below fifty
percent of the median income, adjusted for household size, for the
county where the affordable housing is located.
(c) "Low-income household" means a single person, family, or
unrelated persons living together whose income is more than fifty
percent but is at or below eighty percent of the median income where
the affordable housing is located.
(d) "Moderate-income household" means a single person, family, or
unrelated persons living together whose income is more than eighty
percent but is at or below one hundred fifteen percent of the median
income where the affordable housing is located.
(e) "Eligible organization" means any city, town, or county
government, local housing authority, public development authority,
community renewal agency, regional support network established under
chapter 71.24 RCW, nonprofit community or neighborhood-based
organization, federally recognized Indian tribe in the state of
Washington, or regional or statewide nonprofit housing assistance
organization, each having experience in the development of affordable
housing.
(f) "Real property" means land, buildings, or buildings and land.
(g) "Extremely low-income household" means a single person, family,
or unrelated persons living together whose income is at or below thirty
percent of the median income, adjusted for household size, for the
county where the affordable housing is located.

Sec. 6014 RCW 47.12.063 and 2006 c 17 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature to continue the
department's policy giving priority consideration to abutting property
owners in agricultural areas when disposing of property through its
surplus property program under this section. With respect to surplus
property in nonagricultural areas that is suitable for residential use,
the department shall give priority to selling, leasing, exchanging, or
donating the property to a public entity or private nonprofit entity
dedicated to the development of affordable housing for extremely low-income, very low-income, low-income, or moderate-income households,
consistent with the requirements of this section and RCW 43.63A.510.
(2) Whenever the department determines that any real property owned
by the state of Washington and under the jurisdiction of the department
is no longer required for transportation purposes and that it is in the
public interest to do so, the department may sell, lease, or exchange
the property or exchange it in full or part consideration for land or
improvements or for construction of improvements ((at fair market value
to)). Except as authorized in (j) of this subsection, the department
must receive fair market value for any such sale, lease, or exchange.
The department may engage in the sale, lease, or exchange of its
surplus property with any of the following governmental entities or
persons:
(a) Any other state agency;
(b) The city or county in which the property is situated;
(c) Any other municipal corporation;
(d) Regional transit authorities created under chapter 81.112 RCW;
(e) The former owner of the property from whom the state acquired
title;
(f) In the case of residentially improved property, a tenant of the
department who has resided thereon for not less than six months and who
is not delinquent in paying rent to the state;
(g) Any abutting private owner but only after each other abutting
private owner (if any), as shown in the records of the county assessor,
is notified in writing of the proposed sale. If more than one abutting
private owner requests in writing the right to purchase the property
within fifteen days after receiving notice of the proposed sale, the
property shall be sold at public auction in the manner provided in RCW
47.12.283;
(h) To any person through the solicitation of written bids through
public advertising in the manner prescribed by RCW 47.28.050;
(i) To any other owner of real property required for transportation
purposes;
(j) In the case of property suitable for residential use, any
nonprofit organization dedicated to providing affordable housing to
extremely low-income, very low-income, low-income, and moderate-income
households as defined in RCW 43.63A.510 and is eligible to receive
assistance through the Washington housing trust fund created in chapter
43.185 RCW. The department may sell, lease, exchange, or donate the
property for less than fair market value under this subsection (2)(j)
if the affordable housing to be developed on the property is to be
occupied exclusively by extremely low-income, very low-income, or low-income households as provided in RCW 43.63A.510; or
(k) A federally recognized Indian tribe within whose reservation
boundary the property is located.
(3) Sales to purchasers may at the department's option be for cash,
by real estate contract, or exchange of land or improvements.
Transactions involving the construction of improvements must be
conducted pursuant to chapter 47.28 RCW or Title 39 RCW, as applicable,
and must comply with all other applicable laws and rules.
(4) Conveyances made pursuant to this section shall be by deed
executed by the secretary of transportation and shall be duly
acknowledged.
(5) Unless otherwise provided, all moneys received pursuant to the
provisions of this section less any real estate broker commissions paid
pursuant to RCW 47.12.320 shall be deposited in the motor vehicle fund.

Sec. 6015 RCW 47.12.064 and 1995 c 399 s 121 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In accordance with RCW 43.63A.510, the department shall
identify and catalog real property that is no longer required for
department purposes and is suitable for the development of affordable
housing for extremely low-income, very low-income, low-income, and
moderate-income households as defined in RCW 43.63A.510. The inventory
shall include the location, approximate size, and current zoning
classification of the property. The department shall provide a copy of
the inventory to the department of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce by November 1, ((1993)) 2010, and every November
1st thereafter.
(2) By November 1st of each year, beginning in ((1994)) 2011, the
department shall purge the inventory of real property of sites that are
no longer available for the development of affordable housing. The
department shall include an updated listing of real property that has
become available since the last update. As used in this section, "real
property" means buildings, land, or buildings and land.

Sec. 6016 RCW 43.20A.037 and 1995 c 399 s 65 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In accordance with RCW 43.63A.510, the department shall
identify and catalog real property that is no longer required for
department purposes and is suitable for the development of affordable
housing for extremely low-income, very low-income, and moderate-income
households as defined in RCW 43.63A.510. The inventory shall include
the location, approximate size, and current zoning classification of
the property. The department shall provide a copy of the inventory to
the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))
commerce by November 1, ((1993)) 2010, and every November 1st
thereafter.
(2) By November 1st of each year, beginning in ((1994)) 2011, the
department shall purge the inventory of real property of sites that are
no longer available for the development of affordable housing. The
department shall include an updated listing of real property that has
become available since the last update. As used in this section, "real
property" means buildings, land, or buildings and land.
(3) In selling, transferring, or otherwise disposing of surplus or
under utilized property, the department shall give priority to selling,
leasing, exchanging, or donating the property to a public or private
entity dedicated to the development of affordable housing for extremely
low-income, very low-income, low-income, or moderate-income households,
consistent with RCW 43.63A.510. The department may sell, lease,
exchange, or donate the property for less than fair market value if the
affordable housing to be developed on the property is to be occupied
exclusively by extremely low-income, very low-income, or low-income
households as provided in RCW 43.63A.510.

Sec. 6017 RCW 72.09.055 and 1995 c 399 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In accordance with RCW 43.63A.510, the department shall
identify and catalog real property that is no longer required for
department purposes and is suitable for the development of affordable
housing for extremely low-income, very low-income, low-income, and
moderate-income households as defined in RCW 43.63A.510. The inventory
shall include the location, approximate size, and current zoning
classification of the property. The department shall provide a copy of
the inventory to the department of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce by November 1, ((1993)) 2010, and every November
1st thereafter.
(2) By November 1st of each year, beginning in ((1994)) 2011, the
department shall purge the inventory of real property of sites that are
no longer available for the development of affordable housing. The
department shall include an updated listing of real property that has
become available since the last update. As used in this section, "real
property" means buildings, land, or buildings and land.
(3) In selling, transferring, or otherwise disposing of surplus or
under utilized property, the department shall give priority to selling,
leasing, exchanging, or donating the property to a public or private
entity dedicated to the development of affordable housing for very low-income, low-income, or moderate-income households, consistent with RCW
43.63A.510. The department may sell, lease, exchange, or donate the
property for less than fair market value if the affordable housing to
be developed on the property is to be occupied exclusively by extremely
low-income, very low-income, or low-income households as provided in
RCW 43.63A.510.

Sec. 6018 RCW 43.19.19201 and 1995 c 399 s 64 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In accordance with RCW 43.63A.510, the department of general
administration shall identify and catalog real property that is no
longer required for department purposes and is suitable for the
development of affordable housing for extremely low-income, very low-income, low-income, and moderate-income households as defined in RCW
43.63A.510. The inventory shall include the location, approximate
size, and current zoning classification of the property. The
department of general administration shall provide a copy of the
inventory to the department of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce by November 1, ((1993)) 2010, and every November
1st thereafter.
(2) By November 1st of each year, beginning in ((1994)) 2011, the
department of general administration shall purge the inventory of real
property of sites that are no longer available for the development of
affordable housing. The department shall include an updated listing of
real property that has become available since the last update. As used
in this section, "real property" means buildings, land, or buildings
and land.
(3) In selling, transferring, or otherwise disposing of surplus or
under utilized property, the department shall give priority to selling,
leasing, exchanging, or donating the property to a public or private
entity dedicated to the development of affordable housing for extremely
low-income, very low-income, low-income, or moderate-income households,
consistent with RCW 43.63A.510. The department may sell, lease,
exchange, or donate the property for less than fair market value if the
affordable housing to be developed on the property is to be occupied
exclusively by extremely low-income, very low-income, or low-income
households as provided in RCW 43.63A.510.

Sec. 6019 RCW 79A.05.170 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 23 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) In selling, transferring, or otherwise disposing of surplus or
underutilized real property, the commission shall give priority to
selling, leasing, exchanging, or donating the property to a public or
private entity dedicated to the development of affordable housing for
extremely low-income, very low-income, low-income, or moderate-income
households, consistent with RCW 43.63A.510. The commission may sell,
lease, exchange, or donate the property for less than fair market value
if the affordable housing to be developed on the property is to be
occupied exclusively by extremely low-income, very low-income, or low-income households as provided in RCW 43.63A.510.
(2) Except for those lands subject to RCW 43.63A.510, any lands
owned by the ((state parks and recreation)) commission, which are
determined to be surplus to the needs of the state for development for
state park purposes and which the commission proposes to deed to a
local government or other entity, shall be accompanied by a clause
requiring that if the land is not used for outdoor recreation purposes,
ownership of the land shall revert to the ((state parks and
recreation)) commission.
(((2) The state parks and recreation commission,)) (a) In cases
where land subject to such a reversionary clause is proposed for use or
disposal for purposes other than recreation, the commission shall
require that, if the land is surplus to the needs of the commission for
park purposes at the time the commission becomes aware of its proposed
use for nonrecreation purposes, the holder of the land or property
shall reimburse the commission for the release of the reversionary
interest in the land. The reimbursement shall be in the amount of the
fair market value of the reversionary interest as determined by a
qualified appraiser agreeable to the commission. Appraisal costs shall
be borne by the local entity which holds title to the land.
(((3))) (b) Any funds generated under a reimbursement under this
section shall be deposited in the parkland acquisition account which is
hereby created in the state treasury. Moneys in this account are to be
used solely for the purchase or acquisition of property for use as
state park property by the commission, as directed by the legislature;
all such funds shall be subject to legislative appropriation.
(3) In accordance with RCW 43.63A.510, the commission shall
identify and catalog real property that is no longer required for
commission purposes and is suitable for the development of affordable
housing for extremely low-income, very low-income, low-income, and
moderate-income households as defined in RCW 43.63A.510. The inventory
must include the location, approximate size, and current zoning
classification of the property. The commission shall provide a copy of
the inventory to the department of commerce by November 1, 2010, and
every November 1st thereafter. By November 1st of each year, beginning
in 2011, the commission shall purge the inventory of real property of
sites that are no longer available for the development of affordable
housing. The commission shall include an updated listing of real
property that has become available since the last update. As used in
this section, "real property" means buildings, land, or buildings and
land.

Sec. 6020 RCW 79A.05.175 and 2007 c 145 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except for those lands subject to RCW 43.63A.510 and 79A.05.170(1),
whenever the commission finds that any land under its control cannot
advantageously be used for park purposes, it is authorized to dispose
of such land by the method provided in this section or by the method
provided in RCW 79A.05.170. If such lands are school or other grant
lands, control thereof shall be relinquished by resolution of the
commission to the proper state officials. If such lands were acquired
under restrictive conveyances by which the state may hold them only so
long as they are used for park purposes, they may be returned to the
donor or grantors by the commission. All other such lands may be
either sold by the commission to the highest bidder or exchanged for
other lands of equal value by the commission, and all conveyance
documents shall be executed by the governor. All such exchanges shall
be accompanied by a transfer fee, to be set by the commission and paid
by the other party to the transfer; such fee shall be paid into the
parkland acquisition account established under RCW 79A.05.170. The
commission may accept sealed bids, electronic bids, or oral bids at
auction. Bids on all sales shall be solicited at least twenty days in
advance of the sale date by an advertisement appearing at least once a
week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in
the county in which the land to be sold is located. If the commission
feels that no bid received adequately reflects the fair value of the
land to be sold, it may reject all bids, and may call for new bids.
All proceeds derived from the sale of such park property shall be paid
into the park land acquisition account. All land considered for
exchange shall be evaluated by the commission to determine its
adaptability to park usage. The equal value of all lands exchanged
shall first be determined by the appraisals to the satisfaction of the
commission. No sale or exchange of state park lands shall be made
without the unanimous consent of the commission.

Sec. 6021 RCW 36.34.137 and 1993 c 461 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In selling, transferring, or otherwise disposing of surplus or
underutilized real property, every county shall give priority to
selling, leasing, exchanging, or donating the property to a public or
private entity dedicated to the development of affordable housing for
extremely low-income, very low-income, low-income, or moderate-income
households, consistent with RCW 43.63A.510. A county may sell, lease
exchange, or donate the property for less than fair market value if the
affordable housing to be developed on the property is to be occupied
exclusively by extremely low-income, very low-income, or low-income
households as provided in RCW 43.63A.510.
(2) In accordance with RCW 43.63A.510, every county shall identify
and catalog real property owned by the county that is no longer
required for its purposes and is suitable for the development of
affordable housing for extremely low-income, very low-income, low-income, and moderate-income households as defined in RCW 43.63A.510.
The inventory shall include the location, approximate size, and current
zoning classification of the property. Every county shall provide a
copy of the inventory to the department of ((community development))
commerce by November 1, ((1993)) 2010, with inventory revisions each
November 1st thereafter.
(((2))) (3) By November 1st of each year, beginning in ((1994))
2011, every county shall purge the inventory of real property of sites
that are no longer available for the development of affordable housing.
The inventory revision shall include an updated listing of real
property that has become available since the last update. As used in
this section, "real property" means buildings, land, or buildings and
land.

Sec. 6022 RCW 35.21.687 and 1995 c 399 s 37 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In selling, transferring, or otherwise disposing of surplus or
underutilized real property, every city and town, including every code
city operating under Title 35A RCW, shall give priority to selling,
leasing, exchanging, or donating the property to a public or private
entity dedicated to the development of affordable housing for extremely
low-income, very low-income, low-income, or moderate-income households,
consistent with RCW 43.63A.510. A city, town, or code city may sell,
lease, exchange, or donate the property for less than fair market value
if the affordable housing to be developed on the property is to be
occupied exclusively by extremely low-income, very low-income, or low-income households as provided in RCW 43.63A.510.
(2) In accordance with RCW 43.63A.510, every city and town,
including every code city operating under Title 35A RCW, shall identify
and catalog real property owned by the city or town that is no longer
required for its purposes and is suitable for the development of
affordable housing for extremely low-income, very low-income, low-income, and moderate-income households as defined in RCW 43.63A.510.
The inventory shall include the location, approximate size, and current
zoning classification of the property. Every city and town shall
provide a copy of the inventory to the department of ((community,
trade, and economic development)) commerce by November 1, ((1993))
2010, with inventory revisions each November 1st thereafter.
(((2))) (3) By November 1st of each year, beginning in ((1994))
2011, every city and town, including every code city operating under
Title 35A RCW, shall purge the inventory of real property of sites that
are no longer available for the development of affordable housing. The
inventory revision shall also contain a list of real property that has
become available since the last update. As used in this section, "real
property" means buildings, land, or buildings and land.

Sec. 6023 RCW 79.11.005 and 2003 c 334 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to RCW 43.63A.510, the department is authorized to sell
any real property not designated or acquired as state forest lands, but
acquired by the state, either in the name of the forest board, the
forestry board, or the division of forestry, for administrative sites,
lien foreclosures, or other purposes whenever it shall determine that
the lands are no longer or not necessary for public use.
(2) In selling, transferring, or otherwise disposing of surplus or
underutilized real property, the department shall give priority to
selling, leasing, exchanging, or donating the property to a public or
private entity dedicated to the development of affordable housing for
extremely low-income, very low-income, low-income, or moderate-income
households, consistent with RCW 43.63A.510. The department may sell,
lease, exchange, or donate the property for less than fair market value
if the affordable housing to be developed on the property is to be
occupied exclusively by extremely low-income, very low-income, or low-income households as provided in RCW 43.63A.510.
(3) Except as otherwise provided under RCW 43.63A.510, the sale may
be made after public notice to the highest bidder for such a price as
approved by the governor, but not less than the fair market value of
the real property, plus the value of improvements thereon. Any
instruments necessary to convey title must be executed by the governor
in a form approved by the attorney general.
(((3))) (4) All amounts received from the sale must be credited to
the fund of the department of government that is responsible for the
acquisition and maintenance of the property sold.
(5) In accordance with RCW 43.63A.510, the department shall
identify and catalog real property owned by the county that is no
longer required for its purposes and is suitable for the development of
affordable housing for extremely low-income, very low-income, low-income, and moderate-income households as defined in RCW 43.63A.510.
The inventory must include the location, approximate size, and current
zoning classification of the property. The department shall provide a
copy of the inventory to the department of commerce by November 1,
2010, with inventory revisions each November 1st thereafter.
(6) By November 1st of each year, beginning in 2011, the department
shall purge the inventory of real property of sites that are no longer
available for the development of affordable housing. The inventory
revision must include an updated listing of real property that has
become available since the last update. As used in this section, "real
property" means buildings, land, or buildings and land.

Sec. 6024 RCW 79.22.060 and 2009 c 354 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) With the approval of the board and subject to RCW 43.63A.510,
the department may directly transfer or dispose of state forest lands
without public auction, if the lands:
(a) Consist of ten contiguous acres or less;
(b) Have a value of twenty-five thousand dollars or less; or
(c) Are located in a county with a population of twenty-five
thousand or less and are encumbered with timber harvest deferrals,
associated with wildlife species listed under the federal endangered
species act, greater than thirty years in length.
(2) Disposal under this section may only occur in the following
circumstances:
(a) Transfers in lieu of condemnation;
(b) Transfers to resolve trespass and property ownership disputes;
or
(c) In counties with a population of twenty-five thousand or less,
transfers to public agencies.
(3) Except as otherwise provided under RCW 43.63A.510 and
79.11.005(2), real property to be transferred or disposed of under this
section shall be transferred or disposed of only after appraisal and
for at least fair market value, and only if the transaction is in the
best interest of the state or affected trust. Valuable materials
attached to lands transferred to public agencies under subsection
(2)(c) of this section must be appraised at the fair market value
without consideration of management or regulatory encumbrances
associated with wildlife species listed under the federal endangered
species act.
(4) The proceeds from real property transferred or disposed of
under this section shall be deposited into the park land trust
revolving fund and be solely used to buy replacement land within the
same county as the property transferred or disposed. In counties with
a population of twenty-five thousand or less, the portion of the
proceeds associated with valuable materials on the transferred land
must be distributed as provided in RCW 79.64.110.
(5) In selling, transferring, or otherwise disposing of surplus or
underutilized property, the department shall give priority to selling,
leasing, exchanging, or donating the property to a public or private
entity dedicated to the development of affordable housing for extremely
low-income, very low-income, low-income, or moderate-income households,
consistent with RCW 43.63A.510. The department may sell, lease,
exchange, or donate the property for less than fair market value if the
affordable housing to be developed on the property is to be occupied
exclusively by extremely low-income, very low-income, or low-income
households as provided in RCW 43.63A.510.
(6) In accordance with RCW 43.63A.510, the department shall
identify and catalog real property that is no longer required for
department purposes and is suitable for the development of affordable
housing for extremely low-income, very low-income, low-income, and
moderate-income households as defined in RCW 43.63A.510. The inventory
must include the location, approximate size, and current zoning
classification of the property. The department shall provide a copy of
the inventory to the department of commerce by November 1, 2010, and
every November 1st thereafter.
(7) By November 1st of each year, beginning in 2011, the department
shall purge the inventory of real property of sites that are no longer
available for the development of affordable housing. The department
shall include an updated listing of real property that has become
available since the last update. As used in this section, "real
property" means buildings, land, or buildings and land.

Sec. 6025 RCW 43.180.160 and 2009 c 291 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The total amount of outstanding indebtedness of the commission
may not exceed six billion dollars at any time. The calculation of
outstanding indebtedness shall include the initial principal amount of
an issue and shall not include interest that is either currently
payable or that accrues as a part of the face amount of an issue
payable at maturity or earlier redemption. Outstanding indebtedness
shall not include notes or bonds as to which the obligation of the
commission has been satisfied and discharged by refunding or for which
payment has been provided by reserves or otherwise.
(2)(a) The Washington works housing program is created to increase
opportunities for nonprofit organizations and public agencies to
purchase, acquire, build, and own real property to be used for
affordable housing for low and moderate-income households. The
Washington works housing program is intended to provide access to new
funding mechanisms and build long-term community equity by increasing
the stock of permanently affordable housing owned by nonprofit
organizations and public agencies.
(b) The Washington works housing program is intended to provide
these opportunities for public agencies and nonprofit organizations,
including those materially participating as a managing member or
general partner of a partnership, limited liability company, or
equivalent organization, through the issuance of tax exempt or taxable
revenue bonds issued by the commission in conjunction with a subsidy
necessary to make bond issues to finance affordable housing properties
financially feasible. The program is intended to provide financing for
affordable housing that will meet the following income and rent
restrictions during the period of initial bond indebtedness and
thereafter:
(c) During the period of initial bond indebtedness under the
program, the owner of the property must meet one of the following
requirements: A minimum of twenty percent of the units will be
occupied by households earning less than fifty percent of area median
income and an additional thirty-one percent of the units will be
occupied by persons earning less than eighty percent of area median
income; or forty percent of the units will be occupied by households
earning less than sixty percent of area median income and an additional
eleven percent of the units will be occupied by households earning less
than eighty percent of area median income.
(d) After the initial bond indebtedness is retired, the rents
charged for units in the project will be adjusted to be sufficient to
pay reasonable operation and maintenance expenses, including necessary
capital needs, and to make reasonable deposits into a reserve account
with the intent of providing affordable housing to very low or low-income households for the remaining useful life of the property. The
reasonableness of the rent levels must be periodically approved by the
commission based on information provided by the owner of the property
about income, expenses, and necessary reserve levels. The
determination of the commission regarding the reasonableness of the
rent levels will be final.
(e) The commission will enter into a recorded regulatory agreement
with the borrower at the time of the issuance of bonds under the
program for the purpose of ensuring that the property will meet the
income and rent restrictions established in this section. The
commission may charge such compliance fees as necessary to ensure
enforcement of the income and rent restrictions during the useful life
of the property.
(3) One billion dollars of the outstanding indebtedness of the
commission is for the primary purpose of implementing the Washington
works housing program.
(4) If no subsidies are available to make the program in subsection
(2) of this section feasible; then the commission may pass a resolution
stating these facts and authorize the use of a portion of the one
billion dollars of indebtedness intended for the program to support its
other bond programs until such time as the one billion dollars is
exhausted or subsidies are available to make the program feasible.

Sec. 6026 RCW 39.86.100 and 2001 c 330 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The federal ((tax reform act)) internal revenue code of 1986, as
amended imposes ((an annual)) ceilings on the aggregate amount of
((federally tax-exempt private activity)) certain types of bonds,
including tax-exempt private activity bonds ((for housing, student
loans, exempt facilities, small issue industrial, redevelopment, and
certain public utility projects)) and other types, that may be issued
during any calendar year by or on behalf of states and their political
subdivisions. ((In 2001, the ceiling will be increased to sixty-two
dollars and fifty cents per capita and in 2002 the ceiling will be
increased to seventy-five dollars per capita, to be indexed annually,
for 2003 and every year thereafter. However, a study by the department
of community development indicates that the dollar amount of the state
ceiling is considerably less than the anticipated dollar amount for
which issuers would need an allocation from the state ceiling.)) The
((tax reform act of 1986)) code provides a formula for allocating the
annual tax-exempt private activity bond ceiling among various issuers
of private activity bonds for housing, student loans, exempt
facilities, and redevelopment projects within a state, but permits each
state to enact a different allocation method that is appropriate to
that state's needs. In addition, congress might, from time to time,
amend the code by authorizing state ceilings on additional types of
bonds. The purpose of this chapter is to provide a flexible and
efficient method of allocating the annual state ceiling in Washington
in a manner that recognizes the need of the state and its political
subdivisions to finance activities or projects that satisfy a
substantial public purpose.

Sec. 6027 RCW 39.86.110 and 2009 c 565 s 23 are each reenacted
and amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agency" means the department of commerce.
(2) (("Board" means the community economic revitalization board
established under chapter 43.160 RCW.
(3))) "Bond use category" means: (a) Any of the following
categories of bonds which are subject to the annual state tax-exempt
private activity bond ceiling: (((a))) (i) Housing, (((b) student
loans, (c))) (ii) small issue, (((d))) (iii) exempt facility, (((e)))
(iv) redevelopment, (((f) public utility; and (g))) and (v) remainder;
and (b) any other categories of bonds described in the code for which
there is a separate ceiling, with the exception of bonds designated
solely for school district purposes.
(((4))) (3) "Bonds" means bonds, notes, or other obligations of an
issuer.
(((5))) (4) "Carryforward" is an allocation or reallocation of the
state ceiling which is carried from one calendar year to a later year,
in accordance with the code.
(((6))) (5) "Code" means the federal internal revenue code of 1986
((as it exists on May 8, 1987. It also means the code as amended after
May 8, 1987, but only if the amendments are approved by the agency
under RCW 39.86.180)), as amended.
(((7))) (6) "Director" means the director of the agency or the
director's designee.
(((8))) (7) "Exempt facility" means the bond use category which
includes all bonds which are exempt facility bonds as described in the
code, except those for qualified residential rental projects.
(((9))) (8) "Firm and convincing evidence" means documentation that
satisfies the director that the issuer is committed to the prompt
financing of, and will issue ((tax exempt)) bonds for, the project or
program for which it requests an allocation from the state ceiling.
(((10))) (9) "Housing" means the bond use category which includes:
(a) Mortgage revenue bonds and mortgage credit certificates as
described in the code; and (b) exempt facility bonds for qualified
residential rental projects as described in the code.
(((11))) (10) "Initial allocation" means the portion or dollar
value of the annual state tax-exempt private activity bond ceiling
which initially in each calendar year is allocated to a bond use
category for the issuance of private activity bonds, in accordance with
RCW 39.86.120.
(((12))) (11) "Issuer" means the state, any agency or
instrumentality of the state, any political subdivision, or any other
entity authorized to issue ((private activity)) bonds under state law.
(12) "Original allocation" means any allocation of bond authority
by a mandatory formula in the code, except for the initial allocations
of the annual state ceiling on tax-exempt private activity bonds.
(13) "Private activity bonds" means obligations that are private
activity bonds as defined in the code or bonds for purposes described
in section 1317(25) of the ((tax reform act)) federal internal revenue
code of 1986, as amended.
(14) "Program" means the activities for which housing bonds ((or
student loan bonds)) may be issued.
(15) (("Public utility" means the bond use category which includes
those bonds described in section 1317(25) of the tax reform act of
1986.
(16))) "Redevelopment" means the bond use category which includes
qualified redevelopment bonds as described in the code.
(((17))) (16) "Remainder" means that portion of the annual state
tax-exempt private activity bond ceiling remaining after initial
allocations are made under RCW 39.86.120 for any other bond use
category.
(((18))) (17) "Small issue" means the bond use category which
includes all industrial development bonds that constitute qualified
small issue bonds, as described in the code.
(((19))) (18) "State" means the state of Washington.
(((20))) (19) "State ceiling" means the volume limitation for each
calendar year on ((tax-exempt private activity)) specific bond((s))
types, including tax-exempt private activity bonds and other bonds, as
imposed by the code.
(((21) "Student loans" means the bond use category which includes
qualified student loan bonds as described in the code.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6028 A new section is added to chapter 39.86
RCW to read as follows:
Original allocations or any reallocations of state bond ceilings
other than the tax-exempt private activity bond ceiling must be
determined by formula as provided in the code, or by department rule if
no formula is provided in the code.

Sec. 6029 RCW 39.86.120 and 2001 c 330 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (4) of this section,
the initial allocation of the state ceiling shall be for each year as
follows:

BOND USE
CATEGORY
((2001
2002 and
THEREAFTER
ALTERNATIVE
ALLOCATION))
2010 and
THEREAFTER

Housing ((27.5% 30.0% 32.0%)) 47.0%

Small Issue ((24.5% 24.0%)) 25.0%

Exempt Facility ((19.5% 19.0%)) 20.0%

((Student Loans 14.5% 14.0% 15.0%))

Public Utility ((10.0% 10.0%)) 0.0%

Remainder and
Redevelopment ((4.0% 3.0%)) 8.0%

(2) Initial allocations may be modified by the agency only to
reflect an issuer's carryforward amount. Any reduction of the initial
allocation shall be added to the remainder and be available for
allocation or reallocation.
(3) The remainder shall be allocated by the agency among one or
more issuers from any bond use category with regard to the criteria
specified in RCW 39.86.130.
(4) Should any bond use category no longer be subject to the state
ceiling due to federal or state provisions of law, the agency shall
divide the amount of that initial allocation among the remaining
categories as necessary or appropriate with regard to the criteria
specified in RCW 39.86.130. ((Upon the earlier of: (a) Exhaustion of
the seven hundred fifty million dollar authority under I.R.C. 1317(25),
or any new federal legislation increasing the amount of authority, or
creating additional authority; or (b) waiver of the authority described
under (a) of this subsection due to alternative federal authority that
does not use a state volume cap, then the alternative allocation
schedule in subsection (1) of this section will be used.))
(5)(a) Prior to ((September 1)) July 1st of each calendar year, any
available portion of an initial allocation may be allocated or
reallocated only to an issuer within the same bond use category, except
that the remainder category, or portions thereof, may be allocated at
any time to any bond use category.
(b) Beginning ((September 1)) July 1st of each calendar year, the
agency may allocate or reallocate any available portion of the state
ceiling to any bond use category with regard to the criteria specified
in RCW 39.86.130.

Sec. 6030 RCW 39.86.130 and 1987 c 297 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In granting an allocation, reallocation, or carryforward of the
state ceiling as provided in this chapter, the agency shall consider
existing state priorities and other such criteria, including but not
limited to, the following criteria:
(a) Need of issuers to issue ((private activity)) bonds within a
bond use category subject to a state ceiling;
(b) Amount of the state ceiling available;
(c) Public benefit and purpose to be satisfied, including economic
development, educational opportunity, and public health, safety, or
welfare;
(d) Cost or availability of alternative methods of financing for
the project or program; and
(e) Certainty of using the allocation which is being requested.
(2) In determining whether to allocate an amount of the state
ceiling to an issuer within any bond use category, the agency shall
consider, but is not limited to, the following criteria for each of the
bond use categories:
(a) Housing: Criteria which comply with RCW 43.180.200.
(b) ((Student loans: Criteria which comply with the applicable
provisions of Title 28B RCW and rules adopted by the higher education
coordinating board or applicable state agency dealing with student
financial aid.
(c))) Small issue: ((Recommendation by the board regarding how the
amount of the state ceiling set aside for the small issue bond use
category shall be allocated among issuers.)) Factors which may
include:
(i) The number of employment opportunities the project is likely to
create or retain in relation to the amount of the bond issuance;
(ii) The level of unemployment existing in the geographic area
likely to be affected by the project;
(iii) A commitment to providing employment opportunities to low-income persons in cooperation with the employment security department;
(iv) Geographic distribution of projects;
(v) The number of persons who will benefit from the project;
(vi) Consistency with criteria identified in subsection (1) of this
section; and
(vii) Order in which requests were received((; and
(viii) Requirements of the board's umbrella bond program)).
(((d))) (c) Exempt facility or redevelopment: Factors which may
include:
(i) State issuance needs;
(ii) Consistency with criteria identified in subsection (1) of this
section;
(iii) Order in which requests were received;
(iv) The proportionate number of persons in relationship to the
size of the community who will benefit from the project; and
(v) The unique timing and issuance needs of large scale projects
that may require allocations in more than one year.
(((e))) (d) Public utility: Factors which may include:
(i) Consistency with criteria identified in subsection (1) of this
section; and
(ii) Timing needs for issuance of bonds over a multi-year period.

Sec. 6031 RCW 39.86.140 and 1987 c 297 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No issuer may receive an allocation of the state ceiling
without a certificate of approval from the agency.
(2)(((a))) For each state ceiling allocation request, an issuer
shall submit to the agency, no sooner than ninety days prior to the
beginning of a calendar year for which an allocation of the state
ceiling is being requested, a form identifying:
(((i))) (a) The amount of the allocation sought;
(((ii))) (b) The bond use category from which the allocation sought
would be made;
(((iii))) (c) The project or program for which the allocation is
requested;
(((iv))) (d) The financing schedule for which the allocation is
needed; and
(((v))) (e) Any other such information required by the agency,
including information which corresponds to the allocation criteria of
RCW 39.86.130.
(((b) Nothing in (a) of this subsection precludes a public utility
issuer from filing and the agency from considering a request at such
times as may be appropriate in order to meet the criteria set forth in
RCW 39.86.130(2)(e)(ii).))
(3) The agency may approve or deny an allocation for all or a
portion of the issuer's request. Any denied request, however, shall
remain on file with the agency for the remainder of the calendar year
and shall be considered for receiving any allocation, reallocation, or
carryforward of unused portions of the state ceiling during that
period.
(4) After receiving an allocation request, the agency shall mail to
the requesting issuer a written certificate of approval or notice of
denial for an allocation amount, by a date no later than the latest of
the following:
(a) ((Forty-five days from May 8, 1987;
(b))) February 1st of the calendar year((, other than 1987,)) for
which the request is made;
(((c))) (b) Fifteen days from the date the agency receives an
allocation request; or
(((d))) (c) Fifteen days from the date the agency receives a
recommendation by the board with regard to a small issue allocation
request, should the board choose to review individual requests.
(5)(a) For requests of the state ceiling of any calendar year, the
following applies to all bond use categories except housing ((and
student loans)):
(i) Except for housing ((and student loans)), any allocations
granted prior to April 1st, for which bonds have not been issued by
((September 1)) July 1st of the same calendar year, shall revert to the
agency on ((September 1)) July 1st of the same calendar year for
reallocation unless an extension or carryforward is granted;
(ii) Except for housing ((and student loans,)) any allocations
granted on or after April 1st, for which bonds have not been issued by
((December 15)) October 15th of the same calendar year, shall revert to
the agency on ((December 15)) October 15th of the same calendar year
for reallocation unless an extension or carryforward is granted.
(b) For each calendar year, any housing ((or student loan))
allocations, for which bonds have not been issued by December 15th of
the same calendar year, shall revert to the agency on December 15th of
the same calendar year for reallocation unless an extension or
carryforward is granted.
(6) An extension of the deadlines provided by subsection (5) of
this section may be granted by the agency for the approved allocation
amount or a portion thereof, based on:
(a) Firm and convincing evidence that the bonds will be issued
before the end of the calendar year if the extension is granted; and
(b) Any other criteria the agency deems appropriate.
(7) If an issuer determines that bonds subject to the state ceiling
will not be issued for the project or program for which an allocation
was granted, the issuer shall promptly notify the agency in writing so
that the allocation may be canceled and the amount may be available for
reallocation.
(8) Bonds subject to the state ceiling may be issued only to
finance the project or program for which a certificate of approval is
granted.
(9) Within three business days of the date that bonds for which an
allocation of the state ceiling is granted have been delivered to the
original purchasers, the issuer shall mail to the agency a written
notification of the bond issuance. In accordance with chapter 39.44
RCW, the issuer shall also complete bond issuance information on the
form provided by the agency.
(10) If the total amount of ((tax-exempt)) bonds issued under the
authority of a state ceiling for a project or program is less than the
amount allocated, the remaining portion of the allocation shall revert
to the agency for reallocation in accordance with the criteria in RCW
39.86.130. If the amount of ((tax-exempt)) bonds actually issued under
the authority of a state ceiling is greater than the amount allocated,
the entire allocation shall be disallowed.

Sec. 6032 RCW 39.86.150 and 1987 c 297 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning ((September 1)) July 1st of each calendar year, the
agency may allocate or reallocate any portions of the annual state tax-
exempt private activity bond ceiling for which no certificate of
approval is in effect. Reallocations may also be made from the
remainder category at any time during the year.
(2) Prior to the end of each calendar year, the agency shall
allocate or reallocate any unused portions of the state ceiling among
one or more issuers as carryforward, to be used within three years, in
accordance with the code and relevant criteria described in RCW
39.86.130.
(3) Reallocations of state bond ceilings other than the annual tax-exempt private activity bond ceiling may be made by the agency in
accordance with the code or as established in agency rule when not
specified in the code.

Sec. 6033 RCW 39.86.170 and 1987 c 297 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
A fee schedule shall be established by rule by the agency to assist
in support of bond allocation activities. Fees shall reflect costs
actually incurred or expected to be incurred by the agency in its bond
allocation and bond users clearinghouse activities.

Sec. 6034 RCW 39.86.190 and 2009 c 518 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
By February 1st of each even-numbered year, the agency shall
summarize for the legislature each previous year's bond allocation
requests and issuance. Beginning in ((June of 1988)) February 2010 and
thereafter in ((June)) February of each even-numbered year, the agency
shall also submit a biennial report summarizing usage of the bond
allocation proceeds and any policy concerns for future bond
allocations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6035 Section 6005 of this act expires June 30,
2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6036 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) 2009 c 497 s 1089 (uncodified);
(2) 2009 c 497 s 2030 (uncodified);
(3) 2009 c 497 s 2079 (uncodified);
(4) 2009 c 497 s 3098 (uncodified);
(5) 2009 c 497 s 4009 (uncodified);
(6) 2009 c 497 s 5043 (uncodified);
(7) 2009 c 497 s 5059 (uncodified);
(8) 2009 c 497 s 5072 (uncodified);
(9) 2009 c 497 s 5084 (uncodified);
(10) 2009 c 497 s 5098 (uncodified);
(11) 2009 c 497 s 5112 (uncodified); and
(12) RCW 39.86.200 (Ratification) and 1987 c 297 s 11.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6037 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6038 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of bill)

INDEX PAGE #

CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 73
COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM . . . . . . . . . . . . 82
CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 36
DEBT AFFORDABILITY STUDY . . . . . . . . . . . . 97
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 39
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 43
DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 56
DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 31
ENERGY SAVINGS PERFORMANCE CONTRACTING . . . . . . . . . . . . 97
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 38
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 37
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 57
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 37
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 39
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 73
EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE . . . . . . . . . . . . 73
MILITARY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 34
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 28, 97
PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP . . . . . . . . . . . . 57
RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 56
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 53
STATE TREASURER
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 105
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 63
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 69
WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS . . . . . . . . . . . . 69
WASHINGTON STATE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 62
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 74
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 72
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 74
--- END ---