BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Seeking or obtaining health care is fundamental to public
health and safety;
(b) Health care information is personal and sensitive information
that if improperly used, released, or withheld from a patient may do
significant harm to a patient's interests in privacy, health care, or
other interests;
(c) The provision of medically inaccurate information may harm
individual access to needed health care and jeopardizes the public
health and consumer protection; and
(d) Some limited service pregnancy centers have misled people about
the nature of their services, have provided medically inaccurate
information about reproductive health, and have withheld health care
records, including the results of pregnancy tests, from individuals
seeking services.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature that limited service
pregnancy centers operating in Washington state provide truthful
information about their services, ensure that any reproductive health
information provided is medically accurate, and maintain the privacy of
and respect a person's right to his or her health care information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 As used in this chapter:
(1) "Comprehensive birth control services" means the provision of
nondirective counseling on methods and efficacy of contraception, the
prescription of contraceptive drugs or devices, the provision of
contraceptive drugs or devices, and medical diagnosis and care related
to the prescription or provision of contraceptive drugs or devices.
(2) "Limited service pregnancy center" means an organization that
advertises, offers, or provides pregnancy tests or ultrasounds, and
information about adoption or abortion, whether for a fee or as a free
service, but does not provide any of the following: Prenatal medical
care, comprehensive birth control services, abortion or referrals for
abortion. "Limited service pregnancy center" does not include health
care entities licensed under Title 18 RCW, hospitals and entities
licensed under Title 70 RCW, family planning clinics under contract
with the department of health or the department of social and health
services to provide family planning services, family planning clinics
receiving federal Title X funds, or health care providers licensed
under Title 18 RCW. A limited service pregnancy center remains subject
to the provisions of this chapter notwithstanding the presence of a
licensed health care provider in the governance of, on the staff of, or
acting as a volunteer with the limited service pregnancy center.
(3) "Health care information" has the same meaning as in RCW
70.02.010(7).
(4) "Medically and scientifically accurate" has the same meaning as
in RCW 28A.300.475(2).
(5) "Reproductive health information" means information about: (a)
The medical risks of pregnancy, abortion, miscarriage, and sexually
transmitted infections; and (b) methods of prevention of pregnancy and
sexually transmitted infections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A limited service pregnancy center shall
make the following disclosures to a person seeking services:
(a) That the center does not provide abortion or comprehensive
birth control services;
(b) That the center does not provide referrals to individuals or
organizations that provide abortion or comprehensive birth control
services; and
(c) That the center does not provide medical care for pregnant
women.
(2) The disclosure required by subsection (1) of this section must
be provided as follows:
(a) Verbally, in such a manner as to be reasonably understandable
to the person seeking services, upon first communication or first
contact with a person seeking services, whether by telephone,
electronic communication, or in person; and
(b) In writing, as follows:
(i) In English and in Spanish, in thirty-point font size or larger,
on eight and one-half inch by eleven inch paper or larger, posted (A)
on the main entry door of the organization and (B) inside the building
housing the organization in such a manner as to be clearly visible from
the area at which the organization conducts intakes; and
(ii) In English and in Spanish, clearly visible on the home page of
the organization's web site, in the primary font size used on the web
site; and
(iii) In any advertisement or notice promoting the center's
services.
(3) A limited service pregnancy center shall, before providing a
pregnancy test that uses an over-the-counter product to perform the
pregnancy test, inform the person seeking to be tested that the
pregnancy test is an over-the-counter product and shall give the test
kit to the person seeking to be tested to self-administer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 All reproductive health information provided
by a limited service pregnancy center, whether provided orally or in
writing, must be medically and scientifically accurate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) A limited service pregnancy center that
collects health care information from a person seeking or receiving its
services shall not disclose health care information about that person
to any other person, entity, or organization without the service
recipient's written authorization. A disclosure made under a service
recipient's written authorization must conform to the authorization.
(2) To be valid, a service recipient's authorization shall conform
to the requirements of RCW 70.02.030(3).
(3) A limited service pregnancy center that provides or assists in
the provision of pregnancy testing, whether for a fee or without
charge, whether those tests are over-the-counter or laboratory tests,
shall provide the person tested with a free written statement of the
results of the pregnancy test immediately after the test is completed.
(4) Upon receipt of a written request from a service recipient to
examine or copy all or part of the recipient's recorded health care
information, a limited service pregnancy center, as promptly as
required under the circumstances, but no later than fifteen working
days after receiving the request shall:
(a) Make the information available for examination during regular
business hours and provide a free copy to the service recipient, if
requested;
(b) Inform the service recipient if the information does not exist
or cannot be found; and
(c) If the limited service pregnancy center does not maintain a
record of the information, inform the service recipient and provide the
name and address, if known, of the entity that maintains the record.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The legislature finds that the practices
covered by this chapter are matters vitally affecting the public
interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this chapter is not reasonable in
relation to the development and preservation of business and is an
unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of
competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW. Remedies provided by chapter 19.86 RCW are
cumulative and not exclusive.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---