BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Cities with a population between twenty-four thousand five
hundred and twenty-five thousand, as reported in the 2000 census, and
located in a county with a population between forty thousand five
hundred and forty-one thousand five hundred, as reported in the 2000
census, east of the crest of the Cascade mountains, do not have to
implement the requirements of the national pollutant discharge
elimination system municipal separate storm sewer systems (MS4) permit,
as provided in RCW 90.48.260, until calendar year 2014.
(2) This section expires January 1, 2014.

--- END ---