BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that additional
analysis and examination is needed of how resources from voter-approved
excess levies are used, particularly for employee-related costs that
exceed state allocations of funding. The legislature further finds
that such an analysis is particularly timely given the creation of the
local finance working group under chapter 548, Laws of 2009, which is
scheduled to commence its work in 2010. Furthermore, the quality
education council should add such an examination to its workplan for
2010 and make recommendations to the 2011 legislature regarding how
supplemental employee-related costs should be addressed in a revised
system of local funding and local effort assistance for public schools.

Sec. 2 2009 c 548 s 302 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2010, the office of financial management,
with assistance and support from the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, shall convene a technical working group to develop
options for a new system of supplemental school funding through local
school levies and local effort assistance.
(2) The working group shall consider the impact on overall school
district revenues of the new basic education funding system established
under this act and shall recommend a phase-in plan that ensures that no
school district suffers a decrease in funding from one school year to
the next due to implementation of the new system of supplemental
funding.
(3)(a) The working group shall also examine how local levy funds
are used for supplemental employee-related costs beyond state funding
allocations including, but not limited to, supplemental contracts,
enhanced employee basic benefits, professional development days,
release time, and other employee benefits such as tuition reimbursement
or additional leave. The purpose of the examination is not only to
improve overall understanding of how local levy funds are currently
used, but also to explore the possible impact of such uses on class
size, staffing levels, instructional time for students, availability of
cocurricular programs, levels of student support services, and the use
of substitute teachers. The working group shall use the information
and insight gained through the examination as it develops options for
a new system of supplemental funding, including providing
recommendations for appropriate uses of levy funds for employee-related
costs within that system.
(b) The working group shall make a preliminary report to the
quality education council and the legislature containing its analysis,
findings, and recommendations under this subsection (3) by November 15,
2010.
(4) The working group shall be composed of representatives from the
department of revenue, the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee, school district and educational service district
financial managers, and representatives of the Washington association
of school business officers, the Washington education association, the
Washington association of school administrators, the association of
Washington school principals, the Washington state school directors'
association, the public school employees of Washington, and other
interested stakeholders with expertise in education finance. The
working group may convene advisory subgroups on specific topics as
necessary to assure participation and input from a broad array of
diverse stakeholders.
(((4))) (5) The local funding working group shall be monitored and
overseen by the legislature and by the quality education council
created in ((section 114 of this act)) RCW 28A.290.010. The working
group shall submit a final report to the legislature by December 1,
2011.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.290.010 and 2009 c 548 s 114 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The quality education council is created to recommend and
inform the ongoing implementation by the legislature of an evolving
program of basic education and the financing necessary to support such
program. The council shall develop strategic recommendations on the
program of basic education for the common schools. The council shall
take into consideration the capacity report produced under RCW
28A.300.172 and the availability of data and progress of implementing
the data systems required under RCW 28A.655.210. Any recommendations
for modifications to the program of basic education shall be based on
evidence that the programs effectively support student learning. The
council shall update the statewide strategic recommendations every four
years. The recommendations of the council are intended to:
(a) Inform future educational policy and funding decisions of the
legislature and governor;
(b) Identify measurable goals and priorities for the educational
system in Washington state for a ten-year time period, including the
goals of basic education and ongoing strategies for coordinating
statewide efforts to eliminate the achievement gap and reduce student
dropout rates; and
(c) Enable the state of Washington to continue to implement an
evolving program of basic education.
(2) The council may request updates and progress reports from the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, the state board of
education, the professional educator standards board, and the
department of early learning on the work of the agencies as well as
educational working groups established by the legislature.
(3) The chair of the council shall be selected from the
councilmembers. The council shall be composed of the following
members:
(a) Four members of the house of representatives, with two members
representing each of the major caucuses and appointed by the speaker of
the house of representatives;
(b) Four members of the senate, with two members representing each
of the major caucuses and appointed by the president of the senate; and
(c) One representative each from the office of the governor, office
of the superintendent of public instruction, state board of education,
professional educator standards board, and department of early
learning.
(4) In the 2009 fiscal year, the council shall meet as often as
necessary as determined by the chair. In subsequent years, the council
shall meet no more than four times a year.
(5)(a) The council shall submit an initial report to the governor
and the legislature by January 1, 2010, detailing its recommendations,
including recommendations for resolving issues or decisions requiring
legislative action during the 2010 legislative session, and
recommendations for any funding necessary to continue development and
implementation of chapter 548, Laws of 2009.
(b) The initial report shall, at a minimum, include:
(i) Consideration of how to establish a statewide beginning teacher
mentoring and support system;
(ii) Recommendations for a program of early learning for at-risk
children;
(iii) A recommended schedule for the concurrent phase-in of the
changes to the instructional program of basic education and the
implementation of the funding formulas and allocations to support the
new instructional program of basic education as established under
chapter 548, Laws of 2009. The phase-in schedule shall have full
implementation completed by September 1, 2018; and
(iv) A recommended schedule for phased-in implementation of the new
distribution formula for allocating state funds to school districts for
the transportation of students to and from school, with phase-in
beginning no later than September 1, 2013.
(6) The council shall include in its 2010 workplan an examination
of levy-funded employee-related costs, using the information and
analysis gathered by the local finance working group in its examination
of this topic and any other information requested by the council. The
council shall submit a report to the legislature by January 1, 2011,
containing conclusions and recommendations for appropriate uses of levy
funds for employee-related costs within a revised system of
supplemental local finance for public schools.
(7) The council shall be staffed by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction and the office of financial
management. Additional staff support shall be provided by the state
entities with representatives on the committee. Senate committee
services and the house of representatives office of program research
may provide additional staff support.
(((7))) (8) Legislative members of the council shall serve without
additional compensation but may be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 44.04.120 while attending sessions of the council
or on official business authorized by the council. Nonlegislative
members of the council may be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

--- END ---