BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 52.02.020 and 2005 c 281 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Fire protection districts for the provision of fire prevention
services, fire suppression services, emergency medical services, and
for the protection of life and property ((in areas outside of cities
and towns, except where the cities and towns have been annexed into a
fire protection district or where the district is continuing service
pursuant to RCW 35.02.202,)) are authorized to be established as
provided in this title.
(2) In addition to other services authorized under this section,
fire protection districts that share a common border with Canada and
are surrounded on three sides by water or are bounded on the north by
Bremerton, on the west by Mason county, on the south by Pierce county,
and on the east by the Puget Sound, may also establish or participate
in the provision of health clinic services.

Sec. 2 RCW 52.04.061 and 2009 c 115 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A city or town lying adjacent to a fire protection district may
be annexed to such district if at the time of the initiation of
annexation the population of the city or town is ((100,000)) 300,000 or
less. The legislative authority of the city or town may initiate
annexation by the adoption of an ordinance stating an intent to join
the fire protection district and finding that the public interest will
be served thereby. If the board of fire commissioners of the fire
protection district shall concur in the annexation, notification
thereof shall be transmitted to the legislative authority or
authorities of the counties in which the city or town and the district
are situated.
(2) When a city or town is located in two counties, and at least
eighty percent of the population resides in one county, all of that
portion of the city lying in that county and encompassing eighty
percent of the population may be annexed to a fire protection district
if at the time of the initiation of annexation the proposed area lies
adjacent to a fire protection district, and the population of the
proposed area is greater than five thousand but less than ten thousand.
The legislative authority of the city or town may initiate annexation
by the adoption of an ordinance stating an intent to join the fire
protection district and finding that the public interest will be served
thereby. If the board of fire commissioners of the fire protection
district shall concur in the annexation, notification thereof must be
transmitted to the legislative authority or authorities of the counties
in which the city or town and the district are situated.

--- END ---