BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 During the pendency of any criminal case
charging a felony offense defined in this chapter, the superior court
may, in addition to its other powers, issue an order pursuant to
section 2 of this act. Upon conviction of a person for a violation of
this chapter, the superior court may, in addition to its other powers
of disposition, issue an order pursuant to section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The superior court has jurisdiction to
prevent, restrain, and remedy a felony offense after making provision
for the rights of all innocent persons affected by the violation and
after hearing or trial, as appropriate, by issuing appropriate orders.
(2) Prior to a determination of liability, orders issued under
subsection (1) of this section may include, but are not limited to,
entering restraining orders or prohibitions or taking such other
actions, including the acceptance of satisfactory performance bonds, in
connection with any property or other interest subject to damages,
forfeiture, or other restraints pursuant to this section as the court
deems proper. The orders may also include attachment, receivership, or
injunctive relief in regard to personal or real property pursuant to
Title 7 RCW. In shaping the reach or scope of receivership,
attachment, or injunctive relief, the superior court shall provide for
the protection of bona fide interests in property, including community
property, of persons who were not involved in the violation of this
chapter, except to the extent that such interests or property were
acquired or used in such a way as to be subject to forfeiture under
subsection (3)(f) of this section.
(3) Following a determination of liability, orders may include, but
are not limited to:
(a) Ordering any person to divest himself or herself of any
interest, direct or indirect, in any enterprise;
(b) Imposing reasonable restrictions on the future activities or
investments of any person, including prohibiting any person from
engaging in the same type of endeavor as the enterprise engaged in, the
activities of which affect the laws of this state, to the extent the
Constitutions of the United States and this state permit;
(c) Ordering dissolution or reorganization of any enterprise;
(d) Ordering the payment of actual damages sustained to those
persons injured by the felony offense committed;
(e) Ordering the payment of all costs and expenses of incarceration
relating to the felony offense of conviction, incurred by the state or
county as appropriate to the state general fund or the county;
(f) Ordering forfeiture first as restitution to any person damaged
by the felony act, then to the state general fund and the county, as
appropriate, to the extent not already ordered to be paid in other
damages, of the following:
(i) Any property or other interest acquired or maintained as part
of the felony offense committed;
(ii) Any property, contractual right, or claim against property
used to influence any enterprise that a person has established,
operated, controlled, conducted, or participated in the conduct of the
felony offense committed;
(iii) All proceeds traceable to or derived from the felony offense
committed, and all moneys, negotiable instruments, securities, and
other things of value significantly used or intended to be used
significantly to facilitate commission of the felony offense.
(4) In addition to or in lieu of an action under this section, the
attorney general or county prosecuting attorney may file an action for
forfeiture to the state general fund or county, for cost of
incarceration, as appropriate, to the extent not already ordered paid
pursuant to this section, of the following:
(a) Any interest acquired or maintained by the convicted person;
(b) Any interest, property, contractual right, or claim against
property used that the person has established, operated, controlled,
conducted, or participated in the conduct of the felony offense;
(c) All proceeds traceable to or derived from the felony offense
and all moneys, negotiable instruments, securities, and other things of
value significantly used or intended to be used significantly to
facilitate the commission of the offense.
(5) A defendant convicted in any criminal proceeding is precluded
in any civil proceeding from denying the essential allegations of the
criminal offense proven in the criminal trial in which the defendant
was convicted. For the purposes of this subsection, a conviction shall
be deemed to have occurred upon a verdict, finding, or plea of guilty,
notwithstanding the fact that appellate review of the conviction and
sentence has been or may be sought. If a subsequent reversal of the
conviction occurs, any judgment that was based upon that conviction may
be reopened upon motion of the defendant.
(6) The initiation of civil proceedings under this section shall be
commenced within three years after discovery of the felony offense or
within three years after the final disposition of any criminal charges
relating to the felony offense, whichever is later.
(7) The attorney general or county prosecuting attorney may, in a
civil action brought pursuant to this section, file with the clerk of
the superior court a certificate stating that the case is of special
public importance. A copy of that certificate shall be furnished
immediately by the clerk to the presiding chief judge of the superior
court in which the action is pending and, upon receipt of the copy, the
judge shall immediately designate a judge to hear and determine the
action. The judge so designated shall promptly assign the action for
hearing, participate in the hearings and determination, and cause the
action to be expedited.
(8) The standard of proof in actions brought pursuant to this
section is the preponderance of the evidence test.
(9) A person other than the attorney general or county prosecuting
attorney who files an action under this section shall serve notice and
one copy of the pleading on the attorney general within thirty days
after the action is filed with the superior court. The notice shall
identify the action, the person, and the person's attorney. Service of
the notice does not limit or otherwise affect the right of the state to
maintain an action under this section or intervene in a pending action
nor does it authorize the person to name the state or the attorney
general as a party to the action.
(10) Except in cases filed by a county prosecuting attorney, the
attorney general may, upon timely application, intervene in any civil
action or proceeding brought under this section if the attorney general
certifies that in the attorney general's opinion the action is of
special public importance. Upon intervention, the attorney general may
assert any available claim and is entitled to the same relief as if the
attorney general had instituted a separate action.
(11) In addition to the attorney general's right to intervene as a
party in any action under this section, the attorney general may appear
as amicus curiae in any proceeding in which a claim under this section
has been asserted or in which a court is interpreting this chapter or
this section.
(12) A private civil action under this section does not limit any
other civil or criminal action under this chapter or any other
provision. Private civil remedies provided under this section are
supplemental and not mutually exclusive.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act are each added
to chapter 9.94A RCW.

--- END ---