BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 RCW 36.32.210 (Inventory of county
capitalized assets -- County commission inventory statement -- Filing and
public inspection -- Penalty -- Prosecutions -- Taxpayer's action) and 2003
c 53 s 204, 1997 c 245 s 3, 1995 c 194 s 5, 1969 ex.s. c 182 s 2, 1963
c 108 s 1, & 1963 c 4 s 36.32.210 are each repealed.

--- END ---