BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.250.010 and 2009 c 542 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1)(a) "Multidistrict online provider" means:
(i) A private or nonprofit organization that enters into a contract
with a school district to provide online courses or programs to K-12
students from more than one school district;
(ii) A private or nonprofit organization that enters into contracts
with multiple school districts to provide online courses or programs to
K-12 students from those districts; or
(iii) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a school
district that provides online courses or programs to students who
reside outside the geographic boundaries of the school district.
(b) "Multidistrict online provider" does not include:
(i) A school district online learning program in which fewer than
ten percent of the students enrolled in the program are from other
districts under the interdistrict student transfer provisions of RCW
28A.225.225((. "Multidistrict online provider" also does not
include));
(ii) Regional online learning programs that are jointly developed
and implemented by two or more school districts or an educational
service district through an interdistrict cooperative program agreement
that addresses, at minimum, how the districts share student full-time
equivalency for state basic education funding purposes and how
categorical education programs, including special education, are
provided to eligible students; or
(iii) A public institution of higher education in Washington or an
in-state institution of higher education accredited by an accrediting
association recognized by the higher education coordinating board under
chapter 28B.85 RCW, if the online course or program being offered
generates both high school and college credits.
(2)(a) "Online course" means a course that:
(i) Is delivered primarily electronically using the internet or
other computer-based methods; and
(ii) Is taught by a teacher primarily from a remote location.
Students enrolled in an online course may have access to the teacher
synchronously, asynchronously, or both.
(b) "Online school program" means a school program that:
(i) Is delivered primarily electronically using the internet or
other computer-based methods;
(ii) Is taught by a teacher primarily from a remote location.
Students enrolled in an online program may have access to the teacher
synchronously, asynchronously, or both;
(iii) Delivers a part-time or full-time sequential program; and
(iv) Has an online component of the program with online lessons and
tools for student and data management.
(c) An online course or online school program may be delivered to
students at school as part of the regularly scheduled school day. An
online course or online school program also may be delivered to
students, in whole or in part, independently from a regular classroom
schedule, but such courses or programs must comply with RCW 28A.150.262
to qualify for state basic education funding.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.250.060 and 2009 c 542 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 2011-12 school year, school districts may
claim state basic education funding, to the extent otherwise allowed by
state law, for students enrolled in online courses or programs only if
the online courses or programs are:
(a) Offered by a multidistrict online provider approved under RCW
28A.250.020 by the superintendent of public instruction;
(b) Offered by a school district online learning program if the
program serves students who reside within the geographic boundaries of
the school district, including school district programs in which fewer
than ten percent of the program's students reside outside the school
district's geographic boundaries; ((or))
(c) Offered by a regional online learning program where courses are
jointly developed and offered by two or more school districts or an
educational service district through an interdistrict cooperative
program agreement; or
(d) Offered by a public institution of higher education in
Washington or an in-state institution of higher education accredited by
an accrediting association recognized by the higher education
coordinating board under chapter 28B.85 RCW, if the online course or
program offered generates both high school and college credits.
(2) Criteria shall be established by the superintendent of public
instruction to allow online courses that have not been approved by the
superintendent of public instruction to be eligible for state funding
if the course is in a subject matter in which no courses have been
approved and, if it is a high school course, the course meets
Washington high school graduation requirements.

--- END ---