BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that postsecondary
education provides multiple pathways to enhanced opportunities for
skill development, career advancement, and community and civic
involvement. To increase postsecondary access and affordability, the
legislature maintains a distinguished record of investing in need-based
student financial aid programs, totaling more than five hundred million
dollars during the 2009-2011 biennium, serving more than eighty-five
thousand students. These investments currently rank Washington fifth
among all states with respect to need-based grant aid per full-time
equivalent enrollment.
(2) The legislature further finds that the principal source of
financial aid to Washington students from the federal government is in
the form of loans. Federal loan programs enable millions of deserving,
high-achieving students to access postsecondary education. At the same
time, however, the proportion of undergraduate students nationally who
took out a private student loan increased from five percent in the
2003-04 academic year to fourteen percent in the 2007-08 academic year.
Nearly two-thirds of private loan borrowers in academic year 2007-08
borrowed less than they could have in Stafford loans.
(3) It is therefore the intent of the legislature to design and
operate a state higher education loan program with the goals of: (a)
Increasing postsecondary access and affordability for low and middle-income students in order to maintain the dream of opportunity for all;
(b) reducing reliance on private student loans that often lack the
borrower protections, fixed rates, and affordable repayment options as
do federal student loans; and (c) complementing existing federal
financial aid programs, including proposed changes that would maintain
low interest rates on subsidized student loans while strengthening the
direct loan program.
(4) It is further the intent of the legislature in designing and
operating the Washington higher education loan program that: (a) The
eligibility criteria and associated benefits be clearly defined; (b)
policymakers seek a stable and predictable source of funding; (c) it be
self-supporting in its operation; and (d) self-help aid not replace
gift aid, to ensure that students are not overburdened with excessive
debt loads that may affect their career and life aspirations and
decisions.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.97.010 and 2009 c 215 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The Washington higher education loan program is created. The
program is created to assist eligible students in need of additional
low-cost student loans and related loan benefits.
(2) Moneys for the program shall be deposited in the Washington
higher education loan program account established in section 4 of this
act. The principal and interest from these moneys shall be used for
loan activities described in this section, including administrative
expenses necessary to perform the duties in this section.
(3) The program shall be administered by the board. In
administering the program, the board must:
(a) Periodically assess the needs and target the benefits to
selected students;
(b) Establish an annual loan limit equal to the cost of attendance
minus any other financial aid received;
(c) Devise a program to address the following issues related to
loans:
(i) Issuance of low-interest educational loans;
(ii) Determining loan repayment obligations and options;
(iii) Borrowing educational loans at low interest rates;
(iv) Developing conditional loans that can be forgiven in exchange
for service; and
(v) Creating an emergency loan fund to help students until other
state and federal long-term financing can be secured;
(((c))) (d) Accept public and private contributions;
(((d))) (e) Publicize the program; ((and
(e))) (f) As appropriate, repay loans on behalf of selected
students, collect repayments, and forgive loans; and
(g) Work with public and private colleges and universities, career
colleges, the state board for community and technical colleges, the
workforce training and education coordinating board, and with students,
to conduct periodic assessment of program needs. The board may also
consult with other groups and individuals as needed.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.97.020 and 2009 c 215 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the higher education coordinating board.
(2) "Eligible student" means a student who meets all of the
following criteria:
(a) Has an annual family income, adjusted for family size, that is
no greater than one hundred thirty percent of the Washington state
median family income;
(b) Has completed the free application for federal student aid;
(c) Is a resident student as defined in RCW 28B.15.012(2) (a)
through (d);
(d) Is not enrolled in theology as a field of study;
(e) Is enrolled at least half time in a first aid-eligible
certificate program or in a program leading to a first academic or
technical associate degree, or bachelor's or graduate or professional
degree;
(f) Maintains satisfactory academic progress as determined by the
attending institution;
(g) Is not delinquent or in default on a federal or state student
loan; and
(h) Is not past due in child support obligations.
(3) "Forgive" or "forgiven" means to render service in an
occupation or occupational area, identified and approved by the board,
in lieu of monetary repayment.
(4) "Institution of higher education" means a college or university
in the state of Washington that is accredited by an accrediting
association recognized as such by rule of the board.
(((3))) (5) "Program" means the Washington higher education loan
program.
(((4))) (6) "Resident student" has the definition in RCW
28B.15.012(2) (a) through (d).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28B.97 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington higher education loan program account is created
in the custody of the state treasurer. An appropriation is not
required for expenditures of funds from the account. The account is
not subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW except for
moneys used for program administration.
(2) The board shall deposit in the account all moneys received for
the Washington higher education loan program. The account shall be
self-sustaining and consist of state general fund appropriations made
by the legislature for the Washington higher education loan program,
private contributions to the program, and receipts from participant
repayments.
(3) Expenditures from the account may be used solely for the
purposes authorized in this chapter and costs associated with program
administration by the board.
(4) Disbursements from the account may be made only on the
authorization of the board.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2009 c 87 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with dependents grant
account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the toll collection
account, the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the
energy account, the fair fund, the family leave insurance account, the
food animal veterinarian conditional scholarship account, the fruit and
vegetable inspection account, the future teachers conditional
scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the GET ready
for math and science scholarship account, the grain inspection
revolving fund, the Washington higher education loan program account,
the juvenile accountability incentive account, the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local tourism
promotion account, the pilotage account, the produce railcar pool
account, the regional transportation investment district account, the
rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center
account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance
revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, the children's
trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred
owners' bonus fund and breeder awards account, the Washington horse
racing commission class C purse fund account, the individual
development account program account, the Washington horse racing
commission operating account (earnings from the Washington horse racing
commission operating account must be credited to the Washington horse
racing commission class C purse fund account), the life sciences
discovery fund, the Washington state heritage center account, the
reduced cigarette ignition propensity account, and the reading
achievement account. However, the earnings to be distributed shall
first be reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service
fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right-of-way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 28B.07.300 (Student loan financing -- Authority -- Liability)
and 2007 c 36 s 3;
(2) RCW 28B.07.310 (Administration of alternative state educational
loans) and 2007 c 36 s 4;
(3) RCW 28B.07.320 (Revenue bonds -- Issuance -- Payment -- Personal
liability) and 2007 c 36 s 5;
(4) RCW 28B.07.330 (Revenue refunding bonds) and 2007 c 36 s 6;
(5) RCW 28B.07.340 (Trust funds -- Trust agreements) and 2007 c 36 s
7;
(6) RCW 28B.07.350 (Proceeds fund) and 2007 c 36 s 8;
(7) RCW 28B.07.360 (Default) and 2007 c 36 s 9;
(8) RCW 28B.07.370 (Debt limitation) and 2007 c 36 s 11; and
(9) RCW 28B.07.380 (Sale of assets) and 2007 c 36 s 12.

--- END ---