BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that public
transportation provides many benefits to the citizens of the state and
the environment. For many, public transportation is the only
affordable way to get to a job, to connect with and participate in the
community, and to help reduce congestion on our roads. In these
challenging economic times, many transit agencies find themselves
struggling to meet the needs of the communities they serve. It is the
intent of the legislature to provide these transit agencies with a
temporary tool that can help address their revenue shortfalls during
this economic crisis, and to establish a statewide plan that will guide
future investments in public transportation.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.57.040 and 1982 c 10 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every county transportation authority created to perform the
function of public transportation pursuant to RCW 36.57.020 shall have
the following powers:
(1) To prepare, adopt, carry out, and amend a general comprehensive
plan for public transportation service.
(2) To acquire by purchase, condemnation, gift, or grant and to
lease, construct, add to, improve, replace, repair, maintain, operate,
and regulate the use of any transportation facilities and properties,
including terminal and parking facilities, together with all lands,
rights-of-way, property, equipment, and accessories necessary for such
systems and facilities.
(3) To fix rates, tolls, fares, and charges for the use of such
facilities and to establish various routes and classes of service.
Fares or charges may be adjusted or eliminated for any distinguishable
class of users including, but not limited to senior citizens,
((handicapped)) persons with disabilities, and students.
(4)(a) To impose the following taxes, fees, and charges for public
transportation purposes under this chapter:
(i) A sales and use tax in accordance with RCW 82.14.045;
(ii) A vehicle fee in accordance with section 7 of this act; and
(iii) An excise tax in accordance with RCW 35.95.040.
(b) Subject to the requirements of chapter 81.104 RCW, to impose
additional taxes authorized under chapter 81.104 RCW solely for high
capacity transportation purposes;
(c) Except as provided in section 7(1) of this act, the taxes,
fees, and charges listed in (a) and (b) of this subsection may not be
imposed without approval of a majority of the voters within the
boundaries of the county transportation authority voting on a
proposition at a general or special election.
(5) If a county transit authority extends its transportation
function to any area in which service is already offered by any company
holding a certificate of public convenience and necessity from the
Washington utilities and transportation commission under RCW 81.68.040,
to acquire by purchase or condemnation at the fair market value, from
the person holding the existing certificate for providing the services,
that portion of the operating authority and equipment representing the
services within the area of public operation, or to contract with such
person or corporation to continue to operate such service or any part
thereof for time and upon such terms and conditions as provided by
contract.
(((5))) (6)(a) To contract with the United States or any agency
thereof, any state or agency thereof, any metropolitan municipal
corporation, any other county, city, special district, or governmental
agency and any private person, firm, or corporation for the purpose of
receiving gifts or grants or securing loans or advances for preliminary
planning and feasibility studies, or for the design, construction,
operation, or maintenance of transportation facilities and ambulance
services: PROVIDED, That before the authority enters into any such
contract for the provision of ambulance service, it shall submit to the
voters a proposition authorizing such contracting authority, and a
majority of those voting thereon shall have approved the proposition;
and
(b) To contract with any governmental agency or with any private
person, firm, or corporation for the use by either contracting party of
all or any part of the facilities, structures, lands, interests in
lands, air rights over lands, and rights-of-way of all kinds which are
owned, leased, or held by the other party and for the purpose of
planning, constructing, or operating any facility or performing any
service related to transportation which the county is authorized to
operate or perform, on such terms as may be agreed upon by the
contracting parties: PROVIDED, That before any contract for the lease
or operation of any transportation facilities shall be let to any
private person, firm, or corporation, competitive bids shall first be
called for and contracts awarded in accord with the procedures
established in accord with RCW 36.32.240, 36.32.250, and 36.32.270.
(((6))) (7) In addition to all other powers and duties, an
authority shall have the power to own, construct, purchase, lease, add
to, and maintain any real and personal property or property rights
necessary for the conduct of the affairs of the authority. An
authority may sell, lease, convey, or otherwise dispose of any
authority real or personal property no longer necessary for the conduct
of the affairs of the authority. An authority may enter into contracts
to carry out the provisions of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 35.92.060 and 1995 c 42 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A city or town may also construct, condemn and purchase,
purchase, acquire, add to, alter, maintain, operate, or lease cable,
electric, and other railways, automobiles, motor cars, motor buses,
auto trucks, and any and all other forms or methods of transportation
of freight or passengers within the corporate limits of the city or
town, and a first-class city may also construct, purchase, acquire, add
to, alter, maintain, operate, or lease cable, electric, and other
railways beyond those corporate limits only within the boundaries of
the county in which the city is located and of any adjoining county,
for the transportation of freight and passengers above, upon, or
underneath the ground. It may also fix, alter, regulate, and control
the fares and rates to be charged therefor; and fares or rates may be
adjusted or eliminated for any distinguishable class of users
including, but not limited to, senior citizens, ((handicapped)) persons
with disabilities, and students. Without the payment of any license
fee or tax, or the filing of a bond with, or the securing of a permit
from, the state, or any department thereof, the city or town may engage
in, carry on, and operate the business of transporting and carrying
passengers or freight for hire by any method or combination of methods
that the legislative authority of any city or town may by ordinance
provide, with full authority to regulate and control the use and
operation of vehicles or other agencies of transportation used for such
business.
(2)(a) To carry out the purposes of subsection (1) of this section,
a city or town may, in addition to the general powers granted by this
chapter, impose the following taxes, fees, and charges:
(i) A sales and use tax in accordance with RCW 82.14.045;
(ii) A vehicle fee in accordance with section 7 of this act; and
(iii) An excise tax in accordance with RCW 35.95.040.
(b) Subject to the requirements of chapter 81.104 RCW, city-owned
transit systems may impose additional taxes authorized under chapter
81.104 RCW solely for high capacity transportation purposes;
(c) Except as provided in section 7(1) of this act, the taxes,
fees, and charges listed in (a) and (b) of this subsection may not be
imposed without approval of a majority of the voters within the
boundaries of the city or town voting on a proposition at a general or
special election.

Sec. 4 RCW 36.57A.090 and 1981 c 25 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
A public transportation benefit area authority shall have the
following powers in addition to the general powers granted by this
chapter:
(1) To prepare, adopt, and carry out a general comprehensive plan
for public transportation service which will best serve the residents
of the public transportation benefit area and to amend said plan from
time to time to meet changed conditions and requirements.
(2) To acquire by purchase, condemnation, gift, or grant and to
lease, construct, add to, improve, replace, repair, maintain, operate,
and regulate the use of transportation facilities and properties within
or without the public transportation benefit area or the state,
including systems of surface, underground, or overhead railways,
tramways, buses, or any other means of local transportation except
taxis, and including escalators, moving sidewalks, or other people-moving systems, passenger terminal and parking facilities and
properties, and such other facilities and properties as may be
necessary for passenger and vehicular access to and from such people-moving systems, terminal and parking facilities and properties,
together with all lands, rights-of-way, property, equipment, and
accessories necessary for such systems and facilities. Public
transportation facilities and properties which are owned by any city
may be acquired or used by the public transportation benefit area
authority only with the consent of the city council of the city owning
such facilities. Cities are hereby authorized to convey or lease such
facilities to a public transportation benefit area authority or to
contract for their joint use on such terms as may be fixed by agreement
between the city council of such city and the public transportation
benefit area authority, without submitting the matter to the voters of
such city.
The facilities and properties of a public transportation benefit
area system whose vehicles will operate primarily within the rights-of-way of public streets, roads, or highways, may be acquired, developed,
and operated without the corridor and design hearings which are
required by RCW 35.58.273, as now or hereafter amended, for mass
transit facilities operating on a separate right-of-way.
(3)(a) To impose the following taxes, fees, and charges for public
transportation purposes:
(i) A sales and use tax in accordance with RCW 82.14.045;
(ii) A vehicle fee in accordance with section 7 of this act; and
(iii) An excise tax in accordance with RCW 35.95.040.
(b) Subject to the requirements of chapter 81.104 RCW, to impose
additional taxes authorized under chapter 81.104 RCW solely for high
capacity transportation purposes;
(c) Except as provided in section 7(1) of this act, the taxes,
fees, and charges listed in (a) and (b) of this subsection may not be
imposed without approval of a majority of the voters within the
boundaries of the public transportation benefit area voting on a
proposition at a general or special election.
(4) To fix rates, tolls, fares, and charges for the use of such
facilities and to establish various routes and classes of service.
Fares or charges may be adjusted or eliminated for any distinguishable
class of users including, but not limited to, senior citizens,
((handicapped)) persons with disabilities, and students.
In the event any person holding a certificate of public convenience
and necessity from the Washington utilities and transportation
commission under RCW 81.68.040 has operated under such certificate for
a continuous period of one year prior to the date of certification and
is offering service within the public transportation benefit area on
the date of the certification by the county canvassing board that a
majority of votes cast authorize a tax to be levied and collected by
the public transportation benefit area authority, such authority may by
purchase or condemnation acquire at the fair market value, from the
person holding the existing certificate for providing the services,
that portion of the operating authority and equipment representing the
services within the area of public operation. The person holding such
existing certificate may require the public transportation benefit area
authority to initiate such purchase of those assets of such person,
existing as of the date of the county canvassing board certification,
within sixty days after the date of such certification.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 35.58 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to any other authority provided by law, any
metropolitan municipal corporation authorized to perform the function
of public transportation may, to carry out the purposes of providing
public transportation, impose the following taxes, fees, and charges:
(a) A sales and use tax in accordance with RCW 82.14.045;
(b) A vehicle fee in accordance with section 7 of this act; and
(c) An excise tax in accordance with RCW 35.95.040.
(2) Subject to the requirements of chapter 81.104 RCW, a
metropolitan municipal corporation may elect to seek voter approval of
additional taxes authorized under chapter 81.104 RCW solely for high
capacity transportation purposes.
(3) Except as provided in section 7(1) of this act, the taxes,
fees, and charges listed in subsection (1) of this section may not be
imposed without approval of a majority of the voters within the
boundaries of the metropolitan municipal corporation voting on a
proposition at a general or special election.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.80.005 and 2002 c 56 s 415 are each amended to read
as follows:
((For the purposes of this chapter,)) The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "District" means a regional transportation investment district
created under chapter 36.120 RCW.
(2) "Public transportation system" or "transportation system" means
any metropolitan municipal corporation that may perform the function of
metropolitan public transportation pursuant to chapter 35.58 RCW; any
county performing the public transportation function as authorized in
RCW 36.57.100 and 36.57.110 or that has established a county
transportation authority pursuant to chapter 36.57 RCW; any public
transportation benefit area established pursuant to chapter 36.57A RCW;
and any city that is not located within the boundaries of a
metropolitan municipal corporation, county transportation authority, or
public transportation benefit area, and that owns, operates, or
contracts for the services of a publicly owned or operated system of
transportation. However, "public transportation system" or
"transportation system" means, in respect to any county performing the
public transportation function pursuant to RCW 36.57.100 and 36.57.110,
only that portion of the unincorporated area lying wholly within such
unincorporated transportation benefit area.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 82.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
governing body of a public transportation system may impose by majority
vote an annual vehicle fee of up to twenty dollars per vehicle
registered in the boundaries of the transportation system for each
vehicle subject to license tab fees under RCW 46.16.0621 and for each
vehicle subject to gross weight fees under RCW 46.16.070 with an
unladen weight of six thousand pounds or less.
(2) The governing body of a public transportation system may not
impose a vehicle fee authorized under subsection (1) of this section:
(a) For a passenger-only ferry transportation improvement, unless
the vehicle fee is first approved by a majority of the voters within
the jurisdiction of the public transportation system; or
(b) If, combined with vehicle license fees initially imposed within
its boundaries under RCW 82.80.140(2)(a) after September 1, 2010, the
combined fees exceed twenty dollars. If such combined fees exceed
twenty dollars, a credit must be provided so that the combined fees
imposed do not exceed twenty dollars.
(3) The governing body of a public transportation system may seek
voter approval of up to thirty dollars of an annual vehicle fee
described in subsection (1) of this section if the public
transportation system has within its boundaries some or all of a county
with a population of more than one million, more than five hundred
thousand that adjoins a county with a population of more than one
million, or more than two hundred thousand that adjoins a county with
a population of more than five hundred thousand.
(4) A single vehicle may not be subject to an annual vehicle fee
authorized under this section or subject to combined vehicle fees
authorized under this section and RCW 82.80.140 that exceed one hundred
dollars. If the governing body of a transportation benefit district or
transportation system imposes or obtains voter approval for increased
fees under this section or RCW 82.80.140 that, if combined with the
vehicle fees previously imposed by another transportation benefit
district or transportation system within its boundaries, exceed one
hundred dollars, the transportation benefit district or transportation
system shall provide a credit for the previously imposed fees so that
the combined vehicle fee does not exceed one hundred dollars.
(5) A public transportation system shall contract with the
department of licensing as provided under section 9 of this act for
collection of the vehicle fee.
(6) A vehicle fee imposed under this section may not be assessed
until six months after approval.
(7) A vehicle fee imposed under this section applies only for
vehicle registration renewals and is effective upon the registration
renewal date as provided by the department of licensing.
(8) The following vehicles are exempt from the vehicle fee imposed
under this section:
(a) Farm tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and
46.04.181;
(b) Off-road vehicles and nonhighway vehicles as defined in RCW
46.09.020;
(c) Vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW and the
international registration plan; and
(d) Snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.10.010.
(9) The authority to impose a vehicle fee authorized in this
section expires with registrations that expire no later than December
31, 2014.
(10) This section expires June 30, 2015.

Sec. 8 RCW 82.80.140 and 2007 c 329 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the provisions of RCW 36.73.065, a transportation
benefit district under chapter 36.73 RCW may fix and impose an annual
vehicle fee, not to exceed one hundred dollars per vehicle registered
in the district, for each vehicle subject to license tab fees under RCW
46.16.0621 and for each vehicle subject to gross weight fees under RCW
46.16.070 with an unladen weight of six thousand pounds or less.
(2)(a) A district that includes all the territory within the
boundaries of the jurisdiction, or jurisdictions, establishing the
district may impose by a majority vote of the governing board of the
district up to twenty dollars of the vehicle fee authorized in
subsection (1) of this section. If the district is countywide, the
revenues of the fee shall be distributed to each city within the county
by interlocal agreement. The interlocal agreement is effective when
approved by the county and sixty percent of the cities representing
seventy-five percent of the population of the cities within the county
in which the countywide fee is collected.
(b) A district may not impose a fee under this subsection (2):
(i) For a passenger-only ferry transportation improvement unless
the vehicle fee is first approved by a majority of the voters within
the jurisdiction of the district; or
(ii) That, if combined with the fees ((previously)) imposed after
July 1, 2010, by another district within its boundaries under RCW
36.73.065(4)(a)(i) or by the governing body of a public transportation
system within the district's boundaries under section 7 of this act,
exceeds twenty dollars.
(c) If a district imposes or increases a fee under this subsection
(2) that, if combined with the fees ((previously)) imposed after July
1, 2010, by another district within its boundaries or by the governing
body of a public transportation system within the district's boundaries
under section 7 of this act, exceeds twenty dollars, the district shall
provide a credit for the previously imposed fees so that the combined
vehicle fee does not exceed twenty dollars.
(3) ((The department of licensing shall administer and collect the
fee. The department shall deduct a percentage amount, as provided by
contract, not to exceed one percent of the fees collected, for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The department
shall remit remaining proceeds to the custody of the state treasurer.
The state treasurer shall distribute the proceeds to the district on a
monthly basis.
(4))) A single vehicle may not be subject to an annual vehicle fee
under this section or section 7 of this act, including combined vehicle
fees imposed under this section and section 7 of this act, that exceeds
one hundred dollars. If a transportation benefit district or
transportation system imposes or obtains voter approval for increased
fees under this section or section 7 of this act that, if combined with
the vehicle fees previously imposed or authorized by another
transportation benefit district or transportation system within its
boundaries, exceeds one hundred dollars, the transportation benefit
district or transportation system shall provide a credit for the
previously imposed fees so that the combined vehicle fee does not
exceed one hundred dollars.
(4) A transportation benefit district shall contract with the
department of licensing as provided under section 9 of this act for
collection of the vehicle fee.
(5) No fee under this section may be ((collected)) assessed until
six months after approval under RCW 36.73.065.
(((5))) (6) The vehicle fee under this section applies only when
renewing a vehicle registration, and is effective upon the registration
renewal date as provided by the department of licensing.
(((6))) (7) The following vehicles are exempt from the fee under
this section:
(a) Farm tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and
46.04.181;
(b) Off-road vehicles and nonhighway vehicles as defined in RCW
46.09.020;
(c) Vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW and the
international registration plan; and
(d) Snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.10.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW
to read as follows:
Whenever the department enters into a contract with a public
transportation system as defined in RCW 82.80.005 or a transportation
benefit district as provided in chapter 36.73 RCW for the collection of
vehicle fees under section 7 of this act or RCW 82.80.140:
(1) The contract must require that the public transportation system
or transportation benefit district provide any information specified by
the department to identify the vehicle owners who owe the vehicle fees,
and must specify that it is the responsibility of the public
transportation system or transportation benefit district to ensure that
the vehicle fees are appropriately applied;
(2) The department is not responsible for the collection of any
vehicle fees until a date agreed to by both parties as specified in the
contract;
(3) The department shall deduct a percentage amount, as provided in
the contract, necessary to reimburse the department for the costs
incurred for collection of the vehicle fees; and
(4) The department shall remit remaining proceeds to the custody of
the state treasurer. The state treasurer shall distribute the proceeds
to the public transportation system or transportation benefit district
on a monthly basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1)(a) The joint transportation committee
shall convene an advisory panel on public transit system funding to:
Provide the legislature, public transit providers, and agencies having
public transportation duties with a forum to discuss operating and
capital needs of public transit agencies; identify funding options; and
develop a blueprint for public transit services that will serve to
guide investments in public transit and to establish a plan to improve
service, public access to public transit, and connectivity between
public transit providers across jurisdictional boundaries.
(b) The cochairs of the joint transportation committee shall
appoint and convene the advisory panel to be comprised of members as
provided in this subsection:
(i) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate.
(ii) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house
of representatives.
(iii) One representative of the department of transportation's
public transportation division.
(iv) Two representatives of users of public transportation systems,
one of which must represent persons with special needs.
(v) Three representatives from transit agencies from a list
recommended by the Washington state transit association.
(vi) Two representatives from regional transportation planning
organizations, one representing eastern Washington and one representing
western Washington.
(vii) Three representatives of employers at or owners of major work
sites in Washington.
(viii) The chief executive officer, or the chief executive
officer's designee, of a regional transit authority.
(ix) Two representatives of organizations that address primarily
environmental issues.
(2) The blueprint for statewide public transit developed by the
advisory panel must be consistent with the state's transportation
system policy goals provided in RCW 47.04.280 and the statewide
transportation plan provided in RCW 47.01.071(4). The blueprint must,
at a minimum: Identify operating and capital needs of public transit
agencies; identify funding options; make recommendations regarding how
state transportation investments can improve access to public transit;
develop a plan for public transit services that will serve to guide
investments in public transit; and establish a plan to improve service,
public access to public transit, and connectivity between public
transit providers across jurisdictional boundaries.
(3) The advisory panel may, when appropriate, consult with
individuals from the public and private sectors.
(4) Nonlegislative members must seek reimbursement for travel and
other membership expenses through their respective agencies or
organizations.
(5) Panel expenditures are subject to approval by the joint
transportation committee.
(6) Staff support for the panel must be provided for by the joint
transportation committee and the Washington state transit association.
(7) The panel shall submit an interim progress report to the
transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2010. A
final report must be submitted by December 1, 2011, which must contain,
at a minimum, a blueprint for statewide public transportation services
and corresponding funding and investment recommendations.
(8) This section expires June 30, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 If specific funding for the purposes of
section 10 of this act, referencing section 10 of this act by bill or
chapter number and section number, is not provided by June 30, 2010, in
the omnibus transportation appropriations act, section 10 of this act
is null and void.

--- END ---