BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.185C.040 and 2009 c 518 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Six months after the first Washington homeless census, the
department shall, in consultation with the interagency council on
homelessness and the affordable housing advisory board, prepare and
publish a ten-year homeless housing strategic plan which shall outline
statewide goals and performance measures and shall be coordinated with
the plan for homeless families with children required under RCW
43.63A.650. To guide local governments in preparation of their first
local homeless housing plans due December 31, 2005, the department
shall issue by October 15, 2005, temporary guidelines consistent with
this chapter and including the best available data on each community's
homeless population. Local governments' ten-year homeless housing
plans shall not be substantially inconsistent with the goals and
program recommendations of the temporary guidelines and, when amended
after 2005, the state strategic plan.
(2) Program outcomes and performance measures and goals shall be
created by the department and reflected in the department's homeless
housing strategic plan as well as interim goals against which state and
local governments' performance may be measured, including:
(a) By the end of year one, completion of the first census as
described in RCW 43.185C.030;
(b) By the end of each subsequent year, goals common to all local
programs which are measurable and the achievement of which would move
that community toward housing its homeless population; and
(c) By July 1, 2015, reduction of the homeless population statewide
and in each county by fifty percent.
(3) The department shall develop a consistent statewide data
gathering instrument to monitor the performance of cities and counties
receiving grants in order to determine compliance with the terms and
conditions set forth in the grant application or required by the
department.
The department shall, in consultation with the interagency council
on homelessness and the affordable housing advisory board, report
biennially to the governor and the appropriate committees of the
legislature an assessment of the state's performance in furthering the
goals of the state ten-year homeless housing strategic plan and the
performance of each participating local government in creating and
executing a local homeless housing plan which meets the requirements of
this chapter. The annual report may include performance measures such
as:
(a) The reduction in the number of homeless individuals and
families from the initial count of homeless persons;
(b) The number of new units available and affordable for homeless
families by housing type;
(c) The number of homeless individuals identified who are not
offered suitable housing within thirty days of their request or
identification as homeless;
(d) The number of households at risk of losing housing who maintain
it due to a preventive intervention;
(e) The transition time from homelessness to permanent housing;
(f) The cost per person housed at each level of the housing
continuum;
(g) The ability to successfully collect data and report
performance;
(h) The extent of collaboration and coordination among public
bodies, as well as community stakeholders, and the level of community
support and participation;
(i) The quality and safety of housing provided; and
(j) The effectiveness of outreach to homeless persons, and their
satisfaction with the program.
(4) Annually, based on the performance of local homeless housing
programs in meeting their interim goals, on general population changes
and on changes in the homeless population recorded in the annual
census, the department ((may)) must revise the performance measures and
goals of the state homeless housing strategic plan, set or adjust goals
for years following the initial ten-year period, and recommend changes
in local governments' plans.

--- END ---