BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.76.290 and 1993 c 77 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board shall coordinate educational activities among all
segments of higher education taking into account the educational
programs, facilities, and other resources of both public and
independent two and four-year colleges and universities. The four-year
institutions and the state board for community and technical colleges
shall coordinate information and activities with the board. The board
shall have the following additional responsibilities:
(1) Promote interinstitutional cooperation;
(2) Establish minimum admission standards for four-year
institutions, including a requirement that coursework in American sign
language or an American Indian language shall satisfy any requirement
for instruction in a language other than English that the board or the
institutions may establish as a general undergraduate admissions
requirement;
(3) Establish transfer policies;
(4) Adopt rules implementing statutory residency requirements;
(5) Develop and administer reciprocity agreements with bordering
states and the province of British Columbia;
(6) Review and recommend compensation practices and levels for
administrative employees, exempt under chapter 28B.16 RCW, and faculty
using comparative data from peer institutions;
(7) Monitor higher education activities for compliance with all
relevant state policies for higher education;
(8) Arbitrate disputes between and among four-year institutions or
between and among four-year institutions and community colleges at the
request of one or more of the institutions involved, or at the request
of the governor, or from a resolution adopted by the legislature. The
decision of the board shall be binding on the participants in the
dispute;
(9) Establish and implement a state system for collecting,
analyzing, and distributing information;
(10) Recommend to the governor and the legislature ways to remove
any economic incentives to use off-campus program funds for on-campus
activities; ((and))
(11) Make recommendations to increase minority participation, and
monitor and report on the progress of minority participation in higher
education; and
(12) In partnership with the state universities, regional
universities, the state college, and the education data center, by July
1, 2010, develop a common set of data definitions and methodologies for
generating the following measures:
(a) Cost of instruction per resident undergraduate student full-time equivalent for lower division instruction and upper division
instruction;
(b) Total institutional funding by source displayed as a percentage
of total institutional budget;
(c) Average per full-time equivalent state funding allocation for
resident undergraduate students;
(d) Average salary and benefits for full-time faculty and staff;
(e) Percentage of employees in various categories including but not
limited to tenure-track faculty, nontenure-track faculty, classified,
and exempt administration;
(f) Student-to-teaching faculty ratio;
(g) Student-to-staff ratio;
(h) Average credits awarded per student per year;
(i) Percent of freshman, sophomore, junior, and senior students who
declare a major during the academic year;
(j) Percent of freshman, sophomore, junior, and senior students who
declare a major identified by the institution as high demand during the
academic year;
(k) Percent of first time, full-time freshman who earn a degree
within four, five, and six years, displayed by race and ethnicity and
receipt of student financial assistance;
(l) Employment rates within three quarters of graduation;
(m) Employment rates by industry by field of study;
(n) Top ten highest compensated public employees in each
institution, including their salary and benefit information; and
(o) The percent of courses taken at community and technical
colleges that are accepted through academic transfer policies at each
institution.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.41.400 and 2009 c 548 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An education data center shall be established in the office of
financial management. The education data center shall jointly, with
the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee,
conduct collaborative analyses of early learning, K-12, and higher
education programs and education issues across the P-20 system, which
includes the department of early learning, the superintendent of public
instruction, the professional educator standards board, the state board
of education, the state board for community and technical colleges, the
workforce training and education coordinating board, the higher
education coordinating board, public and private nonprofit four-year
institutions of higher education, and the employment security
department. The education data center shall conduct collaborative
analyses under this section with the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee and provide data electronically to the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, to the
extent permitted by state and federal confidentiality requirements.
The education data center shall be considered an authorized
representative of the state educational agencies in this section under
applicable federal and state statutes for purposes of accessing and
compiling student record data for research purposes.
(2) The education data center shall:
(a) In consultation with the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee and the agencies and organizations
participating in the education data center, identify the critical
research and policy questions that are intended to be addressed by the
education data center and the data needed to address the questions;
(b) Coordinate with other state education agencies to compile and
analyze education data, including data on student demographics that is
disaggregated by distinct ethnic categories within racial subgroups,
and complete P-20 research projects;
(c) Collaborate with the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee and the education and fiscal committees of the
legislature in identifying the data to be compiled and analyzed to
ensure that legislative interests are served;
(d) Annually provide to the K-12 data governance group a list of
data elements and data quality improvements that are necessary to
answer the research and policy questions identified by the education
data center and have been identified by the legislative committees in
(c) of this subsection. Within three months of receiving the list, the
K-12 data governance group shall develop and transmit to the education
data center a feasibility analysis of obtaining or improving the data,
including the steps required, estimated time frame, and the financial
and other resources that would be required. Based on the analysis, the
education data center shall submit, if necessary, a recommendation to
the legislature regarding any statutory changes or resources that would
be needed to collect or improve the data;
(e) Monitor and evaluate the education data collection systems of
the organizations and agencies represented in the education data center
ensuring that data systems are flexible, able to adapt to evolving
needs for information, and to the extent feasible and necessary,
include data that are needed to conduct the analyses and provide
answers to the research and policy questions identified in (a) of this
subsection;
(f) Track enrollment and outcomes through the public centralized
higher education enrollment system;
(g) Assist other state educational agencies' collaborative efforts
to develop a long-range enrollment plan for higher education including
estimates to meet demographic and workforce needs;
(h) Provide research that focuses on student transitions within and
among the early learning, K-12, and higher education sectors in the P-20 system; ((and))
(i) Make recommendations to the legislature as necessary to help
ensure the goals and objectives of this section and RCW 28A.655.210 and
28A.300.507 are met; and
(j) Beginning July 1, 2011, and annually thereafter, display the
institutional data submissions developed in RCW 28B.76.290 on the
education data center's web site. The data must be displayed in an
easy to read fashion and include data submissions from previous years.
(3) The department of early learning, superintendent of public
instruction, professional educator standards board, state board of
education, state board for community and technical colleges, workforce
training and education coordinating board, higher education
coordinating board, public four-year institutions of higher education,
and employment security department shall work with the education data
center to develop data-sharing and research agreements, consistent with
applicable security and confidentiality requirements, to facilitate the
work of the center. Private, nonprofit institutions of higher
education that provide programs of education beyond the high school
level leading at least to the baccalaureate degree and are accredited
by the Northwest association of schools and colleges or their peer
accreditation bodies may also develop data-sharing and research
agreements with the education data center, consistent with applicable
security and confidentiality requirements. The education data center
shall make data from collaborative analyses available to the education
agencies and institutions that contribute data to the education data
center to the extent allowed by federal and state security and
confidentiality requirements applicable to the data of each
contributing agency or institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.76 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Annually, on a schedule to be determined jointly by the board
and the education data center, the state universities, regional
universities, and the state college shall complete the data developed
under RCW 28B.76.290 and transmit it to the education data center.
(2) The board may validate the data once every six academic years.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.20.130 and 2004 c 275 s 52 are each amended to
read as follows:
General powers and duties of the board of regents are as follows:
(1) To have full control of the university and its property of
various kinds, except as otherwise provided by law.
(2)(a) To employ the president of the university, his or her
assistants, members of the faculty, and employees of the institution,
who except as otherwise provided by law, shall hold their positions
during the pleasure of said board of regents.
(b) In employing the president of the university, the board has
full authority for setting the compensation of the president. However,
any employment contract entered into between the board and the
president on or after the effective date of this section is subject to
the following limitations:
(i) Compensation other than the base salary may not be paid from
the general fund state account; and
(ii) A compensation contract between the board and the president of
the university that fails to comply with the terms in this subsection
is void and unenforceable.
(3) Establish entrance requirements for students seeking admission
to the university which meet or exceed the standards specified under
RCW 28B.76.290(2). Completion of examinations satisfactory to the
university may be a prerequisite for entrance by any applicant at the
university's discretion. Evidence of completion of public high schools
and other educational institutions whose courses of study meet the
approval of the university may be acceptable for entrance.
(4) Establish such colleges, schools, or departments necessary to
carry out the purpose of the university and not otherwise proscribed by
law.
(5) With the assistance of the faculty of the university, prescribe
the course of study in the various colleges, schools, and departments
of the institution and publish the necessary catalogues thereof.
(6) Grant to students such certificates or degrees as recommended
for such students by the faculty. The board, upon recommendation of
the faculty, may also confer honorary degrees upon persons other than
graduates of this university in recognition of their learning or
devotion to literature, art, or science: PROVIDED, That no degree
shall ever be conferred in consideration of the payment of money or the
giving of property of whatsoever kind.
(7) Accept such gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises,
whether real or personal property, or both, in trust or otherwise, for
the use or benefit of the university, its colleges, schools,
departments, or agencies; and sell, lease or exchange, invest or expend
the same or the proceeds, rents, profits, and income thereof except as
limited by the terms of said gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and
devises. The board shall adopt proper rules to govern and protect the
receipt and expenditure of the proceeds of all fees, and the proceeds,
rents, profits, and income of all gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests,
and devises above-mentioned.
(8) Except as otherwise provided by law, to enter into such
contracts as the regents deem essential to university purposes.
(9) To submit upon request such reports as will be helpful to the
governor and to the legislature in providing for the institution.
(10) Subject to the approval of the higher education coordinating
board pursuant to RCW 28B.76.230, offer new degree programs, offer off-campus programs, participate in consortia or centers, contract for off-campus educational programs, and purchase or lease major off-campus
facilities.

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.30.150 and 2004 c 275 s 53 are each amended to
read as follows:
The regents of Washington State University, in addition to other
duties prescribed by law, shall:
(1) Have full control of the university and its property of various
kinds, except as otherwise provided by law.
(2)(a) Employ the president of the university, his or her
assistants, members of the faculty, and employees of the university,
who, except as otherwise provided by law, shall hold their positions
during the pleasure of said board of regents.
(b) In employing the president of the university, the board has
full authority for setting the compensation of the president. However,
any employment contract entered into between the board and the
president on or after the effective date of this section is subject to
the following limitations:
(i) Compensation other than the base salary may not be paid from
the general fund state account; and
(ii) A compensation contract between the board and the president of
the university that fails to comply with the terms in this subsection
is void and unenforceable.
(3) Establish entrance requirements for students seeking admission
to the university which meet or exceed the standards specified under
RCW 28B.76.290(2). Completion of examinations satisfactory to the
university may be a prerequisite for entrance by any applicant, at the
university's discretion. Evidence of completion of public high schools
and other educational institutions whose courses of study meet the
approval of the university may be acceptable for entrance.
(4) Establish such colleges, schools, or departments necessary to
carry out the purpose of the university and not otherwise proscribed by
law.
(5) Subject to the approval of the higher education coordinating
board pursuant to RCW 28B.76.230, offer new degree programs, offer off-campus programs, participate in consortia or centers, contract for off-campus educational programs, and purchase or lease major off-campus
facilities.
(6) With the assistance of the faculty of the university, prescribe
the courses of instruction in the various colleges, schools, and
departments of the institution and publish the necessary catalogues
thereof.
(7) Collect such information as the board deems desirable as to the
schemes of technical instruction adopted in other parts of the United
States and foreign countries.
(8) Provide for holding agricultural institutes including farm
marketing forums.
(9) Provide that instruction given in the university, as far as
practicable, be conveyed by means of laboratory work and provide in
connection with the university one or more physical, chemical, and
biological laboratories, and suitably furnish and equip the same.
(10) Provide training in military tactics for those students
electing to participate therein.
(11) Establish a department of elementary science and in connection
therewith provide instruction in elementary mathematics, including
elementary trigonometry, elementary mechanics, elementary and
mechanical drawing, and land surveying.
(12) Establish a department of agriculture and in connection
therewith provide instruction in physics with special application of
its principles to agriculture, chemistry with special application of
its principles to agriculture, morphology and physiology of plants with
special reference to common grown crops and fungus enemies, morphology
and physiology of the lower forms of animal life, with special
reference to insect pests, morphology and physiology of the higher
forms of animal life and in particular of the horse, cow, sheep, and
swine, agriculture with special reference to the breeding and feeding
of livestock and the best mode of cultivation of farm produce, and
mining and metallurgy, appointing demonstrators in each of these
subjects to superintend the equipment of a laboratory and to give
practical instruction therein.
(13) Establish agricultural experiment stations in connection with
the department of agriculture, including at least one in the western
portion of the state, and appoint the officers and prescribe
regulations for their management.
(14) Grant to students such certificates or degrees, as recommended
for such students by the faculty.
(15) Confer honorary degrees upon persons other than graduates of
the university in recognition of their learning or devotion to
literature, art, or science when recommended thereto by the faculty:
PROVIDED, That no degree shall ever be conferred in consideration of
the payment of money or the giving of property of whatsoever kind.
(16) Adopt plans and specifications for university buildings and
facilities or improvements thereto and employ skilled architects and
engineers to prepare such plans and specifications and supervise the
construction of buildings or facilities which the board is authorized
to erect, and fix the compensation for such services. The board shall
enter into contracts with one or more contractors for such suitable
buildings, facilities, or improvements as the available funds will
warrant, upon the most advantageous terms offered at a public
competitive letting, pursuant to public notice under rules established
by the board. The board shall require of all persons with whom they
contract for construction and improvements a good and sufficient bond
for the faithful performance of the work and full protection against
all liens.
(17) Except as otherwise provided by law, direct the disposition of
all money appropriated to or belonging to the state university.
(18) Receive and expend the money appropriated under the act of
congress approved May 8, 1914, entitled "An Act to provide for
cooperative agricultural extension work between the agricultural
colleges in the several States receiving the benefits of the Act of
Congress approved July 2, 1862, and Acts supplemental thereto and the
United States Department of Agriculture" and organize and conduct
agricultural extension work in connection with the state university in
accordance with the terms and conditions expressed in the acts of
congress.
(19) Except as otherwise provided by law, to enter into such
contracts as the regents deem essential to university purposes.
(20) Acquire by lease, gift, or otherwise, lands necessary to
further the work of the university or for experimental or
demonstrational purposes.
(21) Establish and maintain at least one agricultural experiment
station in an irrigation district to conduct investigational work upon
the principles and practices of irrigational agriculture including the
utilization of water and its relation to soil types, crops, climatic
conditions, ditch and drain construction, fertility investigations,
plant disease, insect pests, marketing, farm management, utilization of
fruit by-products, and general development of agriculture under
irrigation conditions.
(22) Supervise and control the agricultural experiment station at
Puyallup.
(23) Establish and maintain at Wenatchee an agricultural experiment
substation for the purpose of conducting investigational work upon the
principles and practices of orchard culture, spraying, fertilization,
pollenization, new fruit varieties, fruit diseases and pests, by-products, marketing, management, and general horticultural problems.
(24) Accept such gifts, grants, conveyances, devises, and bequests,
whether real or personal property, in trust or otherwise, for the use
or benefit of the university, its colleges, schools, or departments;
and sell, lease or exchange, invest or expend the same or the proceeds,
rents, profits, and income thereof except as limited by the terms of
said gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises; and adopt
proper rules to govern and protect the receipt and expenditure of the
proceeds of all fees, and the proceeds, rents, profits, and income of
all gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises.
(25) Construct when the board so determines a new foundry and a
mining, physical, technological building, and fabrication shop at the
university, or add to the present foundry and other buildings, in order
that both instruction and research be expanded to include permanent
molding and die casting with a section for new fabricating techniques,
especially for light metals, including magnesium and aluminum; purchase
equipment for the shops and laboratories in mechanical, electrical, and
civil engineering; establish a pilot plant for the extraction of
alumina from native clays and other possible light metal research;
purchase equipment for a research laboratory for technological research
generally; and purchase equipment for research in electronics,
instrumentation, energy sources, plastics, food technology, mechanics
of materials, hydraulics, and similar fields.
(26) Make and transmit to the governor and members of the
legislature upon request such reports as will be helpful in providing
for the institution.

Sec. 6 RCW 28B.35.120 and 2006 c 263 s 824 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to any other powers and duties prescribed by law, each
board of trustees of the respective regional universities:
(1) Shall have full control of the regional university and its
property of various kinds, except as otherwise provided by law.
(2)(a) Shall employ the president of the regional university, his
or her assistants, members of the faculty, and other employees of the
institution, who, except as otherwise provided by law, shall hold their
positions, until discharged therefrom by the board for good and lawful
reason.
(b) In employing the president of the university, the board has
full authority for setting the compensation of the president. However,
any employment contract entered into between the board and the
president on or after the effective date of this section is subject to
the following limitations:
(i) Compensation other than the base salary may not be paid from
the general fund state account; and
(ii) A compensation contract between the board and the president of
the university that fails to comply with the terms in this subsection
is void and unenforceable.
(3) With the assistance of the faculty of the regional university,
shall prescribe the course of study in the various schools and
departments thereof and publish such catalogues thereof as the board
deems necessary: PROVIDED, That the Washington professional educator
standards board shall determine the requisites for and give program
approval of all courses leading to teacher certification by such board.
(4) Establish such divisions, schools or departments necessary to
carry out the purposes of the regional university and not otherwise
proscribed by law.
(5) Except as otherwise provided by law, may establish and erect
such new facilities as determined by the board to be necessary for the
regional university.
(6) May acquire real and other property as provided in RCW
28B.10.020, as now or hereafter amended.
(7) Except as otherwise provided by law, may purchase all supplies
and purchase or lease equipment and other personal property needed for
the operation or maintenance of the regional university.
(8) May establish, lease, operate, equip and maintain self-supporting facilities in the manner provided in RCW 28B.10.300 through
28B.10.330, as now or hereafter amended.
(9) Except as otherwise provided by law, to enter into such
contracts as the trustees deem essential to regional university
purposes.
(10) May receive such gifts, grants, conveyances, devises and
bequests of real or personal property from whatsoever source, as may be
made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, whenever the terms and
conditions thereof will aid in carrying out the regional university
programs; sell, lease or exchange, invest or expend the same or the
proceeds, rents, profits and income thereof except as limited by the
terms and conditions thereof; and adopt ((regulations)) rules to govern
the receipt and expenditure of the proceeds, rents, profits and income
thereof.
(11) Subject to the approval of the higher education coordinating
board pursuant to RCW 28B.76.230, offer new degree programs, offer off-campus programs, participate in consortia or centers, contract for off-campus educational programs, and purchase or lease major off-campus
facilities.
(12) May ((promulgate)) adopt such rules ((and regulations)), and
perform all other acts not forbidden by law, as the board of trustees
may in its discretion deem necessary or appropriate to the
administration of the regional university.

Sec. 7 RCW 28B.40.120 and 2006 c 263 s 825 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to any other powers and duties prescribed by law, the
board of trustees of The Evergreen State College:
(1) Shall have full control of the state college and its property
of various kinds, except as otherwise provided by law.
(2)(a) Shall employ the president of the state college, his or her
assistants, members of the faculty, and other employees of the
institution, who, except as otherwise provided by law, shall hold their
positions, until discharged therefrom by the board for good and lawful
reason.
(b) In employing the president of the state college, the board has
full authority for setting the compensation of the president. However,
any employment contract entered into between the board and the
president on or after the effective date of this section is subject to
the following limitations:
(i) Compensation other than the base salary may not be paid from
the general fund state account; and
(ii) A compensation contract between the board and the president of
the state college that fails to comply with the terms in this
subsection is void and unenforceable.
(3) With the assistance of the faculty of the state college, shall
prescribe the course of study in the various schools and departments
thereof and publish such catalogues thereof as the board deems
necessary: PROVIDED, That the Washington professional educator
standards board shall determine the requisites for and give program
approval of all courses leading to teacher certification by such board.
(4) Establish such divisions, schools or departments necessary to
carry out the purposes of the college and not otherwise proscribed by
law.
(5) Except as otherwise provided by law, may establish and erect
such new facilities as determined by the board to be necessary for the
college.
(6) May acquire real and other property as provided in RCW
28B.10.020, as now or hereafter amended.
(7) Except as otherwise provided by law, may purchase all supplies
and purchase or lease equipment and other personal property needed for
the operation or maintenance of the college.
(8) May establish, lease, operate, equip and maintain self-supporting facilities in the manner provided in RCW 28B.10.300 through
28B.10.330, as now or hereafter amended.
(9) Except as otherwise provided by law, to enter into such
contracts as the trustees deem essential to college purposes.
(10) May receive such gifts, grants, conveyances, devises and
bequests of real or personal property from whatsoever source, as may be
made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, whenever the terms and
conditions thereof will aid in carrying out the college programs; sell,
lease or exchange, invest or expend the same or the proceeds, rents,
profits and income thereof except as limited by the terms and
conditions thereof; and adopt ((regulations)) rules to govern the
receipt and expenditure of the proceeds, rents, profits and income
thereof.
(11) Subject to the approval of the higher education coordinating
board pursuant to RCW 28B.76.230, offer new degree programs, offer off-campus programs, participate in consortia or centers, contract for off-campus educational programs, and purchase or lease major off-campus
facilities.
(12) May ((promulgate)) adopt such rules ((and regulations)), and
perform all other acts not forbidden by law, as the board of trustees
may in its discretion deem necessary or appropriate to the
administration of the college.

--- END ---