BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 5.28.010 and 1995 c 292 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every court, judge, clerk of a court, state certified court
reporter, or notary public, is authorized to take testimony in any
action, suit or proceeding, and such other persons in particular cases
as authorized by law. Every such court or officer is authorized to
collect fees established under RCW 36.18.020 and 36.18.012 through
36.18.018 and to administer oaths and affirmations generally and to
every such other person in such particular case as authorized.

--- END ---