BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 INTENT. (1) The legislature finds that
persons who have been wrongfully convicted and imprisoned for crimes
they did not commit have been uniquely victimized and have suffered
substantial injustice. The legislature also finds that those persons
do not have adequate legal redress to recover damages and restore their
lives. Thus, the legislature intends to create a civil cause of action
that is above and beyond any existing tort remedy and that is
specifically created to address the unique situation faced by those who
have been wrongfully convicted and imprisoned.
(2) The legislature also recognizes that persons who have been
wrongfully convicted and imprisoned may need more than monetary damages
to assist them in restoring their lives. The legislature finds that
programs such as Washington's corrections clearinghouse and reentry
services established by the department of corrections offer valuable
workforce training, educational services, and other resources that can
help offenders reintegrate back into society. The legislature
encourages the courts to assist persons who have been wrongfully
convicted and imprisoned in accessing these resources. In addition,
because of the wrongfully convicted person's substantial burden of
proof required under this legislation before the person can recover
damages, the legislature encourages the court, in exercising its
discretion regarding the weight and admissibility of evidence, to give
due consideration to difficulties of proof caused by the passage of
time, the death or unavailability of witnesses, the destruction of
evidence, or other factors not caused by the wrongfully convicted
person or those acting on his or her behalf.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 STATEMENT OF CLAIM. (1) Any person
convicted in a court in this state and subsequently imprisoned for one
or more felonies which he or she was wrongfully convicted may file a
claim for damages against the state.
(2) If the person is incapacitated and incapable of filing the
claim, or if he or she is a minor, or is a nonresident of the state,
the claim may be filed on behalf of that person by any relative,
attorney, or agent acting as the person's representative. However, if
the person entitled to file a claim under subsection (1) of this
section is deceased, no claim may be brought on his or her behalf.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 VENUE AND SERVICE OF PROCESS. (1) All
claims of wrongful conviction and imprisonment shall be filed in
superior court. The venue for such actions shall be governed by RCW
4.92.010.
(2) Service of the summons and complaint shall be governed by RCW
4.92.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 PRESENTATION OF CLAIM. (1) In order to file
an actionable claim for wrongful conviction and imprisonment, the
claimant must establish by documentary evidence that:
(a) The claimant has been convicted of one or more felonies in
state court and subsequently sentenced to a term of imprisonment, and
has served all or part of the sentence;
(b) The claimant is not currently incarcerated for any offense;
(c)(i) The claimant has been pardoned on grounds consistent with
innocence for the felony or felonies for which the claimant was
sentenced and which are grounds for the complaint; or
(ii) The claimant's judgment of conviction was reversed or vacated
and the accusatory instrument dismissed or, if a new trial was ordered,
either the claimant was found not guilty at the new trial or the
claimant was not retried and the accusatory instrument dismissed;
provided that the judgment of conviction was reversed or vacated, or
the accusatory instrument was dismissed, on grounds consistent with
innocence or because the statute on which the accusatory instrument was
based or the application of the statute violated the Constitution of
the United States or the state Constitution; and
(d) The claim is not time-barred by the provisions of section 9 of
this act.
(2) In addition to the requirements in subsection (1) of this
section, the claim shall state facts in sufficient detail to permit the
court to determine whether the claimant is likely to succeed at trial
in proving that:
(a) The claimant did not commit any of the acts charged in the
accusatory instrument or the claimant's acts or omissions charged in
the accusatory instrument did not constitute a crime; and
(b) The claimant did not commit or suborn perjury, or fabricate
evidence to cause or bring about the conviction. A guilty plea to a
crime the claimant did not commit, or a confession that is later proven
to be false, does not constitute perjury or fabricated evidence under
this subsection.
(3) The claimant shall verify the claim unless he or she is
incapacitated, in which case the person filing on behalf of the
claimant shall verify the claim.
(4)(a) If the court finds after reading the claim that the claimant
is not likely to succeed at trial, it shall dismiss the claim, either
on its own motion or on the motion of the state.
(b) If the court dismisses the claim, the court shall set forth the
reasons for its decision in written findings of fact and conclusions of
law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 RIGHT OF APPEAL. Any party is entitled to
the rights of appeal afforded parties in a civil action following a
decision on such motions. In the case of dismissal of a claim, review
of the superior court action shall be de novo.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 JUDGMENT AND AWARD. (1) In order to obtain
a judgment in his or her favor, the claimant must show by clear and
convincing evidence that:
(a) The claimant was convicted of one or more felonies in state
court and subsequently sentenced to a term of imprisonment, and has
served all or any part of the sentence;
(b) The claimant is not currently incarcerated for any offense;
(c)(i) The claimant has been pardoned on grounds consistent with
innocence for the felony or felonies for which the claimant was
sentenced and which are the grounds for the complaint; or
(ii) The claimant's judgment of conviction was reversed or vacated
and the accusatory instrument dismissed or, if a new trial was ordered,
either the claimant was found not guilty at the new trial or the
claimant was not retried and the accusatory instrument dismissed;
provided that the judgment of conviction was reversed or vacated, or
the accusatory instrument was dismissed, on grounds consistent with
innocence or because the statute on which the accusatory instrument was
based or the application of the statute violated the Constitution of
the United States or the state Constitution;
(d) The claimant did not commit any of the acts charged in the
accusatory instrument, or the claimant's acts or omissions charged in
the accusatory instrument did not constitute a crime; and
(e) The claimant did not commit or suborn perjury, or fabricate
evidence to cause or bring about his or her conviction. A guilty plea
to a crime the claimant did not commit, or a confession that is later
proven to be false, does not constitute perjury or fabricated evidence
under this subsection.
(2) Any pardon or proclamation issued to the claimant by the
governor shall be admissible as evidence when it is certified by the
officer having lawful custody of the pardon or proclamation, with the
seal of the office affixed, or with the official certificate of such
officer.
(3) If the jury or, in the case where the right to a jury is
waived, the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the
claimant was wrongfully convicted and imprisoned, the court shall award
the following damages to the claimant:
(a) Not less than fifty thousand dollars for each year of actual
confinement including time spent awaiting trial, with an additional
fifty thousand dollars for each year served on death row, as adjusted
for partial years served and to account for inflation from the
effective date of this section;
(b) Economic damages including but not limited to loss of earnings,
costs associated with the claimant's criminal defense at trial and on
appeal, restitution paid by the claimant that was a requirement of the
judgment and sentence, and medical expenses for mental and physical
health costs incurred after the claimant's release that are reasonably
related to the claimant's imprisonment;
(c) Compensation for any reasonable reintegrative services, such as
job training, that are paid for by the claimant;
(d) Up to ten years of eligibility to participate in the health
insurance plans and contracts offered by the public employees' benefits
board. The court shall issue an order directing the health care
authority to enroll the claimant as provided for in section 10 of this
act. The court order must specify the amount of time for which the
claimant is eligible to receive benefits and that the claimant shall
not be responsible for any costs associated with participation. The
claimant's eligibility under this subsection shall not extend to the
claimant's spouse or dependents; and
(e) Reasonable attorneys' fees for successfully bringing the
wrongful conviction claim. The attorneys' fees shall be calculated at
ten percent of the damage award plus expenses. However, attorneys'
fees, exclusive of expenses, shall not exceed seventy-five thousand
dollars. These fees shall not be deducted from the compensation due to
the claimant and counsel shall not be entitled to receive additional
fees from the client. The court may not award any attorneys' fees to
the claimant if the claimant fails to prove he or she was wrongfully
convicted and imprisoned.
(4) The damage award shall not include any punitive or noneconomic
damages.
(5) The damage award shall not be offset by any expenses incurred
by the state or any political subdivision of the state including, but
not limited to, expenses incurred to secure the claimant's custody, or
to feed, clothe, or provide medical services for the claimant, nor
shall the court offset against the award the value of any services or
reduction in fees for services to be provided to the claimant as part
of the damages awarded to the claimant pursuant to this section.
(6) The court may order the claimant's record of conviction vacated
if the record has not already been vacated, sealed, expunged, or
destroyed under court rules. The requirements for vacating records
under RCW 9.94A.640 shall not apply.
(7) Upon request of the claimant, the court shall refer the
claimant to the department of corrections for access to the
department's reentry services, if available, including but not limited
to the department's community-based transition programs and long-term
support programs for education, monitoring, mentoring, life skills
training, assessment, job skills development, mental health and
substance abuse treatment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 NOTICE. (1) On or after the effective date
of this section, when a court grants judicial relief, such as reversal
and vacation of a person's conviction, consistent with the criteria
established in section 4(1)(c)(ii) of this act, the court shall provide
to the person at the time the relief is granted a copy of sections 2
through 11 of this act.
(2) The clemency and pardons board or the indeterminate sentence
review board, whichever is applicable, upon issuance of a pardon by the
governor on grounds consistent with innocence on or after the effective
date of this section, shall provide a copy of sections 2 through 11 of
this act to the individual pardoned.
(3) If an individual entitled to receive the information required
under this section shows that he or she was not provided with the
information, he or she shall have an additional twelve months, beyond
the statute of limitations under section 9 of this act, to bring a
claim under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 LEGAL REMEDIES NOT BARRED. (1) The
provisions of this chapter shall not preclude any other legal remedy
available to the claimant to seek redress for the wrongful conviction
and imprisonment.
(2) The state may not assert as a defense to a claim under this
chapter a release dismissal agreement, plea agreement, or any similar
agreement whereby the prosecutor's office or an agent acting on its
behalf agrees to take or refrain from certain action if the accused
individual agrees to forgo legal action against the government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 STATUTE OF LIMITATIONS. Except as provided
in section 7(3) of this act, an action for compensation under this
chapter shall be commenced within three years after either the grant of
a pardon or the grant of judicial relief and satisfaction of other
conditions described in section 5 of this act; provided, however, that
any action by the state challenging or appealing the grant of judicial
relief shall toll the three-year period. Persons who have been
wrongfully convicted, imprisoned, and released from custody before the
effective date of this section may commence an action under this
chapter within five years of the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An individual who was awarded damages under section 6 of this
act is eligible to participate in the health insurance plans and
contracts offered by the public employees' benefits board as prescribed
by court order, and the individual is not responsible for any costs
associated with that participation.
(2) The health care authority, upon receipt of the court order,
must enroll the individual in a health insurance plan in compliance
with the terms and conditions of the court order.
(3) The director shall adopt rules under RCW 41.50.050 as the
director may find necessary to implement this section and to avoid
conflicts with any applicable federal or state laws.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
When a court refers a person to the department under section 6 of
this act as part of the person's judgment in a wrongful conviction
claim, the department shall provide reasonable reentry services to the
person. Nothing in this section requires the department to establish
new reentry programs or services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 SEVERABILITY CLAUSE. If any provision of
this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision
to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this
chapter are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 CODIFICATION DIRECTION. Sections 1 through
9, 12, and 13 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 4 RCW.

--- END ---