BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.28.180 and 2005 c 504 s 501 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Counties may establish and operate mental health courts.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "mental health court" means
a court that has special calendars or dockets designed to achieve a
reduction in recidivism and symptoms of mental illness among
nonviolent, ((mentally ill)) felony and nonfelony offenders with mental
illnesses and recidivism among nonviolent felony and nonfelony
offenders who have intellectual or developmental disabilities or who
have suffered a traumatic brain injury by increasing their likelihood
for successful rehabilitation through early, continuous, and intense
judicially supervised treatment including drug treatment for persons
with co-occurring disorders; mandatory periodic reviews, including drug
testing if indicated; and the use of appropriate sanctions and other
rehabilitation services.
(3)(a) Any jurisdiction that seeks a state appropriation to fund a
mental health court program must first:
(i) Exhaust all federal funding that is available to support the
operations of its mental health court and associated services; and
(ii) Match, on a dollar-for-dollar basis, state moneys allocated
for mental health court programs with local cash or in-kind resources.
Moneys allocated by the state must be used to supplement, not supplant,
other federal, state, and local funds for mental health court
operations and associated services.
(b) Any county that establishes a mental health court pursuant to
this section shall establish minimum requirements for the participation
of offenders in the program. The mental health court may adopt local
requirements that are more stringent than the minimum. The minimum
requirements are:
(i) The offender would benefit from psychiatric treatment or
treatment related to his or her intellectual or developmental
disability or traumatic brain injury;
(ii) The offender has not previously been convicted of a serious
violent offense or sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; and
(iii) Without regard to whether proof of any of these elements is
required to convict, the offender is not currently charged with or
convicted of an offense:
(A) That is a sex offense;
(B) That is a serious violent offense;
(C) During which the defendant used a firearm; or
(D) During which the defendant caused substantial or great bodily
harm or death to another person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.48 RCW
to read as follows:
Jails shall adopt rules and policies providing that if jail staff,
through screening procedures, have determined that a person in custody
has or may have an intellectual or developmental disability or a
traumatic brain injury, then upon transfer of the person to a
department of corrections facility or other jail facility, every
reasonable effort shall be made by the transferring jail staff to
communicate to the receiving staff any necessary accommodation for the
person as identified by the transferring jail staff.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.09.555 and 2005 c 503 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt rules and policies providing that
when persons with a mental disorder, an intellectual or developmental
disability, or a traumatic brain injury, who were enrolled in medical
assistance immediately prior to confinement, are released from
confinement, their medical assistance coverage will be fully reinstated
on the day of their release, subject to any expedited review of their
continued eligibility for medical assistance coverage that is required
under federal or state law.
(2) The department, in collaboration with the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the department of
corrections, and the regional support networks, shall establish
procedures for coordination between department field offices,
institutions for mental disease, and correctional institutions, as
defined in RCW 9.94.049, that result in prompt reinstatement of
eligibility and speedy eligibility determinations for persons who are
likely to be eligible for medical assistance services upon release from
confinement. Procedures developed under this subsection must address:
(a) Mechanisms for receiving medical assistance services
applications on behalf of confined persons in anticipation of their
release from confinement;
(b) Expeditious review of applications filed by or on behalf of
confined persons and, to the extent practicable, completion of the
review before the person is released;
(c) Mechanisms for providing medical assistance services identity
cards to persons eligible for medical assistance services immediately
upon their release from confinement; and
(d) Coordination with the federal social security administration,
through interagency agreements or otherwise, to expedite processing of
applications for federal supplemental security income or social
security disability benefits, including federal acceptance of
applications on behalf of confined persons.
(3) Where medical or psychiatric examinations during a person's
confinement indicate that the person is disabled, the correctional
institution or institution for mental diseases shall provide the
department with that information for purposes of making medical
assistance eligibility and enrollment determinations prior to the
person's release from confinement. The department shall, to the
maximum extent permitted by federal law, use the examination in making
its determination whether the person is disabled and eligible for
medical assistance.
(4) For purposes of this section, "confined" or "confinement" means
incarcerated in a correctional institution, as defined in RCW 9.94.049,
or admitted to an institute for mental disease, as defined in 42 C.F.R.
part 435, Sec. 1009 on July 24, 2005.
(5) For purposes of this section, "likely to be eligible" means
that a person:
(a) Was enrolled in medicaid or supplemental security income or
general assistance immediately before he or she was confined and his or
her enrollment was terminated during his or her confinement; or
(b) Was enrolled in medicaid or supplemental security income or
general assistance at any time during the five years before his or her
confinement, and medical or psychiatric examinations during the
person's confinement indicate that the person continues to be disabled
and the disability is likely to last at least twelve months following
release.
(6) The economic services administration shall adopt standardized
statewide screening and application practices and forms designed to
facilitate the application of a confined person who is likely to be
eligible for medicaid.

--- END ---