BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.215.005 and 2007 c 415 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that:
(a) Parents are their children's first and most important teachers
and decision makers;
(b) Research across disciplines now demonstrates that what happens
in the earliest years makes a critical difference in children's
readiness to succeed in school and life;
(c) Washington's competitiveness in the global economy requires a
world-class education system that starts early and supports life-long
learning;
(d) Washington state currently makes substantial investments in
voluntary child care and early learning services and supports, but
because services are fragmented across multiple state agencies, and
early learning providers lack the supports and incentives needed to
improve the quality of services they provide, many parents have
difficulty accessing high quality early learning services;
(e) A more cohesive and integrated voluntary early learning system
would result in greater efficiencies for the state, increased
partnership between the state and the private sector, improved access
to high quality early learning services, and better employment and
early learning outcomes for families and all children.
(2) The legislature finds that:
(a) The early years of a child's life are critical to the child's
healthy brain development and that the quality of caregiving during the
early years can significantly impact the child's intellectual, social,
and emotional development;
(b) A successful outcome for every child obtaining a K-12 education
depends on children being prepared from birth for academic and social
success in school. For children at risk of school failure, the
achievement gap often emerges as early as eighteen months of age;
(c) There currently is a shortage of high quality services and
supports for children ages birth to three and their parents and
caregivers; and
(d) Increasing the availability of high quality services for
children ages birth to three and their parents and caregivers will
result in improved school and life outcomes.
(3) Therefore, the legislature intends to establish a robust birth-to-three continuum of services for parents and caregivers of young
children in order to provide education and support regarding the
importance of early childhood development.
(((3))) (4) The purpose of this chapter is:
(a) To establish the department of early learning;
(b) To coordinate and consolidate state activities relating to
child care and early learning programs;
(c) To safeguard and promote the health, safety, and well-being of
children receiving child care and early learning assistance, which is
paramount over the right of any person to provide care;
(d) To provide tools to promote the hiring of suitable providers of
child care by:
(i) Providing parents with access to information regarding child
care providers;
(ii) Providing parents with child care licensing action histories
regarding child care providers; and
(iii) Requiring background checks of applicants for employment in
any child care facility licensed or regulated under current law;
(e) To promote linkages and alignment between early learning
programs and elementary schools and support the transition of children
and families from prekindergarten environments to kindergarten;
(f) To promote the development of a sufficient number and variety
of adequate child care and early learning facilities, both public and
private; and
(g) To license agencies and to assure the users of such agencies,
their parents, the community at large and the agencies themselves that
adequate minimum standards are maintained by all child care and early
learning facilities.
(((4))) (5) This chapter does not expand the state's authority to
license or regulate activities or programs beyond those licensed or
regulated under existing law.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.215.020 and 2007 c 394 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of early learning is created as an executive
branch agency. The department is vested with all powers and duties
transferred to it under this chapter and such other powers and duties
as may be authorized by law.
(2) The primary duties of the department are to implement state
early learning policy and to coordinate, consolidate, and integrate
child care and early learning programs in order to administer programs
and funding as efficiently as possible. The department's duties
include, but are not limited to, the following:
(a) To support both public and private sectors toward a
comprehensive and collaborative system of early learning that serves
parents, children, and providers and to encourage best practices in
child care and early learning programs;
(b) To make early learning resources available to parents and
caregivers;
(c) To carry out activities, including providing clear and easily
accessible information about quality and improving the quality of early
learning opportunities for young children, in cooperation with the
nongovernmental private-public partnership;
(d) To administer child care and early learning programs;
(e) To standardize internal financial audits, oversight visits,
performance benchmarks, and licensing criteria, so that programs can
function in an integrated fashion;
(f) To support the implementation of the nongovernmental private-public partnership and cooperate with that partnership in pursuing its
goals including providing data and support necessary for the successful
work of the partnership;
(g) To work cooperatively and in coordination with the early
learning council;
(h) To collaborate with the K-12 school system at the state and
local levels to ensure appropriate connections and smooth transitions
between early learning and K-12 programs; ((and))
(i) To develop a comprehensive birth-to-three plan to provide
education and support through a continuum of options;
(j) Upon the development of an early learning information system,
to make available to parents timely inspection and licensing action
information through the internet and other means.
(3) As funding for the expansion of the prekindergarten program for
three and four-year olds under this chapter is appropriated by the
legislature, the legislature also intends to appropriate a proportional
amount of funding to the department for implementation of the services
and programs under subsection (2)(i) of this section. Such services
may include, but are not limited to: Home visiting; quality incentives
for infant and toddler child care subsidies; quality improvements for
family home and center-based child care programs serving infants and
toddlers; professional development; early literacy programs; and
informal supports for family, friend, and neighbor caregivers.
(4) The department's programs shall be designed in a way that
respects and preserves the ability of parents and legal guardians to
direct the education, development, and upbringing of their children,
and that recognizes and honors cultural and linguistic diversity. The
department shall include parents and legal guardians in the development
of policies and program decisions affecting their children.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The department of early learning, in
collaboration with the early learning nongovernmental private-public
partnership and the early learning advisory council, shall develop a
birth-to-three plan, including recommended appropriation levels, and
report to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the
governor by December 1, 2010. The plan and recommendations required
under this section shall be developed within existing resources.

--- END ---