BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.05 RCW
to read as follows:
If the state board of health or a local board of health requires an
on-site sewage system with design flows of less than three thousand
five hundred gallons per day to be periodically inspected for
maintenance and operation purposes, the local board of health must
provide the option for the property owner, or the property owner's
designee, to perform the inspection. The local board of health shall
adopt policies to determine the qualifications required for the
property owner, or designee, to perform an inspection. The property
owner, or designee, must be certified as a qualified inspector by the
local board of health before he or she is authorized to perform the
inspection.

--- END ---