BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.45.070 and 2009 c 561 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the basic employer contribution rate established
in RCW 41.45.060 ((or 41.45.054)), the department shall also charge
employers of public employees' retirement system, teachers' retirement
system, school employees' retirement system, public safety employees'
retirement system, or Washington state patrol retirement system members
an additional supplemental rate to pay for the cost of additional
benefits, if any, granted to members of those systems. ((Except as
provided in subsections (6), (7), and (9) of this section,)) The
supplemental contribution rates required by this section shall be
calculated by the state actuary and shall be charged regardless of
language to the contrary contained in the statute which authorizes
additional benefits.
(2) If the ratio of the actuarial value of assets to the actuarial
accrued liability as of the most recent published actuarial rate-setting valuation is less than or equal to eighty-five percent, then
the supplemental rate charged under subsections (3) through (6) of this
section shall be calculated as the level percentage of pay needed to
fund the cost of the benefit over a fixed one-year period.
(3) In addition to the basic member, employer, and state
contribution rate established in RCW 41.45.0604 for the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2, the department
shall also establish supplemental rates to pay for the cost of
additional benefits, if any, granted to members of the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2. ((Except as
provided in subsection (6) of this section,)) These supplemental rates
shall be calculated by the actuary retained by the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' board and the state actuary through the
process provided in RCW 41.26.720(1)(a) and the state treasurer shall
transfer the additional required contributions regardless of language
to the contrary contained in the statute which authorizes the
additional benefits.
(((3))) (4) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
beginning July 1, 2009, the supplemental rate charged under this
section to fund benefit increases provided to active members of the
public employees' retirement system plan 1 and the teachers' retirement
system plan 1 shall be calculated as the level percentage of all system
pay needed to fund the cost of the benefit over a fixed ten-year
period, using projected future salary growth and growth in system
membership. The supplemental rate to fund benefit increases provided
to active members of the public employees' retirement system plan 1
shall be charged to all system employers in the public employees'
retirement system, the school employees' retirement system, and the
public safety employees' retirement system. The supplemental rate to
fund benefit increases provided to active members of the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 shall be charged to all system employers in
the teachers' retirement system.
(((4))) (5) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
the supplemental rate charged under this section to fund benefit
increases provided to active and retired members of the public
employees' retirement system plan 2 and plan 3, the teachers'
retirement system plan 2 and plan 3, the public safety employees'
retirement system plan 2, the school employees' retirement system plan
2 and plan 3, or the Washington state patrol retirement system shall be
calculated as the level percentage of all members' pay needed to fund
the cost of the benefit, as calculated under RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.061,
41.45.0631, or 41.45.067.
(((5))) (6) The supplemental rate charged under this section to
fund postretirement adjustments which are provided on a nonautomatic
basis to current retirees shall be calculated as the percentage of pay
needed to fund the adjustments as they are paid to the retirees.
Beginning July 1, 2009, the supplemental rate charged under this
section to fund increases in the automatic postretirement adjustments
for active or retired members of the public employees' retirement
system plan 1 and the teachers' retirement system plan 1 shall be
calculated as the level percentage of pay needed to fund the cost of
the automatic adjustments over a fixed ten-year period, using projected
future salary growth and growth in system membership. The supplemental
rate to fund increases in the automatic postretirement adjustments for
active members or retired members of the public employees' retirement
system plan 1 shall be charged to all system employers in the public
employees' retirement system, the school employees' retirement system,
and the public safety employees' retirement system. The supplemental
rate to fund increases in automatic postretirement adjustments for
active members or retired members of the teachers' retirement system
plan 1 shall be charged to all system employers in the teachers'
retirement system.
(((6) A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost
of additional benefits granted to members pursuant to chapter 340, Laws
of 1998.
(7) A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of
additional benefits granted to members pursuant to chapter 41.31A RCW;
section 309, chapter 341, Laws of 1998; or section 701, chapter 341,
Laws of 1998.
(8) A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of
additional benefits granted to members and survivors pursuant to
chapter 94, Laws of 2006.
(9) A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of
the additional benefits granted to members of the teachers' retirement
system and the school employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3 in
sections 2, 4, 6, and 8, chapter 491, Laws of 2007 until September 1,
2008. A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of
the additional benefits granted to members of the public employees'
retirement system plans 2 and 3 under sections 9 and 10, chapter 491,
Laws of 2007 until July 1, 2008.))

--- END ---