BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In keeping with the gambling policy
statement in RCW 9.46.010, the legislature intends to:
(1) Assure a local jurisdiction authority to ban or allow house-banked social card games within its jurisdiction;
(2) Provide local jurisdictions with a tool to limit house-banked
social card games within their jurisdictions; and
(3) Reduce uncertainty by legalizing prior efforts by local
jurisdictions to limit house-banked social card games.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.46.295 and 2009 c 550 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any license to engage in any of the gambling activities
authorized by this chapter ((as now exists or as hereafter amended)),
and issued under the authority thereof shall be legal authority to
engage in the gambling activities for which issued throughout the
incorporated and unincorporated area of any county, except that a city
or town located therein with respect to that city, town, or a county
with respect to all areas within that county except for such cities or
towns, may: (a) Absolutely prohibit((, but may not change the scope of
license,)) any or all of the gambling activities for which the license
was issued; or (b) limit house-banked social card game businesses as
provided in section 3 of this act. However, a city, town, or county
that adopts a legislative act under this subsection may not repeal the
legislative act for ten years after the effective date of the
legislative act.
(2) A legislative act adopted by a city, town, or county in effect
on December 1, 2009, that limits house-banked social card games is
deemed to be an act adopted in compliance with this section.
(3) This section does not authorize any city, town, or county to
adopt or enforce any legislative act changing or purporting to change
the scope of a license issued under this chapter.
(((2))) (4) A city or town with a prohibition on house-banked
social card game licenses that annexes an area that is within a city,
town, or county that permits house-banked social card games may allow
a house-banked social card game business that was licensed by the
commission as of July 26, 2009, to continue operating if the city or
town is authorized to impose a tax under RCW 82.14.415 and can
demonstrate that the continuation of the house-banked social card game
business will reduce the credit against the state sales and use tax as
provided in RCW 82.14.415(7). A city or town that allows a house-banked social card game business in an annexed area to continue
operating is not required to allow additional house-banked social card
game businesses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A city, town, or county may adopt a
legislative act limiting the number of house-banked social card game
businesses to the number located in the jurisdiction on the effective
date of the legislative act adopted by the city, town, or county.
However, this number is reduced by one for each business that ceases to
operate as provided in this section. A house-banked social card game
licensee or purchaser of the business of a licensee may not increase
the number of tables to a number greater than the number authorized at
the time of the legislative act.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, nothing in
this section prohibits sale of a house-banked social card game
business, sale of nongambling assets of a house-banked social card game
business, or change of location of a house-banked social card game
business.
(b) If a house-banked social card game business ceases to operate,
the following are prohibited:
(i) Sale of the business, other than a sale in connection with a
change of location outside the jurisdiction; and
(ii) A change of location of the business within the jurisdiction.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "ceases to operate" means a
business does not owe any taxes imposed under RCW 9.46.110 for six
consecutive months.
(4) The commission shall not issue a house-banked social card game
license that will increase the number of licensees in the jurisdiction
to a number greater than that authorized under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A city, town, or county that has adopted
a legislative act under RCW 9.46.295 (1)(b) or (2) must file a copy of
the legislative act with the commission. The commission must adopt
rules that allow the city, town, or county to electronically file the
ordinance, resolution, or other legislative act with the commission.
(2) A licensee or applicant must inform and verify to commission
staff that it is permitted to conduct house-banked social card games in
the jurisdiction when it applies or reapplies for a license. A
verification under this subsection may consist of a letter certifying
that the licensee may operate in the jurisdiction. The commission may
adopt rules about the verification required.
(3) The commission, its members, and staff are absolutely immune
from any legal action relating to a decision of the commission, such as
issuing, renewing, or not issuing a license based on the provisions of
RCW 9.46.295 or section 3 of this act; or one that is based on the
commission's interpretation of RCW 9.46.295 or section 3 of this act or
any local ordinance, resolution, or other legislative act enacted or
amended under RCW 9.46.295 or section 3 of this act. No court, board,
agency, entity, or tribunal of any kind has jurisdiction to join the
commission as a party to any such legal action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 3 and 4 of this act are each added
to chapter 9.46 RCW.

--- END ---