BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.22 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By December 1, 2010, the board shall repeal its rules on pain
management, WAC 246-922-510 through 246-922-540.
(2) By June 30, 2011, the board shall adopt new rules on chronic,
noncancer pain management that contain the following elements:
(a) Dosing criteria, including a dosage amount that must not be
exceeded unless a podiatric physician and surgeon first consults with
a practitioner specializing in pain management;
(b) Guidance on when to seek specialty consultation and ways in
which electronic specialty consultations may be sought;
(c) Guidance on tracking clinical progress by using assessment
tools focusing on pain interference, physical function, and overall
risk for poor outcome; and
(d) Guidance on tracking the use of opioids.
(3) The board shall consult with the agency medical directors'
group, the department of health, the University of Washington, and the
largest professional association of podiatric physicians and surgeons
in the state.
(4) The rules adopted under this section do not apply:
(a) To the provision of palliative, hospice, or other end-of-life
care; or
(b) To the management of acute pain caused by an injury or a
surgical procedure, except to the extent that special requirements are
needed for opioid-dependent patients experiencing such acute pain.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By June 30, 2011, the commission shall adopt new rules on
chronic, noncancer pain management that contain the following elements:
(a) Dosing criteria, including a dosage amount that must not be
exceeded unless a dentist first consults with a practitioner
specializing in pain management;
(b) Guidance on when to seek specialty consultation and ways in
which electronic specialty consultations may be sought;
(c) Guidance on tracking clinical progress by using assessment
tools focusing on pain interference, physical function, and overall
risk for poor outcome; and
(d) Guidance on tracking the use of opioids.
(2) The commission shall consult with the agency medical directors'
group, the department of health, the University of Washington, and the
largest professional association of dentists in the state.
(3) The rules adopted under this section do not apply:
(a) To the provision of palliative, hospice, or other end-of-life
care; or
(b) To the management of acute pain caused by an injury or a
surgical procedure, except to the extent that special requirements are
needed for opioid-dependent patients experiencing such acute pain.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.57 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By December 1, 2010, the board shall repeal its rules on pain
management, WAC 246-853-510 through 246-853-540.
(2) By June 30, 2011, the board shall adopt new rules on chronic,
noncancer pain management that contain the following elements:
(a) Dosing criteria, including a dosage amount that must not be
exceeded unless an osteopathic physician and surgeon first consults
with a practitioner specializing in pain management;
(b) Guidance on when to seek specialty consultation and ways in
which electronic specialty consultations may be sought;
(c) Guidance on tracking clinical progress by using assessment
tools focusing on pain interference, physical function, and overall
risk for poor outcome; and
(d) Guidance on tracking the use of opioids, particularly in the
emergency department.
(3) The board shall consult with the agency medical directors'
group, the department of health, the University of Washington, and the
largest association of osteopathic physicians and surgeons in the
state.
(4) The rules adopted under this section do not apply:
(a) To the provision of palliative, hospice, or other end-of-life
care; or
(b) To the management of acute pain caused by an injury or a
surgical procedure, except to the extent that special requirements are
needed for opioid-dependent patients experiencing such acute pain.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 18.57A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By December 1, 2010, the board shall repeal its rules on pain
management, WAC 246-854-120 through 246-854-150.
(2) By June 30, 2011, the board shall adopt new rules on chronic,
noncancer pain management that contain the following elements:
(a) Dosing criteria, including a dosage amount that must not be
exceeded unless an osteopathic physician's assistant first consults
with a practitioner specializing in pain management;
(b) Guidance on when to seek specialty consultation and ways in
which electronic specialty consultations may be sought;
(c) Guidance on tracking clinical progress by using assessment
tools focusing on pain interference, physical function, and overall
risk for poor outcome; and
(d) Guidance on tracking the use of opioids, particularly in the
emergency department.
(3) The board shall consult with the agency medical directors'
group, the department of health, the University of Washington, and the
largest association of osteopathic physician's assistants in the state.
(4) The rules adopted under this section do not apply:
(a) To the provision of palliative, hospice, or other end-of-life
care; or
(b) To the management of acute pain caused by an injury or a
surgical procedure, except to the extent that special requirements are
needed for opioid-dependent patients experiencing such acute pain.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 18.71 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By December 1, 2010, the commission shall repeal its rules on
pain management, WAC 246-919-800 through 246-919-830.
(2) By June 30, 2011, the commission shall adopt new rules on
chronic, noncancer pain management that contain the following elements:
(a) Dosing criteria, including a dosage amount that must not be
exceeded unless a physician first consults with a practitioner
specializing in pain management;
(b) Guidance on when to seek specialty consultation and ways in
which electronic specialty consultations may be sought;
(c) Guidance on tracking clinical progress by using assessment
tools focusing on pain interference, physical function, and overall
risk for poor outcome; and
(d) Guidance on tracking the use of opioids, particularly in the
emergency department.
(3) The commission shall consult with the agency medical directors'
group, the department of health, the University of Washington, and the
largest professional association of physicians in the state.
(4) The rules adopted under this section do not apply:
(a) To the provision of palliative, hospice, or other end-of-life
care; or
(b) To the management of acute pain caused by an injury or a
surgical procedure, except to the extent that special requirements are
needed for opioid-dependent patients experiencing such acute pain.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 18.71A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By June 30, 2011, the commission shall adopt new rules on
chronic, noncancer pain management that contain the following elements:
(a) Dosing criteria, including a dosage amount that must not be
exceeded unless a physician assistant first consults with a
practitioner specializing in pain management;
(b) Guidance on when to seek specialty consultation and ways in
which electronic specialty consultations may be sought;
(c) Guidance on tracking clinical progress by using assessment
tools focusing on pain interference, physical function, and overall
risk for poor outcome; and
(d) Guidance on tracking the use of opioids, particularly in the
emergency department.
(2) The commission shall consult with the agency medical directors'
group, the department of health, the University of Washington, and the
largest professional association of physician assistants in the state.
(3) The rules adopted under this section do not apply:
(a) To the provision of palliative, hospice, or other end-of-life
care; or
(b) To the management of acute pain caused by an injury or a
surgical procedure, except to the extent that special requirements are
needed for opioid-dependent patients experiencing such acute pain.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 18.79 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By June 30, 2011, the commission shall adopt new rules on
chronic, noncancer pain management that contain the following elements:
(a) Dosing criteria, including a dosage amount that must not be
exceeded unless an advanced registered nurse practitioner or certified
registered nurse anesthetist first consults with a practitioner
specializing in pain management;
(b) Guidance on when to seek specialty consultation and ways in
which electronic specialty consultations may be sought;
(c) Guidance on tracking clinical progress by using assessment
tools focusing on pain interference, physical function, and overall
risk for poor outcome; and
(d) Guidance on tracking the use of opioids, particularly in the
emergency department.
(2) The commission shall consult with the agency medical directors'
group, the department of health, the University of Washington, and the
largest professional associations for advanced registered nurse
practitioners and certified registered nurse anesthetists in the state.
(3) The rules adopted under this section do not apply:
(a) To the provision of palliative, hospice, or other end-of-life
care; or
(b) To the management of acute pain caused by an injury or a
surgical procedure, except to the extent that special requirements are
needed for opioid-dependent patients experiencing such acute pain.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The boards and commissions required to adopt
rules on pain management under sections 1 through 7 of this act shall
work collaboratively to ensure that the rules are as uniform as
practicable.

--- END ---