BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17.369 and 2000 c 237 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) By July 1, 1999, the commission shall make available to
candidates, public officials, and political committees that are
required to file reports under this chapter an electronic filing
((alternative)) system for submitting financial affairs reports,
contribution reports, and expenditure reports((, including but not
limited to filing by diskette, modem, satellite, or)) over the
internet.
(2) By January 1, ((2002)) 2013, the commission shall make
available to lobbyists ((and)), lobbyists' employers, and agencies
required to file reports under RCW 42.17.150, 42.17.170, 42.17.175,
((or)) 42.17.180, or 42.17.190 an electronic filing ((alternative))
system for submitting these reports ((including but not limited to
filing by diskette, modem, satellite, or)) over the internet.
(3) The commission shall make available to candidates((,)) and
public officials((,)) filing financial affairs reports and political
committees((, lobbyists, and lobbyists' employers)) an electronic
((copy of the appropriate reporting forms)) filing system at no charge.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.17.3691 and 2000 c 237 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Beginning January 1, 2002, each candidate or political
committee that expended twenty-five thousand dollars or more in the
preceding year or expects to expend twenty-five thousand dollars or
more in the current year shall file all contribution reports and
expenditure reports required by this chapter by the electronic
alternative provided by the commission under RCW 42.17.369. The
commission may make exceptions on a case-by-case basis for candidates
whose authorized committees lack the technological ability to file
reports using the electronic alternative provided by the commission.
(2) Beginning January 1, 2004,)) Each candidate or political
committee that expended ten thousand dollars or more in the preceding
year or expects to expend ten thousand dollars or more in the current
year shall file all contribution reports and expenditure reports
required by this chapter ((by the electronic alternative))
electronically over the internet as provided by the commission under
RCW 42.17.369. ((The commission may make exceptions on a case-by-case
basis for candidates whose authorized committees lack the technological
ability to file reports using the electronic alternative provided by
the commission.
(3))) (2)(a) Beginning January 1, 2013, lobbyists required to
register under RCW 42.17.150, or report under RCW 42.17.170, whose
total reportable accrued compensation for lobbying, whether from or on
behalf of one or more lobbyists' employers, was ten thousand dollars or
more for the previous calendar year, or is expected to be ten thousand
dollars or more for the current calendar year, must file all reports
required by this chapter electronically over the internet as provided
by the commission under RCW 42.17.369.
(b) Beginning January 1, 2014, lobbyists' employers required to
report under RCW 42.17.180 whose total reportable accrued expenses and
payments for lobbying, including those through or on behalf of one or
more lobbyists, was ten thousand dollars or more for the previous
calendar year, or is expected to be ten thousand dollars or more for
the current calendar year, must file all reports required by this
chapter electronically over the internet as provided by the commission
under RCW 42.17.369.
(c) Beginning January 1, 2013, all agencies required to report
under RCW 42.17.190 must file all lobbying reports required by this
chapter electronically over the internet as provided by the commission
under RCW 42.17.369.
(3) The commission may make exceptions on a case-by-case basis for
candidates, lobbyists, lobbyists' employers, or agencies when they lack
the technological ability to file reports electronically.
(4) Failure by a candidate ((or)), political committee, lobbyist,
lobbyist's employer, or agency to comply with this section is a
violation of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Beginning August 1, 2010, lobbyists and
lobbyists' employers who are registered or required to report for
either calendar year 2010 or 2011, or both, or who subsequently
register for any part of calendar year 2010 or 2011, shall pay an
initial fee to the public disclosure commission for the development and
implementation of the electronic filing system under RCW 42.17.369 as
follows:
(a) Two hundred fifty dollars for each lobbyist whose total
reportable accrued compensation for lobbying, whether from or on behalf
of one or more lobbyists' employers, was ten thousand dollars or more
for the previous calendar year, or is expected to be ten thousand
dollars or more for the current calendar year;
(b) Five hundred dollars for each lobbyist employer whose total
reportable accrued expenses and payments for lobbying, including those
through or on behalf of one or more lobbyists, was ten thousand dollars
or more for the previous calendar year, or is expected to be ten
thousand dollars or more for the current calendar year; and
(c) One hundred fifty dollars for each state agency that has more
than fifty full-time equivalent employees.
(2) Fees received under this section must be deposited into the
public disclosure electronic filing account under section 5 of this
act. The fees in this section shall be used to establish the software
and hardware needed to establish an electronic filing system for
lobbyists and lobbyist employers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Every political committee shall pay a
fee of two hundred dollars to the commission each calendar year that it
is required to report under RCW 42.17.040, 42.17.050, 42.17.060,
42.17.065, 42.17.080, or 42.17.093.
(2) Every lobbyist and lobbyist employer shall pay a fee of two
hundred dollars to the commission each calendar year that it is
required to report under RCW 42.17.150, 42.17.170, 42.17.180, or
42.17.200.
(3) Every person required to report under RCW 42.17.240 shall pay
a fee of two hundred dollars to the commission for each calendar year
he or she is required to report.
(4) No person must pay more than one fee in a calendar year under
this section. Any person may appeal a fee to the commission.
(5) Fees received under this section must be deposited into the
public disclosure electronic filing account under section 5 of this
act. The fees collected under this section shall be used for data
entry costs and purchase and maintenance of computer hardware and
software to maintain electronic filing of the reports required by this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The public disclosure electronic filing
account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts
from fees paid by persons, lobbyists, and lobbyist employers under
sections 3 and 4 of this act must be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for costs incurred as a
result of the design, development, implementation, and maintenance of:
(a) Software or other applications to accommodate electronic filing
of the reports required by this chapter; and
(b) A database and query system compatible with current
architecture, technology, and operating systems that results in readily
available data to the public for review and analysis.
(2) Only the executive director of the public disclosure commission
or the executive director's designee may authorize expenditures from
the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 3 through 5 of this act are each
added to chapter 42.17 RCW.

--- END ---