BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that most states use
competition to maximize efficiency in their workers' compensation
programs. Private sector competition in providing workers'
compensation insurance has been effective in reducing premium costs,
maximizing program efficiency, and creating innovative safety programs
to protect all workers. Therefore, the purposes of this act are to:
(1) Create an efficient and cost-effective industrial insurance
system for the benefit of both employers and workers by introducing
competition into the system through a choice of insurance carriers from
whom employers may purchase industrial insurance;
(2) Provide workers the benefits of safety systems developed by
both private enterprise and by government;
(3) Improve the state's economic climate by providing the private
sector with the opportunity to engage in the industrial insurance
business with appropriate standards and oversight;
(4) Eliminate a government monopoly with respect to industrial
insurance choices for small employers and provide private sector
insurance choices for all employers; and
(5) By July 1, 2011, make Washington a state in which employers may
self-insure or obtain private sector industrial insurance and eliminate
Washington's state-run industrial insurance fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The joint legislative task force on
industrial insurance privatization is established. The task force
consists of the following sixteen members:
(a) The chair and ranking minority member of the senate labor,
commerce, and consumer protection committee;
(b) The chair and ranking minority member of the house commerce and
labor committee;
(c) One member from each major caucus of the house of
representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(d) One member from each major caucus of the senate, appointed by
the president of the senate; and
(e) The following members, appointed jointly by the president of
the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives:
(i) Five members representing business, selected from nominations
submitted by statewide business organizations. At least one of the
members must represent small business and at least one of the members
must be a self-insured employer under Title 51 RCW;
(ii) Two members representing insurers, selected from nominations
submitted by statewide insurance organizations; and
(iii) One member representing labor, selected from nominations
submitted by statewide labor organizations.
(2) The task force shall develop proposed legislation to eliminate
Washington's state-run industrial insurance fund by July 1, 2011. The
task force must provide its recommendations to the legislature by
December 1, 2010.
(3)(a) The task force shall use legislative facilities and staff
from senate committee services and the office of program research and
may hire additional staff with specific technical expertise if such
expertise is necessary and funds are available for that purpose.
(b) The task force, when appropriate, may consult with individuals
from the public and private sector or ask such persons to establish an
advisory committee.
(c) The department of labor and industries and the office of the
insurance commissioner shall cooperate with the task force and each
provide a nonvoting liaison member to the task force.
(4) The chairs of the house commerce and labor committee and the
senate labor, commerce, and consumer protection committee shall convene
and chair the first meeting of the task force, at which time the
members shall select a chair or cochairs from its membership.
(5) Each nonlegislative member of the task force is entitled to be
reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060. All expenses of the task force, including travel, shall be
paid jointly by the senate and the house of representatives.
(6) This section expires June 30, 2011.

--- END ---