BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.27.085 and 1989 c 256 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1) There is hereby created the building code council account in
the state treasury. Moneys deposited into the account shall be used by
the building code council, after appropriation, to perform the purposes
of the council.
(2) All moneys collected under subsection (3) of this section shall
be deposited into the building code council account. Every four years
the state treasurer shall report to the legislature on the balances in
the account so that the legislature may adjust the charges imposed
under subsection (3) of this section.
(3))) There is imposed a fee of four dollars and fifty cents on
each building permit issued by a county or a city, plus an additional
surcharge of two dollars for each residential unit, but not including
the first unit, on each building containing more than one residential
unit. Quarterly each county and city shall remit moneys collected
under this section to the state treasury; however, no remittance is
required until a minimum of fifty dollars has accumulated pursuant to
this subsection.

--- END ---