BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there is an
opportunity to increase the financial and environmental value of
surplus salmon returning to the state's hatcheries. A recent pilot
project using surplus salmon at the Bingham creek hatchery conducted by
the Hood Canal salmon enhancement group in coordination with the
Chehalis Basin task force demonstrated that more financial value could
be realized from surplus salmon than is currently being realized by the
department of fish and wildlife. In addition, the regional fisheries
enhancement group proposes to use salmon not fit for human consumption
more effectively in adding nutrients to individual watersheds.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.12.451 and 1990 c 36 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director may take or remove any species of fish or
shellfish from the waters or beaches of the state.
(2) The director may sell food fish or shellfish caught or taken
during department test fishing operations.
(3) The director ((shall not sell inedible salmon for human
consumption.)) may give salmon and carcasses ((may be given)) to state
institutions or schools or to economically depressed people, unless the
salmon are unfit for human consumption. ((Salmon not fit for human
consumption may be sold by the director for animal food, fish food, or
for industrial purposes.))
(4) ((In the sale of)) (a) The director may sell surplus salmon
from state hatcheries, including eggs and carcasses. Prior to selling
surplus salmon, the director must first provide an opportunity for a
regional fisheries enhancement group, or a coalition of regional
fisheries enhancement groups, to utilize the surplus salmon pursuant to
a memorandum of understanding entered into under the provisions of
section 3 of this act.
(b) All profits from the sale of surplus salmon must be deposited
into the regional fisheries enhancement group account created in RCW
77.95.090.
(c) The ((division of purchasing shall)) director may require that
a portion of the surplus salmon, either sold or subject to a memorandum
of understanding under section 3 of this act, be processed and returned
to the state by the purchaser or memorandum signatory. The processed
salmon ((shall)) must be fit for human consumption and in a form
suitable for distribution to individuals. The ((division of
purchasing)) director shall establish the required percentage at a
level that does not discourage competitive bidding for the surplus
salmon. The measure of the percentage is the combined value of all of
the surplus salmon sold. The department of social and health services
shall distribute the processed salmon to economically depressed
individuals and state institutions pursuant to rules adopted by the
department of social and health services.
(d) The director may not sell inedible salmon for human
consumption. However, the director may sell salmon not fit for human
consumption for animal food, fish food, watershed nutrient enhancement,
or for industrial purposes pursuant to this subsection (4).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 77.95 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A regional fisheries enhancement group constituted under this
chapter may enter into a memorandum of understanding with the
department that allows the regional fisheries enhancement group to
facilitate and provide oversight in the collection and disposition of
all excess state contracted hatchery return salmon. The memorandum of
understanding may be executed with a single regional fisheries
enhancement group or a coalition of regional fisheries enhancement
groups.
(2) Once executed, the department must provide all surplus salmon,
including carcasses and eggs, from the state hatcheries subject to the
memorandum of understanding to the memorandum's signatories. The
signatories must utilize the surplus salmon in a manner that most
efficiently increases base funds for regional fisheries enhancement
groups and programs, and assist in the offset operation and maintenance
costs at dedicated hatchery facilities, maximizes nutrient enhancement
opportunities, and increases the value of donations to state food bank
distribution centers.
(3) Any net revenue derived from execution of a memorandum of
understanding entered into under this section must be deposited into
the regional fisheries enhancement group account created in RCW
77.95.090 for use by the regional fisheries enhancement group or groups
that are signatories to the memorandum of understanding.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.95.090 and 2009 c 340 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The dedicated regional fisheries enhancement group account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. Only the commission or
the commission's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required for expenditures.
(2) A portion of each recreational fishing license fee shall be
used as provided in RCW 77.32.440. A surcharge of one hundred dollars
shall be collected on each commercial salmon fishery license, each
salmon delivery license, and each salmon charter license sold in the
state. All receipts shall be placed in the regional fisheries
enhancement group account and shall be used exclusively for regional
fisheries enhancement group projects for the purposes of RCW 77.95.110.
Except as provided in RCW 77.95.320, funds from the regional fisheries
enhancement group account shall not serve as replacement funding for
department operated salmon projects that exist on January 1, 1991.
(3) All revenue from the ((department's)) sale of salmon carcasses
and eggs, either directly through sale by the department or under the
terms of a memorandum of understanding entered into under section 3 of
this act, that return to group facilities shall be deposited in the
regional fisheries enhancement group account for use by the regional
fisheries enhancement group that produced the surplus or were
signatories to the memorandum of understanding. The commission shall
adopt rules to implement this section pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 5 RCW 77.04.160 and 2001 c 337 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall prepare an annual surplus salmon report.
This report shall include the disposition of adult salmonids that have
returned to salmonid hatchery facilities operated under the
jurisdiction of the state that:
(a) Have not been harvested; and
(b) Were not allowed to escape for natural spawning.
(2) The report shall include, by species, the number and estimated
weight of surplus salmon and steelhead and a description of the
disposition of the adult carcasses including, but not limited to, the
following categories:
(a) Disposed in landfills;
(b) Transferred to another government agency for reproductive
purposes;
(c) Sold to contract buyers in the round;
(d) Sold to contract buyers after spawning;
(e) Included in a memorandum of understanding entered into under
section 3 of this act;
(f) Transferred to Native American tribes;
(((f))) (g) Donated to food banks; and
(((g))) (h) Used in stream nutrient enrichment programs.
(3) The report shall also include, by species, information on the
number of requests for viable salmon eggs, the number of these requests
that were granted and the number that were denied, the geographic areas
for which these requests were granted or denied, and a brief
explanation given for each denial of a request for viable salmon eggs.
(4) The report shall be included in the biennial ((state of the
salmon)) report required by RCW 77.85.020 and other similar state
reports on salmon.
(5) The report shall include an assessment of the infrastructure
needs and facility modifications necessary to implement chapter 337,
Laws of 2001.

--- END ---