BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.96B.045 and 2007 c 120 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a designated crisis responder receives information alleging
that a person, as the result of:
(a) A mental disorder, presents ((an imminent)) a substantial
likelihood of serious harm, or is in ((imminent)) a substantial
likelihood of danger because of being gravely disabled, after
investigation and evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the
reliability and credibility of the person or persons providing the
information if any, the designated crisis responder may take the
person, or cause by oral or written order the person to be taken into
emergency custody in an evaluation and treatment facility for not more
than seventy-two hours as described in this chapter; or
(b) Chemical dependency, presents ((an imminent)) a substantial
likelihood of serious harm, or is in ((imminent)) a substantial
likelihood of danger because of being gravely disabled, after
investigation and evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the
reliability and credibility of the person or persons providing the
information if any, the designated crisis responder may take the
person, or cause by oral or written order the person to be taken into
emergency custody in a secure detoxification facility for not more than
seventy-two hours as described in this chapter.
(2) The designated mental health professional may consider
information provided by families, landlords, neighbors, or others with
significant contact and history of involvement with the person, if the
information is readily and reasonably available.
(3) The evaluation and treatment facility, the secure
detoxification facility, or other certified chemical dependency
provider shall then evaluate the person's condition and admit, detain,
transfer, or discharge such person in accordance with this chapter.
The facility shall notify in writing the court and the designated
crisis responder of the date and time of the initial detention of each
person involuntarily detained so that a probable cause hearing will be
held no later than seventy-two hours after detention.
(((3))) (4) A peace officer may take or cause the person to be
taken into custody and immediately delivered to an evaluation and
treatment facility, secure detoxification facility, or other certified
chemical dependency treatment provider: (a) Pursuant to this section;
or (b) when he or she has reasonable cause to believe that such person,
as a result of a mental disorder or chemical dependency, presents ((an
imminent)) a substantial likelihood of serious harm, or is in
((imminent)) a substantial likelihood of danger because of being
gravely disabled. An individual brought to a facility by a peace
officer may be held for up to twelve hours: PROVIDED, That the
individual is examined by a designated crisis responder within three
hours of arrival. Within twelve hours of arrival the designated crisis
responder must determine whether the individual meets detention
criteria. If the individual is detained, the designated mental health
professional shall file a petition for detention or supplemental
petition as appropriate and commence service on the designated attorney
for the detained person.
(((4))) (5) Nothing in this chapter limits the power of a peace
officer to take a person into custody and immediately deliver the
person to the emergency department of a local hospital or to a
detoxification facility.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.05.050 and 2000 c 94 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit the right of
any person to apply voluntarily to any public or private agency or
practitioner for treatment of a mental disorder, either by direct
application or by referral. Any person voluntarily admitted for
inpatient treatment to any public or private agency shall be released
immediately upon his or her request. Any person voluntarily admitted
for inpatient treatment to any public or private agency shall orally be
advised of the right to immediate discharge, and further advised of
such rights in writing as are secured to them pursuant to this chapter
and their rights of access to attorneys, courts, and other legal
redress. Their condition and status shall be reviewed at least once
each one hundred eighty days for evaluation as to the need for further
treatment or possible discharge, at which time they shall again be
advised of their right to discharge upon request: PROVIDED HOWEVER,
That if the professional staff of any public or private agency or
hospital ((regards)) determines that a person voluntarily admitted who
requests discharge ((as presenting)) presents, as a result of a mental
disorder, ((an imminent)) a substantial likelihood of serious harm, or
is in substantial likelihood of being gravely disabled, they may detain
such person for sufficient time to notify the ((county)) designated
mental health professional of such person's condition to enable the
((county)) designated mental health professional to authorize such
person being further held in custody or transported to an evaluation
and treatment center pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, which
shall in ordinary circumstances be no later than the next judicial day:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That if a person is brought to the emergency room of
a public or private agency or hospital for observation or treatment,
the person refuses voluntary admission, and the professional staff of
the public or private agency or hospital ((regard)) determines that
such person ((as presenting)) presents, as a result of a mental
disorder ((an imminent)) a substantial likelihood of serious harm, or
((as presenting an imminent)) is in a substantial likelihood of danger
because of ((grave disability)) being gravely disabled, they may detain
such person for sufficient time to notify the ((county)) designated
mental health professional of such person's condition to enable the
((county)) designated mental health professional to authorize such
person being further held in custody or transported to an evaluation
treatment center pursuant to the conditions in this chapter, but which
time shall be no more than six hours from the time the professional
staff determine that an evaluation by the ((county)) designated mental
health professional is necessary.

Sec. 3 RCW 71.05.153 and 2007 c 375 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When a designated mental health professional receives
information alleging that a person, as the result of a mental disorder,
presents ((an imminent)) a substantial likelihood of serious harm, or
is in ((imminent)) a substantial likelihood of danger because of being
gravely disabled, after investigation and evaluation of the specific
facts alleged and of the reliability and credibility of the person or
persons providing the information if any, the designated mental health
professional may take such person, or cause by oral or written order
such person to be taken into emergency custody in an evaluation and
treatment facility for not more than seventy-two hours as described in
RCW 71.05.180. The designated mental health professional may consider
information provided by families, landlords, neighbors, or others with
significant contact and history of involvement with the person, if the
information is readily and reasonably available.
(2) A peace officer may take or cause such person to be taken into
custody and immediately delivered to a crisis stabilization unit, an
evaluation and treatment facility, or the emergency department of a
local hospital under the following circumstances:
(a) Pursuant to subsection (1) of this section; or
(b) When he or she has reasonable cause to believe that such person
is suffering from a mental disorder and presents ((an imminent)) a
substantial likelihood of serious harm or is in ((imminent)) a
substantial likelihood of danger because of being gravely disabled.
(3) Persons delivered to a crisis stabilization unit, evaluation
and treatment facility, or the emergency department of a local hospital
by peace officers pursuant to subsection (2) of this section may be
held by the facility for a period of up to twelve hours: PROVIDED,
That they are examined by a mental health professional within three
hours of their arrival. Within twelve hours of their arrival, the
designated mental health professional must determine whether the
individual meets detention criteria. If the individual is detained,
the designated mental health professional shall file a petition for
detention or a supplemental petition as appropriate and commence
service on the designated attorney for the detained person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The research and data analysis division
of the department of social and health services shall track and review
the outcomes regarding the number of seventy-two hour, fourteen-day,
and ninety-day commitments and the cost of providing treatment as a
result of the implementation of sections 1 through 3 of this act.
(2) The research and data analysis division shall make an initial
report to the legislature regarding its findings no later than October
1, 2011, and a second report no later than October 1, 2012. It shall
make a final report no later than October 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act expires June 30, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2010, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---