BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.64A.020 and 1997 c 417 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The board shall adopt, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW,
rules fixing the classification and qualifications and the educational
and training requirements for persons who may be employed as pharmacy
technicians or who may be enrolled in any pharmacy technician training
program. Such rules shall provide that:
(((a))) (i) Licensed pharmacists shall supervise the training of
pharmacy technicians; ((and
(b))) (ii) Training programs shall assure the competence of
pharmacy technicians to aid and assist pharmacy operations. Training
programs shall consist of instruction and/or practical training; and
(iii) Pharmacy technicians shall complete continuing education
requirements established in rule by the board.
(b) Such rules may include successful completion of examinations
for applicants for pharmacy technician certificates. If such
examination rules are adopted, the board shall prepare or determine the
nature of, and supervise the grading of the examinations. The board
may approve an examination prepared or administered by a private
testing agency or association of licensing authorities.
(2) The board may disapprove or revoke approval of any training
program for failure to conform to board rules. In the case of the
disapproval or revocation of approval of a training program by the
board, a hearing shall be conducted in accordance with RCW 18.64.160,
and appeal may be taken in accordance with the Administrative Procedure
Act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

--- END ---