BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.560 and 2007 c 353 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the period beginning May 1, 2007, and concluding July 1,
((2010)) 2011, counties and cities may not amend or adopt critical area
ordinances under RCW 36.70A.060(2) as they specifically apply to
agricultural activities. Nothing in this section:
(a) Nullifies critical area ordinances adopted by a county or city
prior to May 1, 2007, to comply with RCW 36.70A.060(2);
(b) Limits or otherwise modifies the obligations of a county or
city to comply with the requirements of this chapter pertaining to
critical areas not associated with agricultural activities; or
(c) Limits the ability of a county or city to adopt or employ
voluntary measures or programs to protect or enhance critical areas
associated with agricultural activities.
(2) Counties and cities subject to deferral requirements under
subsection (1) of this section:
(a) Should implement voluntary programs to enhance public resources
and the viability of agriculture. Voluntary programs implemented under
this subsection (2)(a) must include measures to evaluate the successes
of these programs; and
(b) Must review and, if necessary, revise critical area ordinances
as they specifically apply to agricultural activities to comply with
the requirements of this chapter by December 1, ((2011)) 2012.
(3) For purposes of this section and RCW 36.70A.5601, "agricultural
activities" means agricultural uses and practices currently existing or
legally allowed on rural land or agricultural land designated under RCW
36.70A.170 including, but not limited to: Producing, breeding, or
increasing agricultural products; rotating and changing agricultural
crops; allowing land used for agricultural activities to lie fallow in
which it is plowed and tilled but left unseeded; allowing land used for
agricultural activities to lie dormant as a result of adverse
agricultural market conditions; allowing land used for agricultural
activities to lie dormant because the land is enrolled in a local,
state, or federal conservation program, or the land is subject to a
conservation easement; conducting agricultural operations; maintaining,
repairing, and replacing agricultural equipment; maintaining,
repairing, and replacing agricultural facilities, when the replacement
facility is no closer to a critical area than the original facility;
and maintaining agricultural lands under production or cultivation.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.5601 and 2007 c 353 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose, the William D. Ruckelshaus Center must conduct an
examination of the conflicts between agricultural activities and
critical area ordinances adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW. The
examination required by this section must commence by July 1, 2007.
(2) In fulfilling the requirements of this section, the center
must: (a) Work and consult with willing participants including, but
not limited to, agricultural, environmental, tribal, and local
government interests; and (b) involve and apprise legislators and
legislative staff of its efforts.
(3) The examination conducted by the center must be completed in
two distinct phases in accordance with the following:
(a) In the first phase, the center must conduct fact-finding and
stakeholder discussions with stakeholders identified in subsection (2)
of this section. These discussions must identify stakeholder concerns,
desired outcomes, opportunities, and barriers. The fact-finding must
identify existing regulatory, management, and scientific information
related to agricultural activities and critical areas including, but
not limited to: (i) Critical area ordinances adopted under chapter
36.70A RCW; (ii) acreage enrolled in the conservation reserve
enhancement program; (iii) acreage protected by conservation easements;
(iv) buffer widths; (v) requirements of federally approved salmon
recovery plans; (vi) the impacts of agricultural activities on Puget
Sound recovery efforts; and (vii) compliance with water quality
requirements. The center must issue two reports of its fact-finding
efforts and stakeholder discussions to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the house of representatives and the senate by December
1, 2007, and December 1, 2008; and
(b)(i) In the second phase, the center must facilitate discussions
between the stakeholders identified in subsection (2) of this section
to identify policy and financial options or opportunities to address
the issues and desired outcomes identified by stakeholders in the first
phase of the center's examination efforts.
(ii) In particular, the stakeholders must examine innovative
solutions including, but not limited to, outcome-based approaches that
incorporate, to the maximum extent practicable, voluntary programs or
approaches. Additionally, stakeholders must examine ways to modify
statutory provisions to ensure that regulatory constraints on
agricultural activities are used as a last resort if desired outcomes
are not achieved through voluntary programs or approaches.
(iii) The center must work to achieve agreement among participating
stakeholders and to develop a coalition that can be used to support
agreed upon changes or new approaches to protecting critical areas
during the ((2010)) 2011 legislative session.
(4) The center must issue a final report of findings and
legislative recommendations to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the house of representatives and the senate by September
1, ((2009)) 2010.

Sec. 3 2007 c 353 s 6 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
This act expires December 1, ((2011)) 2012.

--- END ---