BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.52.0531 and 2009 c 4 s 908 are each amended to read
as follows:
LEVY BASE 2011-17. The maximum dollar amount which may be levied
by or for any school district for maintenance and operation support
under the provisions of RCW 84.52.053 shall be determined as follows:
(1) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1997, the
maximum dollar amount shall be calculated pursuant to the laws and
rules in effect in November 1996.
(2) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and
thereafter, the maximum dollar amount shall be the sum of (a) plus or
minus (b) and (c) of this subsection minus (d) of this subsection:
(a) The district's levy base as defined in subsections (3) and (4)
of this section multiplied by the district's maximum levy percentage as
defined in subsection (((5))) (6) of this section;
(b) For districts in a high/nonhigh relationship, the high school
district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the nonhigh school
district's maximum levy amount shall be increased by an amount equal to
the estimated amount of the nonhigh payment due to the high school
district under RCW 28A.545.030(3) and 28A.545.050 for the school year
commencing the year of the levy;
(c) For districts in an interdistrict cooperative agreement, the
nonresident school district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and
the resident school district's maximum levy amount shall be increased
by an amount equal to the per pupil basic education allocation included
in the nonresident district's levy base under subsection (3) of this
section multiplied by:
(i) The number of full-time equivalent students served from the
resident district in the prior school year; multiplied by:
(ii) The serving district's maximum levy percentage determined
under subsection (((5))) (6) of this section; increased by:
(iii) The percent increase per full-time equivalent student as
stated in the state basic education appropriation section of the
biennial budget between the prior school year and the current school
year divided by fifty-five percent;
(d) The district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced by the
maximum amount of state matching funds for which the district is
eligible under RCW 28A.500.010.
(3) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 2005 and
thereafter, a district's levy base shall be the sum of allocations in
(a) through (c) of this subsection received by the district for the
prior school year and the amounts determined under subsection (4) of
this section, including allocations for compensation increases, plus
the sum of such allocations multiplied by the percent increase per full
time equivalent student as stated in the state basic education
appropriation section of the biennial budget between the prior school
year and the current school year and divided by fifty-five percent. A
district's levy base shall not include local school district property
tax levies or other local revenues, or state and federal allocations
not identified in (a) through (c) of this subsection.
(a) The district's basic education allocation as determined
pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350;
(b) State and federal categorical allocations for the following
programs:
(i) Pupil transportation;
(ii) Special education;
(iii) Education of highly capable students;
(iv) Compensatory education, including but not limited to learning
assistance, migrant education, Indian education, refugee programs, and
bilingual education;
(v) Food services; and
(vi) Statewide block grant programs; and
(c) Any other federal allocations for elementary and secondary
school programs, including direct grants, other than federal impact aid
funds and allocations in lieu of taxes.
(4) For levy collections in calendar years 2005 through ((2011))
2017, in addition to the allocations included under subsection (3)(a)
through (c) of this section, a district's levy base shall also include
the following:
(a)(i) For levy collections in calendar year 2010, the difference
between the allocation the district would have received in the current
school year had RCW 84.52.068 not been amended by chapter 19, Laws of
2003 1st sp. sess. and the allocation the district received in the
current school year pursuant to RCW ((84.52.068. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall offset the amount added to
a district's levy base pursuant to this subsection (4)(a) by any
additional per student allocations included in a district's levy base
pursuant to the enactment of an initiative to the people subsequent to
June 10, 2004)) 28A.505.220;
(ii) For levy collections in calendar years 2011 through 2017, the
difference between the allocation rate the district would have received
in the prior school year using the Initiative 728 rate and the
allocation rate the district received in the prior school year pursuant
to RCW 28A.505.220 multiplied by the full-time equivalent student
enrollment used to calculate the Initiative 728 allocation for the
prior school year; and
(b) The difference between the allocations the district would have
received the prior school year ((had RCW 28A.400.205 not been amended
by chapter 20, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess.)) using the Initiative 732
base and the allocations the district actually received the prior
school year pursuant to RCW 28A.400.205. ((The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall offset the amount added to
a district's levy base pursuant to this subsection (4)(b) by any
additional salary increase allocations included in a district's levy
base pursuant to the enactment of an initiative to the people
subsequent to June 10, 2004.))
(5) For levy collections in calendar years 2011 through 2017, in
addition to the allocations included under subsections (3)(a) through
(c) and (4)(a) and (b) of this section, a district's levy base shall
also include the difference between an allocation of fifty-three and
two-tenths certificated instructional staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through four enrolled
in the prior school year and the allocation of certificated
instructional staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in
grades kindergarten through four that the district actually received in
the prior school year, except that the levy base for a school district
whose allocation in the 2009-10 school year was less than fifty-three
and two-tenths certificated instructional staff units per thousand
full-time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through four shall
include the difference between the allocation the district actually
received in the 2009-10 school year and the allocation the district
actually received in the prior school year.
(6)(a) A district's maximum levy percentage shall be ((twenty-two))
twenty-four percent in ((1998)) 2010 and ((twenty-four)) twenty-eight
percent in ((1999)) 2011 through 2017 and twenty-four percent every
year thereafter; ((plus,))
(b) For qualifying districts, in addition to the percentage in (a)
of this subsection the grandfathered percentage determined as follows:
(((a))) (i) For 1997, the difference between the district's 1993
maximum levy percentage and twenty percent; and
(((b))) (ii) For ((1998 and thereafter)) 2011 through 2017, the
percentage calculated as follows:
(((i))) (A) Multiply the grandfathered percentage for the prior
year times the district's levy base determined under subsection (3) of
this section;
(((ii))) (B) Reduce the result of (((b)(i))) (b)(ii)(A) of this
subsection by any levy reduction funds as defined in subsection (((6)))
(7) of this section that are to be allocated to the district for the
current school year;
(((iii))) (C) Divide the result of (((b)(ii))) (b)(ii)(B) of this
subsection by the district's levy base; and
(((iv))) (D) Take the greater of zero or the percentage calculated
in (((b)(iii))) (b)(ii)(C) of this subsection.
(((6))) (7) "Levy reduction funds" shall mean increases in state
funds from the prior school year for programs included under
subsections (3) and (4) of this section: (a) That are not attributable
to enrollment changes, compensation increases, or inflationary
adjustments; and (b) that are or were specifically identified as levy
reduction funds in the appropriations act. If levy reduction funds are
dependent on formula factors which would not be finalized until after
the start of the current school year, the superintendent of public
instruction shall estimate the total amount of levy reduction funds by
using prior school year data in place of current school year data.
Levy reduction funds shall not include moneys received by school
districts from cities or counties.
(((7) For the purposes of this section,)) (8) The definitions in
this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Prior school year" means the most recent school year completed
prior to the year in which the levies are to be collected.
(((8) For the purposes of this section,)) (b) "Current school year"
means the year immediately following the prior school year.
(c) "Initiative 728 rate" means the allocation rate at which the
student achievement program would have been funded under chapter 3,
Laws of 2001, if all annual adjustments to the initial 2001 allocation
rate had been made in previous years and in each subsequent year as
provided for under chapter 3, Laws of 2001.
(d) "Initiative 732 base" means the prior year's state allocation
for annual salary cost-of-living increases for district employees in
the state-funded salary base as it would have been calculated under
chapter 4, Laws of 2001, if each annual cost-of-living increase
allocation had been provided in previous years and in each subsequent
year.
(9) Funds collected from transportation vehicle fund tax levies
shall not be subject to the levy limitations in this section.
(10) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop rules
((and regulations)) and inform school districts of the pertinent data
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
(11) For calendar year 2009, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall recalculate school district levy authority to
reflect levy rates certified by school districts for calendar year
2009.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.52.0531 and 1997 c 259 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
LEVY BASE 2018 AND THEREAFTER. The maximum dollar amount which may
be levied by or for any school district for maintenance and operation
support under the provisions of RCW 84.52.053 shall be determined as
follows:
(1) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1997, the
maximum dollar amount shall be calculated pursuant to the laws and
rules in effect in November 1996.
(2) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and
thereafter, the maximum dollar amount shall be the sum of (a) plus or
minus (b) and (c) of this subsection minus (d) of this subsection:
(a) The district's levy base as defined in subsection (3) of this
section multiplied by the district's maximum levy percentage as defined
in subsection (4) of this section;
(b) For districts in a high/nonhigh relationship, the high school
district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the nonhigh school
district's maximum levy amount shall be increased by an amount equal to
the estimated amount of the nonhigh payment due to the high school
district under RCW 28A.545.030(3) and 28A.545.050 for the school year
commencing the year of the levy;
(c) For districts in an interdistrict cooperative agreement, the
nonresident school district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and
the resident school district's maximum levy amount shall be increased
by an amount equal to the per pupil basic education allocation included
in the nonresident district's levy base under subsection (3) of this
section multiplied by:
(i) The number of full-time equivalent students served from the
resident district in the prior school year; multiplied by:
(ii) The serving district's maximum levy percentage determined
under subsection (4) of this section; increased by:
(iii) The percent increase per full-time equivalent student as
stated in the state basic education appropriation section of the
biennial budget between the prior school year and the current school
year divided by fifty-five percent;
(d) The district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced by the
maximum amount of state matching funds for which the district is
eligible under RCW 28A.500.010.
(3) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and
thereafter, a district's levy base shall be the sum of allocations in
(a) through (c) of this subsection received by the district for the
prior school year, including allocations for compensation increases,
plus the sum of such allocations multiplied by the percent increase per
full time equivalent student as stated in the state basic education
appropriation section of the biennial budget between the prior school
year and the current school year and divided by fifty-five percent. A
district's levy base shall not include local school district property
tax levies or other local revenues, or state and federal allocations
not identified in (a) through (c) of this subsection.
(a) The district's basic education allocation as determined
pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350;
(b) State and federal categorical allocations for the following
programs:
(i) Pupil transportation;
(ii) Special education;
(iii) Education of highly capable students;
(iv) Compensatory education, including but not limited to learning
assistance, migrant education, Indian education, refugee programs, and
bilingual education;
(v) Food services; and
(vi) Statewide block grant programs; and
(c) Any other federal allocations for elementary and secondary
school programs, including direct grants, other than federal impact aid
funds and allocations in lieu of taxes.
(4)(a) A district's maximum levy percentage shall be ((twenty-two))
twenty-four percent in ((1998)) 2010 and ((twenty-four)) twenty-eight
percent in ((1999)) 2011 through 2017 and twenty-four percent every
year thereafter; ((plus,))
(b) For qualifying districts, in addition to the percentage in (a)
of this subsection the grandfathered percentage determined as follows:
(((a))) (i) For 1997, the difference between the district's 1993
maximum levy percentage and twenty percent; and
(((b))) (ii) For ((1998 and thereafter)) 2011 through 2017, the
percentage calculated as follows:
(((i))) (A) Multiply the grandfathered percentage for the prior
year times the district's levy base determined under subsection (3) of
this section;
(((ii))) (B) Reduce the result of (((b)(i))) (b)(ii)(A) of this
subsection by any levy reduction funds as defined in subsection (5) of
this section that are to be allocated to the district for the current
school year;
(((iii))) (C) Divide the result of (((b)(ii))) (b)(ii)(B) of this
subsection by the district's levy base; and
(((iv))) (D) Take the greater of zero or the percentage calculated
in (((b)(iii))) (b)(ii)(C) of this subsection.
(iii) For 2018 and thereafter, the percentage shall be calculated
as follows:
(A) Multiply the grandfathered percentage for the prior year times
the district's levy base determined under subsection (3) of this
section;
(B) Reduce the result of (b)(iii)(A) of this subsection by any levy
reduction funds as defined in subsection (5) of this section that are
to be allocated to the district for the current school year;
(C) Divide the result of (b)(iii)(B) of this subsection by the
district's levy base; and
(D) Take the greater of zero or the percentage calculated in
(b)(iii)(C) of this subsection.
(5) "Levy reduction funds" shall mean increases in state funds from
the prior school year for programs included under subsection (3) of
this section: (a) That are not attributable to enrollment changes,
compensation increases, or inflationary adjustments; and (b) that are
or were specifically identified as levy reduction funds in the
appropriations act. If levy reduction funds are dependent on formula
factors which would not be finalized until after the start of the
current school year, the superintendent of public instruction shall
estimate the total amount of levy reduction funds by using prior school
year data in place of current school year data. Levy reduction funds
shall not include moneys received by school districts from cities or
counties.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "prior school year" means the
most recent school year completed prior to the year in which the levies
are to be collected.
(7) For the purposes of this section, "current school year" means
the year immediately following the prior school year.
(8) Funds collected from transportation vehicle fund tax levies
shall not be subject to the levy limitations in this section.
(9) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop rules
and regulations and inform school districts of the pertinent data
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 INTENT REGARDING ADDITIONAL LEVIES. The
legislature recognizes that school districts request voter approval for
two-year through four-year levies based on their projected levy
capacities at the time that the levies are submitted to the voters. It
is the intent of the legislature to permit school districts with voter-approved maintenance and operation levies to seek an additional
approval from the voters, if subsequently enacted legislation would
permit a higher levy.

Sec. 4 RCW 84.52.053 and 2009 c 460 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
ADDITIONAL LEVIES FOR SUBSEQUENTLY ENACTED INCREASE. (1) The
limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 through 84.52.056, and 84.52.043
shall not prevent the levy of taxes by school districts, when
authorized so to do by the voters of such school district in the manner
and for the purposes and number of years allowable under Article VII,
section 2(a) of the Constitution of this state. Elections for such
taxes shall be held in the year in which the levy is made or, in the
case of propositions authorizing two-year through four-year levies for
maintenance and operation support of a school district, authorizing
two-year levies for transportation vehicle funds established in RCW
28A.160.130, or authorizing two-year through six-year levies to support
the construction, modernization, or remodeling of school facilities,
which includes the purposes of RCW 28A.320.330(2) (f) and (g), in the
year in which the first annual levy is made.
(2) Once additional tax levies have been authorized for maintenance
and operation support of a school district for a two-year through four-year period as provided under subsection (1) of this section, no
further additional tax levies for maintenance and operation support of
the district for that period may be authorized, except for additional
levies to provide for subsequently enacted increases affecting the
district's levy base or maximum levy percentage. For the purpose of
applying the limitation of this subsection, a two-year through six-year
levy to support the construction, modernization, or remodeling of
school facilities shall not be deemed to be a tax levy for maintenance
and operation support of a school district.
(3) A special election may be called and the time therefor fixed by
the board of school directors, by giving notice thereof by publication
in the manner provided by law for giving notices of general elections,
at which special election the proposition authorizing such excess levy
shall be submitted in such form as to enable the voters favoring the
proposition to vote "yes" and those opposed thereto to vote "no".

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.500.020 and 2004 c 21 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
LEVY EQUALIZATION--DEFINITIONS. (1) Unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.
(a) "Prior tax collection year" means the year immediately
preceding the year in which the local effort assistance shall be
allocated.
(b) "Statewide average ((twelve)) fourteen percent levy rate" means
((twelve)) fourteen percent of the total levy bases as defined in RCW
84.52.0531 (3) and (4) summed for all school districts, and divided by
the total assessed valuation for excess levy purposes in the prior tax
collection year for all districts as adjusted to one hundred percent by
the county indicated ratio established in RCW 84.48.075.
(c) The "district's ((twelve)) fourteen percent levy amount" means
the school district's maximum levy authority after transfers determined
under RCW 84.52.0531(2) (a) through (c) divided by the district's
maximum levy percentage determined under RCW 84.52.0531(5) multiplied
by ((twelve)) fourteen percent.
(d) The "district's ((twelve)) fourteen percent levy rate" means
the district's ((twelve)) fourteen percent levy amount divided by the
district's assessed valuation for excess levy purposes for the prior
tax collection year as adjusted to one hundred percent by the county
indicated ratio.
(e) "Districts eligible for local effort assistance" means those
districts with a ((twelve)) fourteen percent levy rate that exceeds the
statewide average ((twelve)) fourteen percent levy rate.
(2) Unless otherwise stated all rates, percents, and amounts are
for the calendar year for which local effort assistance is being
calculated under this chapter.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.500.030 and 2006 c 372 s 904 and 2006 c 119 s 1
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
LEVY EQUALIZATION--ALLOCATION. Allocation of state matching funds
to eligible districts for local effort assistance shall be determined
as follows:
(1) Funds raised by the district through maintenance and operation
levies shall be matched with state funds using the following ratio of
state funds to levy funds:
(a) The difference between the district's ((twelve)) fourteen
percent levy rate and the statewide average ((twelve)) fourteen percent
levy rate; to
(b) The statewide average ((twelve)) fourteen percent levy rate.
(2) The maximum amount of state matching funds for districts
eligible for local effort assistance shall be the district's ((twelve))
fourteen percent levy amount, multiplied by the following percentage:
(a) The difference between the district's ((twelve)) fourteen
percent levy rate and the statewide average ((twelve)) fourteen percent
levy rate; divided by
(b) The district's ((twelve)) fourteen percent levy rate.
(3) ((Calendar year 2003 allocations and maximum eligibility under
this chapter shall be multiplied by 0.99.
(4) From January 1, 2004, to December 31, 2005, allocations and
maximum eligibility under this chapter shall be multiplied by 0.937.
(5) From January 1, 2006, to December 31, 2006, allocations and
maximum eligibility under this chapter shall be multiplied by 0.9563.))
Beginning with calendar year 2007, allocations and maximum eligibility
under this chapter shall be fully funded at one hundred percent and
shall not be reduced.

Sec. 7 2009 c 4 s 909 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
Section 908 of this act expires January 1, ((2012)) 2018.

Sec. 8 2006 c 119 s 3 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
This act expires January 1, ((2012)) 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1, 5, and 6 of this act expire
January 1, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Section 2 of this act takes effect January
1, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 and 3 through 9 of this act are
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health,
or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The legislature finds that the sections
contained in this act constitute a single integrated plan for revising
the laws relating to school district maintenance and operations levies.
If each provision of this act as passed by the senate and house of
representatives is not enacted into law, the entire act is null and
void. If by June 30, 2010, the superintendent of public instruction
does not certify to the legislature that full funding has been
appropriated in the 2010 omnibus operating appropriations act for the
local effort assistance rates specified in sections 5 and 6 of this
act, the entire act is null and void. If any provision of this act or
its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the act
shall be considered invalid in its entirety, and the act and the
application of any provision of the act to any person or circumstance
shall be considered null and void and of no effect.

--- END ---