BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.71 RCW
to read as follows:
The medical professions account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. Expenditures from the account may only be used for
the administration and implementation of this chapter. Only the
commission or the executive director set forth in RCW 18.71.0191 may
authorize expenditures from the account. No appropriation is required
for expenditures from this account. All fees, assessments, fines, and
other funds of the commission currently deposited in the health
professions account must be transferred to the medical professions
account as soon as possible, but under no circumstances longer than
thirty days, after the effective date of this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.71.401 and 1997 c 79 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
All fees, assessments, fines, and other funds collected or received
under this chapter must be deposited in the ((health)) medical
professions account and used solely to administer and implement this
chapter.

--- END ---