BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Persons subject to payment of the tax under this chapter may
deduct any amounts received for the following activities occurring
within a port district business redevelopment zone:
(a) Making sales at retail or wholesale;
(b) Manufacturing or processing for hire; or
(c) Performing any service.
(2) For the purpose of this section, "port district business
redevelopment zone" has the same meaning as provided in section 3 of
this act.
(3) This section expires January 1, 2025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A city legislative authority may fix and impose a sales and use
tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter for the purposes
designated in subsection (3) of this section.
(2) The tax authorized in this section must be deducted from the
amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the
department under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The rate of tax may not
exceed one-tenth of one percent of the selling price in the case of
sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of a use tax.
(3) Moneys received from any tax imposed under this section must be
used solely for the purpose of public improvement costs within a port
district business redevelopment zone.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Port district business redevelopment zone" has the same
meaning as provided in section 3 of this act.
(b) "Public improvement costs" has the same meaning as provided in
RCW 39.102.020.
(5) This section expires January 1, 2025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.29A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The leasehold excise tax under RCW 82.29A.030 does not apply to
leasehold interests in real or personal property located within a port
district business redevelopment zone.
(2) The exemption provided in subsection (1) of this section does
not apply to city and county leasehold excise taxes imposed under RCW
82.29A.040.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "port district business
redevelopment zone" means any area:
(a) Acquired by a port district with a population of one million
five hundred thousand or more for the purpose of airport expansion or
aircraft noise mitigation, and the area is currently designated by a
city for redevelopment for business or commercial uses;
(b) Any area owned by the state of Washington as of January 1,
2010, and located adjacent to an area described under (a) of this
subsection; and
(c) Any area within one thousand seven hundred fifty feet of the
boundary of an area described in (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(4) This section expires January 1, 2025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2011.

--- END ---