BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that providing
supportive housing for chronically homeless individuals with severe
alcohol problems results in improved outcomes for the served
individuals and the public. The legislature recognizes that these
individuals are the highest utilizers of public crisis services,
including hospital emergency departments for alcohol-related reasons,
detox/sobering facilities, and jails, and that they may be recipients
of general assistance or other public entitlements. The legislature
also finds that providing supportive housing facilities for these
individuals presents a valuable benefit that improves public health and
safety and reduces public spending.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.185C.070 and 2005 c 484 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) During each calendar year in which moneys from the ((homeless
housing)) home security fund account are available for use by the
department for the homeless housing grant program, the department shall
announce to all Washington counties, participating cities, and through
major media throughout the state, a grant application period of at
least ninety days' duration. This announcement will be made as often
as the director deems appropriate for proper utilization of resources.
The department shall then promptly grant as many applications as will
utilize available funds, less appropriate administrative costs of the
department as described in RCW 36.22.179.
(2) The department will develop, with advice and input from the
affordable housing advisory board established in RCW 43.185B.020,
criteria to evaluate grant applications.
(3) The department may approve applications only if they are
consistent with the local and state homeless housing program strategic
plans. The department may give preference to applications based on
some or all of the following criteria:
(a) The total homeless population in the applicant local government
service area, as reported by the most recent annual Washington homeless
census;
(b) Current local expenditures to provide housing for the homeless
and to address the underlying causes of homelessness as described in
RCW 43.185C.005;
(c) Local government and private contributions pledged to the
program in the form of matching funds, property, infrastructure
improvements, and other contributions; and the degree of leveraging of
other funds from local government or private sources for the program
for which funds are being requested, to include recipient contributions
to total project costs, including allied contributions from other
sources such as professional, craft and trade services, and lender
interest rate subsidies;
(d) Construction projects or rehabilitation that will serve
homeless individuals or families for a period of at least twenty-five
years;
(e) Projects which demonstrate serving homeless populations with
the greatest needs, including projects that serve special needs
populations;
(f) Geographically dispersed projects that will serve individuals
in supportive housing facilities. "Supportive housing," for purposes
of this section, means housing that is available for lease to, and
intended for, chronically homeless individuals with mental illness,
chemical dependency, or other disabling or chronic health conditions.
Supportive housing facilities must have supportive services provided
on-site that are designed to assist tenants in achieving and sustaining
housing stability. Supportive housing providers must actively seek to
engage tenants in on-site supportive services, but participation in
such services may not be a condition of ongoing tenancy;
(g) The degree to which the applicant project represents a
collaboration between local governments, nonprofit community-based
organizations, local and state agencies, and the private sector,
especially through its integration with the coordinated and
comprehensive plan for homeless families with children required under
RCW 43.63A.650;
(((g))) (h) The cooperation of the local government in the annual
Washington homeless census project;
(((h))) (i) The commitment of the local government and any
subcontracting local governments, nonprofit organizations, and for-profit entities to employ a diverse workforce;
(((i))) (j) The extent, if any, that the local homeless population
is disproportionate to the revenues collected under this chapter and
RCW 36.22.178 and 36.22.179; and
(((j))) (k) Other elements shown by the applicant to be directly
related to the goal and the department's state strategic plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of one million dollars is
appropriated from the general fund to the department of commerce for
expenditure into the home security fund account solely for the purposes
of establishing and providing ongoing services in two geographically
dispersed supportive housing facilities of at least fifty units each
that are targeted for chronically homeless individuals with severe
alcohol problems.

--- END ---