BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.50.435 and 2003 c 53 s 346 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person who violates RCW 69.50.401 by manufacturing,
selling, delivering, or possessing with the intent to manufacture,
sell, or deliver a controlled substance listed under RCW 69.50.401 or
who violates RCW 69.50.410 by selling for profit any controlled
substance or counterfeit substance classified in schedule I, RCW
69.50.204, except leaves and flowering tops of marihuana to a person:
(a) In a school;
(b) On a school bus;
(c) Within ((one thousand)) five hundred feet of a school bus route
stop designated by the school district;
(d) Within ((one thousand)) five hundred feet of the perimeter of
the school grounds;
(e) In a public park;
(f) In a public housing project designated by a local governing
authority as a drug-free zone;
(g) On a public transit vehicle;
(h) In a public transit stop shelter;
(i) Within five hundred feet of the perimeter of a county or city
courthouse;
(j) At a civic center designated as a drug-free zone by the local
governing authority; or
(((j))) (k) Within ((one thousand)) five hundred feet of the
perimeter of a facility designated under (((i))) (j) of this
subsection, if the local governing authority specifically designates
the ((one thousand)) five hundred foot perimeter may be punished by a
fine of up to twice the fine otherwise authorized by this chapter, but
not including twice the fine authorized by RCW 69.50.406, or by
imprisonment of up to twice the imprisonment otherwise authorized by
this chapter, but not including twice the imprisonment authorized by
RCW 69.50.406, or by both such fine and imprisonment. The provisions
of this section shall not operate to more than double the fine or
imprisonment otherwise authorized by this chapter for an offense.
(2) It is not a defense to a prosecution for a violation of this
section that the person was unaware that the prohibited conduct took
place while in a school or school bus or within ((one thousand)) five
hundred feet of the school or school bus route stop, in a public park,
in a public housing project designated by a local governing authority
as a drug-free zone, on a public transit vehicle, in a public transit
stop shelter, at a civic center designated as a drug-free zone by the
local governing authority, or within ((one thousand)) five hundred feet
of the perimeter of a facility designated under subsection (1)(((i)))
(j) of this section, if the local governing authority specifically
designates the ((one thousand)) five hundred foot perimeter.
(3) It is not a defense to a prosecution for a violation of this
section or any other prosecution under this chapter that persons under
the age of eighteen were not present in the school, the school bus, the
public park, the public housing project designated by a local governing
authority as a drug-free zone, or the public transit vehicle, or at the
school bus route stop, the public transit vehicle stop shelter, at a
civic center designated as a drug-free zone by the local governing
authority, or within ((one thousand)) five hundred feet of the
perimeter of a facility designated under subsection (1)(((i))) (j) of
this section, if the local governing authority specifically designates
the ((one thousand)) five hundred foot perimeter at the time of the
offense or that school was not in session.
(4) It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution for a violation
of this section that the prohibited conduct took place entirely within
a private residence, that no person under eighteen years of age or
younger was present in such private residence at any time during the
commission of the offense, and that the prohibited conduct did not
involve delivering, manufacturing, selling, or possessing with the
intent to manufacture, sell, or deliver any controlled substance in RCW
69.50.401 for profit. The affirmative defense established in this
section shall be proved by the defendant by a preponderance of the
evidence. This section shall not be construed to establish an
affirmative defense with respect to a prosecution for an offense
defined in any other section of this chapter.
(5) In a prosecution under this section, a map produced or
reproduced by any municipality, school district, county, transit
authority engineer, or public housing authority for the purpose of
depicting the location and boundaries of the area on or within ((one
thousand)) five hundred feet of any property used for a school, school
bus route stop, public park, public housing project designated by a
local governing authority as a drug-free zone, public transit vehicle
stop shelter, or a civic center designated as a drug-free zone by a
local governing authority, or a true copy of such a map, shall under
proper authentication, be admissible and shall constitute prima facie
evidence of the location and boundaries of those areas if the governing
body of the municipality, school district, county, or transit authority
has adopted a resolution or ordinance approving the map as the official
location and record of the location and boundaries of the area on or
within ((one thousand)) five hundred feet of the school, school bus
route stop, public park, public housing project designated by a local
governing authority as a drug-free zone, public transit vehicle stop
shelter, or civic center designated as a drug-free zone by a local
governing authority. Any map approved under this section or a true
copy of the map shall be filed with the clerk of the municipality or
county, and shall be maintained as an official record of the
municipality or county. This section shall not be construed as
precluding the prosecution from introducing or relying upon any other
evidence or testimony to establish any element of the offense. This
section shall not be construed as precluding the use or admissibility
of any map or diagram other than the one which has been approved by the
governing body of a municipality, school district, county, transit
authority, or public housing authority if the map or diagram is
otherwise admissible under court rule.
(6) As used in this section the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "School" has the meaning under RCW 28A.150.010 or 28A.150.020.
The term "school" also includes a private school approved under RCW
28A.195.010;
(b) "School bus" means a school bus as defined by the
superintendent of public instruction by rule which is owned and
operated by any school district and all school buses which are
privately owned and operated under contract or otherwise with any
school district in the state for the transportation of students. The
term does not include buses operated by common carriers in the urban
transportation of students such as transportation of students through
a municipal transportation system;
(c) "School bus route stop" means a school bus stop as designated
by a school district;
(d) "Public park" means land, including any facilities or
improvements on the land, that is operated as a park by the state or a
local government;
(e) "Public transit vehicle" means any motor vehicle, streetcar,
train, trolley vehicle, or any other device, vessel, or vehicle which
is owned or operated by a transit authority and which is used for the
purpose of carrying passengers on a regular schedule;
(f) "Transit authority" means a city, county, or state
transportation system, transportation authority, public transportation
benefit area, public transit authority, or metropolitan municipal
corporation within the state that operates public transit vehicles;
(g) "Stop shelter" means a passenger shelter designated by a
transit authority;
(h) "Civic center" means a publicly owned or publicly operated
place or facility used for recreational, educational, or cultural
activities;
(i) "Public housing project" means the same as "housing project" as
defined in RCW 35.82.020.

--- END ---