BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 52.26.230 and 2004 c 129 s 29 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Not fewer than ten days nor more than six months before the
election at which the proposition to impose the benefit charge is
submitted as provided in this chapter, the governing board of the
regional fire protection service authority, or the planning committee
if the benefit charge is being proposed as part of the initial
formation of the regional fire protection service authority, shall hold
a public hearing specifically setting forth its proposal to impose
benefit charges for the support of its legally authorized activities
that will maintain or improve the services afforded in the authority.
A report of the public hearing shall be filed with the county treasurer
of each county in which the property is located and be available for
public inspection.
(2) Prior to November 15th of each year the governing board of the
authority shall hold a public hearing to review and establish the
regional fire protection service authority benefit charges for the
subsequent year.
(3) All resolutions imposing or changing the benefit charges must
be filed with the county treasurer or treasurers of each county in
which the property is located, together with the record of each public
hearing, before November 30th immediately preceding the year in which
the benefit charges are to be collected on behalf of the authority.
(4) After the benefit charges have been established, the owners of
the property subject to the charge must be notified of the amount of
the charge.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.55.092 and 1998 c 16 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The regular property tax levy for each taxing district other than
the state may be set at the amount which would be allowed otherwise
under this chapter if the regular property tax levy for the district
for taxes due in prior years beginning with 1986 had been set at the
full amount allowed under this chapter including any levy authorized
under RCW 52.16.160 or 52.26.140(1)(c) that would have been imposed but
for the limitation in RCW 52.18.065 or 52.26.240, applicable upon
imposition of the benefit charge under chapter 52.18 or 52.26 RCW.
The purpose of this section is to remove the incentive for a taxing
district to maintain its tax levy at the maximum level permitted under
this chapter, and to protect the future levy capacity of a taxing
district that reduces its tax levy below the level that it otherwise
could impose under this chapter, by removing the adverse consequences
to future levy capacities resulting from such levy reductions.

--- END ---