BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.06B.020 and 2008 c 165 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The education ombudsman shall have the following powers and duties:
(1) To develop parental involvement materials, including
instructional guides developed to inform parents of the essential
academic learning requirements required by the superintendent of public
instruction. The instructional guides also shall contain actions
parents may take to assist their children in meeting the requirements,
and should focus on reaching parents who have not previously been
involved with their children's education;
(2) To provide information to students, parents, and interested
members of the public regarding this state's public elementary and
secondary education system;
(3) To identify obstacles to greater parent and community
involvement in school shared decision-making processes and recommend
strategies for helping parents and community members to participate
effectively in school shared decision-making processes, including
understanding and respecting the roles of school building
administrators and staff;
(4) To identify and recommend strategies for improving the success
rates of ethnic and racial student groups and students with
disabilities, with disproportionate academic achievement;
(5) To refer complainants and others to appropriate resources,
agencies, or departments;
(6) To facilitate the resolution of complaints made by parents and
students with regard to the state's public elementary and secondary
education system;
(7) To perform such other functions consistent with the purpose of
the education ombudsman; ((and))
(8) To actively seek and accept public and private money and
develop private-public partnerships to support the purposes of the
office. Any gifts, grants, or endowments from public or private
sources that are made for the use or benefit of the office may be spent
without appropriation according to their terms, along with any income
from such gifts, grants, or endowments; and
(9) To consult with representatives of the following organizations
and groups regarding the work of the office of the education ombudsman,
including but not limited to:
(a) The state parent teacher association;
(b) Certificated and classified school employees;
(c) School and school district administrators;
(d) Parents of special education students;
(e) Parents of English language learners;
(f) The Washington state commission on Hispanic affairs;
(g) The Washington state commission on African-American affairs;
(h) The Washington state commission on Asian Pacific American
affairs; and
(i) The governor's office of Indian affairs.

--- END ---