BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.22 RCW
to read as follows:
The county auditor shall charge a surcharge of sixty-two dollars
for each document recorded, which is in addition to any other charge
allowed by law. The surcharge in this section applies only to
assignments or substitutions of previously recorded deeds of trust.
The funds collected under this section must be transmitted monthly to
the state treasurer who shall deposit the funds in the Washington
housing trust fund account created in RCW 43.185.030. The department
of commerce must use these funds solely for the bond retirement and
interest requirements of the bonds authorized in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 For the purpose of providing funds for the
housing trust fund program at the department of commerce, the state
finance committee is authorized to issue general obligation bonds of
the state of Washington in the sum of one hundred million three hundred
forty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be required, to
finance the projects and all costs incidental thereto. Bonds
authorized in this section may be sold at such price as the state
finance committee shall determine. No bonds authorized in this section
may be offered for sale without prior legislative appropriation of the
net proceeds of the sale of the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The proceeds from the sale of the bonds
authorized in section 2 of this act must be deposited in the Washington
housing bond account created in the state treasury. If the state
finance committee deems it necessary to issue the bonds authorized in
section 2 of this act as taxable bonds in order to comply with federal
internal revenue service rules and regulations pertaining to the use of
nontaxable bond proceeds, the proceeds of such taxable bonds shall be
transferred to the state taxable building construction account in lieu
of any deposit otherwise provided by this section. The state treasurer
shall submit written notice to the director of financial management if
it is determined that any such transfer to the state taxable building
construction account is necessary. Moneys in the account may be spent
only after appropriation. The proceeds shall be used exclusively for
the purposes specified in section 2 of this act and for the payment of
expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds. These
proceeds must be administered by the office of financial management,
subject to legislative appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The debt-limit general fund bond retirement
account must be used for the payment of the principal of and interest
on the bonds authorized in section 2 of this act.
The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th of each
year, certify to the state treasurer the amount needed in the ensuing
twelve months to meet the bond retirement and interest requirements.
On or before the date on which any interest or principal and interest
payment is due, the state treasurer shall transfer from the Washington
housing trust account for deposit in the debt-limit general fund bond
retirement account the following:
(1) An amount equal to the amount certified by the state finance
committee to be due on the payment date; and
(2) Any additional revenue generated in section 1 of this act in
excess of the amount required to meet annual bond retirement and
interest requirements and reasonable reserve requirements. Such excess
revenue must be used for early retirement of the bonds authorized in
section 2 of this act.
Bonds issued under section 2 of this act must state that they are
a general obligation of the state of Washington, must pledge the full
faith and credit of the state to the payment of the principal thereof
and the interest thereon, and must contain an unconditional promise to
pay the principal and interest as the same shall become due.
The owner and holder of each of the bonds or the trustee for the
owner and holder of any of the bonds may by mandamus or other
appropriate proceeding require the transfer and payment of funds as
directed in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The legislature may provide additional means
for raising moneys for the payment of the principal of and interest on
the bonds authorized in section 2 of this act, and section 4 of this
act is not deemed to provide an exclusive method for the payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The bonds authorized in section 2 of this
act shall be a legal investment for all state funds or funds under
state control and for all funds of any other public body.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The sum of one hundred million dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium
ending June 30, 2011, from the Washington housing bond account to the
department of commerce for the purposes of this act.
(1) Up to ten million dollars of the appropriation is for the
workforce housing program established in chapter . . . ., Laws of 2010
(HB 2753).
(2) Up to seven hundred fifty thousand dollars of the appropriation
is for the department of commerce to develop a long-term state
affordable housing strategy, based on the ten-year plan to end
homelessness and the state affordable housing for all plan outlined in
section 8 of this act.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.185B.040 and 1993 c 478 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall, in consultation with the affordable
housing advisory board created in RCW 43.185B.020, prepare and from
time to time amend a ((five-year)) state affordable housing
((advisory)) for all plan. The state plan must incorporate strategies,
objectives, goals, and performance measures, including those required
for the state homeless housing strategic plan required under RCW
43.185C.040. The state affordable housing for all plan may be combined
with the state homeless housing strategic plan required under RCW
43.185C.040 or any other existing state housing plan as long as the
requirements of all of the plans to be merged are met.
(2) The purpose of the state affordable housing for all plan is to:
(a) Document the need for affordable housing in the state and the
extent to which that need is being met through public and private
sector programs((, to));
(b) Outline the development of sound strategies and programs to
promote affordable housing;
(c) Establish, evaluate, and report upon interim goals and
timelines that are determined by the department and by which the state
and counties may be measured;
(d) Evaluate and report upon all counties' use of the affordable
housing for all program surcharge funds provided for in RCW 36.22.178
and all other sources directed to the counties' affordable housing for
all programs;
(e) Report upon how housing trust fund awards within the previous
five-year period are consistent with the state plan and have
contributed to the goal of the affordable housing for all program; and
(f) Facilitate state and county government planning to meet the
state affordable housing ((needs of the state, and to enable the
development of sound strategies and programs for affordable housing))
for all goal.
(3) The information in the ((five-year)) state affordable housing
((advisory)) for all plan must include:
(a) An assessment of the state's housing market trends;
(b) An assessment of the housing needs for ((all)) economic
segments of the state by low-income, very low-income, and extremely
low-income households and special needs populations, including a report
on the number and percentage of additional affordable rental housing
units that are needed statewide and in each county to house low-income,
very low-income, and extremely low-income households;
(c) An inventory of the supply and geographic distribution of
affordable housing rental units made available through public and
private sector programs;
(d) A summary of the activities of all state housing programs, as
well as all housing programs operated by or coordinated by city and
county governments, including local housing-related levy initiatives,
housing-related tax exemption programs, and federally funded programs
operated or coordinated by the state or local governments;
(e) A status report on the degree of progress made by the public
and private sector toward meeting the housing needs of the state,
including each county or city required by the United States department
of housing and urban development to produce a consolidated plan, and
any other city or county where information is readily available;
(((e))) (f) An identification of state and local regulatory
barriers to affordable housing and proposed regulatory and
administrative techniques designed to remove barriers to the
development and placement of affordable housing;((and
(f))) (g) An analysis, statewide and within each county and major
city, of the primary contributors to the cost of housing and an outline
of potential strategies to keep the increasing cost of housing below
the relative rise in wages;
(h) Specific recommendations, policies, or proposals for meeting
the affordable housing needs of the state;
(i) A report on the growth in the population of low-income, very
low-income, and extremely low-income households statewide and for each
county;
(j) A determination of the cost to the state of the affordable
housing shortage;
(k) A report of any differences in the rates of inflation between
median house prices, median rent for a two-bedroom apartment, and
median family income for low-income, very low-income, and extremely
low-income households; and
(l) A summary of the recommendations of the affordable housing
advisory board report as required in RCW 43.185B.030.
(((2)(a))) (4) The ((five-year)) state affordable housing
((advisory)) for all plan required under ((subsection (1) of)) this
section must be submitted to appropriate committees of the legislature
on or before ((February 1, 1994)) December 31, 2010, and subsequent
updated plans must be submitted by December 31st every five years
thereafter.
(((b) Each February 1st, beginning February 1, 1995, the department
shall submit an annual progress report, to the legislature, detailing
the extent to which the state's affordable housing needs were met
during the preceding year and recommendations for meeting those
needs.)) (5) Based on changes to the general population and in the
housing market, the department may revise the performance measures and
goals of the state affordable housing for all plan and set goals for
years following December 31, 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 2 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---