BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.70.110 and 2009 c 403 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary shall charge fees to the licensee for obtaining
a license. Physicians regulated pursuant to chapter 18.71 RCW who
reside and practice in Washington and obtain or renew a retired active
license are exempt from such fees. After June 30, 1995, municipal
corporations providing emergency medical care and transportation
services pursuant to chapter 18.73 RCW shall be exempt from such fees,
provided that such other emergency services shall only be charged for
their pro rata share of the cost of licensure and inspection, if
appropriate. The secretary may waive the fees when, in the discretion
of the secretary, the fees would not be in the best interest of public
health and safety, or when the fees would be to the financial
disadvantage of the state.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, fees
charged shall be based on, but shall not exceed, the cost to the
department for the licensure of the activity or class of activities and
may include costs of necessary inspection.
(3) License fees shall include amounts in addition to the cost of
licensure activities in the following circumstances:
(a) For registered nurses and licensed practical nurses licensed
under chapter 18.79 RCW, support of a central nursing resource center
as provided in RCW 18.79.202, until June 30, 2013;
(b) For all health care providers licensed under RCW 18.130.040,
the cost of regulatory activities for retired volunteer medical worker
licensees as provided in RCW 18.130.360; and
(c) For physicians licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, physician
assistants licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, osteopathic physicians
licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, osteopathic physicians' assistants
licensed under chapter 18.57A RCW, naturopaths licensed under chapter
18.36A RCW, podiatrists licensed under chapter 18.22 RCW, chiropractors
licensed under chapter 18.25 RCW, psychologists licensed under chapter
18.83 RCW, registered nurses licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW,
optometrists licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW, mental health counselors
licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW, massage therapists licensed under
chapter 18.108 RCW, clinical social workers licensed under chapter
18.225 RCW, and acupuncturists licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW, the
license fees shall include up to an additional ((twenty-five)) ten
dollars to be transferred by the department to the University of
Washington for the purposes of RCW 43.70.112.
(4) Health care professionals who are not required to pay the fee
established in subsection (3) of this section may opt to pay that fee
in order to gain access to the resources referenced in RCW 43.70.112.
(5) Department of health advisory committees may review fees
established by the secretary for licenses and comment upon the
appropriateness of the level of such fees.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.70.112 and 2009 c 558 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Within the amounts transferred from the department of health under
RCW 43.70.110(3), the University of Washington shall, through the
health sciences library, provide online access to selected vital
clinical resources, medical journals, decision support tools, and
evidence-based reviews of procedures, drugs, and devices to the health
professionals ((listed)) referenced in RCW 43.70.110(3) (c) and (d).
Online access shall be available no later than January 1, 2009. Each
year, by December 1st, the University of Washington shall provide an
annual accounting of the use of the funds transferred, including which
categories of health professionals are using the materials available
under the program. The accounting must be transmitted by electronic
mail to the members of the health care committees of the legislature.

--- END ---