BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that the
citizens of the state expect that expenditures of funds controlled by
the state will not accelerate climate disruption, measurably degrade
air and water quality, increase health disparities, or otherwise
increase threats to human health and productivity. Therefore, it is
the intent of the legislature that this act serves to clarify existing
responsibilities related to the operation of an efficient statewide
transportation system.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.05.035 and 2007 c 516 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall use the transportation demand modeling
tools developed under subsection (2) of this section to evaluate
investments based on the best mode or improvement, or mix of modes and
improvements, to meet current and future long-term ((demand)) mobility
needs within a corridor or system for the lowest life-cycle cost. The
end result of these demand modeling tools is to provide a cost-benefit
analysis by which the department can determine the ((relative mobility
improvement and congestion relief each mode or improvement under
consideration will provide and the)) net benefit or cost relative to
the investment in each mode or improvement under consideration ((will
need to achieve that relief)).
(2) The department will participate in the refinement, enhancement,
and application of existing transportation demand modeling tools to be
used to evaluate investments. ((This participation and use of
transportation demand modeling tools will be phased in.))
Transportation demand modeling tools used by the department will use
life-cycle cost analysis to determine the most cost-effective
investments including, but not limited to, benefits for investments in
each mode or modes from reductions in vehicle delay, emissions of
greenhouse gases, as defined in RCW 70.235.010, health impacts, barrier
effects, habitat loss, and great bodily harm as defined in RCW
9A.04.110 or death from motor vehicle crashes.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Barrier effect" means a degradation or loss of mobility in the
nonmotorized travel environment resulting from high volumes of motor
vehicle traffic.
(b) "Habitat loss" means the process in which natural habitat is
rendered functionally unable to support the species present.
(c) "Health impacts" means monetized costs incurred as a result of
cardiovascular and chronic disease from mobile source air pollution and
marginal benefits of physical activity.

--- END ---