BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Urban main streets should be designed to
provide safe access to all users, including bicyclists, pedestrians,
motorists, and public transportation users. Context sensitive design
and engineering principles allow for flexible solutions depending on a
community's needs, and result in many positive outcomes for cities and
towns, including improving the health and safety of a community. It is
the intent of the legislature to encourage street designs that safely
meet the needs of all users and also protect and preserve a community's
environment and character.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish a complete streets grant program
within the department's highways and local programs division, or its
successor. The purpose of the grant program is to encourage local
governments to adopt urban arterial retrofit street ordinances designed
to provide safe access to all users, including bicyclists, pedestrians,
motorists, and public transportation users, with the goals of:
(a) Promoting healthy communities by encouraging walking,
bicycling, and using public transportation;
(b) Improving safety by designing major arterials to include
features such as wider sidewalks, dedicated bicycle facilities,
medians, and pedestrian streetscape features, including trees where
appropriate.
(c) Protecting the environment and reducing congestion by providing
safe alternatives to single-occupancy driving; and
(d) Preserving community character by involving local citizens and
stakeholders to participate in planning and design decisions.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Eligible project" means a local government street retrofit
project that includes the addition of, or significant repair to,
facilities that provide street access with all users in mind, including
pedestrians, bicyclists, and public transportation users. If the local
government is the lead applicant to the department, an eligible project
may also include locations that are served by both a local government
and a city or incorporated town that is less than twenty thousand in
population that has adopted a jurisdiction-wide complete streets
ordinance.
(b) "Local government" means incorporated cities and towns with
populations of at least twenty thousand that have adopted a
jurisdiction-wide complete streets ordinance that plans for the needs
of all users and is consistent with sound engineering principles.
(c) "Sound engineering principles" means the 2006 urban design
principles and guidelines developed by the institute of transportation
engineers, titled "Context Sensitive Solutions in Designing Major Urban
Thoroughfares for Walkable Communities," or subsequent updates to these
principles and guidelines published by the institute.
(3) In carrying out the purposes of this section, the department
may award funding, subject to the availability of amounts appropriated
for this specific purpose, only to eligible projects that are designed
consistent with sound engineering principles.
(4) The department must report annually to the transportation
committees of the legislature on the status of any grant projects
funded by the program created under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The complete streets grant program account is created in the
state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Only the department may authorize expenditures from the
account. Expenditures from the account may be used solely for the
grants provided under section 2 of this act.
(2) The department may solicit and receive gifts, grants, or
endowments from private and other sources that are made, in trust or
otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of the complete
streets grant program as provided in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW
to read as follows:
When constructing, retrofitting, or making major repairs to streets
described in RCW 47.24.010, the department must, for street projects
initially planned or scoped after July 1, 2010, and subject to a local
funding contribution as determined by the department:
(1) Consult with local jurisdictions in the design and planning
phases. Consultation with local jurisdictions must include public
outreach and meetings with interested stakeholders in the predesign
phase for the purpose of clarifying community goals and priorities
through community design exercises prior to developing any designs or
visualizations; and
(2) Consider the needs of all users by applying context sensitive
design solutions consistent with the institute of transportation
engineers' 2006 principles and guidelines, titled "Context Sensitive
Solutions in Designing Major Urban Thoroughfares for Walkable
Communities," or subsequent updates to these principles and guidelines
published by the institute.

--- END ---