BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the availability
of technology, online learning, and field and project-based curricula
offer new opportunities for school districts to design innovative
programs for high school students. However, the legislature also finds
that while small, rural school districts desire to offer innovative
learning options for students in their communities, they are
constrained by state laws and rules that appear to prohibit nonhigh
school districts from creating options for their high school students
in cooperation with other nonhigh school districts. Therefore, the
legislature intends to authorize and encourage innovative, cooperative
high school programs for students from very small school districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.340
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Two or more nonhigh school districts may form an interdistrict
cooperative, to offer an innovation academy cooperative, as defined in
section 3 of this act and subject to the approval of the office of the
superintendent of public instruction under section 4 of this act, for
high school students residing in the participating nonhigh school
districts.
(2) Enrollment in an innovation academy cooperative is optional for
students. For students residing in a participating nonhigh school
district who enroll in a high school district rather than the
innovation academy cooperative, the provisions of RCW 28A.540.110 and
chapter 28A.545 RCW apply to the nonhigh school district.
(3) Each innovation academy cooperative shall designate one of the
participating nonhigh school districts to report enrolled students for
funding purposes. The reporting district shall claim the monthly full-time equivalent students enrolled in the innovation academy cooperative
and receive state funding allocations, including basic education
allocations that are based on the small high school allocation under
the appropriations act to the extent the number of students enrolled in
the innovation academy cooperative meets the criteria for a small high
school.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.340
RCW to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of sections 2 through 4 of this act, an
innovation academy cooperative is a high school program with one or
more of the following characteristics:
(a) Interdisciplinary curriculum and instruction organized into
subject-focused themes or academies. Programs are encouraged to
provide an initial focus on academies in science, technology,
engineering, and mathematics;
(b) A combination of instructional service delivery models,
including alternative learning experiences, online learning, work-based
learning, experiential and field-based learning, and direct classroom
instruction at multiple and varying locations;
(c) Intensive and accelerated learning to enable students to
complete high school credits in a short time period; and
(d) Creative scheduling and use of existing school or community
facilities in innovative ways to minimize facility and transportation
costs and maximize access for students who may be geographically
dispersed.
(2) Participating nonhigh school districts shall work with local
community and technical colleges and four-year institutions of higher
education to expand the learning options available for students in an
innovation academy cooperative.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.340
RCW to read as follows:
Nonhigh school districts proposing to enter an interdistrict
agreement to offer an innovation academy cooperative shall submit a
copy of the proposed agreement and operating and instructional plans
for the cooperative to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction for technical review. The purpose of the review is for the
office to provide technical assistance and advice to assure that the
cooperative addresses issues identified under RCW 28A.225.250 and to
assure that the proposed instructional program will offer courses and
learning experiences that enable students to earn high school credit
and complete a high school diploma. The office of the superintendent
of public instruction must approve agreements and plans before an
innovation academy cooperative begins operation.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.225.200 and 1990 c 33 s 234 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A local district may be authorized by the educational service
district superintendent to transport and educate its pupils in other
districts for one year, either by payment of a compensation agreed upon
by such school districts, or under other terms mutually satisfactory to
the districts concerned when this will afford better educational
facilities for the pupils and when a saving may be effected in the cost
of education: PROVIDED, That notwithstanding any other provision of
law, the amount to be paid by the state to the resident school district
for apportionment purposes and otherwise payable pursuant to RCW
28A.150.100, 28A.150.250 through 28A.150.290, 28A.150.350 through
28A.150.410, 28A.160.150 through 28A.160.200, ((28A.160.220))
28A.300.035, 28A.300.170, and 28A.500.010 shall not be greater than the
regular apportionment for each high school student of the receiving
district. Such authorization may be extended for an additional year at
the discretion of the educational service district superintendent.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to districts
participating in a cooperative project established under RCW
28A.340.030 which exceeds two years in duration or to nonhigh school
districts participating in an interdistrict cooperative under sections
2 through 4 of this act.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.225.200 and 2009 c 548 s 706 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A local district may be authorized by the educational service
district superintendent to transport and educate its pupils in other
districts for one year, either by payment of a compensation agreed upon
by such school districts, or under other terms mutually satisfactory to
the districts concerned when this will afford better educational
facilities for the pupils and when a saving may be effected in the cost
of education. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the amount
to be paid by the state to the resident school district for
apportionment purposes and otherwise payable pursuant to RCW
28A.150.250 through 28A.150.290, 28A.150.350 through 28A.150.410,
28A.160.150 through 28A.160.200, 28A.300.035, and 28A.300.170 shall not
be greater than the regular apportionment for each high school student
of the receiving district. Such authorization may be extended for an
additional year at the discretion of the educational service district
superintendent.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to districts
participating in a cooperative project established under RCW
28A.340.030 which exceeds two years in duration or to nonhigh school
districts participating in an interdistrict cooperative under sections
2 through 4 of this act.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.545.040 and 1995 c 77 s 25 are each amended to
read as follows:
The term "student residing in a nonhigh school district" and its
equivalent as used in RCW 28A.545.030 through 28A.545.110 and
84.52.0531 shall mean any common school age person with or without
disabilities who resides within the boundaries of a nonhigh school
district that does not conduct the particular kindergarten through
grade twelve grade which the person has not yet successfully completed
and is eligible to enroll in, not including students enrolled in an
innovation academy cooperative established under sections 2 through 4
of this act.

Sec. 8 RCW 28A.545.120 and 2006 c 263 s 325 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction, with recommendations
from the school facilities citizen advisory panel under RCW
28A.525.025, shall adopt rules governing the establishment in any
existing nonhigh school district of any secondary program or any new
grades in grades nine through twelve. Before any such program or any
new grades are established, the district must obtain prior approval of
the superintendent of public instruction.
(2) This section does not apply to innovation academy cooperatives
established under sections 2 through 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall review the implementation of sections 2 through 4 of
this act to identify keys to success and any barriers to successful
implementation of innovation academy cooperatives and submit a report
to the education committees of the legislature by January 1, 2013.

Sec. 10 RCW 84.52.0531 and 2009 c 4 s 908 are each amended to
read as follows:
The maximum dollar amount which may be levied by or for any school
district for maintenance and operation support under the provisions of
RCW 84.52.053 shall be determined as follows:
(1) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1997, the
maximum dollar amount shall be calculated pursuant to the laws and
rules in effect in November 1996.
(2) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and
thereafter, the maximum dollar amount shall be the sum of (a) plus or
minus (b) ((and)), (c), and (d) of this subsection minus (((d))) (e) of
this subsection:
(a) The district's levy base as defined in subsections (3) and (4)
of this section multiplied by the district's maximum levy percentage as
defined in subsection (5) of this section;
(b) For districts in a high/nonhigh relationship, the high school
district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the nonhigh school
district's maximum levy amount shall be increased by an amount equal to
the estimated amount of the nonhigh payment due to the high school
district under RCW 28A.545.030(3) and 28A.545.050 for the school year
commencing the year of the levy;
(c) Except for nonhigh districts under (d) of this subsection, for
districts in an interdistrict cooperative agreement, the nonresident
school district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the resident
school district's maximum levy amount shall be increased by an amount
equal to the per pupil basic education allocation included in the
nonresident district's levy base under subsection (3) of this section
multiplied by:
(i) The number of full-time equivalent students served from the
resident district in the prior school year; multiplied by:
(ii) The serving district's maximum levy percentage determined
under subsection (5) of this section; increased by:
(iii) The percent increase per full-time equivalent student as
stated in the state basic education appropriation section of the
biennial budget between the prior school year and the current school
year divided by fifty-five percent;
(d) The levy bases of nonhigh districts participating in an
innovation academy cooperative established under section 2 of this act
shall be adjusted by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction to reflect each district's proportional share of student
enrollment in the cooperative;
(e) The district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced by the
maximum amount of state matching funds for which the district is
eligible under RCW 28A.500.010.
(3) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 2005 and
thereafter, a district's levy base shall be the sum of allocations in
(a) through (c) of this subsection received by the district for the
prior school year and the amounts determined under subsection (4) of
this section, including allocations for compensation increases, plus
the sum of such allocations multiplied by the percent increase per full
time equivalent student as stated in the state basic education
appropriation section of the biennial budget between the prior school
year and the current school year and divided by fifty-five percent. A
district's levy base shall not include local school district property
tax levies or other local revenues, or state and federal allocations
not identified in (a) through (c) of this subsection.
(a) The district's basic education allocation as determined
pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350;
(b) State and federal categorical allocations for the following
programs:
(i) Pupil transportation;
(ii) Special education;
(iii) Education of highly capable students;
(iv) Compensatory education, including but not limited to learning
assistance, migrant education, Indian education, refugee programs, and
bilingual education;
(v) Food services; and
(vi) Statewide block grant programs; and
(c) Any other federal allocations for elementary and secondary
school programs, including direct grants, other than federal impact aid
funds and allocations in lieu of taxes.
(4) For levy collections in calendar years 2005 through 2011, in
addition to the allocations included under subsection (3)(a) through
(c) of this section, a district's levy base shall also include the
following:
(a) The difference between the allocation the district would have
received in the current school year had RCW 84.52.068 not been amended
by chapter 19, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess. and the allocation the
district received in the current school year pursuant to RCW 84.52.068.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall offset the
amount added to a district's levy base pursuant to this subsection
(4)(a) by any additional per student allocations included in a
district's levy base pursuant to the enactment of an initiative to the
people subsequent to June 10, 2004; and
(b) The difference between the allocations the district would have
received the prior school year had RCW 28A.400.205 not been amended by
chapter 20, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess. and the allocations the district
actually received the prior school year pursuant to RCW 28A.400.205.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall offset the
amount added to a district's levy base pursuant to this subsection
(4)(b) by any additional salary increase allocations included in a
district's levy base pursuant to the enactment of an initiative to the
people subsequent to June 10, 2004.
(5) A district's maximum levy percentage shall be twenty-two
percent in 1998 and twenty-four percent in 1999 and every year
thereafter; plus, for qualifying districts, the grandfathered
percentage determined as follows:
(a) For 1997, the difference between the district's 1993 maximum
levy percentage and twenty percent; and
(b) For 1998 and thereafter, the percentage calculated as follows:
(i) Multiply the grandfathered percentage for the prior year times
the district's levy base determined under subsection (3) of this
section;
(ii) Reduce the result of (b)(i) of this subsection by any levy
reduction funds as defined in subsection (6) of this section that are
to be allocated to the district for the current school year;
(iii) Divide the result of (b)(ii) of this subsection by the
district's levy base; and
(iv) Take the greater of zero or the percentage calculated in
(b)(iii) of this subsection.
(6) "Levy reduction funds" shall mean increases in state funds from
the prior school year for programs included under subsections (3) and
(4) of this section: (a) That are not attributable to enrollment
changes, compensation increases, or inflationary adjustments; and (b)
that are or were specifically identified as levy reduction funds in the
appropriations act. If levy reduction funds are dependent on formula
factors which would not be finalized until after the start of the
current school year, the superintendent of public instruction shall
estimate the total amount of levy reduction funds by using prior school
year data in place of current school year data. Levy reduction funds
shall not include moneys received by school districts from cities or
counties.
(7) For the purposes of this section, "prior school year" means the
most recent school year completed prior to the year in which the levies
are to be collected.
(8) For the purposes of this section, "current school year" means
the year immediately following the prior school year.
(9) Funds collected from transportation vehicle fund tax levies
shall not be subject to the levy limitations in this section.
(10) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop rules
and regulations and inform school districts of the pertinent data
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
(11) For calendar year 2009, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall recalculate school district levy authority to
reflect levy rates certified by school districts for calendar year
2009.

Sec. 11 RCW 84.52.0531 and 1997 c 259 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The maximum dollar amount which may be levied by or for any school
district for maintenance and operation support under the provisions of
RCW 84.52.053 shall be determined as follows:
(1) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1997, the
maximum dollar amount shall be calculated pursuant to the laws and
rules in effect in November 1996.
(2) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and
thereafter, the maximum dollar amount shall be the sum of (a) plus or
minus (b) ((and)), (c), and (d) of this subsection minus (((d))) (e) of
this subsection:
(a) The district's levy base as defined in subsection (3) of this
section multiplied by the district's maximum levy percentage as defined
in subsection (4) of this section;
(b) For districts in a high/nonhigh relationship, the high school
district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the nonhigh school
district's maximum levy amount shall be increased by an amount equal to
the estimated amount of the nonhigh payment due to the high school
district under RCW 28A.545.030(3) and 28A.545.050 for the school year
commencing the year of the levy;
(c) Except for nonhigh districts under (d) of this subsection, for
districts in an interdistrict cooperative agreement, the nonresident
school district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the resident
school district's maximum levy amount shall be increased by an amount
equal to the per pupil basic education allocation included in the
nonresident district's levy base under subsection (3) of this section
multiplied by:
(i) The number of full-time equivalent students served from the
resident district in the prior school year; multiplied by:
(ii) The serving district's maximum levy percentage determined
under subsection (4) of this section; increased by:
(iii) The percent increase per full-time equivalent student as
stated in the state basic education appropriation section of the
biennial budget between the prior school year and the current school
year divided by fifty-five percent;
(d) The levy bases of nonhigh districts participating in an
innovation academy cooperative established under section 2 of this act
shall be adjusted by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction to reflect each district's proportional share of student
enrollment in the cooperative;
(e) The district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced by the
maximum amount of state matching funds for which the district is
eligible under RCW 28A.500.010.
(3) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and
thereafter, a district's levy base shall be the sum of allocations in
(a) through (c) of this subsection received by the district for the
prior school year, including allocations for compensation increases,
plus the sum of such allocations multiplied by the percent increase per
full time equivalent student as stated in the state basic education
appropriation section of the biennial budget between the prior school
year and the current school year and divided by fifty-five percent. A
district's levy base shall not include local school district property
tax levies or other local revenues, or state and federal allocations
not identified in (a) through (c) of this subsection.
(a) The district's basic education allocation as determined
pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350;
(b) State and federal categorical allocations for the following
programs:
(i) Pupil transportation;
(ii) Special education;
(iii) Education of highly capable students;
(iv) Compensatory education, including but not limited to learning
assistance, migrant education, Indian education, refugee programs, and
bilingual education;
(v) Food services; and
(vi) Statewide block grant programs; and
(c) Any other federal allocations for elementary and secondary
school programs, including direct grants, other than federal impact aid
funds and allocations in lieu of taxes.
(4) A district's maximum levy percentage shall be twenty-two
percent in 1998 and twenty-four percent in 1999 and every year
thereafter; plus, for qualifying districts, the grandfathered
percentage determined as follows:
(a) For 1997, the difference between the district's 1993 maximum
levy percentage and twenty percent; and
(b) For 1998 and thereafter, the percentage calculated as follows:
(i) Multiply the grandfathered percentage for the prior year times
the district's levy base determined under subsection (3) of this
section;
(ii) Reduce the result of (b)(i) of this subsection by any levy
reduction funds as defined in subsection (5) of this section that are
to be allocated to the district for the current school year;
(iii) Divide the result of (b)(ii) of this subsection by the
district's levy base; and
(iv) Take the greater of zero or the percentage calculated in
(b)(iii) of this subsection.
(5) "Levy reduction funds" shall mean increases in state funds from
the prior school year for programs included under subsection (3) of
this section: (a) That are not attributable to enrollment changes,
compensation increases, or inflationary adjustments; and (b) that are
or were specifically identified as levy reduction funds in the
appropriations act. If levy reduction funds are dependent on formula
factors which would not be finalized until after the start of the
current school year, the superintendent of public instruction shall
estimate the total amount of levy reduction funds by using prior school
year data in place of current school year data. Levy reduction funds
shall not include moneys received by school districts from cities or
counties.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "prior school year" means the
most recent school year completed prior to the year in which the levies
are to be collected.
(7) For the purposes of this section, "current school year" means
the year immediately following the prior school year.
(8) Funds collected from transportation vehicle fund tax levies
shall not be subject to the levy limitations in this section.
(9) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop rules
and regulations and inform school districts of the pertinent data
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Section 5 of this act expires September 1,
2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Section 6 of this act takes effect
September 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Section 10 of this act expires January 1,
2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Section 11 of this act takes effect January
1, 2012.

--- END ---