BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Convenient and environmentally sound product stewardship
programs for mercury-containing lights that include collecting,
transporting, and recycling mercury-containing lights will help protect
Washington's environment and the health of state residents;
(2) Mercury lighting is a toxic and hard to collect waste product
that is appropriate for product stewardship;
(3) The purpose of this act is to achieve a statewide goal of
recycling all end-of-life mercury-containing lights by 2020 through
expanded public education, a uniform statewide requirement to recycle
all mercury-containing lights, and the development of a comprehensive,
safe, and convenient collection system that includes use of residential
curbside collection programs, mail-back containers, increased support
for household hazardous waste facilities, and a network of additional
collection locations;
(4) Product producers must play a significant role in financing no-cost collection and processing programs for household generators and
persons discarding up to fifteen mercury-containing lights. Product
producers will finance the collection, transportation, and processing
costs of mercury-containing lights collected at participating
collection locations, including participating household hazardous waste
facilities, charities, retailers, government recycling sites, or other
suitable locations. Product producers will finance the costs of
transporting mercury-containing lights from accumulation points and
processing mercury containing lights collected by curbside and mail-back programs; and
(5) Providers of premium collection services such as residential
curbside and mail-back programs may charge a fee to cover the
collection costs for these more convenient forms of collection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Brand" means a name, symbol, word, or mark that identifies a
product, rather than its components, and attributes the product to the
owner of the brand as the producer.
(2) "Covered entities" means:
(a) A single-family or a multifamily household generator and
persons that deliver no more than fifteen mercury-containing lights to
registered collectors for a product stewardship program during a
ninety-day period; and
(b) A single-family or a multifamily household generator and
persons that utilize a registered residential curbside collection
program or a mail-back program for collection of mercury-containing
lights and that discards no more than fifteen mercury-containing lights
into those programs during a ninety-day period.
(3) "Collection" or "collect" means, except for persons involved in
mail-back programs:
(a) The activity of accumulating any amount of mercury-containing
lights at a location other than the location where the lights are used
by covered entities, and includes curbside collection activities,
household hazardous waste facilities, and other registered drop-off
locations; and
(b) The activity of transporting mercury-containing lights in the
state, where the transporter is not a generator of unwanted mercury-containing lights, to a location for purposes of accumulation.
(4) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(5) "Final disposition" means the point beyond which no further
processing takes place and materials from mercury-containing lights
have been transformed for direct use as a feedstock in producing new
products, or disposed of or managed in permitted facilities.
(6) "Hazardous substances" or "hazardous materials" means those
substances or materials identified by rules adopted under chapter
70.105 RCW.
(7) "Mail-back program" means the use of a prepaid postage
container with mercury vapor barrier packaging that is used for the
collection and recycling of mercury-containing lights from covered
entities as part of a product stewardship program and is transported by
the United States postal service or a common carrier.
(8) "Mercury vapor barrier packaging" means sealable containers
that are specifically designed for the storage, handling, and transport
of mercury-containing lights in order to prevent the escape of mercury
into the environment by volatilization or any other means, and that
meet the requirements for transporting by the United States postal
service or a common carrier.
(9) "Mercury-containing lights" means lamps, bulbs, tubes, or other
devices that contain mercury and provide functional illumination in
homes, businesses, and outdoor stationary fixtures.
(10) "Orphan product" means a mercury-containing light that lacks
a producer's brand, or for which the producer is no longer in business
and has no successor in interest, or that bears a brand for which the
department cannot identify an owner.
(11) "Person" means a sole proprietorship, partnership,
corporation, nonprofit corporation or organization, limited liability
company, firm, association, cooperative, or other legal entity located
within or outside Washington state.
(12) "Processing" means recovering materials from unwanted products
for use as feedstock in new products or disposal or management in
permitted facilities.
(13) "Producer" means a person that:
(a) Has or had legal ownership of the brand, brand name, or cobrand
of a mercury-containing light sold in or into Washington state;
(b) Imports or has imported mercury-containing lights branded by a
producer that meets the requirements of (a) of this subsection and
where that producer has no physical presence in the United States;
(c) If (a) and (b) of this subsection do not apply, makes or made
an unbranded mercury-containing light that is sold or has been sold in
or into Washington state; or
(d)(i) Sells or sold at wholesale or retail a mercury-containing
light; (ii) does not have legal ownership of the brand; and (iii)
elects to fulfill the responsibilities of the producer for that
product.
(14) "Product stewardship" means a requirement for a producer of
mercury-containing lights to manage and reduce adverse safety, health,
and environmental impacts of the product throughout its life cycle,
including financing and providing for the collection, transporting,
reusing, recycling, processing, and final disposition of their
products.
(15) "Product stewardship plan" or "plan" means a detailed plan
describing the manner in which a product stewardship program will be
implemented.
(16) "Product stewardship program" or "program" means the methods,
systems, and services financed and provided by producers of mercury-containing lights generated by covered entities that addresses product
stewardship and includes collecting, transporting, reusing, recycling,
processing, and final disposition of unwanted mercury-containing
lights, including a fair share of orphan products.
(17) "Recovery" means the collection and transportation of unwanted
mercury-containing lights under this chapter.
(18)(a) "Recycling" means transforming or remanufacturing unwanted
products into usable or marketable materials for use other than
landfill disposal or incineration.
(b) "Recycling" does not include energy recovery or energy
generation by means of combusting unwanted products with or without
other waste.
(19) "Reporting period" means the period commencing January 1st and
ending December 31st in the same calendar year.
(20) "Residuals" means nonrecyclable materials left over from
processing an unwanted product.
(21) "Retailer" means a person who offers mercury-containing lights
for sale at retail through any means including, but not limited to,
remote offerings such as sales outlets, catalogs, or the internet, but
does not include a sale that is a wholesale transaction with a
distributor or a retailer.
(22)(a) "Reuse" means a change in ownership of a mercury-containing
light or its components, parts, packaging, or shipping materials for
use in the same manner and purpose for which it was originally
purchased, or for use again, as in shipping materials, by the generator
of the shipping materials.
(b) "Reuse" does not include dismantling of products for the
purpose of recycling.
(23) "Stakeholder" means a person who may have an interest in or be
affected by a product stewardship program.
(24) "Stewardship organization" means an organization designated by
a producer or group of producers to act as an agent on behalf of each
producer to operate a product stewardship program.
(25) "Unwanted product" means a mercury-containing light no longer
wanted by its owner or that has been abandoned, discarded, or is
intended to be discarded by its owner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1)(a) All mercury-containing lights
collected in the state by product stewardship programs or other
collection programs must be recycled. Mercury and mercury-bearing
residuals that exhibit characteristics of hazardous waste from
recycling of mercury-containing lights must be retorted at a facility
that has the required permits and licenses.
(b) Mercury recovered from retorting must be recycled or placed in
a properly permitted hazardous waste landfill, or placed in a properly
permitted mercury repository.
(2) Product stewardship programs for mercury-containing lights must
be fully implemented by January 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Effective January 1, 2013:
(1) All persons, residents, government, commercial, industrial, and
retail facilities and office buildings must recycle their end-of-life
mercury-containing lights.
(2) No mercury-containing lights may knowingly be placed in waste
containers for disposal at incinerators, waste to energy facilities, or
landfills.
(3) No mercury-containing lights may knowingly be placed in a
container for mixed recyclables unless there is a separate location or
compartment for the mercury-containing lights that complies with local
government collection standards or guidelines.
(4) No owner or operator of a solid waste facility may be found in
violation of this section if the facility has posted in a conspicuous
location a sign stating that mercury-containing lights must be recycled
and are not accepted for disposal.
(5) No solid waste collector may be found in violation of this
section for mercury-containing lights placed in a disposal container by
the generator of the mercury-containing light.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Except for persons involved in
registered mail-back programs, a person who collects unwanted mercury-containing lights in the state, receives funding through a product
stewardship program for mercury-containing lights, and who is not a
generator of unwanted mercury-containing lights must:
(a) Register with the department as a collector of unwanted
mercury-containing lights. Until the department adopts rules for
collectors, the collector must provide to the department the legal name
of the person or entity owning and operating the collection location,
the address and phone number of the collection location, and the name,
address, and phone number of the individual responsible for operating
the collection location and update any changes in this information
within thirty days of the change;
(b) Maintain a spill and release response plan at the collection
location that describes the materials, equipment, and procedures that
will be used to respond to any release from an unwanted mercury-containing light;
(c) Maintain a worker safety plan at the collection location that
describes the handling of the unwanted mercury-containing lights at the
collection location and measures that will be taken to protect worker
health and safety; and
(d) Use packaging and shipping material that will minimize the
release of mercury into the environment and minimize breakage and use
mercury vapor barrier packaging if mercury-containing lights are
transported by the United States postal service or a common carrier.
(2) A person who operates a curbside collection program or owns or
operates a mail-back business participating in a product stewardship
program for mercury-containing lights and uses the United States postal
service or a common carrier for transport must register with the
department and use mercury vapor barrier packaging for curbside
collection and mail-back containers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Every producer of mercury-containing
lights sold in or into Washington state must participate in a product
stewardship program for that product.
(2) Every producer must:
(a) Operate, either individually or jointly with other producers,
a product stewardship program approved by the department; or
(b) Enter into an agreement with a stewardship organization to
operate, on the producer's behalf, a product stewardship program
approved by the department.
(3) A producer, group of producers, or stewardship organization
must pay all administrative and operational costs associated with their
program or programs, except for the collection costs associated with
curbside and mail-back collection programs. For curbside and mail-back
programs, a producer, group of producers, or stewardship organization
shall finance the costs of transporting mercury-containing lights from
accumulation points and for processing mercury-containing lights
collected by curbside and mail-back programs. For collection
locations, including household hazardous waste facilities, charities,
retailers, government recycling sites, or other suitable locations, a
producer, group of producers, or stewardship organization shall finance
the costs of collection, transportation, and processing of mercury-containing lights collected at the collection locations.
(4) Product stewardship programs shall collect, free of charge,
unwanted mercury-containing lights delivered from covered entities for
reuse, recycling, processing, or final disposition.
(5) The department or its designee may inspect, audit, or review
audits of processing and disposal facilities used to fulfill the
requirements of a product stewardship program.
(6) No product stewardship program required under this chapter may
use federal or state prison labor for processing unwanted products.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) As of the implementation date
established under this chapter for mercury-containing lights, no
producer, wholesaler, retailer, or other person may sell or offer for
sale that product to any person in this state unless the producer is
participating in a product stewardship program under a plan approved by
the department.
(2) Each product stewardship plan must be approved by the
department.
(3) A person selling or offering for sale mercury-containing lights
in this state must receive from the producer of the product
verification that the producer is participating in an approved product
stewardship program prior to selling the product in or into the state.
A person is considered to have complied with this subsection if, on the
date the person ordered mercury-containing lights from a producer or
its agent, the producer was listed by the department as participating
in an approved product stewardship program or the producer provided
written verification on the shipping documents or billing invoice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The department shall periodically
publish a notice on its web site, and in any other manner it deems
appropriate, requesting that stakeholders who are interested in product
stewardship programs contact the department. The department shall
maintain a list of interested stakeholders, including their mailing
address, and make it available in writing upon request.
(2) A producer, group of producers, or stewardship organization
operating or intending to operate a product stewardship program must,
at least sixty days prior to submitting a product stewardship plan to
the department under subsection (3) of this section, provide public
notice of the plan it is considering for submittal to the list of
interested stakeholders maintained by the department under subsection
(1) of this section. The producer, group of producers, or stewardship
organization must solicit stakeholder comment and input during
development of the plan and attempt to address any stakeholder concerns
regarding the plan prior to submittal. Documentation of these actions
must be submitted to the department at the time of plan submittal.
(3) A producer, group of producers, or stewardship organization
operating or intending to operate a product stewardship program must
submit a product stewardship plan to the department specifying:
(a) Information, including contact information, regarding:
(i) The organization submitting the plan;
(ii) A list of all participating producers and their brands,
including the trademark, if applicable; and
(iii) If the program is to be operated by a stewardship
organization, a description of management, administration, and tasks to
be performed by the stewardship organization.
(b) Recovery goals for unwanted mercury-containing lights,
including:
(i) Recovery goals for the first, second, and third years of the
program, expressed as pounds per capita, and an explanation of how
these goals reflect a significant percentage of unwanted mercury-containing lights generated by covered entities relative to the
quantity of the unwanted product that may be available for reuse or
recycling; and
(ii) Plans to maximize reuse or recycling of packaging or shipping
materials that may be collected.
(c) A collection system for unwanted mercury-containing lights,
including:
(i) Location of collection sites and other collection services to
be used by the program;
(ii) A description of the consideration given to existing
residential curbside collection infrastructure and mail-back systems as
an appropriate collection mechanism. If the curbside collection
infrastructure and the mail-back systems are not utilized by the plan,
a written explanation must be provided citing the reasons that curbside
collection services and mail-back services are not included in the
plan;
(iii) How unwanted mercury-containing lights from all covered
entities will be collected for all cities in the state with populations
greater than ten thousand and in all counties of the state;
(iv) How the collection system will be convenient and adequate to
serve the needs of all covered entities in both urban and rural areas;
and
(v) How collected unwanted mercury-containing lights will be
transported to processing facilities.
(d) A processing and disposal system for unwanted mercury-containing lights, including:
(i) Locations, permit status, and records of any penalties,
violations, or regulatory orders received in the previous three years
by processing and disposal facilities proposed to be used by the
program, including all downstream processing and disposal facilities
handling hazardous substances and hazardous materials through final
disposition;
(ii) A third-party audit of each processing and disposal facility
proposed to be used by the program for any unwanted mercury-containing
lights or residuals containing hazardous substances or hazardous
materials, documenting compliance with all applicable laws,
regulations, and rules;
(iii) Policies and procedures to be followed by persons collecting,
transporting, processing, and disposing of unwanted mercury-containing
lights, including how the program will ensure compliance with all
applicable laws, regulations, and rules;
(iv) A description of how unwanted mercury-containing lights will
be processed at each processing facility;
(v) How all residuals will be disposed of or managed in permitted
facilities, including disposal or management of all hazardous
substances and hazardous materials in permitted hazardous waste
facilities;
(vi) How hazardous substances and hazardous materials will be
safely and securely tracked and handled from collection to final
disposition in compliance with this chapter, any rules adopted by the
department to implement this chapter, and all other applicable laws and
rules; and
(vii) Management practices that will be used by first processors
and their downstream vendors to ensure that hazardous substances and
hazardous materials are not released into the environment and will not
adversely impact human health.
(e) How the program will seek to use businesses within the state,
including transportation services, retailers, collection sites and
services, existing curbside collection services, existing mail-back
services, and processing facilities.
(f) A financing system for the recovery and recycling of unwanted
mercury-containing lights, including:
(i) How the entire product stewardship program will be financed,
that may include how costs will be apportioned among and assessed upon
producers participating in the program;
(ii) How those providing services for the collection,
transportation, and processing systems will be fairly compensated for
their services; and
(iii) How operators of residential curbside collection programs and
mail-back programs will be compensated for the cost of transporting and
processing mercury-containing lights collected from covered entities.
(g) Education and outreach activities, including:
(i) An effective advertising campaign promoting the use of the
program to all covered entities that includes a toll-free telephone
number and web site, with market saturation sufficient to ensure
meeting recovery goals;
(ii) A description of how and when information about the program
will be provided to retailers, wholesalers, collectors, and other
interested parties to disseminate to covered entities; and
(iii) The methodology for determining how the effectiveness of the
outreach activities will be measured.
(h) The stakeholder process described under subsection (2) of this
section, including:
(i) A description of the process used to solicit stakeholder input
during development of the plan; and
(ii) A summary of stakeholder comments and how any stakeholder
concerns were addressed.
(4) All plans submitted to the department must be made available
for public review on the department's web site and at the department's
headquarters.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) A producer, group of producers, or
stewardship organization must submit a proposed product stewardship
plan for mercury-containing lights from covered entities to the
department by January 1, 2011.
(2) Within ninety days after receiving a proposed product
stewardship plan, the department shall determine whether the plan
complies with this chapter and any rules adopted to implement this
chapter. If it approves a plan, the department shall notify the
applicant of its approval. If it rejects a plan, the department shall
notify the applicant of its decision and its reasons for rejecting the
plan. An applicant whose plan has been rejected by the department may
submit a revised plan to the department within sixty days after
receiving notice of the rejection to maintain compliance with this
chapter or may join another plan within sixty days after receiving
notice of rejection.
(3) At least two years from the start of the product stewardship
program and once every four years thereafter, a producer, group of
producers, or stewardship organization operating a product stewardship
program must update its product stewardship plan and submit the updated
plan to the department for review. The department must determine the
status of an updated plan within ninety days of its submittal. If the
department rejects an updated plan, the department shall provide the
reasons it rejected the updated plan. The producer or producers of
mercury-containing lights participating in the product stewardship
program shall continue to operate under the prior approved plan for not
more than ninety days or another time period approved by the department
and shall submit a revised updated plan for approval within that time
period. The prior approved plan remains in effect until the department
approves or rejects the revised plan. Failure of a product stewardship
program to submit an updated plan within the time period provided under
this subsection is deemed to be out of compliance with this chapter,
unless the producers in the product stewardship program notify the
department of their intention to disband the plan and join an alternate
approved plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) Any proposed change to a product
stewardship plan must have prior approval of the department except for
the following:
(a) Additions or changes to collection locations for unwanted
mercury-containing lights; or
(b) Additions of producers to a product stewardship program.
(2) The product stewardship program must inform the department of
changes in subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section fifteen days prior
to the changes occurring.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) On or before April 1st of each year,
every producer, group of producers, or stewardship organization
operating a product stewardship program for mercury-containing lights
must prepare and submit to the department a report in a format provided
by the department for the immediately preceding reporting period
describing:
(a) Information, including contact information, regarding:
(i) The organization submitting the report; and
(ii) A list of all participating producers and their brands and
trademarks, if applicable;
(b) Recovery rates, including:
(i) The amount, by weight, of unwanted mercury-containing lights
collected from covered entities in each county in the state, including
documented collection and recycling or disposal of that material; and
(ii) How the program attained recovery rates established in the
product stewardship plan or set by the department, and, if the program
did not attain those recovery rates, what actions the program will take
during the next reporting period to do so, including how the program
will increase and improve effective, measurable outreach and education
efforts;
(c) The collection system, including collection locations and
services provided for all cities in the state with populations greater
than ten thousand and in all counties in the state;
(d) The processing and disposal system, including:
(i) A list of processing and disposal facilities used and their
locations, the weight of unwanted mercury-containing lights processed
at each processing facility and disposed at each disposal facility, and
a description of the methods used at each processing facility;
(ii) A list of subcontractors used through final disposition that
processed or disposed of unwanted mercury-containing lights containing
hazardous substances or hazardous materials, and subcontractor facility
locations;
(iii) Documentation and summary results of annual third-party
audits conducted on each processing facility and disposal facility as
required in section 8 of this act;
(iv) Final disposition of residuals;
(v) Any penalties, violations, or regulatory orders received during
the reporting period by each processing facility or disposal facility
that was used; and
(vi) Whether policies and procedures in the product stewardship
plan for collecting, transporting, processing, and final disposition of
unwanted mercury-containing lights were followed during the reporting
period, and a description of any noncompliance;
(e) The financing system, including a description of how the system
met the requirements in section 8 of this act;
(f) The education and outreach activities implemented during the
reporting period, including an analysis of the effectiveness of the
education and outreach activities;
(g) How the product stewardship program complied with any other
elements in the plan; and
(h) Any other information that the department may require.
(2) A producer, group of producers, or stewardship organization
operating a product stewardship program under this chapter that attains
a ninety percent recovery rate and a recycling rate of eighty percent
is only required to report to the department information specified in
subsection (1)(a) through (d), (g), and (h) of this section.
(3) All reports submitted to the department must be made available
to the public on the department's web site and at the department's
headquarters.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 By June of the third program year, the plan
operators shall establish required recovery rates for the fourth and
subsequent program years, based on information gained in the first
through third years, sales data, anticipated product obsolescence, and
anticipated sales growth. Annual planned recovery rates must be
submitted to the department for approval by September 1st prior to the
program year for which the rates are established. The submittal must
include documentation of the calculations and data used to determine
the recovery rate. The department shall approve, disapprove, or
adjust, in consultation with the plan's operator, the submitted
recovery rates based upon its assessment of prior years' data, sales
data, and other available information that supports the decision.
Sixty days after delivering a written warning, the department shall
assess a penalty of up to ten thousand dollars for each violation on
each plan operator.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) The department shall send a written
warning and a copy of this chapter and any rules adopted to implement
this chapter to a producer who is not participating in a product
stewardship program approved by the department and whose mercury-containing lights are being sold in or into the state.
(2) A producer not participating in a product stewardship program
approved by the department whose mercury-containing lights continue to
be sold in or into the state sixty days after receiving a written
warning from the department shall be assessed a penalty of one thousand
dollars for each violation. A violation is the sale of one mercury-containing light.
(3) If any producer fails to implement its approved plan, the
department shall assess a penalty of up to five thousand dollars for
the first violation along with notification that the producer must
implement its plan within thirty days of the violation. After thirty
days, any producer failing to implement their approved plan must be
assessed a penalty of up to ten thousand dollars for the second and
each subsequent violation. A subsequent violation occurs each thirty-day period that the producer fails to implement the approved plan.
(4) The department shall send a written warning to a producer that
fails to submit a product stewardship plan, update or change the plan
when required, or submit an annual report as required under this
chapter. The written warning must include compliance requirements and
notification that the requirements must be met within sixty days. If
requirements are not met within sixty days, the producer will be
assessed a ten thousand dollar penalty per day of noncompliance
starting with the first day of notice of noncompliance.
(5) Penalties prescribed under this section must be reduced by
fifty percent if the producer complies within thirty days of the second
violation notice.
(6) A producer may appeal penalties prescribed under this section
to the pollution control hearings board created under chapter 43.21B
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 (1) The department shall provide on its web
site a list of all producers participating in product stewardship
programs that the department has approved and a list of all producers
the department has identified as noncompliant with this chapter and any
rules adopted to implement this chapter.
(2) Product retailers must check the department's web site or
producer-provided written verification to determine if producers of
products they are selling in or into the state are in compliance with
this chapter. If the retailer is unsure of the status of the producer
or believes the producer is not in compliance with this chapter, the
retailer shall contact the department to determine the producer's
status.
(3) The department shall personally serve, or send with delivery
confirmation, a written warning explaining the violation along with a
copy of this chapter and any rules adopted to implement this chapter to
a product retailer known to be selling mercury-containing lights in or
into the state from producers who are not participating in a product
stewardship program or who are not in compliance with this chapter and
rules adopted under this chapter.
(4) A product retailer who continues to sell mercury-containing
lights from a producer who is not participating in an approved product
stewardship program sixty days after receiving a written warning from
the department may be assessed a penalty two times the value of the
products sold in violation of this chapter or five hundred dollars,
whichever is greater. This penalty must be waived if the retailer
verifies that it has discontinued sale of the mercury-containing lights
within thirty days of the date of the penalty assessment. A retailer
may appeal penalties assessed under this section to the pollution
control hearings board.
(5) A sale or purchase of mercury-containing lights as a casual or
isolated sale as defined in RCW 82.04.040 is not subject to the
provisions of this section.
(6) A person primarily engaged in the business of reuse and resale
of a used mercury-containing light is not subject to the provisions of
this section when selling used working mercury-containing lights, for
use in the same manner and purpose for which it was originally
purchased.
(7) In-state retailers in possession of mercury-containing lights
on the date that restrictions on the sale of the product become
effective may exhaust their existing stock through sales to the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 The department shall establish fees to be
charged to and paid annually by producers for administering this
chapter. All fees charged must be based on factors relating to
administering this chapter and be based on a sliding scale. Fees must
be established in amounts to fully recover expenses incurred by the
department to implement this chapter. The initial fee schedule must be
established by rule. Producers solely engaged in the retail sales of
mercury-containing lights are exempt from paying this fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 The product stewardship programs account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. All funds received from
producers under section 15 of this act and penalties collected under
this chapter must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the
account may be used only for administering this chapter. Only the
director of the department or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to the allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 (1) The department may adopt rules
necessary to implement, administer, and enforce this chapter.
(2) The department may adopt rules to establish performance
standards for product stewardship programs and may establish
administrative penalties for failure to meet the standards.
(3) By December 31, 2012, the department shall report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature concerning the status of the
product stewardship program and recommendations for changes to the
provisions of this chapter.
(4) Beginning October 1, 2012, the department shall annually invite
comments from local governments, communities, and citizens to report
their satisfaction with services provided by product stewardship
programs. This information must be used by the department to determine
if the plan operator is meeting convenience requirements and in
reviewing proposed updates or changes to product stewardship plans.
(5) Beginning October 1, 2012, the department shall annually invite
comments from retailers, consumer groups, electric utilities, the
Northwest power and conservation council, and other interested parties
regarding the impacts of the requirements of this chapter on the
availability or purchase of energy efficient lighting within the state.
If the department determines that evidence shows the requirements of
this chapter have resulted in negative impacts on the availability or
purchase of energy efficient lighting in the state, the department
shall report this information by December 31st of each year to the
appropriate committees of the legislature with recommendations for
changes to the provisions of this chapter.
(6) Beginning October 1, 2012, the department shall annually invite
comments from retailers, consumer groups, electric utilities, the
Northwest power and conservation council, and other interested parties
regarding the availability of energy efficient nonmercury lighting to
replace mercury-containing lighting within the state. If the
department determines that evidence shows that energy efficient
nonmercury-containing lighting is available and achieves similar energy
savings as mercury lighting at similar cost, the department shall
report this information by December 31st of each year to the
appropriate committees of the legislature with recommendations for
legislative changes to reduce mercury use in lighting.
(7) Beginning October 1, 2012, the department shall annually
estimate the overall statewide recycling rate for mercury-containing
lights and calculate that portion of the recycling rate attributable to
the product stewardship program.
(8) The department may require submission of independent
performance evaluations and report evaluations documenting the
effectiveness of mercury vapor barrier packaging in preventing the
escape of mercury into the environment. The department may restrict
the use of packaging for which adequate documentation has not been
provided. Any program using restricted mercury vapor barrier packaging
is not eligible for participation in the product stewardship program
for mercury-containing lights.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Nothing in this chapter changes or limits
the authority of the Washington utilities and transportation commission
to regulate collection of solid waste, including curbside collection of
residential recyclable materials, nor does this chapter change or limit
the authority of a city or town to provide such service itself or by
contract under RCW 81.77.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 Nothing in this chapter changes the
requirements of any entity regulated under chapter 70.105 RCW to comply
with the requirements under that chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 This chapter must be liberally construed to
carry out its purposes and objectives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 Sections 1 through 20 and 22 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---