BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
Sec. 101 2009 c 564 s 120 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,370,000))
$20,649,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,444,000))
$17,733,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,121,000
Archives and Records Management Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,863,000
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $760,000
Local Government Archives Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,777,000
Election Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,715,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($99,050,000))
$97,618,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $4,101,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's
share of primary and general election costs and the costs of conducting
mandatory recounts on state measures. Counties shall be reimbursed
only for those odd-year election costs that the secretary of state
validates as eligible for reimbursement.
(2)(a) $1,897,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $2,076,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for contracting
with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television
coverage of state government deliberations and other events of
statewide significance during the 2009-2011 biennium. The funding
level for each year of the contract shall be based on the amount
provided in this subsection. The nonprofit organization shall be
required to raise contributions or commitments to make contributions,
in cash or in kind, in an amount equal to forty percent of the state
contribution. The office of the secretary of state may make full or
partial payment once all criteria in this subsection have been
satisfactorily documented.
(b) The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding
is necessary to ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage
of public affairs. For that purpose, the secretary of state shall
enter into a contract with the nonprofit organization to provide public
affairs coverage.
(c) The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent
audit, an annual financial statement, and an annual report, including
benchmarks that measure the success of the nonprofit organization in
meeting the intent of the program.
(d) No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection
may be used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:
(i) Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any
legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by any
county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of
Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of any
rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state
agency;
(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or
(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel,
lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.
(3) The appropriations in this section are based upon savings
assumed from the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6122 (election
costs).
(4) The secretary of state shall not reduce the services provided
by the talking book and Braille library below the service level
provided in fiscal year 2008.
(5) In implementing budget reductions, the office of the secretary
of state must make its first priority to maintain funding for the
elections division.

Sec. 102 2009 c 564 s 125 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($171,000))
$168,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($212,000))
$209,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($383,000))
$377,000

Sec. 103 2009 c 564 s 126 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,325,000))
$5,285,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,654,000))
$5,614,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,026,000
New Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,346,000
Legal Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $221,515,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($238,136,000))
$238,056,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual
legal services expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for
each agency receiving legal services. The report shall be submitted to
the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the
senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days after the
end of each fiscal year. As part of its by agency report to the
legislative fiscal committees and the office of financial management,
the office of the attorney general shall include information detailing
the agency's expenditures for its agency-wide overhead and a breakdown
by division of division administration expenses.
(2) Prior to entering into any negotiated settlement of a claim
against the state that exceeds five million dollars, the attorney
general shall notify the director of financial management and the
chairs of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of
representatives committee on ways and means.
(3) The office of the attorney general is authorized to expend
$2,100,000 from the Zyprexa and other cy pres awards towards consumer
protection costs in accordance with uses authorized in the court
orders.
(4) The attorney general shall annually report to the fiscal
committees of the legislature all new cy pres awards and settlements
and all new accounts, disclosing their intended uses, balances, the
nature of the claim or account, proposals, and intended timeframes for
the expenditure of each amount. The report shall be distributed
electronically and posted on the attorney general's web site. The
report shall not be printed on paper or distributed physically.

Sec. 104 2009 c 564 s 127 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($779,000))
$766,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($772,000))
$759,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,551,000))
$1,525,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $13,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2010 and $7,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are for the implementation of
Second Substitute House Bill No. 2106 (improving child welfare outcomes
through the phased implementation of strategic and proven reforms). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 105 2009 c 564 s 128 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($51,240,000))
$51,015,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($51,938,000))
$51,813,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $384,540,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,266,000
Public Works Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,990,000
Tourism Development and Promotion Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,003,000
Drinking Water Assistance Administrative
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $439,000
Lead Paint Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,000
Building Code Council Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,286,000
Home Security Fund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,498,000
Affordable Housing for All Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,900,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Independent Youth Housing Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000
Community Preservation and Development Authority
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000
Financial Fraud and Identity Theft Crimes Investigation
and Prosecution Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,166,000
Low-Income Weatherization Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,382,000
Manufacturing Innovation and Modernization
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $246,000
Community and Economic Development Fee
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,833,000
Washington Housing Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,372,000
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $755,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($573,602,000))
$573,252,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,520,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $2,521,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for a contract with the Washington
technology center for work essential to the mission of the Washington
technology center and conducted in partnership with universities.
(2) Repayments of outstanding loans granted under RCW 43.63A.600,
the mortgage and rental assistance program, shall be remitted to the
department, including any current revolving account balances. The
department shall collect payments on outstanding loans, and deposit
them into the state general fund. Repayments of funds owed under the
program shall be remitted to the department according to the terms
included in the original loan agreements.
(3) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to implement section 2(7) of
Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1959 (land use and transportation
planning for marine container ports).
(4) $102,000 of the building code council account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of sections 3
and 7 of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5854 (built
environment pollution). If sections 3 and 7 of the bill are not
enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(5)(a) $10,500,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided for training and technical assistance associated with low
income weatherization programs. Subject to federal requirements, the
department shall provide: (i) Up to $4,000,000 to the state board for
community and technical colleges to provide workforce training related
to weatherization and energy efficiency; (ii) up to $3,000,000 to the
Bellingham opportunity council to provide workforce training related to
energy efficiency and weatherization; and (iii) up to $3,500,000 to
community-based organizations and to community action agencies
consistent with the provisions of Engrossed Second Substitute House
Bill No. 2227 (evergreen jobs act). Any funding remaining shall be
expended in project 91000013, weatherization, in the omnibus capital
appropriations act, Substitute House Bill No. 1216 (capital budget).
(b) $6,787,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely for the state energy program, including not less than
$5,000,000 to provide credit enhancements consistent with the
provisions of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5649 (energy
efficiency in buildings).
(c) Of the general fund--federal appropriation the department shall
provide: $14,500,000 to the Washington State University for the
purpose of making grants for pilot projects providing community-wide
urban, residential, and commercial energy efficiency upgrades
consistent with the provisions of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5649 (energy efficiency in buildings); $500,000 to Washington
State University to conduct farm energy assessments. In contracting
with the Washington State University for the provision of these
services, the total administration of Washington State University and
the department shall not exceed 3 percent of the amounts provided.
(d) $38,500,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided for deposit in the energy recovery act account to establish a
revolving loan program, consistent with the provisions of Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 2289 (expanding energy freedom program).
(e) $10,646,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided pursuant to the energy efficiency and conservation block grant
under the American reinvestment and recovery act. The department may
use up to $3,000,000 of the amount provided in this subsection to
provide technical assistance for energy programs administered by the
agency under the American reinvestment and recovery act.
(6) $14,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5560 (state agency climate leadership). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(((8))) (7) $22,400,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
is provided solely for the justice assistance grant program and is
contingent upon the department transferring: $1,200,000 to the
department of corrections for security threat mitigation, $2,336,000 to
the department of corrections for offender reentry, $1,960,000 to the
Washington state patrol for law enforcement activities, $2,087,000 to
the department of social and health services, division of alcohol and
substance abuse for drug courts, and $428,000 to the department of
social and health services for sex abuse recognition training. The
remaining funds shall be distributed by the department to local
jurisdictions.
(((9))) (8) $20,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $20,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for a grant to KCTS public
television to support Spanish language programming and the V-me Spanish
language channel.
(((10))) (9) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for a grant to resolution
Washington to building statewide capacity for alternative dispute
resolution centers and dispute resolution programs that guarantee that
citizens have access to low-cost resolution as an alternative to
litigation.
(((12))) (10) $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6015 (commercialization of
technology). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((13))) (11) By June 30, 2011, the department shall request
information that describes what jurisdictions have adopted, or are in
the process of adopting, plans that address RCW 36.70A.020 and helps
achieve the greenhouse gas emission reductions established in RCW
70.235.020. This information request in this subsection applies to
jurisdictions that are required to review and if necessary revise their
comprehensive plans by December 1, 2011, in accordance with RCW
36.70A.130.
(((14))) (12) During the 2009-11 fiscal biennium, the department
shall allot all of its appropriations subject to allotment by object,
account, and expenditure authority code to conform with the office of
financial management's definition of an option 2 allotment. For those
funds subject to allotment but not appropriation, the agency shall
submit option 2 allotments to the office of financial management.
(((16))) (13) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for a grant for the state's
participation in the Pacific Northwest economic region.
(((18))) (14) $712,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $712,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to the office of crime victims
advocacy. These funds shall be contracted with the 39 county
prosecuting attorneys' offices to support victim-witness services. The
funds must be prioritized to ensure a full-time victim-witness
coordinator in each county. The office may retain only the amount
currently allocated for this activity for administrative costs.
(((19))) (15) $306,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $306,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for a grant to the retired
senior volunteer program.
(((20))) (16) $65,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $65,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for a contract with a food
distribution program for communities in the southwestern portion of the
state and for workers impacted by timber and salmon fishing closures
and reductions. The department may not charge administrative overhead
or expenses to the funds provided in this subsection.
(((21))) (17) $371,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $371,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to the northwest agriculture
business center.
(((22))) (18) The department shall administer its growth management
act technical assistance so that smaller cities receive proportionately
more assistance than larger cities or counties. Pass-through grants
shall continue to be funded under 2007-09 policy.
(((23))) (19) $212,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill
No. 1172 (development rights transfer). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((25))) (20) $69,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $66,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for implementation of
Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2227 (evergreen jobs act).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(((26))) (21) $350,000 of the community development and
preservation authority account--state appropriation is provided solely
for a grant to a community development authority established under
chapter 43.167 RCW. The community preservation and development's board
of directors may contract with nonprofit community organizations to aid
in mitigating the effects of increased public impact on urban
neighborhoods due to events in stadia that have a capacity of over
50,000 spectators.
(((27))) (22) $300,000 of the Washington auto theft prevention
authority account--state appropriation is provided solely for a
contract with a community group to build local community capacity and
economic development within the state by strengthening political
relationships between economically distressed communities and
governmental institutions. The community group shall identify
opportunities for collaboration and initiate activities and events that
bring community organizations, local governments, and state agencies
together to address the impacts of poverty, political
disenfranchisement, and economic inequality on communities of color.
These funds must be matched by other nonstate sources on an equal
basis.
(((28))) (23) $1,800,000 of the home security fund--state
appropriation is provided for transitional housing assistance or
partial payments for rental assistance under the independent youth
housing program.
(((29))) (24) $5,000,000 of the home security fund--state
appropriation is provided solely for the operation, repair, and
staffing of shelters in the homeless family shelter program.

Sec. 106 2009 c 564 s 129 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($727,000))
$711,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($793,000))
$785,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,520,000))
$1,496,000

Sec. 107 2009 c 564 s 130 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,163,000))
$21,599,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,792,000))
$20,670,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,597,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,270,000
State Auditing Services Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $280,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($68,127,000))
$67,441,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $188,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5945 (Washington health partnership plan).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(2) The office of financial management shall conduct a study on
alternatives for consolidating or transferring activities and
responsibilities of the state lottery commission, state horse racing
commission, state liquor control board, and the state gambling
commission to achieve cost savings and regulatory efficiencies. In
conducting the study, the office of financial management shall consult
with the legislative fiscal committees. Further, the office of
financial management shall establish an advisory group to include, but
not be limited to, representatives of affected businesses, state
agencies or entities, local governments, and stakeholder groups. The
office of financial management shall submit a final report to the
governor and the legislative fiscal committees by November 15, 2009.
(3) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for a study of the feasibility of closing
state institutional facilities and a plan on eliminating beds in the
state institutional facility inventory. The office of financial
management shall contract with consultants with expertise related to
the subject matters included in this study. The office of financial
management and the consultants shall consult with the department of
social and health services, the department of corrections, stakeholder
groups that represent the people served in these institutions, labor
organizations that represent employees who work in these institutions
and other persons or entities with expertise in the areas being
studied.
(a) For the purposes of this study, "state institutional
facilities" means facilities operated by the department of corrections
to house persons convicted of a criminal offense, Green Hill school and
Maple Lane school operated by the department of social and health
services juvenile rehabilitation administration, and residential
habilitation centers operated by the department of social and health
services.
(b) In conducting this study, the consultants shall consider the
following factors as appropriate:
(i) The availability of alternate facilities including alternatives
and opportunities for consolidation with other facilities, impacts on
those alternate facilities, and any related capital costs;
(ii) The cost of operating the facility, including the cost of
providing services and the cost of maintaining or improving the
physical plant of the facility;
(iii) The geographic factors associated with the facility,
including the impact of the facility on the local economy and the
economic impact of its closure, and alternative uses for a facility
recommended for closure;
(iv) The costs associated with closing the facility, including the
continuing costs following the closure of the facility;
(v) Number and type of staff and the impact on the facility staff
including other employment opportunities if the facility is closed;
(vi) The savings that will accrue to the state from closure or
consolidation of a facility and the impact any closure would have on
funding the associated services; and
(vii) For the residential habilitation centers, the impact on
clients in the facility being recommended for closure and their
families, including ability to get alternate services and impact on
being moved to another facility.
(c) The office of financial management shall submit a final report
to the governor and the ways and means committees of the house of
representatives and senate by November 1, 2009. The report shall
provide a recommendation and a plan to eliminate 1,580 beds in the
department of corrections facilities, 235 beds from juvenile
rehabilitation facilities, and 250 funded beds in the residential
habilitation centers through closure or consolidation of facilities.
The report shall include an assessment of each facility studied, where
and how the services should be provided, and any costs or savings
associated with each recommendation. In considering the
recommendations of the report, the governor and the legislature shall
not consider closure of any state institutional facility unless the
report recommended the facility for closure.

Sec. 108 2009 c 564 s 137 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($109,412,000))
$108,215,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($108,505,000))
$106,995,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,904,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter
Control -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $130,000
Waste Tire Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Real Estate Excise Tax Grant Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,050,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $87,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($225,109,000))
$222,402,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $469,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $374,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5368 (annual property revaluation). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2009, the amounts in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) (($5,453,000)) $4,653,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2010 and (($5,242,000)) $4,424,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are for the
implementation of revenue enhancement strategies. The strategies must
include increased out-of-state auditing and compliance, the purchase of
third party data sources for enhanced audit selection, and increased
traditional auditing and compliance efforts.
(3) $3,127,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,737,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6173
(sales tax compliance). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 109 2009 c 564 s 139 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE BOARD OF TAX APPEALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,364,000))
$1,342,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,368,000))
$1,346,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,732,000))
$2,688,000

Sec. 110 2009 c 564 s 143 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION SERVICES
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,104,000))
$1,086,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,104,000))
$1,086,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $701,000
Data Processing Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,824,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,733,000))
$10,697,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the purposes of Engrossed
Second Substitute House Bill No. 1701 (high-speed internet), including
expenditure for deposit to the community technology opportunity
account. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) The department shall implement some or all of the following
strategies to achieve savings on information technology expenditures
through: (a) Holistic virtualization strategies; (b) wide-area network
optimization strategies; (c) replacement of traditional telephone
communications systems with alternatives; and (d) migration of external
voice mail systems to internal voice mail systems coordinated by the
department. The department shall report to the office of financial
management and the fiscal committees of the legislature semiannually on
progress made towards the implementation of savings strategies and the
savings realized to date. No later than June 30, 2011, the department
shall submit a final report on its findings and savings realized to the
office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the
legislature.

Sec. 111 2009 c 564 s 151 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,244,000))
$10,084,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,290,000))
$10,190,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $149,101,000
Enhanced 911 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,598,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,194,000
Disaster Response Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $91,263,000
Military Department Rent and Lease Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $615,000
Military Department Active State Service Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $341,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $144,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $856,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($330,846,000))
$330,586,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $28,194,000 of the disaster response account -- state
appropriation and $91,263,000 of the disaster response account -- federal
appropriation may be spent only on disasters declared by the governor
and with the approval of the office of financial management. The
military department shall submit a report quarterly to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
information on the disaster response account, including: (a) The
amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available
fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund
balance at the end of the 2009-2011 biennium based on current revenue
and expenditure patterns.
(2) $144,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account -- state
appropriation and $856,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account -- federal
appropriation are provided solely for response and recovery costs
associated with the February 28, 2001, earthquake. The military
department shall submit a report quarterly to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing earthquake
recovery costs, including: (a) Estimates of total costs; (b)
incremental changes from the previous estimate; (c) actual
expenditures; (d) estimates of total remaining costs to be paid; and
(e) estimates of future payments by biennium. This information shall
be displayed by fund, by type of assistance, and by amount paid on
behalf of state agencies or local organizations. The military
department shall also submit a report quarterly to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
information on the Nisqually earthquake account, including: (a) The
amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available
fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund
balance at the end of the 2009-2011 biennium based on current revenue
and expenditure patterns.
(3) $85,000,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided solely for homeland security, subject to the following
conditions:
(a) Any communications equipment purchased by local jurisdictions
or state agencies shall be consistent with standards set by the
Washington state interoperability executive committee;
(b) The department shall submit a quarterly report to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
the governor's domestic security advisory group recommendations;
homeland security revenues and expenditures, including estimates of
total federal funding for the state; incremental changes from the
previous estimate, planned and actual homeland security expenditures by
the state and local governments with this federal funding; and matching
or accompanying state or local expenditures; and
(c) The department shall submit a report by December 1st of each
year to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal
committees detailing homeland security revenues and expenditures for
the previous fiscal year by county and legislative district.
(4) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the military department to
contract with the Washington information network 2-1-1 to operate a
statewide 2-1-1 system. The department shall provide the entire amount
for 2-1-1 and shall use any of the funds for administrative purposes.

Sec. 112 2009 c 564 s 153 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,418,000))
$1,371,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,380,000))
$1,349,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,653,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,465,000))
$4,387,000

Sec. 113 2009 c 564 s 154 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE GROWTH MANAGEMENT HEARINGS BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,674,000))
$1,623,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,549,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,223,000))
$3,172,000

(End of part)

PART II
HUMAN SERVICES
Sec. 201 2009 c 564 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- CHILDREN AND FAMILY
SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($315,241,000))
$314,698,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($317,248,000))
$316,181,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($496,509,000))
$494,889,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $828,000
Home Security Fund Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,389,000
Domestic Violence Prevention Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,154,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $725,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,140,094,000))
$1,136,864,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $5,563,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $5,563,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for intensive family preservation
services as defined in RCW 74.14C.010 and for evidence-based services
that prevent out-of-home placement and reduce length of stay in the
child welfare system.
(2) $993,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $993,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to contract for the operation of
one pediatric interim care facility. The facility shall provide
residential care for up to seventeen children through two years of age.
Seventy-five percent of the children served by the facility must be in
need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers.
The facility shall also provide on-site training to biological,
adoptive, or foster parents. The facility shall provide at least three
months of consultation and support to parents accepting placement of
children from the facility. The facility may recruit new and current
foster and adoptive parents for infants served by the facility. The
department shall not require case management as a condition of the
contract.
(3) $375,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year ((2008)) 2010, $375,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year ((2009)) 2011, and $322,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for up to three nonfacility-based programs for the training, consultation, support, and recruitment
of biological, foster, and adoptive parents of children through age
three in need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their
mothers, except that each program may serve up to three medically
fragile nonsubstance-abuse-affected children. In selecting
nonfacility-based programs, preference shall be given to programs whose
federal or private funding sources have expired or that have
successfully performed under the existing pediatric interim care
program.
(4) $2,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $2,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for secure crisis residential
centers. Within appropriated amounts, the department shall collaborate
with providers to maintain no less than forty-five beds that are
geographically representative of the state. The department shall
examine current secure crisis residential staffing requirements,
flexible payment options, center specific waivers, and other
appropriate methods to accomplish this outcome.
(5) A maximum of $76,831,000 of the general fund--state
appropriations and $56,901,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriations for the 2009-11 biennium shall be expended for
behavioral rehabilitative services and these amounts are provided
solely for this purpose. The department shall work with behavioral
rehabilitative service providers to decrease the length of stay through
improved emotional, behavioral, or medical outcomes for children in
behavioral rehabilitative services in order to achieve the appropriated
levels.
(a) Contracted providers shall act in good faith and accept the
hardest to place children, to the greatest extent possible, in order to
improve their emotional, behavioral, or medical conditions.
(b) The department and the contracted provider shall mutually agree
and establish an exit date for when the child is to exit the behavioral
rehabilitative service provider. The department and the contracted
provider should mutually agree, to the greatest extent possible, on a
viable placement for the child to go to once the child's treatment
process has been completed. The child shall exit only when the
emotional, behavioral, or medical condition has improved or if the
provider has not shown progress toward the outcomes specified in the
signed contract at the time of exit. This subsection (b) does not
prevent or eliminate the department's responsibility for removing the
child from the provider if the child's emotional, behavioral, or
medical condition worsens or is threatened.
(c) The department is encouraged to use performance-based contracts
with incentives directly tied to outcomes described in this section.
The contracts should incentivize contracted providers to accept the
hardest to place children and incentivize improvement in children's
emotional, mental, and medical well-being within the established exit
date. The department is further encouraged to increase the use of
behavioral rehabilitative service group homes, wrap around services to
facilitate and support placement of youth with relatives, and other
means to control expenditures.
(d) The total foster care per capita amount shall not increase more
than four percent in the 2009-11 biennium and shall not include
behavioral rehabilitative service.
(6) Within amounts provided for the foster care and adoption
support programs, the department shall control reimbursement decisions
for foster care and adoption support cases such that the aggregate
average cost per case for foster care and for adoption support does not
exceed the amounts assumed in the projected caseload expenditures.
(7) Within amounts appropriated in this section, priority shall be
given to proven intervention models, including evidence-based
prevention and early intervention programs identified by the Washington
state institute for public policy and the department. The department
shall include information on the number, type, and outcomes of the
evidence-based programs being implemented in its reports on child
welfare reform efforts.
(8) $37,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $37,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011, and $32,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of chapter 465, Laws of 2007
(child welfare).
(9) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for continuum of care services.
$100,000 of this amount is for Casey family partners and $25,000 of
this amount is for volunteers of America crosswalk in fiscal year 2010.
$100,000 of this amount is for Casey family partners and $25,000 of
this amount is for volunteers of America crosswalk in fiscal year 2011.
(10) $616,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $616,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011, and $368,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to contract with medical professionals for
comprehensive safety assessments of high-risk families. The safety
assessments will use validated assessment tools to guide intervention
decisions through the identification of additional safety and risk
factors. $800,000 of this amount is for comprehensive safety
assessments for families receiving in-home child protective services or
family voluntary services. $800,000 of this amount is for
comprehensive safety assessments of families with an infant age birth
to fifteen days where the infant was, at birth, diagnosed as substance
exposed and the department received an intake referral related to the
infant due to the substance exposure.
(11) $7,970,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $7,711,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $5,177,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for court-ordered supervised visits
between parents and dependent children and for sibling visits. The
department shall work collaboratively with the juvenile dependency
courts to stay within appropriations without impeding reunification
outcomes between parents and dependent children. The department shall
report to the legislative fiscal committees quarterly, the number of
children in foster care who receive supervised visits, their frequency,
length of time of each visit, and whether reunification is attained.
(12) $1,789,000 of the home security fund--state appropriation is
provided solely for street youth program services.
(13) $1,584,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $1,584,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $1,586,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the department to recruit foster
parents. The recruitment efforts shall include collaborating with
community-based organizations and current or former foster parents to
recruit foster parents.
(14) $725,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for children's administration to
contract with an educational advocacy provider with expertise in foster
care educational outreach. Funding is provided solely for contracted
education coordinators to assist foster children in succeeding in K-12
and higher education systems. Funding shall be prioritized to regions
with high numbers of foster care youth and/or regions where backlogs of
youth that have formerly requested educational outreach services exist.
(15) $1,300,000 of the home security fund account--state
appropriation is provided solely for HOPE beds.
(16) $5,300,000 of the home security fund account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the crisis residential centers.
(17) The appropriations in this section reflect reductions in the
appropriations for the children's administration administrative
expenses. It is the intent of the legislature that these reductions
shall be achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by reducing those
administrative costs that do not affect direct client services or
direct service delivery or programs.
(18) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the
department shall contract for a pilot project with family and community
networks in Whatcom county and up to four additional counties to
provide services. The pilot project shall be designed to provide a
continuum of services that reduce out-of-home placements and the
lengths of stay for children in out-of-home placement. The department
and the community networks shall collaboratively select the additional
counties for the pilot project and shall collaboratively design the
contract. Within the framework of the pilot project, the contract
shall seek to maximize federal funds. The pilot project in each county
shall include the creation of advisory and management teams which
include members from neighborhood-based family advisory committees,
residents, parents, youth, providers, and local and regional department
staff. The Whatcom county team shall facilitate the development of
outcome-based protocols and policies for the pilot project and develop
a structure to oversee, monitor, and evaluate the results of the pilot
projects. The department shall report the costs and savings of the
pilot project to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
November 1 of each year.
(19) $157,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $157,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the department to contract
with a nonprofit entity for a reunification pilot project in Whatcom
and Skagit counties. The contract for the reunification pilot project
shall include a rate of $46.16 per hour for evidence-based
interventions, in combination with supervised visits, to provide 3,564
hours of services to reduce the length of stay for children in the
child welfare system. The contract shall also include evidence-based
intensive parenting skills building services and family support case
management services for 38 families participating in the reunification
pilot project. The contract shall include the flexibility for the
nonprofit entity to subcontract with trained providers.
(20) $303,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $418,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011, and $257,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1961
(increasing adoptions act). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(21) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the department to contract
with an agency that is working in partnership with, and has been
evaluated by, the University of Washington school of social work to
implement promising practice constellation hub models of foster care
support.
(22) The legislature intends for the department to reduce the time
a child remains in the child welfare system. The department shall
establish a measurable goal and report progress toward meeting that
goal to the legislature by January 15 of each fiscal year of the 2009-
11 fiscal biennium. To the extent that actual caseloads exceed those
assumed in this section, it is the intent of the legislature to address
those issues in a manner similar to all other caseload programs.

Sec. 202 2009 c 564 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- JUVENILE
REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($104,870,000))
$104,185,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($93,081,000))
$92,392,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,565,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,900,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,896,000
Juvenile Accountability Incentive Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,801,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($213,113,000))
$211,739,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $353,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $353,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for deposit in the county criminal
justice assistance account for costs to the criminal justice system
associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997
(juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are
intended to provide funding for county adult court costs associated
with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be
distributed in accordance with RCW 82.14.310.
(2) $3,578,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $3,578,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in
this subsection are intended to provide funding for county impacts
associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and
shall be distributed to counties as prescribed in the current
consolidated juvenile services (CJS) formula.
(3) $3,716,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $3,716,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to implement community juvenile
accountability grants pursuant to chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile
code revisions). Funds provided in this subsection may be used solely
for community juvenile accountability grants, administration of the
grants, and evaluations of programs funded by the grants.
(4) $1,506,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,506,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to implement alcohol and substance
abuse treatment programs for locally committed offenders. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall award these moneys on a competitive
basis to counties that submitted a plan for the provision of services
approved by the division of alcohol and substance abuse. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall develop criteria for evaluation of
plans submitted and a timeline for awarding funding and shall assist
counties in creating and submitting plans for evaluation.
(5) $3,066,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $3,066,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for grants to county juvenile
courts for the following programs identified by the Washington state
institute for public policy (institute) in its October 2006 report:
"Evidence-Based Public Policy Options to Reduce Future Prison
Construction, Criminal Justice Costs and Crime Rates": Functional
family therapy, multi-systemic therapy, aggression replacement training
and interagency coordination programs, or other programs with a
positive benefit-cost finding in the institute's report. County
juvenile courts shall apply to the juvenile rehabilitation
administration for funding for program-specific participation and the
administration shall provide grants to the courts consistent with the
per-participant treatment costs identified by the institute.
(6) $1,287,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,287,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for expansion of the following
treatments and therapies in juvenile rehabilitation administration
programs identified by the Washington state institute for public policy
in its October 2006 report: "Evidence-Based Public Policy Options to
Reduce Future Prison Construction, Criminal Justice Costs and Crime
Rates": Multidimensional treatment foster care, family integrated
transitions, and aggression replacement training. The administration
may concentrate delivery of these treatments and therapies at a limited
number of programs to deliver the treatments in a cost-effective
manner.
(7)(a) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2010, the juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall administer a block grant, rather
than categorical funding, of consolidated juvenile service funds,
community juvenile accountability act grants, the chemical dependency
disposition alternative funds, the special sex offender disposition
alternative funds, the mental health disposition alternative,
sentencing disposition alternative, and evidence-based program
expansion grants to juvenile courts for the purpose of serving youth
adjudicated in the juvenile justice system. Evidence-based programs,
based on the criteria established by the Washington state institute for
public policy, and disposition alternatives will be funding priorities.
Funds may be used for promising practices when approved by juvenile
rehabilitation administration, based on criteria established in
consultation with Washington state institute for public policy and the
juvenile courts.
By September 1, 2009, a committee with four members, in
consultation with Washington state institute for public policy, shall
develop a funding formula that takes into account the juvenile courts
average daily population of program eligible youth in conjunction with
the number of youth served in each approved evidence-based program or
disposition alternative. The committee shall have one representative
from the juvenile rehabilitation administration, one representative
from the office of financial management, one representative from the
office of the administrator of the courts, and one representative from
the juvenile courts. Decision making will be by majority rule.
By September 1, 2010, the Washington state institute for public
policy shall provide a report to the office of financial management and
the legislature on the administration of the block grant authorized in
this subsection. The report shall include the criteria used for
allocating the funding as a block grant and the participation targets
and actual participation in the programs subject to the block grant.
(b) By December 1, 2009, the committee established in (a) of this
subsection, in consultation with Washington state institute for public
policy, shall propose to the office of financial management and the
legislature changes in the process of funding and managing, including
accountability and information collection and dissemination, grants to
juvenile courts for serving youth adjudicated in the juvenile court
system use in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2011. The proposal shall
include, but is not limited to: A process of making a block grant of
funds consistent with (a) of this subsection; a program of data
collection and measurement criteria for receiving the funds which will
include targets of the number of youth served in identified evidence-based programs and disposition alternatives in which the juvenile
courts and office of the administrator of the courts will have
responsibility for collecting and distributing information and
providing access to the data systems to the juvenile rehabilitation
administration and the Washington state institute for public policy
related to program and outcome data; and necessary changes to the
Washington administrative code.
(c) Within the funds provided for criminal justice analysis in
section 610(4) of this act, the Washington state institute for public
policy shall conduct an analysis of the costs per participant of
evidence-based programs by the juvenile courts and by December 1, 2009,
shall report the results of this analysis to the juvenile
rehabilitation administration, the juvenile courts, office of the
administrator of the courts, the office of financial management, and
the fiscal committees of the legislature.
(8) $3,700,000 of the Washington auto theft prevention authority
account--state appropriation is provided solely for competitive grants
to community-based organizations to provide at-risk youth intervention
services, including but not limited to, case management, employment
services, educational services, and street outreach intervention
programs. Projects funded should focus on preventing, intervening, and
suppressing behavioral problems and violence while linking at-risk
youth to pro-social activities. The department may not expend more
than $1,850,000 per fiscal year. The costs of administration must not
exceed four percent of appropriated funding for each grant recipient.
Each entity receiving funds must report to the juvenile rehabilitation
administration on the number and types of youth served, the services
provided, and the impact of those services upon the youth and the
community.

Sec. 203 2009 c 564 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- MENTAL HEALTH
PROGRAM
(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES/REGIONAL SUPPORT NETWORKS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $266,677,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $296,619,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $463,180,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,868,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,041,344,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $113,689,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $113,689,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for persons and
services not covered by the medicaid program. This is a reduction of
$11,606,000 each fiscal year from the nonmedicaid funding that was
allocated for expenditure by regional support networks during fiscal
year 2009 prior to supplemental budget reductions. This $11,606,000
reduction shall be distributed among regional support networks
proportional to each network's share of the total state population. To
the extent possible, levels of regional support network spending shall
be maintained in the following priority order: (i) Crisis and
commitment services; (ii) community inpatient services; and (iii)
residential care services, including personal care and emergency
housing assistance.
(b) $16,900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $16,900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the department and regional
support networks to contract for implementation of high-intensity
program for active community treatment (PACT) teams, and other proven
program approaches that the department concurs will enable the regional
support network to achieve significant reductions in the number of beds
the regional support network would otherwise need to use at the state
hospitals.
(c) The number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional
support networks at eastern state hospital shall be 192 per day. The
number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional support
networks at western state hospital shall be 617 per day during the
first quarter of fiscal year 2010, and 587 per day thereafter. Beds in
the program for adaptive living skills (PALS) are not included in the
preceding bed allocations. The department shall separately charge
regional support networks for persons served in the PALS program.
(d) From the general fund--state appropriations in this subsection,
the secretary of social and health services shall assure that regional
support networks reimburse the aging and disability services
administration for the general fund--state cost of medicaid personal
care services that enrolled regional support network consumers use
because of their psychiatric disability.
(e) $4,582,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $4,582,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for mental health services for
mentally ill offenders while confined in a county or city jail and for
facilitating access to programs that offer mental health services upon
release from confinement.
(f) The department is authorized to continue to contract directly,
rather than through contracts with regional support networks, for
children's long-term inpatient facility services.
(g) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to continue performance-based
incentive contracts to provide appropriate community support services
for individuals with severe mental illness who were discharged from the
state hospitals as part of the expanding community services initiative.
These funds will be used to enhance community residential and support
services provided by regional support networks through other state and
federal funding.
(h) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the Spokane regional support
network to implement services to reduce utilization and the census at
eastern state hospital. Such services shall include:
(i) High intensity treatment team for persons who are high
utilizers of psychiatric inpatient services, including those with co-occurring disorders and other special needs;
(ii) Crisis outreach and diversion services to stabilize in the
community individuals in crisis who are at risk of requiring inpatient
care or jail services;
(iii) Mental health services provided in nursing facilities to
individuals with dementia, and consultation to facility staff treating
those individuals; and
(iv) Services at the sixteen-bed evaluation and treatment facility.
At least annually, the Spokane regional support network shall
assess the effectiveness of these services in reducing utilization at
eastern state hospital, identify services that are not optimally
effective, and modify those services to improve their effectiveness.
(i) The department shall return to the Spokane regional support
network fifty percent of the amounts assessed against the network
during the last six months of calendar year 2009 for state hospital
utilization in excess of its contractual limit. The regional support
network shall use these funds for operation during its initial months
of a new sixteen-bed evaluation and treatment facility that will enable
the network to reduce its use of the state hospital, and for diversion
and community support services for persons with dementia who would
likely otherwise require care at the state hospital.
(j) The department is directed to identify and implement program
efficiencies and benefit changes in its delivery of medicaid managed-care services that are sufficient to operate within the state and
federal appropriations in this section. Such actions may include but
are not limited to methods such as adjusting the care access standards;
improved utilization management of ongoing, recurring, and high-intensity services; and increased uniformity in provider payment rates.
The department shall ensure that the capitation rate adjustments
necessary to accomplish these efficiencies and changes are distributed
uniformly and equitably across all regional support networks statewide.
The department is directed to report to the relevant legislative fiscal
and policy committees at least thirty days prior to implementing rate
adjustments reflecting these changes.
(k) In developing the new medicaid managed care rates under which
the public mental health managed care system will operate during the
five years beginning in fiscal year 2011, the department should seek to
estimate the reasonable and necessary cost of efficiently and
effectively providing a comparable set of medically necessary mental
health benefits to persons of different acuity levels regardless of
where in the state they live. Actual prior period spending in a
regional administrative area shall not be a key determinant of future
payment rates. The department shall report to the office of financial
management and to the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the
legislature on its proposed new waiver and mental health managed care
rate-setting approach by October 1, 2009, and again at least sixty days
prior to implementation of new capitation rates.
(l) $1,529,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,529,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to reimburse Pierce and Spokane
counties for the cost of conducting 180-day commitment hearings at the
state psychiatric hospitals.
(m) The legislature intends and expects that regional support
networks and contracted community mental health agencies shall make all
possible efforts to, at a minimum, maintain current compensation levels
of direct care staff. Such efforts shall include, but not be limited
to, identifying local funding that can preserve client services and
staff compensation, achieving administrative reductions at the regional
support network level, and engaging stakeholders on cost-savings ideas
that maintain client services and staff compensation. For purposes of
this section, "direct care staff" means persons employed by community
mental health agencies whose primary responsibility is providing direct
treatment and support to people with mental illness, or whose primary
responsibility is providing direct support to such staff in areas such
as client scheduling, client intake, client reception, client records-keeping, and facilities maintenance.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($120,679,000))
$120,637,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($125,017,000))
$124,995,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($151,300,000))
$151,160,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($65,870,000))
$65,868,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($462,866,000))
$462,660,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The state psychiatric hospitals may use funds appropriated in
this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital group
purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.
(b) $231,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $231,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a community partnership
between western state hospital and the city of Lakewood to support
community policing efforts in the Lakewood community surrounding
western state hospital. The amounts provided in this subsection (2)(b)
are for the salaries, benefits, supplies, and equipment for one full-time investigator, one full-time police officer, and one full-time
community service officer at the city of Lakewood.
(c) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for payment to the city of
Lakewood for police services provided by the city at western state
hospital and adjacent areas.

(3) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,819,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,812,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,142,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,773,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $1,511,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2010 and $1,511,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for
children's evidence based mental health services. Funding is
sufficient to continue serving children at the same levels as fiscal
year 2009.

(4) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,123,000))
$4,077,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,155,000))
$4,094,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,330,000))
$7,227,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,608,000))
$15,398,000

(((b))) The department is authorized and encouraged to continue its
contract with the Washington state institute for public policy to
provide a longitudinal analysis of long-term mental health outcomes as
directed in chapter 334, Laws of 2001 (mental health performance
audit); to build upon the evaluation of the impacts of chapter 214,
Laws of 1999 (mentally ill offenders); and to assess program outcomes
and cost effectiveness of the children's mental health pilot projects
as required by chapter 372, Laws of 2006.

Sec. 204 2009 c 564 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITIES PROGRAM
(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($313,050,000))
$311,589,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($368,549,000))
$366,489,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($851,610,000))
$849,263,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,533,209,000))
$1,527,341,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income
(SSI) state supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical
assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state
supplemental payments.
(b) Amounts appropriated in this section reflect a reduction to
funds appropriated for in-home care. The department shall reduce the
number of in-home hours authorized. The reduction shall be scaled
based on the acuity level of care recipients. The largest hour
reductions shall be to lower acuity patients and the smallest hour
reductions shall be to higher acuity patients. In doing so, the
department shall comply with all maintenance of effort requirements
contained in the American reinvestment and recovery act.
(c) Amounts appropriated in this section are sufficient to develop
and implement the use of a consistent, statewide outcome-based vendor
contract for employment and day services by April 1, 2011. The rates
paid to vendors under this contract shall also be made consistent. In
its description of activities the agency shall include activity
listings and dollars appropriated for: Employment services, day
services, child development services and county administration of
services to the developmentally disabled. The department shall begin
reporting to the office of financial management on these activities
beginning in fiscal year 2010.
(d) $5,593,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $4,002,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $14,701,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for community residential and support
services. Funding in this subsection shall be prioritized for (i)
residents of residential habilitation centers who are able to be
adequately cared for in community settings and who choose to live in
those community settings; (ii) clients without residential services who
are at immediate risk of institutionalization or in crisis; (iii)
children who are at risk of institutionalization or who are aging out
of other state services; and (iv) current home and community-based
waiver program clients who have been assessed as having an immediate
need for increased services. First priority shall be given to children
who are at risk of institutionalization. The department shall ensure
that the average cost per day for all program services other than
start-up costs shall not exceed $300. In order to maximize the number
of clients served and ensure the cost-effectiveness of the waiver
programs, the department will strive to limit new client placement
expenditures to 90 percent of the budgeted daily rate. If this can be
accomplished, additional clients may be served with excess funds,
provided the total projected carry-forward expenditures do not exceed
the amounts estimated. The department shall electronically report to
the appropriate committees of the legislature, within 45 days following
each fiscal year quarter, the number of persons served with these
additional community services, where they were residing, what kinds of
services they were receiving prior to placement, and the actual
expenditures for all community services to support these clients.
(e)(i) $493,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $1,463,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $2,741,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for community services for persons
with developmental disabilities who also have community protection
issues. Funding in this subsection shall be prioritized for (A)
clients being diverted or discharged from the state psychiatric
hospitals; (B) clients participating in the dangerous mentally ill
offender program; (C) clients participating in the community protection
program; and (D) mental health crisis diversion outplacements. The
department shall ensure that the average cost per day for all program
services other than start-up costs shall not exceed $349 per day in
fiscal year 2010 and $356 per day in fiscal year 2011. In order to
maximize the number of clients served and ensure the cost-effectiveness
of the waiver programs, the department will strive to limit new client
placement expenditures to 90 percent of the budgeted daily rate. If
this can be accomplished, additional clients may be served with excess
funds if the total projected carry-forward expenditures do not exceed
the amounts estimated.
(ii) The department shall electronically report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature, within 45 days following each fiscal
year quarter, the number of persons served with these additional
community services, where they were residing, what kinds of services
they were receiving prior to placement, and the actual expenditures for
all community services to support these clients.
(f) $302,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $831,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011, and $1,592,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for health care benefits pursuant to a collective
bargaining agreement negotiated with the exclusive bargaining
representative of individual providers established under RCW
74.39A.270.
(g)(i) $682,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $1,651,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $1,678,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the state's contribution to the
training partnership, as provided in RCW 74.39A.360, pursuant to a
collective bargaining agreement negotiated with the exclusive
bargaining representative of individual providers established under RCW
74.39A.270.
(ii) The federal portion of the amounts in this subsection (g) is
contingent upon federal approval of participation in contributions to
the trust and shall remain unallotted and placed in reserve status
until the office of financial management and the department of social
and health services receive federal approval.
(iii) Expenditures for the purposes specified in this subsection
(g) shall not exceed the amounts provided in this subsection.
(((i))) (h) Within the amounts appropriated in this subsection (1),
the department shall implement all necessary rules to facilitate the
transfer to a department home and community-based services (HCBS)
waiver of all eligible individuals who (i) currently receive services
under the existing state-only employment and day program or the
existing state-only residential program, and (ii) otherwise meet the
waiver eligibility requirements. The amounts appropriated are
sufficient to ensure that all individuals currently receiving services
under the state-only employment and day and state-only residential
programs who are not transferred to a department HCBS waiver will
continue to receive services.
(((j))) (i) Adult day health services shall only be authorized for
in-home clients.
(((k))) (j) In addition to other reductions, the appropriations in
this subsection reflect reductions targeted specifically to state
government administrative costs. These administrative reductions shall
be achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by reducing those
administrative costs that do not affect direct client services or
direct service delivery or programs.
(((l))) (k) The department shall not pay a home care agency
licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW for personal care services provided
by a family member, pursuant to Substitute House Bill No. 2361
(modifying state payments for in-home care).
(((m))) (l) Within the appropriations of this section, the
department shall reduce all seventeen payment levels of the seventeen-level payment system from the fiscal year 2009 levels for boarding
homes, boarding homes contracted as assisted living, and adult family
homes. Excluded from the reductions are exceptional care rate add-ons.
The long-term care program may develop add-ons to pay exceptional care
rates to adult family homes and boarding homes with specialty contracts
to provide support for the following specifically eligible clients:
(i) Persons with AIDS or HIV-related diseases who might otherwise
require nursing home or hospital care;
(ii) Persons with Alzheimer's disease and related dementia who
might otherwise require nursing home care; and
(iii) Persons with co-occurring mental illness and long-term care
needs who are eligible for expanded community services and who might
otherwise require state and local psychiatric hospital care.
Within amounts appropriated, exceptional add-on rates for AIDS/HIV,
dementia specialty care, and expanded community services may be
standardized within each program.
(((n))) (m) The amounts appropriated in this subsection reflect a
reduction in funds available for employment and day services. In
administering this reduction the department shall negotiate with
counties and their vendors so that this reduction, to the greatest
extent possible, is achieved by reducing vendor rates and allowable
contract administrative charges (overhead) and not through reductions
to direct client services or direct service delivery or programs.
(((o))) (n) Within the amounts allotted for employment and day
services in this section, the department shall prioritize the funding
of employment services for students graduating from high school during
fiscal years 2010 and 2011. However, nothing in this subsection is
intended to displace services for other recipients of employment
services.
(((p))) (o) As part of the needs assessment instrument, the
department may collect data on family income for minor children with
developmental disabilities and all individuals who are receiving state-only funded services. The department may ensure that this information
is collected as part of the client assessment process.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,612,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,185,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $202,160,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,441,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $360,398,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income
(SSI) state supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical
assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state
supplemental payments.
(b) The developmental disabilities program is authorized to use
funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods and supplies
through direct contracting with vendors when the program determines it
is cost-effective to do so.
(c) $721,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $721,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the department to fulfill its
contracts with the school districts under chapter 28A.190 RCW to
provide transportation, building space, and other support services as
are reasonably necessary to support the educational programs of
students living in residential habilitation centers.
(d) In addition to other reductions, the appropriations in this
subsection reflect reductions targeted specifically to state government
administrative costs. These administrative reductions shall be
achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by reducing those
administrative costs that do not affect direct client services or
direct service delivery or programs.

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,428,000))
$1,420,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,388,000))
$1,372,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,372,000))
$1,360,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,188,000))
$4,152,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: In addition to other reductions, the
appropriations in this subsection reflect reductions targeted
specifically to state government administrative costs. These
administrative reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent
possible, by reducing those administrative costs that do not affect
direct client services or direct service delivery or programs.

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,066,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,096,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this subsection are
available solely for the infant toddler early intervention program.

Sec. 205 2009 c 564 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- AGING AND ADULT
SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($585,667,000))
$584,741,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($698,622,000))
$693,325,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,814,099,000))
$1,805,958,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,373,000))
$19,973,000
Traumatic Brain Injury Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,816,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,120,577,000))
$3,105,813,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) For purposes of implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted
average nursing facility payment rate shall not exceed $156.37 for
fiscal year 2010 and shall not exceed $158.74 for fiscal year 2011,
including the rate add-on described in subsection (12) of this section.
There will be no adjustments for economic trends and conditions in
fiscal years 2010 and 2011. The economic trends and conditions factor
or factors defined in the biennial appropriations act shall not be
compounded with the economic trends and conditions factor or factors
defined in any other biennial appropriations acts before applying it to
the component rate allocations established in accordance with chapter
74.46 RCW. When no economic trends and conditions factor for either
fiscal year is defined in a biennial appropriations act, no economic
trends and conditions factor or factors defined in any earlier biennial
appropriations act shall be applied solely or compounded to the
component rate allocations established in accordance with chapter 74.46
RCW.
(2) In accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW, the department shall
issue no additional certificates of capital authorization for fiscal
year 2010 and no new certificates of capital authorization for fiscal
year 2011.
(3) The long-term care program may develop and pay enhanced rates
for exceptional care to nursing homes for persons with traumatic brain
injuries who are transitioning from hospital care. The cost per
patient day for caring for these clients in a nursing home setting may
be equal to or less than the cost of caring for these clients in a
hospital setting.
(4) Within the appropriations of this section, the department shall
reduce all seventeen payment levels of the seventeen-level payment
system from the fiscal year 2009 levels for boarding homes, boarding
homes contracted as assisted living, and adult family homes. Excluded
from the reductions are exceptional care rate add-ons. The long-term
care program may develop add-ons to pay exceptional care rates to adult
family homes and boarding homes with specialty contracts to provide
support for the following specifically eligible clients:
(a) Persons with AIDS or HIV-related diseases who might otherwise
require nursing home or hospital care;
(b) Persons with Alzheimer's disease and related dementia who might
otherwise require nursing home care; and
(c) Persons with co-occurring mental illness and long-term care
needs who are eligible for expanded community services and who might
otherwise require state and local psychiatric hospital care.
Within amounts appropriated, exceptional add-on rates for AIDS/HIV,
dementia specialty care, and expanded community services may be
standardized within each program.
(5) Amounts appropriated in this section reflect a reduction to
funds appropriated for in-home care. The department shall reduce the
number of in-home hours authorized. The reduction shall be scaled
based on the acuity level of care recipients. The largest hour
reductions shall be to lower acuity patients and the smallest hour
reductions shall be to higher acuity patients. In doing so, the
department shall comply with all maintenance of effort requirements
contained in the American reinvestment and recovery act.
(6) $536,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $1,477,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $2,830,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for health care benefits pursuant to
a collective bargaining agreement negotiated with the exclusive
bargaining representative of individual providers established under RCW
74.39A.270.
(7)(a) $1,212,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010, $2,934,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2011, and $2,982,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the state's contribution to the
training partnership, as provided in RCW 74.39A.360, pursuant to a
collective bargaining agreement negotiated with the exclusive
bargaining representative of individual providers established under RCW
74.39A.270.
(b) $330,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $660,000 of the general fund-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011, and $810,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for transfer from the department to the training
partnership, as provided in RCW 74.39A.360, for infrastructure and
instructional costs associated with training of individual providers,
pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement negotiated with the
exclusive bargaining representative of individual providers established
under RCW 74.39A.270.
(c) The federal portion of the amounts in this subsection is
contingent upon federal approval of participation in contributions to
the trust and shall remain unallotted and placed in reserve status
until the office of financial management and the department of social
and health services receive federal approval.
(d) Expenditures for the purposes specified in this subsection
shall not exceed the amounts provided in this subsection.
(8) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
may expand the new freedom waiver program to accommodate new waiver
recipients throughout the state. As possible, and in compliance with
current state and federal laws, the department shall allow current
waiver recipients to transfer to the new freedom waiver.
(9) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income
(SSI) state supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical
assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state
supplemental payments.
(10) Adult day health services shall only be authorized for in-home
clients.
(11) $3,955,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $4,239,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $10,190,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the continued operation of
community residential and support services for persons who are older
adults or who have co-occurring medical and behavioral disorders and
who have been discharged or diverted from a state psychiatric hospital.
These funds shall be used to serve individuals whose treatment needs
constitute substantial barriers to community placement, who no longer
require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient hospital level of
care, and who no longer meet the criteria for inpatient involuntary
commitment. Coordination of these services will be done in partnership
between the mental health program and the aging and disability services
administration.
(12) Within the funds provided, the department shall continue to
provide an add-on per medicaid resident day per facility not to exceed
$1.57. The add-on shall be used to increase wages, benefits, and/or
staffing levels for certified nurse aides; or to increase wages and/or
benefits for dietary aides, housekeepers, laundry aides, or any other
category of worker whose statewide average dollars-per-hour wage was
less than $15 in calendar year 2008, according to cost report data.
The add-on may also be used to address resulting wage compression for
related job classes immediately affected by wage increases to low-wage
workers. The department shall continue reporting requirements and a
settlement process to ensure that the funds are spent according to this
subsection. The department shall adopt rules to implement the terms of
this subsection.
(13) $1,840,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,877,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for operation of the volunteer
chore services program.
(14) In accordance with chapter 74.39 RCW, the department may
implement two medicaid waiver programs for persons who do not qualify
for such services as categorically needy, subject to federal approval
and the following conditions and limitations:
(a) One waiver program shall include coverage of care in community
residential facilities. Enrollment in the waiver shall not exceed 600
persons at any time.
(b) The second waiver program shall include coverage of in-home
care. Enrollment in this second waiver shall not exceed 200 persons at
any time.
(c) The department shall identify the number of medically needy
nursing home residents, and enrollment and expenditures on each of the
two medically needy waivers, on monthly management reports.
(d) If it is necessary to establish a waiting list for either
waiver because the budgeted number of enrollment opportunities has been
reached, the department shall track how the long-term care needs of
applicants assigned to the waiting list are met.
(15) The department shall establish waiting lists to the extent
necessary to assure that annual expenditures on the community options
program entry systems (COPES) program do not exceed appropriated
levels. In establishing and managing any such waiting list, the
department shall assure priority access to persons with the greatest
unmet needs, as determined by department assessment processes.
(16) The department shall contract for housing with service models,
such as cluster care, to create efficiencies in service delivery and
responsiveness to unscheduled personal care needs by clustering hours
for clients that live in close proximity to each other.
(17) The department shall not pay a home care agency licensed under
chapter 70.127 RCW for personal care services provided by a family
member, pursuant to Substitute House Bill No. 2361 (modifying state
payments for in-home care).
(18) $204,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $1,099,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $1,697,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to implement Engrossed House Bill No.
2194 (extraordinary medical placement for offenders). The department
shall work in partnership with the department of corrections to
identify services and find placements for offenders who are released
through the extraordinary medical placement program. The department
shall collaborate with the department of corrections to identify and
track cost savings to the department of corrections, including medical
cost savings and to identify and track expenditures incurred by the
aging and disability services program for community services and by the
medical assistance program for medical expenses. A joint report
regarding the identified savings and expenditures shall be provided to
the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal
committees of the legislature by November 30, 2010. If this bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(19) Sufficient funding is provided in this section for the
department to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1935
(adult family homes). During the 2009-11 biennium, the initial
licensing fee for an adult family home shall be set at $900.00. During
the 2009-11 biennium, the annual licensing renewal fee shall be set at
$100.00.

Sec. 206 2009 c 564 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ECONOMIC SERVICES
PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($557,621,000))
$557,452,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($588,286,000))
$587,973,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,140,367,000))
$1,139,899,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,920,000
Administrative Contingency Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,136,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,343,330,000))
$2,342,380,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $303,196,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010, $309,755,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2011, $29,136,000 of the administrative contingency
account--state appropriation, and $778,606,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for all components of the
WorkFirst program. The department shall use moneys from the
administrative contingency account for WorkFirst job placement services
provided by the employment security department. Within the amounts
provided for the WorkFirst program, the department may provide
assistance using state-only funds for families eligible for temporary
assistance for needy families. In addition, within the amounts
provided for WorkFirst the department shall:
(a) Establish a career services work transition program;
(b) Continue to implement WorkFirst program improvements that are
designed to achieve progress against outcome measures specified in RCW
74.08A.410. Outcome data regarding job retention and wage progression
shall be reported quarterly to appropriate fiscal and policy committees
of the legislature for families who leave assistance, measured after 12
months, 24 months, and 36 months. The department shall also report the
percentage of families who have returned to temporary assistance for
needy families after 12 months, 24 months, and 36 months;
(c) Submit a report electronically by October 1, 2009, to the
fiscal committees of the legislature containing a spending plan for the
WorkFirst program. The plan shall identify how spending levels in the
2009-2011 biennium will be adjusted to stay within available federal
grant levels and the appropriated state-fund levels;
(d) Provide quarterly fiscal reports to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing information
on the amount expended from general fund--state and general fund--federal by activity;
(e) Maintain the fiscal year 2009 grant standard for the temporary
assistance for needy families grant.
(2) The department and the office of financial management shall
electronically report quarterly the expenditures, maintenance of effort
allotments, expenditure amounts, and caseloads for the WorkFirst
program to the legislative fiscal committees.
(3) $84,856,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $95,173,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for cash assistance and other
services to recipients in the general assistance--unemployable program.
Within these amounts:
(a) The department shall aggressively pursue opportunities to
transfer general assistance unemployable clients to general assistance
expedited coverage and to facilitate client applications for federal
supplemental security income when the client's incapacities indicate
that he or she would be likely to meet the federal disability criteria
for supplemental security income. The department shall initiate and
file the federal supplemental security income interim agreement as
quickly as possible in order to maximize the recovery of federal funds;
(b) The department shall review the general assistance caseload to
identify recipients that would benefit from assistance in becoming
naturalized citizens, and thus be eligible to receive federal
supplemental security income benefits. Those cases shall be given high
priority for naturalization funding through the department;
(c) The department shall actively coordinate with local workforce
development councils to expedite access to worker retraining programs
for general assistance unemployable clients in those regions of the
state with the greatest number of such clients;
(d) By July 1, 2009, the department shall enter into an interagency
agreement with the department of veterans' affairs to establish a
process for referral of veterans who may be eligible for veteran's
services. This agreement must include outstationing department of
veterans' affairs staff in selected community service office locations
in King and Pierce counties to facilitate applications for veterans'
services; and
(e) In addition to any earlier evaluation that may have been
conducted, the department shall intensively evaluate those clients who
have been receiving general assistance unemployable benefits for twelve
months or more as of July 1, 2009, or thereafter, if the available
medical and incapacity related evidence indicates that the client is
unlikely to meet the disability standard for federal supplemental
security income benefits. The evaluation shall identify services
necessary to eliminate or minimize barriers to employment, including
mental health treatment, substance abuse treatment and vocational
rehabilitation services. The department shall expedite referrals to
chemical dependency treatment, mental health and vocational
rehabilitation services for these clients.
(f) The appropriations in this subsection reflect a change in the
earned income disregard policy for general assistance unemployable
clients. It is the intent of the legislature that the department shall
adopt the temporary assistance for needy families earned income policy
for general assistance unemployable.
(((5))) (4) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for naturalization services.
(((6))) (5)(a) $3,550,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2010 is provided solely for refugee employment
services, of which $2,650,000 is provided solely for the department to
pass through to statewide refugee assistance organizations for limited
English proficiency pathway services; and $3,550,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2011 is provided solely for
refugee employment services, of which $2,650,000 is provided solely for
the department to pass through to statewide refugee assistance
organizations for limited English proficiency pathway services.
(b) The legislature intends that the appropriation in this
subsection for the 2009-11 fiscal biennium will maintain funding for
refugee programs at a level at least equal to expenditures on these
programs in the 2007-09 fiscal biennium.
(((7))) (6) The appropriations in this section reflect reductions
in the appropriations for the economic services administration's
administrative expenses. It is the intent of the legislature that
these reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by
reducing those administrative costs that do not affect direct client
services or direct service delivery or program.

Sec. 207 2009 c 564 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ALCOHOL AND
SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($82,117,000))
$82,028,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($84,772,000))
$84,682,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($145,671,000))
$145,604,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,719,000
Criminal Justice Treatment Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,747,000
Problem Gambling Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,459,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($334,485,000))
$334,239,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
may contract with the University of Washington and community-based
providers for the provision of the parent-child assistance program.
For all contractors, indirect charges for administering the program
shall not exceed ten percent of the total contract amount.
(2) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
shall continue to provide for chemical dependency treatment services
for adult medicaid eligible and general assistance-unemployable
patients.
(3) In addition to other reductions, the appropriations in this
section reflect reductions targeted specifically to state government
administrative costs. These administrative reductions shall be
achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by reducing those
administrative costs that do not affect direct client services or
direct service delivery or programs.

Sec. 208 2009 c 564 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,597,387,000))
$1,598,043,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,984,797,000))
$1,985,797,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,210,672,000))
$5,212,855,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,903,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,076,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,766,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,824,601,000))
$8,828,440,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Based on quarterly expenditure reports and caseload forecasts,
if the department estimates that expenditures for the medical
assistance program will exceed the appropriations, the department shall
take steps including but not limited to reduction of rates or
elimination of optional services to reduce expenditures so that total
program costs do not exceed the annual appropriation authority.
(2) In determining financial eligibility for medicaid-funded
services, the department is authorized to disregard recoveries by
Holocaust survivors of insurance proceeds or other assets, as defined
in RCW 48.104.030.
(3) The legislature affirms that it is in the state's interest for
Harborview medical center to remain an economically viable component of
the state's health care system.
(4) When a person is ineligible for medicaid solely by reason of
residence in an institution for mental diseases, the department shall
provide the person with the same benefits as he or she would receive if
eligible for medicaid, using state-only funds to the extent necessary.
(5) In accordance with RCW 74.46.625, $6,000,000 of the general
fund -- federal appropriation is provided solely for supplemental
payments to nursing homes operated by public hospital districts. The
public hospital district shall be responsible for providing the
required nonfederal match for the supplemental payment, and the
payments shall not exceed the maximum allowable under federal rules.
It is the legislature's intent that the payments shall be supplemental
to and shall not in any way offset or reduce the payments calculated
and provided in accordance with part E of chapter 74.46 RCW. It is the
legislature's further intent that costs otherwise allowable for rate-setting and settlement against payments under chapter 74.46 RCW shall
not be disallowed solely because such costs have been paid by revenues
retained by the nursing home from these supplemental payments. The
supplemental payments are subject to retrospective interim and final
cost settlements based on the nursing homes' as-filed and final
medicare cost reports. The timing of the interim and final cost
settlements shall be at the department's discretion. During either the
interim cost settlement or the final cost settlement, the department
shall recoup from the public hospital districts the supplemental
payments that exceed the medicaid cost limit and/or the medicare upper
payment limit. The department shall apply federal rules for
identifying the eligible incurred medicaid costs and the medicare upper
payment limit.
(6) $1,110,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation and
$1,105,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2011 are provided solely for grants to rural hospitals. The department
shall distribute the funds under a formula that provides a relatively
larger share of the available funding to hospitals that (a) serve a
disproportionate share of low-income and medically indigent patients,
and (b) have relatively smaller net financial margins, to the extent
allowed by the federal medicaid program.
(7) $9,818,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011, and $9,865,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation
are provided solely for grants to nonrural hospitals. The department
shall distribute the funds under a formula that provides a relatively
larger share of the available funding to hospitals that (a) serve a
disproportionate share of low-income and medically indigent patients,
and (b) have relatively smaller net financial margins, to the extent
allowed by the federal medicaid program.
(8) The department shall continue the inpatient hospital certified
public expenditures program for the 2009-11 biennium. The program
shall apply to all public hospitals, including those owned or operated
by the state, except those classified as critical access hospitals or
state psychiatric institutions. The department shall submit reports to
the governor and legislature by November 1, 2009, and by November 1,
2010, that evaluate whether savings continue to exceed costs for this
program. If the certified public expenditures (CPE) program in its
current form is no longer cost-effective to maintain, the department
shall submit a report to the governor and legislature detailing
cost-effective alternative uses of local, state, and federal resources
as a replacement for this program. During fiscal year 2010 and fiscal
year 2011, hospitals in the program shall be paid and shall retain one
hundred percent of the federal portion of the allowable hospital cost
for each medicaid inpatient fee-for-service claim payable by medical
assistance and one hundred percent of the federal portion of the
maximum disproportionate share hospital payment allowable under federal
regulations. Inpatient medicaid payments shall be established using an
allowable methodology that approximates the cost of claims submitted by
the hospitals. Payments made to each hospital in the program in each
fiscal year of the biennium shall be compared to a baseline amount.
The baseline amount will be determined by the total of (a) the
inpatient claim payment amounts that would have been paid during the
fiscal year had the hospital not been in the CPE program, (b) one half
of the indigent assistance disproportionate share hospital payment
amounts paid to and retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005,
and (c) all of the other disproportionate share hospital payment
amounts paid to and retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005
to the extent the same disproportionate share hospital programs exist
in the 2009-11 biennium. If payments during the fiscal year exceed the
hospital's baseline amount, no additional payments will be made to the
hospital except the federal portion of allowable disproportionate share
hospital payments for which the hospital can certify allowable match.
If payments during the fiscal year are less than the baseline amount,
the hospital will be paid a state grant equal to the difference between
payments during the fiscal year and the applicable baseline amount.
Payment of the state grant shall be made in the applicable fiscal year
and distributed in monthly payments. The grants will be recalculated
and redistributed as the baseline is updated during the fiscal year.
The grant payments are subject to an interim settlement within eleven
months after the end of the fiscal year. A final settlement shall be
performed. To the extent that either settlement determines that a
hospital has received funds in excess of what it would have received as
described in this subsection, the hospital must repay the excess
amounts to the state when requested. $6,570,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2010, which is appropriated in
section 204(1) of this act, and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011, which is appropriated in section
204(1) of this act, are provided solely for state grants for the
participating hospitals. Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this
section for the remaining state grants for the participating hospitals.
(9) The department is authorized to use funds appropriated in this
section to purchase goods and supplies through direct contracting with
vendors when the department determines it is cost-effective to do so.
(((12))) (10) $93,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $93,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for the department to pursue a federal Medicaid
waiver pursuant to Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5945 (Washington
health partnership plan). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((13))) (11) The department shall require managed health care
systems that have contracts with the department to serve medical
assistance clients to limit any reimbursements or payments the systems
make to providers not employed by or under contract with the systems to
no more than the medical assistance rates paid by the department to
providers for comparable services rendered to clients in the fee-for-service delivery system.
(((16))) (12) A maximum of $166,875,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation and $38,389,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation may be expended in the fiscal biennium for the general
assistance-unemployable medical program, and these amounts are provided
solely for this program. Of these amounts, $10,749,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2010 and $10,892,000 of the
general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for payments to
hospitals for providing outpatient services to low income patients who
are recipients of general assistance-unemployable. Pursuant to RCW
74.09.035, the department shall not expend for the general assistance
medical care services program any amounts in excess of the amounts
provided in this subsection.
(((17))) (13) If the department determines that it is feasible
within the amounts provided in subsection (16) of this section, and
without the loss of federal disproportionate share hospital funds, the
department shall contract with the carrier currently operating a
managed care pilot project for the provision of medical care services
to general assistance-unemployable clients. Mental health services
shall be included in the services provided through the managed care
system. If the department determines that it is feasible, effective
October 1, 2009, in addition to serving clients in the pilot counties,
the carrier shall expand managed care services to clients residing in
at least the following counties: Spokane, Yakima, Chelan, Kitsap, and
Cowlitz. If the department determines that it is feasible, the carrier
shall complete implementation into the remaining counties. Total per
person costs to the state, including outpatient and inpatient services
and any additional costs due to stop loss agreements, shall not exceed
the per capita payments projected for the general assistance-unemployable eligibility category, by fiscal year, in the February 2009
medical assistance expenditures forecast. The department, in
collaboration with the carrier, shall seek to improve the transition
rate of general assistance clients to the federal supplemental security
income program.
(((18))) (14) The department shall evaluate the impact of the use
of a managed care delivery and financing system on state costs and
outcomes for general assistance medical clients. Outcomes measured
shall include state costs, utilization, changes in mental health status
and symptoms, and involvement in the criminal justice system.
(((19))) (15) The department shall report to the governor and the
fiscal committees of the legislature by June 1, 2010, on its progress
toward achieving a twenty percentage point increase in the generic
prescription drug utilization rate.
(((20))) (16) State funds shall not be used by hospitals for
advertising purposes.
(((21))) (17) The department shall seek a medicaid state plan
amendment to create a professional services supplemental payment
program for University of Washington medicine professional providers no
later than July 1, 2009. The department shall apply federal rules for
identifying the shortfall between current fee-for-service medicaid
payments to participating providers and the applicable federal upper
payment limit. Participating providers shall be solely responsible for
providing the local funds required to obtain federal matching funds.
Any incremental costs incurred by the department in the development,
implementation, and maintenance of this program will be the
responsibility of the participating providers. Participating providers
will retain the full amount of supplemental payments provided under
this program, net of any potential costs for any related audits or
litigation brought against the state. The department shall report to
the governor and the legislative fiscal committees on the prospects for
expansion of the program to other qualifying providers as soon as
feasibility is determined but no later than December 31, 2009. The
report will outline estimated impacts on the participating providers,
the procedures necessary to comply with federal guidelines, and the
administrative resource requirements necessary to implement the
program. The department will create a process for expansion of the
program to other qualifying providers as soon as it is determined
feasible by both the department and providers but no later than June
30, 2010.
(((22))) (18) $9,350,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2010, $8,313,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011, and $20,371,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for development and
implementation of a replacement system for the existing medicaid
management information system. The amounts provided in this subsection
are conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements of
section 902 of this act.
(((23))) (19) $506,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 and $657,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1373 (children's mental health). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(((24))) (20) Pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396(a)(25), the
department shall pursue insurance claims on behalf of medicaid children
served through its in-home medically intensive child program under WAC
388-551-3000. The department shall report to the Legislature by
December 31, 2009, on the results of its efforts to recover such
claims.
(((25))) (21) The department may, on a case-by-case basis and in
the best interests of the child, set payment rates for medically
intensive home care services to promote access to home care as an
alternative to hospitalization. Expenditures related to these
increased payments shall not exceed the amount the department would
otherwise pay for hospitalization for the child receiving medically
intensive home care services.
(((26))) (22) $425,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010, $425,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $1,580,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to continue children's health
coverage outreach and education efforts under RCW 74.09.470. These
efforts shall rely on existing relationships and systems developed with
local public health agencies, health care providers, public schools,
the women, infants, and children program, the early childhood education
and assistance program, child care providers, newborn visiting nurses,
and other community-based organizations. The department shall seek
public-private partnerships and federal funds that are or may become
available to provide on-going support for outreach and education
efforts under the federal children's health insurance program
reauthorization act of 2009.
(((27))) (23) The department, in conjunction with the office of
financial management, shall reduce outpatient and inpatient hospital
rates and implement a prorated inpatient payment policy. In
determining the level of reductions needed, the department shall
include in its calculations services paid under fee-for-service,
managed care, and certified public expenditure payment methods; but
reductions shall not apply to payments for psychiatric inpatient
services or payments to critical access hospitals.
(((28))) (24) The department will pursue a competitive procurement
process for antihemophilic products, emphasizing evidence-based
medicine and protection of patient access without significant
disruption in treatment.
(((29))) (25) The department will pursue several strategies towards
reducing pharmacy expenditures including but not limited to increasing
generic prescription drug utilization by 20 percentage points and
promoting increased utilization of the existing mail-order pharmacy
program.
(((30))) (26) The department shall reduce reimbursement for over-the-counter medications while maintaining reimbursement for those over-the-counter medications that can replace more costly prescription
medications.
(((31))) (27) The department shall seek public-private partnerships
and federal funds that are or may become available to implement health
information technology projects under the federal American recovery and
reinvestment act of 2009.
(((32))) (28) The department shall target funding for maternity
support services towards pregnant women with factors that lead to
higher rates of poor birth outcomes, including hypertension, a preterm
or low birth weight birth in the most recent previous birth, a
cognitive deficit or developmental disability, substance abuse, severe
mental illness, unhealthy weight or failure to gain weight, tobacco
use, or African American or Native American race.
(((34))) (29) $79,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $53,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1845
(medical support obligations).
(((35))) (30) $63,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010, $583,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $864,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to implement Engrossed House Bill No.
2194 (extraordinary medical placement for offenders). The department
shall work in partnership with the department of corrections to
identify services and find placements for offenders who are released
through the extraordinary medical placement program. The department
shall collaborate with the department of corrections to identify and
track cost savings to the department of corrections, including medical
cost savings, and to identify and track expenditures incurred by the
aging and disability services program for community services and by the
medical assistance program for medical expenses. A joint report
regarding the identified savings and expenditures shall be provided to
the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal
committees of the legislature by November 30, 2010. If this bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(((36))) (31) Sufficient amounts are provided in this section to
provide full benefit dual eligible beneficiaries with medicare part D
prescription drug copayment coverage in accordance with RCW 74.09.520.

Sec. 209 2009 c 564 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- VOCATIONAL
REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,452,000))
$10,451,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,127,000))
$10,125,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($83,553,000))
$83,534,000
Telecommunications Devices for the Hearing and
Speech Impaired -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,979,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($106,111,000))
$106,089,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The vocational rehabilitation program
shall coordinate closely with the economic services program to serve
general assistance unemployable clients who are referred for
eligibility determination and vocational rehabilitation services, and
shall make every effort, within the requirements of the federal
rehabilitation act of 1973, to serve these clients.

Sec. 210 2009 c 564 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- SPECIAL COMMITMENT
PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($54,027,000))
$49,818,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($53,137,000))
$47,259,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($107,164,000))
$97,077,000

Sec. 211 2009 c 564 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ADMINISTRATION AND
SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($34,549,000))
$34,425,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($34,843,000))
$34,627,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($55,407,000))
$55,169,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,526,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($126,325,000))
$125,747,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: In addition to other reductions, the
appropriations in this section reflect reductions targeted specifically
to state government administrative costs. These administrative
reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by
reducing those administrative costs that do not affect direct client
services or direct service delivery or programs.
(1) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the Washington state mentors
program to continue its public-private partnerships to provide
technical assistance and training to mentoring programs that serve at-risk youth.
(2) $445,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $445,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for funding of the teamchild
project through the governor's juvenile justice advisory committee.
(3) $178,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $178,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the juvenile detention
alternatives initiative.
(4) Amounts appropriated in this section reflect a reduction to the
family policy council. The family policy council shall reevaluate
staffing levels and administrative costs to ensure to the extent
possible a maximum ratio of grant moneys provided and administrative
costs.
(5) Amounts appropriated in this section reflect a reduction to the
council on children and families. The council on children and families
shall reevaluate staffing levels and administrative costs to ensure to
the extent possible a maximum ratio of grant moneys provided and
administrative costs.

Sec. 212 2009 c 564 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,802,000))
$2,638,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,814,000))
$2,533,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,299,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,915,000))
$6,470,000

Sec. 213 2009 c 564 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE INDETERMINATE SENTENCE REVIEW BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,913,000))
$1,882,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,917,000))
$1,886,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,830,000))
$3,768,000

Sec. 214 2009 c 564 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($108,879,000))
$107,413,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($84,169,000))
$82,806,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $480,871,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $138,846,000
Hospital Data Collection Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $326,000
Health Professions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $76,218,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $603,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,531,000
Safe Drinking Water Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,723,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,817,000
Waterworks Operator Certification -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,519,000
Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $326,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,600,000
Medical Test Site Licensure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,117,000
Youth Tobacco Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,512,000
Public Health Supplemental Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,525,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $295,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($46,884,000))
$46,852,000
Biotoxin Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,165,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($989,974,000))
$987,113,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department of health shall not initiate any services that
will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly
authorized in this act or other law. The department of health and the
state board of health shall not implement any new or amended rules
pertaining to primary and secondary school facilities until the rules
and a final cost estimate have been presented to the legislature, and
the legislature has formally funded implementation of the rules through
the omnibus appropriations act or by statute. The department may seek,
receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal
moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does
not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of
amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives
unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent
for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation that
provides appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated
state moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this
subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the
legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(2) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055 and RCW 43.70.250, the department is
authorized to establish fees by the amount necessary to fully support
the cost of activities related to the administration of long-term care
worker certification. The department is further authorized to increase
fees by the amount necessary to implement the regulatory requirements
of the following bills: House Bill No. 1414 (health care assistants),
House Bill No. 1740 (dental residency licenses), and House Bill No.
1899 (retired active physician licenses).
(((4))) (3) $764,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the medical quality assurance
commission to maintain disciplinary staff and associated costs
sufficient to reduce the backlog of disciplinary cases and to continue
to manage the disciplinary caseload of the commission.
(((5))) (4) $57,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $58,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the midwifery licensure
and regulatory program to offset a reduction in revenue from fees.
There shall be no change to the current annual fees for new or renewed
licenses for the midwifery program. The department shall convene the
midwifery advisory committee on a quarterly basis to address issues
related to licensed midwifery.
(((6))) (5) Funding for the human papillomavirus vaccine shall not
be included in the department's universal vaccine purchase program in
fiscal year 2010. Remaining funds for the universal vaccine purchase
program shall be used to continue the purchase of all other vaccines
included in the program until May 1, 2010, or until state funds are
exhausted, at which point state funding for the universal vaccine
purchase program shall be discontinued. Funds from section 317 of the
federal public health services act direct assistance shall not be used
in lieu of state funds.
(((7))) (6) Beginning July 1, 2010, the department, in
collaboration with the department of social and health services, shall
maximize the use of existing federal funds, including section 317 of
the federal public health services act direct assistance as well as
federal funds that may become available under the American recovery and
reinvestment act, in order to continue to provide immunizations for
low-income, nonmedicaid eligible children up to three hundred percent
of the federal poverty level in state-sponsored health programs.
(((8))) (7) The department shall eliminate outreach activities for
the health care directives registry and use the remaining amounts to
maintain the contract for the registry and minimal staffing necessary
to administer the basic entry functions for the registry.
(((9))) (8) Funding in this section reflects a temporary reduction
of resources for the 2009-11 fiscal biennium for the state board of
health to conduct health impact reviews.
(((10))) (9) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055 and 43.70.125, the
department is authorized to adopt rules to establish a fee schedule to
apply to applicants for initial certification surveys of health care
facilities for purposes of receiving federal health care program
reimbursement. The fees shall only apply when the department has
determined that federal funding is not sufficient to compensate the
department for the cost of conducting initial certification surveys.
The fees for initial certification surveys may be established as
follows: Up to $1,815 for ambulatory surgery centers, up to $2,015 for
critical access hospitals, up to $980 for end stage renal disease
facilities, up to $2,285 for home health agencies, up to $2,285 for
hospice agencies, up to $2,285 for hospitals, up to $520 for
rehabilitation facilities, up to $690 for rural health clinics, and up
to $7,000 for transplant hospitals.
(((11))) (10) Funding for family planning grants for fiscal year
2011 is reduced in the expectation that federal funding shall become
available to expand coverage of services for individuals through
programs at the department of social and health services. In the event
that such funding is not provided, the legislature intends to continue
funding through a supplemental appropriation at fiscal year 2010
levels.
(((12))) (11) $16,000,000 of the tobacco prevention and control
account--state appropriation is provided solely for local health
jurisdictions to conduct core public health functions as defined in RCW
43.70.514.
(((13))) (12) $100,000 of the health professions account
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 1414 (health care assistants). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((14))) (13) $42,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No.
1740 (dentistry license issuance). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2009, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.
(((15))) (14) $23,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Second Substitute House
Bill No. 1899 (retired active physician licenses). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this section shall
lapse.
(((16))) (15) $12,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $67,000 of the general fund--private/local
appropriation are provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1510
(birth certificates). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the
amount provided in this section shall lapse.
(((17))) (16) $31,000 of the health professions account is provided
for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5850 (human
trafficking). If the bill is not enacted by June 2009, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((18))) (17) $282,000 of the health professions account is
provided for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5752
(dentists cost recovery). If the bill is not enacted by June 2009, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((19))) (18) $106,000 of the health professions account is
provided for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5601
(speech language assistants). If the bill is not enacted by June 2009,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 215 2009 c 564 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
(1) ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,622,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,318,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $111,940,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) Within funds appropriated in this section, the department shall
seek contracts for chemical dependency vendors to provide chemical
dependency treatment of offenders in corrections facilities, including
corrections centers and community supervision facilities, which have
demonstrated effectiveness in treatment of offenders and are able to
provide data to show a successful treatment rate.
(b) $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the support of a statewide
council on mentally ill offenders that includes as its members
representatives of community-based mental health treatment programs,
current or former judicial officers, and directors and commanders of
city and county jails and state prison facilities. The council will
investigate and promote cost-effective approaches to meeting the long-term needs of adults and juveniles with mental disorders who have a
history of offending or who are at-risk of offending, including their
mental health, physiological, housing, employment, and job training
needs.

(2) CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($459,575,000))
$456,657,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($629,070,000))
$626,303,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $185,131,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,536,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,960,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,283,272,000))
$1,277,587,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The department may expend funds generated by contractual
agreements entered into for mitigation of severe overcrowding in local
jails. Any funds generated in excess of actual costs shall be
deposited in the state general fund. Expenditures shall not exceed
revenue generated by such agreements and shall be treated as a recovery
of costs.
(((c))) (b) The department shall accomplish personnel reductions
with the least possible impact on correctional custody staff, community
custody staff, and correctional industries. For the purposes of this
subsection, correctional custody staff means employees responsible for
the direct supervision of offenders.
(((d))) (c) During the 2009-11 biennium, when contracts are
established or renewed for offender pay phone and other telephone
services provided to inmates, the department shall select the
contractor or contractors primarily based on the following factors:
(i) The lowest rate charged to both the inmate and the person paying
for the telephone call; and (ii) the lowest commission rates paid to
the department, while providing reasonable compensation to cover the
costs of the department to provide the telephone services to inmates
and provide sufficient revenues for the activities funded from the
institutional welfare betterment account.
(((e))) (d) The Harborview medical center shall provide inpatient
and outpatient hospital services to offenders confined in department of
corrections facilities at a rate no greater than the average rate that
the department has negotiated with other community hospitals in
Washington state.
(((g))) (e) A political subdivision which is applying for funding
to mitigate one-time impacts associated with construction or expansion
of a correctional institution, consistent with WAC 137-12A-030, may
apply for the mitigation funds in the fiscal biennium in which the
impacts occur or in the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.
(((h))) (f) Within amounts provided in this subsection, the
department, jointly with the department of social and health services,
shall identify the number of offenders released through the
extraordinary medical placement program, the cost savings to the
department of corrections, including estimated medical cost savings,
and the costs for medical services in the community incurred by the
department of social and health services. The department and the
department of social and health services shall jointly report to the
office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of
the legislature by November 30, 2010.
(((i))) (g) $11,863,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2010, $11,864,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011, and $2,336,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation are provided solely for in-prison
evidence-based programs and for the reception diagnostic center program
as part of the offender re-entry initiative.

(3) COMMUNITY SUPERVISION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($152,122,000))
$151,249,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($141,982,000))
$141,785,000
((General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000))
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($294,854,000))
$293,034,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The department shall accomplish personnel reductions with the
least possible impact on correctional custody staff, community custody
staff, and correctional industries. For the purposes of this
subsection, correctional custody staff means employees responsible for
the direct supervision of offenders.
(b) $2,083,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $2,083,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5525
(state institutions/release). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(c) (($375,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely as a matching amount of state funds for a
federal second chance act grant and is contingent upon receipt of
$750,000 of federal funding under the second chance act.
(d))) The appropriations in this subsection are based upon savings
assumed from the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No.
5288 (supervision of offenders).
(((e))) (d) $2,791,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $3,166,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for evidence-based community programs and for community justice centers as part of
the offender re-entry initiative.

(4) CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,574,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,565,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,139,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $132,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2010 and $132,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for
transfer to the jail industries board. The board shall use the amounts
provided only for administrative expenses, equipment purchases, and
technical assistance associated with advising cities and counties in
developing, promoting, and implementing consistent, safe, and efficient
offender work programs.

(5) INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,455,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,450,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,905,000

Sec. 216 2009 c 564 s 225 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SENTENCING GUIDELINES COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($978,000))
$962,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($976,000))
$960,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,954,000))
$1,922,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the sentencing
guidelines commission, in partnership with the courts, shall develop a
plan to implement an evidence-based system of community custody for
adult felons that will include the consistent use of evidence-based
risk and needs assessment tools, programs, supervision modalities, and
monitoring of program integrity. The plan for the evidence-based
system of community custody shall include provisions for identifying
cost-effective rehabilitative programs; identifying offenders for whom
such programs would be cost-effective; monitoring the system for cost-effectiveness; and reporting annually to the legislature. In
developing the plan, the sentencing guidelines shall consult with: The
Washington state institute for public policy; the legislature; the
department of corrections; local governments; prosecutors; defense
attorneys; victim advocate groups; law enforcement; the Washington
federation of state employees; and other interested entities. The
sentencing guidelines commission shall report its recommendations to
the governor and the legislature by December 1, 2009.
(2)(a) Except as provided in subsection (b), during the 2009-11
biennium, the reports required by RCW 9.94A.480(2) and 9.94A.850(2) (d)
and (h) shall be prepared within the available funds and may be delayed
or suspended at the discretion of the commission.
(b) The commission shall submit the analysis described in section
15 of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5288 no later than December
1, 2011.

(End of part)

PART III
NATURAL RESOURCES
Sec. 301 2009 c 564 s 302 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($60,166,000))
$59,991,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($58,190,000))
$58,047,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $82,452,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,668,000
Special Grass Seed Burning Research Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Reclamation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,679,000
Flood Control Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,965,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,554,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities) -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $426,000
Freshwater Aquatic Algae Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $509,000
Water Rights Tracking System Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $116,000
Site Closure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $706,000
Wood Stove Education and Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $612,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,670,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($101,727,000))
$101,705,000
State Toxics Control Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $383,000
Local Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,730,000
Water Quality Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,433,000
Underground Storage Tank Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,298,000
Biosolids Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,413,000
Hazardous Waste Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,930,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,843,000))
$2,030,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,688,000
Air Operating Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,783,000
Freshwater Aquatic Weeds Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,699,000
Oil Spill Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,078,000
Metals Mining Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $465,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,940,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($444,200,000))
$442,998,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $170,000 of the oil spill prevention account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a contract with the University of
Washington's sea grant program to continue an educational program
targeted to small spills from commercial fishing vessels, ferries,
cruise ships, ports, and marinas.
(2) $240,000 of the woodstove education and enforcement account--state appropriation is provided solely for citizen outreach efforts to
improve understanding of burn curtailments, the proper use of wood
heating devices, and public awareness of the adverse health effects of
woodsmoke pollution.
(3) $3,000,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation is
provided solely for contracted toxic-site cleanup actions at sites
where multiple potentially liable parties agree to provide funding.
(4) $3,600,000 of the local toxics account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the standby emergency rescue tug stationed at Neah
Bay.
(5) $811,000 of the state toxics account--state appropriation is
provided solely for oversight of toxic cleanup at facilities that
treat, store, and dispose of hazardous wastes.
(6) $1,456,000 of the state toxics account--state appropriation is
provided solely for toxic cleanup at sites where willing parties
negotiate prepayment agreements with the department and provide
necessary funding.
(7) $558,000 of the state toxics account--state appropriation and
$3,000,000 of the local toxics account--state appropriation are
provided solely for grants and technical assistance to Puget Sound-area
local governments engaged in updating shoreline master programs.
(8) $950,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for measuring water and habitat
quality to determine watershed health and assist salmon recovery,
beginning in fiscal year 2011.
(9) RCW 70.105.280 authorizes the department to assess reasonable
service charges against those facilities that store, treat, incinerate,
or dispose of dangerous or extremely hazardous waste that involves both
a nonradioactive hazardous component and a radioactive component.
Service charges may not exceed the costs to the department in carrying
out the duties in RCW 70.105.280. The current service charges do not
meet the costs of the department to carry out its duties. Pursuant to
RCW 43.135.055 and 70.105.280, the department is authorized to increase
the service charges no greater than 18 percent for fiscal year 2010 and
no greater than 15 percent for fiscal year 2011. Such service charges
shall include all costs of public participation grants awarded to
qualified entities by the department pursuant to RCW 70.105D.070(5) for
facilities at which such grants are recognized as a component of a
community relations or public participation plan authorized or required
as an element of a consent order, federal facility agreement or agreed
order entered into or issued by the department pursuant to any federal
or state law governing investigation and remediation of releases of
hazardous substances. Public participation grants funded by such
service charges shall be in addition to, and not in place of, any other
grants made pursuant to RCW 70.105D.070(5). Costs for the public
participation grants shall be billed individually to the mixed waste
facility associated with the grant.
(10) The department is authorized to increase the following fees in
the 2009-2011 biennium as necessary to meet the actual costs of
conducting business and the appropriation levels in this section:
Environmental lab accreditation, dam safety and inspection, biosolids
permitting, air emissions new source review, and manufacturer
registration and renewal.
(((12))) (11) $63,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5797 (solid waste handling permits). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(((13))) (12) $225,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $193,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for implementation of
Engrossed Second Substitute Bill No. 5560 (agency climate leadership).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(((14))) (13) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for watershed planning
implementation grants to continue ongoing efforts to develop and
implement water agreements in the Nooksack Basin and the Bertrand
watershed. These amounts are intended to support project
administration; monitoring; negotiations in the Nooksack watershed
between tribes, the department, and affected water users; continued
implementation of a flow augmentation project; plan implementation in
the Fishtrap watershed; and the development of a water bank.
(((15))) (14) $215,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $235,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to provide watershed planning
implementation grants for WRIA 32 to implement Substitute House Bill
No. 1580 (pilot local water management program). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(((16))) (15) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the purpose of supporting
the trust water rights program and processing trust water right
transfer applications that improve instream flow.
(((17))) (16)(a) The department shall convene a stock water working
group that includes: Legislators, four members representing
agricultural interests, three members representing environmental
interests, the attorney general or designee, the director of the
department of ecology or designee, the director of the department of
agriculture or designee, and affected federally recognized tribes shall
be invited to send participants.
(b) The group shall review issues surrounding the use of permit-exempt wells for stock-watering purposes and may develop
recommendations for legislative action.
(c) The working group shall meet periodically and report its
activities and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate
legislative committees by December 1, 2009.
(((19))) (17) $73,000 of the water quality permit account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No.
1413 (water discharge fees). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2009, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((20))) (18) The department shall continue to work with the
Columbia Snake River irrigators' association to determine how seasonal
water operation and maintenance conservation can be utilized. In
implementing this proviso, the department shall also consult with the
Columbia River policy advisory group as appropriate.
(((21))) (19) The department shall track any changes in costs,
wages, and benefits that would have resulted if House Bill No. 1716
(public contract living wages), as introduced in the 2009 regular
session of the legislature, were enacted and made applicable to
contracts and related subcontracts entered into, renewed, or extended
during the 2009-11 biennium. The department shall submit a report to
the house of representatives commerce and labor committee and the
senate labor, commerce, and consumer protection committee by December
1, 2011. The report shall include data on any aggregate changes in
wages and benefits that would have resulted during the 2009-11
biennium.
(((22))) (20) Within amounts appropriated in this section the
department shall develop recommendations by December 1, 2009, for a
convenient and effective mercury-containing light recycling program for
residents, small businesses, and small school districts throughout the
state. The department shall consider options including but not limited
to, a producer-funded program, a recycler-supported or recycle fee
program, a consumer fee at the time of purchase, general fund
appropriations, or a currently existing dedicated account. The
department shall involve and consult with stakeholders including
persons who represent retailers, waste haulers, recyclers, mercury-containing light manufacturers or wholesalers, cities, counties,
environmental organizations and other interested parties. The
department shall report its findings and recommendations for a
recycling program for mercury-containing lights to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2009.
(((23))) (21) During the 2009-11 biennium, the department shall
implement its cost reimbursement authority for processing water right
applications using a competitive bidding process. For each cost
reimbursement application, the department shall obtain cost proposals
and other necessary information from at least three prequalified costs
reimbursement consultants and shall select the lowest responsive
bidder.
(((24))) (22) $140,000 of the freshwater aquatic algae control
account--state appropriation is provided solely for grants to cities,
counties, tribes, special purpose districts, and state agencies for
capital and operational expenses used to manage and study excessive
saltwater algae with an emphasis on the periodic accumulation of sea
lettuce on Puget Sound beaches.
(((25))) (23) By December 1, 2009, the department in consultation
with local governments shall conduct a remedial action grant financing
alternatives report. The report shall address options for financing the
remedial action grants identified in the department's report, entitled
"House Bill 1761, Model Toxics Control Accounts Ten-Year Financing
Plan" and shall include but not be limited to the following: (a)
Capitalizing cleanup costs using debt insurance; (b) capitalizing
cleanup costs using prefunded cost-cap insurance; (c) other contractual
instruments with local governments; and (d) an assessment of overall
economic benefits of the remedial action grants funded using the
instruments identified in this section.

Sec. 302 2009 c 564 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,541,000))
$23,326,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,944,000))
$22,729,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,902,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,000
Winter Recreation Program Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,558,000
Off Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $239,000
Snowmobile Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,842,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $363,000
Recreation Resources Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,802,000
NOVA Program Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,560,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($73,278,000))
$71,778,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account --
Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($152,402,000))
$150,472,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for a grant for the operation of
the Northwest avalanche center.
(((3))) (2) Proceeds received from voluntary donations given by
motor vehicle registration applicants shall be used solely for the
operation and maintenance of state parks.
(((5))) (3) With the passage of Substitute House Bill No. 2339
(state parks system donation), the legislature finds that it has
provided sufficient funds to ensure that all state parks remain open
during the 2009-11 biennium. The commission shall not close state
parks unless the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, or revenue
collections are insufficient to fund the ongoing operation of state
parks. By January 10, 2010, the commission shall provide a report to
the legislature on their budget and resources related to operating
parks for the remainder of the biennium.
(((6))) (4) The commission shall work with the department of
general administration to evaluate the commission's existing leases
with the intention of increasing net revenue to state parks. The
commission shall provide to the office of financial management and the
legislative fiscal committees no later than September 30, 2009, a list
of leases the commission proposes be managed by the department of
general administration.

Sec. 303 2009 c 564 s 306 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,692,000))
$7,575,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,707,000))
$7,590,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,179,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,578,000))
$16,344,000

Sec. 304 2009 c 564 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($41,234,000))
$40,686,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($39,939,000))
$38,891,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $86,330,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,490,000
Off Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $415,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,757,000
Recreational Fisheries Enhancement -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,640,000
Warm Water Game Fish Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,877,000
Eastern Washington Pheasant Enhancement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $848,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $207,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Prevention Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $844,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($74,744,000))
$76,178,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,381,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,928,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $487,000
Wildlife Rehabilitation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,000
Regional Fisheries Salmonid Recovery Account --
Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,001,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $884,000
Oyster Reserve Land Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $918,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($324,194,000))
$324,032,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $294,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of hatchery
reform recommendations defined by the hatchery scientific review group.
(2) $355,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $422,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the department to implement a
pilot project with the Confederated Tribes of the Colville Reservation
to develop expanded recreational fishing opportunities on Lake Rufus
Woods and its northern shoreline and to conduct joint enforcement of
lake fisheries on Lake Rufus Woods and adjoining waters, pursuant to
state and tribal intergovernmental agreements developed under the
Columbia River water supply program. For the purposes of the pilot
project:
(a) A fishing permit issued to a nontribal member by the Colville
Tribes shall satisfy the license requirement of RCW 77.32.010 on the
waters of Lake Rufus Woods and on the north shore of Lake Rufus Woods;
(b) The Colville Tribes have agreed to provide to holders of its
nontribal member fishing permits a means to demonstrate that fish in
their possession were lawfully taken in Lake Rufus Woods;
(c) A Colville tribal member identification card shall satisfy the
license requirement of RCW 77.32.010 on all waters of Lake Rufus Woods;
(d) The department and the Colville Tribes shall jointly designate
fishing areas on the north shore of Lake Rufus Woods for the purposes
of enhancing access to the recreational fisheries on the lake; and
(e) The Colville Tribes have agreed to recognize a fishing license
issued under RCW 77.32.470 or RCW 77.32.490 as satisfying the nontribal
member fishing permit requirements of Colville tribal law on the
reservation portion of the waters of Lake Rufus Woods and at designated
fishing areas on the north shore of Lake Rufus Woods;
(3) Prior to submitting its 2011-2013 biennial operating and
capital budget request related to state fish hatcheries to the office
of financial management, the department shall contract with the
hatchery scientific review group (HSRG) to review this request. This
review shall: (a) Determine if the proposed requests are consistent
with HSRG recommendations; (b) prioritize the components of the
requests based on their contributions to protecting wild salmonid
stocks and meeting the recommendations of the HSRG; and (c) evaluate
whether the proposed requests are being made in the most cost effective
manner. The department shall provide a copy of the HSRG review to the
office of financial management with their agency budget proposal.
(4) Within existing funds, the department shall continue
implementing its capital program action plan dated September 1, 2007,
including the purchase of the necessary maintenance and support costs
for the capital programs and engineering tools. The department shall
report to the office of financial management and the appropriate
committees of the legislature, its progress in implementing the plan,
including improvements instituted in its capital program, by September
30, 2011.
(((6))) (5) $1,232,000 of the state wildlife account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No.
1778 (fish and wildlife). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((7))) (6) $400,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $400,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for a state match to support
the Puget Sound nearshore partnership between the department and the
U.S. army corps of engineers.
(((8))) (7) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for removal of derelict gear
in Washington waters.
(((9))) (8) The department of fish and wildlife shall dispose of
all fixed wing aircraft it currently owns. The proceeds from the
aircraft shall be deposited into the state wildlife account. Disposal
of the aircraft must occur no later than June 30, 2010.
(((10))) (9) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 is provided solely for an electron project fish
passage study consistent with the recommendations and protocols
contained in the 2008 electron project downstream fish passage final
report.
(((11))) (10) $60,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $60,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for implementation of
Engrossed Second Substitute Bill No. 5560 (agency climate leadership).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(((12))) (11) If sufficient new revenues are not identified to
continue hatchery operations, within the constraints of legally binding
tribal agreements, the department shall dispose of, by removal, sale,
lease, reversion, or transfer of ownership, the following hatcheries:
McKernan, Colville, Omak, Bellingham, Arlington, and Mossyrock.
Disposal of the hatcheries must occur by June 30, 2011, and any
proceeds received from disposal shall be deposited in the state
wildlife account. Within available funds, the department shall provide
quarterly reports on the progress of disposal to the office of
financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the
legislature. The first report shall be submitted no later than
September 30, 2009.
(((13))) (12) $100,000 of the eastern Washington pheasant
enhancement account--state appropriation is provided solely for the
department to support efforts to enhance permanent and temporary
pheasant habitat on public and private lands in Grant, Franklin, and
Adams counties. The department may support efforts by entities
including conservation districts, nonprofit organizations, and
landowners, and must require such entities to provide significant
nonstate matching resources, which may be in the form of funds,
material, or labor.

Sec. 305 2009 c 564 s 309 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,616,000))
$12,329,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,295,000))
$11,271,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,565,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $194,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,559,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,298,000
Water Quality Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($43,588,000))
$42,277,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $350,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation
is provided solely for funding to the Pacific county noxious weed
control board to eradicate remaining spartina in Willapa Bay.
(2) $19,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $6,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to implement Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5797 (solid waste handling permits). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(3) The department is authorized to establish or increase the
following fees in the 2009-11 biennium as necessary to meet the actual
costs of conducting business: Christmas tree grower licensing, nursery
dealer licensing, plant pest inspection and testing, and commission
merchant licensing.

Sec. 306 2009 c 564 s 311 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,223,000))
$3,172,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,194,000))
$3,143,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,623,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $896,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,436,000))
$11,334,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $305,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for measuring water and habitat quality to
determine watershed health and assist salmon recovery.
(2) $896,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for activities that contribute to
Puget Sound protection and recovery, including provision of independent
advice and assessment of the state's oil spill prevention,
preparedness, and response programs, including review of existing
activities and recommendations for any necessary improvements. The
partnership may carry out this function through an existing committee,
such as the ecosystem coordination board or the leadership council, or
may appoint a special advisory council. Because this is a unique
statewide program, the partnership may invite participation from
outside the Puget Sound region.
(3) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the Puget
Sound partnership shall facilitate an ongoing monitoring consortium to
integrate monitoring efforts for storm water, water quality, watershed
health, and other indicators to enhance monitoring efforts in Puget
Sound.
(4) The Puget Sound partnership shall work with Washington State
University and the environmental protection agency to secure funding
for the beach watchers program.
(5) $877,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $877,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to support public education and
volunteer programs. The partnership is directed to distribute the
majority of funding as grants to local organizations, local
governments, and education, communication, and outreach network
partners. The partnership shall track progress for this activity
through the accountability system of the Puget Sound partnership.

(End of part)

PART IV
TRANSPORTATION
Sec. 401 2009 c 564 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,668,000))
$1,436,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,712,000))
$1,535,000
Architects' License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,056,000))
$767,000
Professional Engineers' Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,586,000
Real Estate Commission Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,047,000
Master License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,718,000
Uniform Commercial Code Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,100,000
Real Estate Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $276,000
Real Estate Appraiser Commission Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,692,000
Business and Professions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,270,000
Real Estate Research Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $320,000
Geologists' Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,000
Derelict Vessel Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($55,828,000))
$53,831,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, the department is authorized to
increase fees for cosmetologists, funeral directors, cemeteries, court
reporters and appraisers. These increases are necessary to support the
expenditures authorized in this section, consistent with RCW 43.24.086.
(2) $1,352,000 of the business and professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5391 (tattoo and body piercing). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((4))) (3) $358,000 of the business and professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 6126
(professional athletics). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 402 2009 c 564 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PATROL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($41,468,000))
$40,668,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($40,366,000))
$39,566,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,401,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,568,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,022,000
Enhanced 911 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $589,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,122,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,245,000
Fire Service Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $131,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,002,000
Fire Service Training Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,717,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $504,000
Fingerprint Identification Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,371,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($132,560,000))
$130,960,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $200,000 of the fire service training account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for two FTEs in the office of the
state director of fire protection to exclusively review K-12
construction documents for fire and life safety in accordance with the
state building code. It is the intent of this appropriation to provide
these services only to those districts that are located in counties
without qualified review capabilities.
(2) $8,000,000 of the disaster response account--state
appropriation is provided solely for Washington state fire service
resource mobilization costs incurred in response to an emergency or
disaster authorized under RCW 43.43.960 and 43.43.964. The state
patrol shall submit a report quarterly to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing information
on current and planned expenditures from this account. This work shall
be done in coordination with the military department.
(((4))) (3) The 2010 legislature will review the use of king air
planes by the executive branch and the adequacy of funding in this
budget regarding maintaining and operating the planes to successfully
accomplish their mission.
(((5))) (4) The appropriations in this section reflect reductions
in the appropriations for the agency's administrative expenses. It is
the intent of the legislature that these reductions shall be achieved,
to the greatest extent possible, by reducing those administrative costs
that do not affect direct client services or direct service delivery or
programs.
(((6))) (5) $400,000 of the fire service training account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the firefighter apprenticeship
training program.
(((7))) (6) $48,000 of the fingerprint identification account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute House
Bill No. 1621 (consumer loan companies). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(End of part)

PART V
EDUCATION
Sec. 501 2009 c 564 s 513 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- EDUCATION REFORM
PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($95,181,000))
$93,681,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $102,512,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $152,626,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $95,112,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($445,431,000))
$443,931,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $36,806,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $34,516,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, $1,350,000 of the education legacy trust
account--state appropriation, and $15,868,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation are provided solely for development and
implementation of the Washington assessments of student learning
(WASL), including: (i) Development and implementation of retake
assessments for high school students who are not successful in one or
more content areas of the WASL; and (ii) development and implementation
of alternative assessments or appeals procedures to implement the
certificate of academic achievement. The superintendent of public
instruction shall report quarterly on the progress on development and
implementation of alternative assessments or appeals procedures.
Within these amounts, the superintendent of public instruction shall
contract for the early return of 10th grade student WASL results, on or
around June 10th of each year.
(2) $3,249,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $3,249,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the design of the state
assessment system and the implementation of end of course assessments
for high school math.
(3) $1,014,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
is provided solely for allocations to districts for salaries and
benefits for the equivalent of two additional professional development
days for fourth and fifth grade teachers during the 2008-2009 school
year. The allocations shall be made based on the calculations of
certificated instructional staff units for fourth and fifth grade
provided in section 502 of this act and on the calculations of
compensation provided in sections 503 and 504 of this act. Districts
may use the funding to support additional days for professional
development as well as job-embedded forms of professional development.
(4) $3,241,000 of the education legacy trust fund appropriation is
provided solely for allocations to districts for salaries and benefits
for the equivalent of three additional professional development days
for middle and high school math and science teachers during the 2008-2009 school year, as well as specialized training for one math and
science teacher in each middle school and high school during the 2008-2009 school year. Districts may use the funding to support additional
days for professional development as well as job-embedded forms of
professional development.
(5) $3,850,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a math and science instructional
coaches program pursuant to chapter 396, Laws of 2007. Funding shall
be used to provide grants to schools and districts to provide salaries,
benefits, and professional development activities for up to twenty-five
instructional coaches in middle and high school math and twenty-five
instructional coaches in middle and high school science in each year of
the biennium; and up to $300,000 may be used by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to administer and coordinate the
program.
(6) $1,781,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,943,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to allow approved middle and
junior high school career and technical education programs to receive
enhanced vocational funding. The office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall provide allocations to districts for middle
and junior high school students in accordance with the funding formulas
provided in section 502 of this act. If Second Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5676 is enacted the allocations are formula-driven, otherwise the
office of the superintendent shall consider the funding provided in
this subsection as a fixed amount, and shall adjust funding to stay
within the amounts provided in this subsection.
(7) $139,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $139,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for (a) staff at the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to coordinate and promote efforts
to develop integrated math, science, technology, and engineering
programs in schools and districts across the state; and (b) grants of
$2,500 to provide twenty middle and high school teachers each year
professional development training for implementing integrated math,
science, technology, and engineering program in their schools.
(8) $1,579,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,579,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the Washington state
leadership and assistance for science education reform (LASER) regional
partnership activities coordinated at the Pacific science center,
including instructional material purchases, teacher and principal
professional development, and school and community engagement events.
Funding shall be distributed to the various LASER activities in a
manner proportional to LASER program spending during the 2007-2009
biennium.
(9) $81,010,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants for voluntary full-day
kindergarten at the highest poverty schools, as provided in chapter
400, Laws of 2007. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall provide allocations to districts for recipient
schools in accordance with the funding formulas provided in section 502
of this act. Each kindergarten student who enrolls for the voluntary
full-day program in a recipient school shall count as one-half of one
full-time equivalent student for the purpose of making allocations
under this subsection. Although the allocations are formula-driven,
the office of the superintendent shall consider the funding provided in
this subsection as a fixed amount, and shall limit the number of
recipient schools so as to stay within the amounts appropriated each
fiscal year in this subsection. The funding provided in this
subsection is estimated to provide full-day kindergarten programs for
20 percent of kindergarten enrollment. Funding priority shall be given
to schools with the highest poverty levels, as measured by prior year
free and reduced priced lunch eligibility rates in each school.
Additionally, as a condition of funding, school districts must agree to
provide the full-day program to the children of parents who request it
in each eligible school. For the purposes of calculating a school
district levy base, funding provided in this subsection shall be
considered a state block grant program under RCW 84.52.0531.
(a) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, a maximum of
$272,000 may be used for administrative support of the full-day
kindergarten program within the office of the superintendent of public
instruction.
(b) Student enrollment pursuant to this program shall not be
included in the determination of a school district's overall K-12 FTE
for the allocation of student achievement programs and other funding
formulas unless specifically stated.
(10) $700,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the development of a
leadership academy for school principals and administrators. The
superintendent of public instruction shall contract with an independent
organization to design, field test, and implement a state-of-the-art
education leadership academy that will be accessible throughout the
state. Initial development of the content of the academy activities
shall be supported by private funds. Semiannually the independent
organization shall report on amounts committed by foundations and
others to support the development and implementation of this program.
Leadership academy partners, with varying roles, shall include the
state level organizations for school administrators and principals, the
superintendent of public instruction, the professional educator
standards board, and others as the independent organization shall
identify.
(11) $105,754,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for preparing, training, and recruiting high quality teachers
and principals under Title II of the no child left behind act.
(12) (($3,046,000)) $1,546,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2010 and $3,046,000 of the general fund--
state appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to the
office of the superintendent of public instruction for focused
assistance. The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall conduct educational audits of low-performing schools and enter
into performance agreements between school districts and the office to
implement the recommendations of the audit and the community. Funding
in this subsection may be used for focused assistance programs for
individual schools as well as school districts.
(13) $30,702,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for the reading first program under Title I of the no child
left behind act.
(14) $1,667,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,667,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to eliminate the lunch co-pay for
students in grades kindergarten through third grade that are eligible
for reduced price lunch.
(15) $5,285,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $5,285,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for: (a) The meals for kids
program under RCW 28A.235.145 through 28A.235.155; (b) to eliminate the
breakfast co-pay for students eligible for reduced price lunch; and (c)
for additional assistance for school districts initiating a summer food
service program.
(16) $1,056,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,056,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the Washington reading corps.
The superintendent shall allocate reading corps members to low-performing schools and school districts that are implementing
comprehensive, proven, research-based reading programs. Two or more
schools may combine their Washington reading corps programs. Grants
provided under this section may be used by school districts for
expenditures from September 2009 through August 31, 2011.
(17) $3,594,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $3,594,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for grants to school districts to
provide a continuum of care for children and families to help children
become ready to learn. Grant proposals from school districts shall
contain local plans designed collaboratively with community service
providers. If a continuum of care program exists in the area in which
the school district is located, the local plan shall provide for
coordination with existing programs to the greatest extent possible.
Grant funds shall be allocated pursuant to RCW 70.190.040.
(18) $1,959,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,959,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for improving technology
infrastructure, monitoring and reporting on school district technology
development, promoting standards for school district technology,
promoting statewide coordination and planning for technology
development, and providing regional educational technology support
centers, including state support activities, under chapter 28A.650 RCW.
(19) $225,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $225,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the operation of the center
for the improvement of student learning pursuant to RCW 28A.300.130.
(20) $250,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for costs associated with the office
of the superintendent of public instruction's statewide director of
technology position.
(21)(a) $28,270,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $36,513,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the
following bonuses for teachers who hold valid, unexpired certification
from the national board for professional teaching standards and who are
teaching in a Washington public school, subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(i) For national board certified teachers, a bonus of $5,000 per
teacher beginning in the 2007-08 school year and adjusted for inflation
in each school year thereafter in which Initiative 732 cost of living
adjustments are provided. National board certified teachers who become
public school principals shall continue to receive this bonus for as
long as they are principals and maintain the national board
certification;
(ii) An additional $5,000 annual bonus shall be paid to national
board certified teachers who teach in either: (A) High schools where
at least 50 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for
federal free or reduced price lunch, (B) middle schools where at least
60 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free
or reduced price lunch, or (C) elementary schools where at least 70
percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or
reduced price lunch;
(iii) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to
ensure that national board certified teachers meet the qualifications
for bonuses under (a)(ii) of this subsection for less than one full
school year receive bonuses in a pro-rated manner; and
(iv) During the 2009-10 and 2010-11 school years, and within the
available appropriation, certificated instructional staff who have met
the eligibility requirements and have applied for certification from
the national board for professional teaching standards may receive a
conditional two thousand dollars or the amount set by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to contribute toward the current
assessment fee, not including the initial up-front candidacy payment.
The fee shall be an advance on the first annual bonus under RCW
28A.405.415. The assessment fee for national certification is provided
in addition to compensation received under a district's salary schedule
adopted in accordance with RCW 28A.405.200 and shall not be included in
calculations of a district's average salary and associated salary
limitation under RCW 28A.400.200. Recipients who fail to receive
certification after three years are required to repay the assessment
fee, not including the initial up-front candidacy payment, as set by
the national board for professional teaching standards and administered
by the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The office
of the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to define
the terms for initial grant of the assessment fee and repayment,
including applicable fees.
(b) Included in the amounts provided in this subsection are amounts
for mandatory fringe benefits.
(22) $2,750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $2,750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for secondary career and technical
education grants pursuant to chapter 170, Laws of 2008. This funding
may additionally be used to support FIRST Robotics programs.
(23) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the local farms-healthy kids
program as described in chapter 215, Laws of 2008.
(24) $2,348,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $2,348,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are appropriated for a beginning educator support
program. School districts and/or regional consortia may apply for
grant funding beginning in the 2009-10 school year. The superintendent
shall implement this program in 5 to 15 school districts and/or
regional consortia. The program provided by a district and/or regional
consortia shall include: A paid orientation; assignment of a qualified
mentor; development of a professional growth plan for each beginning
teacher aligned with professional certification; release time for
mentors and new teachers to work together, and teacher observation time
with accomplished peers. $250,000 may be used to provide state-wide
professional development opportunities for mentors and beginning
educators. The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules
to establish and operate a research-based beginning educator support
program no later than August 31, 2009. OSPI must evaluate the
program's progress and may contract for this work. A report to the
legislature about the beginning educator support program is due
November 1, 2010.
(25) $4,400,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the development and implementation
of diagnostic assessments, consistent with the recommendations of the
Washington assessment of student learning work group.
(26) $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5414 (statewide assessments and curricula).
(27) $530,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $530,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the leadership internship
program for superintendents, principals, and program administrators.

(End of part)

PART VI
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 A new section is added to 2009 c 564
(uncodified) to read as follows:
NEW HIRES. (1) From the effective date of this section until July
1, 2011, state agencies of the legislative, executive, and judicial
branches shall not establish new staff positions or fill vacant
existing staff positions except as specifically authorized by this
section.
(2) The following activities of state agencies are exempt from
subsection (1) of this section:
(a) Direct custody, supervision, and patient care in corrections,
juvenile rehabilitation, institutional care of veterans, the mentally
ill, developmentally disabled, state hospitals, the special commitment
center, and the schools for the blind and the deaf;
(b) Direct protective services to children and other vulnerable
populations in the department of social and health services;
(c) Washington state patrol investigative services and field
enforcement;
(d) Hazardous materials response and emergency cleanup;
(e) Emergency public health and patient safety response and the
public health laboratory;
(f) Military operations and emergency management within the
military department;
(g) Firefighting;
(h) Enforcement officers in the department of fish and wildlife,
the liquor control board, the gambling commission, and the department
of natural resources;
(i) Park rangers at the parks and recreation commission;
(j) Seasonal employment by natural resources agencies to the extent
that employment levels do not exceed the prior fiscal year;
(k) Seasonal employment in the department of transportation
maintenance programs to the extent that employment levels do not exceed
the prior fiscal year;
(l) Employees hired on a seasonal basis by the department of
agriculture for inspection and certification of agricultural products
and for insect detection;
(m) Activities directly related to tax and fee collection, revenue
generation, auditing, and recovery;
(n) In institutions of higher education, any positions directly
related to academic programs, as well as positions not funded from
state funds or tuition, positions that are filled by enrolled students
at their own institution as student workers, positions in campus police
and security, positions related to emergency management and response,
and positions related to student health care and counseling;
(o) Operations of the state lottery and liquor control board
business enterprises;
(p) The unemployment insurance program of the employment security
department; and
(q) Activities that are necessary to receive or maintain federal
funds by the state.
(3) The exemptions specified in subsection (2) of this section do
not require the establishment of new staff positions or the filling of
vacant staff positions in the activities specified.
(4) Exceptions to this section may be granted under section 605 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 A new section is added to 2009 c 564
(uncodified) to read as follows:
NEW PERSONAL SERVICES CONTRACTS. (1) From the effective date of
this section until July 1, 2011, state agencies of the legislative,
executive, and judicial branches shall not enter into any contracts or
other agreements entered into for the acquisition of personal services
not related to an emergency or other catastrophic event that requires
government action to protect life or public safety.
(2) This section does not apply to personal services contracts or
other agreements for the acquisition of personal services where the
costs are funded exclusively from private or federal grants, where the
costs are for tax and fee collection, where the costs are for revenue
generation and auditing activities, where the costs are necessary to
receive or maintain federal funds by the state, or, in institutions of
higher education, where the costs are not funded from state funds or
tuition. This section also does not apply where costs are related to
hearing officers, where costs are related to real estate appraisals or
habitat assessments, where costs are related to carrying out a court
order, or where costs are related to information technology contracts
related to an information services board approved information
technology project, or where costs are related to judicial information
system technology projects.
(3) Exceptions to this section may be granted under section 605 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 A new section is added to 2009 c 564
(uncodified) to read as follows:
EQUIPMENT PURCHASES. (1) From the effective date of this section
until July 1, 2011, state agencies of the legislative, executive, and
judicial branches shall not enter into any contracts or other
agreements for the acquisition of any item of equipment the cost of
which exceeds five thousand dollars and is not related to an emergency
or other catastrophic event that requires government action to protect
life or public safety.
(2) This section does not apply to the unemployment insurance
program of the employment security department, to costs that are for
tax and fee collection, for revenue generation and audit activities, or
for receiving or maintaining federal funds by the state, or, in
institutions of higher education, to costs not funded from state funds
or tuition. This section also does not apply to costs that are funded
exclusively from private or federal grants, or for equipment necessary
to complete a project funded in the omnibus capital or transportation
appropriation acts, or the operational divisions of the department of
information services, or cost related to the continuation, renewal, or
establishment of maintenance for existing computer software licensing
and existing computer hardware, or for costs related to the judicial
information system.
(3) Exceptions to this section may be granted under section 605 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604 A new section is added to 2009 c 564
(uncodified) to read as follows:
STATE EMPLOYEE TRAVEL AND TRAINING. (1) State agencies of the
legislative, executive, and judicial branches shall not make
expenditures for the cost or reimbursement of out-of-state travel or
out-of-state training by state employees where the travel or training
is not related to an emergency or other catastrophic event that
requires government action to protect life or public safety, or direct
service delivery, and the travel or training occurs after the effective
date of this section and before July 1, 2011.
(2) This section does not apply to travel expenditures when the
costs are funded exclusively from private or federal grants. This
section does not apply to the unemployment insurance program of the
employment security department, to costs that are for tax and fee
collection, for revenue generation and audit activities, or for
receiving or maintaining federal funds by the state, or, in
institutions of higher education, to costs not funded from state funds
or tuition. This section also does not apply to costs related to
carrying out a court order or to costs to travel by air into Washington
state from any airport located in a contiguous state of which the
largest city is part of a metropolitan statistical area with a city
located in Washington state, or to motor vehicle and parking costs for
single day travel to a contiguous state or British Columbia, Canada.
(3) Exceptions to this section may be granted under section 605 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605 A new section is added to 2009 c 564
(uncodified) to read as follows:
EXCEPTIONS. (1) Exceptions to sections 601 through 604 of this act
may be granted for the critically necessary work of an agency as
provided in this section.
(2) For agencies of the executive branch, the exceptions shall be
subject to approval by the director of financial management. For
agencies of the judicial branch, the exceptions shall be subject to
approval of the chief justice of the supreme court. For the house of
representatives and the senate, the exceptions shall be subject to
approval of the chief clerk of the house of representatives and the
secretary of the senate, respectively, under the direction of the
senate committee on facilities and operations and the executive rules
committee of the house of representatives. For other legislative
agencies, the exceptions shall be subject to approval of both the chief
clerk of the house of representatives and the secretary of the senate
under the direction of the senate committee on facilities and
operations and the executive rules committee of the house of
representatives.
(3) Exceptions approved under subsection (2) of this section shall
take effect no sooner than five business days following notification of
the chair and ranking minority member of the ways and means committees
in the house of representatives and the senate. The person approving
exceptions under subsection (2) of this section shall send the
exceptions to the legislature for consideration every thirty days from
the effective date of this section, or earlier should volume or
circumstances so necessitate.
(4) Exceptions approved and taking effect under this section shall
be published electronically at least quarterly by the office of
financial management on the state fiscal web site.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 606 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 607 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately, except for sections 601 through 605 of this act which take
effect thirty days after the effective date of this act.

(End of part)

INDEX PAGE #

ATTORNEY GENERAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
BOARD OF TAX APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
CONSERVATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 77
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE . . . . . . . . . . . . 81
DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 65
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 70
DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 77
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 60
DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 15
DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING . . . . . . . . . . . . 84
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 59
AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 40
ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 49
CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 19
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 34
ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 45
JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 25
MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 49
MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
SPECIAL COMMITMENT PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 58
VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 58
ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
GROWTH MANAGEMENT HEARINGS BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 60
INDETERMINATE SENTENCE REVIEW BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 60
MILITARY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 16
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP . . . . . . . . . . . . 82
SECRETARY OF STATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 1
SENTENCING GUIDELINES COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 68
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 76
STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 85
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 87
--- END ---