BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.32.180 and 1999 c 364 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every person licensed to practice dentistry in this state shall
renew his or her license and comply with administrative procedures,
administrative requirements, continuing education requirements, and
fees as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. The commission, in
its sole discretion, may permit the applicant to be licensed without
examination, and with or without conditions, if it is satisfied that
the applicant meets all the requirements for licensure in this state
and is competent to engage in the practice of dentistry.
(2) The commission shall provide a grace period of thirty days to
any person licensed to practice dentistry under this chapter who fails
to renew his or her license by his or her renewal date. The commission
shall provide the grace period only if the person has complied with all
of the other requirements for renewal other than submission of the
requisite paperwork and fees. During the grace period, the commission
may not suspend or revoke the person's license.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By December 31, 2010, the commission shall retroactively
relicense any person whose license was suspended or revoked during the
twelve months prior to the effective date of this section if:
(a) The suspension or revocation was because of the person's
failure to renew his or her license;
(b) The person would have qualified for the grace period
established in RCW 18.32.180(2); and
(c) The person renewed his or her license within the grace period.
(2) The commission shall alter its records to reflect any
relicensing under this section.
(3) This section expires January 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
For purposes of payment, a carrier shall treat a licensed dentist
who has utilized the grace period established in RCW 18.32.180, or who
has been relicensed under section 2 of this act, as if the dentist had
renewed his or her license by his or her renewal date.

--- END ---