BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.21.420 and 1965 c 7 s 35.21.420 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any city owning and operating a public utility and having
facilities for the generation of electricity located in a county other
than that in which the city is located, may provide for the public
peace, health, safety and welfare of such county as concerns the
facilities and the personnel employed in connection therewith, by
contributing to the support of the county government of any such county
and enter into contracts with any such county therefor.
(2)(a) Any city with a population greater than five hundred
thousand people owning and operating a public utility and having
facilities for the generation of electricity located in a county other
than that in which the city is located, must provide for the impacts of
lost revenue and the public peace, health, safety, and welfare of such
county as concerns the facilities and the personnel employed in
connection therewith, by contributing to the support of the county,
city, or town government and school district of any such county and
enter into contracts with any such county therefor as specified in RCW
35.21.425.
(b)(i) In the event the contract between a county and the governing
body of a city with a population greater than five hundred thousand
people authorized or required under this section expires prior to the
adoption of a new contract between the parties, the city must continue
to make compensatory payments to the affected county pursuant to the
terms of the most recent expired contract until such time as a new
contract is entered into by the parties.
(ii) In the event a contract entered into under subsection (1) of
this section between a county and the governing body of a city with a
population greater than five hundred thousand people expired prior to
the effective date of this act, the city shall be indebted to the
county for any resulting arrearage accruing from the time of the
expiration of the contract until such time as a new contract is entered
into by the parties. The dollar amount of such arrearage shall be
calculated retroactively by reference to the payment terms set forth in
the most recent expired compensation contract between the city and the
county.
(c) In the event the contract between a county and any city with a
population greater than five hundred thousand people owning and
operating a public utility and having facilities for the generation of
electricity located in a county other than that in which the city is
located expires and the parties are unable to reach agreement within
six months of such expiration, then the parties shall follow the
arbitration procedures as provided in RCW 35.21.426. The city and/or
the municipal utility shall be responsible for all arbitration costs.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.21.425 and 1965 c 7 s 35.21.425 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, whenever
after March 17, 1955, any city shall construct hydroelectric generating
facilities or acquire land for the purpose of constructing the same in
a county other than the county in which such city is located, and by
reason of such construction or acquisition shall (1) cause loss of
revenue and/or place a financial burden in providing for the public
peace, health, safety, welfare, and added road maintenance in such
county, in addition to road construction or relocation as set forth in
RCW 90.28.010 and/or (2) shall cause any loss of revenues and/or
increase the financial burden of any school district affected by the
construction because of an increase in the number of pupils by reason
of the construction or the operation of said generating facilities, the
city shall enter into an agreement with said county and/or the
particular school district or districts affected for the payment of
moneys to recompense such losses or to provide for such increased
financial burden, upon such terms and conditions as may be mutually
agreeable to the city and the county and/or school district or
districts.
(2)(a) Whenever after March 17, 1955, a municipal owned utility
located in a city with a population greater than five hundred thousand
people constructs or operates hydroelectric generating facilities or
acquires land for the purpose of constructing or operating the same in
a county other than the county in which the city is located must enter
into an agreement with the county affected for the annual payment of
moneys to recompense such losses, as provided under RCW 35.21.425.
(b)(i) In the event the agreement between a county and the
governing body of either a city with a population greater than five
hundred thousand people or a municipal utility owned by a city with a
population greater than five hundred thousand people, as required under
this section, expires prior to the adoption of a new agreement between
the parties, the city or utility must continue to make compensatory
payments to the affected county pursuant to the terms of the most
recent expired agreement until such time as a new agreement is entered
into by the parties.
(ii) In the event an agreement entered into under subsection (1) of
this section between a county and the governing body of a city with a
population greater than five hundred thousand people expired prior to
the effective date of this act, the city shall be indebted to the
county for any resulting arrearage accruing from the time of the
expiration of the agreement until such time as a new agreement is
entered into by the parties. The dollar amount of such arrearage shall
be calculated retroactively by reference to the payment terms set forth
in the most recent expired compensation agreement between the city and
the county.
(c) In the event the agreement required between a county and the
governing body of either a city with a population greater than five
hundred thousand people or a municipal utility owned by a city with a
population greater than five hundred thousand people expires, or has
expired prior to the effective date of this act, and the parties are
unable to reach agreement within six months of such expiration, then
the parties shall follow the arbitration procedures as provided in RCW
35.21.426. The city and/or the municipal utility shall be responsible
for all arbitration costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---