BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.47A.110 and 2008 c 143 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The health insurance partnership board shall:
(a) Develop policies for enrollment of small employers in the
partnership, including minimum participation rules for small employer
groups. The small employer shall determine the criteria for
eligibility and enrollment in his or her plan and the terms and amounts
of the employer's contributions to that plan, consistent with any
minimum employer premium contribution level established by the board
under (d) of this subsection;
(b) Designate health benefit plans that are currently offered in
the small group market that will be offered to participating small
employers through the health insurance partnership and those plans that
will qualify for premium subsidy payments. Up to five health benefit
plans shall be chosen, with multiple deductible and point-of-service
cost-sharing options. The health benefit plans shall range from
catastrophic to comprehensive coverage, and one health benefit plan
shall be a high deductible health plan accompanied by a health savings
account. The board shall offer a direct patient-provider primary care
practice as defined in RCW 48.150.010 that includes a wraparound
insurance plan approved by the insurance commissioner to small
employers through the partnership. Every effort shall be made to
include health benefit plans that include components to maximize the
quality of care provided and result in improved health outcomes, such
as preventive care, wellness incentives, chronic care management
services, and provider network development and payment policies related
to quality of care;
(c) Approve a mid-range benefit plan from those selected to be used
as a benchmark plan for calculating premium subsidies;
(d) Determine whether there should be a minimum employer premium
contribution on behalf of employees, and if so, how much;
(e) Develop policies related to partnership participant enrollment
in health benefit plans. The board may focus its initial efforts on
access to coverage and affordability of coverage for participating
small employers and their employees. To the extent necessary for
successful implementation of the partnership, during a start-up phase
of partnership operation, the board may:
(i) Limit partnership participant health benefit plan choice; and
(ii) Offer former employees of participating small employers the
opportunity to continue coverage after separation from employment to
the extent that a former employee is eligible for continuation coverage
under 29 U.S.C. Sec. 1161 et seq.
The start-up phase may not exceed two years from the date the
partnership begins to offer coverage;
(f) Determine appropriate health benefit plan rating methodologies.
The methodologies shall be based on the small group adjusted community
rate as defined in Title 48 RCW. The board shall evaluate the impact
of applying the small group adjusted community rating methodology to
health benefit plans purchased through the partnership on the principle
of allowing each partnership participant to choose his or her health
benefit plan, and may implement one or more risk adjustment or
reinsurance mechanisms to reduce uncertainty for carriers and provide
for efficient risk management of high-cost enrollees;
(g) Determine whether the partnership should be designated as the
administrator of a participating small employer health benefit plan and
undertake the obligations required of a plan administrator under
federal law in order to minimize administrative burdens on
participating small employers;
(h) Conduct analyses and provide recommendations as requested by
the legislature and the governor, with the assistance of staff from the
health care authority and the office of the insurance commissioner.
(2) The board may authorize one or more limited health care service
plans for dental care services to be offered by limited health care
service contractors under RCW 48.44.035. However, such plan shall not
qualify for subsidy payments.
(3) In fulfilling the requirements of this section, the board shall
consult with small employers, the office of the insurance commissioner,
members in good standing of the American academy of actuaries, health
carriers, agents and brokers, and employees of small business.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.47A.020 and 2008 c 143 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Administrator" means the administrator of the Washington state
health care authority, established under chapter 41.05 RCW.
(2) "Board" means the health insurance partnership board
established in RCW 70.47A.100.
(3) "Eligible partnership participant" means a partnership
participant who:
(a) Is a resident of the state of Washington; and
(b) Has family income that does not exceed two hundred percent of
the federal poverty level, as determined annually by the federal
department of health and human services.
(4) "Health benefit plan" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
48.43.005, and shall include wraparound insurance plans approved by the
insurance commissioner in which the primary care is provided by a
direct patient-provider primary care practice, as defined in RCW
48.150.010.
(5) "Participating small employer" means a small employer that has
entered into an agreement with the partnership to purchase health
benefits through the partnership. To participate in the partnership,
an employer must attest to the fact that (a) the employer does not
currently offer health insurance to its employees, and (b) at least
fifty percent of the employer's employees are low-wage workers.
(6) "Partnership" means the health insurance partnership
established in RCW 70.47A.030.
(7) "Partnership participant" means a participating small employer
and employees of a participating small employer, and, except to the
extent provided otherwise in RCW 70.47A.110(1)(e), a former employee of
a participating small employer who chooses to continue receiving
coverage through the partnership following separation from employment.
(8) "Small employer" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
48.43.005.
(9) "Subsidy" or "premium subsidy" means payment or reimbursement
to an eligible partnership participant toward the purchase of a health
benefit plan, and may include a net billing arrangement with insurance
carriers and direct patient-provider primary care practices or a
prospective or retrospective payment for health benefit plan premiums,
including direct patient-provider primary care practice direct fees if
the health benefit plan is composed of a wraparound insurance plan
which is used with a direct patient-provider primary care practice to
provide primary care.

--- END ---