BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The joint administrative rules review
committee, a bipartisan committee of the legislature made up of members
from both caucuses and both chambers of the legislature serves as a
watchdog for the citizens of the state to ensure that agency rules are
adopted in accordance with all applicable provisions of law and are
consistent with legislative intent.
(2) Typically, concerns related to proposed or adopted rules are
resolved informally, through discussions with agency staff. On
occasion, however, concerns regarding agency rules are either not able
to be resolved at the staff level or are sufficiently complex or
significant to necessitate a rules review committee hearing or work
session. On rare occasions, the rules review committee makes an
adverse finding or findings against an agency as it relates to adopted
or proposed rules. It is unprecedented for a majority of the rules
review committee to find that an agency has failed to adequately
respond to a formal request by the rules review committee for
additional information consistent with statutory requirements.
(3) The legislature finds that the rules review committee provides
an important service; and further finds that when a majority of the
committee expresses concerns that are not adequately addressed or
resolved by the agency this must serve as a red flag for the
legislature. It is the intent of the legislature to recognize the
concerns of the rules review committee by requiring an affirmative
action of the legislature to approve agency rules in response to
certain adverse findings of the rules review committee.

Sec. 2 RCW 34.05.640 and 1998 c 21 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Within seven days of an agency hearing held after notification
of the agency by the rules review committee pursuant to RCW 34.05.620
or 34.05.630, the affected agency shall notify the committee of its
intended action on a proposed or existing rule to which the committee
objected or on a committee finding of the agency's failure to adopt
rules.
(2) If the rules review committee finds by a majority vote of its
members: (a) That the proposed or existing rule in question will not
be modified, amended, withdrawn, or repealed by the agency so as to
conform with the intent of the legislature, (b) that an existing rule
was not adopted in accordance with all applicable provisions of law, or
(c) that the agency will not replace the policy or interpretive
statement, guideline, or document that is of general applicability, or
its equivalent, with a rule, the rules review committee may, within
thirty days from notification by the agency of its intended action,
file with the code reviser notice of its objections together with a
concise statement of the reasons therefor. Such notice and statement
shall also be provided to the agency by the rules review committee.
(3)(a) If the rules review committee makes an adverse finding
regarding an existing rule under subsection (2)(a) or (b) of this
section, the committee may, by a majority vote of its members,
recommend suspension of the rule. Within seven days of such vote the
committee shall transmit to the appropriate standing committees of the
legislature, the governor, the code reviser, and the agency written
notice of its objection and recommended suspension and the concise
reasons therefor. Within thirty days of receipt of the notice, the
governor shall transmit to the committee, the code reviser, and the
agency written approval or disapproval of the recommended suspension.
If the suspension is approved by the governor, it is effective from the
date of that approval and continues until ninety days after the
expiration of the next regular legislative session.
(b) If the rules review committee makes an adverse finding
regarding a policy or interpretive statement, guideline, or document
that is of general applicability, or its equivalent, under subsection
(2)(c) of this section, the committee may, by a majority vote of its
members, advise the governor of its finding.
(4) If the rules review committee finds by majority vote that
agency rules have not been adopted in accordance with all procedures of
law; that an agency failed to adequately respond to the rules review
committee's written request for additional information required by
statute; or that proposed or existing rules will not be modified,
amended, withdrawn, or repealed by the agency so as to conform with the
intent of the legislature, the legislature must affirmatively approve
the subject proposed or adopted rules, or direct the agency to modify
its rules, at the next regular session following the date of the rules
review committee's findings.
(5) The code reviser shall publish transmittals from the rules
review committee or the governor issued pursuant to subsection (2) or
(3) of this section in the Washington state register and shall publish
in the next supplement and compilation of the Washington Administrative
Code a reference to the committee's objection or recommended suspension
and the governor's action on it and to the issue of the Washington
state register in which the full text thereof appears.
(((5))) (6) The reference shall be removed from a rule published in
the Washington Administrative Code if a subsequent adjudicatory
proceeding determines that the rule is within the intent of the
legislature or was adopted in accordance with all applicable laws,
whichever was the objection of the rules review committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act applies retroactively to all
actions of the joint administrative rules review committee taken
subsequent to the 2009 legislative session.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---