BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.56.870 and 2009 c 472 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The initial imposition of tolls on the state route number 520
corridor is authorized, the state route number 520 corridor is
designated an eligible toll facility, and toll revenue generated in the
corridor must only be expended as allowed under RCW 47.56.820.
(2) The state route number 520 corridor consists of that portion of
state route number 520 between the junctions of Interstate 5 and state
route number 202. The toll imposed by this section shall be charged
only for travel on the floating bridge portion of the state route
number 520 corridor.
(3)(a) In setting the toll rates for the corridor pursuant to RCW
47.56.850, the tolling authority shall set a variable schedule of toll
rates to maintain travel time, speed, and reliability on the corridor
and generate the necessary revenue as required under (b) of this
subsection.
(b) The tolling authority shall initially set the variable schedule
of toll rates, which the tolling authority may adjust at least annually
to reflect inflation as measured by the consumer price index or as
necessary to meet the redemption of bonds and interest payments on the
bonds, to generate revenue sufficient to provide for:
(i) The issuance of general obligation bonds first payable from
toll revenue and then excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels
pledged for the payment of those bonds in the amount necessary to fund
the ((replacement state route number 520 floating bridge and necessary
landings)) state route number 520 bridge replacement and HOV program,
subject to subsection (4) of this section; and
(ii) Costs associated with the project designated in subsection (4)
of this section that are eligible under RCW 47.56.820.
(4) The proceeds of the bonds designated in subsection (3)(b)(i) of
this section((, which together with other appropriated and identified
state and federal funds is sufficient to pay for the replacement of the
floating bridge segment and necessary landings of state route number
520,)) must be used only to fund the ((construction of the replacement
state route number 520 floating bridge and necessary landings)) state
route number 520 bridge replacement and HOV program.
(5) The department may carry out the ((construction and))
improvements designated in subsection (4) of this section and
administer the tolling program on the state route number 520 corridor.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.56.875 and 2009 c 472 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
A special account to be known as the state route number 520
corridor account is created in the state treasury.
(1) Deposits to the account must include:
(a) All proceeds of bonds issued for ((construction of the
replacement state route number 520 floating bridge and necessary
landings)) the state route number 520 bridge replacement and HOV
program, including any capitalized interest;
(b) All of the tolls and other revenues received from the operation
of the state route number 520 corridor as a toll facility, to be
deposited at least monthly;
(c) Any interest that may be earned from the deposit or investment
of those revenues;
(d) Notwithstanding RCW 47.12.063, proceeds from the sale of any
surplus real property acquired for the ((purpose of building the
replacement state route number 520 floating bridge and necessary
landings)) state route number 520 bridge replacement and HOV program;
and
(e) All damages, liquidated or otherwise, collected under any
contract involving the ((construction of the replacement state route
number 520 floating bridge and necessary landings)) state route number
520 bridge replacement and HOV program.
(2) Subject to the covenants made by the state in the bond
proceedings authorizing the issuance and sale of bonds for the
((replacement state route number 520 floating bridge and necessary
landings)) state route number 520 bridge replacement and HOV program,
toll charges, other revenues, and interest received from the operation
of the state route number 520 corridor as a toll facility may be used
to:
(a) Pay any required costs allowed under RCW 47.56.820; and
(b) Repay amounts to the motor vehicle fund as required.
(3) When repaying the motor vehicle fund, the state treasurer shall
transfer funds from the state route number 520 corridor account to the
motor vehicle fund on or before each debt service date for bonds issued
for the ((replacement state route number 520 floating bridge project
and necessary landings)) state route number 520 bridge replacement and
HOV program in an amount sufficient to repay the motor vehicle fund for
amounts transferred from that fund to the highway bond retirement fund
to provide for any bond principal and interest due on that date. The
state treasurer may establish subaccounts for the purpose of
segregating toll charges, bond sale proceeds, and other revenues.

--- END ---