BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that encouraging
outstanding students to enter the teaching profession is of paramount
importance to the state of Washington. It is incumbent on policy
leaders to employ bold strategies to attract sufficient qualified
persons into teaching, to alter the environment of schools, and to
create the schools that would prepare Washington's students for the
economic and social conditions the state will face in the twenty-first
century. The legislature therefore intends to expand the future
teachers conditional scholarship and loan repayment program and the
alternative routes to certification program to assist in the effort to
recruit our most talented students into the teaching profession.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.102.040 and 2008 c 170 s 306 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board may select participants based on an application
process conducted by the board or the board may utilize selection
processes for similar students in cooperation with the professional
educator standards board or the office of the superintendent of public
instruction.
(2) If the board selects participants for the program, it shall
establish a selection committee for screening and selecting recipients
of the conditional scholarships. The criteria shall emphasize factors
demonstrating excellence including but not limited to superior
scholastic achievement, leadership ability, community contributions,
bilingual ability, willingness to commit to providing teaching service
in shortage areas, and an ability to act as a role model for students.
Priority will be given to individuals seeking certification or an
additional endorsement in math, including any specialty endorsements in
math approved by the professional educator standards board, science,
technology education, agricultural education, business and marketing
education, family and consumer science education, or special education.
Priority shall also be given to individuals who can serve as role
models to students and possess the skills, knowledge, commitment, and
background that will make them uniquely qualified to help schools
succeed in addressing the achievement gap.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.102.050 and 2004 c 58 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The board may award conditional scholarships ((or)) and
provide loan repayments to eligible participants from the funds
appropriated to the board for this purpose, or from any private
donations, or any other funds given to the board for this program.
(b) The amount of the conditional scholarship or loan repayment
awarded an individual shall not exceed the amount of tuition and fees
at the institution of higher education attended by the participant or
resident undergraduate tuition and fees at the University of Washington
per academic year for a full-time student, whichever is lower.
Participants are eligible to receive conditional scholarships or loan
repayments for a maximum of ((five)) two years.
(c) Beginning in the 2013-14 academic year, the board may award
conditional scholarships and provide loan repayments not to exceed the
total cost of attendance at the institution attended by the participant
per academic year up to fifteen thousand dollars.
(2) Beginning in the 2013-14 academic year, conditional
scholarships or loan repayments may be awarded in addition to other
student financial assistance awards including the alternative routes to
teacher certification conditional scholarship program under RCW
28A.660.050.
(3) Conditional scholarships may be used for any educational
expense including room and board, transportation, books and supplies,
and miscellaneous personal expenses.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.102.055 and 2004 c 58 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon documentation of federal student loan indebtedness, the
board may enter into agreements with participants to repay all or part
of a federal student loan in exchange for teaching service in an
approved educational program. The ratio of loan repayment to years of
teaching service for the loan repayment program shall be the same as
established for the conditional scholarship program.
(2) The agreement shall specify the period of time it is in effect
and detail the obligations of the board and the participant, including
the amount to be paid to the participant. The agreement may also
specify the geographic location and subject matter area of teaching
service for which loan repayment will be provided.
(3) At the end of each school year, a participant under this
section shall provide evidence to the board that the requisite teaching
service has been provided. Upon receipt of the evidence, the board
shall pay the participant the agreed-upon amount for one year of full-time teaching service or a prorated amount for less than full-time
teaching service. To qualify for additional loan repayments, the
participant must be engaged in continuous teaching service as defined
by the board.
(4) The board may, at its discretion, arrange to make the loan
repayment directly to the holder of the participant's federal student
loan.
(5) The board's obligations to a participant under this section
shall cease when:
(a) The terms of the agreement have been fulfilled;
(b) The participant fails to maintain continuous teaching service
as determined by the board; or
(c) All of the participant's federal student loans have been
repaid.
(6) The board shall adopt rules governing loan repayments,
including approved leaves of absence from continuous teaching service
and other deferments as may be necessary.
(7) Beginning in the 2013-14 academic year, the board shall
annually provide up to three thousand dollars of supplemental payments
of federal student loans. Supplemental payments may be made over a
period of ten years or until the total loan repayment award amount has
been paid, whichever occurs first. Repayment shall commence upon
documentation of federal student loan indebtedness and completion of
the first year of required teaching service.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.660.050 and 2009 c 539 s 3 and 2009 c 192 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for these
purposes, the conditional scholarship programs in this chapter are
created under the following guidelines:
(1) The programs shall be administered by the higher education
coordinating board. In administering the programs, the higher
education coordinating board has the following powers and duties:
(a) To adopt necessary rules and develop guidelines to administer
the programs;
(b) To collect and manage repayments from participants who do not
meet their service obligations; and
(c) To accept grants and donations from public and private sources
for the programs.
(2) Requirements for participation in the conditional scholarship
programs are as provided in this subsection (2).
(a) The alternative route conditional scholarship program is
limited to interns of the partnership grant programs under RCW
28A.660.040. In order to receive conditional scholarship awards,
recipients shall:
(i) Be accepted and maintain enrollment in alternative
certification routes through the partnership grant program;
(ii) Continue to make satisfactory progress toward completion of
the alternative route certification program and receipt of a residency
teaching certificate; and
(iii) Receive no more than the annual amount of the scholarship,
not to exceed eight thousand dollars, for the cost of tuition, fees,
and educational expenses, including books, supplies, and transportation
for the alternative route certification program in which the recipient
is enrolled. The board may adjust the annual award by the average rate
of resident undergraduate tuition and fee increases at the state
universities as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.
(b) The pipeline for paraeducators conditional scholarship program
is limited to qualified paraeducators as provided by RCW 28A.660.042.
In order to receive conditional scholarship awards, recipients shall:
(i) Be accepted and maintain enrollment at a community and
technical college for no more than two years and attain an associate of
arts degree;
(ii) Continue to make satisfactory progress toward completion of an
associate of arts degree. This progress requirement is a condition for
eligibility into a route one program of the alternative routes to
teacher certification program for a mathematics, special education, or
English as a second language endorsement; and
(iii) Receive no more than the annual amount of the scholarship,
not to exceed four thousand dollars, for the cost of tuition, fees, and
educational expenses, including books, supplies, and transportation for
the alternative route certification program in which the recipient is
enrolled. The board may adjust the annual award by the average rate of
tuition and fee increases at the state community and technical
colleges.
(c) The retooling to teach mathematics and science conditional
scholarship program is limited to current K-12 teachers and individuals
having an elementary education certificate but who are not employed in
positions requiring an elementary education certificate as provided by
RCW 28A.660.045. In order to receive conditional scholarship awards:
(i) Individuals currently employed as teachers shall pursue a
middle level mathematics or science, or secondary mathematics or
science endorsement; or
(ii) Individuals who are certificated with an elementary education
endorsement, but not employed in positions requiring an elementary
education certificate, shall pursue an endorsement in middle level
mathematics or science, or both; and
(iii) Individuals shall use one of the pathways to endorsement
processes to receive a mathematics or science endorsement, or both,
which shall include passing a mathematics or science endorsement test,
or both tests, plus observation and completing applicable coursework to
attain the proper endorsement; and
(iv) Individuals shall receive no more than the annual amount of
the scholarship, not to exceed three thousand dollars, for the cost of
tuition, test fees, and educational expenses, including books,
supplies, and transportation for the endorsement pathway being pursued.
(3) The Washington professional educator standards board shall
select individuals to receive conditional scholarships and loan
repayments. In selecting recipients, preference shall be given to
eligible veterans or national guard members. Priority consideration
shall also be given to those individuals seeking endorsements,
including specialty endorsements, in mathematics and to individuals who
can serve as role models to students and possess the skills, knowledge,
commitment, and background that will make them uniquely qualified to
help schools succeed in addressing the achievement gap.
(4) For the purpose of this chapter, a conditional scholarship is
a loan that is forgiven in whole or in part in exchange for service as
a certificated teacher employed in a Washington state K-12 public
school. The state shall forgive one year of loan obligation for every
two years a recipient teaches in a public school. Recipients who fail
to continue a course of study leading to residency teacher
certification or cease to teach in a public school in the state of
Washington in their endorsement area are required to repay the
remaining loan principal with interest.
(5) Recipients who fail to fulfill the required teaching obligation
are required to repay the remaining loan principal with interest and
any other applicable fees. The higher education coordinating board
shall adopt rules to define the terms for repayment, including
applicable interest rates, fees, and deferments.
(6) The higher education coordinating board may deposit all
appropriations, collections, and any other funds received for the
program in this chapter in the future teachers conditional scholarship
account authorized in RCW 28B.102.080.
(7) Beginning in the 2013-14 academic year, the higher education
coordinating board may provide loan repayment to interns of the
partnership grant programs under RCW 28A.660.040. The board shall
annually provide up to three thousand dollars of supplemental payments
of federal student loans. Supplemental payments may be made over a
period of ten years, or until the total loan repayment award amount has
been paid, whichever occurs first. Supplemental payments shall begin
after degree completion and the completion of required teaching
service. The amount of the loan repayment provided an individual shall
not exceed the cost of attendance at the institution of higher
education attended by the participant or fifteen thousand dollars per
academic year, whichever is lower.

--- END ---