BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.102.020 and 2009 c 267 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Annual state contribution limit" means seven million five
hundred thousand dollars statewide per fiscal year.
(2) "Assessed value" means the valuation of taxable real property
as placed on the last completed assessment roll.
(3) "Board" means the community economic revitalization board under
chapter 43.160 RCW.
(4) "Demonstration project" means one of the following projects:
(a) Bellingham waterfront redevelopment project;
(b) Spokane river district project at Liberty Lake; and
(c) Vancouver riverwest project.
(5) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(6) "Fiscal year" means the twelve-month period beginning July 1st
and ending the following June 30th.
(7) "Local excise tax allocation revenue" means an amount of local
excise taxes equal to some or all of the sponsoring local government's
local excise tax increment, amounts of local excise taxes equal to some
or all of any participating local government's excise tax increment as
agreed upon in the written agreement under RCW 39.102.080(1), or both,
and dedicated to local infrastructure financing.
(8) "Local excise tax increment" means an amount equal to the
estimated annual increase in local excise taxes in each calendar year
following the approval of the revenue development area by the board
from taxable activity within the revenue development area, as set forth
in the application provided to the board under RCW 39.102.040, and
updated in accordance with RCW 39.102.140(1)(f).
(9) "Local excise taxes" means local revenues derived from the
imposition of sales and use taxes authorized in RCW 82.14.030.
(10) "Local government" means any city, town, county, port
district, and any federally recognized Indian tribe.
(11) "Local infrastructure financing" means the use of revenues
received from local excise tax allocation revenues, local property tax
allocation revenues, other revenues from local public sources, and
revenues received from the local option sales and use tax authorized in
RCW 82.14.475, dedicated to pay either the principal and interest on
bonds authorized under RCW 39.102.150 or to pay public improvement
costs on a pay-as-you-go basis subject to RCW 39.102.195, or both.
(12) "Local property tax allocation revenue" means those tax
revenues derived from the receipt of regular property taxes levied on
the property tax allocation revenue value and used for local
infrastructure financing.
(13) "Low-income housing" means residential housing for low-income
persons or families who lack the means which is necessary to enable
them, without financial assistance, to live in decent, safe, and
sanitary dwellings, without overcrowding. For the purposes of this
subsection, "low income" means income that does not exceed eighty
percent of the median family income for the standard metropolitan
statistical area in which the revenue development area is located.
(14) "Ordinance" means any appropriate method of taking legislative
action by a local government.
(15) "Participating local government" means a local government
having a revenue development area within its geographic boundaries that
has entered into a written agreement with a sponsoring local government
as provided in RCW 39.102.080 to allow the use of all or some of its
local excise tax allocation revenues or other revenues from local
public sources dedicated for local infrastructure financing.
(16) "Participating taxing district" means a local government
having a revenue development area within its geographic boundaries that
has entered into a written agreement with a sponsoring local government
as provided in RCW 39.102.080 to allow the use of some or all of its
local property tax allocation revenues or other revenues from local
public sources dedicated for local infrastructure financing.
(17) "Property tax allocation revenue base value" means the
assessed value of real property located within a revenue development
area less the property tax allocation revenue value.
(18)(a)(i) "Property tax allocation revenue value" means
seventy-five percent of any increase in the assessed value of real
property in a revenue development area resulting from:
(A) The placement of new construction, improvements to property, or
both, on the assessment roll, where the new construction and
improvements are initiated after the revenue development area is
approved by the board;
(B) The cost of new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements, when such cost is treated as new
construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW as provided in RCW
84.14.020, and the new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements are initiated after the revenue development
area is approved by the board;
(C) The cost of rehabilitation of historic property, when such cost
is treated as new construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW as
provided in RCW 84.26.070, and the rehabilitation is initiated after
the revenue development area is approved by the board.
(ii) Increases in the assessed value of real property in a revenue
development area resulting from (a)(i)(A) through (C) of this
subsection are included in the property tax allocation revenue value in
the initial year. These same amounts are also included in the property
tax allocation revenue value in subsequent years unless the property
becomes exempt from property taxation.
(b) "Property tax allocation revenue value" includes seventy-five
percent of any increase in the assessed value of new construction
consisting of an entire building in the years following the initial
year, unless the building becomes exempt from property taxation.
(c) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, "property tax
allocation revenue value" does not include any increase in the assessed
value of real property after the initial year.
(d) There is no property tax allocation revenue value if the
assessed value of real property in a revenue development area has not
increased as a result of any of the reasons specified in (a)(i)(A)
through (C) of this subsection.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, "initial year" means:
(i) For new construction and improvements to property added to the
assessment roll, the year during which the new construction and
improvements are initially placed on the assessment roll;
(ii) For the cost of new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements, when such cost is treated as new
construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW, the year when such cost
is treated as new construction for purposes of levying taxes for
collection in the following year; and
(iii) For the cost of rehabilitation of historic property, when
such cost is treated as new construction for purposes of chapter 84.55
RCW, the year when such cost is treated as new construction for
purposes of levying taxes for collection in the following year.
(19) "Public improvement costs" means the cost of: (a) Design,
planning, acquisition including land acquisition, site preparation
including land clearing, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation,
improvement, and installation of public improvements; (b) demolishing,
relocating, maintaining, and operating property pending construction of
public improvements; (c) the local government's portion of relocating
utilities as a result of public improvements; (d) financing public
improvements, including interest during construction, legal and other
professional services, taxes, insurance, principal and interest costs
on general indebtedness issued to finance public improvements, and any
necessary reserves for general indebtedness; (e) assessments incurred
in revaluing real property for the purpose of determining the property
tax allocation revenue base value that are in excess of costs incurred
by the assessor in accordance with the revaluation plan under chapter
84.41 RCW, and the costs of apportioning the taxes and complying with
this chapter and other applicable law; (f) administrative expenses and
feasibility studies reasonably necessary and related to these costs;
and (g) any of the above-described costs that may have been incurred
before adoption of the ordinance authorizing the public improvements
and the use of local infrastructure financing to fund the costs of the
public improvements.
(20) "Public improvements" means:
(a) Infrastructure improvements within the revenue development area
that include:
(i) Street, bridge, and road construction and maintenance,
including highway interchange construction;
(ii) Water and sewer system construction and improvements,
including wastewater reuse facilities;
(iii) Sidewalks, traffic controls, and streetlights;
(iv) Parking, terminal, and dock facilities;
(v) Park and ride facilities of a transit authority;
(vi) Park facilities and recreational areas, including trails; and
(vii) Storm water and drainage management systems;
(b) Expenditures for facilities and improvements that support
affordable housing as defined in RCW 43.63A.510.
(21) "Real property" has the same meaning as in RCW 84.04.090 and
also includes any privately owned improvements located on publicly
owned land that are subject to property taxation.
(22) "Regular property taxes" means regular property taxes as
defined in RCW 84.04.140, except: (a) Regular property taxes levied by
public utility districts specifically for the purpose of making
required payments of principal and interest on general indebtedness;
(b) regular property taxes levied by the state for the support of the
common schools under RCW 84.52.065; and (c) regular property taxes
authorized by RCW 84.55.050 that are limited to a specific purpose.
"Regular property taxes" do not include excess property tax levies that
are exempt from the aggregate limits for junior and senior taxing
districts as provided in RCW 84.52.043.
(23) "Relocating a business" means the closing of a business and
the reopening of that business, or the opening of a new business that
engages in the same activities as the previous business, in a different
location within a one-year period, when an individual or entity has an
ownership interest in the business at the time of closure and at the
time of opening or reopening. "Relocating a business" does not include
the closing and reopening of a business in a new location where the
business has been acquired and is under entirely new ownership at the
new location, or the closing and reopening of a business in a new
location as a result of the exercise of the power of eminent domain.
(24) "Revenue development area" means the geographic area adopted
by a sponsoring local government and approved by the board, from which
local excise and property tax allocation revenues are derived for local
infrastructure financing.
(25)(a) "Revenues from local public sources" means:
(i) Amounts of local excise tax allocation revenues and local
property tax allocation revenues, dedicated by sponsoring local
governments, participating local governments, and participating taxing
districts, for local infrastructure financing; and
(ii) Any other local revenues, except as provided in (b) of this
subsection, including revenues derived from federal and private
sources.
(b) Revenues from local public sources do not include any local
funds derived from state grants, state loans, or any other state moneys
including any local sales and use taxes credited against the state
sales and use taxes imposed under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW.
(26) "Small business" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
19.85.020.
(27) "Sponsoring local government" means a city, town, or county,
and for the purpose of this chapter a federally recognized Indian tribe
or any combination thereof, that adopts a revenue development area and
applies to the board to use local infrastructure financing.
(28) "State contribution" means the lesser of:
(a) One million dollars;
(b) The total amount of local excise tax allocation revenues, local
property tax allocation revenues, and other revenues from local public
sources, that are dedicated by a sponsoring local government, any
participating local governments, and participating taxing districts, in
the preceding calendar year to the payment of principal and interest on
bonds issued under RCW 39.102.150 or to pay public improvement costs on
a pay-as-you-go basis subject to RCW 39.102.195, or both; ((or))
(c) The amount of project award granted by the board in the notice
of approval to use local infrastructure financing under RCW 39.102.040;
or
(d) The highest amount of state excise tax allocation revenues and
state property tax allocation revenues for any one calendar year as
determined by the sponsoring local government and reported to the board
and the department as required by RCW 39.102.140.
(29) "State excise tax allocation revenue" means an amount equal to
the annual increase in state excise taxes estimated to be received by
the state in each calendar year following the approval of the revenue
development area by the board, from taxable activity within the revenue
development area as set forth in the application provided to the board
under RCW 39.102.040 and periodically updated and reported as required
in RCW 39.102.140(1)(f).
(30) "State excise taxes" means revenues derived from state retail
sales and use taxes under RCW 82.08.020(1) and 82.12.020 at the rate
provided in RCW 82.08.020(1), less the amount of tax distributions from
all local retail sales and use taxes, other than the local sales and
use taxes authorized by RCW 82.14.475 for the applicable revenue
development area, imposed on the same taxable events that are credited
against the state retail sales and use taxes under chapters 82.08 and
82.12 RCW.
(31) "State property tax allocation revenue" means an amount equal
to the estimated tax revenues derived from the imposition of property
taxes levied by the state for the support of common schools under RCW
84.52.065 on the property tax allocation revenue value, as set forth in
the application submitted to the board under RCW 39.102.040 and updated
annually in the report required under RCW 39.102.140(1)(f).
(32) "Taxing district" means a government entity that levies or has
levied for it regular property taxes upon real property located within
a proposed or approved revenue development area.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.14.475 and 2009 c 267 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A sponsoring local government, and any cosponsoring local
government, that has been approved by the board to use local
infrastructure financing may impose a sales and use tax in accordance
with the terms of this chapter and subject to the criteria set forth in
this section. Except as provided in this section, the tax is in
addition to other taxes authorized by law and ((shall be)) is collected
from those persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08
and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the
taxing jurisdiction of the sponsoring local government or cosponsoring
local government.
(2) The tax authorized under subsection (1) of this section ((shall
be)) is credited against the state taxes imposed under RCW 82.08.020(1)
and 82.12.020 at the rate provided in RCW 82.08.020(1). The department
((shall)) must perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the
sponsoring local government or cosponsoring local government at no cost
to the sponsoring local government or cosponsoring local government and
((shall)) must remit the taxes as provided in RCW 82.14.060.
(3) The aggregate rate of tax imposed by the sponsoring local
government, and any cosponsoring local government, must not exceed the
lesser of:
(a) The rate provided in RCW 82.08.020(1) less:
(i) The aggregate rates of all other local sales and use taxes
imposed by any taxing authority on the same taxable events;
(ii) The aggregate rates of all taxes under RCW 82.14.465 and this
section that are authorized to be imposed on the same taxable events
but have not yet been imposed by a sponsoring local government or
cosponsoring local government that has been approved by the department
or the community economic revitalization board to receive a state
contribution under chapter((s [chapter])) 39.100 or 39.102 RCW; and
(iii) The percentage amount of distributions required under RCW
82.08.020(5) multiplied by the rate of state taxes imposed under RCW
82.08.020(1); and
(b) The rate, as determined by the sponsoring local government, and
any cosponsoring local government, in consultation with the department,
reasonably necessary to receive the state contribution over ten months.
(4) Sponsoring local governments that have been approved before
October 1, 2008, by the community economic revitalization board for a
state contribution must select the rate of tax under this section no
later than September 1, 2009.
(5) The department, upon request, must assist a sponsoring local
government and cosponsoring local government in establishing their tax
rate in accordance with subsection (3) of this section. Once the rate
of tax is selected, it may not be increased.
(6)(a) No tax may be imposed under the authority of this section:
(i) ((Before July 1, 2008;
(ii))) Before July 1st of the second calendar year following the
year approval by the board under RCW 39.102.040 was made; and
(((iii) Before the state excise tax allocation revenues and state
property tax allocation revenues for the preceding calendar year equal
or exceed the amount of project award approved by the board under RCW
39.102.040))
(ii) Until a sponsoring local government reports to the board and
the department as required by RCW 39.102.140 that the state has
benefited through the receipt of state excise tax allocation revenues
or state property tax allocation revenues, or both.
(b) The tax imposed under this section ((shall)) expires when all
indebtedness issued under the authority of RCW 39.102.150 is retired
and all other contractual obligations relating to the financing of
public improvements under chapter 39.102 RCW are satisfied, but not
more than twenty-five years after the tax is first imposed.
(7) An ordinance adopted by the legislative authority of a
sponsoring local government or cosponsoring local government imposing
a tax under this section ((shall)) must provide that:
(a) The tax ((shall)) is first ((be)) imposed on the first day of
a fiscal year;
(b) The cumulative amount of tax received by the sponsoring local
government, and any cosponsoring local government, in any fiscal year
((shall)) may not exceed the amount of the state contribution;
(c) The tax ((shall)) will cease to be distributed for the
remainder of any fiscal year in which either:
(i) The amount of tax received by the sponsoring local government,
and any cosponsoring local government, equals the amount of the state
contribution;
(ii) The amount of revenue from taxes imposed under this section by
all sponsoring and cosponsoring local governments equals the annual
state contribution limit; or
(iii) The amount of tax received by the sponsoring local government
equals the amount of project award granted in the approval notice
described in RCW 39.102.040;
(d) Neither the local excise tax allocation revenues nor the local
property tax allocation revenues may constitute more than eighty
percent of the total local funds as described in RCW 39.102.020(28)(b).
This requirement applies beginning January 1st of the fifth calendar
year after the calendar year in which the sponsoring local government
begins allocating local excise tax allocation revenues under RCW
39.102.110;
(e) The tax ((shall)) must be distributed again, should it cease to
be distributed for any of the reasons provided in (c) of this
subsection, at the beginning of the next fiscal year, subject to the
restrictions in this section; and
(f) Any revenue generated by the tax in excess of the amounts
specified in (c) of this subsection ((shall)) belongs to the state of
Washington.
(8) If a county and city cosponsor a revenue development area, the
combined amount of distributions received by both the city and county
may not exceed the state contribution.
(9) The department ((shall)) must determine the amount of tax
receipts distributed to each sponsoring local government, and any
cosponsoring local government, imposing sales and use tax under this
section and shall advise a sponsoring or cosponsoring local government
when tax distributions for the fiscal year equal the amount of state
contribution for that fiscal year as provided in subsection (11) of
this section. Determinations by the department of the amount of tax
distributions attributable to each sponsoring or cosponsoring local
government are final and ((shall)) may not be used to challenge the
validity of any tax imposed under this section. The department
((shall)) must remit any tax receipts in excess of the amounts
specified in subsection (7)(c) of this section to the state treasurer
who ((shall)) must deposit the money in the general fund.
(10) If a sponsoring or cosponsoring local government fails to
comply with RCW 39.102.140, no tax may be distributed in the subsequent
fiscal year until such time as the sponsoring or cosponsoring local
government complies and the department calculates the state
contribution amount for such fiscal year.
(11) Each year, the amount of taxes approved by the department for
distribution to a sponsoring or cosponsoring local government in the
next fiscal year ((shall)) must be equal to the state contribution and
((shall)) may be no more than the total local funds as described in RCW
39.102.020(28)(b). The department ((shall)) must consider information
from reports described in RCW 39.102.140 when determining the amount of
state contributions for each fiscal year. A sponsoring or cosponsoring
local government ((shall)) may not receive, in any fiscal year, more
revenues from taxes imposed under the authority of this section than
the amount approved annually by the department. The department
((shall)) may not approve the receipt of more distributions of sales
and use tax under this section to a sponsoring or cosponsoring local
government than is authorized under subsection (7) of this section.
(12) The amount of tax distributions received from taxes imposed
under the authority of this section by all sponsoring and cosponsoring
local governments is limited annually to not more than seven million
five hundred thousand dollars.
(13) The definitions in RCW 39.102.020 apply to this section unless
the context clearly requires otherwise.
(14) If a sponsoring local government is a federally recognized
Indian tribe, the distribution of the sales and use tax authorized
under this section ((shall)) must be authorized through an interlocal
agreement pursuant to chapter 39.34 RCW.
(15) Subject to RCW 39.102.195, the tax imposed under the authority
of this section may be applied either to provide for the payment of
debt service on bonds issued under RCW 39.102.150 by the sponsoring
local government or to pay public improvement costs on a pay-as-you-go
basis, or both.
(16) The tax imposed under the authority of this section ((shall))
must cease to be imposed if the sponsoring local government or
cosponsoring local government fails to issue indebtedness under the
authority of RCW 39.102.150, and fails to commence construction on
public improvements, by June 30th of the fifth fiscal year in which the
local tax authorized under this section is imposed.
(17) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Local sales and use taxes" means sales and use taxes imposed
by cities, counties, public facilities districts, and other local
governments under the authority of this chapter, chapter 67.28 or
67.40 RCW, or any other chapter, and that are credited against the
state sales and use taxes.
(b) "State sales and use taxes" means the tax imposed in RCW
82.08.020(1) and the tax imposed in RCW 82.12.020 at the rate provided
in RCW 82.08.020(1).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act expire June 30,
2039.

--- END ---