BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.12.037 and 2000 c 107 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission may acquire by gift, easement, purchase, lease,
or condemnation lands, buildings, water rights, rights-of-way, or other
necessary property, and construct and maintain necessary facilities for
purposes consistent with this title. However, under no circumstances
may the commission or the department purchase any real estate or
interest in real estate for more than the appraised current use value
of the real estate or real estate interest.
(2) The commission may authorize the director to acquire property
under this section, but the power of condemnation may only be exercised
by the director when an appropriation has been made by the legislature
for the acquisition of a specific property, except to clear title and
acquire access rights-of-way.
(3) The commission may sell, lease, convey, or grant concessions
upon real or personal property under the control of the department.

--- END ---