BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that, more than ever,
attending college provides opportunities for graduates that are not as
available to those who have not received a higher education. Providing
student aid to assure Washington students a chance at college is a
critical duty. However, the legislature also finds that resources are
scarce and the state is no longer in a position to provide the breadth
and depth of support it once did. In times of financial crisis,
resources must be targeted to those with the most need.
The legislature also finds that the majority of college entrants
are still young people. Despite recent growth in incumbent workers
returning to college, research indicates that even in community and
technical colleges that typically serve higher proportions of
nontraditional students, the median age of students ranges from twenty-six to twenty-nine depending on program of study. Data also indicates
that retention is most challenging for students and institutions during
the first two years of study.
The legislature therefore intends to narrow the scope of the state
need grant program and assure the state can honor its commitments to
young people during the first two years of higher education.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.92.060 and 2009 c 215 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
In awarding need grants, the board shall proceed substantially as
follows: PROVIDED, That nothing contained herein shall be construed to
prevent the board, in the exercise of its sound discretion, from
following another procedure when the best interest of the program so
dictates:
(1) The board shall annually select the financial aid award
recipients from among Washington residents applying for student
financial aid who have been ranked according to:
(a) Financial need as determined by the amount of the family
contribution; and
(b) Other considerations, such as whether the student is a former
foster youth, or is a placebound student who has completed an associate
of arts or associate of science degree or its equivalent.
(2) The financial need of the highest ranked students shall be met
by grants depending upon the evaluation of financial need until the
total allocation has been disbursed. Funds from grants which are
declined, forfeited or otherwise unused shall be reawarded until
disbursed, except that eligible former foster youth shall be assured
receipt of a grant.
(3) A student shall be eligible to receive a state need grant for
up to ((five)) two years, or the credit or clock hour equivalent of
((five)) two years, or up to one hundred twenty-five percent of the
published length of time of the student's program, whichever is
shorter. A student may not start a new associate degree program as a
state need grant recipient until at least five years have elapsed since
earning an associate degree as a need grant recipient, except that a
student may earn two associate degrees concurrently. Qualifications
for renewal will include maintaining satisfactory academic progress
toward completion of an eligible program as determined by the board.
Should the recipient terminate his or her enrollment for any reason
during the academic year, the unused portion of the grant shall be
returned to the state educational grant fund by the institution
according to the institution's own policy for issuing refunds, except
as provided in RCW 28B.92.070. Persons who were awarded a state need
grant before the start of the 2010-11 academic year and have been
continuously enrolled in an institution of higher education shall
receive a maximum of five total years of eligibility.
(4) In computing financial need, the board shall determine a
maximum student expense budget allowance, not to exceed an amount equal
to the total maximum student expense budget at the public institutions
plus the current average state appropriation per student for operating
expense in the public institutions. Any child support payments
received by students who are parents attending less than half-time
shall not be used in computing financial need.
(5)(a) A student who is enrolled in three to six credit-bearing
quarter credits, or the equivalent semester credits, may receive a
grant for up to one academic year before beginning a program that leads
to a degree or certificate.
(b) An eligible student enrolled on a less-than-full-time basis
shall receive a prorated portion of his or her state need grant for any
academic period in which he or she is enrolled on a less-than-full-time
basis, as long as funds are available.
(c) An institution of higher education may award a state need grant
to an eligible student enrolled in three to six credit-bearing quarter
credits, or the semester equivalent, on a provisional basis if:
(i) The student has not previously received a state need grant from
that institution;
(ii) The student completes the required free application for
federal student aid;
(iii) The institution has reviewed the student's financial
condition, and the financial condition of the student's family if the
student is a dependent student, and has determined that the student is
likely eligible for a state need grant; and
(iv) The student has signed a document attesting to the fact that
the financial information provided on the free application for federal
student aid and any additional financial information provided directly
to the institution is accurate and complete, and that the student
agrees to repay the institution for the grant amount if the student
submitted false or incomplete information.
(6) As used in this section, "former foster youth" means a person
who is at least eighteen years of age, but not more than twenty-four
years of age, who was a dependent of the department of social and
health services at the time he or she attained the age of eighteen.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.92.080 and 2009 c 238 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except for opportunity internship graduates whose eligibility is
provided under RCW 28B.92.084, for a student to be eligible for a state
need grant a student must:
(1) Be a "needy student" or "disadvantaged student" as determined
by the board in accordance with RCW 28B.92.030 (((3) and (4)));
(2) Have been domiciled within the state of Washington for at least
one year;
(3) Be enrolled or accepted for enrollment on at least a half-time
basis at an institution of higher education in Washington as defined in
RCW 28B.92.030(((1)));
(4) Be twenty-nine years of age or younger at the time of
application, unless the student is solely responsible for a dependent
child or received a state need grant before the 2010-11 academic year
and has been continuously enrolled in an institution of higher
education;
(5) Until June 30, 2011, to the extent funds are specifically
appropriated for this purpose, and subject to any terms and conditions
specified in the omnibus appropriations act, be enrolled or accepted
for enrollment for at least three quarter credits or the equivalent
semester credits at an institution of higher education in Washington as
defined in RCW 28B.92.030(((1))); and
(((5))) (6) Have complied with all the rules adopted by the board
for the administration of this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.92.120 and 2004 c 275 s 41 are each amended to
read as follows:
Funds appropriated for student financial assistance to be granted
pursuant to this chapter shall be disbursed as determined by the board;
however at least fifty percent of funds must be reserved for students
attending an institution of higher education on a part-time or less-than-half-time basis. If the board finds that demand for financial aid
for part-time and less-than-half-time students will not account for
fifty percent of funds, then remaining funds may be disbursed to
provide grants to students enrolled full time.

--- END ---