BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that the Puget
Sound region is faced with growing traffic congestion and has limited
ability to expand freeway capacity due to financial, environmental, and
physical constraints. Freeway high occupancy vehicle lanes have been
an effective means of providing transit, vanpools, and carpools with a
fast trip on congested freeway corridors, but in many cases, these
lanes operate beyond their capacity during peak commute times.
It is the intent of the legislature to maximize the effectiveness
of the freeway system. An express toll lanes network is one approach
for managing the use of freeway high occupancy vehicle lanes and for
adding needed capacity to congested freeway segments. The legislature
acknowledges that as one of the most congested freeway sections in the
state, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 corridors between
Lynnwood and Puyallup serve as an ideal candidate for the use of an
express toll lanes network. An express toll lanes network could
provide benefits for movement of traffic, as well as having the
potential to generate revenue for other improvements in the corridor.
Therefore, it is the intent of this act to direct the department of
transportation to develop and operate express toll lanes on Interstate
405 between the city of Bellevue on the south end and Interstate 5 on
the north end and to conduct an evaluation of that project to determine
the impacts on freeway efficiency, effectiveness for transit,
feasibility of financing capacity improvements through tolls, and
freeway users.
It is further the intent of the legislature to use its evaluation
of initial express toll lanes on Interstate 405 to guide additions to
the express toll lanes network, particularly in the most congested
areas of the Interstate 405 corridor, such as the Renton-to-Bellevue
segment and the Interstate 405/state route number 167 interchange, with
the ultimate goal of continuous express toll lanes from Puyallup to
Lynnwood.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.56.810 and 2008 c 122 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this subchapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Tolling authority" means the governing body that is legally
empowered to review and adjust toll rates. Unless otherwise delegated,
the transportation commission is the tolling authority for all state
highways.
(2) "Eligible toll facility" or "eligible toll facilities" means
portions of the state highway system specifically identified by the
legislature including, but not limited to, transportation corridors,
bridges, crossings, interchanges, on-ramps, off-ramps, approaches,
bistate facilities, and interconnections between highways.
(3) "Toll revenue" or "revenue from an eligible toll facility"
means toll receipts, all interest income derived from the investment of
toll receipts, and any gifts, grants, or other funds received for the
benefit of the eligible toll facility.
(4) "Express toll lanes" means one or more lanes of a highway in
which the department charges tolls primarily as a means of regulating
access to or use of the highway facility to maintain travel speed and
reliability. Supporting facilities include, but are not limited to,
approaches, enforcement areas, improvements, buildings, and equipment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 47.56 RCW
under the subchapter heading "toll facilities created after July 1,
2008" to read as follows:
(1) The initial imposition of tolls for express toll lanes on
Interstate 405 between the junctions with Interstate 5 on the north end
and NE 6th Street in the city of Bellevue on the south end is
authorized, Interstate 405 is designated an eligible toll facility, and
toll revenue generated in the corridor must only be expended as allowed
under RCW 47.56.820.
(2) Tolls for the express toll lanes must be set as follows:
(a) The schedule of toll rates must be set by the tolling authority
pursuant to RCW 47.56.850. Toll rates may vary in amount by time of
day, level of traffic congestion within the highway facility, vehicle
occupancy, or other criteria, as the tolling authority deems
appropriate.
(b) The department shall establish performance standards for the
express toll lanes project. The department must automatically adjust
the toll rate within the schedule established by the tolling authority,
using dynamic tolling, to ensure that only toll-paying, high-occupant
vehicle users with two passengers and single-occupant vehicle users are
permitted to enter the express toll lanes to the extent that average
vehicle speeds in the lanes remain above forty-five miles per hour at
least ninety percent of the time during peak hours.
(c) The tolling authority shall periodically review the toll rates
against traffic performance to determine if the toll rates are
effectively maintaining travel time, speed, and reliability on the
highway facilities.
(3) The department may construct and operate express toll lanes on
Interstate 405 between the city of Bellevue on the south end and
Interstate 5 on the north end.
(4) The department shall monitor the express toll lanes project and
shall biennially report to the transportation commission and the
legislature on the impacts from the project on the following issues:
(a) Freeway efficiency and safety;
(b) Effectiveness for transit;
(c) Person and vehicle movements by mode;
(d) Ability to finance improvements and transportation services
through tolls; and
(e) Highway users. The department must analyze aggregate data and
conduct, as needed, separate surveys to assess usage of the highway
facility in relation to geographic, socioeconomic, and demographic
information within the corridor to ascertain actual and perceived
questions of equitable use of the highway facility.
(5) A violation of the lane restrictions applicable to the express
toll lanes established under this section is a traffic infraction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 47.56 RCW
under the subchapter heading "toll facilities created after July 1,
2008" to read as follows:
(1) The department shall conduct a traffic and revenue analysis for
the development of a forty-mile continuous express toll lane system
that includes state route number 167 in King county and Interstate 405
and utilizes express toll lanes to add capacity to the Renton-to-Bellevue segment of Interstate 405 and to more effectively move
vehicles and goods between the state route number 167 and Interstate
405 corridors at the interchange of state route number 167 and
Interstate 405.
(2) The department shall use the information from the traffic and
revenue analysis to develop a finance plan to fund improvements in the
forty-mile corridor. The department must include the following
assumptions in the finance plan:
(a) Current state and federal funding contributions for projects in
the corridor; and
(b) An express toll lane system operating in the corridor by 2014.
(3) The department must consult with a committee consisting of
local and state elected officials from the forty-mile corridor while
developing the traffic and revenue analysis plan and finance plan.
(4) The department must provide the traffic and revenue analysis
plan and finance plan to the governor and the legislature by January
2011.

--- END ---