BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commission shall offer training on human trafficking to
criminal justice and correctional personnel, and other public safety
employees. The training shall be implemented by the commission in
consultation with appropriate public and private organizations that
have expertise in reducing and preventing human trafficking.
(2) The training shall consist of a minimum of one hour of
classroom or internet instruction, and shall include instruction on the
following subjects:
(a) How to identify suspicious illegal human trafficking
activities; and
(b) Examples of where a victim of human trafficking may get help
for health care, human services, housing, education, legal assistance,
job training or preparation, interpreting services, English as a second
language classes, and victim's compensation.
(3) The training developed by the commission shall be made
available by the commission to all employees of state and local
agencies that perform public safety duties.

--- END ---