BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.40.0357 and 2008 c 230 s 3 and 2008 c 158 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

DESCRIPTION AND OFFENSE CATEGORY

JUVENILE
DISPOSITION
OFFENSE
CATEGORY DESCRIPTION (RCW CITATION) JUVENILE DISPOSITION
CATEGORY FOR
ATTEMPT, BAILJUMP,
CONSPIRACY, OR
SOLICITATION

. . . . . . . . . . . .

Arson and Malicious Mischief

A Arson 1 (9A.48.020) B+

B Arson 2 (9A.48.030) C

C Reckless Burning 1 (9A.48.040) D

D Reckless Burning 2 (9A.48.050) E

B Malicious Mischief 1 (9A.48.070) C

C Malicious Mischief 2 (9A.48.080) D

D Malicious Mischief 3 (9A.48.090(2) (a)
and (c)) E

E Malicious Mischief 3 (9A.48.090(2)(b)) E

E Tampering with Fire Alarm Apparatus
(9.40.100) E

E Tampering with Fire Alarm Apparatus
with Intent to Commit Arson (9.40.105) E

A Possession of Incendiary Device
(9.40.120)
B+

Assault and Other Crimes Involving
Physical Harm

A Assault 1 (9A.36.011) B+

B+ Assault 2 (9A.36.021) C+

C+ Assault 3 (9A.36.031) D+

D+ Assault 4 (9A.36.041) E

B+ Drive-By Shooting (9A.36.045) C+

D+ Reckless Endangerment (9A.36.050) E

C+ Promoting Suicide Attempt (9A.36.060) D+

D+ Coercion (9A.36.070) E

C+ Custodial Assault (9A.36.100) D+

Burglary and Trespass

B+ Burglary 1 (9A.52.020) C+

B Residential Burglary (9A.52.025) C

B Burglary 2 (9A.52.030) C

D Burglary Tools (Possession of)
(9A.52.060) E

D Criminal Trespass 1 (9A.52.070) E

E Criminal Trespass 2 (9A.52.080) E

C Mineral Trespass (78.44.330) C

C Vehicle Prowling 1 (9A.52.095) D

D Vehicle Prowling 2 (9A.52.100) E

Drugs

E Possession/Consumption of Alcohol
(66.44.270) E

C Illegally Obtaining Legend Drug
(69.41.020) D

C+ Sale, Delivery, Possession of Legend Drug
with Intent to Sell (69.41.030(2)(a)) D+

E Possession of Legend Drug
(69.41.030(2)(b)) E

B+ Violation of Uniform Controlled
Substances Act - Narcotic,
Methamphetamine, or Flunitrazepam Sale
(69.50.401(2) (a) or (b)) B+

C Violation of Uniform Controlled
Substances Act - Nonnarcotic Sale
(69.50.401(2)(c)) C

E Possession of Marihuana <40 grams
(69.50.4014) E

C Fraudulently Obtaining Controlled
Substance (69.50.403) C

C+ Sale of Controlled Substance for Profit
(69.50.410) C+

E Unlawful Inhalation (9.47A.020) E

B Violation of Uniform Controlled
Substances Act - Narcotic,
Methamphetamine, or Flunitrazepam
Counterfeit Substances (69.50.4011(2) (a)
or (b)) B

C Violation of Uniform Controlled
Substances Act - Nonnarcotic Counterfeit
Substances (69.50.4011(2) (c), (d), or (e)) C

C Violation of Uniform Controlled
Substances Act - Possession of a
Controlled Substance (69.50.4013) C

C Violation of Uniform Controlled
Substances Act - Possession of a
Controlled Substance (69.50.4012)
C

Firearms and Weapons

B Theft of Firearm (9A.56.300) C

B Possession of Stolen Firearm (9A.56.310) C

E Carrying Loaded Pistol Without Permit
(9.41.050) E

A- Unlawful Possession of a Firearm 1
(9.41.040(1)) B+

((C)) B+ Possession of Firearms by Minor (<18)
(9.41.040(2)(a)(iii)) C+

D+ Possession of Dangerous Weapon
(9.41.250) E

D Intimidating Another Person by use of
Weapon (9.41.270)
E

Homicide

A+ Murder 1 (9A.32.030) A

A+ Murder 2 (9A.32.050) B+

B+ Manslaughter 1 (9A.32.060) C+

C+ Manslaughter 2 (9A.32.070) D+

B+ Vehicular Homicide (46.61.520) C+

Kidnapping

A Kidnap 1 (9A.40.020) B+

B+ Kidnap 2 (9A.40.030) C+

C+ Unlawful Imprisonment (9A.40.040)
D+

Obstructing Governmental Operation

D Obstructing a Law Enforcement Officer
(9A.76.020) E

E Resisting Arrest (9A.76.040) E

B Introducing Contraband 1 (9A.76.140) C

C Introducing Contraband 2 (9A.76.150) D

E Introducing Contraband 3 (9A.76.160) E

B+ Intimidating a Public Servant (9A.76.180) C+

B+ Intimidating a Witness (9A.72.110)
C+

Public Disturbance

C+ Riot with Weapon (9A.84.010(2)(b)) D+

D+ Riot Without Weapon (9A.84.010(2)(a)) E

E Failure to Disperse (9A.84.020) E

E Disorderly Conduct (9A.84.030) E

Sex Crimes

A Rape 1 (9A.44.040) B+

A- Rape 2 (9A.44.050) B+

C+ Rape 3 (9A.44.060) D+

A- Rape of a Child 1 (9A.44.073) B+

B+ Rape of a Child 2 (9A.44.076) C+

B Incest 1 (9A.64.020(1)) C

C Incest 2 (9A.64.020(2)) D

D+ Indecent Exposure (Victim <14)
(9A.88.010) E

E Indecent Exposure (Victim 14 or over)
(9A.88.010) E

B+ Promoting Prostitution 1 (9A.88.070) C+

C+ Promoting Prostitution 2 (9A.88.080) D+

E O & A (Prostitution) (9A.88.030) E

B+ Indecent Liberties (9A.44.100) C+

A- Child Molestation 1 (9A.44.083) B+

B Child Molestation 2 (9A.44.086) C+

C Failure to Register as a Sex Offender
(9A.44.130)
D

Theft, Robbery, Extortion, and Forgery

B Theft 1 (9A.56.030) C

C Theft 2 (9A.56.040) D

D Theft 3 (9A.56.050) E

B Theft of Livestock 1 and 2 (9A.56.080 and
9A.56.083) C

C Forgery (9A.60.020) D

A Robbery 1 (9A.56.200) B+

B+ Robbery 2 (9A.56.210) C+

B+ Extortion 1 (9A.56.120) C+

C+ Extortion 2 (9A.56.130) D+

C Identity Theft 1 (9.35.020(2)) D

D Identity Theft 2 (9.35.020(3)) E

D Improperly Obtaining Financial
Information (9.35.010) E

B Possession of a Stolen Vehicle
(9A.56.068) C

B Possession of Stolen Property 1
(9A.56.150) C

C Possession of Stolen Property 2
(9A.56.160) D

D Possession of Stolen Property 3
(9A.56.170) E

B Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission
1 (9A.56.070) C

C Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission
2 (9A.56.075) D

B Theft of a Motor Vehicle (9A.56.065) C

Motor Vehicle Related Crimes

E Driving Without a License (46.20.005) E

B+ Hit and Run - Death (46.52.020(4)(a)) C+

C Hit and Run - Injury (46.52.020(4)(b)) D

D Hit and Run-Attended (46.52.020(5)) E

E Hit and Run-Unattended (46.52.010) E

C Vehicular Assault (46.61.522) D

C Attempting to Elude Pursuing Police
Vehicle (46.61.024) D

E Reckless Driving (46.61.500) E

D Driving While Under the Influence
(46.61.502 and 46.61.504) E

B+ Felony Driving While Under the Influence
(46.61.502(6)) B

B+ Felony Physical Control of a Vehicle
While Under the Influence (46.61.504(6))
B

Other

B Animal Cruelty 1 (16.52.205) C

B Bomb Threat (9.61.160) C

C Escape 11 (9A.76.110) C

C Escape 21 (9A.76.120) C

D Escape 3 (9A.76.130) E

E Obscene, Harassing, Etc., Phone Calls
(9.61.230) E

A Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult
Class A Felony B+

B Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult
Class B Felony C

C Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult
Class C Felony D

D Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult
Gross Misdemeanor E

E Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult
Misdemeanor E

V Violation of Order of Restitution,
Community Supervision, or Confinement
(13.40.200)2 V

1Escape 1 and 2 and Attempted Escape 1 and 2 are classed as C offenses
and the standard range is established as follows:

1st escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 4 weeks
confinement
2nd escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 8 weeks
confinement
3rd and subsequent escape or attempted escape during 12-month
period - 12 weeks confinement

2If the court finds that a respondent has violated terms of an order,
it may impose a penalty of up to 30 days of confinement.

JUVENILE SENTENCING STANDARDS

This schedule must be used for juvenile offenders. The court may
select sentencing option A, B, C, D, or RCW 13.40.167.

OPTION A
JUVENILE OFFENDER SENTENCING GRID
STANDARD RANGE

A+
180 WEEKS TO AGE 21 YEARS

A 103 WEEKS TO 129 WEEKS

A- 15-36 52-65 80-100 103-129

WEEKS WEEKS WEEKS WEEKS

EXCEPT

30-40

WEEKS FOR

15-17

YEAR OLDS

Current B+ 15-36 52-65 80-100 103-129

Offense WEEKS WEEKS WEEKS WEEKS

Category

B LOCAL 52-65

SANCTIONS (LS) 15-36 WEEKS WEEKS

C+ LS

15-36 WEEKS

C LS 15-36 WEEKS

Local Sanctions:

0 to 30 Days

D+ LS 0 to 12 Months Community Supervision

0 to 150 Hours Community Restitution

D LS $0 to $500 Fine

E LS

0 1 2 3 4
or more

PRIOR ADJUDICATIONS

NOTE: References in the grid to days or weeks mean periods of
confinement.
(1) The vertical axis of the grid is the current offense category.
The current offense category is determined by the offense of
adjudication.
(2) The horizontal axis of the grid is the number of prior
adjudications included in the juvenile's criminal history. Each prior
felony adjudication shall count as one point. Each prior violation,
misdemeanor, and gross misdemeanor adjudication shall count as 1/4
point. Fractional points shall be rounded down.
(3) The standard range disposition for each offense is determined
by the intersection of the column defined by the prior adjudications
and the row defined by the current offense category.
(4) RCW 13.40.180 applies if the offender is being sentenced for
more than one offense.
(5) A current offense that is a violation is equivalent to an
offense category of E. However, a disposition for a violation shall
not include confinement.

OR

OPTION B
SUSPENDED DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE

(1) If the offender is subject to a standard range disposition
involving confinement by the department, the court may impose the
standard range and suspend the disposition on condition that the
offender comply with one or more local sanctions and any educational or
treatment requirement. The treatment programs provided to the offender
must be either research-based best practice programs as identified by
the Washington state institute for public policy or the joint
legislative audit and review committee, or for chemical dependency
treatment programs or services, they must be evidence-based or
research-based best practice programs. For the purposes of this
subsection:
(a) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice that has had
multiple site random controlled trials across heterogeneous populations
demonstrating that the program or practice is effective for the
population; and
(b) "Research-based" means a program or practice that has some
research demonstrating effectiveness, but that does not yet meet the
standard of evidence-based practices.
(2) If the offender fails to comply with the suspended disposition,
the court may impose sanctions pursuant to RCW 13.40.200 or may revoke
the suspended disposition and order the disposition's execution.
(3) An offender is ineligible for the suspended disposition option
under this section if the offender is:
(a) Adjudicated of an A+ offense;
(b) Fourteen years of age or older and is adjudicated of one or
more of the following offenses:
(i) A class A offense, or an attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation
to commit a class A offense;
(ii) Manslaughter in the first degree (RCW 9A.32.060); or
(iii) Assault in the second degree (RCW 9A.36.021), extortion in
the first degree (RCW 9A.56.120), kidnapping in the second degree (RCW
9A.40.030), robbery in the second degree (RCW 9A.56.210), residential
burglary (RCW 9A.52.025), burglary in the second degree (RCW
9A.52.030), drive-by shooting (RCW 9A.36.045), vehicular homicide (RCW
46.61.520), hit and run death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a)), intimidating a
witness (RCW 9A.72.110), violation of the uniform controlled substances
act (RCW 69.50.401 (2)(a) and (b)), or manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070),
when the offense includes infliction of bodily harm upon another or
when during the commission or immediate withdrawal from the offense the
respondent was armed with a deadly weapon;
(c) Ordered to serve a disposition for a firearm violation under
RCW 13.40.193; or
(d) Adjudicated of a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.

OR

OPTION C
CHEMICAL DEPENDENCY DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE

If the juvenile offender is subject to a standard range disposition
of local sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has not
committed an A- or B+ offense, other than a first-time B+ offense under
chapter 9.41 RCW, the court may impose a disposition under RCW
13.40.160(4) and 13.40.165.

OR

OPTION D
MANIFEST INJUSTICE

If the court determines that a disposition under option A, B, or C
would effectuate a manifest injustice, the court shall impose a
disposition outside the standard range under RCW 13.40.160(2).

Sec. 2 RCW 13.40.193 and 2003 c 53 s 100 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a respondent is found to have been in possession of a
firearm in violation of RCW 9.41.040(2)(a)(iii), the court shall
((impose a minimum disposition of ten days of confinement. If the
offender's standard range of disposition for the offense as indicated
in RCW 13.40.0357 is more than thirty days of confinement, the court
shall)) commit the offender to the department for the standard range
disposition, as indicated in RCW 13.40.0357 unless the respondent is
eligible for and the court imposes a disposition under RCW 13.40.160(4)
and 13.40.165. ((The offender shall not be released until the offender
has served a minimum of ten days in confinement.))
(2) If the court finds that the respondent or an accomplice was
armed with a firearm, the court shall determine the standard range
disposition for the offense pursuant to RCW 13.40.160. If the offender
or an accomplice was armed with a firearm when the offender committed
any felony other than possession of a machine gun, possession of a
stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful
possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, or use of a
machine gun in a felony, the following periods of total confinement
must be added to the sentence: For a class A felony, six months; for
a class B felony, four months; and for a class C felony, two months.
The additional time shall be imposed regardless of the offense's
juvenile disposition offense category as designated in RCW 13.40.0357.
(3) When a disposition under this section would effectuate a
manifest injustice, the court may impose another disposition. When a
judge finds a manifest injustice and imposes a disposition of
confinement exceeding thirty days, the court shall commit the juvenile
to a maximum term, and the provisions of RCW 13.40.030(2) shall be used
to determine the range. When a judge finds a manifest injustice and
imposes a disposition of confinement less than thirty days, the
disposition shall be comprised of confinement or community supervision
or both.
(4) Any term of confinement ordered pursuant to this section shall
run consecutively to any term of confinement imposed in the same
disposition for other offenses.

Sec. 3 RCW 13.40.160 and 2007 c 199 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The standard range disposition for a juvenile adjudicated of an
offense is determined according to RCW 13.40.0357.
(a) When the court sentences an offender to a local sanction as
provided in RCW 13.40.0357 option A, the court shall impose a
determinate disposition within the standard ranges, except as provided
in subsection (2), (3), (4), (5), or (6) of this section. The
disposition may be comprised of one or more local sanctions.
(b) When the court sentences an offender to a standard range as
provided in RCW 13.40.0357 option A that includes a term of confinement
exceeding thirty days, commitment shall be to the department for the
standard range of confinement, except as provided in subsection (2),
(3), (4), (5), or (6) of this section.
(2) If the court concludes, and enters reasons for its conclusion,
that disposition within the standard range would effectuate a manifest
injustice the court shall impose a disposition outside the standard
range, as indicated in option D of RCW 13.40.0357. The court's finding
of manifest injustice shall be supported by clear and convincing
evidence.
A disposition outside the standard range shall be determinate and
shall be comprised of confinement or community supervision, or a
combination thereof. When a judge finds a manifest injustice and
imposes a sentence of confinement exceeding thirty days, the court
shall sentence the juvenile to a maximum term, and the provisions of
RCW 13.40.030(2) shall be used to determine the range. A disposition
outside the standard range is appealable under RCW 13.40.230 by the
state or the respondent. A disposition within the standard range is
not appealable under RCW 13.40.230.
(3) When a juvenile offender is found to have committed a sex
offense, other than a sex offense that is also a serious violent
offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030, and has no history of a prior sex
offense, the court, on its own motion or the motion of the state or the
respondent, may order an examination to determine whether the
respondent is amenable to treatment.
The report of the examination shall include at a minimum the
following: The respondent's version of the facts and the official
version of the facts, the respondent's offense history, an assessment
of problems in addition to alleged deviant behaviors, the respondent's
social, educational, and employment situation, and other evaluation
measures used. The report shall set forth the sources of the
evaluator's information.
The examiner shall assess and report regarding the respondent's
amenability to treatment and relative risk to the community. A
proposed treatment plan shall be provided and shall include, at a
minimum:
(a)(i) Frequency and type of contact between the offender and
therapist;
(ii) Specific issues to be addressed in the treatment and
description of planned treatment modalities;
(iii) Monitoring plans, including any requirements regarding living
conditions, lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by family members,
legal guardians, or others;
(iv) Anticipated length of treatment; and
(v) Recommended crime-related prohibitions.
The court on its own motion may order, or on a motion by the state
shall order, a second examination regarding the offender's amenability
to treatment. The evaluator shall be selected by the party making the
motion. The defendant shall pay the cost of any second examination
ordered unless the court finds the defendant to be indigent in which
case the state shall pay the cost.
After receipt of reports of the examination, the court shall then
consider whether the offender and the community will benefit from use
of this special sex offender disposition alternative and consider the
victim's opinion whether the offender should receive a treatment
disposition under this section. If the court determines that this
special sex offender disposition alternative is appropriate, then the
court shall impose a determinate disposition within the standard range
for the offense, or if the court concludes, and enters reasons for its
conclusions, that such disposition would cause a manifest injustice,
the court shall impose a disposition under option D, and the court may
suspend the execution of the disposition and place the offender on
community supervision for at least two years. As a condition of the
suspended disposition, the court may impose the conditions of community
supervision and other conditions, including up to thirty days of
confinement and requirements that the offender do any one or more of
the following:
(b)(i) Devote time to a specific education, employment, or
occupation;
(ii) Undergo available outpatient sex offender treatment for up to
two years, or inpatient sex offender treatment not to exceed the
standard range of confinement for that offense. A community mental
health center may not be used for such treatment unless it has an
appropriate program designed for sex offender treatment. The
respondent shall not change sex offender treatment providers or
treatment conditions without first notifying the prosecutor, the
probation counselor, and the court, and shall not change providers
without court approval after a hearing if the prosecutor or probation
counselor object to the change;
(iii) Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify
the court or the probation counselor prior to any change in the
offender's address, educational program, or employment;
(iv) Report to the prosecutor and the probation counselor prior to
any change in a sex offender treatment provider. This change shall
have prior approval by the court;
(v) Report as directed to the court and a probation counselor;
(vi) Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations, perform
community restitution, or any combination thereof;
(vii) Make restitution to the victim for the cost of any counseling
reasonably related to the offense;
(viii) Comply with the conditions of any court-ordered probation
bond; or
(ix) The court shall order that the offender shall not attend the
public or approved private elementary, middle, or high school attended
by the victim or the victim's siblings. The parents or legal guardians
of the offender are responsible for transportation or other costs
associated with the offender's change of school that would otherwise be
paid by the school district. The court shall send notice of the
disposition and restriction on attending the same school as the victim
or victim's siblings to the public or approved private school the
juvenile will attend, if known, or if unknown, to the approved private
schools and the public school district board of directors of the
district in which the juvenile resides or intends to reside. This
notice must be sent at the earliest possible date but not later than
ten calendar days after entry of the disposition.
The sex offender treatment provider shall submit quarterly reports
on the respondent's progress in treatment to the court and the parties.
The reports shall reference the treatment plan and include at a minimum
the following: Dates of attendance, respondent's compliance with
requirements, treatment activities, the respondent's relative progress
in treatment, and any other material specified by the court at the time
of the disposition.
At the time of the disposition, the court may set treatment review
hearings as the court considers appropriate.
Except as provided in this subsection (3), after July 1, 1991,
examinations and treatment ordered pursuant to this subsection shall
only be conducted by certified sex offender treatment providers or
certified affiliate sex offender treatment providers under chapter
18.155 RCW. A sex offender therapist who examines or treats a juvenile
sex offender pursuant to this subsection does not have to be certified
by the department of health pursuant to chapter 18.155 RCW if the court
finds that: (A) The offender has already moved to another state or
plans to move to another state for reasons other than circumventing the
certification requirements; (B) no certified sex offender treatment
providers or certified affiliate sex offender treatment providers are
available for treatment within a reasonable geographical distance of
the offender's home; and (C) the evaluation and treatment plan comply
with this subsection (3) and the rules adopted by the department of
health.
If the offender violates any condition of the disposition or the
court finds that the respondent is failing to make satisfactory
progress in treatment, the court may revoke the suspension and order
execution of the disposition or the court may impose a penalty of up to
thirty days' confinement for violating conditions of the disposition.
The court may order both execution of the disposition and up to thirty
days' confinement for the violation of the conditions of the
disposition. The court shall give credit for any confinement time
previously served if that confinement was for the offense for which the
suspension is being revoked.
For purposes of this section, "victim" means any person who has
sustained emotional, psychological, physical, or financial injury to
person or property as a direct result of the crime charged. "Victim"
may also include a known parent or guardian of a victim who is a minor
child unless the parent or guardian is the perpetrator of the offense.
A disposition entered under this subsection (3) is not appealable
under RCW 13.40.230.
(4) If the juvenile offender is subject to a standard range
disposition of local sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has
not committed an A- or B+ offense, other than a first-time B+ offense
under chapter 9.41 RCW, the court may impose the disposition
alternative under RCW 13.40.165.
(5) If a juvenile is subject to a commitment of 15 to 65 weeks of
confinement, the court may impose the disposition alternative under RCW
13.40.167.
(6) When the offender is subject to a standard range commitment of
15 to 36 weeks and is ineligible for a suspended disposition
alternative, a manifest injustice disposition below the standard range,
special sex offender disposition alternative, chemical dependency
disposition alternative, or mental health disposition alternative, the
court in a county with a pilot program under RCW 13.40.169 may impose
the disposition alternative under RCW 13.40.169.
(7) RCW 13.40.193 shall govern the disposition of any juvenile
adjudicated of possessing a firearm in violation of RCW
9.41.040(2)(a)(iii) or any crime in which a special finding is entered
that the juvenile was armed with a firearm.
(8) RCW 13.40.308 shall govern the disposition of any juvenile
adjudicated of theft of a motor vehicle as defined under RCW 9A.56.065,
possession of a stolen motor vehicle as defined under RCW 9A.56.068,
taking a motor vehicle without permission in the first degree under RCW
9A.56.070, and taking a motor vehicle without permission in the second
degree under RCW 9A.56.075.
(9) Whenever a juvenile offender is entitled to credit for time
spent in detention prior to a dispositional order, the dispositional
order shall specifically state the number of days of credit for time
served.
(10) Except as provided under subsection (3), (4), (5), or (6) of
this section, or option B of RCW 13.40.0357, or RCW 13.40.127, the
court shall not suspend or defer the imposition or the execution of the
disposition.
(11) In no case shall the term of confinement imposed by the court
at disposition exceed that to which an adult could be subjected for the
same offense.

Sec. 4 RCW 13.40.165 and 2004 c 120 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The purpose of this disposition alternative is to ensure that
successful treatment options to reduce recidivism are available to
eligible youth, pursuant to RCW 70.96A.520. The court must consider
eligibility for the chemical dependency disposition alternative when a
juvenile offender is subject to a standard range disposition of local
sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has not committed an A-or B+ offense, other than a first time B+ offense under chapter 69.50
RCW or a first time B+ offense under chapter 9.41 RCW. The court, on
its own motion or the motion of the state or the respondent if the
evidence shows that the offender may be chemically dependent or
substance abusing, may order an examination by a chemical dependency
counselor from a chemical dependency treatment facility approved under
chapter 70.96A RCW to determine if the youth is chemically dependent or
substance abusing. The offender shall pay the cost of any examination
ordered under this subsection unless the court finds that the offender
is indigent and no third party insurance coverage is available, in
which case the state shall pay the cost.
(2) The report of the examination shall include at a minimum the
following: The respondent's version of the facts and the official
version of the facts, the respondent's offense history, an assessment
of drug-alcohol problems and previous treatment attempts, the
respondent's social, educational, and employment situation, and other
evaluation measures used. The report shall set forth the sources of
the examiner's information.
(3) The examiner shall assess and report regarding the respondent's
relative risk to the community. A proposed treatment plan shall be
provided and shall include, at a minimum:
(a) Whether inpatient and/or outpatient treatment is recommended;
(b) Availability of appropriate treatment;
(c) Monitoring plans, including any requirements regarding living
conditions, lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by family members,
legal guardians, or others;
(d) Anticipated length of treatment; and
(e) Recommended crime-related prohibitions.
(4) The court on its own motion may order, or on a motion by the
state or the respondent shall order, a second examination. The
evaluator shall be selected by the party making the motion. The
requesting party shall pay the cost of any examination ordered under
this subsection unless the requesting party is the offender and the
court finds that the offender is indigent and no third party insurance
coverage is available, in which case the state shall pay the cost.
(5)(a) After receipt of reports of the examination, the court shall
then consider whether the offender and the community will benefit from
use of this chemical dependency disposition alternative and consider
the victim's opinion whether the offender should receive a treatment
disposition under this section.
(b) If the court determines that this chemical dependency
disposition alternative is appropriate, then the court shall impose the
standard range for the offense, or if the court concludes, and enters
reasons for its conclusion, that such disposition would effectuate a
manifest injustice, the court shall impose a disposition above the
standard range as indicated in option D of RCW 13.40.0357 if the
disposition is an increase from the standard range and the confinement
of the offender does not exceed a maximum of fifty-two weeks, suspend
execution of the disposition, and place the offender on community
supervision for up to one year. As a condition of the suspended
disposition, the court shall require the offender to undergo available
outpatient drug/alcohol treatment and/or inpatient drug/alcohol
treatment. For purposes of this section, inpatient treatment may not
exceed ninety days. As a condition of the suspended disposition, the
court may impose conditions of community supervision and other
sanctions, including up to thirty days of confinement, one hundred
fifty hours of community restitution, and payment of legal financial
obligations and restitution.
(6) The drug/alcohol treatment provider shall submit monthly
reports on the respondent's progress in treatment to the court and the
parties. The reports shall reference the treatment plan and include at
a minimum the following: Dates of attendance, respondent's compliance
with requirements, treatment activities, the respondent's relative
progress in treatment, and any other material specified by the court at
the time of the disposition.
At the time of the disposition, the court may set treatment review
hearings as the court considers appropriate.
If the offender violates any condition of the disposition or the
court finds that the respondent is failing to make satisfactory
progress in treatment, the court may impose sanctions pursuant to RCW
13.40.200 or revoke the suspension and order execution of the
disposition. The court shall give credit for any confinement time
previously served if that confinement was for the offense for which the
suspension is being revoked.
(7) For purposes of this section, "victim" means any person who has
sustained emotional, psychological, physical, or financial injury to
person or property as a direct result of the offense charged. "Victim"
may also include a known parent or guardian of a victim who is a minor
child or is not a minor child but is incapacitated, incompetent,
disabled, or deceased.
(8) Whenever a juvenile offender is entitled to credit for time
spent in detention prior to a dispositional order, the dispositional
order shall specifically state the number of days of credit for time
served.
(9) In no case shall the term of confinement imposed by the court
at disposition exceed that to which an adult could be subjected for the
same offense.
(10) A disposition under this section is not appealable under RCW
13.40.230.

--- END ---