BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that in some areas of
the state, the cooperative provision of certain water and sewer
services would create efficiencies, reduce consumer rates, conserve
water and energy, and cause the construction of more environmentally
friendly infrastructure. It is the intent of the legislature to
research the value of creating a statutory structure in Washington
state that would encourage the formation of additional regional water
and sewer systems or water system partnerships.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) For the purposes of this act:
(a) "Regional water and sewer system" means any public or publicly
created regional or intergovernmental entity that provides water or
sewer services to two or more local governments.
(b) "Water system partnerships" is defined as partnership options
ranging from, but not limited to, informal arrangements, such as
sharing equipment, to transferring ownership of a system through
consolidation.
(2) The governor shall convene a study group to evaluate regional
water and sewer systems in Washington state and to determine what
statutory changes are necessary to encourage the establishment and
operation of regional water and sewer systems or water system
partnerships. The study group consists of the following members:
(a) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate,
appointed by the president of the senate;
(b) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house
of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(c) Two representatives from public regional water systems,
including one that was formed as a watershed management partnership
under RCW 39.34.200 and 39.34.210;
(d) One representative from a regional sewer system that consists
of at least three cities and one county;
(e) One representative from the Washington association of sewer and
water districts;
(f) One representative from a public utility district; and
(g) Two members appointed by the governor having extensive legal
and policy experience with both local government and water/sewer
issues.
(3) At a minimum, the study group shall research, review, and make
recommendations on the following:
(a) Identify all existing and developing regional water and sewer
systems and water system partnerships, and identify all known groups of
local governments that are considering developing regional water and
sewer systems or water system partnerships;
(b) For each of the groups identified under (a) of this subsection,
the study group shall outline its history, objectives for forming,
organizational structure, legal basis for formation and operation, and
potential problems or challenges with respect to formation and
operation under the current law;
(c) Review the laws, policies, and outcomes related to regional
water and sewer systems and water system partnerships in at least two
states that are known to have successful operating regional water and
sewer systems or water system partnerships;
(d) Evaluate and describe what potential benefits might be obtained
by encouraging the formation of additional regional water and sewer
systems or water system partnerships in Washington state. At a
minimum, the study should consider potential operational efficiencies
and cost and rate reductions;
(e) Identify Washington state statutes that may discourage the
formation and operation of successful regional water and sewer systems
or water system partnerships, and make recommendations on changes to
the statutes that would encourage the formation and successful
operation of additional regional water and sewer systems and water
system partnerships in the state.
(4) The study group shall compile its findings and recommendations
into a final report and provide its report to the legislature and
governor by December 1, 2010.
(5) The study group shall function within existing resources and no
specific budget may be provided to complete the study. The
participants of the study group are encouraged to donate their time and
their entities' staff resources to offset any costs.
(6) This section expires July 1, 2011.

--- END ---