BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
HOME CARE QUALITY AUTHORITY
Sec. 101 RCW 41.56.030 and 2007 c 184 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Public employer" means any officer, board, commission,
council, or other person or body acting on behalf of any public body
governed by this chapter, or any subdivision of such public body. For
the purposes of this section, the public employer of district court or
superior court employees for wage-related matters is the respective
county legislative authority, or person or body acting on behalf of the
legislative authority, and the public employer for nonwage-related
matters is the judge or judge's designee of the respective district
court or superior court.
(2) "Public employee" means any employee of a public employer
except any person (a) elected by popular vote, or (b) appointed to
office pursuant to statute, ordinance or resolution for a specified
term of office as a member of a multimember board, commission, or
committee, whether appointed by the executive head or body of the
public employer, or (c) whose duties as deputy, administrative
assistant or secretary necessarily imply a confidential relationship to
(i) the executive head or body of the applicable bargaining unit, or
(ii) any person elected by popular vote, or (iii) any person appointed
to office pursuant to statute, ordinance or resolution for a specified
term of office as a member of a multimember board, commission, or
committee, whether appointed by the executive head or body of the
public employer, or (d) who is a court commissioner or a court
magistrate of superior court, district court, or a department of a
district court organized under chapter 3.46 RCW, or (e) who is a
personal assistant to a district court judge, superior court judge, or
court commissioner. For the purpose of (e) of this subsection, no more
than one assistant for each judge or commissioner may be excluded from
a bargaining unit.
(3) "Bargaining representative" means any lawful organization which
has as one of its primary purposes the representation of employees in
their employment relations with employers.
(4) "Collective bargaining" means the performance of the mutual
obligations of the public employer and the exclusive bargaining
representative to meet at reasonable times, to confer and negotiate in
good faith, and to execute a written agreement with respect to
grievance procedures and collective negotiations on personnel matters,
including wages, hours and working conditions, which may be peculiar to
an appropriate bargaining unit of such public employer, except that by
such obligation neither party shall be compelled to agree to a proposal
or be required to make a concession unless otherwise provided in this
chapter.
(5) "Commission" means the public employment relations commission.
(6) "Executive director" means the executive director of the
commission.
(7) "Uniformed personnel" means: (a) Law enforcement officers as
defined in RCW 41.26.030 employed by the governing body of any city or
town with a population of two thousand five hundred or more and law
enforcement officers employed by the governing body of any county with
a population of ten thousand or more; (b) correctional employees who
are uniformed and nonuniformed, commissioned and noncommissioned
security personnel employed in a jail as defined in RCW
70.48.020(((5))) (9), by a county with a population of seventy thousand
or more, and who are trained for and charged with the responsibility of
controlling and maintaining custody of inmates in the jail and
safeguarding inmates from other inmates; (c) general authority
Washington peace officers as defined in RCW 10.93.020 employed by a
port district in a county with a population of one million or more; (d)
security forces established under RCW 43.52.520; (e) firefighters as
that term is defined in RCW 41.26.030; (f) employees of a port district
in a county with a population of one million or more whose duties
include crash fire rescue or other firefighting duties; (g) employees
of fire departments of public employers who dispatch exclusively either
fire or emergency medical services, or both; or (h) employees in the
several classes of advanced life support technicians, as defined in RCW
18.71.200, who are employed by a public employer.
(8) "Institution of higher education" means the University of
Washington, Washington State University, Central Washington University,
Eastern Washington University, Western Washington University, The
Evergreen State College, and the various state community colleges.
(9) (("Home care quality authority" means the authority under
chapter 74.39A RCW.
(10))) "Individual provider" means an individual provider as
defined in RCW 74.39A.240(4) who, solely for the purposes of collective
bargaining, is a public employee as provided in RCW 74.39A.270.
(((11))) (10) "Child care subsidy" means a payment from the state
through a child care subsidy program established pursuant to RCW
74.12.340 or 74.08A.340, 45 C.F.R. Sec. 98.1 through 98.17, or any
successor program.
(((12))) (11) "Family child care provider" means a person who: (a)
Provides regularly scheduled care for a child or children in the home
of the provider or in the home of the child or children for periods of
less than twenty-four hours or, if necessary due to the nature of the
parent's work, for periods equal to or greater than twenty-four hours;
(b) receives child care subsidies; and (c) is either licensed by the
state under RCW 74.15.030 or is exempt from licensing under chapter
74.15 RCW.
(((13))) (12) "Adult family home provider" means a provider as
defined in RCW 70.128.010 who receives payments from the medicaid and
state-funded long-term care programs.

Sec. 102 RCW 43.105.340 and 2008 c 151 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall coordinate among state agencies to develop
a consumer protection web site. The web site shall serve as a one-stop
web site for consumer information. At a minimum, the web site must
provide links to information on:
(a) Insurance information provided by the office of the insurance
commissioner, including information on how to file consumer complaints
against insurance companies, how to look up authorized insurers, and
how to learn more about health insurance benefits;
(b) Child care information provided by the department of early
learning, including how to select a child care provider, how child care
providers are rated, and information about product recalls;
(c) Financial information provided by the department of financial
institutions, including consumer information on financial fraud,
investing, credit, and enforcement actions;
(d) Health care information provided by the department of health,
including health care provider listings and quality assurance
information;
(e) ((Home care information provided by the home care quality
authority, including information to assist consumers in finding an in-home provider;
(f))) Licensing information provided by the department of
licensing, including information regarding business, vehicle, and
professional licensing; and
(((g))) (f) Other information available on existing state agency
web sites that could be a helpful resource for consumers.
(2) By July 1, 2008, state agencies shall report to the department
on whether they maintain resources for consumers that could be made
available through the consumer protection web site.
(3) By September 1, 2008, the department shall make the consumer
protection web site available to the public.
(4) After September 1, 2008, the department, in coordination with
other state agencies, shall develop a plan on how to build upon the
consumer protection web site to create a consumer protection portal.
The plan must also include an examination of the feasibility of
developing a toll-free information line to support the consumer
protection portal. The plan must be submitted to the governor and the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2008.

Sec. 103 RCW 74.39A.095 and 2009 c 580 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In carrying out case management responsibilities established
under RCW 74.39A.090 for consumers who are receiving services under the
medicaid personal care, community options programs entry system or
chore services program through an individual provider, each area agency
on aging shall provide oversight of the care being provided to
consumers receiving services under this section to the extent of
available funding. Case management responsibilities incorporate this
oversight, and include, but are not limited to:
(a) Verification that any individual provider ((who has not been
referred to a consumer by the authority)) has met any training
requirements established by the department;
(b) Verification of a sample of worker time sheets;
(c) Monitoring the consumer's plan of care to verify that it
adequately meets the needs of the consumer, through activities such as
home visits, telephone contacts, and responses to information received
by the area agency on aging indicating that a consumer may be
experiencing problems relating to his or her home care;
(d) Reassessing and reauthorizing services;
(e) Monitoring of individual provider performance. If, in the
course of its case management activities, the area agency on aging
identifies concerns regarding the care being provided by an individual
provider ((who was referred by the authority)), the area agency on
aging must notify the ((authority)) department regarding its concerns;
and
(f) Conducting criminal background checks or verifying that
criminal background checks have been conducted for any individual
provider ((who has not been referred to a consumer by the authority)).
Individual providers who are hired after January 1, 2012, are subject
to background checks under RCW 74.39A.055.
(2) The area agency on aging case manager shall work with each
consumer to develop a plan of care under this section that identifies
and ensures coordination of health and long-term care services that
meet the consumer's needs. In developing the plan, they shall utilize,
and modify as needed, any comprehensive community service plan
developed by the department as provided in RCW 74.39A.040. The plan of
care shall include, at a minimum:
(a) The name and telephone number of the consumer's area agency on
aging case manager, and a statement as to how the case manager can be
contacted about any concerns related to the consumer's well-being or
the adequacy of care provided;
(b) The name and telephone numbers of the consumer's primary health
care provider, and other health or long-term care providers with whom
the consumer has frequent contacts;
(c) A clear description of the roles and responsibilities of the
area agency on aging case manager and the consumer receiving services
under this section;
(d) The duties and tasks to be performed by the area agency on
aging case manager and the consumer receiving services under this
section;
(e) The type of in-home services authorized, and the number of
hours of services to be provided;
(f) The terms of compensation of the individual provider;
(g) A statement by the individual provider that he or she has the
ability and willingness to carry out his or her responsibilities
relative to the plan of care; and
(h)(i) Except as provided in (h)(ii) of this subsection, a clear
statement indicating that a consumer receiving services under this
section has the right to waive any of the case management services
offered by the area agency on aging under this section, and a clear
indication of whether the consumer has, in fact, waived any of these
services.
(ii) The consumer's right to waive case management services does
not include the right to waive reassessment or reauthorization of
services, or verification that services are being provided in
accordance with the plan of care.
(3) Each area agency on aging shall retain a record of each waiver
of services included in a plan of care under this section.
(4) Each consumer has the right to direct and participate in the
development of their plan of care to the maximum practicable extent of
their abilities and desires, and to be provided with the time and
support necessary to facilitate that participation.
(5) A copy of the plan of care must be distributed to the
consumer's primary care provider, individual provider, and other
relevant providers with whom the consumer has frequent contact, as
authorized by the consumer.
(6) The consumer's plan of care shall be an attachment to the
contract between the department, or their designee, and the individual
provider.
(7) If the department or area agency on aging case manager finds
that an individual provider's inadequate performance or inability to
deliver quality care is jeopardizing the health, safety, or well-being
of a consumer receiving service under this section, the department or
the area agency on aging may take action to terminate the contract
between the department and the individual provider. If the department
or the area agency on aging has a reasonable, good faith belief that
the health, safety, or well-being of a consumer is in imminent
jeopardy, the department or area agency on aging may summarily suspend
the contract pending a fair hearing. The consumer may request a fair
hearing to contest the planned action of the case manager, as provided
in chapter 34.05 RCW. ((When the department or area agency on aging
terminates or summarily suspends a contract under this subsection, it
must provide oral and written notice of the action taken to the
authority.)) The department may by rule adopt guidelines for
implementing this subsection.
(8) The department or area agency on aging may reject a request by
a consumer receiving services under this section to have a family
member or other person serve as his or her individual provider if the
case manager has a reasonable, good faith belief that the family member
or other person will be unable to appropriately meet the care needs of
the consumer. The consumer may request a fair hearing to contest the
decision of the case manager, as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW. The
department may by rule adopt guidelines for implementing this
subsection.

Sec. 104 RCW 74.39A.220 and 2002 c 3 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The people of the state of Washington find as follows:
(1) Thousands of Washington seniors and persons with disabilities
live independently in their own homes, which they prefer and is less
costly than institutional care such as nursing homes.
(2) Many Washington seniors and persons with disabilities currently
receive long-term in-home care services from individual providers hired
directly by them under the medicaid personal care, community options
programs entry system, or chore services program.
(3) Quality long-term in-home care services allow Washington
seniors, persons with disabilities, and their families the choice of
allowing seniors and persons with disabilities to remain in their
homes, rather than forcing them into institutional care such as nursing
homes. Long-term in-home care services are also less costly, saving
Washington taxpayers significant amounts through lower reimbursement
rates.
(4) The quality of long-term in-home care services in Washington
would benefit from improved regulation, higher standards, better
accountability, and improved access to such services. The quality of
long-term in-home care services would further be improved by a well-trained, stable individual provider workforce earning reasonable wages
and benefits.
(5) ((Washington seniors and persons with disabilities would
benefit from the establishment of an authority that has the power and
duty to regulate and improve the quality of long-term in-home care
services.
(6))) The ((authority)) state should ensure that the quality of
long-term in-home care services provided by individual providers is
improved through better regulation, higher standards, increased
accountability, and the enhanced ability to obtain services. The
((authority)) state should also encourage stability in the individual
provider workforce through collective bargaining and by providing
training opportunities.

Sec. 105 RCW 74.39A.240 and 2002 c 3 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 74.39A.030
((and)), 74.39A.095 ((and)), 74.39A.220 through 74.39A.300, and
41.56.026((, 70.127.041, and 74.09.740)) unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) (("Authority" means the home care quality authority.
(2) "Board" means the board created under RCW 74.39A.230.
(3))) "Consumer" means a person to whom an individual provider
provides any such services.
(((4))) (2) "Individual provider" means a person, including a
personal aide, who has contracted with the department to provide
personal care or respite care services to functionally disabled persons
under the medicaid personal care, community options program entry
system, chore services program, or respite care program, or to provide
respite care or residential services and support to persons with
developmental disabilities under chapter 71A.12 RCW, or to provide
respite care as defined in RCW 74.13.270.

Sec. 106 RCW 74.39A.260 and 2009 c 580 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department must perform criminal background checks for
individual providers and prospective individual providers ((and ensure
that the authority has ready access to any long-term care abuse and
neglect registry used by the department)). Individual providers who
are hired after January 1, 2012, are subject to background checks under
RCW 74.39A.055.

Sec. 107 RCW 74.39A.270 and 2007 c 361 s 7 and 2007 c 278 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Solely for the purposes of collective bargaining and as
expressly limited under subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the
governor is the public employer, as defined in chapter 41.56 RCW, of
individual providers, who, solely for the purposes of collective
bargaining, are public employees as defined in chapter 41.56 RCW. To
accommodate the role of the state as payor for the community-based
services provided under this chapter and to ensure coordination with
state employee collective bargaining under chapter 41.80 RCW and the
coordination necessary to implement RCW 74.39A.300, the public employer
shall be represented for bargaining purposes by the governor or the
governor's designee appointed under chapter 41.80 RCW. The governor or
governor's designee shall periodically consult with the ((authority))
department during the collective bargaining process to allow the
((authority)) department to communicate issues relating to the long-term in-home care services received by consumers. The governor or the
governor's designee shall consult the ((authority)) department on all
issues for which the exclusive bargaining representative requests to
engage in collective bargaining under subsections (5) and (6) ((and
(7))) of this section. The ((authority)) department shall work with
the developmental disabilities council, the governor's committee on
disability issues and employment, the state council on aging, and other
consumer advocacy organizations to obtain informed input from consumers
on their interests, including impacts on consumer choice, for all
issues proposed for collective bargaining under subsections (5) and (6)
((and (7))) of this section.
(2) Chapter 41.56 RCW governs the collective bargaining
relationship between the governor and individual providers, except as
otherwise expressly provided in this chapter and except as follows:
(a) The only unit appropriate for the purpose of collective
bargaining under RCW 41.56.060 is a statewide unit of all individual
providers;
(b) The showing of interest required to request an election under
RCW 41.56.060 is ten percent of the unit, and any intervener seeking to
appear on the ballot must make the same showing of interest;
(c) The mediation and interest arbitration provisions of RCW
41.56.430 through 41.56.470 and 41.56.480 apply, except that:
(i) With respect to commencement of negotiations between the
governor and the bargaining representative of individual providers,
negotiations shall be commenced by May 1st of any year prior to the
year in which an existing collective bargaining agreement expires; and
(ii) The decision of the arbitration panel is not binding on the
legislature and, if the legislature does not approve the request for
funds necessary to implement the compensation and fringe benefit
provisions of the arbitrated collective bargaining agreement, is not
binding on ((the authority or)) the state;
(d) Individual providers do not have the right to strike; and
(e) Individual providers who are related to, or family members of,
consumers or prospective consumers are not, for that reason, exempt
from this chapter or chapter 41.56 RCW.
(3) Individual providers who are public employees solely for the
purposes of collective bargaining under subsection (1) of this section
are not, for that reason, employees of the state, its political
subdivisions, or an area agency on aging for any purpose. Chapter
41.56 RCW applies only to the governance of the collective bargaining
relationship between the employer and individual providers as provided
in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(4) Consumers and prospective consumers retain the right to select,
hire, supervise the work of, and terminate any individual provider
providing services to them. ((Consumers may elect to receive long-term
in-home care services from individual providers who are not referred to
them by the authority.))
(5) ((In implementing and administering this chapter, neither the
authority nor any of its contractors may reduce or increase the hours
of service for any consumer below or above the amount determined to be
necessary under any assessment prepared by the department or an area
agency on aging.
(6))) Except as expressly limited in this section and RCW
74.39A.300, the wages, hours, and working conditions of individual
providers are determined solely through collective bargaining as
provided in this chapter. No agency or department of the state may
establish policies or rules governing the wages or hours of individual
providers. However, this subsection does not modify:
(a) The department's authority to establish a plan of care for each
consumer or its core responsibility to manage long-term in-home care
services under this chapter, including determination of the level of
care that each consumer is eligible to receive. However, at the
request of the exclusive bargaining representative, the governor or the
governor's designee appointed under chapter 41.80 RCW shall engage in
collective bargaining, as defined in RCW 41.56.030(4), with the
exclusive bargaining representative over how the department's core
responsibility affects hours of work for individual providers. This
subsection shall not be interpreted to require collective bargaining
over an individual consumer's plan of care;
(b) The department's authority to terminate its contracts with
individual providers who are not adequately meeting the needs of a
particular consumer, or to deny a contract under RCW 74.39A.095(8);
(c) The consumer's right to assign hours to one or more individual
providers selected by the consumer within the maximum hours determined
by his or her plan of care;
(d) The consumer's right to select, hire, terminate, supervise the
work of, and determine the conditions of employment for each individual
provider providing services to the consumer under this chapter;
(e) The department's obligation to comply with the federal medicaid
statute and regulations and the terms of any community-based waiver
granted by the federal department of health and human services and to
ensure federal financial participation in the provision of the
services; and
(f) The legislature's right to make programmatic modifications to
the delivery of state services under this title, including standards of
eligibility of consumers and individual providers participating in the
programs under this title, and the nature of services provided. The
governor shall not enter into, extend, or renew any agreement under
this chapter that does not expressly reserve the legislative rights
described in this subsection (((6))) (5)(f).
(((7))) (6) At the request of the exclusive bargaining
representative, the governor or the governor's designee appointed under
chapter 41.80 RCW shall engage in collective bargaining, as defined in
RCW 41.56.030(4), with the exclusive bargaining representative over
employer contributions to the training partnership for the costs of:
(a) Meeting all training and peer mentoring required under this
chapter; and (b) other training intended to promote the career
development of individual providers.
(((8)(a))) (7) The state, the department, ((the authority,)) the
area agencies on aging, or their contractors under this chapter may not
be held vicariously or jointly liable for the action or inaction of any
individual provider or prospective individual provider, whether or not
that individual provider or prospective individual provider was
included on the ((authority's)) referral registry or referred to a
consumer or prospective consumer. The existence of a collective
bargaining agreement, the placement of an individual provider on the
referral registry, or the development or approval of a plan of care for
a consumer who chooses to use the services of an individual provider
and the provision of case management services to that consumer, by the
department or an area agency on aging, does not constitute a special
relationship with the consumer.
(((b) The members of the board are immune from any liability
resulting from implementation of this chapter.
(9))) (8) Nothing in this section affects the state's
responsibility with respect to unemployment insurance for individual
providers. However, individual providers are not to be considered, as
a result of the state assuming this responsibility, employees of the
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 (1) The home care quality authority is
hereby abolished and its powers, duties, and functions are hereby
transferred to the department of social and health services. All
references to the home care quality authority in the Revised Code of
Washington shall be construed to mean the department of social and
health services.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the home care quality
authority shall be delivered to the custody of the department of social
and health services. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor
vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the home care quality
authority shall be made available to the department of social and
health services. All funds, credits, or other assets held by the home
care quality authority shall be assigned to the department of social
and health services.
(b) Any appropriations made to the home care quality authority
shall, on the effective date of this section, be transferred and
credited to the department of social and health services.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any funds, books,
documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible
property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance
of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial
management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and
certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All rules and all pending business before the home care quality
authority shall be continued and acted upon by the department of social
and health services. All existing contracts and obligations shall
remain in full force and shall be performed by the department of social
and health services.
(4) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the home care quality authority shall not affect the validity of any
act performed before the effective date of this section.
(5) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(6) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the public
employment relations commission as provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 RCW 74.39A.290 is decodified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 70.127.041 (Home care quality authority not subject to
regulation) and 2002 c 3 s 13;
(2) RCW 74.39A.230 (Authority created) and 2002 c 3 s 2;
(3) RCW 74.39A.250 (Authority duties) and 2002 c 3 s 4; and
(4) RCW 74.39A.280 (Powers) and 2002 c 3 s 7.

PART II
DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND
Sec. 201 RCW 74.18.020 and 2003 c 409 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Department" means ((an agency of state government called the
department of services for the blind)) the department of social and
health services.
(2) (("Director" means the director of the department of services
for the blind. The director is appointed by the governor with the
consent of the senate.)) "Secretary" means the secretary of the
department.
(3) "Rehabilitation council for the blind" means the body of
members appointed by the governor in accordance with the provisions of
RCW 74.18.070 to advise the state agency.
(4) "Blind person" means a person who: (a) Has no vision or whose
vision with corrective lenses is so limited that the individual
requires alternative methods or skills to do efficiently those things
that are ordinarily done with sight by individuals with normal vision;
(b) has an eye condition of a progressive nature which may lead to
blindness; or (c) is blind for purposes of the business enterprise
program as set forth in RCW 74.18.200 through 74.18.230 in accordance
with requirements of the Randolph-Sheppard Act of 1936.
(5) "Telephonic reading service" means audio information provided
by telephone, including the acquisition and distribution of daily
newspapers and other information of local, state, or national interest.

Sec. 202 RCW 74.18.030 and 1983 c 194 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
((There is hereby created an agency of state government to be known
as the department of services for the blind.)) The department shall
deliver services to blind persons to the extent that appropriations are
made available, provided that applicants meet the eligibility criteria
for services authorized by this chapter.

Sec. 203 RCW 74.18.045 and 2003 c 409 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The ((director)) department shall provide access to a
telephonic reading service for blind and disabled persons.
(b) The ((director)) department shall establish criteria for
eligibility for blind and disabled persons who may receive the
telephonic reading services. The criteria may be based upon the
eligibility criteria for persons who receive services established by
the national library service for the blind and physically handicapped
of the library of congress.
(2) The ((director)) secretary or designee may enter into contracts
or other agreements that he or she determines to be appropriate to
provide telephonic reading services pursuant to this section.
(3) The ((director)) secretary or designee may expand the type and
scope of materials available on the telephonic reading service in order
to meet the local, regional, or foreign language needs of blind or
visually impaired residents of this state. The ((director)) secretary
or designee may also expand the scope of services and availability of
telephonic reading services by current methods and technologies that
may be developed. The ((director)) secretary or designee may inform
current and potential patrons of the availability of telephonic reading
services through appropriate means, including, but not limited to,
direct mailings, direct telephonic contact, and public service
announcements.
(4) The ((director)) secretary or designee may expend moneys from
the business enterprises revolving account accrued from vending machine
sales in state and local government buildings, as well as donations and
grants, for the purpose of supporting the cost of activities described
in this section.

Sec. 204 RCW 74.18.070 and 2003 c 409 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created the rehabilitation council for the
blind. The rehabilitation council shall consist of the minimum number
of voting members to meet the requirements of the rehabilitation
council required under the federal rehabilitation act of 1973 as now or
hereafter amended. A majority of the voting members shall be blind
persons. Rehabilitation council members shall be residents of the
state of Washington, and shall be appointed in accordance with the
categories of membership specified in the federal rehabilitation act of
1973 as now or hereafter amended. The ((director of the department))
secretary or designee shall be an ex officio, nonvoting member.
(2) The governor shall appoint members of the rehabilitation
council for terms of three years, except that the initial appointments
shall be as follows: (a) Three members for terms of three years; (b)
two members for terms of two years; and (c) other members for terms of
one year. Vacancies in the membership of the rehabilitation council
shall be filled by the governor for the remainder of the unexpired
term.
(3) The governor may remove members of the rehabilitation council
for cause.

Sec. 205 RCW 74.18.080 and 2000 c 57 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The rehabilitation council for the blind shall meet officially
with the ((director of the department)) secretary or designee quarterly
to perform the duties enumerated in RCW 74.18.090. Additional meetings
of the rehabilitation council may be convened at the call of the
chairperson or of a majority of the members. The rehabilitation
council shall elect a chairperson from among its members for a term of
one year or until a successor has been elected.
(2) Rehabilitation council members shall receive reimbursement for
travel expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 206 RCW 74.18.090 and 2003 c 409 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
The rehabilitation council for the blind may:
(1) Provide counsel to the ((director)) department in developing,
reviewing, making recommendations, and agreeing on the department's
state plan for vocational rehabilitation, budget requests, permanent
rules concerning services to blind persons, and other major policies
which impact the quality or quantity of services for blind persons;
(2) Undertake annual reviews with the ((director)) department of
the needs of blind persons, the effectiveness of the services and
priorities of the department to meet those needs, and the measures that
could be taken to improve the department's services;
(3) Annually make recommendations to the governor and the
legislature on issues related to the department, other state agencies,
or state laws which have a significant effect on the opportunities,
services, or rights of blind persons;
(4) ((Advise and make recommendations to the governor on the
criteria and qualifications pertinent to the selection of the director;
(5))) Perform additional functions as required by the federal
rehabilitation act of 1973 as now or hereafter amended.

Sec. 207 RCW 74.18.100 and 2000 c 57 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be the duty of the ((director)) secretary or designee to
consult in a timely manner with the rehabilitation council for the
blind on the matters enumerated in RCW 74.18.090. The ((director))
secretary or designee shall provide appropriate departmental resources
for the use of the rehabilitation council in conducting its official
business.

Sec. 208 RCW 74.18.190 and 1983 c 194 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department may offer services to assist blind children and
their families to learn skills and locate resources which increase the
child's ability for personal development and participation in society.
(2) Services provided under this section may include:
(a) Direct consultation with blind children and their families to
provide needs assessment, counseling, developmental training, adaptive
skills, and information regarding other available resources;
(b) Consultation and technical assistance in all sectors of
society, at the request of a blind child, his or her family, or a
service provider working with the child or family, to assure the blind
child's rights to participate fully in educational, vocational, and
social opportunities. The department is encouraged to establish
working agreements and arrangements with community organizations and
other state agencies which provide services to blind children.
(3) To facilitate the coordination of services to blind children
and their families, the office of superintendent of public instruction
and the department ((of services for the blind)) shall negotiate an
interagency agreement providing for coordinated service delivery and
the sharing of information between the two agencies, including an
annual register of blind students in the state of Washington.

Sec. 209 RCW 28A.155.160 and 2009 c 381 s 24 are each amended to
read as follows:
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, the department of early learning,
the Washington state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss,
the Washington state school for the blind, school districts,
educational service districts, and all other state and local government
educational agencies and the department of ((services for the blind,
the department of)) social and health services, and all other state and
local government agencies concerned with the care, education, or
habilitation or rehabilitation of children with disabilities may enter
into interagency cooperative agreements for the purpose of providing
assistive technology devices and services to children with
disabilities. Such arrangements may include but are not limited to
interagency agreements for the acquisition, including joint funding,
maintenance, loan, sale, lease, or transfer of assistive technology
devices and for the provision of assistive technology services
including but not limited to assistive technology assessments and
training.
For the purposes of this section, "assistive device" means any
item, piece of equipment, or product system, whether acquired
commercially off-the-shelf, modified, or customized, that is used to
increase, maintain, or improve functional capabilities of children with
disabilities. The term "assistive technology service" means any
service that directly assists a child with a disability in the
selection, acquisition, or use of an assistive technology device.
Assistive technology service includes:
(1) The evaluation of the needs of a child with a disability,
including a functional evaluation of the child in the child's customary
environment;
(2) Purchasing, leasing, or otherwise providing for the acquisition
of assistive technology devices by children with disabilities;
(3) Selecting, designing, fitting, customizing, adapting, applying,
retaining, repairing, or replacing of assistive technology devices;
(4) Coordinating and using other therapies, interventions, or
services with assistive technology devices, such as those associated
with existing education and rehabilitation plans and programs;
(5) Training or technical assistance for a child with a disability
or if appropriate, the child's family; and
(6) Training or technical assistance for professionals, including
individuals providing education and rehabilitation services, employers,
or other individuals who provide services to, employ, or are otherwise
substantially involved in the major life functions of children with
disabilities.

Sec. 210 RCW 41.05.225 and 2002 c 71 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall offer a plan of health insurance to blind
licensees who are actively operating facilities and participating in
the business enterprises program established in RCW 74.18.200 through
74.18.230, and maintained by the department of social and health
services ((for the blind)). The plan of health insurance benefits must
be the same or substantially similar to the plan of health insurance
benefits offered to state employees under this chapter. Enrollment
will be at the option of each individual licensee or vendor, under
rules established by the board.
(2) All costs incurred by the state or the board for providing
health insurance coverage to active blind vendors, excluding family
participation, under subsection (1) of this section may be paid for
from net proceeds from vending machine operations in public buildings
under RCW 74.18.230.
(3) Money from the business enterprises program under the federal
Randolph-Sheppard Act may not be used for family participation in the
health insurance benefits provided under this section. Family
insurance benefits are the sole responsibility of the individual blind
vendors.

Sec. 211 RCW 42.17.2401 and 2009 c 565 s 24 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 42.17.240, the term "executive state
officer" includes:
(1) The chief administrative law judge, the director of
agriculture, the administrator of the Washington basic health plan,
((the director of the department of services for the blind,)) the
director of the state system of community and technical colleges, the
director of commerce, the secretary of corrections, the director of
early learning, the director of ecology, the commissioner of employment
security, the chair of the energy facility site evaluation council, the
secretary of the state finance committee, the director of financial
management, the director of fish and wildlife, the executive secretary
of the forest practices appeals board, the director of the gambling
commission, the director of general administration, the secretary of
health, the administrator of the Washington state health care
authority, the executive secretary of the health care facilities
authority, the executive secretary of the higher education facilities
authority, the executive secretary of the horse racing commission, the
executive secretary of the human rights commission, the executive
secretary of the indeterminate sentence review board, the director of
the department of information services, the executive director of the
state investment board, the director of labor and industries, the
director of licensing, the director of the lottery commission, the
director of the office of minority and women's business enterprises,
the director of parks and recreation, the director of personnel, the
executive director of the public disclosure commission, the executive
director of the Puget Sound partnership, the director of the recreation
and conservation office, the director of retirement systems, the
director of revenue, the secretary of social and health services, the
chief of the Washington state patrol, the executive secretary of the
board of tax appeals, the secretary of transportation, the secretary of
the utilities and transportation commission, the director of veterans
affairs, the president of each of the regional and state universities
and the president of The Evergreen State College, and each district and
each campus president of each state community college;
(2) Each professional staff member of the office of the governor;
(3) Each professional staff member of the legislature; and
(4) Central Washington University board of trustees, the boards of
trustees of each community college and each technical college, each
member of the state board for community and technical colleges, state
convention and trade center board of directors, committee for deferred
compensation, Eastern Washington University board of trustees,
Washington economic development finance authority, The Evergreen State
College board of trustees, executive ethics board, forest practices
appeals board, forest practices board, gambling commission, life
sciences discovery fund authority board of trustees, Washington health
care facilities authority, each member of the Washington health
services commission, higher education coordinating board, higher
education facilities authority, horse racing commission, state housing
finance commission, human rights commission, indeterminate sentence
review board, board of industrial insurance appeals, information
services board, recreation and conservation funding board, state
investment board, commission on judicial conduct, legislative ethics
board, liquor control board, lottery commission, marine oversight
board, Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning
council, parks and recreation commission, board of pilotage
commissioners, pollution control hearings board, public disclosure
commission, public pension commission, shorelines hearings board,
public employees' benefits board, salmon recovery funding board, board
of tax appeals, transportation commission, University of Washington
board of regents, utilities and transportation commission, Washington
state maritime commission, Washington personnel resources board,
Washington public power supply system executive board, Washington State
University board of regents, Western Washington University board of
trustees, and fish and wildlife commission.

Sec. 212 RCW 43.01.090 and 2005 c 330 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director of general administration may assess a charge or rent
against each state board, commission, agency, office, department,
activity, or other occupant or user for payment of a proportionate
share of costs for occupancy of buildings, structures, or facilities
including but not limited to all costs of acquiring, constructing,
operating, and maintaining such buildings, structures, or facilities
and the repair, remodeling, or furnishing thereof and for the rendering
of any service or the furnishing or providing of any supplies,
equipment, historic furnishings, or materials.
The director of general administration may recover the full costs
including appropriate overhead charges of the foregoing by periodic
billings as determined by the director including but not limited to
transfers upon accounts and advancements into the general
administration services account. Charges related to the rendering of
real estate services under RCW 43.82.010 and to the operation and
maintenance of public and historic facilities at the state capitol, as
defined in RCW 79.24.710, shall be allocated separately from other
charges assessed under this section. Rates shall be established by the
director of general administration after consultation with the director
of financial management. The director of general administration may
allot, provide, or furnish any of such facilities, structures,
services, equipment, supplies, or materials to any other public service
type occupant or user at such rates or charges as are equitable and
reasonably reflect the actual costs of the services provided:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the legislature, its duly constituted
committees, interim committees and other committees shall be exempted
from the provisions of this section.
Upon receipt of such bill, each entity, occupant, or user shall
cause a warrant or check in the amount thereof to be drawn in favor of
the department of general administration which shall be deposited in
the state treasury to the credit of the general administration services
account unless the director of financial management has authorized
another method for payment of costs.
Beginning July 1, 1995, the director of general administration
shall assess a capital projects surcharge upon each agency or other
user occupying a facility owned and managed by the department of
general administration in Thurston county, excluding state capitol
public and historic facilities, as defined in RCW 79.24.710. The
capital projects surcharge does not apply to agencies or users that
agree to pay all future repairs, improvements, and renovations to the
buildings they occupy and a proportional share, as determined by the
office of financial management, of all other campus repairs,
installations, improvements, and renovations that provide a benefit to
the buildings they occupy or that have an agreement with the department
of general administration that contains a charge for a similar purpose,
including but not limited to RCW 43.01.091, in an amount greater than
the capital projects surcharge. Beginning July 1, 2002, the capital
projects surcharge does not apply to department of social and health
services ((for the blind)) vendors who, pursuant to chapter 74.18 RCW,
operate cafeteria services in facilities owned and managed by the
department of general administration; the department shall consider
this space to be a common area for purposes of allocating the capital
projects surcharge to other building tenants beginning July 1, 2003.
The director, after consultation with the director of financial
management, shall adopt differential capital project surcharge rates to
reflect the differences in facility type and quality. The initial
payment structure for this surcharge shall be one dollar per square
foot per year. The surcharge shall increase over time to an amount
that when combined with the facilities and service charge equals the
market rate for similar types of lease space in the area or equals five
dollars per square foot per year, whichever is less. The capital
projects surcharge shall be in addition to other charges assessed under
this section. Proceeds from the capital projects surcharge shall be
deposited into the Thurston county capital facilities account created
in RCW 43.19.501.

Sec. 213 RCW 47.38.070 and 2009 c 459 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) As a necessary and desirable step to spur public and private
investment in electric vehicle infrastructure in accordance with
section 1, chapter 459, Laws of 2009, and to begin implementing the
provisions of RCW 43.19.648, the legislature authorizes an alternative
fuels corridor pilot project capable of supporting electric vehicle
charging and battery exchange technologies.
(2) To the extent permitted under federal programs, rules, or law,
the department may enter into partnership agreements with other public
and private entities for the use of land and facilities along state
routes and within interstate highway rights-of-way for an alternative
fuels corridor pilot project. At a minimum, the pilot project must:
(a) Limit renewable fuel and vehicle technology offerings to those
with a forecasted demand over the next fifteen years and approved by
the department;
(b) Ensure that a pilot project site does not compete with existing
retail businesses in the same geographic area for the provision of the
same refueling services, recharging technologies, or other retail
commercial activities;
(c) Provide existing truck stop operators and retail truck
refueling businesses with an absolute right of first refusal over the
offering of refueling services to class six trucks with a maximum gross
vehicle weight of twenty-six thousand pounds within the same geographic
area identified for a possible pilot project site;
(d) Reach agreement with the department of social and health
services ((for the blind)) ensuring that any activities at host sites
do not materially affect the revenues forecasted from their vending
operations at each site;
(e) Regulate the internal rate of return from the partnership,
including provisions to reduce or eliminate the level of state support
once the partnership attains economic self-sufficiency;
(f) Be limited to not more than five locations on state-owned land
within federal interstate rights-of-way or state highway rights-of-way
in Washington; and
(g) Be limited in duration to a term of years reasonably necessary
for the partnership to recover the cost of capital investments, plus
the regulated internal rate of return.
(3) The department is not responsible for providing capital
equipment nor operating refueling or recharging services. The
department must provide periodic status reports on the pilot project to
the office of financial management and the relevant standing committees
of the legislature not less than every biennium.
(4) The provisions of this section are subject to the availability
of existing funds. However, capital improvements under this section
must be funded with federal or private funds.

Sec. 214 RCW 74.09.720 and 1983 c 194 s 26 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A prevention of blindness program is hereby established in the
department of social and health services to provide prompt, specialized
medical eye care, including assistance with costs when necessary, for
conditions in which sight is endangered or sight can be restored or
significantly improved. The department of social and health services
shall adopt rules concerning program eligibility, levels of assistance,
and the scope of services.
(2) The department of social and health services shall employ on a
part-time basis an ophthalmological and/or an optometrical consultant
to provide liaison with participating eye physicians and to review
medical recommendations made by an applicant's eye physician to
determine whether the proposed services meet program standards.
(((3) The department of social and health services and the
department of services for the blind shall formulate a cooperative
agreement concerning referral of clients between the two agencies and
the coordination of policies and services.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 215 (1) The department of services for the
blind is hereby abolished and its powers, duties, and functions are
hereby transferred to the department of social and health services.
All references to the director or the department of services for the
blind in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the
secretary or the department of social and health services.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the department of
services for the blind shall be delivered to the custody of the
department of social and health services. All cabinets, furniture,
office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed
by the department of services for the blind shall be made available to
the department of social and health services. All funds, credits, or
other assets held by the department of services for the blind shall be
assigned to the department of social and health services.
(b) Any appropriations made to the department of services for the
blind shall, on the effective date of this section, be transferred and
credited to the department of social and health services.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel,
funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other
tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the
performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of
financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the department of services for the blind
engaged in performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred are
transferred to the jurisdiction of the department of social and health
services. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state
civil service law, are assigned to the department of social and health
services to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly,
without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be
appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing
state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the department of
services for the blind shall be continued and acted upon by the
department of social and health services. All existing contracts and
obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the
department of social and health services.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the department of services for the blind shall not affect the validity
of any act performed before the effective date of this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) All classified employees of the department of services for the
blind assigned to the department of social and health services under
this act whose positions are within an existing bargaining unit
description at the department of social and health services shall
become a part of the existing bargaining unit and shall be considered
an appropriate addition or modification of the existing bargaining unit
under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW.

PART III
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---