BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.95.003 and 2007 c 362 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board is created within the department of corrections. The
board shall consist of a ((chairman)) chair and four other members,
each of whom shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the
senate. Each member shall hold office for a term of five years, and
until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. The terms shall
expire on April 15th of the expiration year. Vacancies in the
membership of the board shall be filled by appointment by the governor
with the consent of the senate. In the event of the inability of any
member to act, the governor shall appoint some competent person to act
in ((his)) the member's stead during the continuance of such inability.
The members shall not be removable during their respective terms except
for cause determined by the superior court of Thurston county. The
governor in appointing the members shall designate one of them to serve
as ((chairman)) chair at the governor's pleasure. The appointed
((chairman)) chair shall serve as a fully participating board member
((and as the director of the agency)).
The members of the board and ((its officers and employees)) staff
assigned to the board shall not engage in any other business or
profession or hold any other public office without the prior approval
of the executive ethics board indicating compliance with RCW 42.52.020,
42.52.030, 42.52.040 and 42.52.120; nor shall they, at the time of
appointment or employment or during their incumbency, serve as the
representative of any political party on an executive committee or
other governing body thereof, or as an executive officer or employee of
any political committee or association. The members of the board shall
each severally receive salaries fixed by the governor in accordance
with the provisions of RCW 43.03.040, and in addition shall receive
travel expenses incurred in the discharge of their official duties in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Employees assigned to the
board shall be employees of the department.
The ((board)) secretary may employ((, and fix, with the approval of
the governor, the compensation of and prescribe the duties of)) a
senior administrative officer and such ((officers, employees, and
assistants)) other personnel as may be necessary((, and provide
necessary quarters, supplies, and equipment)) to carry out the duties
of the board.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.95.005 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 318 are each
amended to read as follows:
The board shall meet at major state correctional institutions at
such times as may be necessary for a full and complete study of the
cases of all convicted persons whose durations of confinement are to be
determined by it; whose community custody supervision is under the
board's authority; or whose applications for parole come before it.
Other times and places of meetings may also be fixed by the board.
The superintendents of the different institutions shall provide
suitable quarters for the board and ((assistants)) staff while in the
discharge of their duties.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.95.007 and 1986 c 224 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board may meet and transact business in panels. Each board
panel shall consist of at least two members of the board. In all
matters concerning the internal affairs of the board and policy-making
decisions, a majority of the full board must concur in such matters.
The ((chairman)) chair of the board with the consent of a majority of
the board may designate any two members to exercise all the powers and
duties of the board in connection with any hearing before the board.
If the two members so designated cannot unanimously agree as to the
disposition of the hearing assigned to them, such hearing shall be
reheard by the full board. All actions of the full board shall be by
concurrence of a majority of the sitting board members.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.95.140 and 2009 c 28 s 29 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall cause a complete record to be kept of every
prisoner under the jurisdiction of the board released on parole or
community custody. Such records shall be organized in accordance with
the most modern methods of filing and indexing so that there will be
always immediately available complete information about each such
prisoner. Subject to information sharing provisions related to
mentally ill offenders((,)) and the end of sentence review committee,
((and the department of corrections,)) the board may make rules as to
the privacy of such records and their use by others than the board and
((its)) the department of corrections staff assigned to perform board-related duties. Sex offenders convicted of crimes committed before
July 1, 1984, who are under the board's jurisdiction shall be subject
to the determinations of the end of sentence review committee regarding
risk level and subject to sex offender registration and community
notification. The board and the department of corrections staff
assigned to perform board-related duties shall be immune from liability
for the release of information concerning sex offenders as provided in
RCW 4.24.550.
The superintendents of state correctional facilities and all
officers and employees thereof and all other public officials shall at
all times cooperate with the board and furnish to the board((, its
officers, and employees)) and the department of corrections staff
assigned to perform board-related duties such information as may be
necessary to enable it to perform its functions, and such
superintendents and other employees shall at all times give the members
of the board((, its officers, and employees)) and the department of
corrections staff assigned to perform board-related duties free access
to all prisoners confined in the state correctional facilities.
(2) Offenders sentenced under RCW 9.94A.507 shall be subject to the
determinations of the end of sentence review committee regarding risk
level and subject to sex offender registration and community
notification.
(3) The end of sentence review committee shall make law enforcement
notifications for offenders under board jurisdiction on the same basis
that it notifies law enforcement regarding offenders sentenced under
chapter 9.94A RCW for crimes committed after July 1, 1984.

Sec. 5 RCW 9.95.280 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 344 are each
amended to read as follows:
The secretary of corrections or the secretary's designee, upon
recommendation by the board, may deputize any person (regularly
employed by another state) to act as an officer and agent of this state
in effecting the return of any person convicted of a crime committed
before July 1, 1984, who has violated the terms and conditions of
parole or probation as granted by this state. In any matter relating
to the return of such a person, any agent so deputized shall have all
the powers of a police officer of this state.

Sec. 6 RCW 9.95.300 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 346 are each
amended to read as follows:
The secretary of corrections or the secretary's designee, upon
recommendation by the board, may enter into contracts with ((similar))
officials of any other state or states for the purpose of sharing an
equitable portion of the cost of effecting the return of any person who
has violated the terms and conditions of parole, probation, or
community custody as granted by this state.

Sec. 7 RCW 9.96.050 and 2009 c 325 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) When an offender on parole has performed all obligations of
his or her release, including any and all legal financial obligations,
for such time as shall satisfy the indeterminate sentence review board
that his or her final release is not incompatible with the best
interests of society and the welfare of the paroled individual, the
board may make a final order of discharge and issue a certificate of
discharge to the offender.
(b) The board retains the jurisdiction to issue a certificate of
discharge after the expiration of the offender's or parolee's maximum
statutory sentence. If not earlier granted and any and all legal
financial obligations have been paid, the board shall issue a final
order of discharge three years from the date of parole unless the
parolee is on suspended or revoked status at the expiration of the
three years.
(c) The discharge, regardless of when issued, shall have the effect
of restoring all civil rights not already restored by RCW 29A.08.520,
and the certification of discharge shall so state.
(d) This restoration of civil rights shall not restore the right to
receive, possess, own, or transport firearms.
(e) The board shall issue a certificate of discharge to the
offender in person or by mail to the offender's last known address.
(2) ((The board shall send to the department of corrections)) A
copy of every signed certificate of discharge for offender sentences
under the authority of the department of corrections shall be placed in
the department's files.
(3) The discharge provided for in this section shall be considered
as a part of the sentence of the convicted person and shall not in any
manner be construed as affecting the powers of the governor to pardon
any such person.

Sec. 8 RCW 71.05.385 and 2009 c 320 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A mental health service provider shall release to the persons
authorized under subsection (2) of this section, upon request:
(a) The fact, place, and date of an involuntary commitment, the
fact and date of discharge or release, and the last known address of a
person who has been committed under this chapter.
(b) Information related to mental health services, in the format
determined under subsection (9) of this section, concerning a person
who:
(i) Is currently committed to the custody or supervision of the
department of corrections or the indeterminate sentence review board
under chapter 9.94A or 9.95 RCW;
(ii) Has been convicted or found not guilty by reason of insanity
of a serious violent offense; or
(iii) Was charged with a serious violent offense and such charges
were dismissed under RCW 10.77.086.
Legal counsel may release such information to the persons
authorized under subsection (2) of this section on behalf of the mental
health service provider, provided that nothing in this subsection shall
require the disclosure of attorney work product or attorney-client
privileged information.
(2) The information subject to release under subsection (1) of this
section shall be released to law enforcement officers, personnel of a
county or city jail, designated mental health professionals, public
health officers, therapeutic court personnel, personnel of the
department of corrections, ((or personnel of)) including the
indeterminate sentence review board and personnel assigned to perform
board-related duties, when such information is requested during the
course of business and for the purpose of carrying out the
responsibilities of the requesting person's office. No mental health
service provider or person employed by a mental health service
provider, or its legal counsel, shall be liable for information
released to or used under the provisions of this section or rules
adopted under this section except under RCW 71.05.440.
(3) A person who requests information under subsection (1)(b) of
this section must comply with the following restrictions:
(a) Information must be requested only for the purposes permitted
by this subsection and for the purpose of carrying out the
responsibilities of the requesting person's office. Appropriate
purposes for requesting information under this section include:
(i) Completing presentence investigations or risk assessment
reports;
(ii) Assessing a person's risk to the community;
(iii) Assessing a person's risk of harm to self or others when
confined in a city or county jail;
(iv) Planning for and provision of supervision of an offender,
including decisions related to sanctions for violations of conditions
of community supervision; and
(v) Responding to an offender's failure to report for department of
corrections supervision.
(b) Information shall not be requested under this section unless
the requesting person has reasonable suspicion that the individual who
is the subject of the information:
(i) Has engaged in activity indicating that a crime or a violation
of community custody or parole has been committed or, based upon his or
her current or recent past behavior, is likely to be committed in the
near future; or
(ii) Is exhibiting signs of a deterioration in mental functioning
which may make the individual appropriate for civil commitment under
this chapter.
(c) Any information received under this section shall be held
confidential and subject to the limitations on disclosure outlined in
this chapter, except:
(i) Such information may be shared with other persons who have the
right to request similar information under subsection (2) of this
section, solely for the purpose of coordinating activities related to
the individual who is the subject of the information in a manner
consistent with the official responsibilities of the persons involved;
(ii) Such information may be shared with a prosecuting attorney
acting in an advisory capacity for a person who receives information
under this section. A prosecuting attorney under this subsection shall
be subject to the same restrictions and confidentiality limitations as
the person who requested the information; and
(iii) As provided in RCW 72.09.585.
(4) A request for information related to mental health services
under this section shall not require the consent of the subject of the
records. Such request shall be provided in writing, except to the
extent authorized in subsection (5) of this section. A written request
may include requests made by e-mail or facsimile so long as the
requesting person is clearly identified. The request must specify the
information being requested.
(5) In the event of an emergency situation that poses a significant
risk to the public or the offender, a mental health service provider,
or its legal counsel, shall release information related to mental
health services delivered to the offender and, if known, information
regarding where the offender is likely to be found to the department of
corrections or law enforcement upon request. The initial request may
be written or oral. All oral requests must be subsequently confirmed
in writing. Information released in response to an oral request is
limited to a statement as to whether the offender is or is not being
treated by the mental health service provider and the address or
information about the location or whereabouts of the offender.
(6) Disclosure under this section to state or local law enforcement
authorities is mandatory for the purposes of the health insurance
portability and accountability act.
(7) Whenever federal law or federal regulations restrict the
release of information contained in the treatment records of any
patient who receives treatment for alcoholism or drug dependency, the
release of the information may be restricted as necessary to comply
with federal law and regulations.
(8) This section does not modify the terms and conditions of
disclosure of information related to sexually transmitted diseases
under chapter 70.24 RCW.
(9) In collaboration with interested organizations, the department
shall develop a standard form for requests for information related to
mental health services made under this section and a standard format
for information provided in response to such requests. Consistent with
the goals of the health information privacy provisions of the federal
health insurance portability and accountability act, in developing the
standard form for responsive information, the department shall design
the form in such a way that the information disclosed is limited to the
minimum necessary to serve the purpose for which the information is
requested.

Sec. 9 RCW 72.09.585 and 2004 c 166 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When the department is determining an offender's risk
management level, the department shall inquire of the offender and
shall be told whether the offender is subject to court-ordered
treatment for mental health services or chemical dependency services.
The department shall request and the offender shall provide an
authorization to release information form that meets applicable state
and federal requirements and shall provide the offender with written
notice that the department will request the offender's mental health
and substance abuse treatment information. An offender's failure to
inform the department of court-ordered treatment is a violation of the
conditions of supervision if the offender is in the community and an
infraction if the offender is in confinement, and the violation or
infraction is subject to sanctions.
(2) When an offender discloses that he or she is subject to court-ordered mental health services or chemical dependency treatment, the
department shall provide the mental health services provider or
chemical dependency treatment provider with a written request for
information and any necessary authorization to release information
forms. The written request shall comply with rules adopted by the
department of social and health services or protocols developed jointly
by the department and the department of social and health services. A
single request shall be valid for the duration of the offender's
supervision in the community. Disclosures of information related to
mental health services made pursuant to a department request shall not
require consent of the offender.
(3) The information received by the department under RCW 71.05.445
or ((71.34.225)) 71.34.345 may be released to the indeterminate
sentence review board as relevant to carry out its responsibility of
planning and ensuring community protection with respect to persons
under its jurisdiction. Further disclosure by the indeterminate
sentence review board is subject to the limitations set forth in
subsections (5) and (6) of this section and must be consistent with the
written policy of the indeterminate sentence review board. The
decision to disclose or not shall not result in civil liability for the
indeterminate sentence review board or ((its employees)) staff assigned
to perform board-related duties provided that the decision was reached
in good faith and without gross negligence.
(4) The information received by the department under RCW 71.05.445
or ((71.34.225)) 71.34.345 may be used to meet the statutory duties of
the department to provide evidence or report to the court. Disclosure
to the public of information provided to the court by the department
related to mental health services shall be limited in accordance with
RCW 9.94A.500 or this section.
(5) The information received by the department under RCW 71.05.445
or ((71.34.225)) 71.34.345 may be disclosed by the department to other
state and local agencies as relevant to plan for and provide offenders
transition, treatment, and supervision services, or as relevant and
necessary to protect the public and counteract the danger created by a
particular offender, and in a manner consistent with the written policy
established by the secretary. The decision to disclose or not shall
not result in civil liability for the department or its employees so
long as the decision was reached in good faith and without gross
negligence. The information received by a state or local agency from
the department shall remain confidential and subject to the limitations
on disclosure set forth in chapters 70.02, 71.05, and 71.34 RCW and,
subject to these limitations, may be released only as relevant and
necessary to counteract the danger created by a particular offender.
(6) The information received by the department under RCW 71.05.445
or ((71.34.225)) 71.34.345 may be disclosed by the department to
individuals only with respect to offenders who have been determined by
the department to have a high risk of reoffending by a risk assessment,
as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, only as relevant and necessary for those
individuals to take reasonable steps for the purpose of self-protection, or as provided in RCW 72.09.370(2). The information may
not be disclosed for the purpose of engaging the public in a system of
supervision, monitoring, and reporting offender behavior to the
department. The department must limit the disclosure of information
related to mental health services to the public to descriptions of an
offender's behavior, risk he or she may present to the community, and
need for mental health treatment, including medications, and shall not
disclose or release to the public copies of treatment documents or
records, except as otherwise provided by law. All disclosure of
information to the public must be done in a manner consistent with the
written policy established by the secretary. The decision to disclose
or not shall not result in civil liability for the department or its
employees so long as the decision was reached in good faith and without
gross negligence. Nothing in this subsection prevents any person from
reporting to law enforcement or the department behavior that he or she
believes creates a public safety risk.

Sec. 10 RCW 42.17.2401 and 2009 c 565 s 24 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 42.17.240, the term "executive state
officer" includes:
(1) The chief administrative law judge, the director of
agriculture, the administrator of the Washington basic health plan, the
director of the department of services for the blind, the director of
the state system of community and technical colleges, the director of
commerce, the secretary of corrections, the director of early learning,
the director of ecology, the commissioner of employment security, the
chair of the energy facility site evaluation council, the secretary of
the state finance committee, the director of financial management, the
director of fish and wildlife, the executive secretary of the forest
practices appeals board, the director of the gambling commission, the
director of general administration, the secretary of health, the
administrator of the Washington state health care authority, the
executive secretary of the health care facilities authority, the
executive secretary of the higher education facilities authority, the
executive secretary of the horse racing commission, the executive
secretary of the human rights commission, ((the executive secretary of
the indeterminate sentence review board,)) the director of the
department of information services, the executive director of the state
investment board, the director of labor and industries, the director of
licensing, the director of the lottery commission, the director of the
office of minority and women's business enterprises, the director of
parks and recreation, the director of personnel, the executive director
of the public disclosure commission, the executive director of the
Puget Sound partnership, the director of the recreation and
conservation office, the director of retirement systems, the director
of revenue, the secretary of social and health services, the chief of
the Washington state patrol, the executive secretary of the board of
tax appeals, the secretary of transportation, the secretary of the
utilities and transportation commission, the director of veterans
affairs, the president of each of the regional and state universities
and the president of The Evergreen State College, and each district and
each campus president of each state community college;
(2) Each professional staff member of the office of the governor;
(3) Each professional staff member of the legislature; and
(4) Central Washington University board of trustees, the boards of
trustees of each community college and each technical college, each
member of the state board for community and technical colleges, state
convention and trade center board of directors, committee for deferred
compensation, Eastern Washington University board of trustees,
Washington economic development finance authority, The Evergreen State
College board of trustees, executive ethics board, forest practices
appeals board, forest practices board, gambling commission, life
sciences discovery fund authority board of trustees, Washington health
care facilities authority, each member of the Washington health
services commission, higher education coordinating board, higher
education facilities authority, horse racing commission, state housing
finance commission, human rights commission, indeterminate sentence
review board, board of industrial insurance appeals, information
services board, recreation and conservation funding board, state
investment board, commission on judicial conduct, legislative ethics
board, liquor control board, lottery commission, marine oversight
board, Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning
council, parks and recreation commission, board of pilotage
commissioners, pollution control hearings board, public disclosure
commission, public pension commission, shorelines hearings board,
public employees' benefits board, salmon recovery funding board, board
of tax appeals, transportation commission, University of Washington
board of regents, utilities and transportation commission, Washington
state maritime commission, Washington personnel resources board,
Washington public power supply system executive board, Washington State
University board of regents, Western Washington University board of
trustees, and fish and wildlife commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 RCW 4.24.5502 is decodified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) The indeterminate sentence review board
is transferred to the department of corrections.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the indeterminate
sentence review board shall be delivered to the custody of the
department of corrections. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment,
motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the
indeterminate sentence review board shall be made available to the
department of corrections. All funds, credits, or other assets held by
the indeterminate sentence review board shall be assigned to the
department of corrections.
(b) Any appropriations made to the indeterminate sentence review
board shall, on the effective date of this section, be transferred and
credited to the department of corrections.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel,
funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other
tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the
performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of
financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the indeterminate sentence review board are
transferred to the jurisdiction of the department of corrections. All
employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service
law, are assigned to the department of corrections to perform their
usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of
rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in
accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the indeterminate
sentence review board shall be continued and acted upon by the
department of corrections. All existing contracts and obligations
shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the department of
corrections.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the indeterminate sentence review board shall not affect the validity
of any act performed before the effective date of this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) All classified employees of the indeterminate sentence review
board assigned to the department of corrections under this act whose
positions are within an existing bargaining unit description at the
department of corrections shall become a part of the existing
bargaining unit at the department of corrections and shall be
considered an appropriate inclusion or modification of the existing
bargaining unit under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW.
(8) Notwithstanding any provision of this act and despite the
transfer of the indeterminate sentence review board to the department
of corrections, the members of the indeterminate sentence review board
will possess and shall exercise independent judgment when making any
decisions concerning offenders. These decisions include but are not
limited to decisions concerning offenders' release, revocation,
reinstatement, or the imposition of conditions of supervision.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---