BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 79A.05 RCW
to read as follows:
The commission shall adopt by rule criteria for the transfer, sale,
or other disposal of land under RCW 79A.05.170 and 79A.05.175. The
commission shall provide Indian tribes the right of first refusal to
acquire lands that have archaeological, historical, and cultural
significance to federally recognized Indian tribes whose traditional
lands and territories included parts of Washington.

--- END ---