BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In establishing the prototypical school
funding model in chapter 548, Laws of 2009, the legislature intended
that the new model would provide a transparent funding system so that
policymakers, educators, and taxpayers could better understand how the
state supports basic education. To facilitate that goal, the
legislature intends to establish a standardized portal through which
the public is provided ready access to this model as it applies to
their local schools.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
implement and maintain an internet-based portal that provides ready
public access to the state's prototypical school funding model for
basic education under RCW 28A.150.260. The portal must provide
citizens the opportunity to view, for each local school building, the
staffing levels and other prototypical school funding elements that are
assumed under the state funding formula. The portal must also provide
a matrix displaying how individual school districts are deploying those
same state resources through their allocation of staff and other
resources to school buildings, so that citizens are able to compare the
state assumptions to district allocation decisions for each local
school building.

--- END ---