BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.43.105 and 2005 c 388 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section, "traditional Chinese herbal
practitioner" means a person who is certified as a diplomate in Chinese
herbology from the national certification commission for acupuncture
and oriental medicine or who has received a certificate in Chinese
herbology from a school accredited by the accreditation council on
acupuncture and oriental medicine.
(2) A pharmacy licensed by, or shopkeeper or itinerant vendor
registered with, the department of health under chapter 18.64 RCW, or
an employee thereof, a practitioner as defined in RCW 18.64.011, or a
traditional Chinese herbal practitioner may not knowingly sell,
transfer, or otherwise furnish to any person a product at retail that
he or she knows to contain any detectable quantity of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or
salts of isomers, without first obtaining photo identification of the
person that shows the date of birth of the person.
(3) A person buying or receiving a product at retail containing any
detectable quantity of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, from
a pharmacy licensed by, or shopkeeper or itinerant vendor registered
with, the department of health under chapter 18.64 RCW, or an employee
thereof, a practitioner as defined in RCW 18.64.011, or a traditional
Chinese herbal practitioner must first produce photo identification of
the person that shows the date of birth of the person.
(4) Any product containing any detectable quantity of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or
salts of isomers, shall be kept (a) behind a counter where the public
is not permitted, or (b) in a ((central location)) locked display case
so that ((is not accessible by)) a customer((s without assistance of))
wanting access must ask an employee of the merchant for assistance.
(5) No pharmacy licensed by, or shopkeeper or itinerant vendor
registered with, the department of health under chapter 18.64 RCW, or
an employee thereof, a practitioner as defined in RCW 18.64.011, or a
traditional Chinese herbal practitioner may sell any product containing
any detectable quantity of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, to
a person that is not at least eighteen years old.
(6) A pharmacy licensed by, or shopkeeper or itinerant vendor
registered with, the department of health under chapter 18.64 RCW
selling a nonprescription drug containing ephedrine, pseudoephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers shall
require the purchaser to electronically or manually sign a record of
the transaction. The record must include the name and address of the
purchaser, the date and time of the sale, the name and initials of the
shopkeeper, itinerant vendor, pharmacist, pharmacy technician, or
employee conducting the transaction, the name of the product being
sold, as well as the total quantity in grams, of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts
of isomers, being sold.
(7) The board of pharmacy, by rule, may exempt products containing
ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts,
isomers, or salts of isomers, in combination with another active
ingredient from the requirements of this section if they are found not
to be used in the illegal manufacture of methamphetamine or other
controlled dangerous substances. A manufacturer of a drug product may
apply for removal of the product from the requirements of this section
if the product is determined by the board to have been formulated in
such a way as to effectively prevent the conversion of the active
ingredient into methamphetamine. The burden of proof for exemption is
upon the person requesting the exemption. The petitioner shall provide
the board with evidence that the product has been formulated in such a
way as to serve as an effective general deterrent to the conversion of
pseudoephedrine into methamphetamine. The evidence must include the
furnishing of a valid scientific study, conducted by an independent,
professional laboratory and evincing professional quality chemical
analysis. Factors to be considered in whether a product should be
excluded from this section include but are not limited to:
(a) Ease with which the product can be converted to
methamphetamine;
(b) Ease with which ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine is extracted from the substance and whether it
forms an emulsion, salt, or other form;
(c) Whether the product contains a "molecular lock" that renders it
incapable of being converted into methamphetamine;
(d) Presence of other ingredients that render the product less
likely to be used in the manufacture of methamphetamine; and
(e) Any pertinent data that can be used to determine the risk of
the substance being used in the illegal manufacture of methamphetamine
or any other controlled substance.
(((7))) (8) Nothing in this section applies:
(a) To any product containing ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers that
is not the only active ingredient and that is in liquid, liquid
capsule, or gel capsule form;
(b) To the sale of a product that may only be sold upon the
presentation of a prescription;
(c) To the sale of a product by a traditional Chinese herbal
practitioner to a patient; or
(d) When the details of the transaction are recorded in a pharmacy
profile individually identified with the recipient and maintained by a
licensed pharmacy.
(((8))) (9)(a) No pharmacy licensed by, or shopkeeper or itinerant
vendor registered with, the department of health under chapter 18.64
RCW, a practitioner as defined in RCW 18.64.011, or a traditional
Chinese herbal practitioner may retaliate against any employee that has
made a good faith attempt to comply with the requirements of this
section by requesting that a customer present photo identification,
making a reasonable effort to determine the customer's age.
(b) No pharmacy licensed by, or shopkeeper or itinerant vendor
registered with, the department of health under chapter 18.64 RCW, a
practitioner as defined in RCW 18.64.011, or a traditional Chinese
herbal practitioner is subject to prosecution under subsection (((9)))
(10) of this section if they made a good faith attempt to comply with
the requirements of this section by requesting that a customer present
photo identification, making a reasonable effort to determine the
customer's age.
(((9))) (10) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 2 RCW 69.43.110 and 2005 c 388 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for a pharmacy licensed by, or shopkeeper or
itinerant vendor registered with, the department of health under
chapter 18.64 RCW, or an employee thereof, or a practitioner as defined
in RCW 18.64.011, knowingly to sell, transfer, or to otherwise furnish,
in a single transaction((:
(a) More than two packages of one or more products that he or she
knows to contain ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine,
their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers; or
(b))) a ((single package of any product that he or she knows to
contain)) total of more than ((three)) 3.6 grams of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, their salts, isomers, or salts
of isomers, ((or a combination of any of these substances)) in any
twenty-four hour period or more than a total of nine grams per
purchaser in any thirty-day period.
(2) It is unlawful for a person who is not a manufacturer,
wholesaler, pharmacy, practitioner, shopkeeper, or itinerant vendor
licensed by or registered with the department of health under chapter
18.64 RCW to purchase or acquire((, in any twenty-four hour period,))
more than ((the quantities)) 3.6 grams in any twenty-four hour period,
or more than a total of nine grams in any thirty-day period, of the
substances specified in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) It is unlawful for any person to sell or distribute any of the
substances specified in subsection (1) of this section unless the
person is licensed by or registered with the department of health under
chapter 18.64 RCW, or is a practitioner as defined in RCW 18.64.011.
(4)(a) Beginning July 1, 2011, or the date upon which the
electronic sales tracking system established under section 3 of this
act is available, whichever is later, a pharmacy licensed by, or
shopkeeper or itinerant vendor registered with, the department of
health under chapter 18.64 RCW shall, before completing a sale under
this section, submit the required information to the electronic sales
tracking system established under section 3 of this act, as long as
such a system is available without cost to the pharmacy, shopkeeper, or
itinerant vendor for accessing the system. The pharmacy, shopkeeper,
or itinerant vendor may not complete the sale if the system generates
a stop sale alert, except as permitted in section 3 of this act.
(b) If a pharmacy, shopkeeper, or itinerant vendor selling a
nonprescription drug containing ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers
experiences mechanical or electronic failure of the electronic sales
tracking system and is unable to comply with the electronic sales
tracking requirement, he or she shall maintain a written log or an
alternative electronic recordkeeping mechanism until such time as he or
she is able to comply with the electronic sales tracking requirement.
(c) A pharmacy, shopkeeper, or itinerant vendor selling a
nonprescription drug containing ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers may
seek an exemption from submitting transactions to the electronic sales
tracking system in writing to the board of pharmacy stating the reasons
for the exemption. The board may grant an exemption for good cause
shown, but in no event shall a granted exemption exceed one hundred
eighty days. The board may grant multiple exemptions for any pharmacy,
shopkeeper, or itinerant vendor if the good cause shown indicates
significant hardship for compliance with this section. A pharmacy,
shopkeeper, or itinerant vendor that receives an exemption shall
maintain a logbook in hardcopy form and must require the purchaser to
provide the information required under this section before the
completion of any sale. The logbook shall be maintained as a record of
each sale for inspection by any law enforcement officer or board
inspector during normal business hours. For purposes of this
subsection (4)(c), "good cause" includes, but is not limited to,
situations where the installation of the necessary equipment to access
the system is unavailable or cost prohibitive to the pharmacy,
shopkeeper, or itinerant vendor.
(d) A pharmacy, shopkeeper, or itinerant vendor may withdraw from
participating in the electronic sales tracking system if the system is
no longer being furnished without cost for accessing the system. A
pharmacy, shopkeeper, or itinerant vendor who withdraws from the
electronic sales tracking system is subject to the same requirements as
a pharmacy, shopkeeper, or itinerant vendor who has been granted an
exemption under (c) of this subsection.
(e) For the purposes of this subsection (4) and section 3 of this
act:
(i) "Cost for accessing the system" means costs relating to:
(A) Access to the web-based electronic sales tracking software,
including inputting and retrieving data;
(B) The web-based software known as software as a service;
(C) Training; and
(D) Technical support to integrate to point of sale vendors, if
necessary.
(ii) "Cost for accessing the system" does not include:
(A) Costs relating to required internet access;
(B) Optional hardware that a pharmacy may choose to purchase for
work flow purposes; or
(C) Other equipment.
(5) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 69.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board of pharmacy shall implement a real-time electronic
sales tracking system to monitor the nonprescription sale of products
in this state containing any detectable quantity of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts
of isomers, provided that the system is available to the state without
cost for accessing the system to the state or retailers. The board is
authorized to enter into a public-private partnership, through a
memorandum of understanding or similar arrangement, to make the system
available.
(2) The records submitted to the tracking system are for the
confidential use of the pharmacy, shopkeeper, or itinerant vendor who
submitted them, except that:
(a) The records must be produced in court when lawfully required;
(b) The records must be open for inspection by the board of
pharmacy; and
(c) The records must be available to any general or limited
authority Washington peace officer to enforce the provisions of this
chapter or to federal law enforcement officers.
(3) The electronic sales tracking system shall be capable of
generating a stop sale alert, which shall be a notification that
completion of the sale would result in the seller or purchaser
violating the quantity limits in RCW 69.43.110 (1) and (2). The system
shall contain an override function for use by a dispenser of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts
of isomers, who has a reasonable fear of imminent bodily harm. Each
instance in which the override function is utilized shall be logged by
the system.
(4) The board of pharmacy shall have the authority to adopt rules
necessary to implement and enforce the provisions of this section.
(5) The board of pharmacy may not raise licensing or registration
fees to fund the rule making or implementation of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 69.43 RCW
to read as follows:
A pharmacy, shopkeeper, or itinerant vendor participating in the
electronic sales tracking system under RCW 69.43.110(4):
(1) Is not liable for civil damages resulting from any act or
omission in carrying out the requirements of RCW 69.43.110(4), other
than an act or omission constituting gross negligence or willful or
wanton misconduct; and
(2) Is not liable for civil damages resulting from a data breach
that was proximately caused by a failure on the part of the electronic
sales tracking system to take reasonable care through the use of
industry standard levels of encryption to guard against unauthorized
access to account information that is in the possession or control of
the system.

Sec. 5 RCW 42.56.240 and 2008 c 276 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following investigative, law enforcement, and crime victim
information is exempt from public inspection and copying under this
chapter:
(1) Specific intelligence information and specific investigative
records compiled by investigative, law enforcement, and penology
agencies, and state agencies vested with the responsibility to
discipline members of any profession, the nondisclosure of which is
essential to effective law enforcement or for the protection of any
person's right to privacy;
(2) Information revealing the identity of persons who are witnesses
to or victims of crime or who file complaints with investigative, law
enforcement, or penology agencies, other than the commission, if
disclosure would endanger any person's life, physical safety, or
property. If at the time a complaint is filed the complainant, victim,
or witness indicates a desire for disclosure or nondisclosure, such
desire shall govern. However, all complaints filed with the commission
about any elected official or candidate for public office must be made
in writing and signed by the complainant under oath;
(3) Any records of investigative reports prepared by any state,
county, municipal, or other law enforcement agency pertaining to sex
offenses contained in chapter 9A.44 RCW or sexually violent offenses as
defined in RCW 71.09.020, which have been transferred to the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs for permanent electronic
retention and retrieval pursuant to RCW 40.14.070(2)(b);
(4) License applications under RCW 9.41.070; copies of license
applications or information on the applications may be released to law
enforcement or corrections agencies;
(5) Information revealing the identity of child victims of sexual
assault who are under age eighteen. Identifying information means the
child victim's name, address, location, photograph, and in cases in
which the child victim is a relative or stepchild of the alleged
perpetrator, identification of the relationship between the child and
the alleged perpetrator; ((and))
(6) The statewide gang database referenced in RCW 43.43.762; and
(7) Data from the electronic sales tracking system established in
section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 RCW 69.43.170 (Ephedrine, pseudoephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine -- Pilot project to record retail transactions -- Penalty) and 2005 c 388 s 8 are each repealed.

--- END ---