BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that in order to
ensure timely environmental protection through rapid oil spill
containment and cleanup, covered vessels and facilities should
immediately notify the state and implement their oil spill contingency
plans when they have emergencies that could result in an oil spill.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.56.010 and 2007 c 347 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Best achievable protection" means the highest level of
protection that can be achieved through the use of the best achievable
technology and those staffing levels, training procedures, and
operational methods that provide the greatest degree of protection
achievable. The director's determination of best achievable protection
shall be guided by the critical need to protect the state's natural
resources and waters, while considering (a) the additional protection
provided by the measures; (b) the technological achievability of the
measures; and (c) the cost of the measures.
(2) "Best achievable technology" means the technology that provides
the greatest degree of protection taking into consideration (a)
processes that are being developed, or could feasibly be developed,
given overall reasonable expenditures on research and development, and
(b) processes that are currently in use. In determining what is best
achievable technology, the director shall consider the effectiveness,
engineering feasibility, and commercial availability of the technology.
(3) "Board" means the pollution control hearings board.
(4) "Cargo vessel" means a self-propelled ship in commerce, other
than a tank vessel or a passenger vessel, three hundred or more gross
tons, including but not limited to, commercial fish processing vessels
and freighters.
(5) "Bulk" means material that is stored or transported in a loose,
unpackaged liquid, powder, or granular form capable of being conveyed
by a pipe, bucket, chute, or belt system.
(6) "Committee" means the preassessment screening committee
established under RCW 90.48.368.
(7) "Covered vessel" means a tank vessel, cargo vessel, or
passenger vessel.
(8) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(9) "Director" means the director of the department of ecology.
(10) "Discharge" means any spilling, leaking, pumping, pouring,
emitting, emptying, or dumping.
(11)(a) "Facility" means any structure, group of structures,
equipment, pipeline, or device, other than a vessel, located on or near
the navigable waters of the state that transfers oil in bulk to or from
a tank vessel or pipeline, that is used for producing, storing,
handling, transferring, processing, or transporting oil in bulk.
(b) A facility does not include any: (i) Railroad car, motor
vehicle, or other rolling stock while transporting oil over the
highways or rail lines of this state; (ii) underground storage tank
regulated by the department or a local government under chapter 90.76
RCW; (iii) motor vehicle motor fuel outlet; (iv) facility that is
operated as part of an exempt agricultural activity as provided in RCW
82.04.330; or (v) marine fuel outlet that does not dispense more than
three thousand gallons of fuel to a ship that is not a covered vessel,
in a single transaction.
(12) "Fund" means the state coastal protection fund as provided in
RCW 90.48.390 and 90.48.400.
(13) "Having control over oil" shall include but not be limited to
any person using, storing, or transporting oil immediately prior to
entry of such oil into the waters of the state, and shall specifically
include carriers and bailees of such oil.
(14) "Marine facility" means any facility used for tank vessel
wharfage or anchorage, including any equipment used for the purpose of
handling or transferring oil in bulk to or from a tank vessel.
(15) "Navigable waters of the state" means those waters of the
state, and their adjoining shorelines, that are subject to the ebb and
flow of the tide and/or are presently used, have been used in the past,
or may be susceptible for use to transport intrastate, interstate, or
foreign commerce.
(16) "Necessary expenses" means the expenses incurred by the
department and assisting state agencies for (a) investigating the
source of the discharge; (b) investigating the extent of the
environmental damage caused by the discharge; (c) conducting actions
necessary to clean up the discharge; (d) conducting predamage and
damage assessment studies; and (e) enforcing the provisions of this
chapter and collecting for damages caused by a discharge.
(17) "Oil" or "oils" means oil of any kind that is liquid at
atmospheric temperature and any fractionation thereof, including, but
not limited to, crude oil, petroleum, gasoline, fuel oil, diesel oil,
biological oils and blends, oil sludge, oil refuse, and oil mixed with
wastes other than dredged spoil. Oil does not include any substance
listed in Table 302.4 of 40 C.F.R. Part 302 adopted August 14, 1989,
under section 101(14) of the federal comprehensive environmental
response, compensation, and liability act of 1980, as amended by P.L.
99-499.
(18) "Offshore facility" means any facility located in, on, or
under any of the navigable waters of the state, but does not include a
facility any part of which is located in, on, or under any land of the
state, other than submerged land.
(19) "Onshore facility" means any facility any part of which is
located in, on, or under any land of the state, other than submerged
land, that because of its location, could reasonably be expected to
cause substantial harm to the environment by discharging oil into or on
the navigable waters of the state or the adjoining shorelines.
(20)(a) "Owner or operator" means (i) in the case of a vessel, any
person owning, operating, or chartering by demise, the vessel; (ii) in
the case of an onshore or offshore facility, any person owning or
operating the facility; and (iii) in the case of an abandoned vessel or
onshore or offshore facility, the person who owned or operated the
vessel or facility immediately before its abandonment.
(b) "Operator" does not include any person who owns the land
underlying a facility if the person is not involved in the operations
of the facility.
(21) "Passenger vessel" means a ship of three hundred or more gross
tons with a fuel capacity of at least six thousand gallons carrying
passengers for compensation.
(22) "Person" means any political subdivision, government agency,
municipality, industry, public or private corporation, copartnership,
association, firm, individual, or any other entity whatsoever.
(23) "Ship" means any boat, ship, vessel, barge, or other floating
craft of any kind.
(24) "Spill" means an unauthorized discharge of oil or hazardous
substances into the waters of the state.
(25) "Tank vessel" means a ship that is constructed or adapted to
carry, or that carries, oil in bulk as cargo or cargo residue, and
that:
(a) Operates on the waters of the state; or
(b) Transfers oil in a port or place subject to the jurisdiction of
this state.
(26) "Waters of the state" includes lakes, rivers, ponds, streams,
inland waters, underground water, salt waters, estuaries, tidal flats,
beaches and lands adjoining the seacoast of the state, sewers, and all
other surface waters and watercourses within the jurisdiction of the
state of Washington.
(27) "Worst case spill" means: (a) In the case of a vessel, a
spill of the entire cargo and fuel of the vessel complicated by adverse
weather conditions; and (b) in the case of an onshore or offshore
facility, the largest foreseeable spill in adverse weather conditions.
(28) "Facility emergency" means a substantial threat of pollution
originating from a facility, including failure or degradation of a
tank, pipeline, pump, valve, or an explosion, structural failure, fire,
reduction or loss of electrical power, reduction or loss of control
systems, or other impaired safe operation.
(29) "Substantial threat of pollution" means any incident or
condition that may create a risk of discharge of oil or hazardous
substances to the environment.
(30) "Vessel emergency" means a substantial threat of pollution
originating from a covered vessel, including loss or serious
degradation of propulsion, steering, means of navigation, primary
electrical generating capability, and seakeeping capability.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.56.280 and 1995 c 399 s 218 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It shall be the duty of any person discharging oil or hazardous
substances or otherwise causing, permitting, or allowing the same to
enter the waters of the state, unless the discharge or entry was
expressly authorized by the department prior thereto or authorized by
operation of law under RCW 90.48.200, to immediately notify the coast
guard and the division of emergency management. The notice to the
division of emergency management within the military department ((of
community, trade, and economic development)) shall be made to the
division's twenty-four hour statewide toll-free number established for
reporting emergencies.
(2) When a vessel emergency occurs within three miles of the state
shoreline or within United States waters of the Strait of Juan de Fuca
or Puget Sound in which a discharge of oil is likely, the owner or
operator or their authorized representative shall notify the emergency
management division within the military department as soon as
practicable. When making such a notification, the owner, operator, or
authorized representative shall provide an estimate of the maximum most
probable volume of oil that is at risk of being spilled.
(3) When a facility emergency occurs in which a discharge of oil is
likely, the owner or operator or their authorized representative shall
notify the emergency management division within the military department
as soon as practicable. When making such a notification, the owner,
operator, or authorized representative shall provide an estimate of the
maximum most probable volume of oil that is at risk of being spilled.

Sec. 4 RCW 90.56.210 and 2005 c 78 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each onshore and offshore facility shall have a contingency
plan for the containment and cleanup of oil spills from the facility
into the waters of the state and for the protection of fisheries and
wildlife, shellfish beds, natural resources, and public and private
property from such spills. Each onshore and offshore facility must
activate their contingency plan in the event of an oil spill. In the
event of a facility emergency, the facility must also activate their
contingency plan. In such cases, the facility must, as soon as
practicable, work with appropriate federal authorities and the
department to: (a) Assess damage to the facility and determine the
probability of a discharge of oil into the environment; (b) develop
appropriate source control plans; and (c) determine if it is necessary
to preposition oil spill response resources to protect sensitive areas
in case of an oil spill.
(2) The department shall by rule adopt and periodically revise
standards for the preparation of contingency plans. The department
shall require contingency plans, at a minimum, to meet the following
standards:
(a) Include full details of the method of response to spills of
various sizes from any facility which is covered by the plan;
(b) Be designed to be capable in terms of personnel, materials, and
equipment, of promptly and properly, to the maximum extent practicable,
as defined by the department removing oil and minimizing any damage to
the environment resulting from a worst case spill;
(c) Provide a clear, precise, and detailed description of how the
plan relates to and is integrated into relevant contingency plans which
have been prepared by cooperatives, ports, regional entities, the
state, and the federal government;
(d) Provide procedures for early detection of oil spills and timely
notification of such spills to appropriate federal, state, and local
authorities under applicable state and federal law;
(e) State the number, training preparedness, and fitness of all
dedicated, prepositioned personnel assigned to direct and implement the
plan;
(f) Incorporate periodic training and drill programs to evaluate
whether personnel and equipment provided under the plan are in a state
of operational readiness at all times;
(g) Describe important features of the surrounding environment,
including fish and wildlife habitat, shellfish beds, environmentally
and archaeologically sensitive areas, and public facilities. The
departments of ecology, fish and wildlife, and natural resources, and
the ((office)) department of archaeology and historic preservation,
upon request, shall provide information that they have available to
assist in preparing this description. The description of
archaeologically sensitive areas shall not be required to be included
in a contingency plan until it is reviewed and updated pursuant to
subsection (((9))) (10) of this section;
(h) State the means of protecting and mitigating effects on the
environment, including fish, shellfish, marine mammals, and other
wildlife, and ensure that implementation of the plan does not pose
unacceptable risks to the public or the environment;
(i) Provide arrangements for the prepositioning of oil spill
containment and cleanup equipment and trained personnel at strategic
locations from which they can be deployed to the spill site to promptly
and properly remove the spilled oil;
(j) Provide arrangements for enlisting the use of qualified and
trained cleanup personnel to implement the plan;
(k) Provide for disposal of recovered spilled oil in accordance
with local, state, and federal laws;
(l) Until a spill prevention plan has been submitted pursuant to
RCW 90.56.200, state the measures that have been taken to reduce the
likelihood that a spill will occur, including but not limited to,
design and operation of a facility, training of personnel, number of
personnel, and backup systems designed to prevent a spill;
(m) State the amount and type of equipment available to respond to
a spill, where the equipment is located, and the extent to which other
contingency plans rely on the same equipment; and
(n) If the department has adopted rules permitting the use of
dispersants, the circumstances, if any, and the manner for the
application of the dispersants in conformance with the department's
rules.
(((2))) (3)(a) The following shall submit contingency plans to the
department within six months after the department adopts rules
establishing standards for contingency plans under subsection (((1)))
(2) of this section:
(i) Onshore facilities capable of storing one million gallons or
more of oil; and
(ii) Offshore facilities.
(b) Contingency plans for all other onshore and offshore facilities
shall be submitted to the department within eighteen months after the
department has adopted rules under subsection (((1))) (2) of this
section. The department may adopt a schedule for submission of plans
within the eighteen-month period.
(((3))) (4)(a) The owner or operator of a facility shall submit the
contingency plan for the facility.
(b) A person who has contracted with a facility to provide
containment and cleanup services and who meets the standards
established pursuant to RCW 90.56.240, may submit the plan for any
facility for which the person is contractually obligated to provide
services. Subject to conditions imposed by the department, the person
may submit a single plan for more than one facility.
(((4))) (5) A contingency plan prepared for an agency of the
federal government or another state that satisfies the requirements of
this section and rules adopted by the department may be accepted by the
department as a contingency plan under this section. The department
shall ensure that to the greatest extent possible, requirements for
contingency plans under this section are consistent with the
requirements for contingency plans under federal law.
(((5))) (6) In reviewing the contingency plans required by this
section, the department shall consider at least the following factors:
(a) The adequacy of containment and cleanup equipment, personnel,
communications equipment, notification procedures and call down lists,
response time, and logistical arrangements for coordination and
implementation of response efforts to remove oil spills promptly and
properly and to protect the environment;
(b) The nature and amount of vessel traffic within the area covered
by the plan;
(c) The volume and type of oil being transported within the area
covered by the plan;
(d) The existence of navigational hazards within the area covered
by the plan;
(e) The history and circumstances surrounding prior spills of oil
within the area covered by the plan;
(f) The sensitivity of fisheries, shellfish beds, and wildlife and
other natural resources within the area covered by the plan;
(g) Relevant information on previous spills contained in on-scene
coordinator reports prepared by the department; and
(h) The extent to which reasonable, cost-effective measures to
prevent a likelihood that a spill will occur have been incorporated
into the plan.
(((6))) (7) The department shall approve a contingency plan only if
it determines that the plan meets the requirements of this section and
that, if implemented, the plan is capable, in terms of personnel,
materials, and equipment, of removing oil promptly and properly and
minimizing any damage to the environment.
(((7))) (8) The approval of the contingency plan shall be valid for
five years. Upon approval of a contingency plan, the department shall
provide to the person submitting the plan a statement indicating that
the plan has been approved, the facilities or vessels covered by the
plan, and other information the department determines should be
included.
(((8))) (9) An owner or operator of a facility shall notify the
department in writing immediately of any significant change of which it
is aware affecting its contingency plan, including changes in any
factor set forth in this section or in rules adopted by the department.
The department may require the owner or operator to update a
contingency plan as a result of these changes.
(((9))) (10) The department by rule shall require contingency plans
to be reviewed, updated, if necessary, and resubmitted to the
department at least once every five years.
(((10))) (11) Approval of a contingency plan by the department does
not constitute an express assurance regarding the adequacy of the plan
nor constitute a defense to liability imposed under this chapter or
other state law.

Sec. 5 RCW 88.46.060 and 2005 c 78 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each covered vessel shall have a contingency plan for the
containment and cleanup of oil spills from the covered vessel into the
waters of the state and for the protection of fisheries and wildlife,
shellfish beds, natural resources, and public and private property from
such spills. The department shall by rule adopt and periodically
revise standards for the preparation of contingency plans. Each vessel
must activate their contingency plan in the event of an oil spill. In
the event of a vessel emergency, the vessel must also activate their
contingency plan. In such cases, the vessel must, as soon as
practicable, work with appropriate federal authorities and the
department to: (a) Assess damage to the vessel and determine the
probability of a discharge of oil into the environment; (b) develop
appropriate salvage and source control plans; and (c) determine if it
is necessary to preposition oil spill response resources to protect
sensitive areas in case of an oil spill.
(2) The department shall require contingency plans, at a minimum,
to meet the following standards:
(a) Include full details of the method of response to spills of
various sizes from any vessel which is covered by the plan;
(b) Be designed to be capable in terms of personnel, materials, and
equipment, of promptly and properly, to the maximum extent practicable,
as defined by the department, removing oil and minimizing any damage to
the environment resulting from a worst case spill;
(c) Provide a clear, precise, and detailed description of how the
plan relates to and is integrated into relevant contingency plans which
have been prepared by cooperatives, ports, regional entities, the
state, and the federal government;
(d) Provide procedures for early detection of spills and timely
notification of such spills to appropriate federal, state, and local
authorities under applicable state and federal law;
(e) State the number, training preparedness, and fitness of all
dedicated, prepositioned personnel assigned to direct and implement the
plan;
(f) Incorporate periodic training and drill programs to evaluate
whether personnel and equipment provided under the plan are in a state
of operational readiness at all times;
(g) Describe important features of the surrounding environment,
including fish and wildlife habitat, shellfish beds, environmentally
and archaeologically sensitive areas, and public facilities. The
departments of ecology, fish and wildlife, and natural resources, and
the ((office)) department of archaeology and historic preservation,
upon request, shall provide information that they have available to
assist in preparing this description. The description of
archaeologically sensitive areas shall not be required to be included
in a contingency plan until it is reviewed and updated pursuant to
subsection (((9))) (10) of this section;
(h) State the means of protecting and mitigating effects on the
environment, including fish, shellfish, marine mammals, and other
wildlife, and ensure that implementation of the plan does not pose
unacceptable risks to the public or the environment;
(i) Establish guidelines for the use of equipment by the crew of a
vessel to minimize vessel damage, stop or reduce any spilling from the
vessel, and, only when appropriate and only when vessel safety is
assured, contain and clean up the spilled oil;
(j) Provide arrangements for the prepositioning of spill
containment and cleanup equipment and trained personnel at strategic
locations from which they can be deployed to the spill site to promptly
and properly remove the spilled oil;
(k) Provide arrangements for enlisting the use of qualified and
trained cleanup personnel to implement the plan;
(l) Provide for disposal of recovered spilled oil in accordance
with local, state, and federal laws;
(m) Until a spill prevention plan has been submitted pursuant to
RCW 88.46.040, state the measures that have been taken to reduce the
likelihood that a spill will occur, including but not limited to,
design and operation of a vessel, training of personnel, number of
personnel, and backup systems designed to prevent a spill;
(n) State the amount and type of equipment available to respond to
a spill, where the equipment is located, and the extent to which other
contingency plans rely on the same equipment; and
(o) If the department has adopted rules permitting the use of
dispersants, the circumstances, if any, and the manner for the
application of the dispersants in conformance with the department's
rules.
(((2))) (3)(a) The owner or operator of a tank vessel of three
thousand gross tons or more shall submit a contingency plan to the
department within six months after the department adopts rules
establishing standards for contingency plans under subsection (1) of
this section.
(b) Contingency plans for all other covered vessels shall be
submitted to the department within eighteen months after the department
has adopted rules under subsection (1) of this section. The department
may adopt a schedule for submission of plans within the eighteen-month
period.
(((3))) (4)(a) The owner or operator of a tank vessel or of the
facilities at which the vessel will be unloading its cargo, or a
Washington state nonprofit corporation established for the purpose of
oil spill response and contingency plan coverage and of which the owner
or operator is a member, shall submit the contingency plan for the tank
vessel. Subject to conditions imposed by the department, the owner or
operator of a facility may submit a single contingency plan for tank
vessels of a particular class that will be unloading cargo at the
facility.
(b) The contingency plan for a cargo vessel or passenger vessel may
be submitted by the owner or operator of the cargo vessel or passenger
vessel, by the agent for the vessel resident in this state, or by a
Washington state nonprofit corporation established for the purpose of
oil spill response and contingency plan coverage and of which the owner
or operator is a member. Subject to conditions imposed by the
department, the owner, operator, or agent may submit a single
contingency plan for cargo vessels or passenger vessels of a particular
class.
(c) A person who has contracted with a covered vessel to provide
containment and cleanup services and who meets the standards
established pursuant to RCW 90.56.240, may submit the plan for any
covered vessel for which the person is contractually obligated to
provide services. Subject to conditions imposed by the department, the
person may submit a single plan for more than one covered vessel.
(((4))) (5) A contingency plan prepared for an agency of the
federal government or another state that satisfies the requirements of
this section and rules adopted by the department may be accepted by the
department as a contingency plan under this section. The department
shall ensure that to the greatest extent possible, requirements for
contingency plans under this section are consistent with the
requirements for contingency plans under federal law.
(((5))) (6) In reviewing the contingency plans required by this
section, the department shall consider at least the following factors:
(a) The adequacy of containment and cleanup equipment, personnel,
communications equipment, notification procedures and call down lists,
response time, and logistical arrangements for coordination and
implementation of response efforts to remove oil spills promptly and
properly and to protect the environment;
(b) The nature and amount of vessel traffic within the area covered
by the plan;
(c) The volume and type of oil being transported within the area
covered by the plan;
(d) The existence of navigational hazards within the area covered
by the plan;
(e) The history and circumstances surrounding prior spills of oil
within the area covered by the plan;
(f) The sensitivity of fisheries and wildlife, shellfish beds, and
other natural resources within the area covered by the plan;
(g) Relevant information on previous spills contained in on-scene
coordinator reports prepared by the director; and
(h) The extent to which reasonable, cost-effective measures to
prevent a likelihood that a spill will occur have been incorporated
into the plan.
(((6))) (7) The department shall approve a contingency plan only if
it determines that the plan meets the requirements of this section and
that, if implemented, the plan is capable, in terms of personnel,
materials, and equipment, of removing oil promptly and properly and
minimizing any damage to the environment.
(((7))) (8) The approval of the contingency plan shall be valid for
five years. Upon approval of a contingency plan, the department shall
provide to the person submitting the plan a statement indicating that
the plan has been approved, the vessels covered by the plan, and other
information the department determines should be included.
(((8))) (9) An owner or operator of a covered vessel shall notify
the department in writing immediately of any significant change of
which it is aware affecting its contingency plan, including changes in
any factor set forth in this section or in rules adopted by the
department. The department may require the owner or operator to update
a contingency plan as a result of these changes.
(((9))) (10) The department by rule shall require contingency plans
to be reviewed, updated, if necessary, and resubmitted to the
department at least once every five years.
(((10))) (11) Approval of a contingency plan by the department does
not constitute an express assurance regarding the adequacy of the plan
nor constitute a defense to liability imposed under this chapter or
other state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 RCW 88.46.100 (Notification of accidents and
near miss incidents) and 2000 c 69 s 10, 1995 c 391 s 9, & 1991 c 200
s 423 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---