BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature declares that Washington's
waters are unique and have irreplaceable economic and environmental
value for the citizens of the state. Washington's waters, including
Puget Sound which is an estuary of national significance, provide
critical habitat for numerous and diverse marine life and wildlife of
which some are considered threatened or endangered. The waters also
provide a major source of recreation, commercial fishing, tourism, and
high quality of life for Washington's citizens. Washington's economy
is highly dependent on the continued health of these waters and
adjacent environments.
The legislature finds that the transporting and handling of oil and
petroleum products upon and near Washington's waters creates a serious
potential hazard to these important natural resources and the economy.
The state's oil spill prevention, preparedness, response, and
environmental restoration programs have protected these waters since
1990. The legislature therefore finds that in order to maintain its
priority focus on the goal of zero spills and further protect these
waters when spills occur, continued adequate funding is necessary. It
is the legislature's intent that the state's oil spill, prevention,
preparedness, response, and environmental restoration activities be
sufficiently funded to maintain a world-class capability.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.23B.010 and 1992 c 73 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Barrel" means a unit of measurement of volume equal to forty-two United States gallons of crude oil or petroleum product.
(2) "Bulk oil terminal" means a marine terminal or facility of any
kind, other than a waterborne vessel, that is used for transferring
crude oil or petroleum products to or from a pipeline or waterborne
vessel or barge.
(3) "Crude oil" means any naturally occurring liquid hydrocarbons
at atmospheric temperature and pressure coming from the earth,
including condensate and natural gasoline.
(((3))) (4) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(((4))) (5) "Marine terminal" means a facility of any kind, other
than a waterborne vessel, that is used for transferring crude oil or
petroleum products to or from a waterborne vessel or barge.
(((5))) (6) "Navigable waters" means those waters of the state and
their adjoining shorelines that are subject to the ebb and flow of the
tide, including the Columbia and Snake rivers.
(((6))) (7) "Person" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.030.
(((7))) (8) "Petroleum product" means any liquid hydrocarbons at
atmospheric temperature and pressure that are the product of the
fractionation, distillation, or other refining or processing of crude
oil, and that are used as, useable as, or may be refined as a fuel or
fuel blendstock, including but not limited to, gasoline, diesel fuel,
aviation fuel, bunker fuel, and fuels containing a blend of alcohol and
petroleum.
(((8))) (9) "Pipeline" means any conveyance system capable of
transporting ten thousand gallons or more per day of crude oil or
petroleum products.
(10) "Taxpayer" means the person owning crude oil or petroleum
products immediately after receipt of the same into the storage tanks
of a ((marine)) bulk oil terminal in this state from a waterborne
vessel ((or)), barge, or pipeline and who is liable for the taxes
imposed by this chapter.
(((9))) (11) "Waterborne vessel or barge" means any ship, barge, or
other watercraft capable of travelling on the navigable waters of this
state and capable of transporting any crude oil or petroleum product in
quantities of ten thousand gallons or more for purposes other than
providing fuel for its motor or engine.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.23B.020 and 2006 c 256 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An oil spill response tax is imposed on ((the privilege of
receiving)) crude oil or petroleum products received at a ((marine))
bulk oil terminal within this state from a pipeline or from a
waterborne vessel or barge operating on the navigable waters of this
state. The tax imposed in this section is levied upon the owner of the
crude oil or petroleum products immediately after receipt of the same
into the storage tanks of a ((marine)) bulk oil terminal from a
pipeline or a waterborne vessel or barge at the rate of one cent per
barrel of crude oil or petroleum product received.
(2) In addition to the tax imposed in subsection (1) of this
section, an oil spill administration tax is imposed on ((the privilege
of receiving)) crude oil or petroleum products received at a ((marine))
bulk oil terminal within this state from a pipeline or a waterborne
vessel or barge operating on the navigable waters of this state. The
tax imposed in this section is levied upon the owner of the crude oil
or petroleum products immediately after receipt of the same into the
storage tanks of a ((marine)) bulk oil terminal from a pipeline or a
waterborne vessel or barge at the rate of ((four)) six cents per barrel
of crude oil or petroleum product.
(3) The taxes imposed by this chapter ((shall)) must be collected
by the ((marine)) bulk oil terminal operator from the taxpayer. If any
person charged with collecting the taxes fails to bill the taxpayer for
the taxes, or in the alternative has not notified the taxpayer in
writing of the ((imposition of the)) taxes imposed, or having collected
the taxes, fails to pay them to the department in the manner prescribed
by this chapter, whether such failure is the result of the person's own
acts or the result of acts or conditions beyond the person's control,
he or she ((shall)), nevertheless, ((be)) is personally liable to the
state for the amount of the taxes. Payment of the taxes by the owner
to a ((marine)) bulk oil terminal operator ((shall)) relieves the owner
from further liability for the taxes.
(4) Taxes collected under this chapter ((shall)) must be held in
trust until paid to the department. Any person collecting the taxes
who appropriates or converts the taxes collected ((shall be)) is guilty
of a gross misdemeanor if the money required to be collected is not
available for payment on the date payment is due. The taxes required
by this chapter to be collected ((shall)) must be stated separately
from other charges made by the ((marine)) bulk oil terminal operator in
any invoice or other statement of account provided to the taxpayer.
(5) If a taxpayer fails to pay the taxes imposed by this chapter to
the person charged with collection of the taxes and the person charged
with collection fails to pay the taxes to the department, the
department may, in its discretion, proceed directly against the
taxpayer for collection of the taxes.
(6) The taxes ((shall be)) are due from the ((marine)) bulk oil
terminal operator, along with reports and returns on forms prescribed
by the department, within twenty-five days after the end of the month
in which the taxable activity occurs.
(7) The amount of taxes, until paid by the taxpayer to the
((marine)) bulk oil terminal operator or to the department, ((shall))
constitutes a debt from the taxpayer to the ((marine)) bulk oil
terminal operator. Any person required to collect the taxes under this
chapter who, with intent to violate the provisions of this chapter,
fails or refuses to do so as required and any taxpayer who refuses to
pay any taxes due under this chapter, ((shall be)) is guilty of a
misdemeanor as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(8) Upon prior approval of the department, the taxpayer may pay the
taxes imposed by this chapter directly to the department. The
department ((shall)) must give its approval for direct payment under
this section whenever it appears, in the department's judgment, that
direct payment will enhance the administration of the taxes imposed
under this chapter. The department ((shall)) must provide by rule for
the issuance of a direct payment certificate to any taxpayer qualifying
for direct payment of the taxes. Good faith acceptance of a direct
payment certificate by a terminal operator ((shall)) relieves the
((marine)) bulk oil terminal operator from any liability for the
collection or payment of the taxes imposed under this chapter.
(9) All receipts from the tax imposed in subsection (1) of this
section ((shall)) must be deposited into the state oil spill response
account. All receipts from the tax imposed in subsection (2) of this
section ((shall)) must be deposited into the oil spill prevention
account.
(10) Within forty-five days after the end of each calendar quarter,
the office of financial management ((shall)) must determine the balance
of the oil spill response account as of the last day of that calendar
quarter. Balance determinations by the office of financial management
under this section are final and ((shall)) may not be used to challenge
the validity of any tax imposed under this chapter. The office of
financial management ((shall)) must promptly notify the departments of
revenue and ecology of the account balance once a determination is
made. For each subsequent calendar quarter, the tax imposed by
subsection (1) of this section ((shall)) must be imposed during the
entire calendar quarter unless:
(a) Tax was imposed under subsection (1) of this section during the
immediately preceding calendar quarter, and the most recent quarterly
balance is more than nine million dollars; or
(b) Tax was not imposed under subsection (1) of this section during
the immediately preceding calendar quarter, and the most recent
quarterly balance is more than eight million dollars.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.23B.030 and 1992 c 73 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The taxes imposed under this chapter ((shall)) only apply to the
first receipt of crude oil or petroleum products at a ((marine)) bulk
oil terminal in this state and not to the later transporting and
subsequent receipt of the same oil or petroleum product, whether in the
form originally received at a ((marine)) bulk oil terminal in this
state or after refining or other processing.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.23B.040 and 1992 c 73 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
Credit ((shall)) must be allowed against the taxes imposed under
this chapter for any crude oil or petroleum products received at a
((marine)) bulk oil terminal and subsequently exported ((from or sold
for export)) from the state as a bulk commodity for resale. Petroleum
product delivered into the fuel tanks of waterborne vessels or tug
boats, airplanes, trains, and other vehicles is not considered as
placed into the export stream and is not allowed a credit against the
taxes imposed under this chapter.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.23B.045 and 1992 c 73 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person having paid the tax imposed by this chapter who uses
petroleum products as a consumer for a purpose other than as a fuel may
claim refund or credit against the tax imposed under this chapter. For
this purpose, the term "consumer" ((shall be)) is defined as provided
in RCW 82.04.190.
(2) Any person having paid the tax imposed by this chapter who uses
petroleum products as a component or ingredient in the manufacture of
an item which is not a fuel may claim a refund or credit against the
tax imposed by this chapter.
(3) The amount of refund or credit claimed under this section may
not exceed the amount of tax paid by the person making such claim on
the petroleum products so consumed or used. The refund or credit
allowed by this section ((shall)) must be claimed on ((such)) the forms
and subject to ((such)) the requirements as the department may
prescribe by rule.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.23B.050 and 1991 c 200 s 808 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department ((shall)) must adopt ((such)) rules as may be
necessary to enforce and administer the provisions of this chapter.
Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the administration, collection, and
enforcement of the taxes levied under this chapter.

Sec. 8 RCW 90.56.500 and 2009 c 11 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state oil spill response account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from RCW 82.23B.020(1) ((shall)) must be
deposited in the account. All costs reimbursed to the state by a
responsible party or any other person for responding to a spill of oil
((shall)) must also be deposited in the account. Moneys in the account
((shall)) may be spent only after appropriation. The account is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.
(2) The account ((shall)) must be used exclusively to pay for:
(a) The costs associated with the response to spills of crude oil
or petroleum products into the navigable waters of the state; and
(b) The costs associated with the department's use of the emergency
response towing vessel as described in RCW 88.46.135.
(3) Payment of response costs under subsection (2)(a) of this
section ((shall)) must be limited to spills which the director has
determined are likely to exceed fifty thousand dollars.
(4) Before expending moneys from the account, the director
((shall)) must make reasonable efforts to obtain funding for response
costs under subsection (2) of this section from the person responsible
for the spill and from other sources, including the federal government.
(5) Reimbursement for response costs ((shall be)) are allowed only
for costs which are not covered by other funds appropriated to the
agencies responsible for response activities. Costs associated with
the response to spills of crude oil or petroleum products ((shall))
include:
(a) Natural resource damage assessment and related activities;
(b) Spill related response, containment, wildlife rescue, cleanup,
disposal, and associated costs;
(c) Interagency coordination and public information related to a
response; and
(d) Appropriate travel, goods and services, contracts, and
equipment.

Sec. 9 RCW 90.56.510 and 2000 c 69 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The oil spill prevention account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from RCW 82.23B.020(2) ((shall)) must be
deposited in the account. Moneys from the account may be spent only
after appropriation. The account is subject to allotment procedures
under chapter 43.88 RCW. If, on the first day of any calendar month,
the balance of the oil spill response account is greater than nine
million dollars and the balance of the oil spill prevention account
exceeds the unexpended appropriation for the current biennium, then the
tax under RCW 82.23B.020(2) ((shall)) must be suspended on the first
day of the next calendar month until the beginning of the following
biennium, provided that the tax ((shall)) not be suspended during the
last six months of the biennium. If the tax imposed under RCW
82.23B.020(2) is suspended during two consecutive biennia, the
department ((shall)) must by November 1st after the end of the second
biennium, recommend to the appropriate standing committees an
adjustment in the tax rate. For the biennium ending June 30, 1999, and
the biennium ending June 30, 2001, the state treasurer may transfer a
total of up to one million dollars from the oil spill response account
to the oil spill prevention account to support appropriations made from
the oil spill prevention account in the omnibus appropriations act
adopted not later than June 30, 1999.
(2) Expenditures from the oil spill prevention account ((shall))
must be used exclusively for the administrative costs related to the
purposes of this chapter, and chapters 90.48, 88.40, and 88.46 RCW.
Starting with the 1995-1997 biennium, the legislature ((shall)) must
give activities of state agencies related to prevention of oil spills
priority in funding from the oil spill prevention account. Costs of
prevention include the costs of:
(a) Routine responses not covered under RCW 90.56.500;
(b) Management and staff development activities;
(c) Development of rules and policies and the statewide plan
provided for in RCW 90.56.060;
(d) Facility and vessel plan review and approval, drills,
inspections, investigations, enforcement, and litigation;
(e) Interagency coordination and public outreach and education;
(f) Collection and administration of the tax provided for in
chapter 82.23B RCW; and
(g) Appropriate travel, goods and services, contracts, and
equipment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 82.23B
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Beginning January 1, 2012, and on January 1st of each year
thereafter, the department must adjust the tax imposed in RCW
82.23B.020(2) using the fiscal growth factor, as defined in chapter
43.135 RCW.
(2) The department must calculate the adjusted tax rate no later
than November 1st of the calendar year preceding the January 1st
effective date of the adjusted tax.
(3) To calculate the adjusted tax rate, the department must
multiply the amount of the tax rate in effect for the calendar year
preceding the January 1st effective date of the adjusted tax by the sum
of one plus the fiscal growth factor, expressed as a decimal, for the
previous fiscal year. The amount of the adjusted tax must be
determined to the third decimal point.

Sec. 11 RCW 82.23B.901 and 1992 c 73 s 44 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The amendment of RCW 82.23B.010, 82.23B.020, 82.23B.030, and
82.23B.040 by chapter 73, Laws of 1992, ((shall)) may not be construed
as affecting any existing right acquired or liability or obligation
incurred under the sections or under any rule or order adopted under
the sections, nor as affecting any proceeding instituted under the
sections.
(2) The amendment of RCW 82.23B.045, 82.23B.050, 90.56.500, and
90.56.510 by chapter . . ., Laws of 2010 (this act), may not be
construed as affecting any existing right acquired or liability or
obligation incurred under the sections or under any rule or order
adopted under the sections, nor as affecting any proceeding instituted
under the sections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 RCW 82.23B.060, 82.23B.900, and 82.23B.902
are decodified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---