BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the Washington
park arboretum is the official arboretum of the state of Washington.
The University of Washington and the city of Seattle cooperatively
established the arboretum in 1934, with Seattle holding title to the
property and the University of Washington designing, developing, and
managing the arboretum and botanic garden. The Washington park
arboretum's plant collections, consisting of approximately four
thousand six hundred different species and one hundred thirty-nine
endangered species, are some of the most prestigious in the world. It
provides ecological, aesthetic, recreational, and educational benefits
to residents of Seattle and Washington state, and to visitors from
around the world.
The Washington park arboretum was, and continues to be,
significantly impacted by the current configuration of state route
number 520 and its associated ramps. These impacts, which affect the
ecology, landscape, visitor experience, and the collections themselves,
will be exacerbated by proposed changes to the state route number 520
corridor.
Therefore, the legislature intends to create a program to support
the preservation, maintenance, and enhancement of the grounds and
collections at the Washington park arboretum in order to partially
offset the impacts from the current configuration of state route number
520 and its associated ramps, as well as the impacts from proposed
changes to the state route number 520 corridor. Funding will come
specifically from tolls imposed on the state route number 520 corridor,
and not from the state's general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.56 RCW
under the subchapter heading "toll facilities created after June 1,
2008" to read as follows:
(1) The department shall deposit one percent of any revenues from
the toll imposed on the state route number 520 corridor under the
authority of this subchapter, up to a maximum of one million dollars in
any fiscal year, into the Washington park arboretum support account.
(2) The Washington park arboretum support account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. On July 1st of each year, the state
treasurer shall transfer: Fifty percent of any moneys in the account
to the University of Washington to be used solely for the preservation,
maintenance, and enhanced presentation of the Washington park
arboretum's collections; and fifty percent of any moneys in the account
to the city of Seattle solely for preservation, maintenance, and
enhancement of Washington park. Moneys in the account may not supplant
existing funding for Washington park or the Washington park arboretum.
The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW,
but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.56.820 and 2008 c 122 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless otherwise delegated, only the legislature may authorize
the imposition of tolls on eligible toll facilities.
(2) Except as provided in section 2 of this act, all revenue from
an eligible toll facility must be used only to construct, improve,
preserve, maintain, manage, or operate the eligible toll facility on or
in which the revenue is collected. Expenditures of toll revenues are
subject to appropriation and must be made only:
(a) To cover the operating costs of the eligible toll facility,
including necessary maintenance, preservation, administration, and toll
enforcement by public law enforcement within the boundaries of the
facility;
(b) To meet obligations for the repayment of debt and interest on
the eligible toll facilities, and any other associated financing costs
including, but not limited to, required reserves and insurance;
(c) To meet any other obligations to provide funding contributions
for any projects or operations on the eligible toll facilities;
(d) To provide for the operations of conveyances of people or
goods; or
(e) For any other improvements to the eligible toll facilities.

Sec. 4 RCW 47.56.870 and 2009 c 472 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The initial imposition of tolls on the state route number 520
corridor is authorized, the state route number 520 corridor is
designated an eligible toll facility, and toll revenue generated in the
corridor must only be expended as allowed under RCW 47.56.820 and
section 2 of this act.
(2) The state route number 520 corridor consists of that portion of
state route number 520 between the junctions of Interstate 5 and state
route number 202. The toll imposed by this section shall be charged
only for travel on the floating bridge portion of the state route
number 520 corridor.
(3)(a) In setting the toll rates for the corridor pursuant to RCW
47.56.850, the tolling authority shall set a variable schedule of toll
rates: To maintain travel time, speed, and reliability on the corridor
((and)); to generate the necessary revenue as required under (b) of
this subsection; and in consideration of section 2 of this act.
(b) The tolling authority shall initially set the variable schedule
of toll rates, which the tolling authority may adjust at least annually
to reflect inflation as measured by the consumer price index or as
necessary to meet the redemption of bonds and interest payments on the
bonds, to generate revenue sufficient to provide for:
(i) The issuance of general obligation bonds first payable from
toll revenue and then excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels
pledged for the payment of those bonds in the amount necessary to fund
the replacement state route number 520 floating bridge and necessary
landings, subject to subsection (4) of this section; and
(ii) Costs associated with the project designated in subsection (4)
of this section that are eligible under RCW 47.56.820.
(4) The proceeds of the bonds designated in subsection (3)(b)(i) of
this section, which together with other appropriated and identified
state and federal funds is sufficient to pay for the replacement of the
floating bridge segment and necessary landings of state route number
520, must be used only to fund the construction of the replacement
state route number 520 floating bridge and necessary landings.
(5) The department may carry out the construction and improvements
designated in subsection (4) of this section and administer the tolling
program on the state route number 520 corridor.

Sec. 5 RCW 47.56.875 and 2009 c 472 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
A special account to be known as the state route number 520
corridor account is created in the state treasury.
(1) Deposits to the account must include:
(a) All proceeds of bonds issued for construction of the
replacement state route number 520 floating bridge and necessary
landings, including any capitalized interest;
(b) Except as provided in section 2 of this act, all of the tolls
and other revenues received from the operation of the state route
number 520 corridor as a toll facility, to be deposited at least
monthly;
(c) Any interest that may be earned from the deposit or investment
of those revenues;
(d) Notwithstanding RCW 47.12.063, proceeds from the sale of any
surplus real property acquired for the purpose of building the
replacement state route number 520 floating bridge and necessary
landings; and
(e) All damages, liquidated or otherwise, collected under any
contract involving the construction of the replacement state route
number 520 floating bridge and necessary landings.
(2) Subject to the covenants made by the state in the bond
proceedings authorizing the issuance and sale of bonds for the
replacement state route number 520 floating bridge and necessary
landings, toll charges, other revenues, and interest received from the
operation of the state route number 520 corridor as a toll facility may
be used to:
(a) Pay any required costs allowed under RCW 47.56.820; and
(b) Repay amounts to the motor vehicle fund as required.
(3) When repaying the motor vehicle fund, the state treasurer shall
transfer funds from the state route number 520 corridor account to the
motor vehicle fund on or before each debt service date for bonds issued
for the replacement state route number 520 floating bridge project and
necessary landings in an amount sufficient to repay the motor vehicle
fund for amounts transferred from that fund to the highway bond
retirement fund to provide for any bond principal and interest due on
that date. The state treasurer may establish subaccounts for the
purpose of segregating toll charges, bond sale proceeds, and other
revenues.

--- END ---