BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Issuing company" means the company that provided the personal
electronic device to the consumer, the company providing service to the
personal electronic device, or the company that tracks or uses data
from a device owned by a consumer.
(2) "Personal electronic device" means a privately owned wireless
or portable electronic handheld piece of equipment that includes, but
is not limited to, existing and emerging mobile communications systems
and smart technologies, portable electronic book reading devices,
portable internet devices, and personal digital assistants. "Personal
electronic device" also includes any current or emerging wireless
handheld technologies or portable information technology systems that
may be used for word processing, wireless internet access, or image
capture or recording. "Personal electronic device" may also include
those electronic devices designed and sold with the intention of
establishing an ongoing relationship with a vendor, such as a
subscription to content or access.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 An issuing company may not sell content in
connection with a personal electronic device to a consumer that is not
the owner of the personal electronic device if the issuing company
receives a notarized statement from the owner of the personal
electronic device attesting that the personal electronic device has
been lost.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Within thirty days of receipt of proof
of the consumer's ownership of the personal electronic device and a
copy of a police report filed by the consumer, evidencing the
consumer's claim to be a victim of theft under chapter 9A.56 RCW, an
issuing company shall:
(a) Deactivate or disable the personal electronic device, if
feasible, so that the personal electronic device is inoperable; and
(b) Cease providing content in connection with the personal
electronic device.
(2) The issuing company may decline to deactivate or disable a
consumer's personal electronic device if, in the exercise of good faith
and reasonable judgment after consulting with the law enforcement
agency that assisted the consumer in preparing the police report, the
issuing company believes the personal electronic device was not stolen.
(3) In order to facilitate the exercise of a consumer's right to
request that their personal electronic device be deactivated or
disabled, all police and sheriff's departments in Washington state
shall provide to the consumer, at the consumer's request, a copy of any
police report, filed by the consumer, evidencing the consumer's claim
to be a victim of theft under chapter 9A.56 RCW.
(4) An issuing company may not be held liable if, due to
misrepresentation by the consumer, the issuing company deactivates or
disables a personal electronic device possessed by a person that is, in
fact, the rightful owner of the electronic device.
(5) A consumer that misrepresents material facts in a police report
filed pursuant to this chapter may be liable for perjury under chapter
9A.72 RCW.
(6) Nothing in this section may be construed to require a law
enforcement agency to investigate reports claiming theft of a personal
electronic device.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act may be known and cited as the
consumer protection act for electronic devices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---