BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
INTENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 The legislature recognizes that
Washington's tax system is based on all businesses and individuals
paying their fair share of taxes. The legislature finds that some
taxpayers have been exploiting certain loopholes and using techniques
to avoid taxes that have no business purpose or substantial economic
effect other than their tax effects. The legislature further finds
that in these difficult economic conditions when the state is facing
budget cuts that will severely impact its most vulnerable citizens, the
state must aggressively act to curtail these practices. Therefore, by
this act, the legislature intends to close loopholes and provide the
department of revenue with enhanced tools to invalidate abusive tax
avoidance transactions, thereby preserving revenues for vital state
services.

PART II
GENERAL ANTIABUSE PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The department must disregard, for tax purposes, abusive tax
avoidance transactions. In disregarding an abusive tax avoidance
transaction, the department may:
(a) Recharacterize the nature of income, such as recharacterizing
dividends received from a related entity as income received for
providing services to that entity;
(b) Disregard the form of a corporate or other entity, even when
legal formalities have been observed, when the form of entity is used
as part of an abusive tax avoidance transaction;
(c) Treat the tax effects of the transaction, plan, or arrangement
according to its underlying substance rather than its form;
(d) Treat a series of formally separate steps as a single
transaction;
(e) Impute income to a taxpayer that provides services to a related
person and the consideration received for providing such services does
not reflect fair market value; and
(f) Take any other reasonable steps necessary to deny the tax
benefit that would otherwise arise as a result of the abusive tax
avoidance transaction.
(2) For purposes of this section, "abusive tax avoidance
transaction" means the avoidance of any tax collected by the department
under the provisions of this chapter by means of a transaction, plan,
or arrangement that lacks economic substance.
(3)(a) A transaction, plan, or arrangement will be considered as
having economic substance only if:
(i) The transaction, plan, or arrangement changes in a meaningful
way, apart from its tax effects, the taxpayer's economic position;
(ii) The taxpayer has a substantial nontax purpose for entering
into the transaction, plan, or arrangement; and
(iii) The transaction, plan, or arrangement is an objectively
reasonable means of accomplishing the substantial nontax purpose.
(b) A transaction, plan, or arrangement that carries some risk of
loss and profit potential may nevertheless be found to lack economic
substance if the economic risks and profit potential are so
insignificant when compared to the tax benefits that a reasonable
person would conclude that the taxpayer would not have engaged in the
transaction, plan, or arrangement absent its tax effects.
(c) An objective of achieving favorable financial accounting
benefits arising from tax savings is not deemed to be a substantial
nontax purpose for entering into a transaction, plan, or arrangement.
(d) The burden is on the taxpayer to establish that a transaction,
plan, or arrangement has economic substance.
(4) The provisions of this section are cumulative and nonexclusive
and do not affect any other remedies provided to the department under
statutory or common law.

Sec. 202 RCW 82.32.090 and 2006 c 256 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If payment of any tax due on a return to be filed by a taxpayer
is not received by the department of revenue by the due date, there
((shall be)) is assessed a penalty of five percent of the amount of the
tax; and if the tax is not received on or before the last day of the
month following the due date, there ((shall be)) is assessed a total
penalty of fifteen percent of the amount of the tax under this
subsection; and if the tax is not received on or before the last day of
the second month following the due date, there ((shall be)) is assessed
a total penalty of twenty-five percent of the amount of the tax under
this subsection. No penalty so added shall be less than five dollars.
(2) If the department of revenue determines that any tax has been
substantially underpaid, there ((shall be)) is assessed a penalty of
five percent of the amount of the tax determined by the department to
be due. If payment of any tax determined by the department to be due
is not received by the department by the due date specified in the
notice, or any extension thereof, there ((shall be)) is assessed a
total penalty of fifteen percent of the amount of the tax under this
subsection; and if payment of any tax determined by the department to
be due is not received on or before the thirtieth day following the due
date specified in the notice of tax due, or any extension thereof,
there ((shall be)) is assessed a total penalty of twenty-five percent
of the amount of the tax under this subsection. No penalty so added
((shall)) may be less than five dollars. As used in this section,
"substantially underpaid" means that the taxpayer has paid less than
eighty percent of the amount of tax determined by the department to be
due for all of the types of taxes included in, and for the entire
period of time covered by, the department's examination, and the amount
of underpayment is at least one thousand dollars.
(3) If a warrant ((be)) is issued by the department ((of revenue))
for the collection of taxes, increases, and penalties, there ((shall
be)) is added thereto a penalty of ten percent of the amount of the
tax, but not less than ten dollars.
(4) If the department finds that a person has engaged in any
business or performed any act upon which a tax is imposed under this
title and that person has not obtained from the department a
registration certificate as required by RCW 82.32.030, the department
((shall)) must impose a penalty of five percent of the amount of tax
due from that person for the period that the person was not registered
as required by RCW 82.32.030. The department ((shall)) may not impose
the penalty under this subsection (4) if a person who has engaged in
business taxable under this title without first having registered as
required by RCW 82.32.030, prior to any notification by the department
of the need to register, obtains a registration certificate from the
department.
(5) If the department finds that all or any part of a deficiency
resulted from the disregard of specific written instructions as to
reporting or tax liabilities, the department ((shall)) must add a
penalty of ten percent of the amount of the additional tax found due
because of the failure to follow the instructions. A taxpayer
disregards specific written instructions when the department ((of
revenue)) has informed the taxpayer in writing of the taxpayer's tax
obligations and the taxpayer fails to act in accordance with those
instructions unless the department has not issued final instructions
because the matter is under appeal pursuant to this chapter or
departmental regulations. The department ((shall)) may not assess the
penalty under this section upon any taxpayer who has made a good faith
effort to comply with the specific written instructions provided by the
department to that taxpayer. Specific written instructions may be
given as a part of a tax assessment, audit, determination, or closing
agreement, provided that such specific written instructions ((shall))
apply only to the taxpayer addressed or referenced on such documents.
Any specific written instructions by the department ((of revenue
shall)) must be clearly identified as such and ((shall)) must inform
the taxpayer that failure to follow the instructions may subject the
taxpayer to the penalties imposed by this subsection.
(6) If the department finds that all or any part of a deficiency
resulted from engaging in an abusive tax avoidance transaction, as
defined in section 201 of this act, the department must assess a
penalty of thirty-five percent of the additional tax found to be due.
The penalty provided in this subsection may be assessed together with
any other applicable penalties provided in this section on the same tax
found to be due, except for the evasion penalty provided in subsection
(7) of this section. The department may not assess the penalty under
this subsection if, before the department discovers the taxpayer's use
of an abusive tax avoidance transaction, the taxpayer discloses its
participation in the abusive tax avoidance transaction to the
department.
(7) If the department finds that all or any part of the deficiency
resulted from an intent to evade the tax payable ((hereunder)), a
further penalty of fifty percent of the additional tax found to be due
((shall)) must be added.
(((7))) (8) The penalties imposed under subsections (1) through (4)
of this section can each be imposed on the same tax found to be due.
This subsection does not prohibit or restrict the application of other
penalties authorized by law.
(((8))) (9) The department ((of revenue)) may not impose both the
evasion penalty and the penalty for disregarding specific written
instructions or the penalty provided in subsection (6) of this section
on the same tax found to be due.
(((9))) (10) For the purposes of this section, "return" means any
document a person is required by the state of Washington to file to
satisfy or establish a tax or fee obligation that is administered or
collected by the department of revenue, and that has a statutorily
defined due date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In all civil actions for damages against tax practitioners that
advised the taxpayer in connection with an abusive tax avoidance
transaction, where negligence is an element of the cause of action, it
is evidence of negligence on the part of such tax practitioner to show
that the tax practitioner failed to request a ruling from the
department, disclosing the identity of the taxpayer to which the ruling
request applied, on whether the department would consider the
transaction, plan, or arrangement an abusive tax avoidance transaction
and to communicate the ruling to the taxpayer before the taxpayer
participated in the abusive tax avoidance transaction.
(2) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Abusive tax avoidance transaction" has the same meaning as in
section 201 of this act.
(b) "Tax practitioner" means an individual who receives
compensation for providing tax advice, including attorneys,
accountants, and consultants.

Sec. 204 RCW 82.32.050 and 2008 c 181 s 501 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If upon examination of any returns or from other information
obtained by the department it appears that a tax or penalty has been
paid less than that properly due, the department ((shall)) must assess
against the taxpayer such additional amount found to be due and
((shall)) must add thereto interest on the tax only. The department
((shall)) must notify the taxpayer by mail, or electronically as
provided in RCW 82.32.135, of the additional amount, and the additional
amount ((shall become)) is due and ((shall)) must be paid within thirty
days from the date of the notice, or within such further time as the
department may provide.
(a) For tax liabilities arising before January 1, 1992, interest
((shall be)) is computed at the rate of nine percent per annum from the
last day of the year in which the deficiency is incurred until the
earlier of December 31, 1998, or the date of payment. After December
31, 1998, the rate of interest ((shall be)) is variable and computed as
provided in subsection (2) of this section. The rate so computed
((shall)) must be adjusted on the first day of January of each year for
use in computing interest for that calendar year.
(b) For tax liabilities arising after December 31, 1991, the rate
of interest ((shall be)) is variable and computed as provided in
subsection (2) of this section from the last day of the year in which
the deficiency is incurred until the date of payment. The rate so
computed ((shall)) must be adjusted on the first day of January of each
year for use in computing interest for that calendar year.
(c) Interest imposed after December 31, 1998, ((shall be)) is
computed from the last day of the month following each calendar year
included in a notice, and the last day of the month following the final
month included in a notice if not the end of a calendar year, until the
due date of the notice. If payment in full is not made by the due date
of the notice, additional interest ((shall)) must be computed until the
date of payment. The rate of interest ((shall be)) is variable and
computed as provided in subsection (2) of this section. The rate so
computed ((shall)) must be adjusted on the first day of January of each
year for use in computing interest for that calendar year.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the rate of interest to be
charged to the taxpayer ((shall be)) is an average of the federal
short-term rate as defined in 26 U.S.C. Sec. 1274(d) of the federal
internal revenue code of 1986, as amended plus two percentage points.
The rate set for each new year ((shall be)) is computed by taking an
arithmetical average to the nearest percentage point of the federal
short-term rate, compounded annually. That average ((shall be)) is
calculated using the rates from four months: January, April, and July
of the calendar year immediately preceding the new year, and October of
the previous preceding year.
(3) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12),
the department, on its own motion or at the request of any taxpayer
affected by the emergency, may extend the due date of any assessment or
correction of an assessment for additional taxes, penalties, or
interest as the department deems proper.
(4) No assessment or correction of an assessment for additional
taxes, penalties, or interest due may be made by the department more
than four years after the close of the tax year, except (a) against a
taxpayer who has not registered as required by this chapter, (b) upon
a showing of fraud or of misrepresentation of a material fact by the
taxpayer, ((or)) (c) where a taxpayer has executed a written waiver of
such limitation, or (d) where the assessment is the result of
disregarding an abusive tax avoidance transaction as defined in section
201 of this act. The execution of a written waiver ((shall)) also
extends the period for making a refund or credit as provided in RCW
82.32.060(2).
(5) For the purposes of this section, "return" means any document
a person is required by the state of Washington to file to satisfy or
establish a tax or fee obligation that is administered or collected by
the department of revenue and that has a statutorily defined due date.

PART III
CLOSING USE TAX LOOPHOLES AND CLARIFYING AMBIGUITY
Sec. 301 RCW 82.12.020 and 2009 c 535 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is ((hereby)) levied and ((there shall be)) collected
from every person in this state a tax or excise for the privilege of
using within this state as a consumer any:
(a) Article of tangible personal property ((purchased at retail,
or)) acquired by ((lease, gift, repossession, or bailment, or extracted
or produced or manufactured by the person so using the same, or
otherwise furnished to a person engaged in any business taxable under
RCW 82.04.280 (2) or (7))) the user in any manner, including tangible
personal property acquired at a casual or isolated sale, and including
by-products used by the manufacturer thereof, except as otherwise
provided in this chapter, irrespective of whether the article or
similar articles are manufactured or are available for purchase within
this state;
(b) Prewritten computer software, regardless of the method of
delivery, but excluding prewritten computer software that is either
provided free of charge or is provided for temporary use in viewing
information, or both;
(c) Services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2) (a) or
(g), (3)(a), or (6)(b), excluding services defined as a retail sale in
RCW 82.04.050(6)(b) that are provided free of charge;
(d) Extended warranty; or
(e)(i) Digital good, digital code, or digital automated service,
including the use of any services provided by a seller exclusively in
connection with digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated
services, whether or not a separate charge is made for such services.
(ii) With respect to the use of digital goods, digital automated
services, and digital codes acquired by purchase, the tax imposed in
this subsection (1)(e) applies in respect to:
(A) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser the right
of permanent use;
(B) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser a right of
use that is less than permanent;
(C) Sales in which the purchaser is not obligated to make continued
payment as a condition of the sale; and
(D) Sales in which the purchaser is obligated to make continued
payment as a condition of the sale.
(iii) With respect to digital goods, digital automated services,
and digital codes acquired other than by purchase, the tax imposed in
this subsection (1)(e) applies regardless of whether or not the
consumer has a right of permanent use or is obligated to make continued
payment as a condition of use.
(2) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of any article of tangible personal property, extended warranty,
digital good, digital code, digital automated service, or service
taxable under RCW 82.04.050 (2) (a) or (g), (3)(a), or (6)(b), if the
sale to, or the use by, the present user or the present user's bailor
or donor has already been subjected to the tax under chapter 82.08 RCW
or this chapter and the tax has been paid by the present user or by the
present user's bailor or donor.
(3)(a) Except as provided in this section, payment of the tax
imposed by this chapter or chapter 82.08 RCW by one purchaser or user
of tangible personal property, extended warranty, digital good, digital
code, digital automated service, or other service does not have the
effect of exempting any other purchaser or user of the same property,
extended warranty, digital good, digital code, digital automated
service, or other service from the taxes imposed by such chapters.
(b) The tax imposed by this chapter does not apply:
(i) If the sale to, or the use by, the present user or his or her
bailor or donor has already been subjected to the tax under chapter
82.08 RCW or this chapter and the tax has been paid by the present user
or by his or her bailor or donor;
(ii) In respect to the use of any article of tangible personal
property acquired by bailment and the tax has once been paid based on
reasonable rental as determined by RCW 82.12.060 measured by the value
of the article at time of first use multiplied by the tax rate imposed
by chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter as of the time of first use;
(iii) In respect to the use of any article of tangible personal
property acquired by bailment, if the property was acquired by a
previous bailee from the same bailor for use in the same general
activity and the original bailment was prior to June 9, 1961; or
(iv) To the use of digital goods or digital automated services,
which were obtained through the use of a digital code, if the sale of
the digital code to, or the use of the digital code by, the present
user or the present user's bailor or donor has already been subjected
to the tax under chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter and the tax has been
paid by the present user or by the present user's bailor or donor.
(4)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection (4), the tax is
levied and must be collected in an amount equal to the value of the
article used, value of the digital good or digital code used, value of
the extended warranty used, or value of the service used by the
taxpayer, multiplied by the applicable rates in effect for the retail
sales tax under RCW 82.08.020.
(b) In the case of a seller required to collect use tax from the
purchaser, the tax must be collected in an amount equal to the purchase
price multiplied by the applicable rate in effect for the retail sales
tax under RCW 82.08.020.
(5) For purposes of the tax imposed in this section, "person"
includes anyone within the definition of "buyer," "purchaser," and
"consumer" in RCW 82.08.010.

PART IV
CLOSING REAL ESTATE EXCISE TAX LOOPHOLES
AND ADDRESSING AMBIGUITIES
Sec. 401 RCW 82.45.010 and 2008 c 116 s 3 and 2008 c 6 s 701 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this chapter, the term "sale" ((shall have)) has its
ordinary meaning and ((shall)) includes any conveyance, grant,
assignment, quitclaim, or transfer of the ownership of or title to real
property, including standing timber, or any estate or interest therein
for a valuable consideration, and any contract for such conveyance,
grant, assignment, quitclaim, or transfer, and any lease with an option
to purchase real property, including standing timber, or any estate or
interest therein or other contract under which possession of the
property is given to the purchaser, or any other person at the
purchaser's direction, and title to the property is retained by the
vendor as security for the payment of the purchase price. The term
also includes the grant, assignment, quitclaim, sale, or transfer of
improvements constructed upon leased land.
(2)(a) The term "sale" also includes the transfer or acquisition
within any twelve-month period of a controlling interest in any entity
with an interest in real property located in this state for a valuable
consideration.
(b) For the sole purpose of determining whether, pursuant to the
exercise of an option, a controlling interest was transferred or
acquired within a twelve-month period, the date that the option
agreement was executed is the date on which the transfer or acquisition
of the controlling interest is deemed to occur. For all other purposes
under this chapter, the date upon which the option is exercised is the
date of the transfer or acquisition of the controlling interest.
(c) For purposes of this subsection, all acquisitions of persons
acting in concert ((shall)) must be aggregated for purposes of
determining whether a transfer or acquisition of a controlling interest
has taken place. The department ((of revenue shall)) must adopt
standards by rule to determine when persons are acting in concert. In
adopting a rule for this purpose, the department ((shall)) must
consider the following:
(((a))) (i) Persons ((shall)) must be treated as acting in concert
when they have a relationship with each other such that one person
influences or controls the actions of another through common ownership;
and
(((b))) (ii) When persons are not commonly owned or controlled,
they ((shall)) must be treated as acting in concert only when the unity
with which the purchasers have negotiated and will consummate the
transfer of ownership interests supports a finding that they are acting
as a single entity. If the acquisitions are completely independent,
with each purchaser buying without regard to the identity of the other
purchasers, then the acquisitions ((shall be)) are considered separate
acquisitions.
(3) The term "sale" ((shall)) does not include:
(a) A transfer by gift, devise, or inheritance.
(b) A transfer of any leasehold interest other than of the type
mentioned above.
(c) A cancellation or forfeiture of a vendee's interest in a
contract for the sale of real property, whether or not such contract
contains a forfeiture clause, or deed in lieu of foreclosure of a
mortgage.
(d) The partition of property by tenants in common by agreement or
as the result of a court decree.
(e) The assignment of property or interest in property from one
spouse or one domestic partner to the other spouse or other domestic
partner in accordance with the terms of a decree of dissolution of
marriage or state registered domestic partnership or in fulfillment of
a property settlement agreement.
(f) The assignment or other transfer of a vendor's interest in a
contract for the sale of real property, even though accompanied by a
conveyance of the vendor's interest in the real property involved.
(g) Transfers by appropriation or decree in condemnation
proceedings brought by the United States, the state or any political
subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation.
(h) A mortgage or other transfer of an interest in real property
merely to secure a debt, or the assignment thereof.
(i) Any transfer or conveyance made pursuant to a deed of trust or
an order of sale by the court in any mortgage, deed of trust, or lien
foreclosure proceeding or upon execution of a judgment, or deed in lieu
of foreclosure to satisfy a mortgage or deed of trust.
(j) A conveyance to the federal housing administration or veterans
administration by an authorized mortgagee made pursuant to a contract
of insurance or guaranty with the federal housing administration or
veterans administration.
(k) A transfer in compliance with the terms of any lease or
contract upon which the tax as imposed by this chapter has been paid or
where the lease or contract was entered into prior to the date this tax
was first imposed.
(l) The sale of any grave or lot in an established cemetery.
(m) A sale by the United States, this state or any political
subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation of this state.
(n) A sale to a regional transit authority or public corporation
under RCW 81.112.320 under a sale/leaseback agreement under RCW
81.112.300.
(o) A transfer of real property, however effected, if it consists
of a mere change in identity or form of ownership of an entity where
there is no change in the beneficial ownership. These include
transfers to a corporation or partnership which is wholly owned by the
transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or
children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic
partner((: PROVIDED, That)). However, if thereafter such transferee
corporation or partnership voluntarily transfers such real property, or
such transferor, spouse or domestic partner, or children of the
transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner voluntarily
transfer stock in the transferee corporation or interest in the
transferee partnership capital, as the case may be, to other than (1)
the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or
children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic
partner, (2) a trust having the transferor and/or the transferor's
spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the
transferor's spouse or domestic partner as the only beneficiaries at
the time of the transfer to the trust, or (3) a corporation or
partnership wholly owned by the original transferor and/or the
transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor
or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner, within three years of
the original transfer to which this exemption applies, and the tax on
the subsequent transfer has not been paid within sixty days of becoming
due, excise taxes ((shall)) become due and payable on the original
transfer as otherwise provided by law.
(p)(i) A transfer that for federal income tax purposes does not
involve the recognition of gain or loss for entity formation,
liquidation or dissolution, and reorganization, including but not
limited to nonrecognition of gain or loss because of application of
section 332, 337, 351, 368(a)(1), 721, or 731 of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended.
(ii) However, the transfer described in (p)(i) of this subsection
cannot be preceded or followed within a twelve-month period by another
transfer or series of transfers, that, when combined with the otherwise
exempt transfer or transfers described in (p)(i) of this subsection,
results in the transfer of a controlling interest in the entity for
valuable consideration, and in which one or more persons previously
holding a controlling interest in the entity receive cash or property
in exchange for any interest the person or persons acting in concert
hold in the entity. This subsection (3)(p)(ii) does not apply to that
part of the transfer involving property received that is the real
property interest that the person or persons originally contributed to
the entity or when one or more persons who did not contribute real
property or belong to the entity at a time when real property was
purchased receive cash or personal property in exchange for that person
or persons' interest in the entity. The real estate excise tax under
this subsection (3)(p)(ii) is imposed upon the person or persons who
previously held a controlling interest in the entity.
(q) A qualified sale of a manufactured/mobile home community, as
defined in RCW 59.20.030, that takes place on or after June 12, 2008,
but before December 31, 2018.

Sec. 402 RCW 82.45.033 and 1993 sp.s. c 25 s 505 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) As used in this chapter, the term "controlling interest" has
the following meaning:
(((1))) (a) In the case of a corporation, either fifty percent or
more of the total combined voting power of all classes of stock of the
corporation entitled to vote, or fifty percent of the capital, profits,
or beneficial interest in the voting stock of the corporation; and
(((2))) (b) In the case of a partnership, association, trust, or
other entity, fifty percent or more of the capital, profits, or
beneficial interest in such partnership, association, trust, or other
entity.
(2) The department may, at the department's option, enforce the
obligation of the seller under this chapter as provided in this
subsection (2):
(a) In the transfer or acquisition of a controlling interest as
defined in subsection (1)(a) of this section, either against the
corporation in which a controlling interest is transferred or acquired,
against the person or persons who acquired the controlling interest in
the corporation or, when the corporation is not a publicly traded
company, against the person or persons who transferred the controlling
interest in the corporation; and
(b) In the transfer or acquisition of a controlling interest as
defined in subsection (1)(b) of this section, either against the entity
in which a controlling interest is transferred or acquired or against
the person or persons who transferred or acquired the controlling
interest in the entity.

Sec. 403 RCW 82.45.070 and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.45.070 are each
amended to read as follows:
The tax ((herein)) provided for in this chapter and any interest or
penalties thereon ((shall be)) is a specific lien upon each ((piece))
parcel of real property that is sold or that is owned by an entity in
which a controlling interest has been transferred or acquired. The
lien attaches from the time of sale until the tax ((shall have been))
is paid, which lien may be enforced in the manner prescribed for the
foreclosure of mortgages.

Sec. 404 RCW 82.45.080 and 1980 c 154 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied under this chapter ((shall be)) is the
obligation of the seller and the department ((of revenue)) may, at the
department's option, enforce the obligation through an action of debt
against the seller or the department may proceed in the manner
prescribed for the foreclosure of mortgages ((and resort to)). The
department's use of one course of enforcement ((shall)) is not ((be))
an election not to pursue the other.
(2) For purposes of this section and notwithstanding any other
provisions of law, the seller is the parent corporation of a wholly
owned subsidiary, when such subsidiary is the transferor to a third-
party transferee and the subsidiary is dissolved before paying the tax
imposed under this chapter.

Sec. 405 RCW 82.45.100 and 2007 c 111 s 112 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Payment of the tax imposed under this chapter is due and
payable immediately at the time of sale, and if not paid within one
month thereafter ((shall)) will bear interest from the time of sale
until the date of payment.
(a) Interest imposed before January 1, 1999, ((shall be)) is
computed at the rate of one percent per month.
(b) Interest imposed after December 31, 1998, ((shall be)) is
computed on a monthly basis at the rate as computed under RCW
82.32.050(2). The rate so computed ((shall)) must be adjusted on the
first day of January of each year for use in computing interest for
that calendar year. The department ((of revenue shall)) must provide
written notification to the county treasurers of the variable rate on
or before December 1st of the year preceding the calendar year in which
the rate applies.
(2) In addition to the interest described in subsection (1) of this
section, if the payment of any tax is not received by the county
treasurer or the department of revenue, as the case may be, within one
month of the date due, there ((shall be)) is assessed a penalty of five
percent of the amount of the tax; if the tax is not received within two
months of the date due, there ((shall)) will be assessed a total
penalty of ten percent of the amount of the tax; and if the tax is not
received within three months of the date due, there ((shall)) will be
assessed a total penalty of twenty percent of the amount of the tax.
The payment of the penalty described in this subsection ((shall be)) is
collectible from the seller only, and RCW 82.45.070 does not apply to
the penalties described in this subsection.
(3) If the tax imposed under this chapter is not received by the
due date, the transferee ((shall be)) is personally liable for the tax,
along with any interest as provided in subsection (1) of this section,
unless((:
(a))) an instrument evidencing the sale is recorded in the official
real property records of the county in which the property conveyed is
located((; or
(b) Either the transferor or transferee notifies the department of
revenue in writing of the occurrence of the sale within thirty days
following the date of the sale)).
(4) If upon examination of any affidavits or from other information
obtained by the department or its agents it appears that all or a
portion of the tax is unpaid, the department ((shall)) must assess
against the taxpayer the additional amount found to be due plus
interest and penalties as provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this
section. The department ((shall)) must notify the taxpayer by mail, or
electronically as provided in RCW 82.32.135, of the additional amount
and the same ((shall)) becomes due and ((shall)) must be paid within
thirty days from the date of the notice, or within such further time as
the department may provide.
(5) No assessment or refund may be made by the department more than
four years after the date of sale except upon a showing of:
(a) Fraud or misrepresentation of a material fact by the taxpayer;
(b) A failure by the taxpayer to record documentation of a sale or
otherwise report the sale to the county treasurer; or
(c) A failure of the transferor or transferee to report the sale
under RCW 82.45.090(2).
(6) Penalties collected on taxes due under this chapter under
subsection (2) of this section and RCW 82.32.090 (2) through (7)
((shall)) must be deposited in the housing trust fund as described in
chapter 43.185 RCW.

Sec. 406 RCW 82.45.220 and 2005 c 326 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
An organization that fails to report a transfer of ((the
controlling)) an interest, or an option to purchase an interest, in the
organization under RCW 43.07.390 to the secretary of state and is later
determined to be subject to real estate excise taxes due to the
transfer, ((shall be)) is subject to the provisions of RCW 82.45.100 as
well as the evasion penalty in RCW 82.32.090(((6))) (7).

Sec. 407 RCW 43.07.390 and 2005 c 326 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The secretary of state ((shall)) must adopt rules requiring any
entity that is required to file an annual report with the secretary of
state, including entities under Titles 23, 23B, 24, and 25 RCW, to
disclose any transfer ((in)) of the controlling interest ((of)) in the
entity, or any transfer of an interest or an option to purchase an
interest in the entity, and any interest in real property.
(2) This information ((shall)) must be made available to the
department of revenue upon request for the purposes of tracking the
transfer of the controlling interest in entities owning real property
and to determine when the real estate excise tax is applicable in such
cases.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "controlling interest" has
the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.45.033.

PART V
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 This act must be construed liberally to
effectuate the legislature's intent to ensure that all businesses and
individuals pay their fair share of taxes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 Section 201 of this act applies to tax
periods beginning January 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---