BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Concurrent with the initiation of an enforcement action under
RCW 77.15.300, 77.55.291, or any other provision of this chapter, and
within existing resources, the department must provide the person
against whom an enforcement action is being taken with a statement of
violation prepared consistent with the requirements of this section.
(2) Any statement of violation prepared under this section must
include, at a minimum, the following contents:
(a) A detailed explanation of how the offending project is causing
harm to fish life;
(b) Evidence of individual fish actually being harmed by the
project, if any, including any documentation of instances of fish
mortality linked to the project; and
(c) A signature by a department biologist confirming that the
biologist has personally and physically investigated the impacts of the
project and attests to the accuracy of the information contained in the
statement of violation.
(3) The department may not pursue enforcement against any
individual for a violation of this chapter that arises after the
effective date of this section unless the statement of violation is
provided at the time of the initiation of the enforcement action.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.15.300 and 2000 c 107 s 239 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawfully undertaking hydraulic project
activities if the person constructs any form of hydraulic project or
performs other work on a hydraulic project and:
(a) Fails to have a hydraulic project approval required under
chapter 77.55 RCW for such construction or work; or
(b) Violates any requirements or conditions of the hydraulic
project approval for such construction or work.
(2) Unlawfully undertaking hydraulic project activities is a gross
misdemeanor.
(3) Any enforcement action taken under this section must be
conducted consistent with section 1 of this act.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.55.291 and 2005 c 146 s 701 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department may levy civil penalties of up to one hundred
dollars per day for violation of any provisions of RCW 77.55.021. The
penalty provided shall be imposed by notice in writing, either by
certified mail or personal service to the person incurring the penalty,
from the director or the director's designee describing the violation.
(2) Any person incurring any penalty under this chapter may appeal
the same under chapter 34.05 RCW to the director. Appeals shall be
filed within thirty days of receipt of notice imposing any penalty.
(3) The penalty imposed shall become due and payable thirty days
after receipt of a notice imposing the penalty unless an appeal is
filed. Whenever an appeal of any penalty incurred under this chapter
is filed, the penalty shall become due and payable only upon completion
of all review proceedings and the issuance of a final order confirming
the penalty in whole or in part.
(4) If the amount of any penalty is not paid within thirty days
after it becomes due and payable, the attorney general, upon the
request of the director, shall bring an action in the name of the state
of Washington in the superior court of Thurston county or of any county
in which such violator may do business, to recover such penalty. In
all such actions the procedure and rules of evidence shall be the same
as an ordinary civil action. All penalties recovered under this
section shall be paid into the state's general fund.
(5) Any enforcement action taken under this section must be
conducted consistent with section 1 of this act.

--- END ---