BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.27 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that a significant cause of the problems
consumers face in residential construction is poor workmanship. The
legislature further finds that one of the most effective methods for
protecting consumers in the area of residential construction is to
ensure that contractors have the experience and skills necessary to
manage all aspects of a construction project. The legislature,
therefore, intends to establish education, experience, and examination
requirements for contractors.
(2)(a) The department of labor and industries shall develop
recommendations to the legislature on the education, experience, and
examination requirements for the contractor registration program.
(b) In developing recommendations, the department shall closely
involve and consult with stakeholders. The department must also survey
education, experience, and examination requirements in other states,
particularly states such as California that require trade specific
competency training.
(c) The recommendations must be submitted to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 15, 2010.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2011.

--- END ---