BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that significant
progress has been made through a number of plans and policies to
establish coherent and transparent funding and policy objectives,
resources, and expectations for Washington's six public four-year
institutions of higher education. The legislature established a pilot
performance agreement process to implement these plans and policies.
(2) Developing performance agreements at each of the public four-year institutions of higher education will provide that the proper
balance of tuition, state support, and financial aid will be tied to
each institution's unique role, mission, student profile, and
contribution to achieving the goals of the state's strategic master
plan for higher education.
(3) The legislature finds that aligning and simplifying the process
for preparing, submitting, and processing performance agreements for
the six public four-year institutions with the state budget process is
necessary to provide adequate time for negotiation and deliberation.
(4) A forum should be created to develop an agreement among
policymakers and institution leaders about how institutions' strategic
plans, resources, and outcomes align with the state higher education
strategic master plan, as adopted by the legislature, for a planning
horizon of six years.
(5) Beginning in 2010, each public four-year institution of higher
education should develop a performance agreement that will be submitted
in conjunction with its biennial budget request.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.10.920 and 2008 c 160 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As used in this section and RCW 28B.10.921 and 28B.10.922, a
performance agreement is an agreement reached between the state and the
governing board of an institution of higher education and approved by
the legislature using the process provided in RCW 28B.10.922.
(2) The purpose of a performance agreement is to develop and
communicate a six-year ((plan)) agreement developed jointly by state
policymakers and an institution of higher education that aligns goals,
priorities, desired outcomes, flexibility, institutional mission,
accountability, and levels of resources.
(((3) Beginning in 2008, performance agreements shall be pilot-tested with the public four-year institutions of higher education.))

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.10.921 and 2008 c 160 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Performance agreements shall address but not be limited to the
following issues:
(a) Indicators that measure ((outcomes concerning cost, quality,))
timeliness of student progress toward degrees and certifications((, and
articulation between and within the K-12 and higher education
systems));
(b) Benchmarks and goals for long-term degree production, including
discrete benchmarks and goals in ((particular fields of study)) areas
of critical state need including but not limited to high employer
demand programs of study;
(c) The level of state resources and tuition revenue necessary to
meet the performance outcomes, benchmarks, and goals, with state
resources, subject to legislative appropriation;
(d) ((The prioritization of four-year institution capital budget
projects by the office of financial management)) Any additional
measures that an institution may deem a priority in meeting state or
institutional strategic planning goals; and
(e) Indicators that measure outcomes concerning ((recruitment))
enrollment, retention, and success of students((, faculty, and staff))
from diverse, underrepresented ((communities)), and low-income groups.
(2) The goals and outcomes identified in a performance agreement
shall be linked to the role, mission, and strategic plan of the
institution of higher education and aligned with the statewide
strategic master plan for higher education.
(3) Performance agreements may also ((include grants to)) provide
an institution((, under the terms of the agreement, of)) with
flexibility ((or waivers from)) in administering or waiving state
controls or rules. The agreement may identify ((areas where))
statutory changes ((is)) necessary to grant an institution such
flexibility or waivers of state agency rules.
(4) ((The following areas may not be included in a)) Performance
agreements may not include:
(a) Flexibility or waivers of requirements in a collective
bargaining agreement negotiated under chapter 28B.52, 41.56, 41.59,
41.76, or 41.80 RCW;
(b) Flexibility or waivers of administrative rules or processes
governed by chapter 28B.52, 41.56, 41.59, 41.76, or 41.80 RCW;
(c) Rules, processes, duties, rights, and responsibilities of the
academic faculty as contained in the faculty codes of the four-year
institution;
(d) Flexibility or waivers of requirements under chapter 39.12 RCW;
(e) Flexibility or waivers of administrative rules or other
regulations that address health and safety, civil rights, and
nondiscrimination laws that apply to institutions of higher education;
and
(f) State laws covering terms and conditions of employment,
including but not limited to salaries, job security, and health,
retirement, unemployment, or any other employment benefits.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.10.922 and 2008 c 160 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A state performance agreement committee is created to represent
the state in developing performance agreements under this section and
RCW 28B.10.920 and 28B.10.921. The committee is composed of one
representative((s)) from the governor's office((,)); one representative
from the office of financial management((,)); two representatives from
the higher education coordinating board((, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, two members of the senate
appointed by the secretary of the senate, and two members of the house
of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives)) appointed by the board, one of whom is the executive
director; the chairs of the appropriate house of representatives and
senate policy committees or their designees; the chair of an
appropriate house of representatives fiscal committee, or the chair's
designee; the chair of an appropriate senate fiscal committee, or the
chair's designee; and one member each from the house of representatives
and the senate minority caucuses appointed by the speaker of the house
of representatives and president of the senate, respectively. The
executive director of the higher education coordinating board shall
serve as chair of the state performance agreement committee. The state
performance agreement committee shall be staffed by personnel from the
higher education coordinating board.
(2) ((Each of the participating institutions shall develop a
preliminary draft of a performance agreement with input from students
and faculty. The governing boards of the public four-year institutions
of higher education shall designate performance agreement
representatives for each institution respectively that shall include
two faculty members at those institutions bargaining under chapter
41.76 RCW, at least one of whom shall be appointed by the exclusive
collective bargaining agent and the other appointed by the faculty
governance organization of that institution. If the participating
pilot institution does not bargain under chapter 41.76 RCW, then two
faculty members shall be appointed by the faculty governance
organization of that institution. The associated student governments
or their equivalents shall designate two performance agreement
representatives at those institutions. Starting with the preliminary
drafts, the state performance agreement committee and representatives
of each institution shall develop revised draft performance agreements
for each institution and submit the revised drafts to the governor and
the fiscal and higher education committees of the legislature no later
than September 1, 2008.)) In preparation for the 2011-2013 biennium,
each of the state's four-year institutions of higher education shall
develop a preliminary draft performance agreement with input from
students and faculty. The governing boards of the public four-year
institutions of higher education shall designate performance agreement
representatives for each institution respectively that shall include
two faculty members at those institutions bargaining under chapter
41.76 RCW, at least one of whom shall be appointed by the exclusive
collective bargaining agent and the other appointed by the faculty
governance organization of that institution. If the participating
pilot institution does not bargain under chapter 41.76 RCW, then two
faculty members shall be appointed by the faculty governance
organization of that institution. The associated student governments
or their equivalents shall designate two performance agreement
representatives at those institutions. Once the preliminary draft is
developed by the institution, representatives of the state committee
and institution leadership shall engage in a series of meetings to
negotiate a proposed performance agreement that shall be submitted to
the full state committee for consideration and action by September 15,
2010. Once the state committee has agreed to recommend the performance
agreement, it shall be submitted to the governor's office and the
office of financial management by October 1, 2010, for consideration by
the governor for inclusion in the governor's 2011-2013 operating budget
recommendations.
(3) ((After receiving informal input on the revised draft
performance agreements, particularly regarding the levels of resources
assumed in the agreements, the state committee and institution
representatives shall develop final proposed performance agreements and
submit the agreements to the governor and the office of financial
management by November 1, 2008, for consideration in development of the
governor's 2009-2011 operating and capital budget recommendations.
(4))) The state committee ((shall)) may submit any legislation
necessary to implement a performance agreement to the ((higher
education)) appropriate committees of the senate and house of
representatives.
(((5))) (4) All cost items contained within a performance agreement
are subject to legislative appropriation.
(((6))) (5) If the legislature affirms, through a proviso ((in the
2009-2011 omnibus appropriations act)), that the enacted omnibus
appropriations act ((and the 2009 capital budget act enacted by the
legislature)) aligns with the proposed performance agreements, the
performance agreements shall take effect beginning July 1, ((2009))
2011, through June 30, ((2015)) 2017. If the legislature affirms,
through a proviso ((in the 2009-2011 omnibus appropriations act)) or
through inaction, that the omnibus appropriations act ((and/or the 2009
capital budget act are)) is not aligned with the proposed performance
agreements, the state committee and institution ((representatives))
leadership shall ((redraft the agreements to align with the enacted
budgets, and the redrafted agreements shall take effect beginning
September 1, 2009, through June 30, 2015)) reconvene to agree upon
necessary adjustments to the performance agreements to align funding
provided by the enacted omnibus appropriations act with agreed
indicators and outcomes, in which case the performance agreements shall
take effect beginning September 1, 2011, through June 30, 2017.
(((7))) (6) The legislature, ((the)) state committee, and ((the))
institution ((representatives)) leadership shall repeat the process
described in subsections (((6))) (2) through (5) of this section for
each subsequent omnibus appropriations ((and capital budget)) act
enacted between the 2010 and ((2014)) 2015 legislative sessions to
ensure that the performance agreements are updated as necessary to
align with enacted omnibus appropriations ((and capital budget)) acts.

Sec. 5 RCW 44.28.156 and 2008 c 160 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The joint committee shall conduct an evaluation of the higher
education performance agreements ((pilot test)) under RCW 28B.10.920
through 28B.10.922 and make recommendations regarding changes to the
substance or process of creating the agreements, including whether the
performance agreement process should be continued and expanded to
include additional higher education institutions. The evaluation shall
be submitted to the governor and the higher education committees of the
senate and house of representatives by November 1, ((2014)) 2017.

--- END ---