BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the global health
sector develops new technologies and products for the improvement of
health delivery locally and worldwide and that Washington is home to
the world's richest collection of global health research and education
programs creating new and innovative technologies on a daily basis. It
is the intent of the legislature to stimulate the state's economy and
foster job creation in the emerging field of global health while
improving the health of people in Washington state and the world. The
purpose of this act is to create a funding mechanism and a grant
program to ensure that Washington remains competitive in global health
innovation and to guarantee that the development, manufacture, and
delivery of global health products will become an even more dynamic
part of the state's economy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The Washington global health
technologies and product development competitiveness program is
created.
(2)(a) The program must be administered by a nonprofit organization
exempt from income taxation under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(6) of the
federal internal revenue code whose board of directors is appointed by
the governor. The governor must make the appointments after
consultation with a state-wide alliance of global health research,
nonprofit, and private entities. The board consists of the following
members:
(i) Three members representing private companies engaged in the
provision of global health products or services;
(ii) Three members representing nonprofit organizations supporting
global health research or providing global health products or services;
(iii) Three members representing public research institutions
engaged in global health research and education; and
(iv) One member who is a former state-wide elected official.
(b) The governor must appoint the chair of the board from among the
members. The governor must appoint the members to staggered terms and
each appointment may not last more than three years, but an appointee
may serve more than one term.
(3) The board must contract with the department of health for
management services to assist the board in implementing the program.
(4) The board must solicit and receive gifts, grants, bequests,
royalty payments, licensing income, and other funds from businesses,
foundations, and the federal government to promote the development and
delivery of global health technologies and products. All federal funds
received must be deposited in the Washington global health technologies
and product development account created in section 3 of this act. All
remaining funds received must be deposited in an account that the board
creates and administers to carry out the purposes of this section.
Expenditures from the account created by the board may be used only for
funding activities of the program created in this section. Of the
total amounts deposited into these accounts, no more than three percent
of the total funds may be used for the department of health's
management services and administrative expenses related to the program
created in this section.
(5) The board must establish eligibility criteria for global health
technologies and product development grants and adopt policies and
procedures to facilitate the orderly process of grant application,
review, and reward.
(6) In making grants to entities pursuant to contract for the
development, production, promotion, and delivery of global health
technologies and products, the board must consider the following:
(a) The quality of the proposed research or the proposed technical
assistance in product development or production process design. Any
grant funds awarded for research activities must be awarded for
nonbasic research which will assist in commercialization or manufacture
of global health technologies;
(b) The potential for the grant recipient to improve global health
outcomes;
(c) The potential for the grant to leverage additional funding for
the development of global health technologies and products;
(d) The potential for the grant to stimulate, or promote technical
skills training for, employment in the development of global health
technologies in the state;
(e) The willingness of the grant recipient, when appropriate, to
enter into royalty or licensing income agreements with the board; and
(f) Any other factors, as the board determines.
(7) Grant contracts must specify that award recipients must conduct
their research, development, and any subsequent production activities
within Washington, with the exception of activities such as clinical
trials that must be carried out in developing countries, and that a
failure to comply with this requirement will obligate the recipient to
return the amount of the award plus interest as determined by the
board.
(8) Upon the recommendation of the Washington economic development
commission, the board may provide funding for the recruitment and
employment by public research institutions and global health nonprofit
organizations in the state, of global health researchers with a history
of commercialization of global health technologies.
(9) Each project receiving a grant under this section must report
information to the board in the format and at the intervals as the
board requires to provide accountability and to evaluate the
effectiveness of the program. The information reported must include
the amount of funding received; the funding, if any, leveraged by the
grant; the number and types of jobs created as a result of the grant;
and any other information that the board requires. The board must use
the information to prepare an annual evaluation of the program for a
report to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the
governor, beginning December 1, 2012.
(10) Upon request of the citizen commission for performance
measurement of tax preferences or the joint legislative audit and
review committee, the board must provide information needed by the
commission or committee to meet its responsibilities under chapter
43.136 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The Washington global health technologies
and product development account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. Only the board of directors of the Washington global health
technologies and product development competitiveness program or the
board's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. All
federal moneys received from the solicitations required in section 2 of
this act must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the
account may be used only for funding activities of the Washington
global health technologies and product development competitiveness
program created in section 2 of this act. The account is subject to
the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation
is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person is allowed a credit against taxes due under this
chapter in an amount equal to fifty percent of contributions made in
any fiscal year directly to the Washington global health technologies
and product development program created in section 2 of this act. The
credit must be taken in a form and manner as required by the
department.
(2) A person claiming the credit under this section must make a
contribution to the Washington global health technologies and product
development account before claiming a credit under this section. A
credit may not be claimed under this section for any contribution for
which a credit is claimed under section 5 of this act.
(3) The credit under this section may not exceed five hundred
thousand dollars per fiscal year per person. The credit may not exceed
the tax that would otherwise be due under this chapter.
(4) Refunds are not be granted in the place of credits.
(5) Except as provided under subsection (6) of this section, a tax
credit claimed under this section may not be carried over to another
year.
(6) Any amount of tax credit otherwise allowable under this section
not claimed by a person in any calendar year may be carried over and
claimed against the tax liability for the next succeeding calendar
year. Any credit remaining unused in the next succeeding calendar year
may be carried forward and claimed against the tax liability for the
second succeeding calendar year; and any credit not used in that second
succeeding calendar year may be carried over and claimed against the
tax liability for the third succeeding calendar year, but may not be
carried over for any calendar year thereafter.
(7) Credits under this section are available on a first in-time
basis. The department must disallow any credit, or portion thereof,
that would cause the total amount of credits claimed under this section
during any calendar year to exceed five million dollars. The
department must provide written notice to any person that has claimed
tax credits in excess of the five-million dollar limitation in this
subsection. The notice must indicate the amount of tax due and provide
that the tax be paid within thirty days from the date of such a notice.
The department may not assess penalties and interest as provided in
chapter 82.32 RCW on the amount due in the initial notice if the amount
due is paid by the due date specified in the notice, or any extension
thereof.
(8) To claim a credit under this section, a person must
electronically file with the department all returns, forms, and any
other information required by the department, in an electronic format
as provided or approved by the department. Any return, form, or
information required to be filed in an electronic format under this
section is not filed until received by the department in an electronic
format. As used in this subsection, "returns" has the same meaning as
"return" in RCW 82.32.050.
(9) No application is necessary for the tax credit. The person
must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility
under this section.
(10) The Washington global health technologies and product
development competitiveness program created in section 2 of this act
must provide to the department, upon request, information needed to
verify eligibility for credit under this section, including information
regarding contributions received by the program.
(11) The department may not allow any credit under this section
before July 1, 2010.
(12) This section expires June 30, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 48.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An insurer earns a credit against taxes due under this chapter
in an amount equal to fifty percent of the contributions made by the
insurer in any fiscal year directly to the Washington global health
technologies and product development program created in section 2 of
this act. A credit may not be claimed under this section for any
contribution for which a credit is claimed under section 4 of this act.
(2) The credit under this section may not exceed five hundred
thousand dollars per fiscal year per person.
(3) Any amount of tax credit otherwise allowable under this section
not claimed by an insurer in any calendar year may be carried over and
claimed against the tax liability for the next succeeding calendar
year. Any credit remaining unused in the next succeeding calendar year
may be carried forward and claimed against the tax liability for the
second succeeding calendar year. Any credit not used in that second
succeeding calendar year may be carried over and claimed against the
tax liability for the third succeeding calendar year, but may not be
carried over for any calendar year thereafter.
(4) Credits under this section are available on a first in-time
basis. The commissioner must disallow any credit, or portion thereof,
that would cause the total amount of credits claimed under this section
during any calendar year to exceed five million dollars. The
commissioner must provide written notice to any person that has claimed
tax credits in excess of the five-million dollar limitation in this
subsection. The notice must indicate the amount of tax due and provide
that the tax be paid within thirty days from the date of such a notice.
The commissioner may not assess penalties and interest on the amount
due in the initial notice if the amount due is paid by the due date
specified in the notice, or any extension thereof.
(5) An insurer claiming the credit under this section is subject to
all the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW. The tax credit that may be
applied against state premium tax liability in any one tax year may not
exceed the state premium tax liability of the insurer for such tax
year.
(6) No application is necessary for the tax credit under this
section. An insurer claiming the tax credit under this section must
keep records necessary for the commissioner to verify eligibility for
the credit.
(7) The Washington global health technologies and product
development competitiveness program created in section 2 of this act
must provide to the commissioner, upon request, information needed to
verify eligibility for credit under this section, including information
regarding contributions received by the program.
(8) An insurer is not required to reduce the amount of tax pursuant
to the state premium tax liability included by the insurer in
connection with ratemaking for any insurance contract written in
Washington because of a reduction in the insurer's tax liability based
on the tax credit allowed under this act.
(9) If the taxes paid by an insurer with respect to its state
premium tax liability constitute a credit against any other tax which
is imposed by Washington, the insurer's credit against such other tax
will not be reduced by virtue of the reduction in the insurer's tax
liability based on the tax credit allowed under this act.
(10) The commissioner may not allow any credit under this section
before July 1, 2010.
(11) This section expires June 30, 2018.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2009 c 87 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with dependents grant
account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the toll collection
account, the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the
energy account, the fair fund, the family leave insurance account, the
food animal veterinarian conditional scholarship account, the fruit and
vegetable inspection account, the future teachers conditional
scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the GET ready
for math and science scholarship account, the Washington global health
technologies and product development account, the grain inspection
revolving fund, the juvenile accountability incentive account, the law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local
tourism promotion account, the pilotage account, the produce railcar
pool account, the regional transportation investment district account,
the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center
account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance
revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, the children's
trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred
owners' bonus fund and breeder awards account, the Washington horse
racing commission class C purse fund account, the individual
development account program account, the Washington horse racing
commission operating account (earnings from the Washington horse racing
commission operating account must be credited to the Washington horse
racing commission class C purse fund account), the life sciences
discovery fund, the Washington state heritage center account, the
reduced cigarette ignition propensity account, and the reading
achievement account. However, the earnings to be distributed shall
first be reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service
fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right-of-way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---