BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The governing board of a nonprofit organization, corporation,
or association may apply for deferral of taxes on taxable activity
related to an eligible facility. Application must be made to the
department in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The
application must contain information regarding the location of the
facility, estimated or actual costs of the facility, time schedules for
completion and operation of the facility, and other information
required by the department. The department must rule on the
application within sixty days. All applications for the tax deferral
under this section must be submitted prior to the initiation of
construction and no later than December 31, 2012.
(2) The department must issue a sales and use tax deferral
certificate for state and local sales and use taxes due under chapters
82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW for sales or charges made for taxable
activity related to an eligible facility.
(3) The nonprofit organization, corporation, or association must
begin paying the deferred taxes in the fifth year after the date in
which the eligible facility is issued an occupancy permit by the local
permit issuing authority. The first payment is due by December 31st of
the fifth calendar year after such certified date, with subsequent
annual payments due by December 31st of the following nine years. Each
payment must equal ten percent of the deferred tax.
(4) The department may authorize an accelerated repayment schedule
upon request of the nonprofit organization, corporation, or
association.
(5) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, interest
may not be charged on any taxes deferred under this section for the
period of deferral. The debt for deferred taxes is not extinguished by
insolvency or other failure of the nonprofit organization, corporation,
or association.
(6) If the facility is not operationally complete within five
calendar years from issuance of the tax deferral certificate or if at
any time the department finds that the facility is not eligible for tax
deferral under this section, the amount of deferred taxes outstanding
for the facility is immediately due and payable. If deferred taxes
must be repaid under this subsection, the department must assess
interest, but not penalties, on amounts due under this subsection.
Interest is assessed at the rate provided for delinquent taxes under
this chapter, retroactively to the date of deferral, and accrues until
the deferred taxes due are repaid.
(7) Applications and any other information received by the
department of revenue under this section are not confidential under RCW
82.32.330. This chapter applies to the administration of this section.
(8) This section applies to taxable activity for an eligible
facility that occurs on or after July 1, 2011.
(9) The following definitions apply to this section:
(a) "Eligible facility" means a facility that is: (i) Owned and
operated by a nonprofit organization, corporation, or association; (ii)
used primarily as a performing arts center; and (iii) located in a city
with an estimated population between one hundred fifteen thousand and
one hundred fifty thousand at the time construction of the facility is
initiated.
(b) "Facility" means a new structure and fixtures that are
permanently affixed to and become a physical part of the structure.
(c) "Nonprofit organization, corporation, or association" means an
organization, corporation, or association exempt from tax under section
26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986,
as amended as of the effective date of this act.
(d) "Performing arts center" means a facility that is used for
music, dance, drama, or similar presentations and has a seating
capacity of one thousand seven hundred or more.
(e) "Site preparation" includes soil testing, site clearing and
grading, demolition, or any other related activities that are initiated
before construction. Site preparation does not include landscaping
services or landscaping materials.
(f) "Taxable activity" means construction of new structures, the
acquisition and installation of fixtures, and site preparation.

--- END ---