BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 86.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Local improvement districts may be initiated by petition signed
by the owners according to the records of the office of the county
assessor of at least fifty-one percent of the area of land within the
limits of the local district to be created.
(2) If the local improvement district is initiated by petition, the
petition must set forth the nature and territorial extent of the
proposed improvement and the fact that the signers thereof are the
owners according to the records of the county assessor of at least
fifty-one percent of the area of land within the limits of the local
district to be created. Upon the filing of the petition with the
board, the board must determine whether the petition is sufficient, and
the board's determination thereof must be conclusive upon all persons.
No person may withdraw his or her name from the petition after the
filing thereof with the board.
(3) If the board finds the petition to be sufficient, it must adopt
a resolution declaring its intention to order the improvement
petitioned for, setting forth the nature and territorial extent of the
improvement, designating the number of the proposed local district,
describing the boundaries thereof, stating the estimated cost and
expense of the improvement and the proportionate amount thereof which
will be borne by the property within the proposed local district, and
fixing a date, time, and place for a public hearing on the formation of
the proposed local district.
(4) Notice of the adoption of the resolution of intention pursuant
to a petition of the property owners, must be published in at least two
consecutive issues of a newspaper of general circulation in the
proposed local district, the date of the first publication to be at
least fifteen days prior to the date fixed by such resolution for
hearing before the board. Notice of the adoption of the resolution of
intention must also be given each owner or reputed owner of any lot,
tract, parcel of land, or other property within the proposed local
district by mailing the notice at least fifteen days before the date
fixed for the public hearing to the owner or reputed owner of the
property as shown on the tax rolls of the county treasurer at the
address shown thereon. The notice must refer to the resolution of
intention and designate the proposed local district by number. The
notice must also set forth the nature of the proposed improvement, the
total estimated cost, the proportion of total cost to be borne by
assessments, the estimated amount of the cost and expense of such
improvement to be borne by the particular lot, tract, or parcel, the
date, time, and place of the hearing before the board. The notice must
also state that all persons desiring to object to the formation of the
proposed district must file their written protests with the board
before the time fixed for the public hearing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 86.15 RCW
to read as follows:
Any notice given to the public or to the owners of specific lots,
tracts, or parcels of land relating to the formation of a local
improvement district initiated by petition must contain a statement
that actual assessments may vary from assessment estimates so long as
they do not exceed a figure equal to the increased true and fair value
the improvement adds to the property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 86.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Whether the improvement is initiated by petition or resolution,
the board must conduct a public hearing at the time and place
designated in the notice to the property owners. At this hearing the
board shall hear objections from any person affected by the formation
of the local district and may make changes in the boundaries of the
district or modifications in plans for the proposed improvement as are
deemed necessary: PROVIDED, That the board may not change the
boundaries of the district to include property not previously included
therein without first passing a new resolution of intention and giving
a new notice to property owners in the manner and form and within the
time herein provided for the original notice.
(2) Unless the board finds clear and convincing reasons, reasons
that must be documented through adopted findings, that the district
should not be formed, the board must by resolution order the
improvement, adopt detailed plans of the local district and declare the
estimated cost thereof, and proceed with the work. The board must
proceed with the work and file with the county treasurer its roll
levying special assessments in the amount to be paid by special
assessment against the property situated within the local district in
proportion to the special benefits to be derived by the property
therein from the improvement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---