BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A city in which a water-sewer district operates works, plants,
or facilities for the distribution and sale of water or sewer services
may levy and collect from the district a tax on the gross revenues
derived by the district from the sale of water or sewer services within
the city, exclusive of the revenues derived from the sale of water or
sewer services for purposes of resale. The tax when levied must be a
debt of the district, and may be collected as such. The district may
add the amount of tax to the rates or charges it makes for water or
sewer services sold within the limits of the city.
(2)(a) A city imposing a tax under this section:
(i) May not impose a franchise fee or other charge on the water-sewer district; and
(ii) May only do so through an interlocal agreement with the
district under chapter 39.34 RCW.
(b) The interlocal agreement required by this subsection (2) must
identify the district as the collection and pass-through entity, with
revenues submitted to the city. The interlocal agreement may include
provisions addressing city assumptions of the water-sewer district and
the expenditure of revenues collected under this section in areas of
the district that are located within the corporate limits of the city.
(3) For purposes of this section, the term "city" has the same
meaning as defined in RCW 35.13A.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A city choosing to impose a tax under
section 1 of this act that adopts a resolution to assume all or part of
a water-sewer district must complete a feasibility study of the
assumption. The study must be completed within six months of the
passage of the resolution to assume all or part of the district. The
study is not required if the board of commissioners of the district
consents to the assumption.
(2) The study must be jointly and equally funded by the city and
the district through a mutually agreed upon contract with a qualified
independent consultant with professional expertise involving public
water and sewer systems. The study must address the impact of the
proposed assumption on the city and district. Issues to be considered
must be mutually agreed upon by the city and district and must include,
but are not limited to, engineering and operational impacts, assumption
costs to the city and district, including potential impacts on future
water-sewer rates, bond ratings and future borrowing costs, the status
of existing water rights, and other issues jointly agreed upon.
(3) The findings of the study must be presented as a public record
and must be available to the registered voters of the entire district.
If the method of assumption requires the submission of a ballot
proposition to all registered voters of the district, the findings of
the study must be made available to these voters prior to a vote on the
proposed assumption.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A city choosing to impose a tax under
section 1 of this act may not assume jurisdiction of all or part of a
water-sewer district under RCW 35.13A.020, 35.13A.030, or 35.13A.040
without voter approval of a ballot proposition authorizing the
assumption. Ballot propositions under this section must be submitted
to all registered voters of the district. If a majority of the votes
cast on the proposition are in favor of the assumption, the assumption
may proceed as authorized under chapter 35.13A RCW.
(2) Elections under this section must be conducted in accordance
with general election law, and the election costs must be borne by the
city seeking approval to assume jurisdiction of the district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 For purposes of this chapter, the term
"city" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 35.13A.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The assumption provisions in sections 2
through 4 of this act are alternative and in addition to other
provisions in chapter 35.13A RCW.
(2) Nothing in sections 2 through 4 of this act: (a) Limits or
otherwise modifies the assumption authority under chapter 35.13A RCW
for cities that do not impose a tax under section 1 of this act; or (b)
abrogates city and water-sewer district agreements for cities that do
not impose a tax under section 1 of this act.

Sec. 6 RCW 35.13A.020 and 1999 c 153 s 28 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in section 3 of this act, whenever all of
the territory of a district is included within the corporate boundaries
of a city, the city legislative body may adopt a resolution or
ordinance to assume jurisdiction over all of the district.
(2) Upon the assumption, all real and personal property,
franchises, rights, assets, taxes levied but not collected for the
district for other than indebtedness, water, sewer, and drainage
facilities, and all other facilities and equipment of the district
shall become the property of the city subject to all financial,
statutory, or contractual obligations of the district for the security
or performance of which the property may have been pledged. The city,
in addition to its other powers, shall have the power to manage,
control, maintain, and operate the property, facilities and equipment
and to fix and collect service and other charges from owners and
occupants of properties so served by the city, subject, however, to any
outstanding indebtedness, bonded or otherwise, of the district payable
from taxes, assessments, or revenues of any kind or nature and to any
other contractual obligations of the district.
(3) The city may by resolution or ordinance of its legislative
body, assume the obligation of paying such district indebtedness and of
levying and of collecting or causing to be collected the district
taxes, assessments, and utility rates and charges of any kind or nature
to pay and secure the payment of the indebtedness, according to all of
the terms, conditions and covenants incident to the indebtedness, and
shall assume and perform all other outstanding contractual obligation
of the district in accordance with all of their terms, conditions, and
covenants. An assumption shall not be deemed to impair the obligation
of any indebtedness or other contractual obligation. During the period
until the outstanding indebtedness of the district has been discharged,
the territory of the district and the owners and occupants of property
therein, shall continue to be liable for its and their proportionate
share of the indebtedness, including any outstanding assessments levied
within any local improvement district or utility local improvement
district thereof. The city shall assume the obligation of causing the
payment of the district's indebtedness, collecting the district's
taxes, assessments, and charges, and observing and performing the other
district contractual obligations. The legislative body of the city
shall act as the officers of the district for the purpose of certifying
the amount of any property tax to be levied and collected therein, and
causing service and other charges and assessments to be collected from
the property or owners or occupants thereof, enforcing the collection
and performing all other acts necessary to ensure performance of the
district's contractual obligations in the same manner and by the same
means as if the territory of the district had not been included within
the boundaries of a city.
When a city assumes the obligation of paying the outstanding
indebtedness, and if property taxes or assessments have been levied and
service and other charges have accrued for this purpose but have not
been collected by the district prior to the assumption, the same when
collected shall belong and be paid to the city and be used by the city
so far as necessary for payment of the indebtedness of the district
existing and unpaid on the date the city assumes the indebtedness. Any
funds received by the city which have been collected for the purpose of
paying any bonded or other indebtedness of the district, shall be used
for the purpose for which they were collected and for no other purpose.
Any outstanding indebtedness shall be paid as provided in the terms,
conditions, and covenants of the indebtedness. All funds of the
district on deposit with the county treasurer at the time of title
transfer shall be used by the city solely for the benefit of the
assumed utility and shall not be transferred to or used for the benefit
of the city's general fund.

Sec. 7 RCW 35.13A.030 and 1999 c 153 s 29 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as provided in section 3 of this act, whenever a portion of
a district equal to at least sixty percent of the area or sixty percent
of the assessed valuation of the real property lying within such
district, is included within the corporate boundaries of a city, the
city may assume by ordinance the full and complete management and
control of that portion of the entire district not included within
another city, whereupon the provisions of RCW 35.13A.020 shall be
operative; or the city may proceed directly under the provisions of RCW
35.13A.050.

Sec. 8 RCW 35.13A.040 and 1999 c 153 s 30 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as provided in section 3 of this act, whenever the portion
of a district included within the corporate boundaries of a city is
less than sixty percent of the area of the district and less than sixty
percent of the assessed valuation of the real property within the
district, the city may elect to proceed under the provisions of RCW
35.13A.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act applies only to a city, as well as
the water-sewer districts within the corporate boundaries of the city
and potential annexation areas that, as of the effective date of this
act:
(1) Has a population of between eighty thousand and eighty-five
thousand as certified in the April 1, 2009, official population
estimates listed by the office of financial management; and
(2) Is located in a county with a population of one million five
hundred thousand or more.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 2 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 35 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act expires January 1, 2015.

--- END ---