BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any person elected to serve in the state legislature who leaves
his or her employment to participate in a regular or special
legislative session shall be granted a leave of absence from such
employment for the duration of the regular or special legislative
session. Upon return, such person shall be reinstated to his or her
original position or similar position with equivalent pay and
accumulated seniority, retirement, fringe benefits, and other service
credits, unless the employer's circumstances have so changed as to make
it impossible or unreasonable to do so. A person shall give notice in
writing to his or her employer that he or she is a candidate for
legislative office and may be absent during regular and special
legislative sessions. This notice must be given by the employee in
writing within thirty days after filing for legislative office.
(2) This section does not apply to private employers with twenty-five or less employees.

--- END ---