BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 42.52 RCW
to read as follows:
No state-elected official may speak or appear in a public service
announcement that is broadcast, shown, or distributed in any form
whatsoever during the period beginning January 1st and continuing
through the general election if that official is a candidate. If the
official does not control the broadcast, showing, or distribution of a
public service announcement in which he or she speaks or appears, then
the official shall contractually limit the use of the public service
announcement to be consistent with this section prior to participating
in the public service announcement. This section does not apply to
public service announcements that are part of the regular duties of the
office that only mention or visually display the office or office seal
or logo and do not mention or visually display the name of the official
in the announcement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 42.23 RCW
to read as follows:
No municipal officer may speak or appear in a public service
announcement that is broadcast, shown, or distributed in any form
whatsoever during the period beginning January 1st and continuing
through the general election if that officer is a candidate. If the
officer does not control the broadcast, showing, or distribution of a
public service announcement in which he or she speaks or appears, then
the officer shall contractually limit the use of the public service
announcement to be consistent with this section prior to participating
in the public service announcement. This section does not apply to
public service announcements that are part of the regular duties of the
office that only mention or visually display the office or office seal
or logo and do not mention or visually display the name of the officer
in the announcement.

--- END ---