BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 RCW 19.27.530 (Carbon monoxide alarms--Requirements -- Exemptions -- Adoption of rules) and 2009 c 313 s 2 are
each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 19.27 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By January 1, 2013, any residential occupancy that has fuel
fired appliances or an enclosed garage must be equipped with a carbon
monoxide alarm.
(2) A landlord, as defined in RCW 59.18.030, shall provide written
notice to any tenant, as defined in RCW 59.18.030, at the commencement
of the tenancy on (a) whether the dwelling unit is equipped with a
carbon monoxide alarm and (b) the responsibility of the tenant to
maintain the alarm as specified by the alarm manufacturer, including
the replacement of batteries. If a dwelling unit is not equipped with
a carbon monoxide alarm, the landlord shall provide the tenant with a
notice about the health hazards associated with using fuel fired
appliances or other personal property that creates carbon monoxide.

--- END ---