BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.400.305 and 2009 c 381 s 30 are each amended to
read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules as
necessary under chapter 34.05 RCW on record check information. The
rules shall include, but not be limited to the following:
(1) Written procedures providing a school district, approved
private school, Washington state center for childhood deafness and
hearing loss, state school for the blind, or federal bureau of Indian
affairs-funded school employee or applicant for certification or
employment access to and review of information obtained based on the
record check required under RCW 28A.400.303; and
(2) Written procedures limiting access to the superintendent of
public instruction record check database to only those individuals
processing record check information at the office of the superintendent
of public instruction, the appropriate school district or districts,
approved private schools, the Washington state center for childhood
deafness and hearing loss, the state school for the blind, the
appropriate educational service district or districts, and the
appropriate federal bureau of Indian affairs-funded schools.

--- END ---