BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the current
economic crisis is requiring sacrifices by citizens and businesses all
across the state. The legislature acknowledges the sacrifices also
being made by the many state employees who have volunteered for unpaid
furlough days including those, such as our ferry workers, who
volunteered for pay freezes. The recession requires us to continue to
find every possible cost savings while striving to continue to deliver
key services to our citizens. Therefore, the legislature finds it
necessary to immediately suspend recognition awards given to state
employees. Until the economic climate permits the resumption of
appropriate cash awards, the legislature encourages supervisors
throughout state agencies to look for nonmonetary ways to acknowledge
outstanding contributions to Washington's citizens by our state's civil
servants.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.06.133 and 2009 c 534 s 2 and 2009 c 5 s 2 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The director shall adopt rules, consistent with the purposes
and provisions of this chapter and with the best standards of personnel
administration, regarding the basis and procedures to be followed for:
(a) The reduction, dismissal, suspension, or demotion of an
employee;
(b) Training and career development;
(c) Probationary periods of six to twelve months and rejections of
probationary employees, depending on the job requirements of the class,
except that entry level state park rangers shall serve a probationary
period of twelve months;
(d) Transfers;
(e) Promotional preferences;
(f) Sick leaves and vacations;
(g) Hours of work;
(h) Layoffs when necessary and subsequent reemployment, except for
the financial basis for layoffs;
(i) The number of names to be certified for vacancies;
(j) Adoption and revision of a state salary schedule to reflect the
prevailing rates in Washington state private industries and other
governmental units. The rates in the salary schedules or plans shall
be increased if necessary to attain comparable worth under an
implementation plan under RCW 41.06.155 and, for institutions of higher
education and related boards, shall be competitive for positions of a
similar nature in the state or the locality in which an institution of
higher education or related board is located. Such adoption and
revision is subject to approval by the director of financial management
in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW;
(k) Increment increases within the series of steps for each pay
grade based on length of service for all employees whose standards of
performance are such as to permit them to retain job status in the
classified service. ((For the twelve months following)) From February
18, 2009, through June 30, 2011, a salary or wage increase shall not be
granted to any exempt position under this chapter;
(l) Optional lump sum relocation compensation approved by the
agency director, whenever it is reasonably necessary that a person make
a domiciliary move in accepting a transfer or other employment with the
state. An agency must provide lump sum compensation within existing
resources. If the person receiving the relocation payment terminates
or causes termination with the state, for reasons other than layoff,
disability separation, or other good cause as determined by an agency
director, within one year of the date of the employment, the state is
entitled to reimbursement of the lump sum compensation from the person;
(m) Providing for veteran's preference as required by existing
statutes, with recognition of preference in regard to layoffs and
subsequent reemployment for veterans and their surviving spouses by
giving such eligible veterans and their surviving spouses additional
credit in computing their seniority by adding to their unbroken state
service, as defined by the director, the veteran's service in the
military not to exceed five years. For the purposes of this section,
"veteran" means any person who has one or more years of active military
service in any branch of the armed forces of the United States or who
has less than one year's service and is discharged with a disability
incurred in the line of duty or is discharged at the convenience of the
government and who, upon termination of such service, has received an
honorable discharge, a discharge for physical reasons with an honorable
record, or a release from active military service with evidence of
service other than that for which an undesirable, bad conduct, or
dishonorable discharge shall be given. However, the surviving spouse
of a veteran is entitled to the benefits of this section regardless of
the veteran's length of active military service. For the purposes of
this section, "veteran" does not include any person who has voluntarily
retired with twenty or more years of active military service and whose
military retirement pay is in excess of five hundred dollars per month.
(2) Rules adopted under this section by the director shall provide
for local administration and management by the institutions of higher
education and related boards, subject to periodic audit and review by
the director.
(3) Rules adopted by the director under this section may be
superseded by the provisions of a collective bargaining agreement
negotiated under RCW 41.80.001 and 41.80.010 through 41.80.130. The
supersession of such rules shall only affect employees in the
respective collective bargaining units.
(4)(a) The director shall require that each state agency report
annually the following data:
(i) The number of classified, Washington management service, and
exempt employees in the agency and the change compared to the previous
report;
(ii) The number of bonuses and performance-based incentives awarded
to agency staff and the base wages of such employees; and
(iii) The cost of each bonus or incentive awarded.
(b) A report that compiles the data in (a) of this subsection for
all agencies will be provided annually to the governor and the
appropriate committees of the legislature and must be posted for the
public on the department of personnel's agency web site.
(5) From the effective date of this act until June 30, 2011,
neither recruitment and retention awards nor performance-based awards,
incentives, or premiums may be granted by the director or employers to
employees covered by rules adopted pursuant to the provisions of this
section.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.06.500 and 2009 c 5 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 41.06.070, notwithstanding any other
provisions of this chapter, the director is authorized to adopt, after
consultation with state agencies and employee organizations, rules for
managers as defined in RCW 41.06.022. These rules shall not apply to
managers employed by institutions of higher education or related boards
or whose positions are exempt. The rules shall govern recruitment,
appointment, classification and allocation of positions, examination,
training and career development, hours of work, probation,
certification, compensation, transfer, affirmative action, promotion,
layoff, reemployment, performance appraisals, discipline, and any and
all other personnel practices for managers. These rules shall be
separate from rules adopted for other employees, and to the extent that
the rules adopted under this section apply only to managers shall take
precedence over rules adopted for other employees, and are not subject
to review by the board.
(2) In establishing rules for managers, the director shall adhere
to the following goals:
(a) Development of a simplified classification system that
facilitates movement of managers between agencies and promotes upward
mobility;
(b) Creation of a compensation system that provides flexibility in
setting and changing salaries, and shall require review and approval by
the director in the case of any salary changes greater than five
percent proposed for any group of employees;
(c) Establishment of a performance appraisal system that emphasizes
individual accountability for program results and efficient management
of resources; effective planning, organization, and communication
skills; valuing and managing workplace diversity; development of
leadership and interpersonal abilities; and employee development;
(d) Strengthening management training and career development
programs that build critical management knowledge, skills, and
abilities; focusing on managing and valuing workplace diversity;
empowering employees by enabling them to share in workplace decision
making and to be innovative, willing to take risks, and able to accept
and deal with change; promoting a workplace where the overall focus is
on the recipient of the government services and how these services can
be improved; and enhancing mobility and career advancement
opportunities;
(e) Permitting flexible recruitment and hiring procedures that
enable agencies to compete effectively with other employers, both
public and private, for managers with appropriate skills and training;
allowing consideration of all qualified candidates for positions as
managers; and achieving affirmative action goals and diversity in the
workplace;
(f) Providing that managers may only be reduced, dismissed,
suspended, or demoted for cause; and
(g) Facilitating decentralized and regional administration.
(3) For the twelve months following February 18, 2009, a salary or
wage increase shall not be granted to any position under this section.
(4) From the effective date of this act until June 30, 2011, no
recruitment and retention, performance pay, awards, incentives,
premiums, or growth and development progression adjustments may be
granted by the director or employers to the Washington management
service employees covered by the rules adopted pursuant to the
provisions of this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.180.080 and 1997 c 163 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to other powers and duties specified in this chapter,
the commission may:
(1) Establish in resolutions relating to any issuance of bonds, or
in any financing documents relating to such issuance, such standards
and requirements applicable to the purchase of mortgages and mortgage
loans or the making of loans to mortgage lenders as the commission
deems necessary or desirable, including but not limited to: (a) The
time within which mortgage lenders must make commitments and
disbursements for mortgages or mortgage loans; (b) the location and
other characteristics of single-family housing or multifamily housing
to be financed by mortgages and mortgage loans; (c) the terms and
conditions of mortgages and mortgage loans to be acquired; (d) the
amounts and types of insurance coverage required on mortgages, mortgage
loans, and bonds; (e) the representations and warranties of mortgage
lenders confirming compliance with such standards and requirements; (f)
restrictions as to interest rate and other terms of mortgages or
mortgage loans or the return realized therefrom by mortgage lenders;
(g) the type and amount of collateral security to be provided to assure
repayment of any loans from the commission and to assure repayment of
bonds; and (h) any other matters related to the purchase of mortgages
or mortgage loans or the making of loans to lending institutions as
shall be deemed relevant by the commission;
(2) Sue and be sued in its own name;
(3) Make and execute contracts and all other instruments necessary
or convenient for the exercise of its purposes or powers, including but
not limited to contracts or agreements for the origination, servicing,
and administration of mortgages or mortgage loans, and the borrowing of
money;
(4) Procure such insurance, including but not limited to insurance:
(a) Against any loss in connection with its property and other assets,
including but not limited to mortgages or mortgage loans, in such
amounts and from such insurers as the commission deems desirable, and
(b) to indemnify members of the commission for acts done in the course
of their duties;
(5) Provide for the investment of any funds, including funds held
in reserve, not required for immediate disbursement, and provide for
the selection of investments;
(6) Fix, revise, and collect fees and charges in connection with
the investigation and financing of housing or in connection with
assignments, contracts, purchases of mortgages or mortgage loans, or
any other actions permitted under this chapter or by the commission;
and receive grants and contributions;
(7) Make such expenditures as are appropriate for paying the
administrative costs of the commission and for carrying out the
provisions of this chapter. These expenditures may be made only from
funds consisting of the commission's receipts from fees and charges,
grants and contributions, the proceeds of bonds issued by the
commission, and other revenues; these expenditures shall not be made
from funds of the state of Washington;
(8) Establish such special funds, and controls on deposits to and
disbursements from them, as it finds convenient for the implementation
of this chapter;
(9) Conduct such investigations and feasibility studies as it deems
appropriate;
(10) Proceed with foreclosure actions or accept deeds in lieu of
foreclosure together with the assignments of leases and rentals
incidental thereto. Any properties acquired by the commission through
such actions shall be sold as soon as practicable through persons
licensed under chapter 18.85 RCW or at public auction, or by transfer
to a public agency. In preparation for the disposition of the
properties, the commission may own, lease, clear, construct,
reconstruct, rehabilitate, repair, maintain, manage, operate, assign,
or encumber the properties;
(11) Take assignments of leases and rentals;
(12) Subject to any provisions of the commission's contracts with
the holders of obligations of the commission, consent to any
modification with respect to rate of interest, time, and payment of any
installment of principal or interest or any other term of any contract,
mortgage, mortgage loan, mortgage loan commitment, contract, or
agreement of any kind;
(13) Subject to provisions of the commission's contracts with the
holders of bonds, permit the reduction of rental or carrying charges to
persons unable to pay the regular rent or schedule of charges if, by
reason of other income of the commission or by reason of payment by any
department, agency, or instrumentality of the United States or of this
state, the reduction can be made without jeopardizing the economic
stability of the housing being financed;
(14) Sell, at public or private sale, with or without public
bidding, any mortgage, mortgage loan, or other instrument or asset held
by the commission;
(15) Employ, contract with, or engage engineers, architects,
attorneys, financial advisors, bond underwriters, mortgage lenders,
mortgage administrators, housing construction or financing experts,
other technical or professional assistants, and such other personnel as
are necessary. The commission may delegate to the appropriate persons
the power to execute legal instruments on its behalf;
(16) Receive contributions or grants from any source unless
otherwise prohibited;
(17) Impose covenants running with the land in order to satisfy and
enforce the requirements of applicable state and federal law and
commission policy with respect to housing or other facilities financed
by the commission or assisted by federal, state, or local programs
administered by the commission, by executing and recording regulatory
agreements or other covenants between the commission and the person or
entity to be bound. These regulatory agreements and covenants shall
run with the land and be enforceable by the commission or its
successors or assigns against the person or entity making the
regulatory agreement or covenants or its successors or assigns, even
though there may be no privity of estate or privity of contract between
the commission or its successors or assigns and the person or entity
against whom enforcement is sought. The term of any such covenant
shall be set forth in the recorded agreement containing the covenant.
This subsection shall apply to regulatory agreements and covenants
previously entered into by the commission as well as regulatory
agreements and covenants entered into by the commission on or after
July 27, 1997;
(18) Delegate any of its powers and duties if consistent with the
purposes of this chapter;
(19) Exercise any other power reasonably required to implement the
purposes of this chapter.
From the effective date of this act through June 30, 2011, neither
the commission nor its designees may grant any recruitment and
retention, bonus, performance-based award, or premiums to any employee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---