BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.31.020 and 2007 c 356 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington traumatic brain injury strategic partnership
advisory council is established as an advisory council to the governor,
the legislature, and the secretary of the department of social and
health services.
(2) The council shall be composed of:
(a) The following voting members ((who shall be)) appointed by the
governor:
(((a) The secretary or the secretary's designee, and
representatives from the following: Children's administration, mental
health division, aging and disability services administration, and
vocational rehabilitation;
(b) The executive director of a state brain injury association;
(c))) (i) A representative from a nonprofit organization serving
individuals with traumatic brain injury;
(((d) The secretary of the department of health or the secretary's
designee;
(e) The secretary of the department of corrections or the
secretary's designee;
(f) A representative of the department of community, trade, and
economic development;
(g))) (ii) A representative from an organization serving veterans;
(((h) A representative from the national guard;
(i))) (iii) A representative of a Native American tribe located in
Washington;
(((j) The executive director of the Washington protection and
advocacy system;
(k))) (iv) A neurologist who has experience working with
individuals with traumatic brain injuries;
(((l))) (v) A neuropsychologist who has experience working with
persons with traumatic brain injuries;
(((m))) (vi) A social worker or clinical psychologist who has
experience in working with persons who have sustained traumatic brain
injuries;
(((n))) (vii) A rehabilitation specialist, such as a speech
pathologist, vocational rehabilitation counselor, occupational
therapist, or physical therapist who has experience working with
persons with traumatic brain injuries;
(((o))) (viii) Two persons who are individuals with a traumatic
brain injury;
(((p))) (ix) Two persons who are family members of individuals with
traumatic brain injuries; and
(((q))) (x) Two members of the public who have experience with
issues related to the causes of traumatic brain injuries; and
(b) The following ex officio voting members:
(i) The secretary or the secretary's designee, and representatives
from the following: Children's administration, mental health division,
aging and disability services administration, and vocational
rehabilitation;
(ii) The secretary of the department of health or the secretary's
designee;
(iii) The secretary of the department of corrections or the
secretary's designee;
(iv) A representative of the department of commerce;
(v) A representative of the office of the superintendent of public
instruction to be appointed by June 30, 2010;
(vi) The executive director of the Washington protection and
advocacy system or the executive director's designee;
(vii) The executive director of the state brain injury association
or the executive director's designee; and
(viii) A representative from the national guard.
(3) Councilmembers shall not be compensated for serving on the
council, but may be reimbursed for all reasonable expenses related to
costs incurred in participating in meetings for the council.
(4) ((Initial appointments to the council shall be made by July 30,
2007.)) The terms of appointed councilmembers shall be three years((,
except that the terms of the appointed members who are initially
appointed shall be staggered by the governor to end as follows:
(a) Four members on June 30, 2008;
(b) Three members on June 30, 2009; and
(c) Three members on June 30, 2010)).
(5) No councilmember appointed pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of
this section, except for the representative from the nonprofit
organization serving individuals with traumatic brain injury, may serve
more than two consecutive terms.
(6) The appointed members of the council shall, to the extent
possible, represent rural and urban areas of the state.
(7) A chairperson shall be elected every two years by majority vote
from among the councilmembers. The chairperson shall act as the
presiding officer of the council.
(8) The duties of the council include:
(a) Collaborating with the department to develop, and revise and
update, as needed, a comprehensive statewide plan to address the needs
of individuals with traumatic brain injuries;
(b) ((By November 1, 2007,)) Providing recommendations to the
department on criteria to be used to select programs facilitating
support groups for individuals with traumatic brain injuries and their
families under RCW 74.31.050;
(c) By ((December 1, 2007)) February 28, 2012, and every two years
thereafter, submitting a report to the legislature and the governor on
the following:
(i) ((The development of a comprehensive statewide information and
referral network for individuals with traumatic brain injuries;
(ii) The development of a statewide registry to collect data
regarding individuals with traumatic brain injuries, including the
potential to utilize the department of information services to develop
the registry;
(iii) The efforts of the department to provide services for
individuals with traumatic brain injuries)) Identifying the activities
of the council in the implementation of the comprehensive statewide
plan; and
(ii) The council's recommendations for revisions to the
comprehensive statewide plan;
(d) ((By December 30, 2007, reviewing the preliminary comprehensive
statewide plan developed by the department to meet the needs of
individuals with traumatic brain injuries as required in RCW 74.31.030
and submitting a report to the legislature and the governor containing
comments and recommendations regarding the plan)) Developing
recommendations for using the traumatic brain injury account
established under RCW 74.31.060 to form strategic partnerships and to
foster the development of critical services for individuals with
traumatic brain injury; and
(e) Developing recommendations for a council staffing plan for
council support under RCW 74.31.030.
(9) The council may utilize the advice or services of a nationally
recognized expert, or other individuals as the council deems
appropriate, to assist the council in carrying out its duties under
this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.31.030 and 2007 c 356 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((By July 30, 2007,)) In response to council recommendations
developed pursuant to RCW 74.31.020, the department shall include in
the statewide comprehensive plan a staffing plan for providing adequate
support for council activities for positions funded by the traumatic
brain injury account established in RCW 74.31.060 and designate ((a))
at least one staff person who shall be responsible for the following:
(a) Coordinating policies, programs, and services for individuals
with traumatic brain injuries; and
(b) Providing staff support to the council created in RCW
74.31.020.
(2) The department shall provide data and information to the
council established under RCW 74.31.020 that is requested by the
council and is in the possession or control of the department.
(3) ((By December 1, 2007,)) The department shall ((provide a
preliminary report to the legislature and the governor, and shall
provide a final report by December 1, 2008, containing recommendations
for a)) implement within available funds the comprehensive statewide
plan to address the needs of individuals with traumatic brain injuries,
including the use of public-private partnerships and a public awareness
campaign. The comprehensive plan should be created, implemented within
available funding, and revised as necessary in collaboration with the
council and should consider the following:
(a) Building provider capacity and provider training;
(b) Improving the coordination of services;
(c) The feasibility of establishing agreements with private sector
agencies to develop services for individuals with traumatic brain
injuries; and
(d) Other areas the council deems appropriate.
(4) ((By December 1, 2007,)) The department shall:
(a) ((Provide)) Assure information and referral services are
provided to individuals with traumatic brain injuries ((until the
statewide referral and information network is developed)). The
referral services may be funded from the traumatic brain injury account
established under RCW 74.31.060; ((and))
(b) Encourage and facilitate the following:
(i) Collaboration among state agencies that provide services to
individuals with traumatic brain injuries;
(ii) Collaboration among organizations and entities that provide
services to individuals with traumatic brain injuries; and
(iii) Community participation in program implementation; and
(c) Have the authority to accept and expend or retain any gifts,
bequests, contributions, or grants from private persons or private and
public agencies to carry out the purpose of this chapter.
(5) By December 1, ((2007, and by December 1st each year)) 2011,
and at least every two years thereafter, the department shall issue a
report to the governor and the legislature containing the following:
(a) A summary of action taken by the department to meet the needs
of individuals with traumatic brain injuries; ((and))
(b) Recommendations for improvements in services to address the
needs of individuals with traumatic brain injuries; and
(c) Changes in the comprehensive statewide plan.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.31.040 and 2007 c 356 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
((By December 1, 2007,)) In collaboration with the council, the
department shall ((institute)) conduct a public awareness campaign that
utilizes funding from the traumatic brain injury account to leverage a
private advertising campaign to persuade Washington residents to be
aware and concerned about the issues facing individuals with traumatic
brain injuries through all forms of media including television, radio,
and print.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.31.050 and 2007 c 356 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((By March 1, 2008,)) The department shall provide funding to
programs that facilitate support groups to individuals with traumatic
brain injuries and their families.
(2) The department shall use a request for proposal process to
select the programs to receive funding. The council shall provide
recommendations to the department on the criteria to be used in
selecting the programs.
(3) The programs shall be funded solely from the traumatic brain
injury account established in RCW 74.31.060, to the extent that funds
are available.

Sec. 5 RCW 74.31.060 and 2007 c 356 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The traumatic brain injury account is created in the ((state
treasury)) custody of the state treasurer. Two dollars of the fee
imposed under RCW 46.63.110(7)(c) must be deposited into the account.
Moneys in the account ((may be spent only after appropriation, and))
may be used only to support activities in the statewide traumatic brain
injury comprehensive plan, to provide a public awareness campaign and
services relating to traumatic brain injury under RCW 74.31.040 and
74.31.050, for information and referral services, and for costs of
required department staff who are providing support for the council
((and information and referral services)) under RCW 74.31.020 and
74.31.030. The secretary of the department of social and health
services has the authority to administer the funds.

--- END ---