BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the 2009
settlement in New England Carpenters Health Benefits Fund v. First Data
Bank, Inc., in which publishers of average wholesale drug prices agreed
to reduce many published average wholesale drug prices, has effectively
reduced medicaid reimbursement rates to Washington pharmacies because
published average wholesale drug prices are a significant component of
the medicaid reimbursement rate calculation.
(2) The legislature further finds that it is in the public interest
to protect the health and welfare of Washington residents by ensuring
that payment rates to Washington pharmacies are sufficient to enlist
enough pharmacies to ensure access to needed drugs for medicaid
patients, especially in rural areas where there are fewer pharmacies.
(3) The legislature intends to safeguard access to pharmaceuticals
for medicaid patients by directing the department of social and health
services to adjust pharmacy reimbursement rates so that pharmacy
reimbursements are not reduced as a result of the reduction in
published average wholesale prices that resulted from the legal
settlement in New England Carpenters Health Benefits Fund v. First Data
Bank, Inc.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall adjust pharmacy reimbursement rates so that
pharmacy reimbursements are not reduced as a result of the reduction in
published average wholesale prices that resulted from the legal
settlement in New England Carpenters Health Benefits Fund v. First Data
Bank, Inc.

--- END ---