BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds a number of cities and
counties in the state of Washington conduct traffic schools for
eligible persons receiving traffic infractions as a condition of the
deferral of the infractions under RCW 46.63.070(5). The legislature
recognizes that since driver's education programs have only recently
been required to provide information about how to drive safely among
bicyclists and pedestrians, many licensed drivers do not have knowledge
about such safe driving practices. In order to increase such knowledge
and to avoid unnecessary injuries, fatalities, and conflicts, the
legislature believes that it is appropriate to include bicycle and
pedestrian curriculum approved by the department of licensing for
traffic schools or to new drivers as part of the curriculum of traffic
schools. Curriculum materials, which are donated by bicycle
organizations without state expense, are available from the department
of licensing and posted on the department's web site.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.83 RCW
to read as follows:
Any jurisdiction conducting a traffic school as a condition of the
deferral of an infraction under RCW 46.63.070(5) shall include, as part
of its curriculum, the curriculum for driving safely among bicyclists
and pedestrians that has been approved by the department of licensing
for traffic schools. This curriculum addition shall not exceed thirty
minutes of an eight-hour curriculum block.

--- END ---