BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Bargaining representative" means any lawful organization which
represents employees in their employment relations with their
employers.
(2) "Collective bargaining" means the performance of the mutual
obligations of the employer and the exclusive bargaining representative
to meet at reasonable times, to confer and negotiate in good faith, and
to execute a written agreement with respect to grievance procedures and
collective negotiations on personnel matters, including wages, hours,
and working conditions, which may be peculiar to an appropriate
bargaining unit of such employer, except that by such obligation
neither party shall be compelled to agree to a proposal or be required
to make a concession unless otherwise provided in this chapter.
(3) "Commission" means the public employment relations commission.
(4) "Employee" means a symphony musician who is an employee of an
employer.
(5)(a) "Employer" means a symphony orchestra with a gross annual
revenue of more than three hundred thousand dollars that does not meet
the jurisdictional standards of the national labor relations board, and
includes any person acting as an agent of an employer, directly or
indirectly.
(b) In determining whether any person is acting as an "agent" of
another person so as to make such other person responsible for his or
her acts, the question of whether the specific acts performed were
actually authorized or subsequently ratified shall not be controlling.
(6) "Executive director" means the executive director of the
commission.
(7) "Labor dispute" includes any controversy concerning terms,
tenure, or conditions of employment, or concerning the association of
representation of persons in negotiating, fixing, maintaining,
changing, or seeking to arrange terms or conditions of employment,
regardless of whether the disputants stand in the proximate relation of
employer and employee. In the event of a dispute between an employer
and an exclusive bargaining representative over the matters that are
terms and conditions of employment, the commission shall decide which
items are mandatory subjects for bargaining.
(8) "Labor organization" means an organization of any kind, or an
agency or employee representation committee or plan, in which employees
participate and which exists for the primary purpose of dealing with
employers concerning grievances, labor disputes, wages, rates of pay,
hours of employment, or conditions of employment.
(9) "Person" includes one or more individuals, labor organizations,
partnerships, associations, corporations, legal representatives,
trustees in bankruptcy, or receivers.
(10) "Unfair labor practice" means any activity listed in sections
13 and 14 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 No employer, or other person, shall directly
or indirectly, interfere with, restrain, coerce, or discriminate
against any employee or group of employees in the free exercise of
their right to organize and designate bargaining representatives of
their own choosing for the purpose of collective bargaining, or in the
free exercise of any other right under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If an employer and its employees are in
disagreement as to the selection of a bargaining representative the
commission shall be invited to intervene as is provided in sections 4
through 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The commission, upon reasonable notice,
shall decide in each application for certification as an exclusive
bargaining representative, the unit appropriate for the purpose of
collective bargaining. In determining, modifying, or combining the
bargaining unit, the commission shall consider the duties, skills, and
working conditions of the employees; the history of collective
bargaining by the employees and their bargaining representatives; the
extent of organization among the employees; and the desire of the
employees. The commission shall determine the bargaining
representative by: (1) Comparison of signatures on organization
bargaining authorization cards; or (2) conducting an election
specifically therefor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If the commission elects to conduct an
election to ascertain the exclusive bargaining representative, and upon
the request of a prospective bargaining representative showing written
proof of at least thirty percent representation of the employees within
the unit, the commission shall hold an election by secret ballot to
determine the issue. The ballot shall contain the name of the
bargaining representative and of any other bargaining representative
showing written proof of at least ten percent representation of the
employees within the unit, together with a choice for any employee to
designate that he or she does not desire to be represented by any
bargaining agent. Where more than one organization is on the ballot
and neither of the three or more choices receives a majority vote of
valid ballots cast, a run-off election shall be held. The run-off
ballot shall contain the two choices which received the largest and
second-largest number of votes. No question concerning representation
may be raised within one year of a certification or attempted
certification. Where there is a valid collective bargaining agreement
in effect, no question of representation may be raised except during
the period not more than ninety nor less than sixty days prior to the
expiration date of the agreement. Any agreement which contains a
provision for automatic renewal or extension of the agreement shall not
be a valid agreement; nor shall any agreement be valid if it provides
for a term of existence for more than three years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The bargaining representative which has been
determined to represent a majority of the employees in a bargaining
unit shall be certified by the commission as the exclusive bargaining
representative of, and shall be required to represent, all the
employees within the unit without regard to membership in the
bargaining representative. However, any employee at any time may
present his or her grievance to the employer and have such grievance
adjusted without the intervention of the exclusive bargaining
representative, if the adjustment is not inconsistent with the terms of
a collective bargaining agreement then in effect, and if the exclusive
bargaining representative has been given reasonable opportunity to be
present at any initial meeting called for the resolution of the
grievance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The commission may adopt rules necessary to
administer this chapter in conformity with the intent and purpose of
this chapter and consistent with the best standards of labor-management
relations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 An employer may engage in collective
bargaining with the exclusive bargaining representative and no employer
may refuse to engage in collective bargaining with the exclusive
bargaining representative. Upon the failure of the employer and the
exclusive bargaining representative to conclude a collective bargaining
agreement, any matter in dispute may be submitted by either party to
the commission. If an employer implements its last and best offer
where there is no contract settlement, allegations that either party is
violating the terms of the implemented offer are subject to grievance
arbitration procedures if and as such procedures are set forth in the
implemented offer, or, if not in the implemented offer, if and as such
procedures are set forth in the parties' last contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Upon the written authorization of any
employee within the bargaining unit and after the certification or
recognition of the bargaining representative, the employer must deduct
from the pay of the employee the monthly amount of dues as certified by
the secretary of the exclusive bargaining representative and must
transmit the dues to the treasurer of the exclusive bargaining
representative.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A collective bargaining agreement may:
(1) Contain union security provisions. However, nothing in this
section authorizes a closed shop provision. Agreements involving union
security provisions must safeguard the right of nonassociation of
employees based on bona fide religious tenets or teachings of a church
or religious body of which the employee is a member. The employee must
pay an amount of money equivalent to regular union dues and initiation
fee to a nonreligious charity or to another charitable organization
mutually agreed upon by the employee affected and the bargaining
representative to which the employee would otherwise pay the dues and
initiation fee. The employee must furnish written proof that the
payment has been made. If the employee and the bargaining
representative do not reach agreement on this matter, the commission
must designate the charitable organization;
(2) Provide for binding arbitration of a labor dispute arising from
the application or the interpretation of the matters contained in a
collective bargaining agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) After the termination date of a
collective bargaining agreement, all of the terms and conditions
specified in the collective bargaining agreement remain in effect until
the effective date of a subsequent agreement, not to exceed one year
from the termination date stated in the agreement. Thereafter, the
employer may unilaterally implement according to law.
(2) This section does not apply to provisions of a collective
bargaining agreement which both parties agree to exclude from the
provisions of subsection (1) of this section and to provisions within
the collective bargaining agreement with separate and specific
termination dates.
(3) This section shall not apply to collective bargaining
agreements in effect or being bargained on the effective date of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 In addition to any other method for
selecting arbitrators, the parties may request the commission to
appoint a qualified person who may be an employee of the commission to
act as an arbitrator to assist in the resolution of a labor dispute
between the employer and the bargaining representative arising from the
application of the matters contained in a collective bargaining
agreement. The arbitrator must conduct the arbitration of the dispute
in a manner as provided for in the collective bargaining agreement.
The commission may not collect any fees or charges from the employer
or the bargaining representative for services performed by the
commission under this chapter. The provisions of chapter 49.08 RCW do
not apply to this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 It is an unfair labor practice for an
employer:
(1) To interfere with, restrain, or coerce employees in the
exercise of their rights guaranteed by this chapter;
(2) To control, dominate, or interfere with a bargaining
representative;
(3) To discriminate against an employee who has filed an unfair
labor practice charge or who has given testimony under this chapter;
(4) To refuse to engage in collective bargaining.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 It is an unfair labor practice for a
bargaining representative:
(1) To interfere with, restrain, or coerce employees in the
exercise of their rights guaranteed by this chapter;
(2) To induce the employer to commit an unfair labor practice;
(3) To discriminate against an employee who has filed an unfair
labor practice charge or who has given testimony under this chapter;
(4) To refuse to engage in collective bargaining.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 (1) The commission must prevent unfair
labor practices and issue appropriate remedial orders. However, a
complaint may not be processed for an unfair labor practice occurring
more than six months before the filing of the complaint with the
commission.
(2) If the commission determines that a person has engaged in or is
engaging in an unfair labor practice, the commission must issue and
serve upon the person an order requiring the person to cease and desist
from the unfair labor practice. The commission may take action to
carry out the purposes and policy of this chapter, including requiring
the person to pay damages and reinstate employees.
(3) The commission may petition the superior court for the county
in which the main office of the employer is located or in which the
person who has engaged or is engaging in the unfair labor practice
resides or transacts business, for the enforcement of its order and for
appropriate temporary relief.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Actions taken by or on behalf of the
commission shall be pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, or rules adopted in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, and the right of judicial review
provided by chapter 34.05 RCW is applicable to all actions and rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Sections 1 through 17 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 49 RCW.

--- END ---