BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there is a need
to avoid insider trading in the public sector. This act creates a
mechanism so that public land sales offer transparency in the process
and avoid the appearance of favoritism when they include public or
former public employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
Whenever a public employee or a person who was employed by a public
entity within the past twelve months enters into contract to purchase
public lands held by a public corporation created pursuant to RCW
35.21.730 or 35.21.660, the county legislative authority must ratify
the sale by majority vote at an open public meeting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35.22 RCW
to read as follows:
Whenever a public employee or a person who was employed by a public
entity within the past twelve months enters into contract to purchase
public lands held by a city, the city's legislative authority must
ratify the sale by majority vote at an open public meeting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 35.23 RCW
to read as follows:
Whenever a public employee or a person who was employed by a public
entity within the past twelve months enters into contract to purchase
public lands held by a city, the city's legislative authority must
ratify the sale by majority vote at an open public meeting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 35.27 RCW
to read as follows:
Whenever a public employee or a person who was employed by a public
entity within the past twelve months enters into contract to purchase
public lands held by a town, the town's legislative authority must
ratify the sale by majority vote at an open public meeting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 35.57 RCW
to read as follows:
Whenever a public employee or a person who was employed by a public
entity within the past twelve months enters into contract to purchase
public lands held by a public facilities district, the city's
legislative authority must ratify the sale by majority vote at an open
public meeting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 36.34 RCW
to read as follows:
Whenever the winning bidder for county property sold pursuant to
RCW 36.34.080 is a public employee or a person who was employed by a
public entity within the past twelve months, the county legislative
authority must ratify the sale by majority vote at an open public
meeting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 36.100 RCW
to read as follows:
Whenever a public employee or a person who was employed by a public
entity within the past twelve months enters into contract to purchase
public lands held by a public facilities district, the city's
legislative authority must ratify the sale by majority vote at an open
public meeting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 43.17 RCW
to read as follows:
When selling real property, each department must publish a notice
listing any bidder who is a public employee or who was employed by a
public entity within the previous twelve months.

Sec. 10 RCW 47.12.063 and 2006 c 17 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature to continue the
department's policy giving priority consideration to abutting property
owners in agricultural areas when disposing of property through its
surplus property program under this section.
(2) Whenever the department determines that any real property owned
by the state of Washington and under the jurisdiction of the department
is no longer required for transportation purposes and that it is in the
public interest to do so, the department may sell the property or
exchange it in full or part consideration for land or improvements or
for construction of improvements at fair market value to any of the
following governmental entities or persons:
(a) Any other state agency;
(b) The city or county in which the property is situated;
(c) Any other municipal corporation;
(d) Regional transit authorities created under chapter 81.112 RCW;
(e) The former owner of the property from whom the state acquired
title;
(f) In the case of residentially improved property, a tenant of the
department who has resided thereon for not less than six months and who
is not delinquent in paying rent to the state;
(g) Any abutting private owner but only after each other abutting
private owner (if any), as shown in the records of the county assessor,
is notified in writing of the proposed sale. If more than one abutting
private owner requests in writing the right to purchase the property
within fifteen days after receiving notice of the proposed sale, the
property shall be sold at public auction in the manner provided in RCW
47.12.283;
(h) To any person through the solicitation of written bids through
public advertising in the manner prescribed by RCW 47.28.050;
(i) To any other owner of real property required for transportation
purposes;
(j) In the case of property suitable for residential use, any
nonprofit organization dedicated to providing affordable housing to
very low-income, low-income, and moderate-income households as defined
in RCW 43.63A.510 and is eligible to receive assistance through the
Washington housing trust fund created in chapter 43.185 RCW; or
(k) A federally recognized Indian tribe within whose reservation
boundary the property is located.
(3) Sales to purchasers may at the department's option be for cash,
by real estate contract, or exchange of land or improvements.
Transactions involving the construction of improvements must be
conducted pursuant to chapter 47.28 RCW or Title 39 RCW, as applicable,
and must comply with all other applicable laws and rules.
(4) Conveyances made pursuant to this section shall be by deed
executed by the secretary of transportation and shall be duly
acknowledged.
(5) Unless otherwise provided, all moneys received pursuant to the
provisions of this section less any real estate broker commissions paid
pursuant to RCW 47.12.320 shall be deposited in the motor vehicle fund.
(6) When selling real property, the department must publish a
notice listing any bidder or purchaser who is a public employee or who
was employed by a public entity within the previous twelve months.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 53.08 RCW
to read as follows:
Whenever a public employee or a person who was employed by a public
entity within the past twelve months enters into contract to purchase
public lands held by a port district, the commission must ratify the
sale by majority vote at an open public meeting.

Sec. 12 RCW 54.16.180 and 2008 c 198 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A district may sell and convey, lease, or otherwise dispose of
all or any part of its works, plants, systems, utilities and
properties, after proceedings and approval by the voters of the
district, as provided for the lease or disposition of like properties
and facilities owned by cities and towns. The affirmative vote of
three-fifths of the voters voting at an election on the question of
approval of a proposed sale((,)) shall be necessary to authorize such
a sale.
(2) A district may, without the approval of the voters, sell,
convey, lease, or otherwise dispose of all or any part of the property
owned by it that is located:
(a) Outside its boundaries, to another public utility district,
city, town or other municipal corporation; or
(b) Within or without its boundaries, which has become
unserviceable, inadequate, obsolete, worn out or unfit to be used in
the operations of the system and which is no longer necessary, material
to, and useful in such operations, to any person or public body.
(3) A district may sell, convey, lease or otherwise dispose of
items of equipment or materials to any other district, to any
cooperative, mutual, consumer-owned or investor-owned utility, to any
federal, state, or local government agency, to any contractor employed
by the district or any other district, utility, or agency, or any
customer of the district or of any other district or utility, from the
district's stores without voter approval or resolution of the
district's board, if such items of equipment or materials cannot
practicably be obtained on a timely basis from any other source, and
the amount received by the district in consideration for any such sale,
conveyance, lease, or other disposal of such items of equipment or
materials is not less than the district's cost to purchase such items
or the reasonable market value of equipment or materials.
(4) A district located within a county with a population of from
one hundred twenty-five thousand to less than two hundred ten thousand
may sell and convey to a city of the first class, which owns its own
water system, all or any part of a water system owned by the district
where a portion of it is located within the boundaries of the city,
without approval of the voters, upon such terms and conditions as the
district shall determine.
(5) A district located in a county with a population of from twelve
thousand to less than eighteen thousand and bordered by the Columbia
river may, separately or in connection with the operation of a water
system, or as part of a plan for acquiring or constructing and
operating a water system, or in connection with the creation of another
or subsidiary local utility district, provide for the acquisition or
construction, additions or improvements to, or extensions of, and
operation of, a sewage system within the same service area as in the
judgment of the district commission is necessary or advisable to
eliminate or avoid any existing or potential danger to public health
due to lack of sewerage facilities or inadequacy of existing
facilities.
(6) A district located within a county with a population of from
one hundred twenty-five thousand to less than two hundred ten thousand
bordering on Puget Sound may sell and convey to any city or town with
a population of less than ten thousand all or any part of a water
system owned by the district without approval of the voters upon such
terms and conditions as the district shall determine.
(7) A district may sell and convey, lease, or otherwise dispose of,
to any person or entity without approval of the voters and upon such
terms and conditions as it determines, all or any part of an electric
generating project owned directly or indirectly by the district,
regardless of whether the project is completed, operable, or operating,
as long as:
(a) The project is or would be powered by an eligible renewable
resource as defined in RCW 19.285.030; and
(b) The district, or the separate legal entity in which the
district has an interest in the case of indirect ownership, has:
(i) The right to lease the project or to purchase all or any part
of the energy from the project during the period in which it does not
have a direct or indirect ownership interest in the project; and
(ii) An option to repurchase the project or part thereof sold,
conveyed, leased, or otherwise disposed of at or below fair market
value upon termination of the lease of the project or termination of
the right to purchase energy from the project.
(8) Districts are municipal corporations for the purposes of this
section. A commission shall be held to be the legislative body, a
president and secretary shall have the same powers and perform the same
duties as a mayor and city clerk, and the district resolutions shall be
held to be ordinances within the meaning of statutes governing the
sale, lease, or other disposal of public utilities owned by cities and
towns.
(9) When selling real property, the district must publish a notice
listing any bidder or purchaser who is a public employee or who was
employed by a public entity within the previous twelve months.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 57.08 RCW
to read as follows:
When selling real property, the district must publish a notice
listing any bidder or purchaser who is a public employee or who was
employed by a public entity within the previous twelve months.

Sec. 14 RCW 79.11.040 and 2003 c 334 s 311 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person desiring to purchase any state lands shall file an
application on the forms provided by the department and accompanied by
the fees authorized under RCW 79.02.250. If a person desiring to
purchase state lands is a public employee or was employed by a public
entity within the previous twelve months, the sale must conform to the
requirements of chapter 42.52 RCW.

Sec. 15 RCW 79.11.130 and 2003 c 381 s 4 and 2003 c 334 s 346 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The department shall give notice of the sale by advertisement
published not fewer than two times during a four-week period prior to
the time of sale in at least one newspaper of general circulation in
the county in which the whole, or any part of any lot, block, or tract
of land to be sold is situated, and by posting a copy of the notice in
a conspicuous place in the department's Olympia office, the region
headquarters administering such sale, and in the office of the county
auditor of such county. The notice shall specify the place, date, and
time of sale, the appraised value of the land, describe with
particularity each parcel of land to be sold, and specify that the
terms of sale will be available in the region headquarters and the
department's Olympia office. In addition, the notice shall include the
names of any public employees or former public employees who left
public employment in the previous twelve months making any offer to
purchase the state land, the amount of the public employee's offer, the
terms and conditions of the offer, and when and how the offer was made.
The notice must also include a statement that all offers from any other
individuals and entities will be accepted and that the property shall
be sold only to the highest and best bidder.
(2) The advertisement is for informational purposes only, and under
no circumstances does the information in the notice of sale constitute
a warranty that the purchaser will receive the stated values, volumes,
or acreage. All purchasers are expected to make their own
measurements, evaluations, and appraisals.
(3) The department shall print a list of all public lands and the
appraised value thereof, that are to be sold. This list should be
published in a pamphlet form to be issued at least four weeks prior to
the date of any sale of the lands. The list should be organized by
county and by alphabetical order, and provide sale information to
prospective buyers. The department shall retain for free distribution
in the Olympia office and the region offices sufficient copies of the
pamphlet, to be kept in a conspicuous place, and, when requested so to
do, shall mail copies of the pamphlet as issued to any requesting
applicant. The department may seek additional means of publishing the
information in the pamphlet, such as on the internet, to increase the
number of prospective buyers.
(4) The sale of valuable materials appraised at an amount not
exceeding two hundred fifty thousand dollars, as described in RCW
((79.01.200)) 79.11.090 and as authorized by the board of natural
resources, are exempt from the requirements of subsection (3) of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 79A.05
RCW to read as follows:
When selling real property, the commission must publish a notice
listing any bidder or purchaser who is a public employee or who was
employed by a public entity within the previous twelve months.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---