BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.225.145 and 2008 c 135 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall issue an associate license to any applicant
who demonstrates to the satisfaction of the secretary that the
applicant meets the following requirements for the applicant's practice
area and submits a declaration that the applicant is working under
supervision toward full licensure in that category:
(a) Licensed social worker associate--advanced or licensed social
worker associate--independent clinical: Graduation from a master's
degree or doctoral degree educational program in social work accredited
by the council on social work education and approved by the secretary
based upon nationally recognized standards.
(b) Licensed mental health counselor associate: Graduation from a
master's degree or doctoral degree educational program in mental health
counseling or a related discipline from a college or university
approved by the secretary based upon nationally recognized standards.
(c) Licensed marriage and family therapist associate: Graduation
from a master's degree or doctoral degree educational program in
marriage and family therapy or graduation from an educational program
in an allied field equivalent to a master's degree or doctoral degree
in marriage and family therapy approved by the secretary based upon
nationally recognized standards.
(2) ((Associates)) (a) A licensed mental health counselor associate
or a licensed marriage and family therapist associate may not provide
independent ((social work,)) mental health counseling((,)) or marriage
and family therapy for a fee, monetary or otherwise. Associates
working under the supervision of an approved supervisor are not
providing independent practice.
(b)(i)(A) A licensed social worker associate--advanced or (B) a
licensed social worker associate--independent clinical may only provide
independent clinical social work or advanced social work as employees
of a public or private agency, institution, or incorporated clinic to
acquire the experience hours necessary for full licensure. (ii)(A) A
licensed social worker associate--advanced or (B) a licensed social
worker associate--independent clinical may not provide services under
this subsection (2)(b) under any other circumstance on a voluntary
basis or for a fee, monetary or otherwise, including, but not limited
to, private practice.
(c) All types of associates must meet with and work under the
supervision of an approved supervisor who documents the provided
experience hours required for full licensure.
(3) Associates shall provide each client or patient, during the
first professional contact, with a disclosure form according to RCW
18.225.100, disclosing that he or she is an associate under the
supervision of an approved supervisor.
(4) The department shall adopt by rule what constitutes adequate
proof of compliance with the requirements of this section.
(5) Applicants are subject to the denial of a license or issuance
of a conditional license for the reasons set forth in chapter 18.130
RCW.
(6) An associate license may be renewed no more than four times.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2013.

--- END ---