BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to audits authorized under RCW 43.88.160 and
43.09.470, by December 1, 2010, and every eight years thereafter, the
state auditor must conduct independent, comprehensive performance
audits of the investment contracts entered into by the state investment
board.
(2) The scope for each performance audit may not be limited and
must include at least the following specific elements:
(a) Services actually provided under the contract in comparison to
the services originally contracted;
(b) Identification of services that can be reduced or eliminated;
(c) A comparison of investment performance and services obtained
through the contract compared to industry-wide performance data,
performance measures, and self-assessment systems; and
(d) Identification of best practices.

--- END ---