BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 59.20 RCW
to read as follows:
A landlord shall provide, upon the request of a tenant, a written
receipt for any payments made by the tenant. The receipt must be
provided to the tenant within fifteen business days of the request. A
tenant may request any receipt for sums paid within the previous twelve
months.

--- END ---