BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.40 RCW
under the subchapter heading "plan 2" to read as follows:
(1) Active members of the Washington state patrol retirement system
who have previously established service credit in the public employees'
retirement system plan 2 while employed in the state patrol as a
commercial vehicle enforcement officer, and who became a commissioned
officer on or before July 1, 2000, have the following options:
(a) Remain a member of the public employees' retirement system; or
(b) Transfer service credit earned under the retirement system as
a commercial vehicle enforcement officer to the Washington state patrol
retirement system by making an irrevocable choice filed in writing with
the department of retirement systems within one year of the
department's announcement of the ability to make such a transfer.
(2)(a) Any commissioned officer choosing to transfer under this
section shall have transferred from the retirement system to the
Washington state patrol retirement system:
(i) All the employee's applicable accumulated contributions plus
interest, and an equal amount of employer contributions attributed to
such employee; and
(ii) All applicable months of service as a commercial vehicle
enforcement officer credited to the employee under this chapter as
though that service was rendered as a member of the Washington state
patrol retirement system.
(b) For the applicable period of service, the employee shall pay:
(i) The difference between the contributions the employee paid to
the retirement system, and the contributions which would have been paid
by the employee had the employee been a member of the Washington state
patrol retirement system, plus interest as determined by the director.
This payment shall be made no later than December 31, 2018, or the date
of retirement, whichever comes first;
(ii) The difference between the employer contributions paid to the
public employees' retirement system, and the employer contributions
which would have been payable to the Washington state patrol retirement
system; and
(iii) An amount sufficient to ensure that the funding status of the
Washington state patrol retirement system will not change due to this
transfer.
(c) If the payment required by this subsection is not paid in full
by the deadline, the transferred service credit shall not be used to
determine eligibility for benefits nor to calculate benefits under the
Washington state patrol retirement system. In such case, the
employee's accumulated contributions plus interest transferred under
this subsection, and any payments made under this subsection, shall be
refunded to the employee. The employer shall be entitled to a credit
for the employer contributions transferred under this subsection.
(d) An individual who transfers service credit and contributions
under this subsection is permanently excluded from the public
employees' retirement system for all service as a commercial vehicle
enforcement officer.

--- END ---