BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.09.170 and 2008 c 6 s 1017 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in ((subsection (7) of)) RCW
26.09.070(7), the provisions of any decree respecting maintenance or
support may be modified: (a) Only as to installments accruing
subsequent to the petition for modification or motion for adjustment
except motions to compel court-ordered adjustments, which shall be
effective as of the first date specified in the decree for implementing
the adjustment; and, (b) except as otherwise provided in subsections
(5), (6), (9), and (10) of this section, only upon a showing of a
substantial change of circumstances. The provisions as to property
disposition may not be revoked or modified, unless the court finds the
existence of conditions that justify the reopening of a judgment under
the laws of this state.
(2) Unless otherwise agreed in writing or expressly provided in the
decree the obligation to pay future maintenance is terminated upon the
death of either party or the remarriage of the party receiving
maintenance or registration of a new domestic partnership of the party
receiving maintenance.
(3) Unless otherwise agreed in writing or expressly provided in the
decree, provisions for the support of a child are terminated by
emancipation of the child or by the death of the parent obligated to
support the child.
(4) Unless expressly provided by an order of the superior court or
a court of comparable jurisdiction, the support provisions of the order
are terminated upon the marriage or registration of a domestic
partnership to each other of parties to a paternity order, or upon
remarriage or registration of a domestic partnership to each other of
parties to a decree of dissolution. The remaining provisions of the
order, including provisions establishing paternity, remain in effect.
(5) An order of child support may be modified one year or more
after it has been entered without showing a substantial change of
circumstances:
(a) If the order in practice works a severe economic hardship on
either party or the child;
(b) If a party requests an adjustment in an order for child support
which was based on guidelines which determined the amount of support
according to the child's age, and the child is no longer in the age
category on which the current support amount was based;
(c) If a child is still in high school, upon a finding that there
is a need to extend support beyond the eighteenth birthday to complete
high school; or
(d) To add an automatic adjustment of support provision consistent
with RCW 26.09.100.
(6) An order or decree entered prior to June 7, 1984, may be
modified without showing a substantial change of circumstances if the
requested modification is to:
(a) Require health insurance coverage for a child named therein; or
(b) Modify an existing order for health insurance coverage.
(7) An obligor's voluntary unemployment or voluntary
underemployment, by itself, is not a substantial change of
circumstances.
(8)(a) The department of social and health services may file an
action to modify or adjust an order of child support if public
assistance money is being paid to or for the benefit of the child and
the child support order is at least twenty-five percent ((or more))
above or below the appropriate child support amount set forth in the
standard calculation as defined in RCW 26.19.011 and reasons for the
deviation are not set forth in the findings of fact or order. The
determination of twenty-five percent or more shall be based on the
current income of the parties and the department shall not be required
to show a substantial change of circumstances if the reasons for the
deviations were not set forth in the findings of fact or order.
(b) The department of social and health services may file an action
to modify or adjust an order of child support in a nonassistance case
when services have been requested by a party to the order or by another
state or jurisdiction and the child support order is at least twenty-five percent above or below the appropriate child support amount set
forth in the standard calculation as defined in RCW 26.19.011 and
reasons for the deviation are not set forth in the findings of fact or
order. The determination of twenty-five percent or more shall be based
on the current income of the parties and the department shall not be
required to show a substantial change of circumstances if the reasons
for the deviations were not set forth in the findings of fact or order.
(c) At intervals required by federal law, the department of social
and health services may file an action to modify or adjust an order of
child support if the child support order is at least twenty-five
percent above or below the appropriate child support amount set forth
in the standard calculation as defined in RCW 26.19.011 and the
department has determined the case meets the department's review
criteria. For public assistance cases, the department may file an
action without a request from the parties to the order. For
nonassistance cases, the department may file an action when services
have been requested by a party to the order or by another state or
jurisdiction.
(9)(a) All child support decrees may be adjusted once every twenty-four months based upon changes in the income of the parents without a
showing of substantially changed circumstances. Either party may
initiate the adjustment by filing a motion and child support
worksheets.
(b) A party may petition for modification in cases of substantially
changed circumstances under subsection (1) of this section at any time.
However, if relief is granted under subsection (1) of this section,
twenty-four months must pass before a motion for an adjustment under
(a) of this subsection may be filed.
(c) If, pursuant to (a) of this subsection or subsection (10) of
this section, the court adjusts or modifies a child support obligation
by more than thirty percent and the change would cause significant
hardship, the court may implement the change in two equal increments,
one at the time of the entry of the order and the second six months
from the entry of the order. Twenty-four months must pass following
the second change before a motion for an adjustment under (a) of this
subsection may be filed.
(d) A parent who is receiving transfer payments who receives a wage
or salary increase may not bring a modification action pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section alleging that increase constitutes a
substantial change of circumstances.
(e) The department of social and health services may file an action
at any time to modify or adjust an order of child support in cases of
substantially changed circumstances if public assistance money is being
paid to or for the benefit of the child. The determination of the
existence of substantially changed circumstances by the department that
lead to the filing of an action to modify the order of child support is
not binding upon the court.
(f) The department of social and health services may file an action
at any time to modify or adjust an order of child support in a
nonassistance case pursuant to this section.
(10) An order of child support may be adjusted twenty-four months
from the date of the entry of the decree or the last adjustment or
modification, whichever is later, based upon changes in the economic
table or standards in chapter 26.19 RCW.
(11) If testimony other than affidavit is required in any
proceeding under this section, a court of this state shall permit a
party or witness to be deposed or to testify under penalty of perjury
by telephone, audiovisual means, or other electronic means, unless good
cause is shown.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.09.175 and 2002 c 199 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A proceeding for the modification of an order of child support
shall commence with the filing of a petition and worksheets. The
petition shall be in the form prescribed by the administrator for the
courts. There shall be a fee of twenty dollars for the filing of a
petition for modification of dissolution.
(2)(a) The petitioner shall serve upon the other party the summons,
a copy of the petition, and the worksheets in the form prescribed by
the administrator for the courts. If the modification proceeding is
the first action filed in this state, service shall be made by personal
service. If the decree to be modified was entered in this state,
service shall be by personal service or by any form of mail requiring
a return receipt. Proof of service shall be filed with the court.
(b) If the support obligation has been assigned to the state
pursuant to RCW 74.20.330 or the state has a subrogated interest under
RCW 74.20A.030, the summons, petition, and worksheets shall also be
served on the attorney general; except that notice shall be given to
the office of the prosecuting attorney for the county in which the
action is filed in lieu of the office of the attorney general in those
counties and in the types of cases as designated by the office of the
attorney general by letter sent to the presiding superior court judge
of that county. ((Proof of service shall be filed with the court.))
(3) ((The)) As provided for under RCW 26.09.170, the department of
social and health services may file an action to modify or adjust an
order of child support if public assistance money is being paid to or
for the benefit of the child. As provided for under RCW 26.09.170, the
department of social and health services may file an action to modify
or adjust an order of child support in a nonassistance case.
(4) A responding party's answer and worksheets shall be served and
the answer filed within twenty days after service of the petition or
sixty days if served out of state. ((The)) A responding party's
failure to file an answer within the time required shall result in
entry of a default judgment for the petitioner.
(((4))) (5) At any time after responsive pleadings are filed,
((either)) any party may schedule the matter for hearing.
(((5))) (6) Unless ((both)) all parties stipulate to arbitration or
the presiding judge authorizes oral testimony pursuant to subsection
(((6))) (7) of this section, a petition for modification of an order of
child support shall be heard by the court on affidavits, the petition,
answer, and worksheets only.
(((6))) (7) A party seeking authority to present oral testimony on
the petition to modify a support order shall file an appropriate motion
not later than ten days after the time of notice of hearing.
Affidavits and exhibits setting forth the reasons oral testimony is
necessary to a just adjudication of the issues shall accompany the
petition. The affidavits and exhibits must demonstrate the
extraordinary features of the case. Factors which may be considered
include, but are not limited to: (a) Substantial questions of
credibility on a major issue; (b) insufficient or inconsistent
discovery materials not correctable by further discovery; or (c)
particularly complex circumstances requiring expert testimony.
(8) If testimony other than affidavit is required in any proceeding
under this section, a court of this state shall permit a party or
witness to be deposed or to testify under penalty of perjury by
telephone, audiovisual means, or other electronic means, unless good
cause is shown.

--- END ---