BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) In a situation in which a person receiving in-home care
services does not have the capacity to act as the employer of his or
her own care provider and cannot supervise the provision of his or her
own care, the care provider is essentially supervising himself or
herself;
(2) The lack of independent supervision raises concerns because the
person receiving services is not capable of providing the supervision
himself or herself;
(3) If no other qualified person is willing to accept, in writing,
the responsibilities and obligations to supervise the individual
provider, it would be in the best interests of the person receiving
services to allow the individual provider to be employed and supervised
by a licensed home care agency; and
(4) Persons receiving services might be best served by an exemption
to the prohibition against payment for family member care providers
employed by home care agencies.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.39A.326 and 2009 c 571 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The department shall not pay a home care agency licensed
under chapter 70.127 RCW for in-home personal care or respite services
provided under this chapter, Title 71A RCW, or chapter 74.39 RCW if the
care is provided to a client by a family member of the client. ((To
the extent permitted under federal law,)) The provisions of this
subsection shall not apply if ((the family member providing care is
older than)) the client is unable to supervise his or her paid care
provider and has no qualified person willing to accept in writing the
responsibilities and obligations of providing such supervision.
(b) The department may, on a case-by-case basis based on the
client's health and safety, make exceptions to (a) of this subsection
to authorize payment or to provide for payment during a transition
period of up to three months.
(2) The department shall take appropriate enforcement action
against a home care agency found to have charged the state for hours of
service for which the department is not authorized to pay under this
section, including requiring recoupment of any payment made for those
hours and, under criteria adopted by the department by rule,
terminating the contract of an agency that violates a recoupment
requirement.
(3) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Client" means a person who has been deemed eligible by the
department to receive in-home personal care or respite services.
(b) "Family member" shall be liberally construed to include, but
not be limited to, a parent, child, sibling, aunt, uncle, cousin,
grandparent, grandchild, grandniece, or grandnephew, or such relatives
when related by marriage.
(((4))) (c) "Qualified person" means any individual over the age of
twenty-one selected by the client or his or her legal representative,
who meets the department's background check requirements, and who does
not receive payment from the department for providing services to the
client.
(4) For purposes of this section, a client is unable to supervise
his or her paid care provider if so determined by the department's
comprehensive assessment reporting evaluation or any successor
evaluation tool adopted by the department or if the inability to
supervise the paid care provider results from the client's level of
cognitive performance, clinical complexity, or mood or behavior
symptoms as certified by the client's treating physician.
(5) The department shall adopt rules to implement this section.
The rules shall not result in affecting the amount, duration, or scope
of the personal care or respite services benefit to which a client may
be entitled pursuant to RCW 74.09.520 or Title XIX of the federal
social security act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---