BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Brake friction materials are an essential component of motor
vehicle brakes systems and critically important to transportation
safety and public safety in general;
(2) Debris from brake friction materials containing copper and its
compounds is generated and released to the surrounding environment
during normal operation of motor vehicle brakes;
(3) Thousands of pounds of copper and other substances released
from brake friction material enter Washington state's streams, rivers,
and marine environment every year; and
(4) Copper is toxic to many aquatic organisms in both marine and
freshwater environments, and impairs the sensory systems of salmon,
reducing their ability to elude predators and hindering their return to
spawning streams.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "After-market brake friction material" means brake friction
material not sold with newly manufactured vehicles.
(2) "Alternative brake friction material" means brake friction
material that:
(a) Does not contain more than 0.5 percent copper or the
constituents identified in section 4 of this act at the concentrations
specified;
(b) Enables motor vehicle brakes to meet motor vehicle safety
standards for new motor vehicle brakes specified in Title 49 of the
code of federal regulations;
(c) Is available at a cost and quantity to enable brake friction
material manufacturers to produce economically viable products; and
(d) Is available to enable brake friction material manufacturers to
produce viable products to meet consumer acceptance performance
standards.
(3) "Brake friction material" means that part of a motor vehicle
brake designed to retard or stop the movement of a motor vehicle
through friction against a rotor made of more durable material.
(4) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(5) "Motor vehicle" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
46.04.320.
(6) "Motor vehicle brake" means an energy conversion mechanism used
to retard or stop the movement of a motor vehicle.
(7) "Testing agency" means an agency approved by the department as
qualified and equipped for the testing of products, materials,
equipment, and installations in accordance with nationally recognized
standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Beginning January 1, 2015, after-market
brake friction material exceeding five percent copper and its compounds
by weight may not be sold in Washington state.
(2) Beginning January 1, 2020, new vehicles with brake friction
material exceeding five percent copper and its compounds by weight may
not be sold in Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Beginning January 1, 2014, brake
friction material containing any of the following constituents in an
amount exceeding the specified concentrations may not be sold in
Washington state:
(a) Asbestiform fibers, 0.1 percent by weight.
(b) Cadmium and its compounds, 0.01 percent by weight.
(c) Chromium(VI)-salts, 0.1 percent by weight.
(d) Lead and its compounds, 0.1 percent by weight.
(e) Mercury and its compounds, 0.1 percent by weight.
(2) By January 1, 2013, and at least every three years thereafter,
brake friction material manufacturers shall provide to the department
data adequate to determine the concentration of antimony, copper,
nickel, and zinc and their compounds in brake friction material. Using
that data and other data as needed, the department must establish
baseline concentrations for those constituents in brake friction
material by July 1, 2013. The department will use data provided by
manufacturers to track progress toward reducing the use of copper and
its compounds and to ensure that concentrations of antimony, nickel, or
zinc and their compounds do not increase by more than fifty percent
above baseline levels.
(3) If data provided by manufacturers indicates that the
concentration level of antimony, nickel, or zinc and their compounds
has increased by more than fifty percent above baseline levels, the
department shall review scientific studies to determine the potential
impact of the constituent on human health and the environment. If the
department determines that scientific studies demonstrate the need for
controlling the use of antimony, nickel, or zinc and their compounds in
brake friction material, the department shall prioritize the presence
of the constituent in brake friction material for future regulation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) By December 1, 2020, the department
shall review risk assessments, scientific studies, and other relevant
analysis regarding the availability of alternative brake friction
material containing no more than 0.5 percent copper and its compounds
and determine whether such alternative brake friction material may be
available.
(2) If the department finds that alternative brake friction
material containing no more than 0.5 percent copper and its compounds
may be available, it shall convene a brake friction material advisory
committee consisting of but not limited to:
(a) A representative of the department, who will chair the
committee;
(b) The chief of the Washington state patrol, or the chief's
designee;
(c) A representative of manufacturers of brake friction material;
(d) A representative of manufacturers of motor vehicles;
(e) A representative of a nongovernmental organization concerned
with motor vehicle safety;
(f) A representative of the national highway traffic safety
administration; and
(g) A representative from a nongovernmental organization concerned
with the environment.
(3) If convened, the brake friction material advisory committee
shall assess alternative brake friction materials containing no more
than 0.5 percent copper and its compounds. Following an assessment,
the committee must recommend to the department whether an alternative
brake friction material is available. Considering recommendations from
the committee, the department will make a finding whether an
alternative brake friction material is available.
(a) If the department finds that alternative brake friction
materials are available, then brake friction material exceeding 0.5
percent copper and its compounds by weight may not be sold in
Washington state after January 1, 2025.
(b) If the department decides that an alternative brake friction
material is not available, the department shall comply with section 6
of this act.
(4) By December 1, 2021, the department shall provide a report to
the legislature documenting its findings and the recommendations of the
brake friction material advisory committee. The report must also
include any additional evidence of potential harm posed by copper and
its compounds in the environment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) If the brake friction material advisory
committee recommends, pursuant to section 5 of this act, that an
alternative brake friction material containing no more than 0.5 percent
copper and its compounds is not available, the department shall
periodically evaluate the finding. If, following a new evaluation, the
department finds that an alternative brake friction material may be
available, it shall reconvene a brake friction material advisory
committee to conduct an assessment as described in section 5 of this
act.
(2) If the department, in consultation with the brake friction
material advisory committee finds that an alternative brake friction
material is available, the department shall report the finding to the
legislature by December 1st of the year in which it makes the finding.
Beginning five years after the report submittal date but no earlier
than January 1, 2025, brake friction material exceeding 0.5 percent
copper and its compounds by weight may not be sold in Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The following motor vehicle classes and
brakes are exempt from this chapter:
(1) Military combat vehicles;
(2) Vehicles employing internal closed oil immersed motor vehicle
brakes or a similar brake system that is fully contained and emits no
debris or fluids under normal operating conditions; and
(3) Motor vehicle brakes designed for the primary purpose of
holding vehicles stationary and not for use while vehicles are in
motion.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) By December 1, 2012, the department
must, after consulting with interested parties, develop criteria for
certifying compliance with the requirements of this chapter and marking
proof of certification on brake friction material.
(2) Beginning January 1, 2015:
(a) Manufacturers of brake friction material offered for sale in
Washington state must obtain, from a testing agency, certification of
compliance with the requirements of this chapter as they take effect
pursuant to sections 3 and 4 of this act and mark proof of
certification on the brake friction material; and
(b) Retailers of brake friction material must ensure that they only
offer for sale in Washington state brake friction material certified to
be compliant with the requirements of this chapter.
(3) Beginning January 1, 2020, manufacturers of new motor vehicles
offered for sale in Washington state must ensure that the motor
vehicles are equipped with brake friction material certified to be
compliant with the requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) A violator of this chapter is subject to
a civil fine of up to ten thousand dollars per day per violation. A
violation of this chapter includes, but is not limited to, the sale of
motor vehicles with brake friction material that does not comply with
this chapter and falsifying certification of compliance with this
chapter.
(2) The department shall enforce this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The department may adopt rules to implement
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 10 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---