BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
encourage maximization of financial resources eligible and available
for medicaid services by establishing the medicaid nursing facility
quality assurance trust fund to receive nursing facility quality
assurance fees to use in securing federal matching funds under
federally prescribed programs available through the state medicaid
plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 For the purposes of this title, unless
otherwise required by the context:
(1) "Certain high volume medicaid nursing facilities" means the
fewest number of facilities necessary with the highest number of
medicaid days or total patient days annually to meet the statistical
redistribution test at 42 C.F.R. Sec. 433.68(e)(2).
(2) "Continuing care retirement community" means a facility that
provides a continuum of services by one operational entity or related
organization providing independent living services, or boarding home or
assisted living services under chapter 18.20 RCW, and skilled nursing
services under chapter 18.51 RCW in a single contiguous campus. The
number of licensed nursing home beds must be fifty-five percent or less
of the total number of beds available in the entire continuing care
retirement community. For purposes of this definition contiguous means
land adjoining or touching other property held by the same or related
organization. Land divided by a public road shall be considered
contiguous.
(3) "Deductions from revenue" means reductions from gross revenue
resulting from an inability to collect payment of charges. Such
reductions include bad debt, contractual adjustments, policy discounts
and adjustments, and other such revenue deductions.
(4) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(5) "Fund" means the medicaid nursing facility quality assurance
trust fund.
(6) "Hospital based" means a nursing facility that is part of, or
a related organization of, a hospital.
(7) "Medicare patient day" means a patient day for medicare
beneficiaries on a medicare part A stay, medicare hospice stay, and a
patient day for persons who have opted for managed care coverage using
their medicare benefit.
(8) "Net patient service revenue" means gross revenue from services
to nursing facility patients less deductions from revenue. Net patient
service revenue does not include other operating revenue or
nonoperating revenue.
(9) "Nonexempt nursing facility" means a nursing facility that is
not exempt from the quality assurance fee under section 4 of this act.
(10) "Nonoperating revenue" means income from activities not
relating directly to the day-to-day operations of an organization.
Nonoperating revenue includes such items as gains on disposal of a
facility's assets, dividends, and interest from security investments,
gifts, grants, and endowments.
(11) "Nursing facility" has the same meaning as "nursing home," as
defined in RCW 18.51.010.
(12) "Other operating revenue" means income from nonresident care
services to residents, as well as sales and activities to persons other
than residents. It is derived in the course of operating the facility
such as providing personal laundry service for residents or from other
sources such as meals provided to persons other than residents,
personal telephones, gift shops, and vending machines.
(13) "Related organization" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
74.46.020.
(14) "Resident day" means a calendar day of care provided to a
nursing facility resident, excluding medicare patient days. Resident
days include the day of admission and exclude the day of discharge. An
admission and discharge on the same day count as one day of care.
Resident days include nursing facility hospice days and exclude
nonmedicaid bedhold days.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) There is hereby created in the state
treasury the medicaid nursing facility quality assurance trust fund.
(2) The medicaid nursing facility quality assurance trust fund must
be a separate and continuing fund, and no money in the fund reverts to
the state general fund at any time. The interest and income on the
money in the fund, after deducting any applicable charges, must be
credited to the fund.
(3) Any money received under section 4 of this act must be
deposited in the state treasury for credit to the medicaid nursing
facility quality assurance trust fund, and must be expended, to the
extent authorized by federal law, to obtain federal financial
participation in the medicaid program to maintain and enhance nursing
facility rates in a manner set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Expenditures from the medicaid nursing facility quality
assurance trust fund must be used only:
(a) As an immediate pass-through or rate add-on to reimburse the
medicaid share of the quality assurance assessment as a medicaid
allowable cost; and
(b) For maintenance and enhancement of the medicaid nursing home
rates paid on the date this act takes effect, and for subsequent
enhancement of medicaid nursing home rate-settings; and
(c) To administer the provisions of this act the department may
expend an amount not to exceed one-half of one percent of the money
received from the fees assessed, and must not exceed the amount
authorized for expenditure by the legislature for administrative
expenses in a fiscal year.
(5) Funds from the medicaid nursing facility quality assurance
trust fund may not be used to replace existing state expenditures to
nursing facilities on rates paid on the date this act takes effect or
for subsequent rate settings.
(6) Expenditures from the medicaid nursing facility quality
assurance trust fund may not be included in the calculation of the
annual statewide weighted average nursing facility payment rate for
purposes of implementing the provisions of RCW 74.46.421(4).
(7) Money in the fund that is available, but not used by the end of
each fiscal year, must be accumulated and applied to payments to
nursing homes in the next fiscal year.
(8) Funds resulting from any increase in the quality assurance fee
over and above the initial calculation of the fee referenced in section
4(1) of this act, shall only be used to increase nursing facility
medicaid rates above those calculated by the state plan methodology in
effect on January 1, 2010, without application of the budget dial.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Annually, before July 1st of each year,
the department shall calculate the quality assurance fee rates that
nonexempt providers will report and pay monthly for each nonmedicare
patient day. The quality assurance fee shall be set at a percentage of
total aggregate net resident service revenue of assessed facilities
which maintains the nursing facilities medicaid rates, net of the
impact for reimbursement of the medicaid share of the fee itself, in an
amount equal to or greater than rates paid on the date this act takes
effect. As of the effective date of this act the quality assurance fee
shall not exceed 2.8 percent of net patient services revenues and shall
be calculated and paid on a per resident day basis exclusive of
medicare patient days. The department shall notify providers of the
quality assurance fee and provide a standardized form to complete and
submit with payments. The department shall collect the quality
assurance fee on health care items or services provided by nursing
facilities for the purpose of obtaining federal financial participation
under the state's medicaid program.
(2) The quality assurance fee shall, at no time, be greater than
the maximum percentage of the nursing facility industry reported net
patient service revenues allowed under federal law or regulation.
(3) The per resident day assessment rate shall be the same amount
for each affected facility except as prescribed in subsection (4) of
this section.
(4) In accordance with the redistribution method set forth in 42
C.F.R. Sec. 433.68(e)(1) and (2), the department shall seek a waiver of
the broad-based and uniform provider assessment requirements of federal
law to exclude certain nursing facilities from the quality assurance
fee and to permit certain high volume medicaid nursing facilities or
facilities with a high number of total annual resident days to pay the
quality assurance fee at a lesser amount per nonmedicare patient day:
(a) The department shall exempt the following nursing facility
providers from the quality assurance fee subject to federal approval
under 42 C.F.R. Sec. 433.68(e)(2):
(i) Continuing care retirement communities as defined in section 2
of this act;
(ii) Nursing facilities with thirty-five or fewer beds;
(iii) State and county operated nursing facilities; and
(iv) Any nursing facility operated by a public hospital district
and nursing facilities that are hospital-based.
(b) The department shall lower the quality assurance assessment for
either certain high volume medicaid nursing facilities or certain
facilities with high resident volumes to meet the redistributive tests
of 42 C.F.R. Sec. 433.68(e)(2).
(5) The department shall notify the nursing facility operators of
any nursing facilities that would be exempted from the quality
assurance fee pursuant to the waiver request submitted to the federal
department of health and human services under this section. The
nursing facilities included in the waiver request may withhold payment
of the fee pending final action by the federal government on the
request for waiver.
(6) The imposition and collection of the quality assurance fee
shall be prohibited without federal government approval of a state
medicaid plan amendment authorizing federal financial participation.
(7) The department shall make and pursue all good faith efforts to
secure federal government approval of the nursing facility quality
assurance fee and the broad-based and uniformity waiver described in
section 4(4) of this act. If the nursing facility quality assurance
fee and the broad-based and uniformity waiver are not approved by the
federal government, notwithstanding any other provision of this
section, the department shall return any and all collected fee amounts
to the nursing facilities that paid them and shall discontinue the
imposition, assessment, and collection of the nursing facility quality
assurance fee.
(8) The department shall assess the nursing facility quality
assurance fee on a monthly basis and shall collect the fee from nursing
facility providers by no later than the end of the next succeeding
calendar month. The department shall require nursing facility
providers to report monthly their total number of days of care provided
to nonmedicare residents.
(9) The department shall adopt any rules necessary for the
administration and implementation of this section.
(10) All nursing facility quality assurance fee moneys collected
pursuant to this section by the department shall be transmitted to the
state treasurer who shall establish a medicaid nursing facility quality
assurance trust fund and shall credit all such amounts to the medicaid
nursing facility quality assurance trust fund.
(11) The provisions of this section shall become null and void,
having no force and effect, if any of the following occur:
(a) The nursing facility quality assessment and the broad-based and
uniformity waiver are not approved by the federal government; or
(b) The medicaid plan amendment reflecting the payment rates in
section 3(4) of this act is not approved by the federal government; or
(c) Any of the provisions of section 3 of this act are violated.
(12) If this section does not become operative or becomes null and
void, any and all moneys in the fund relating to the assessment shall
be returned on a pro rata basis to the nursing facilities that paid the
quality assurance assessment.
(13) If the nursing facility fails to make its payments timely, the
department may seek a remedy provided by law, including, but not
limited to:
(a) Withholding any medical assistance reimbursement payments until
such time as the assessment amount is recovered;
(b) Suspension or revocation of the nursing facility license; or
(c) Imposition of a civil fine up to one thousand dollars per day
for each delinquent payment, not to exceed the amount of the
assessment.
(14) Nursing facilities may not create a separate line-item charge
for the purpose of passing the fee through to residents.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.84.092 and 2009 c 479 s 31, 2009 c 472 s 5, and
2009 c 451 s 8 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate
share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily
balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search
and rescue account, the budget stabilization account, the capitol
building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia
river basin water supply development account, the common school
construction fund, the county arterial preservation account, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of licensing services
account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the
developmental disabilities community trust account, the drinking water
assistance account, the drinking water assistance administrative
account, the drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern
Washington University capital projects account, the education
construction fund, the education legacy trust account, the election
account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account,
the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College
capital projects account, the federal forest revolving account, the
ferry bond retirement fund, the freight congestion relief account, the
freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal
account, the grade crossing protective fund, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health
services account, the high capacity transportation account, the state
higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway
infrastructure account, the highway safety account, the high occupancy
toll lanes operations account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medicaid nursing
facility quality assurance trust fund, the medical aid account, the
mobile home park relocation fund, the motor vehicle fund, the
motorcycle safety education account, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding
stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance
account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the
public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account,
the public facilities construction loan revolving account beginning
July 1, 2004, the public health supplemental account, the public
transportation systems account, the public works assistance account,
the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry
operations account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real
estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account,
the regional mobility grant program account, the resource management
cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural Washington
loan fund, the site closure account, the small city pavement and
sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife
account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees'
insurance reserve account, the state investment board expense account,
the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state
patrol highway account, the state route number 520 corridor account,
the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge
account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco
prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the
transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement
account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account,
the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation
partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tuition
recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund,
the University of Washington building account, the urban arterial trust
account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and
pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve
officers' administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account,
the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety
employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the
state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 2 through 4 of this act are each
added to chapter 74.46 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act expires June 30, 2013.

--- END ---