BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.28.328 and 1994 c 155 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Lis pendens" means a lis pendens filed under RCW 4.28.320 or
4.28.325 or other instrument having the effect of clouding the title to
real property, however named, including consensual commercial lien,
common law lien, commercial contractual lien, or demand for performance
of public office lien, but does not include a lis pendens filed in
connection with an action under Title 6, 60, other than chapter 60.70
RCW, or 61 RCW;
(b) "Claimant" means a person who files a lis pendens, but does not
include the United States, any agency thereof, or the state of
Washington, any agency, political subdivision, or municipal corporation
thereof; and
(c) "Aggrieved party" means (i) a person against whom the claimant
asserted the cause of action in which the lis pendens was filed, but
does not include parties fictitiously named in the pleading; or (ii) a
person having an interest or a right to acquire an interest in the real
property against which the lis pendens was filed, provided that the
claimant had actual or constructive knowledge of such interest or right
when the lis pendens was filed.
(2) A claimant in an action not affecting the title to real
property against which the lis pendens was filed is liable to an
aggrieved party who prevails on a motion to cancel the lis pendens, for
actual damages caused by filing the lis pendens, and for reasonable
attorneys' fees incurred in canceling the lis pendens.
(3) Unless the claimant establishes a substantial justification for
filing the lis pendens, a claimant is liable to an aggrieved party who
prevails in defense of the action in which the lis pendens was filed
for actual damages caused by filing the lis pendens, and in the court's
discretion, reasonable attorneys' fees and costs incurred in defending
the action. Substantial justification for filing the lis pendens
requires proof that the claimant had a reasonable basis in fact or in
law for filing the lis pendens and the claimant must prove substantial
justification for filing the lis pendens by a preponderance of the
evidence.

--- END ---