BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An employer shall provide employees uninterrupted thirty-minute
meal breaks and rest breaks of at least ten minutes or as otherwise
agreed to be provided by the employer, whichever is longer, unless
there is:
(a) An unforeseeable emergent circumstance as defined in RCW
49.28.130; or
(b) A clinical circumstance that may lead to patient harm without
the specific skill or expertise of the employee on break.
(2) Rest breaks may be taken at any point during each four-hour
work period during which the employee is required to receive the rest
break.
(3) As an exception to the rest break requirement of subsection (1)
of this section, an employee may temporarily choose to take shorter
rest breaks equivalent to at least ten minutes during each four-hour
work period.
(4) Reporting a missed break is not grounds for discrimination,
dismissal, discharge, or any other penalty, threat of reports for
discipline, or employment decision adverse to the employee.
(5) For purposes of this section, "employee" means a person who is
involved in direct patient care activities or clinical services,
receives an hourly wage, and is a:
(a) Licensed practical nurse or a registered nurse licensed under
chapter 18.79 RCW;
(b) Surgical technologist registered under chapter 18.215 RCW;
(c) Radiologic technologist certified under chapter 18.84 RCW;
(d) Respiratory care practitioner licensed under chapter 18.89 RCW;
(e) Cardiovascular technologist or technician who conducts tests on
pulmonary or cardiovascular systems of patients for diagnostic
purposes; or
(f) Diagnostic medical sonographer who produces ultrasonic
recordings of internal organs.
(6) For purposes of this section, "employer" means hospitals
licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW; state hospitals as defined in RCW
72.23.010; state veterans' homes as defined in RCW 72.36.035;
residential habilitation centers listed in RCW 71A.20.020, 71A.20.030,
and 71A.20.040; facilities owned and operated by the department of
corrections, or by a governing unit as defined in RCW 70.48.020, in a
correctional institution as defined in RCW 9.94.049 that provide health
care services to inmates as defined in RCW 72.09.015; and facilities in
an institution as defined in RCW 13.40.020 or a detention facility as
defined in RCW 13.40.020 that provide health care services to juveniles
committed to the custody of the department of social and health
services under RCW 13.40.185 or confined in a detention facility.

--- END ---