BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that conventions
and trade shows provide both direct and indirect civic and economic
benefits. It is the intent of the legislature to provide for the
transfer of the governance and financing of the state convention and
trade center to a public facilities district formed by a county with a
population of one million five hundred thousand or more to acquire,
own, and operate the convention and trade center. The legislature also
intends to replace, in connection with such transfer, the authority
under chapter 67.40 RCW of the state and city to impose excise taxes on
the sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging to fund the
state convention and trade center with authority for the public
facilities district to impose lodging taxes at these rates, without
affecting the existing authority of the state, county, cities, and
other municipal corporations to impose taxes on the sale or charge made
for the furnishing of lodging under existing caps on the aggregate rate
that may be charged.
(2) The legislature further finds that the location of the
convention and trade center particularly benefits and increases the
occupancy of larger hotels and other lodging facilities in the city in
which it is located and to a lesser extent in the remainder of the
county in which it is located. The legislature finds that imposing
excise taxes on the sale of or charge made for the furnishing of
lodging at the rates authorized in section 5 of this act is an
appropriate method of paying for the cost of acquiring, constructing,
owning, remodeling, maintaining, equipping, reequipping, repairing,
altering, and operating a convention and trade center.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.100.010 and 2002 c 218 s 26 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((A)) One or more public facilities districts may be created in
any county and ((shall)) must be coextensive with the boundaries of the
county.
(2) A public facilities district ((shall be)) is created upon
adoption of a resolution providing for the creation of such a district
by the county legislative authority in which the proposed district is
located.
(3) A public facilities district is a municipal corporation, an
independent taxing "authority" within the meaning of Article VII,
section 1 of the state Constitution, and a "taxing district" within the
meaning of Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution.
(4) Except as provided in RCW 36.100.040 (4) and (5), no taxes
authorized under this chapter may be assessed or levied unless a
majority of the voters of the public facilities district has approved
such tax at a general or special election. A single ballot proposition
may both validate the imposition of the sales and use tax under RCW
82.14.048 and the excise tax under RCW 36.100.040(1).
(5)(a) A public facilities district ((shall)) constitutes a body
corporate and ((shall)) possesses all the usual powers of a corporation
for public purposes as well as all other powers that may now or
hereafter be specifically conferred by statute, including, but not
limited to, the authority to hire employees, staff, and services, to
enter into contracts, including contracts with public and private
parties, to acquire, own, sell, transfer, lease, and otherwise acquire
or dispose of property, to grant concessions under terms approved by
the public facilities district, and to sue and be sued.
(b) A public facilities district created by a county with a
population of one million five hundred thousand or more to acquire,
own, and operate a convention and trade center transferred from a
public nonprofit corporation may acquire by condemnation property or
property rights as may be necessary for its purposes under the
procedures set forth in chapter 8.08 RCW. Such a public facilities
district may continue to contract with the Seattle-King county
convention and visitors' bureau or its successor in interest for
marketing the convention and trade center facility and services.
(6) A public facilities district may enter into contracts with a
county for the purpose of exercising any powers of a community renewal
agency under chapter 35.81 RCW.
(7) The ((county)) legislative authority ((or the city council)) of
a city or county, the board of directors of a public nonprofit
corporation, or the state of Washington may transfer property to
((the)) a public facilities district created under this chapter, with
or without consideration. No property that is encumbered with debt or
that is in need of major capital renovation may be transferred to the
district without the agreement of the district and revenues adequate to
retire the existing indebtedness.
(8) A public facilities district may enter into agreements with the
state, any municipal corporation, or any other governmental entity for
the design, financing, acquisition, development, construction,
reconstruction, lease, remodeling, alteration, maintenance, equipping,
reequipping, repair, operation, or management of one or more facilities
of the parties thereto. Agreements may provide that any party to the
contract designs, finances, acquires, develops, constructs,
reconstructs, remodels, alters, maintains, equips, reequips, repairs,
and operates one or more facilities for the other party or parties to
the contract. A public facilities district may enter into an agreement
with the state, any municipal corporation, or other public or private
entity that will assist a public facilities district in the financing
of all or any part of a district facility on such terms as may be
determined by agreement between the respective parties, including
without limitation by a loan, guaranty, or other financing agreement.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.100.020 and 1995 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 302 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) A public facilities district ((shall)) must be governed by
a board of directors consisting of five ((or)), seven, or nine members
as provided in this section.
(b) If the largest city in the county has a population that is at
least forty percent of the total county population, the board of
directors of the public facilities district ((shall)) must consist of
five members selected as follows:
(((a))) (i) Two members appointed by the county legislative
authority to serve for four-year staggered terms;
(((b))) (ii) Two members appointed by the city council of the
largest city in the county to serve for four-year staggered terms; and
(((c))) (iii) One person to serve for a four-year term who is
selected by the other directors.
(c)(i) Except as provided in (c)(ii) of this subsection (1), if the
largest city in the county has a population of less than forty percent
of the total county population, the county legislative authority
((shall)) must establish in the resolution creating the public
facilities district whether the board of directors of the public
facilities district has either five or seven members, and the county
legislative authority ((shall)) must appoint the members of the board
of directors to reflect the interests of cities and towns in the
county, as well as the unincorporated area of the county.
(ii) However, if the county has a population of one million five
hundred thousand or more, the largest city in the county has a
population of less than forty percent of the total county population,
and the county operates under a county charter, which provides for an
elected county executive, the members of the board of directors must be
appointed as follows:
(A) If the public facilities district is created to construct a
baseball stadium as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, three members ((shall))
must be appointed by the governor and the remaining members ((shall))
must be appointed by the county executive subject to confirmation by
the county legislative authority. Of the members appointed by the
governor, the speaker of the house of representatives and the majority
leader of the senate ((shall)) must each recommend to the governor a
person to be appointed to the board; and
(B) If the public facilities district is created to acquire, own,
and operate a convention and trade center, following the expiration of
the terms of the initial board of directors, three members must be
appointed by the governor, three members must be nominated by the
county executive subject to confirmation by the county legislative
authority, and three members must be nominated by the mayor of the city
in which the convention and trade center is located subject to
confirmation by the city legislative authority. Members of the board
of directors may not be members of the legislative authority of the
county or any city within the county.
(d) The initial board of directors of a public facilities district
created in a county of one million five hundred thousand or more to
acquire, own, and operate a convention and trade center must be
comprised of the nine members of the board of the public nonprofit
corporation that transfers the convention and trade center to the
public facilities district under section 8 of this act. The governor
must designate which of the initial board members must serve two-year
terms and which must serve four-year terms and identify the board
positions to which successors to initial directors are to be appointed
by the county and the city.
(2) At least one member on the board of directors ((shall)) must be
representative of the lodging industry in the public facilities
district before the public facilities district imposes the excise tax
under RCW 36.100.040(1). Of the members of the board of directors of
a public facilities district created in a county of one million five
hundred thousand or more to acquire, own, and operate a convention and
trade center, one of the governor's appointments and one of the
county's appointments must be representative of the lodging industry in
the public facilities district and one of the city's appointments must
be representative of organized labor, except that these requirements do
not apply to the initial board of such district.
(3) Members of the board of directors ((shall)) must serve four-year terms of office, except that two of the initial five board members
((or)), three of the initial seven board members ((shall)), and four of
the initial nine board members must serve two-year terms of office.
(4) A vacancy ((shall)) must be filled in the same manner as the
original appointment was made and the person appointed to fill a
vacancy ((shall)) must serve for the remainder of the unexpired term of
the office for the position to which he or she was appointed.
(5) Any director may be removed from office by the person or entity
that appointed or confirmed such director for any reason or for no
reason as follows: A director appointed by the governor may be removed
from office by the governor((.)); and any ((other)) director confirmed
by a city or county legislative authority may be removed from office by
action of at least two-thirds of the members of the legislative
authority ((which made the appointment)) that confirmed the director.

Sec. 4 RCW 36.100.030 and 2003 c 376 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A public facilities district is authorized to acquire,
construct, own, remodel, maintain, equip, reequip, repair, and operate
(a) sports facilities, entertainment facilities, convention facilities,
including without limitation any convention and trade center
transferred from a public nonprofit corporation under section 8(1) of
this act, or regional centers as defined in RCW 35.57.020, and (b) for
districts formed after January 1, 2000, recreational facilities other
than ski areas, together with contiguous parking facilities. The taxes
that are provided for in this chapter may only be imposed for these
purposes, including without limitation implementing any redemption,
prepayment, or legal defeasance of outstanding obligations under
section 8(3)(a) of this act.
(2) A public facilities district may enter into agreements under
chapter 39.34 RCW for the ((joint provision and operation)) design,
financing, acquisition, development, construction, reconstruction,
lease, remodeling, alteration, maintenance, equipping, reequipping,
repair, operation, or management of such facilities and may enter into
contracts under chapter 39.34 RCW where any party to the contract
provides and operates such facilities for the other party or parties to
the contract. A public facilities district may enter into agreements
under chapter 39.34 RCW that will assist a public facilities district
in the financing of all or any part of a district facility on such
terms as may be determined by agreement between the respective parties,
including without limitation by a loan, guaranty, or other financing
agreement.
(3) Notwithstanding the establishment of a career, civil, or merit
service system, a public facilities district may contract with a public
or private entity for the operation or management of its public
facilities.
(4) A public facilities district is authorized to use the
supplemental alternative public works contracting procedures set forth
in chapter 39.10 RCW in connection with the design, construction,
reconstruction, remodel, or alteration of any of its public facilities.
(5) A public facilities district may impose charges and fees for
the use of its facilities, and may accept and expend or use gifts,
grants, and donations.

Sec. 5 RCW 36.100.040 and 2008 c 137 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A public facilities district may impose an excise tax on the
sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging that is subject to
tax under chapter 82.08 RCW, except that no such tax may be levied on
any premises having fewer than forty lodging units. ((However)) Except
for any tax imposed under subsection (4) or (5) of this section, if a
public facilities district has not imposed such an excise tax prior to
December 31, 1995, the public facilities district may only impose the
excise tax if a ballot proposition authorizing the imposition of the
tax has been approved by a simple majority vote of voters of the public
facilities district voting on the proposition.
(2) The rate of the tax ((shall)) may not exceed two percent and
the proceeds of the tax ((shall)) may only be used for the acquisition,
design, construction, remodeling, maintenance, equipping, reequipping,
repairing, and operation of its public facilities. This excise tax
((shall)) may not be imposed until the district has approved the
proposal to acquire, design, and construct the public facilities.
(3) ((A public facilities district may not impose the tax
authorized in this section if, after the tax authorized in this section
was imposed, the effective combined rate of state and local excise
taxes, including sales and use taxes and excise taxes on lodging,
imposed on the sale of or charge made for furnishing of lodging in any
jurisdiction in the public facilities district exceeds eleven and one-half percent.
(4))) Except for a public facilities district created within a
county with a population of one million five hundred thousand or more
for the purpose of acquiring, owning, and operating a convention and
trade center, a public facilities district may not impose the tax
authorized in this section if, after the tax authorized in this section
was imposed, the effective combined rate of state and local excise
taxes, including sales and use taxes and excise taxes on lodging,
imposed on the sale of or charge made for furnishing of lodging in any
jurisdiction in the public facilities district exceeds eleven and one-half percent.
(4) To replace the tax authorized by RCW 67.40.090, a public
facilities district created within a county with a population of one
million five hundred thousand or more for the purpose of acquiring,
owning, and operating a convention and trade center may impose an
excise tax on the sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging
that is subject to tax under chapter 82.08 RCW, except that no such tax
may be levied on any premises having fewer than sixty lodging units.
The rate of the tax may not exceed seven percent within the portion of
the district that corresponds to the boundaries of the largest city
within the public facilities district and may not exceed 2.8 percent in
the remainder of the district. The tax imposed under this subsection
(4) may not be collected prior to the transfer date defined in section
8 of this act.
(5) To replace the tax authorized by RCW 67.40.130, a public
facilities district created within a county with a population of one
million five hundred thousand or more for the purpose of acquiring,
owning, and operating a convention and trade center may impose an
additional excise tax on the sale of or charge made for the furnishing
of lodging that is subject to tax under chapter 82.08 RCW, except that
no such tax may be levied on any premises having fewer than sixty
lodging units. The rate of the additional excise tax may not exceed
two percent and may be imposed only within the portion of the district
that corresponds to the boundaries of the largest city within the
public facilities district and may not be imposed in the remainder of
the district. The tax imposed under this subsection (5) may not be
collected prior to the transfer date specified in section 8 of this
act. The tax imposed under this subsection (5) must be credited
against the amount of the tax otherwise due to the state from those
same taxpayers under chapter 82.08 RCW. The tax under this subsection
(5) may be imposed only for the purpose of paying or securing the
payment of the principal of and interest on obligations issued or
incurred by the public facilities district and paying annual payment
amounts to the state under subsection (6)(a) of this section. The
authority to impose the additional excise tax under this subsection (5)
expires on the date that is the earlier of (a) July 1, 2029, or (b) the
date on which all obligations issued or incurred by the public
facilities district to implement any redemption, prepayment, or legal
defeasance of outstanding obligations under section 8(3)(a) of this act
are no longer outstanding.
(6)(a) Commencing with the first full fiscal year of the state
after the transfer date defined in section 8 of this act and for so
long as a public facilities district imposes a tax under subsection (5)
of this section, the public facilities district must transfer to the
state of Washington on June 30th of each fiscal year an annual payment
amount.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection (6), "annual payment
amount" means an amount equal to revenues received by the public
facilities district in the fiscal year from the additional excise tax
imposed under subsection (5) of this section.
(c)(i) If the public facilities district in any fiscal year is
required to apply additional lodging excise tax revenues to the payment
of principal and interest on obligations it issues or incurs, and the
public facilities district is unable to pay all or any portion of the
annual payment amount to the state, the deficiency is deemed to be a
loan from the state to the public facilities district for the purpose
of assisting the district in paying such principal and interest and
must be repaid by the public facilities district to the state after
providing for the payment of the principal of and interest on
obligations issued or incurred by the public facilities district, all
on terms established by an agreement between the state treasurer and
the public facilities district executed prior to the transfer date.
Outstanding obligations to repay any loans deemed to have been made to
the public facilities district as provided in any such agreements
between the state treasurer and the public facilities district survive
the expiration of the additional excise tax under subsection (5) of
this section.
(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (6)(c), "additional
lodging excise tax revenues" mean the tax revenues received by the
public facilities district under subsection (5) of this section.
(7) A public facilities district is authorized to pledge any of its
revenues, including without limitation revenues from the taxes
authorized in this section, to pay or secure the payment of obligations
issued or incurred by the public facilities district, subject to the
terms established by the board of directors of the public facilities
district. So long as a pledge of the taxes authorized under this
section is in effect, the legislature may not withdraw or modify the
authority to levy and collect the taxes at the rates permitted under
this section and may not increase the annual payment amount to be
transferred to the state under subsection (6) of this section.
(8) The department of revenue must perform the collection of such
taxes on behalf of the public facilities district at no cost to the
district, and the state treasurer must distribute those taxes as
available on a monthly basis to the district or, upon the direction of
the district, to a fiscal agent, paying agent or trustee for
obligations issued or incurred by the district.
(9) Except as expressly provided in this chapter, all of the
provisions contained in RCW 82.08.050 and 82.08.060 and chapter 82.32
RCW have full force and application with respect to taxes imposed under
the provisions of this section.
(10) The taxes imposed in this section ((does)) do not apply to
sales of temporary medical housing exempt under RCW 82.08.997.

Sec. 6 RCW 36.100.060 and 1999 c 165 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) To carry out the purpose of this chapter, a public facilities
district may issue general obligation bonds, not to exceed an amount,
together with any outstanding nonvoter approved general obligation
indebtedness, equal to one-half of one percent of the value of taxable
property within the district, as the term "value of taxable property"
is defined in RCW 39.36.015. A public facilities district additionally
may issue general obligation bonds for capital purposes only, together
with any outstanding general obligation indebtedness, not to exceed an
amount equal to one and one-fourth percent of the value of the taxable
property within the district, as the term "value of taxable property"
is defined in RCW 39.36.015, when authorized by the voters of the
public facilities district pursuant to Article VIII, section 6 of the
state Constitution, and to provide for the retirement thereof by excess
property tax levies as provided in this chapter.
(2) General obligation bonds may be issued with a maturity of up to
thirty years, and must be issued and sold in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 39.46 RCW. If the public facilities district is
formed by a county with a population of one million five hundred
thousand or more to acquire, own, and operate a convention and trade
center, general obligation bonds may be issued with a maturity of up to
forty years, and ((shall)) must be issued and sold in accordance with
the provisions of chapter 39.46 RCW. In addition to the powers vested
in it under RCW 39.46.030, a public facilities district created by a
county with a population of one million five hundred thousand or more
to acquire, own, and operate a convention and trade center may appoint,
and may specify the rights and duties of, trustees with respect to its
bonds, and such trustees may receive, hold, disburse, invest, and
reinvest funds on the district's behalf and for the protection of the
district's bond owners.
(3) The general obligation bonds may be payable from the operating
revenues of the public facilities district in addition to the tax
receipts of the district.
(4) The excise tax imposed pursuant to RCW 36.100.040 ((shall)) (1)
terminates upon final payment of all bonded indebtedness for its public
facilities, except that the excise tax may be reauthorized by a public
vote, in the same manner as originally authorized, for funding of
additional public facilities or a regional center.

Sec. 7 RCW 36.100.100 and 1995 c 396 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The treasurer of the county in which a public facilities district
is located ((shall)) must be the ex officio treasurer of the district,
unless the board of directors of a public facilities district created
in a county of one million five hundred thousand or more designates by
resolution another person having experience in financial or fiscal
matters as the treasurer of the district. Such a treasurer possesses
all of the powers, responsibilities, and duties of, and is subject to
the same restrictions as provided by law for, a county treasurer with
regard to district financial matters. Such treasurer must be bonded
for not less than twenty-five thousand dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 36.100 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) On the transfer date the board of directors of a public
nonprofit corporation formed under RCW 67.40.020 that owns and operates
a state convention and trade center must transfer all lands,
facilities, equipment, assets, other interests in real, personal, and
intangible property, and interests under contracts, leases, licenses,
and agreements under the control of that board of directors to a public
facilities district created as provided in RCW 36.100.010 by the county
in which the convention and trade center is located pursuant to an
agreement with the public facilities district, subject to the review
and approval of the state treasurer.
(2) No real estate excise tax or other excise tax may be imposed
with respect to the transfer of assets of the public nonprofit
corporation to the public facilities district.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "transfer date" means the
date on or prior to June 30, 2011, on which provision has been made for
all of the following, pursuant to agreements and other necessary
arrangements approved by the state treasurer:
(a) The redemption, prepayment, or legal defeasance on or prior to
the transfer date of all outstanding borrowings and other financing
obligations of the state of Washington and the public nonprofit
corporation with respect to the state convention and trade center,
including state bonds and certificates of participation and related
financing contracts;
(b) The transfer to the public facilities district on the transfer
date of the balances on deposit in the state convention and trade
center operations account, the state convention and trade center
account and other accounts relating to the state convention and trade
center, including the revenues identified under (g)(ii) of this
subsection (3);
(c) The imposition by the public facilities district of excise
taxes on the sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging under
RCW 36.100.040 (4) and (5) at the maximum rates permitted in those
subsections;
(d) The transfer of all other assets and liabilities and, to the
extent permissible by their terms, the assignment or transfer of all
contracts and agreements of the public nonprofit corporation from the
public nonprofit corporation to the public facilities district;
(e) The execution of an agreement settling all claims in the case
of Tourism Alliance, a Washington nonprofit corporation; Craig Schafer;
Claridge LLC, a Washington limited liability company; R.C. Hedreen
Corporation, a Washington corporation; and on behalf of taxpayers,
Andrew Olsen, Amy L. Dee, Christopher M. Dee, Clipper Navigation, Inc.,
a Washington corporation v. State of Washington and James L. McIntire,
in his official capacity as State Treasurer of the State of Washington;
(f) The payment or provision for payment of all fees, costs, and
expenses incurred by the state of Washington and the public nonprofit
corporation to effect such transfer;
(g) An agreement of the public facilities district to transfer to
the state on June 30, 2011, an amount equal to (i) the revenues from
the tax imposed under RCW 36.100.040(5) during the state fiscal year
ending June 30, 2011, plus (ii) the revenues from the tax imposed under
RCW 67.40.130 during the state fiscal year ending June 30, 2011; and
(h) The agreement between the state treasurer and the public
facilities district, referred to in section 5(6)(c)(i).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 36.100 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in chapters 35.101, 67.28, and 82.14 RCW,
after January 1, 1983, no city, town, or county in which the tax under
RCW 36.100.040 (4) and (5) is imposed may impose a license fee or tax
on the act or privilege of engaging in business to furnish lodging by
a hotel, rooming house, tourist court, motel, trailer camp, or similar
facilities in excess of the rate imposed upon other persons engaged in
the business of making sales at retail.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "sales at retail" has the
same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 36.100
RCW to read as follows:
Nothing in this act may be construed to limit the authority of a
public nonprofit corporation under chapter 67.40 RCW prior to the
effective date of section 13 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 36.100
RCW to read as follows:
Bonds issued under this chapter are hereby made securities in which
all public officers and public bodies of the state and its political
subdivisions, all insurance companies, trust companies in their
commercial departments, savings banks, cooperative banks, banking
associations, investment companies, executors, trustees and other
fiduciaries, and all other persons whatsoever who are now or may
hereafter be authorized to invest in obligations of the state may
properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control
or belonging to them. Such bonds are hereby made securities which may
properly and legally be deposited with and received by any state or
municipal officer or any agency or political subdivision of the state
for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds and other obligations of
the state are now or may hereafter be authorized by law.

Sec. 12 RCW 39.94.020 and 1998 c 291 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Credit enhancement" includes insurance, letters of credit,
lines of credit, or other similar agreements which enhance the security
for the payment of the state's or an other agency's obligations under
financing contracts.
(2) "Financing contract" means any contract entered into by the
state for itself or on behalf of an other agency which provides for the
use and purchase of real or personal property by the state and provides
for payment by the state over a term of more than one year, and which
provides that title to the subject property may secure performance of
the state or transfer to the state or an other agency by the end of the
term, upon exercise of an option, for a nominal amount or for a price
determined without reference to fair market value. Financing contracts
((shall)) include, but are not ((be)) limited to, conditional sales
contracts, financing leases, lease purchase contracts, or refinancing
contracts, but ((shall)) do not include operating or true leases. For
purposes of this chapter, the term "financing contract" ((shall)) does
not include any nonrecourse financing contract or other obligation
payable only from money or other property received from private sources
and not payable from any public money or property. The term "financing
contract" ((shall)) includes a "master financing contract."
(3) "Master financing contract" means a financing contract which
provides for the use and purchase of property by the state, and which
may include more than one financing contract and appropriation.
(4) "Other agency" means any commission established under Title 15
RCW, a library or regional library, an educational service district,
the superintendent of public instruction, the school directors'
association, a health district, a public facilities district, or any
county, city, town, school district, or other municipal corporation or
quasi-municipal corporation described as such by statute.
(5) "State" means the state, agency, department, or instrumentality
of the state, the state board for community and technical colleges, and
any state institution of higher education.
(6) "State finance committee" means the state finance committee
under chapter 43.33 RCW.
(7) "Trustee" means a bank or trust company, within or without the
state, authorized by law to exercise trust powers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 67.40.010 (Legislative finding) and 1983 2nd ex.s. c 1 s 1
& 1982 c 34 s 1;
(2) RCW 67.40.025 (State convention and trade center operations
account -- Operating revenues -- Expenditures) and 2008 c 329 s 916, 1988
ex.s. c 1 s 2, 1987 1st ex.s. c 8 s 3, & 1985 c 233 s 2;
(3) RCW 67.40.027 (Compensation and travel expenses of board
members) and 1985 c 233 s 3;
(4) RCW 67.40.030 (General obligation bonds -- Authorized--Appropriation required) and 1990 c 181 s 1, 1988 ex.s. c 1 s 3, 1987
1st ex.s. c 3 s 12, 1985 c 233 s 1, 1983 2nd ex.s. c 1 s 3, & 1982 c 34
s 3;
(5) RCW 67.40.040 (Deposit of proceeds in state convention and
trade center account and appropriate subaccounts -- Credit against future
borrowings -- Use) and 2008 c 329 s 917, 2008 c 328 s 6011, 2007 c 228 s
106, 2005 c 518 s 936, 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 929, 1995 c 386 s 13, 1991
sp.s. c 13 s 11, 1990 c 181 s 2, 1988 ex.s. c 1 s 4, 1987 1st ex.s. c
8 s 4, 1985 c 57 s 66, 1983 2nd ex.s. c 1 s 4, & 1982 c 34 s 4;
(6) RCW 67.40.045 (Authorization to borrow from state treasury for
project completion costs -- Limits -- "Project completion" defined--Legislative intent -- Application) and 1995 c 386 s 14, 1993 sp.s. c 12
s 9, 1992 c 4 s 1, 1991 c 2 s 1, 1990 c 181 s 3, 1988 ex.s. c 1 s 9, &
1987 1st ex.s. c 8 s 1;
(7) RCW 67.40.050 (Administration of proceeds) and 1982 c 34 s 5;
(8) RCW 67.40.055 (Transfer of funds to account -- Repayment of
borrowed funds with interest) and 1988 ex.s. c 1 s 5 & 1987 1st ex.s.
c 8 s 11;
(9) RCW 67.40.060 (Retirement of bonds from nondebt-limit
proprietary appropriated bond retirement account -- Transfer from
accounts -- Pledge and promise -- Remedies of bondholders) and 2005 c 487
s 9, 1997 c 456 s 25, 1987 1st ex.s. c 8 s 5, 1983 2nd ex.s. c 1 s 5,
& 1982 c 34 s 6;
(10) RCW 67.40.070 (Legislature may provide additional means for
payment of bonds) and 1982 c 34 s 7;
(11) RCW 67.40.080 (Bonds legal investment for public funds) and
1982 c 34 s 8;
(12) RCW 67.40.090 (Lodging tax imposed in King county -- Rates--Proceeds) and 2002 c 178 s 4, 1995 c 386 s 15, 1991 c 2 s 3, 1988 ex.s.
c 1 s 6, 1987 1st ex.s. c 8 s 6, & 1982 c 34 s 9;
(13) RCW 67.40.100 (Limitation on license fees and taxes on hotels,
motels, rooming houses, trailer camps, etc.) and 1997 c 452 s 15, 1990
c 242 s 1, 1988 ex.s. c 1 s 25, & 1982 c 34 s 10;
(14) RCW 67.40.105 (Exemption from tax -- Emergency lodging for
homeless persons -- Conditions) and 1988 c 61 s 3;
(15) RCW 67.40.107 (Exemption from tax -- Temporary medical housing)
and 2008 c 137 s 4;
(16) RCW 67.40.110 (Use of revenues from convention and trade
center facilities excise tax by cities for professional sports
franchise facilities limited) and 1997 c 452 s 19 & 1987 1st ex.s. c 8
s 8;
(17) RCW 67.40.120 (Contracts for marketing facility and services)
and 2002 c 182 s 1, 1997 c 452 s 20, 1991 c 336 s 2, & 1988 ex.s. c 1
s 8;
(18) RCW 67.40.130 (Convention and trade facilities -- Tax on
transient lodging authorized -- Rates) and 1995 c 386 s 1;
(19) RCW 67.40.140 (Convention and trade facilities -- Remittance of
tax -- Credit) and 1995 c 386 s 2;
(20) RCW 67.40.150 (Convention and trade facilities -- Contract of
administration and collection to department of revenue -- Disposition of
tax -- Procedure) and 1995 c 386 s 3;
(21) RCW 67.40.160 (Convention and trade facilities -- Tax on
construction -- Disposition) and 1995 c 386 s 4;
(22) RCW 67.40.170 (Convention and trade facilities -- Use of
collected taxes) and 1995 c 386 s 5;
(23) RCW 67.40.180 (Convention and trade facilities -- Use of funds--Acceptance by board of directors of funding commitment) and 1995 c 386
s 6;
(24) RCW 67.40.190 (Convention and trade facilities -- Use of funds--Encumbered revenue) and 1995 c 386 s 7; and
(25) RCW 67.40.900 (Severability -- 1982 c 34) and 1982 c 34 s 13.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 RCW 67.40.020 (State convention and trade
center -- Public nonprofit corporation authorized -- Board of directors--Powers and duties) and 1995 c 386 s 12, 1993 c 500 s 9, 1988 ex.s. c 1
s 1, 1987 1st ex.s. c 8 s 2, 1984 c 210 s 1, 1983 2nd ex.s. c 1 s 2, &
1982 c 34 s 2 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Section 13 of this act is effective
contingent upon the transfer date occurring in section 8 of this act.
If the transfer date occurs in section 8 of this act, section 13 of
this act is effective on the transfer date. For the purposes of this
section, "transfer date" has the same meaning as provided in section 8
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Section 14 of this act is effective
contingent upon the transfer date occurring in section 8 of this act.
If the transfer date occurs in section 8 of this act, section 14 of
this act is effective thirty days after the transfer date in section 8
of this act. For the purposes of this section, "transfer date" has the
same meaning as provided in section 8 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 The state treasurer must provide written
notice of the effective dates in sections 15 and 16 of this act to the
department of revenue, the office of the code reviser, and others as
deemed appropriate by the state treasurer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 The provisions of this chapter must be
liberally construed to effect the policies and purposes of this
chapter.

--- END ---