BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.33.330 and 1996 c 243 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All records of any proceeding under this chapter shall be
sealed and shall not be thereafter open to inspection by any person
except upon order of the court for good cause shown, or except by using
the procedure described in RCW 26.33.343 or 26.33.345. In determining
whether good cause exists, the court shall consider any certified
statement on file with the department of health as provided in RCW
26.33.347.
(2) The state registrar of vital statistics may charge a reasonable
fee for the review of any of its sealed records.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.33.340 and 1993 c 81 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Department, agency, and court files regarding an adoption shall be
confidential except as provided for in RCW 26.33.345 and except that
reasonably available nonidentifying information ((may)) shall be
disclosed upon the written request for the information from the
adoptive parent, the adoptee, or the birth parent. If the adoption
facilitator refuses to disclose nonidentifying information, the
individual may petition the superior court. Identifying information
may also be disclosed through the procedures described in RCW 26.33.343
and 26.33.345.

Sec. 3 RCW 26.33.345 and 1993 c 81 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services, adoption
agencies, and independent adoption facilitators shall release the name
and location of the court where a relinquishment of parental rights or
finalization of an adoption took place to an adult adoptee, a birth
parent of an adult adoptee, an adoptive parent, a birth or adoptive
grandparent of an adult adoptee, or an adult sibling of an adult
adoptee, or the legal guardian of any of these.
(2) The department of health shall make available a noncertified
copy of the original birth certificate of a child to the child's birth
parents upon request.
(3) ((For adoptions finalized after October 1, 1993)) After
receiving a request from an adopted person eighteen years of age or
older, the department of health shall ((make available)) provide the
person with a noncertified copy of the adopted person's original birth
certificate ((to the adoptee after the adoptee's eighteenth birthday)),
unless the birth parent has filed an affidavit of nondisclosure.

Sec. 4 RCW 26.33.345 and 1993 c 81 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services, adoption
agencies, and independent adoption facilitators shall release the name
and location of the court where a relinquishment of parental rights or
finalization of an adoption took place to an adult adoptee, a birth
parent of an adult adoptee, an adoptive parent, a birth or adoptive
grandparent of an adult adoptee, or an adult sibling of an adult
adoptee, or the legal guardian of any of these.
(2) The department of health shall make available a noncertified
copy of the original birth certificate of a child to the child's birth
parents upon request.
(3) ((For adoptions finalized after October 1, 1993)) After
receiving a request from an adopted person eighteen years of age or
older, or the adult child of an adult adopted person, unless the birth
parent filed an affidavit of nondisclosure prior to October 1, 2010,
the department of health shall ((make available)) provide the person
with a noncertified copy of the adopted person's original birth
certificate ((to the adoptee after the adoptee's eighteenth birthday
unless the birth parent has filed an affidavit of nondisclosure)) and
a certified copy of the adopted person's adoption decree.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 3 of this act expires October 1,
2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 4 of this act takes effect October
1, 2010.

--- END ---