BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 INTENT. The legislature intends to provide
for the operation of education programs for juvenile inmates
incarcerated in adult jails.
The legislature finds that this chapter fully satisfies any
constitutional duty to provide education programs for juvenile inmates
in adult jails. The legislature further finds that biennial
appropriations for education programs under this chapter amply provide
for any constitutional duty to educate juvenile inmates in adult jails.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 EDUCATION PROGRAMS FOR JUVENILES IN ADULT
JAILS. A program of education shall be made available for juvenile
inmates by adult jail facilities and the several school districts of
the state for persons under the age of eighteen years who have been
incarcerated in any adult jail facilities operated under the authority
of chapter 70.48 RCW. Each school district within which there is
located an adult jail facility shall, singly or in concert with another
school district pursuant to RCW 28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 or chapter
39.34 RCW, conduct a program of education, including related student
activities for inmates in adult jail facilities. School districts are
not precluded from contracting with educational service districts,
community and technical colleges, four-year institutions of higher
education, or other qualified entities to provide all or part of these
education programs. The division of duties, authority, and liabilities
of the adult jail facilities and the several school districts of the
state respecting the educational programs shall be as provided for in
this chapter with regard to programs for juveniles in adult jail
facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 "ADULT JAIL FACILITY"--DEFINED. As used in
this chapter, "adult jail facility" means an adult jail operated under
the authority of chapter 70.48 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 DUTIES, AUTHORITY, AND RESPONSIBILITIES OF
EDUCATION PROVIDER. (1) Except as otherwise provided for by contract
under section 7 of this act, the duties and authority of a school
district, educational service district, institution of higher
education, or private contractor to provide for education programs
under this chapter include:
(a) Employing, supervising, and controlling administrators,
teachers, specialized personnel, and other persons necessary to conduct
education programs, subject to security clearance by the adult jail
facilities;
(b) Purchasing, leasing, renting, or providing textbooks, maps,
audiovisual equipment paper, writing instruments, physical education
equipment, and other instructional equipment, materials, and supplies
deemed necessary by the provider of the education programs;
(c) Conducting education programs for inmates under the age of
eighteen in accordance with program standards established by the
superintendent of public instruction;
(d) Expending funds for the direct and indirect costs of
maintaining and operating the program of education that are
appropriated by the legislature and allocated by the superintendent of
public instruction for the exclusive purpose of maintaining and
operating education programs for juvenile inmates incarcerated in adult
jail facilities, in addition to funds from federal and private grants,
and bequests, and gifts made for the purpose of maintaining and
operating the program of education; and
(e) Providing educational services to juvenile inmates within five
school days of receiving notification from an adult jail facility
within the district's boundaries that an individual under the age of
eighteen has been incarcerated.
(2) The school district, educational service district, institution
of higher education, or private contractor shall develop the curricula,
instruction methods, and educational objectives of the education
programs, subject to applicable requirements of state and federal law.
For inmates who are under the age of eighteen when they commence the
program and who have not met high school graduation requirements, such
courses of instruction and school-related student activities as are
provided by the school district for students outside of adult jails
shall be provided by the school district for students in adult jails,
to the extent that it is practical and judged appropriate by the school
district and the administrator of the adult jail facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 SCHOOL DISTRICTS--ADDITIONAL AUTHORITY AND
LIMITATION. School districts providing an education program to
juvenile inmates in an adult jail facility, may:
(1) Award appropriate diplomas or certificates to juvenile inmates
who successfully complete graduation requirements;
(2) Allow students eighteen years of age who have participated in
an education program under this chapter to continue in the program,
under rules adopted by the superintendent of public instruction; and
(3) Spend only funds appropriated by the legislature and allocated
by the superintendent of public instruction for the exclusive purpose
of maintaining and operating education programs under this chapter,
including direct and indirect costs of maintaining and operating the
education programs, and funds from federal and private grants,
bequests, and gifts made for that purpose. School districts may not
expend excess tax levy proceeds authorized for school district purposes
to pay costs incurred under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 SUPPORT OF EDUCATION PROGRAMS. To support
each education program under this chapter, the adult jail facility and
each superintendent or chief administrator of an adult jail facility
shall:
(1) Through existing space, construction, lease, or rental of
space, provide necessary building and exercise space for the education
program that is secure, safe, separate, and apart from space occupied
by nonstudent inmates while educational services are being provided;
(2) Through existing space, construction, lease, or rental, provide
technology and supporting equipment; and other equipment and fixtures
deemed necessary by the adult jail facility to conduct the education
program;
(3) Provide heat, lights, telephone, janitorial services, repair
services, and other support services for the building and exercise
spaces, equipment, and fixtures provided under this section;
(4) Maintain a clean and appropriate classroom environment that is
sufficient to meet the program requirements and consistent with
security conditions;
(5) Employ, supervise, and control security staff to safeguard
agents of the education providers and juvenile inmates while engaged in
educational and related activities conducted under this chapter;
(6) Provide clinical and medical evaluation services necessary for
a determination by the education provider of the educational needs of
juvenile inmates;
(7) Provide such other support services and facilities as are
reasonably necessary to conduct the education program; and
(8) Notify the school district within which the adult jail facility
resides within five school days that an eligible juvenile inmate has
been incarcerated in the adult jail facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 CONTRACT BETWEEN SCHOOL DISTRICTS AND ADULT
JAIL FACILITIES. Each education provider under this chapter and the
adult jail facility shall negotiate and execute a written contract for
each school year, or such longer period as may be agreed to, that
delineates the manner in which their respective duties and authority
will be cooperatively performed and exercised, and any disputes and
grievances resolved through mediation, and if necessary, arbitration.
Any such contract may provide for the performance of duties by an
education provider in addition to those in this chapter, including
duties imposed upon the adult jail facility and its agents under
section 6 of this act, if supplemental funding provided by the adult
jail facility is available to fully pay the direct and indirect costs
of these additional duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 EDUCATION SITE CLOSURES OR REDUCTION IN
SERVICES--NOTICE--LIABILITY FOR FAILURE TO PROVIDE NOTICE--ALTERNATIVE
DISPUTE RESOLUTION. (1) By September 30, 2010, districts must, in
coordination with adult jail facilities residing within their
boundaries, submit an instructional service plan to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction. Service plans must meet
requirements stipulated in the rules of the office of the
superintendent of public instruction. Once districts have submitted a
plan to the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
districts are not required to resubmit their plans unless either
districts or adult jail facilities initiate a significant change to
their plans. Annually, before April 15th, districts and the adult jail
facilities must review their plans.
(2) By April 15th of each school year, the adult jail administrator
shall provide written notice to the office of the superintendent of
public instruction and education providers operating programs under
this chapter of any reasonably foreseeable education site closures,
reductions in the number of inmates or education services, or any other
cause for a reduction in certificated or classified staff the next
school year. The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall adopt rules regarding school district funding when the number of
enrolled students decreases below the number associated with supporting
either certificated contracts or classified contracts, or both.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 ALLOCATION OF MONEY--ACCOUNTABILITY
REQUIREMENTS--RULES. The superintendent of public instruction shall:
(1) Allocate money appropriated by the legislature to administer
and provide education programs under this chapter to school districts
that have assumed the primary responsibility to administer and provide
education programs under this chapter or to the educational service
district operating the program under contract; and
(2) Adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW that establish
reporting, program compliance, audit, and such other accountability
requirements as are reasonably necessary to implement this chapter and
related provisions of the omnibus appropriations act effectively.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 28A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---