BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 87.03.001 and 1989 c 84 s 66 are each amended to read
as follows:
The formation of an irrigation district may be subject to potential
review by a boundary review board under chapter 36.93 RCW. The
alteration of the boundaries of an irrigation district, including but
not limited to a consolidation, addition of lands, exclusion of lands,
or merger, may be subject to potential review by a boundary review
board under chapter 36.93 RCW, except that additions or exclusions of
land to an irrigation district, when those lands are within the
boundary of a federal reclamation project, are not subject to review by
a boundary review board under chapter 36.93 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 87.03.140 and 1921 c 129 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board, and its agents and employees, shall have the right to
enter upon any land to make surveys, and may locate the necessary
irrigation or drainage works, power plants, power sites or power lines
and the line for any canal or canals, and the necessary branches of
laterals for the same, on any lands which may be deemed best for such
location. Said board shall also have the power to acquire, either by
purchase or condemnation, or other legal means, all lands, waters,
water rights, and other property necessary for the construction, use,
supply, maintenance, repair and improvements of said canal or canals
and irrigation and drainage works, including canals and works
constructed or being constructed by private owners, or any other
person, lands for reservoirs for the storage of needful waters and all
necessary appurtenances. The board may also construct the necessary
dams, reservoirs and works for the collection of water for the said
district, and may enter into contracts for a water supply to be
delivered to the canals and works of the district, and do any and every
lawful act necessary to be done in order to carry out the purposes of
this act; and in carrying out the aforesaid purposes the bonds of the
district may be used by the board, at not less than ninety percent of
their par value in payment. The board may enter into any obligation or
contract with the United States or with the state of Washington for the
supervision of the construction, for the construction, reconstruction,
betterment, extension, sale or purchase, or operation and maintenance
of the necessary works for the delivery and distribution of water
therefrom under the provisions of the state reclamation act, or under
the provisions of the federal reclamation act, and all amendments or
extensions thereof, and the rules and regulations established
thereunder, or it may contract with the United States for a water
supply or for reclamation purposes in general under any act of congress
which, for the purposes of this act, shall be deemed to include any act
of congress for reclamation purposes heretofore or hereafter enacted
providing for and permitting such contract, or for the collection of
money due or to become due to the United States, or for the assumption
of the control and management of the works; and in case contract has
been or may hereafter be made with the United States, as herein
provided, bonds of the district may be deposited with the United States
as payment or as security for future payment at not less than ninety
percent of their par value, the interest on said bonds to be provided
for by assessment and levy as in the case of other bonds of the
district, and regularly paid to the United States to be applied as
provided in such contract, and if bonds of the district are not so
deposited, it shall be the duty of the board of directors to include as
part of any levy or assessment provided in RCW 87.03.260 an amount
sufficient to meet each year all payments accruing under the terms of
any such contract. The board may accept on behalf of the district
appointment of the district as fiscal agent of the United States or the
state of Washington or other authorization of the district by the
United States or the state of Washington to make collections of money
for or on behalf of the United States or the state of Washington in
connection with any federal or other reclamation project, whereupon the
district, and the county treasurer for the district, shall be
authorized to so act and to assume the duties and liability incident to
such action, and the said board shall have full power to do any and all
things required by the federal statutes now or hereafter enacted in
connection therewith, and all things required by the rules and
regulations now or that may hereafter be established by any department
of the federal government in regard thereto.
The use of all water required for the irrigation of the lands
within any district, together with rights-of-way for canals, laterals,
ditches, sites for reservoirs, power plants, sites, and lines, and all
other property required in fully carrying out the purposes of the
organization of the district is hereby declared to be a public use; and
in condemnation proceedings to acquire any property or property rights
for the use of the district, the board of directors shall proceed in
the name of the district, in the same manner provided in this state for
private corporations in cases of appropriation of lands, real estate
and other property ((by private corporations)), subject to the
provisions of this chapter: PROVIDED, That the irrigation district, at
its option, pursuant to resolution to that end duly passed by its board
of directors may unite in a single action proceedings for the
acquisition and condemnation of different tracts of land needed by it
for rights-of-way for canals, laterals, power plants, sites, and lines
and other irrigation works which are held by separate owners. And the
court may, on the motion of any party, consolidate into a single action
separate suits for the condemnation of rights-of-way for such
irrigation works whenever from motives of economy or the expediting of
business it appears desirable so to do: PROVIDED FURTHER, That there
shall be a separate finding of the court or jury as to each tract held
in separate ownership.
In any condemnation proceeding brought under the provisions of this
act to acquire canals, laterals and ditches and rights-of-way therefor,
sites, reservoirs, power plants and pumping plants and sites therefor,
power canals, transmission lines, electrical equipment and any other
property, and if the owner or owners thereof or their predecessors
shall have issued contracts or deeds agreeing to deliver to the holders
of said contracts or deeds water for irrigation purposes, or
authorizing the holders thereof to take or receive water for irrigation
purposes from any portion of said property or works, and if the
delivery of said water or the right to take or receive the same shall
in any manner constitute a charge upon, or a right in the property and
works sought to be acquired, or any portion thereof, the district shall
be authorized to institute and maintain said condemnation proceedings
for the purpose of acquiring said property and works, and the interest
of the owners therein subject to the rights of the holders of such
contracts or deeds, and the court or jury making the award shall
determine and award to such owner or owners the value of the interest
to be so appropriated in said condemnation proceedings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 87.03 RCW
to read as follows:
In case an irrigation district requires immediate possession and
use of the property sought to be condemned, and an order of necessity
has been granted, and no review has been taken therefrom, the
irrigation district may stipulate with respondents in accordance with
the provisions of this chapter for an order of immediate possession and
use, and file with the court clerk where the action is pending, a
certificate of the irrigation district's requirement of immediate
possession and use of the land, which shall state the amount of money
offered to the respondents and shall further state that such offer
constitutes a continuing tender of the amount.
The irrigation district shall then issue and deliver a warrant
payable to the order of the court clerk where the action is pending in
a sum sufficient to pay the amount offered, which shall then be paid
into the court's registry.
The court, without further notice to respondents, shall thereafter
enter an order granting the irrigation district immediate possession
and use of the property described in the order of necessity, which
order shall bind the irrigation district to pay the full amount of any
final judgment of compensation and damages that may be awarded for the
taking and appropriation of the lands, real estate, premises, or other
property described in the petition required by RCW 8.20.010, and for
the injury, if any, by reason of the taking to the remainder of the
lands, real estate, premises, or other property from which the property
described in the petition is to be taken. This amount must be offset
against any and all such compensation or benefits, if any, accruing to
the remainder by reason of the appropriation and use by the irrigation
district of the lands, real estate, premises, or other property
described in the petition. The moneys paid into court may at any time
after entry of the order of immediate possession and use, be withdrawn
by respondents, by order of the court, as their interests shall appear.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 87.03 RCW
to read as follows:
The amount paid into court under the provisions of section 3 of
this act constitute just compensation paid for the taking of the
property. Respondents may, in the same action, request a trial for the
purpose of assessing the amount of compensation to be made and the
amount of damages arising from the taking. At the trial, the date of
valuation of the property shall be the date of entry of the order
granting the irrigation district immediate possession and use of the
property.
If, pursuant to such trial, an amount in excess of the tender is
awarded, the court shall order the excess paid to respondents with
interest thereon from the time of the entry of the order of immediate
possession and use, and shall charge the costs of the action to the
irrigation district. If, pursuant to the trial, respondents are
awarded an amount equal to the tender, the costs of the action shall be
charged to the irrigation district. If the verdict or decision awards
an amount less than the tender, each party shall bear its own costs,
and if respondents have accepted the tender and withdrawn the amount
paid into court, the irrigation district is entitled to a judgment for
the difference; otherwise, the excess on deposit shall be returned to
the irrigation district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 87.03 RCW
to read as follows:
If any respondent elects to demand a trial for the purpose of
assessing just compensation and damages arising from a taking under the
provisions of section 3 of this act, the respondent shall so move
within sixty days from the date of entry of the order of immediate
possession and use, and the issues shall be brought to trial within one
year from the date of the order unless good and sufficient proof is
offered and it appears therefrom to the court that the hearing could
not have been held within the year. In the event that a demand is not
timely made or having been timely made, is not brought to trial within
the limiting period, the court, upon application of the irrigation
district, shall enter a decree of appropriation for the amount paid
into court under the provisions of section 3 of this act, as the total
sum to which respondents are entitled, and such decree shall be final
and nonappealable.

Sec. 6 RCW 87.03.436 and 1990 c 39 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
All contract projects, the estimated cost of which is less than
((one)) three hundred thousand dollars, may be awarded to a contractor
on the small works roster. The small works roster shall be comprised
of all responsible contractors who have requested to be on the list.
The board of directors shall authorize by resolution a procedure for
securing telephone and/or written quotations from the contractors on
the small works roster to assure establishment of a competitive price
and for awarding contracts to the lowest responsible bidder. Such
procedure shall require that a good-faith effort be made to request
quotations from all responsible contractors on the small works roster.
Immediately after an award is made, the bid quotations obtained shall
be recorded, open to public inspection, and available by telephone
inquiry. The small works roster shall be revised once a year.

Sec. 7 RCW 87.03.443 and 2004 c 215 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
There may be created ((for)) by each irrigation district or
separate legal authority created pursuant to RCW 87.03.018 a fund to be
known as the upgrading and improvement fund. The board of directors
shall determine what portion of the annual revenue of the irrigation
district or separate legal authority will be placed into its upgrading
and improvement fund, including all or any part of the funds received
by a district or separate legal authority from the sale, delivery, and
distribution of electrical energy. Moneys from the upgrading and
improvement fund may ((only)) be used to modernize, improve, or upgrade
((the)) irrigation and hydroelectric power facilities ((of the
irrigation district)) or to respond to an emergency affecting such
facilities. The funds may also be used for licensing hydroelectric
power facilities and for payment of capital improvements.

--- END ---