BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that some individuals
use the public records act in such a way that it burdens the government
entity without providing a balancing benefit to the people of
Washington. The act was not put in place so that individuals could use
it to monopolize employees' time to the detriment of other citizens.
The intent of this act is to create balance between those that desire
public information and the competing obligations of government
employees.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.56.120 and 2005 c 483 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No fee shall be charged for the inspection of public records.
No fee shall be charged for locating public documents and making them
available for copying. A reasonable charge may be imposed for
providing copies of public records and for the use by any person of
agency equipment or equipment of the office of the secretary of the
senate or the office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives
to copy public records, which charges shall not exceed the amount
necessary to reimburse the agency, the office of the secretary of the
senate, or the office of the chief clerk of the house of
representatives for its actual costs directly incident to such copying.
Agency charges for photocopies shall be imposed in accordance with the
actual per page cost or other costs established and published by the
agency. ((In no event may an agency)) Except as provided in subsection
(2) of this section, an agency may not charge a per page cost greater
than the actual per page cost as established and published by the
agency. To the extent the agency has not determined the actual per
page cost for photocopies of public records, the agency may not charge
in excess of fifteen cents per page. An agency may require a deposit
in an amount not to exceed ten percent of the estimated cost of
providing copies for a request. If an agency makes a request available
on a partial or installment basis, the agency may charge for each part
of the request as it is provided. If an installment of a records
request is not claimed or reviewed, the agency is not obligated to
fulfill the balance of the request.
(2) If the production of records for one requester in a calendar
month exceeds five person-hours, the public agency may require the
requester to pay the personnel costs for the request during the month
to complete the search and copying tasks. The personnel costs may not
exceed the actual salary and benefit costs for the personnel required
to perform the search and copying tasks. The requester shall pay the
fee before the records are disclosed, and the public agency may require
payment in advance of the search.

--- END ---