BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.285.030 and 2009 c 565 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Attorney general" means the Washington state office of the
attorney general.
(2) "Auditor" means: (a) The Washington state auditor's office or
its designee for qualifying utilities under its jurisdiction that are
not investor-owned utilities; or (b) an independent auditor selected by
a qualifying utility that is not under the jurisdiction of the state
auditor and is not an investor-owned utility.
(3) "Commission" means the Washington state utilities and
transportation commission.
(4) "Conservation" means any reduction in electric power
consumption resulting from increases in the efficiency of energy use,
production, or distribution.
(5) "Cost-effective" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
80.52.030.
(6) "Council" means the Washington state apprenticeship and
training council within the department of labor and industries.
(7) "Customer" means a person or entity that purchases electricity
for ultimate consumption and not for resale.
(8) "Department" means the department of commerce or its successor.
(9) "Distributed generation" means an eligible renewable resource
where the generation facility or any integrated cluster of such
facilities has a generating capacity of not more than five megawatts.
(10) "Eligible renewable resource" means:
(a) Electricity from a generation facility powered by a renewable
resource other than fresh water that commences operation after March
31, 1999, where((: (i))) the facility is located ((in the Pacific
Northwest; or (ii) the electricity from the facility is delivered into
Washington state on a real-time basis without shaping, storage, or
integration services)) within the geographic boundary of the western
electricity coordinating council or its successor entity; ((or))
(b) Incremental electricity produced as a result of efficiency
improvements completed after March 31, 1999, to hydroelectric
generation ((projects)) facilities owned by a qualifying utility and
located in the Pacific Northwest or to hydroelectric generation in
irrigation pipes and canals located in the Pacific Northwest, where the
additional generation in either case does not result in new water
diversions or impoundments;
(c) That portion of incremental electricity produced as a result of
equipment efficiency improvements completed after March 31, 1999,
attributable to a qualifying utility's share of the electricity output
to hydroelectric generation facilities whose energy output is marketed
by the Bonneville power administration where the additional generation
does not result in new water diversions or an increase in the amount of
water storage; or
(d) Electricity from a biomass energy generation facility located
in Washington that commenced operation before March 31, 1999, and that
has been significantly modified after the effective date of this
section. For the purposes of this section, "significantly modified"
means and is limited to installation, replacement, or modification of
equipment that improves the heat rate of the facility by at least
twenty-five percent.
(11) "Investor-owned utility" has the same meaning as defined in
RCW 19.29A.010.
(12) "Load" means the amount of kilowatt-hours of electricity
delivered in the most recently completed year by a qualifying utility
to its Washington retail customers.
(13)(a) "Nonpower attributes" means all environmentally related
characteristics, exclusive of energy, capacity reliability, and other
electrical power service attributes, that are associated with the
generation of electricity from a renewable resource, including but not
limited to the facility's fuel type, geographic location, vintage,
qualification as an eligible renewable resource, and avoided emissions
of pollutants to the air, soil, or water, and avoided emissions of
carbon dioxide and other greenhouse gases.
(b) "Nonpower attributes" does not include any aspects, claims,
characteristics, or benefits associated with the on-site capture and
destruction of methane or other greenhouse gases at a facility through
a digester system, landfill gas collection system, or other mechanism,
which may be separately marketable as greenhouse gas emissions
reduction credits, offsets, or similar tradable commodities.
(14) "Pacific Northwest" has the same meaning as defined for the
Bonneville power administration in section 3 of the Pacific Northwest
electric power planning and conservation act (94 Stat. 2698; 16 U.S.C.
Sec. 839a).
(15) "Public facility" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
39.35C.010.
(16) "Qualifying utility" means an electric utility, as the term
"electric utility" is defined in RCW 19.29A.010, that serves more than
twenty-five thousand customers in the state of Washington. The number
of customers served may be based on data reported by a utility in form
861, "annual electric utility report," filed with the energy
information administration, United States department of energy.
(17) "Renewable energy credit" means a tradable certificate of
proof of at least one megawatt-hour of an eligible renewable resource
where the generation facility is not powered by fresh water, the
certificate includes all of the nonpower attributes associated with
that one megawatt-hour of electricity, and the certificate is verified
by a renewable energy credit tracking system selected by the
department.
(18) "Renewable resource" means: (a) Water; (b) wind; (c) solar
energy; (d) geothermal energy; (e) landfill gas; (f) wave, ocean, or
tidal power; (g) gas from sewage treatment facilities; (h) biodiesel
fuel as defined in RCW 82.29A.135 that is not derived from crops raised
on land cleared from old growth ((or first-growth)) forests where the
clearing occurred after December 7, 2006; ((and)) or (i) biomass energy
((based on animal waste or solid organic fuels from wood, forest, or
field residues, or dedicated energy crops that do not include (i) wood
pieces that have been treated with chemical preservatives such as
creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic; (ii) black
liquor by-product from paper production; (iii) wood from old growth
forests; or (iv) municipal solid waste)).
(19) "Rule" means rules adopted by an agency or other entity of
Washington state government to carry out the intent and purposes of
this chapter.
(20) "Year" means the twelve-month period commencing January 1st
and ending December 31st.
(21)(a) "Biomass energy" means: (i) By-products of pulping and
wood manufacturing process; (ii) animal waste; (iii) solid organic
fuels from wood; (iv) forest or field residues; (v) wooden demolition
or construction debris; (vi) food waste; (vii) liquors derived from
algae and other sources; (viii) dedicated energy crops; (ix) biosolids;
and (x) yard waste.
(b) "Biomass energy" does not include: (i) Wood pieces that have
been treated with chemical preservatives such as creosote,
pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic; (ii) wood from old growth
forests; or (iii) municipal solid waste.
(22) "Greenhouse gases" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
80.80.010.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.285.040 and 2007 c 1 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each qualifying utility shall pursue all available conservation
that is cost-effective, reliable, and feasible.
(a) ((By January 1, 2010)) Beginning on the effective date of this
section, using methodologies consistent with those used by the Pacific
Northwest electric power and conservation planning council in its most
recently published regional power plan, each qualifying utility shall
identify its achievable cost-effective conservation potential through
2019. At least every two years thereafter, the qualifying utility
shall review and update this assessment for the subsequent ten-year
period.
(b) ((Beginning)) By January 1, 2010, each qualifying utility shall
establish and make publicly available a biennial acquisition target for
cost-effective conservation consistent with its identification of
achievable opportunities in (a) of this subsection, and meet that
target during the subsequent two-year period. At a minimum, each
biennial acquisition target must be no lower than the qualifying
utility's pro rata share for that two-year period of its cost-effective
conservation potential for the subsequent ten-year period. A
qualifying utility may not use incremental electricity produced as a
result of efficiency improvements to hydroelectric generation
facilities to meet its biennial conservation acquisition target if the
improvements were used to meet its targets under subsection (2)(a) of
this section.
(c) In meeting its conservation targets, a qualifying utility may
count high-efficiency cogeneration owned and used by a retail electric
customer to meet its own needs. High-efficiency cogeneration is the
sequential production of electricity and useful thermal energy from a
common fuel source, where, under normal operating conditions, the
facility ((has a useful thermal energy output of no less than thirty-three percent of the total energy output)) is designed to have a
projected overall thermal conversion efficiency of at least seventy
percent. For the purposes of this section, "overall thermal conversion
efficiency" means the output of electricity plus usable heat divided by
fuel input. The reduction in load due to high-efficiency cogeneration
shall be((: (i) Calculated as the ratio of the fuel chargeable to
power heat rate of the cogeneration facility compared to the heat rate
on a new and clean basis of a best-commercially available technology
combined-cycle natural gas-fired combustion turbine; and (ii))) counted
towards meeting the biennial conservation target in the same manner as
other conservation savings.
(d) The commission may determine if a conservation program
implemented by an investor-owned utility is cost-effective based on the
commission's policies and practice.
(e) The commission may rely on its standard practice for review and
approval of investor-owned utility conservation targets.
(2)(a) Each qualifying utility shall use eligible renewable
resources or acquire equivalent renewable energy credits, or a
combination of both, to meet the following annual targets:
(i) At least three percent of its load by January 1, 2012, and each
year thereafter through December 31, 2015;
(ii) At least ((nine)) ten and twenty-five one-hundredths (10.25%)
percent of its load by January 1, 2016, and each year thereafter
through December 31, 2019; and
(iii) At least ((fifteen)) sixteen and twenty-five one-hundredths
(16.25%) percent of its load by January 1, 2020, and each year
thereafter.
(b) It must be the goal of the state for each qualifying utility to
use eligible renewable resources or acquire equivalent renewable energy
credits, or a combination of both, to meet an annual renewable resource
goal of at least twenty percent of its load by January 1, 2024, and
each year thereafter.
(c) A qualifying utility may count distributed generation at double
the facility's electrical output if the utility: (i) Owns or has
contracted for the distributed generation and the associated renewable
energy credits; or (ii) has contracted to purchase the associated
renewable energy credits.
(((c))) (d) In meeting the annual targets in (a) of this
subsection, a qualifying utility shall calculate its annual load based
on the average of the utility's load for the previous two years.
(((d))) (e) A qualifying utility shall be considered in compliance
with an annual target in (a) of this subsection if: (i) The utility's
weather-adjusted load for the previous three years on average did not
increase over that time period; (ii) after December 7, 2006, the
utility did not commence or renew ownership or incremental purchases of
electricity from resources other than renewable resources other than on
a daily spot price basis and the electricity is not offset by
equivalent renewable energy credits; and (iii) the utility invested at
least one percent of its total annual retail revenue requirement that
year on eligible renewable resources, renewable energy credits, or a
combination of both.
(((e))) (f) The requirements of this section may be met for any
given year with renewable energy credits ((produced)) generated during
((that)) the target year, the preceding two years, or that may be
generated during the first three months of the subsequent year. Each
renewable energy credit may be used only once to meet the requirements
of this section.
(((f))) (g) In complying with the targets established in (a) of
this subsection, a qualifying utility may not count:
(i) Eligible renewable resources or distributed generation where
the associated renewable energy credits are owned by a separate entity;
or
(ii) Eligible renewable resources or renewable energy credits
obtained for and used in an optional pricing program such as the
program established in RCW 19.29A.090.
(((g))) (h) Where fossil and combustible renewable resources are
cofired in one generating unit located in the Pacific Northwest where
the cofiring commenced after March 31, 1999, the unit shall be
considered to produce eligible renewable resources in direct proportion
to the percentage of the total heat value represented by the heat value
of the renewable resources.
(((h))) (i)(i) A qualifying utility that acquires an eligible
renewable resource or renewable energy credit may count that
acquisition at one and two-tenths times its base value:
(A) Where the eligible renewable resource comes from a facility
that commenced operation after December 31, 2005; and
(B) Where the developer of the facility used apprenticeship
programs approved by the council during facility construction.
(ii) The council shall establish minimum levels of labor hours to
be met through apprenticeship programs to qualify for this extra
credit.
(((i))) (j) A qualifying utility shall be considered in compliance
with an annual target in (a) of this subsection if events beyond the
reasonable control of the utility that could not have been reasonably
anticipated or ameliorated prevented it from meeting the renewable
energy target. Such events include weather-related damage, mechanical
failure, strikes, lockouts, and actions of a governmental authority
that adversely affect the generation, transmission, or distribution of
an eligible renewable resource under contract to a qualifying utility.
(k) Beginning in 2012 and every two years thereafter, a qualifying
utility may use up to twenty-five percent of the conservation achieved
in excess of its biennial conservation target established in subsection
(1)(a) of this section to meet the renewable target established in (a)
of this subsection for that compliance year.
(l)(i) Between the effective date of this section and December 31,
2017, a qualifying utility that acquires electricity from photovoltaic
facilities located in Washington using solar inverters and modules
manufactured in Washington, or from solar thermal electric systems
located and manufactured in Washington, may count that acquisition at
two times its base value.
(ii) A qualifying utility may count the electricity produced in
(l)(i) of this subsection if it: (A) Owns or has contracted for the
solar energy generation and the associated renewable energy credits; or
(B) has contracted to purchase the associated renewable energy credits.
(3) Utilities that become qualifying utilities after December 31,
2006, shall meet the requirements in this section on a time frame
comparable in length to that provided for qualifying utilities as of
December 7, 2006.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.285.070 and 2007 c 1 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) On or before June 1, 2012, and annually thereafter, each
qualifying utility shall report to the department on its progress in
the preceding year in meeting the energy conservation targets
established in RCW 19.285.040(1), including expected electricity
savings from the biennial conservation target, expenditures on
conservation, and actual electricity savings results((,)). Each
qualifying utility shall also submit an implementation plan for meeting
the renewable energy targets in RCW 19.285.040(2) for the current
target year. The plan must include the qualifying utility's average of
its load for the most recent two years, projected load and megawatt-hour target for the current year based on load forecasts in the
utility's most recently acknowledged integrated resource plan, and an
estimate of the quantity of eligible renewable resources and renewable
energy credits, not to include information associated with specific
resources or costs, that the qualifying utility will require to meet
the target for the current target year. The plan may not be the basis
for enforcement actions or penalties against the qualifying utility.
(2) On or before June 1st of the year subsequent to the target
year, and annually thereafter, each qualifying utility shall report to
the department on its progress in meeting the renewable energy targets
established in RCW 19.285.040(2), including the utility's annual load
for the prior two years, the amount of megawatt-hours needed to meet
the annual renewable energy target, the amount of megawatt-hours of
each type of eligible renewable resource acquired, the type and amount
of renewable energy credits acquired, and the percent of its total
annual retail revenue requirement invested in the incremental cost of
eligible renewable resources and the cost of renewable energy credits.
For each year that a qualifying utility elects to demonstrate
alternative compliance under RCW 19.285.040(2) (d) or (i) or
19.285.050(1), it must include in its annual report relevant data to
demonstrate that it met the criteria in that section.
(3) A qualifying utility may submit its reports to the department
in conjunction with its annual obligations in chapter 19.29A RCW.
(((2))) (4) A qualifying utility that is an investor-owned utility
shall also report all information required in subsections (1) and (2)
of this section to the commission, and all other qualifying utilities
shall also make all information required in subsections (1) and (2) of
this section available to the auditor.
(((3))) (5) A qualifying utility shall also make reports required
in this section available to its customers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) By June 30, 2013, the joint legislative
audit and review committee shall conduct a study on the costs and
benefits of the renewable and conservation targets under chapter 19.285
RCW, including an examination of how the targets affect the following:
The cost of electricity for commercial, industrial, and residential
customers of each qualifying utility; and the development of renewable
energy.
(2)(a) The department of commerce shall contract with a mutually
acceptable person or entity to study the feasibility of measuring
hydroelectric power that is used to integrate an eligible renewable
resource and whether classifying such hydroelectric power as an
eligible renewable resource will further the purposes of chapter 19.285
RCW. The study must be presented to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2013.
(b) Before selecting the contractor, the department of commerce
shall consult the following: Qualifying utilities; large industrial
customers; organizations representing environmental interests; and any
other directly interested organizations and associations.

--- END ---