BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
EDUCATOR EVALUATIONS AND PERFORMANCE
Sec. 101 RCW 28A.150.230 and 2006 c 263 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is the intent and purpose of this section to guarantee that
each common school district board of directors, whether or not acting
through its respective administrative staff, be held accountable for
the proper operation of their district to the local community and its
electorate. In accordance with the provisions of Title 28A RCW, as now
or hereafter amended, each common school district board of directors
shall be vested with the final responsibility for the setting of
policies ensuring quality in the content and extent of its educational
program and that such program provide students with the opportunity to
achieve those skills which are generally recognized as requisite to
learning.
(2) In conformance with the provisions of Title 28A RCW, as now or
hereafter amended, it shall be the responsibility of each common school
district board of directors to adopt policies to:
(a) Establish performance criteria and an evaluation process for
its superintendent, classified staff, certificated personnel, including
administrative staff, and for all programs constituting a part of such
district's curriculum. Each district shall report annually to the
superintendent of public instruction the following for each employee
group listed in this subsection (2)(a): (i) Evaluation criteria and
rubrics; (ii) a description of each rating; and (iii) the number of
staff in each rating;
(b) Determine the final assignment of staff, certificated or
classified, according to board enumerated classroom and program needs
and data, based upon a plan to ensure that the assignment policy: (i)
Supports the learning needs of all the students in the district; and
(ii) gives specific attention to high-need schools and classrooms;
(c) Provide information to the local community and its electorate
describing the school district's policies concerning hiring, assigning,
terminating, and evaluating staff, including the criteria for
evaluating teachers and principals;
(d) Determine the amount of instructional hours necessary for any
student to acquire a quality education in such district, in not less
than an amount otherwise required in RCW 28A.150.220, or rules of the
state board of education;
(((d))) (e) Determine the allocation of staff time, whether
certificated or classified;
(((e))) (f) Establish final curriculum standards consistent with
law and rules of the superintendent of public instruction, relevant to
the particular needs of district students or the unusual
characteristics of the district, and ensuring a quality education for
each student in the district; and
(((f))) (g) Evaluate teaching materials, including text books,
teaching aids, handouts, or other printed material, in public hearing
upon complaint by parents, guardians or custodians of students who
consider dissemination of such material to students objectionable.

Sec. 102 RCW 28A.405.100 and 1997 c 278 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
superintendent of public instruction shall establish and may amend from
time to time minimum criteria for the evaluation of the professional
performance capabilities and development of certificated classroom
teachers and certificated support personnel. For classroom teachers
the criteria shall be developed in the following categories:
Instructional skill; classroom management, professional preparation and
scholarship; effort toward improvement when needed; the handling of
student discipline and attendant problems; and interest in teaching
pupils and knowledge of subject matter.
(b) Every board of directors shall, in accordance with procedure
provided in RCW 41.59.010 through 41.59.170, 41.59.910 and 41.59.920,
establish evaluative criteria and procedures for all certificated
classroom teachers and certificated support personnel. The evaluative
criteria must contain as a minimum the criteria established by the
superintendent of public instruction pursuant to this section and must
be prepared within six months following adoption of the superintendent
of public instruction's minimum criteria. The district must certify to
the superintendent of public instruction that evaluative criteria have
been so prepared by the district.
(2)(a) Pursuant to the implementation schedule and procedure
established in subsection (7)(b) of this section, every board of
directors shall adopt revised evaluative criteria and a four-level
rating system for all certificated classroom teachers.
(b) The minimum criteria shall include: (i) Centering instruction
on high expectations for student achievement; (ii) demonstrating
effective teaching practices; (iii) recognizing individual student
learning needs and developing strategies to address those needs; (iv)
providing clear and intentional focus on subject matter content and
curriculum; (v) fostering and managing a safe, positive learning
environment; (vi) using multiple student data elements to modify
instruction and improve student learning; (vii) communicating and
collaborating with parents and the school community; and (viii)
exhibiting collaborative and collegial practices focused on improving
instructional practice and student learning.
(c) The four-level rating system used to evaluate the certificated
classroom teacher must describe performance along a continuum that
indicates the extent to which the criteria have been met or exceeded.
When student growth data, if available and appropriate, is referenced
in the evaluation process it must be based on multiple measures that
can include classroom-based, school-based, district-based, and state-based tools. As used in this subsection, "student growth" means the
change in student achievement between two points in time.
(3)(a) Except as provided in subsection (((5))) (10) of this
section, it shall be the responsibility of a principal or his or her
designee to evaluate all certificated personnel in his or her school.
During each school year all classroom teachers and certificated support
personnel((, hereinafter referred to as "employees" in this section,))
shall be observed for the purposes of evaluation at least twice in the
performance of their assigned duties. Total observation time for each
employee for each school year shall be not less than sixty minutes. An
employee in the third year of provisional status as defined in RCW
28A.405.220 shall be observed at least three times in the performance
of his or her duties and the total observation time for the school year
shall not be less than ninety minutes. Following each observation, or
series of observations, the principal or other evaluator shall promptly
document the results of the observation in writing, and shall provide
the employee with a copy thereof within three days after such report is
prepared. New employees shall be observed at least once for a total
observation time of thirty minutes during the first ninety calendar
days of their employment period.
(b) As used in this subsection and subsection (4) of this section,
"employees" means classroom teachers and certificated support
personnel.
(4)(a) At any time after October 15th, an employee whose work is
not judged ((unsatisfactory)) satisfactory based on district evaluation
criteria shall be notified in writing of the specific areas of
deficiencies along with a reasonable program for improvement. During
the period of probation, the employee may not be transferred from the
supervision of the original evaluator. Improvement of performance or
probable cause for nonrenewal must occur and be documented by the
original evaluator before any consideration of a request for transfer
or reassignment as contemplated by either the individual or the school
district. A probationary period of sixty school days shall be
established. The establishment of a probationary period does not
adversely affect the contract status of an employee within the meaning
of RCW 28A.405.300. The purpose of the probationary period is to give
the employee opportunity to demonstrate improvements in his or her
areas of deficiency. The establishment of the probationary period and
the giving of the notice to the employee of deficiency shall be by the
school district superintendent and need not be submitted to the board
of directors for approval. During the probationary period the
evaluator shall meet with the employee at least twice monthly to
supervise and make a written evaluation of the progress, if any, made
by the employee. The evaluator may authorize one additional
certificated employee to evaluate the probationer and to aid the
employee in improving his or her areas of deficiency; such additional
certificated employee shall be immune from any civil liability that
might otherwise be incurred or imposed with regard to the good faith
performance of such evaluation. The probationer may be removed from
probation if he or she has demonstrated improvement to the satisfaction
of the principal in those areas specifically detailed in his or her
initial notice of deficiency and subsequently detailed in his or her
improvement program. Lack of necessary improvement during the
established probationary period, as specifically documented in writing
with notification to the probationer and shall constitute grounds for
a finding of probable cause under RCW 28A.405.300 or 28A.405.210.
(b) Immediately following the completion of a probationary period
that does not produce performance changes detailed in the initial
notice of deficiencies and improvement program, the employee may be
removed from his or her assignment and placed into an alternative
assignment for the remainder of the school year. This reassignment may
not displace another employee nor may it adversely affect the
probationary employee's compensation or benefits for the remainder of
the employee's contract year. If such reassignment is not possible,
the district may, at its option, place the employee on paid leave for
the balance of the contract term.
(((2))) (5) Every board of directors shall establish evaluative
criteria and procedures for all superintendents, principals, and other
administrators. It shall be the responsibility of the district
superintendent or his or her designee to evaluate all administrators.
Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, such evaluation
shall be based on the administrative position job description. Such
criteria, when applicable, shall include at least the following
categories: Knowledge of, experience in, and training in recognizing
good professional performance, capabilities and development; school
administration and management; school finance; professional preparation
and scholarship; effort toward improvement when needed; interest in
pupils, employees, patrons and subjects taught in school; leadership;
and ability and performance of evaluation of school personnel.
(((3))) (6)(a) Pursuant to the implementation schedule and
procedure established by subsection (7)(b) of this section, every board
of directors shall adopt revised evaluative criteria and a four-level
rating system for principals.
(b) The minimum criteria shall include: (i) Creating a school
culture that promotes the ongoing improvement of learning and teaching
for students and staff; (ii) providing for school safety; (iii) leading
the development, implementation, and evaluation of a data-driven plan
for increasing student achievement, including the use of multiple
student data elements; (iv) assisting instructional staff with
alignment of curriculum, instruction, and assessment with state and
local district learning goals; (v) monitoring, assisting, and
evaluating effective instruction and assessment practices; (vi)
managing both staff and fiscal resources to support student achievement
and legal responsibilities; and (vii) partnering with the school
community to promote student learning.
(c) The four-level rating system used to evaluate the principal
must describe performance along a continuum that indicates the extent
to which the criteria have been met or exceeded. When student growth
data, if available and appropriate, is referenced in the evaluation
process it must be based on multiple measures that can include
classroom-based, school-based, district-based, and state-based tools.
As used in this subsection, "student growth" means the change in
student achievement between two points in time.
(7)(a) The superintendent of public instruction, in collaboration
with state professional associations representing teachers, principals,
and administrators, shall create common statewide models for the
evaluation system criteria and the four-level rating systems described
under subsections (2) and (6) of this section. Models for student
growth tools, professional development programs, and evaluator training
for certificated classroom teachers and principals shall be developed.
Human resources specialists, professional development experts, and
assessment experts must also be consulted. Due to the diversity of
teaching assignments and the many developmental levels of students,
classroom teachers and principals must be prominently represented in
this work.
(b) A new certificated classroom teacher evaluation system that
implements the provisions of subsection (2) of this section and a new
principal evaluation system that implements the provisions of
subsection (6) of this section shall be phased-in beginning with the
2010-11 school year as follows:
(i) A set of school districts shall be selected by the
superintendent of public instruction to participate in a collaborative
process resulting in the development and piloting of the new evaluation
systems for certificated classroom teachers and principals during the
2010-11 and 2011-12 school years. These school districts must be
selected based on: (A) The agreement of the local associations
representing classroom teachers and principals to collaborate with the
district and with the superintendent of public instruction in this
developmental work; and (B) the agreement of the district and the
associations to participate in the full range of development and
implementation activities, including development of rubrics for the
evaluation criteria and rating systems, identification or development
of appropriate multiple measures of student growth and student
learning, development of evaluation system forms, participation in
professional development for principals and classroom teachers,
participation in evaluator training, and participation in activities to
evaluate the effectiveness of the new systems and support programs.
(ii) Based on the results of the developmental work in 2010-11, the
superintendent of public instruction shall adopt common statewide model
evaluation criteria and four-level rating systems, one set each for
classroom teachers and for principals, for use in 2011-12 by the school
districts under (b)(i) of this subsection. The superintendent may
modify the statewide models based on the experience of these school
districts in the 2011-12 school year. During the 2012-13 school year,
the common statewide model evaluation criteria and four-level rating
systems must be pilot-tested with at least some employees in each
school district in the state.
(iii) Beginning with the 2013-14 school year, each school district
in the state must either:
(A) Implement the common statewide model evaluation criteria and
four-level rating systems for all classroom teachers and principals; or
(B) Submit to the superintendent of public instruction a set of
evaluation criteria and a four-level rating system that meets the
requirements of subsection (2) or (6) of this section as applicable,
but has been modified by the district. Any modifications to the
criteria and rating system for classroom teachers must be made in
accordance with procedures provided in chapter 41.59 RCW. If the
superintendent of public instruction determines that the evaluation
criteria and four-level rating system proposed by the district are
substantially equivalent to or an improvement on the common statewide
models, the district may use the modified criteria and rating system.
Any further modifications must be submitted to the superintendent of
public instruction for review.
(c) The superintendent of public instruction shall report on the
status of the evaluation system development and implementation to the
governor and the education committees of the legislature by July 1,
2011, and at the conclusion of the development phase by July 1, 2012.
(8) Each certificated ((employee)) classroom teacher and
certificated support personnel shall have the opportunity for
confidential conferences with his or her immediate supervisor on no
less than two occasions in each school year. Such confidential
conference shall have as its sole purpose the aiding of the
administrator in his or her assessment of the employee's professional
performance.
(((4))) (9) The failure of any evaluator to evaluate or supervise
or cause the evaluation or supervision of certificated ((employees))
classroom teachers and certificated support personnel or administrators
in accordance with this section, as now or hereafter amended, when it
is his or her specific assigned or delegated responsibility to do so,
shall be sufficient cause for the nonrenewal of any such evaluator's
contract under RCW 28A.405.210, or the discharge of such evaluator
under RCW 28A.405.300.
(((5))) (10) After ((an employee)) a certificated classroom teacher
or certificated support personnel has four years of satisfactory
evaluations under subsection (1) of this section or has received one of
the two top ratings for four years under subsection (2) of this
section, a school district may use a short form of evaluation, a
locally bargained evaluation emphasizing professional growth, an
evaluation under subsection (1) or (2) of this section, or any
combination thereof. The short form of evaluation shall include either
a thirty minute observation during the school year with a written
summary or a final annual written evaluation based on the criteria in
subsection (1) or (2) of this section and based on at least two
observation periods during the school year totaling at least sixty
minutes without a written summary of such observations being prepared.
A locally bargained short-form evaluation emphasizing professional
growth must provide that the professional growth activity conducted by
the certificated classroom teacher be specifically linked to one or
more of the certificated classroom teacher evaluation criteria.
However, the evaluation process set forth in subsection (1) or (2) of
this section shall be followed at least once every three years unless
this time is extended by a local school district under the bargaining
process set forth in chapter 41.59 RCW. The employee or evaluator may
require that the evaluation process set forth in subsection (1) or (2)
of this section be conducted in any given school year. No evaluation
other than the evaluation authorized under subsection (1) or (2) of
this section may be used as a basis for determining that an employee's
work is ((unsatisfactory)) not satisfactory under subsection (1) or (2)
of this section or as probable cause for the nonrenewal of an
employee's contract under RCW 28A.405.210 unless an evaluation process
developed under chapter 41.59 RCW determines otherwise.

Sec. 103 RCW 28A.405.220 and 2009 c 57 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 28A.405.210, every person
employed by a school district in a teaching or other nonsupervisory
certificated position shall be subject to nonrenewal of employment
contract as provided in this section during the first ((two)) three
years of employment by such district, unless: (a) The employee has
previously completed at least two years of certificated employment in
another school district in the state of Washington, in which case the
employee shall be subject to nonrenewal of employment contract pursuant
to this section during the first year of employment with the new
district; or (b) the school district superintendent may make a
determination to remove an employee from provisional status if the
employee has received one of the top two evaluation ratings during the
second year of employment by the district. Employees as defined in
this section shall hereinafter be referred to as "provisional
employees(("))."
(2) In the event the superintendent of the school district
determines that the employment contract of any provisional employee
should not be renewed by the district for the next ensuing term such
provisional employee shall be notified thereof in writing on or before
May 15th preceding the commencement of such school term, or if the
omnibus appropriations act has not passed the legislature by May 15th,
then notification shall be no later than June 15th, which notification
shall state the reason or reasons for such determination. Such notice
shall be served upon the provisional employee personally, or by
certified or registered mail, or by leaving a copy of the notice at the
place of his or her usual abode with some person of suitable age and
discretion then resident therein. The determination of the
superintendent shall be subject to the evaluation requirements of RCW
28A.405.100.
(3) Every such provisional employee so notified, at his or her
request made in writing and filed with the superintendent of the
district within ten days after receiving such notice, shall be given
the opportunity to meet informally with the superintendent for the
purpose of requesting the superintendent to reconsider his or her
decision. Such meeting shall be held no later than ten days following
the receipt of such request, and the provisional employee shall be
given written notice of the date, time and place of meeting at least
three days prior thereto. At such meeting the provisional employee
shall be given the opportunity to refute any facts upon which the
superintendent's determination was based and to make any argument in
support of his or her request for reconsideration.
(4) Within ten days following the meeting with the provisional
employee, the superintendent shall either reinstate the provisional
employee or shall submit to the school district board of directors for
consideration at its next regular meeting a written report recommending
that the employment contract of the provisional employee be nonrenewed
and stating the reason or reasons therefor. A copy of such report
shall be delivered to the provisional employee at least three days
prior to the scheduled meeting of the board of directors. In taking
action upon the recommendation of the superintendent, the board of
directors shall consider any written communication which the
provisional employee may file with the secretary of the board at any
time prior to that meeting.
(5) The board of directors shall notify the provisional employee in
writing of its final decision within ten days following the meeting at
which the superintendent's recommendation was considered. The decision
of the board of directors to nonrenew the contract of a provisional
employee shall be final and not subject to appeal.
(6) This section applies to any person employed by a school
district in a teaching or other nonsupervisory certificated position
after June 25, 1976. This section provides the exclusive means for
nonrenewing the employment contract of a provisional employee and no
other provision of law shall be applicable thereto, including, without
limitation, RCW 28A.405.210 and chapter 28A.645 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 A new section is added to chapter 28A.405
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Representatives of the office of the superintendent of public
instruction and statewide associations representing administrators,
principals, human resources specialists, and certificated classroom
teachers shall analyze how the evaluation systems in RCW 28A.405.100
(2) and (6) affect issues related to a change in contract status.
(2) The analysis shall be conducted during each of the phase-in
years of the certificated classroom teacher and principal evaluation
systems. The analysis shall include: Procedures, timelines,
probationary periods, appeal procedures, and other items related to the
timely exercise of employment decisions and due process provisions for
certificated classroom teachers and principals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 A new section is added to chapter 28A.405
RCW to read as follows:
If funds are provided for professional development activities
designed specifically for first through third-year teachers, the funds
shall be allocated first to districts participating in the evaluation
systems in RCW 28A.405.100 (2) and (6) before the required
implementation date under that section.

PART II
PRINCIPAL PERFORMANCE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 The legislature finds that the presence of
highly effective principals in schools has never been more important
than it is today. To enable students to meet high academic standards,
principals must lead and encourage teams of teachers and support staff
to work together, align curriculum and instruction, use student data to
target instruction and intervention strategies, and serve as the chief
school officer with parents and the community. Greater responsibility
should come with greater authority over personnel, budgets, resource
allocation, and programs. But greater responsibility also comes with
greater accountability for outcomes. Washington is putting into place
an updated and rigorous system of evaluating principal performance, one
that will measure what matters. This system will never be truly
effective unless the results are meaningfully used.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 A new section is added to chapter 28A.405
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Any certificated employee of a school district under this
section who is first employed as a principal after the effective date
of this section shall be subject to transfer as provided under this
section, at the expiration of the term of his or her employment
contract, to any subordinate certificated position within the school
district. "Subordinate certificated position" as used in this section
means any administrative or nonadministrative certificated position for
which the annual compensation is less than the position currently held
by the administrator. This section applies only to school districts
with an annual average student enrollment of more than thirty-five
thousand full-time equivalent students.
(2) During the first three consecutive school years of employment
as a principal by the school district, or during the first full school
year of such employment in the case of a principal who has been
previously employed as a principal by another school district in the
state for three or more consecutive school years, the transfer of the
principal to a subordinate certificated position may be made by a
determination of the superintendent that the best interests of the
school district would be served by the transfer.
(3) Commencing with the fourth consecutive school year of
employment as a principal, or the second consecutive school year of
such employment in the case of a principal who has been previously
employed as a principal by another school district in the state for
three or more consecutive school years, the transfer of the principal
to a subordinate certificated position shall be based on the
superintendent's determination that the results of the evaluation of
the principal's performance using the evaluative criteria and rating
system established under RCW 28A.405.100 provide a valid reason for the
transfer without regard to whether there is probable cause for the
transfer. If a valid reason is shown, it shall be deemed that the
transfer is reasonably related to the principal's performance. No
probationary period is required. However, provision of support and an
attempt at remediation of the performance of the principal, as defined
by the superintendent, are required for a determination by the
superintendent under this subsection that the principal should be
transferred to a subordinate certificated position.
(4) Any superintendent transferring a principal under this section
to a subordinate certificated position shall notify that principal in
writing on or before May 15th before the beginning of the school year
of that determination, or if the omnibus appropriations act has not
passed the legislature by May 15th, then notification shall be no later
than June 15th. The notification shall state the reason or reasons for
the transfer and shall identify the subordinate certificated position
to which the principal will be transferred. The notification shall be
served upon the principal personally, or by certified or registered
mail, or by leaving a copy of the notice at the place of his or her
usual abode with some person of suitable age and discretion then
resident therein.
(5) Any principal so notified may request to the president or chair
of the board of directors of the district, in writing and within ten
days after receiving notice, an opportunity to meet informally with the
board of directors in an executive session for the purpose of
requesting the board to reconsider the decision of the superintendent,
and shall be given such opportunity. The board, upon receipt of such
request, shall schedule the meeting for no later than the next
regularly scheduled meeting of the board, and shall give the principal
written notice at least three days before the meeting of the date,
time, and place of the meeting. At the meeting the principal shall be
given the opportunity to refute any evidence upon which the
determination was based and to make any argument in support of his or
her request for reconsideration. The principal and the board may
invite their respective legal counsel to be present and to participate
at the meeting. The board shall notify the principal in writing of its
final decision within ten days following its meeting with the
principal. No appeal to the courts shall lie from the final decision
of the board of directors to transfer a principal to a subordinate
certificated position.
(6) This section provides the exclusive means for transferring a
certificated employee first employed by a school district under this
section as a principal after the effective date of this section to a
subordinate certificated position at the expiration of the term of his
or her employment contract.

Sec. 203 RCW 28A.405.210 and 2009 c 57 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
No teacher, principal, supervisor, superintendent, or other
certificated employee, holding a position as such with a school
district, hereinafter referred to as "employee", shall be employed
except by written order of a majority of the directors of the district
at a regular or special meeting thereof, nor unless he or she is the
holder of an effective teacher's certificate or other certificate
required by law or the Washington professional educator standards board
for the position for which the employee is employed.
The board shall make with each employee employed by it a written
contract, which shall be in conformity with the laws of this state, and
except as otherwise provided by law, limited to a term of not more than
one year. Every such contract shall be made in duplicate, one copy to
be retained by the school district superintendent or secretary and one
copy to be delivered to the employee. No contract shall be offered by
any board for the employment of any employee who has previously signed
an employment contract for that same term in another school district of
the state of Washington unless such employee shall have been released
from his or her obligations under such previous contract by the board
of directors of the school district to which he or she was obligated.
Any contract signed in violation of this provision shall be void.
In the event it is determined that there is probable cause or
causes that the employment contract of an employee should not be
renewed by the district for the next ensuing term such employee shall
be notified in writing on or before May 15th preceding the commencement
of such term of that determination, or if the omnibus appropriations
act has not passed the legislature by May 15th, then notification shall
be no later than June 15th, which notification shall specify the cause
or causes for nonrenewal of contract. Such determination of probable
cause for certificated employees, other than the superintendent, shall
be made by the superintendent. Such notice shall be served upon the
employee personally, or by certified or registered mail, or by leaving
a copy of the notice at the house of his or her usual abode with some
person of suitable age and discretion then resident therein. Every
such employee so notified, at his or her request made in writing and
filed with the president, chair or secretary of the board of directors
of the district within ten days after receiving such notice, shall be
granted opportunity for hearing pursuant to RCW 28A.405.310 to
determine whether there is sufficient cause or causes for nonrenewal of
contract: PROVIDED, That any employee receiving notice of nonrenewal
of contract due to an enrollment decline or loss of revenue may, in his
or her request for a hearing, stipulate that initiation of the
arrangements for a hearing officer as provided for by RCW
28A.405.310(4) shall occur within ten days following July 15 rather
than the day that the employee submits the request for a hearing. If
any such notification or opportunity for hearing is not timely given,
the employee entitled thereto shall be conclusively presumed to have
been reemployed by the district for the next ensuing term upon
contractual terms identical with those which would have prevailed if
his or her employment had actually been renewed by the board of
directors for such ensuing term.
This section shall not be applicable to "provisional employees" as
so designated in RCW 28A.405.220; transfer to a subordinate
certificated position as that procedure is set forth in RCW 28A.405.230
or section 202 of this act shall not be construed as a nonrenewal of
contract for the purposes of this section.

Sec. 204 RCW 28A.405.230 and 2009 c 57 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any certificated employee of a school district employed as an
assistant superintendent, director, principal, assistant principal,
coordinator, or in any other supervisory or administrative position,
hereinafter in this section referred to as "administrator", shall be
subject to transfer, at the expiration of the term of his or her
employment contract, to any subordinate certificated position within
the school district. "Subordinate certificated position" as used in
this section, shall mean any administrative or nonadministrative
certificated position for which the annual compensation is less than
the position currently held by the administrator.
Every superintendent determining that the best interests of the
school district would be served by transferring any administrator to a
subordinate certificated position shall notify that administrator in
writing on or before May 15th preceding the commencement of such school
term of that determination, or if the omnibus appropriations act has
not passed the legislature by May 15th, then notification shall be no
later than June 15th, which notification shall state the reason or
reasons for the transfer, and shall identify the subordinate
certificated position to which the administrator will be transferred.
Such notice shall be served upon the administrator personally, or by
certified or registered mail, or by leaving a copy of the notice at the
place of his or her usual abode with some person of suitable age and
discretion then resident therein.
Every such administrator so notified, at his or her request made in
writing and filed with the president or chair, or secretary of the
board of directors of the district within ten days after receiving such
notice, shall be given the opportunity to meet informally with the
board of directors in an executive session thereof for the purpose of
requesting the board to reconsider the decision of the superintendent.
Such board, upon receipt of such request, shall schedule the meeting
for no later than the next regularly scheduled meeting of the board,
and shall notify the administrator in writing of the date, time and
place of the meeting at least three days prior thereto. At such
meeting the administrator shall be given the opportunity to refute any
facts upon which the determination was based and to make any argument
in support of his or her request for reconsideration. The
administrator and the board may invite their respective legal counsel
to be present and to participate at the meeting. The board shall
notify the administrator in writing of its final decision within ten
days following its meeting with the administrator. No appeal to the
courts shall lie from the final decision of the board of directors to
transfer an administrator to a subordinate certificated position:
PROVIDED, That in the case of principals such transfer shall be made at
the expiration of the contract year and only during the first three
consecutive school years of employment as a principal by a school
district; except that if any such principal has been previously
employed as a principal by another school district in the state of
Washington for three or more consecutive school years the provisions of
this section shall apply only to the first full school year of such
employment.
This section applies to any person employed as an administrator by
a school district on June 25, 1976, and to all persons so employed at
any time thereafter, except that section 202 of this act applies to
persons first employed after the effective date of this section as a
principal by a school district meeting the criteria of section 202 of
this act. This section provides the exclusive means for transferring
an administrator subject to this section to a subordinate certificated
position at the expiration of the term of his or her employment
contract.

Sec. 205 RCW 28A.405.300 and 1990 c 33 s 395 are each amended to
read as follows:
In the event it is determined that there is probable cause or
causes for a teacher, principal, supervisor, superintendent, or other
certificated employee, holding a position as such with the school
district, hereinafter referred to as "employee", to be discharged or
otherwise adversely affected in his or her contract status, such
employee shall be notified in writing of that decision, which
notification shall specify the probable cause or causes for such
action. Such determinations of probable cause for certificated
employees, other than the superintendent, shall be made by the
superintendent. Such notices shall be served upon that employee
personally, or by certified or registered mail, or by leaving a copy of
the notice at the house of his or her usual abode with some person of
suitable age and discretion then resident therein. Every such employee
so notified, at his or her request made in writing and filed with the
president, chair of the board or secretary of the board of directors of
the district within ten days after receiving such notice, shall be
granted opportunity for a hearing pursuant to RCW 28A.405.310 to
determine whether or not there is sufficient cause or causes for his or
her discharge or other adverse action against his or her contract
status.
In the event any such notice or opportunity for hearing is not
timely given, or in the event cause for discharge or other adverse
action is not established by a preponderance of the evidence at the
hearing, such employee shall not be discharged or otherwise adversely
affected in his or her contract status for the causes stated in the
original notice for the duration of his or her contract.
If such employee does not request a hearing as provided herein,
such employee may be discharged or otherwise adversely affected as
provided in the notice served upon the employee.
Transfer to a subordinate certificated position as that procedure
is set forth in RCW 28A.405.230 or section 202 of this act shall not be
construed as a discharge or other adverse action against contract
status for the purposes of this section.

PART III
ENCOURAGING INNOVATIONS
Sec. 301 RCW 28A.400.200 and 2002 c 353 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every school district board of directors shall fix, alter,
allow, and order paid salaries and compensation for all district
employees in conformance with this section.
(2)(a) Salaries for certificated instructional staff shall not be
less than the salary provided in the appropriations act in the
statewide salary allocation schedule for an employee with a
baccalaureate degree and zero years of service; and
(b) Salaries for certificated instructional staff with a master's
degree shall not be less than the salary provided in the appropriations
act in the statewide salary allocation schedule for an employee with a
master's degree and zero years of service;
(3)(a) The actual average salary paid to certificated instructional
staff shall not exceed the district's average certificated
instructional staff salary used for the state basic education
allocations for that school year as determined pursuant to RCW
28A.150.410.
(b) Fringe benefit contributions for certificated instructional
staff shall be included as salary under (a) of this subsection only to
the extent that the district's actual average benefit contribution
exceeds the amount of the insurance benefits allocation provided per
certificated instructional staff unit in the state operating
appropriations act in effect at the time the compensation is payable.
For purposes of this section, fringe benefits shall not include payment
for unused leave for illness or injury under RCW 28A.400.210; employer
contributions for old age survivors insurance, workers' compensation,
unemployment compensation, and retirement benefits under the Washington
state retirement system; or employer contributions for health benefits
in excess of the insurance benefits allocation provided per
certificated instructional staff unit in the state operating
appropriations act in effect at the time the compensation is payable.
A school district may not use state funds to provide employer
contributions for such excess health benefits.
(c) Salary and benefits for certificated instructional staff in
programs other than basic education shall be consistent with the salary
and benefits paid to certificated instructional staff in the basic
education program.
(4) Salaries and benefits for certificated instructional staff may
exceed the limitations in subsection (3) of this section only by
separate contract for additional time, for additional responsibilities,
((or)) for incentives, or for implementing specific measurable
innovative activities specified by the school district to: (a) Close
one or more achievement gaps or (b) focus on development of science,
technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM) learning opportunities
to include professional development. Supplemental contracts shall not
cause the state to incur any present or future funding obligation.
Supplemental contracts shall be subject to the collective bargaining
provisions of chapter 41.59 RCW and the provisions of RCW 28A.405.240,
shall not exceed one year, and if not renewed shall not constitute
adverse change in accordance with RCW 28A.405.300 through 28A.405.380.
No district may enter into a supplemental contract under this
subsection for the provision of services which are a part of the basic
education program required by Article IX, section 3 of the state
Constitution.
(5) Employee benefit plans offered by any district shall comply
with RCW 28A.400.350 and 28A.400.275 and 28A.400.280.

--- END ---