BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.530.080 and 1999 c 314 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to the authority granted under RCW 28A.530.010, a
school district may contract indebtedness for any purpose specified in
RCW 28A.530.010 (2), (4), and (5) or for the purpose of purchasing any
real or personal property, or property rights, in connection with the
exercise of any powers or duties which it is now or hereafter
authorized to exercise, and issue bonds, notes, or other evidences of
indebtedness therefor without a vote of the qualified electors of the
district, subject to the limitations on indebtedness set forth in RCW
39.36.020(3).
(2) Before issuing nonvoted bonds in excess of two hundred fifty
thousand dollars, a school district shall publish notice of intent to
issue such bonds and shall hold a public hearing on the proposal at any
regular or special meeting of the school board. The notice shall
designate: The date, time, and place of the hearing; the purpose and
amount of the bonds; the type, terms, and conditions of bonds; and the
means identified for repayment. The notice shall also state that any
person may appear and be heard on the issue of issuing such bonds. The
notice shall be published at least once each week for two consecutive
weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the district, or if
there is none, in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or
counties in which such district is a part. The last notice shall be
published no later than seven days immediately before the hearing. At
the conclusion of public comment, the board of directors may proceed to
determine, by resolution, whether to issue such bonds.
(3) The public notice and hearing requirements in subsection (2) of
this section shall not apply to any refinancing or refunding of
outstanding nonvoted or voted bonds.
(4) Such bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness shall be
issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW, and the proceeds
thereof shall be deposited in the capital projects fund, the
transportation vehicle fund, or the general fund, as applicable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies prospectively only.

--- END ---