BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the department of
fish and wildlife issues thousands of hydraulic project approvals each
year at a substantial commitment of government resources for individual
permit review and writing. The legislature recognizes the importance
of the individual approval processes to ensure that hydraulic project
approval decisions provide for the proper protection of fish life.
However, the legislature also recognizes that permitting of certain
routine, low-risk activities can be streamlined by issuing pamphlet
permits that describe specific rules that, if complied with, will
ensure proper protection of fish life and lessen the regulatory burden
on applicants. The legislature also finds that other permit
streamlining measures, such as issuing multiple site permits or general
permits authorizing work within a broad, defined geographic area for
specific applicants will benefit both the applicant and the department
of fish and wildlife, and provide for the protection of fish life.
Furthermore, the legislature finds that the department of fish and
wildlife should establish fees for the hydraulic project approval
program to pay for a portion of the program's administrative,
compliance monitoring, and enforcement costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As an alternative to requiring and issuing individual hydraulic
project approvals under RCW 77.55.021, the department may adopt rules
under which certain hydraulic projects may be conducted without an
individual hydraulic project approval, provided the rules are followed.
The rules must:
(a) Ensure that this alternative hydraulic project approval is only
available for repetitive, low-risk hydraulic projects for which
potential impacts to fish life are well understood and proven
mitigation measures are available that can be incorporated into the
rule;
(b) Describe the time, manner, locations, methods, or other
conditions under which the described activity is approved;
(c) Describe the activity that is exempt from individual hydraulic
project approval, if conducted in compliance with the rules; and
(d) Be published in pamphlets or online, which may provide other
reasonably necessary information or educational materials designed to
aid compliance with the approved time, manner, methods, or other
requirements provided by rule.
(2) Rules adopted under this section may require possession of the
pamphlet at the hydraulic project activity site or while conducting the
activity. The rules may also require possession of proof of payment of
applicable fees authorized by this act and post-activity reporting of
activities conducted under this section. The rules must be enforced
under RCW 77.15.300.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.55.011 and 2009 c 549 s 1028 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Bed" means the land below the ordinary high water lines of
state waters. This definition does not include irrigation ditches,
canals, storm water runoff devices, or other artificial watercourses
except where they exist in a natural watercourse that has been altered
artificially.
(2) "Board" means the hydraulic appeals board created in RCW
77.55.301.
(3) "Commission" means the state fish and wildlife commission.
(4) "Department" means the department of fish and wildlife.
(5) "Director" means the director of the department of fish and
wildlife.
(6) "Emergency" means an immediate threat to life, the public,
property, or of environmental degradation.
(7) "Hydraulic project" means the construction or performance of
work that will use, divert, obstruct, or change the natural flow or bed
of any of the salt or freshwaters of the state.
(8) "Imminent danger" means a threat by weather, water flow, or
other natural conditions that is likely to occur within sixty days of
a request for a permit application.
(9) "Marina" means a public or private facility providing boat
moorage space, fuel, or commercial services. Commercial services
include but are not limited to overnight or live-aboard boating
accommodations.
(10) "Marine terminal" means a public or private commercial wharf
located in the navigable water of the state and used, or intended to be
used, as a port or facility for the storing, handling, transferring, or
transporting of goods to and from vessels.
(11) "Ordinary high water line" means the mark on the shores of all
water that will be found by examining the bed and banks and
ascertaining where the presence and action of waters are so common and
usual, and so long continued in ordinary years as to mark upon the soil
or vegetation a character distinct from the abutting upland. Provided,
that in any area where the ordinary high water line cannot be found,
the ordinary high water line adjoining saltwater is the line of mean
higher high water and the ordinary high water line adjoining fresh
water is the elevation of the mean annual flood.
(12) "Permit" means a hydraulic project approval permit issued
under this chapter.
(13) "Sandbars" includes, but is not limited to, sand, gravel,
rock, silt, and sediments.
(14) "Small scale prospecting and mining" means the use of only the
following methods: Pans; nonmotorized sluice boxes; concentrators; and
minirocker boxes for the discovery and recovery of minerals.
(15) "Spartina," "purple loosestrife," and "aquatic noxious weeds"
have the same meanings as defined in RCW 17.26.020.
(16) "Streambank stabilization" means those projects that prevent
or limit erosion, slippage, and mass wasting. These projects include,
but are not limited to, bank resloping, log and debris relocation or
removal, planting of woody vegetation, bank protection using rock or
woody material or placement of jetties or groins, gravel removal, or
erosion control.
(17) "Tide gate" means a one-way check valve that prevents the
backflow of tidal water.
(18) "Waters of the state" and "state waters" means all salt and
fresh waters waterward of the ordinary high water line and within the
territorial boundary of the state.
(19) "Application submittal fee" means the fee that accompanies an
application for hydraulic project approval submitted under RCW
77.55.021 for the initial application intake, entry into the
department's database, determination of application completeness, and
assessment of appropriate permit processing fees. For projects in the
low category, this fee also serves as the permit processing fee.
(20) "Emergency permit" means a verbal hydraulic project approval
or the written follow-up to the verbal approval issued under RCW
77.55.021(15).
(21) "Expedited permit" means a hydraulic project approval issued
under RCW 77.55.021 (14) or (15).
(22) "General permit" means a hydraulic project approval issued
under RCW 77.55.021 for multiple routine hydraulic projects occurring
over a wide geographic area but for which specific project sites have
not been designated.
(23) "Pamphlet permit" means a hydraulic project approval that
contains the rules under which routine, low-risk hydraulic projects may
be conducted. Pamphlet permits are issued in printed or online
pamphlet format under RCW 77.55.081, 77.55.091, or section 2 of this
act.
(24) "Permit modification" means a hydraulic project approval
issued under RCW 77.55.021 that extends, renews, or changes the
conditions of a previously issued hydraulic project approval, provided
the design, size, and scope of the previously approved project remain
unchanged.
(25) "Permit processing fee" means the fee for evaluating the
impacts of, and resultant mitigation for proposed hydraulic projects,
and for processing applications under RCW 77.55.021.
(26) "Single-site permit" means a hydraulic project approval issued
under RCW 77.55.021 for a single hydraulic project location.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.55.021 and 2008 c 272 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 77.55.031, ((77.55.051, and))
77.55.041, and 77.55.051, in the event that any person or government
agency desires to undertake a hydraulic project, the person or
government agency shall, before commencing work thereon, secure the
approval of the department in the form of a permit as to the adequacy
of the means proposed for the protection of fish life.
(2) A complete written application for a permit ((may)) must be
submitted ((in person or by registered mail)) to the department and
must contain the following:
(a) General plans for the overall project;
(b) Complete plans and specifications of the proposed construction
or work within the mean higher high water line in saltwater or within
the ordinary high water line in freshwater;
(c) Complete plans and specifications for the proper protection of
fish life; ((and))
(d) Notice of compliance with any applicable requirements of the
state environmental policy act, unless otherwise provided for in this
chapter; and
(e) Payment of all applicable application submittal and permit
processing fees charged by the department under section 6 of this act.
(3) The department may accept complete, written applications as
provided in this section for permits for hydraulic projects with
multiple sites or within broad geographic areas.
(4) With the exception of emergency oral permits as provided in
subsection (11) of this section, applications for permits must be
submitted to the department's headquarters office. Requests for
emergency oral permits as provided in subsection (11) of this section
may be made to the permitting biologist assigned to the location in
which the emergency occurs, to the department's regional office in
which the emergency occurs, or to the department's headquarters office.
(5) Except as provided in subsections (11) and (13) of this
section, the department may not proceed with permit review until the
fees set out in section 6 of this act are paid.
(6)(a) Protection of fish life is the only ground upon which
approval of a permit may be denied or conditioned. Approval of a
permit may not be unreasonably withheld or unreasonably conditioned.
Except as provided in this subsection and subsections (((8), (10),
and)) (12) (14), and (15) of this section, the department has forty-five calendar days upon receipt of a complete application to grant or
deny approval of a permit. The forty-five day requirement is suspended
if:
(i) After ten working days of receipt of the complete application,
the applicant remains unavailable or unable to arrange for a timely
field evaluation of the proposed project;
(ii) The site is physically inaccessible for inspection;
(iii) The applicant requests a delay; or
(iv) The department is issuing a permit for a storm water discharge
and is complying with the requirements of RCW 77.55.161(3)(b).
(b) Immediately upon determination that the forty-five day period
is suspended, the department shall notify the applicant in writing of
the reasons for the delay.
(c) The period of forty-five calendar days may be extended if the
permit is part of a multiagency permit streamlining effort and all
participating permitting agencies and the permit applicant agree to an
extended timeline longer than forty-five calendar days.
(((4))) (7) If the department denies approval of a permit, the
department shall provide the applicant a written statement of the
specific reasons why and how the proposed project would adversely
affect fish life. Only the issuance, denial, conditioning, or
modification of a permit shall be appealable to the department or the
board as specified in RCW 77.55.301 within thirty days of the notice of
decision.
(((5))) (8)(a) The permittee must demonstrate substantial progress
on construction of that portion of the project relating to the permit
within two years of the date of issuance.
(b) Approval of a permit is valid for a period of up to five years
from the date of issuance, except as provided in (c) of this subsection
and in RCW 77.55.151.
(c) A permit remains in effect without need for periodic renewal
for hydraulic projects that divert water for agricultural irrigation or
stock watering purposes and that involve seasonal construction or other
work. A permit for streambank stabilization projects to protect farm
and agricultural land as defined in RCW 84.34.020 remains in effect
without need for periodic renewal if the problem causing the need for
the streambank stabilization occurs on an annual or more frequent
basis. The permittee must notify the appropriate agency before
commencing the construction or other work within the area covered by
the permit.
(((6))) (9) The department may, after consultation with the
permittee, modify a permit due to changed conditions. The modification
becomes effective unless appealed to the department or the board as
specified in RCW 77.55.301 within thirty days from the notice of the
proposed modification. For hydraulic projects that divert water for
agricultural irrigation or stock watering purposes, or when the
hydraulic project or other work is associated with streambank
stabilization to protect farm and agricultural land as defined in RCW
84.34.020, the burden is on the department to show that changed
conditions warrant the modification in order to protect fish life. The
department may not charge fees under section 6 of this act if the
modification is not requested by the permittee.
(((7))) (10) A permittee may request modification of a permit due
to changed conditions. The request must include payment of the permit
modification fee charged by the department under section 6 of this act.
The request must be processed ((within forty-five calendar days of
receipt of the written request)) according to subsections (4), (5), and
(6) of this section. A decision by the department may be appealed to
the board within thirty days of the notice of the decision. For
hydraulic projects that divert water for agricultural irrigation or
stock watering purposes, or when the hydraulic project or other work is
associated with streambank stabilization to protect farm and
agricultural land as defined in RCW 84.34.020, the burden is on the
permittee to show that changed conditions warrant the requested
modification and that such a modification will not impair fish life.
(((8))) (11)(a) The department, the county legislative authority,
or the governor may declare and continue an emergency. If the county
legislative authority declares an emergency under this subsection, it
shall immediately notify the department. A declared state of emergency
by the governor under RCW 43.06.010 shall constitute a declaration
under this subsection.
(b) The department, through its authorized representatives, shall
issue immediately, upon request, oral approval for a stream crossing,
or work to remove any obstructions, repair existing structures, restore
streambanks, protect fish life, or protect property threatened by the
stream or a change in the stream flow without the necessity of
obtaining a written permit prior to commencing work. Conditions of the
emergency oral permit must be established by the department and reduced
to writing within thirty days and complied with as provided for in this
chapter.
(c) The department may not require the provisions of the state
environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, to be met as a condition
of issuing a permit under this subsection.
(((9))) (d) The department shall charge permittees applicable
application submittal and permit processing fees after an emergency
permit is issued under this subsection. The department may not require
payment of permit fees prior to the issuance of emergency permits.
(12) All state and local agencies with authority under this chapter
to issue permits or other authorizations in connection with emergency
water withdrawals and facilities authorized under RCW 43.83B.410 shall
expedite the processing of such permits or authorizations in keeping
with the emergency nature of such requests and shall provide a decision
to the applicant within fifteen calendar days of the date of
application.
(((10))) (13)(a) The department or the county legislative authority
may determine an imminent danger exists. The county legislative
authority shall notify the department, in writing, if it determines
that an imminent danger exists. In cases of imminent danger, the
department shall issue an expedited written permit, upon request, for
work to remove any obstructions, repair existing structures, restore
banks, protect fish resources, or protect property. Expedited permit
requests require a complete written application as provided in
subsection (2) of this section and must be issued within fifteen
calendar days of the receipt of a complete written application.
Approval of an expedited permit is valid for up to sixty days from the
date of issuance. The department may not require the provisions of the
state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, to be met, or the
payment of a permit processing fee, as a condition of issuing a permit
under this subsection.
(((11))) (b) The department shall charge permittees applicable
permit processing fees after an expedited permit is issued under this
subsection.
(14)(a) For any property, except for property located on a marine
shoreline, that has experienced at least two consecutive years of
flooding or erosion that has damaged or has threatened to damage a
major structure, water supply system, septic system, or access to any
road or highway, the county legislative authority may determine that a
chronic danger exists. The county legislative authority shall notify
the department, in writing, when it determines that a chronic danger
exists. In cases of chronic danger, the department shall issue a
permit, upon request, for work necessary to abate the chronic danger by
removing any obstructions, repairing existing structures, restoring
banks, restoring road or highway access, protecting fish resources, or
protecting property. Permit requests must be made and processed in
accordance with subsections (2) ((and)), (3), and (4) of this section.
(b) Any projects proposed to address a chronic danger identified
under (a) of this subsection that satisfies the project description
identified in RCW 77.55.181(1)(a)(ii) are not subject to the provisions
of the state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW. However,
the project is subject to the review process established in RCW
77.55.181(3) as if it were a fish habitat improvement project.
(((12))) (15)(a) The department may issue an expedited written
permit in those instances where normal permit processing would result
in significant hardship for the applicant or unacceptable damage to the
environment. Expedited permit requests require a complete written
application as provided in subsection (2) of this section and must be
issued within fifteen calendar days of the receipt of a complete
written application. Approval of an expedited permit is valid for up
to sixty days from the date of issuance. The department may not
require the provisions of the state environmental policy act, chapter
43.21C RCW, to be met, or the payment of a permit processing fee, as a
condition of issuing a permit under this subsection.
(b) The department shall charge permittees applicable permit
processing fees after an expedited permit is issued under this
subsection.

Sec. 5 RCW 77.15.300 and 2000 c 107 s 239 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawfully undertaking hydraulic project
activities if the person:
(a)(i) Constructs any form of hydraulic project or performs other
work on a hydraulic project; and((:
(a))) (ii) Fails to have a hydraulic project approval required
under chapter 77.55 RCW for such construction or work; or
(b) Violates any requirements or conditions of the hydraulic
project approval for such construction or work; or
(c) Violates any rule adopted under RCW 77.55.021, 77.55.081,
77.55.091, or section 2 of this act that identifies the time, manner,
locations, methods, or other conditions under which an activity is
approved or not approved.
(2) Unlawfully undertaking hydraulic project activities is a gross
misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Between July 1, 2010, and June 30, 2012, the department will
charge fees for permits issued under RCW 77.55.021 to recover a portion
of the existing costs for processing and issuing decisions on permit
applications, for the new costs of administering fee collections, and
for costs related to compliance monitoring and enforcement of projects
requiring a permit. The fees are based on the scale and complexity of
the project and the relative effort required for department staff to
review the application, conduct site visits and consult with applicants
as necessary, and issue or deny the permit.
(2) The department will charge the following fees:

Permit Category Fee Notes

Pamphlet permit. $100 User must renew fee every five years.

Application submittal, required for
low, medium, and high complexity
permits, and general permits. $250 Covers the processing costs and the
processing costs for a low complexity,
single-site permit.

Permit processing fee for low
complexity, single-site permit. Not applicable: Processing fee is
included in application submittal fee. Total low complexity, single-site
permit cost of $250.

Permit processing fee for medium
complexity, single-site permit. $275 Total medium complexity, single-site
permit cost of $525 ($250 + $275).

Permit processing fee for high
complexity, single-site high permit. $1,200 Total high complexity, single-site
permit cost of $1,450 ($250 +
$1,200).

Permit processing fee for additional
sites consolidated into a single permit. Twenty percent of the total low,
medium, or high complexity category
fee for each additional site. Example: A medium permit with
three sites would cost $735 ($525 +
$105+ $105).

Permit processing fee for general
permit. $5,250

Permit modification. $150

(3) In cases where hydraulic projects include work that falls into
more than one of the permit categories outlined in subsection (2) of
this section, the fee charged will be based on the most complex
component of the project.
(4) By July 1, 2012, the department, in collaboration with
interested and affected parties, will establish by rule a fee schedule
that sets forth the fee criteria and amount for the various categories
of permits.
(a) The fee criteria must be based on the scale and complexity of
the project and the relative effort required for department staff to
review the application, conduct site visits, consult with applicants,
and issue or deny the permit. The criteria may also include
consideration of the capital cost of the project.
(b) The fee criteria and amounts may consider a workload analysis
conducted by the department.
(c) The department may adjust the fee schedule no more often than
once every two years.
(5) Revenues generated by these fees must be deposited in the
hydraulic project approval account established in section 7 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The hydraulic project approval account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from application submittal fees and permit
processing fees for hydraulic project approval applications in section
6 of this act must be deposited into the account.
(2) Expenditures from the hydraulic project approval account may be
used only to fund department activities relating to processing and
issuing hydraulic project approval decisions, compliance monitoring,
enforcement activities related to permits issued under RCW 77.55.021,
conducting or participating in administrative or judicial appeals of
hydraulic project approval decisions, and for the associated management
and administrative costs incurred to implement and operate the program.
(3) Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through
43.79.282, moneys in the hydraulic project approval account may be
spent only after appropriation.

Sec. 8 RCW 77.55.291 and 2005 c 146 s 701 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The department may levy civil penalties of up to one hundred
dollars per day ((for violation of any provisions of RCW 77.55.021))
when a person:
(i) Constructs any form of hydraulic project or performs other work
on a hydraulic project and fails to have a hydraulic project approval
required under this chapter for such construction or work;
(ii) Violates any requirements or conditions of the hydraulic
project approval for the construction or work;
(iii) Fails to pay applicable application submittal or permit
processing fees within thirty days of receipt of expedited permits or
the written follow-up to emergency oral approvals under RCW 77.55.021;
or
(iv) Violates any rule adopted under RCW 77.55.021, 77.55.081,
77.55.091, or section 2 of this act that identifies the time, manner,
locations, methods, or other conditions under which an activity is
approved or not approved.
(b) The penalty provided shall be imposed by notice in writing,
either by certified mail or personal service to the person incurring
the penalty, from the director or the director's designee describing
the violation.
(2) Any person incurring any penalty under this chapter may appeal
the same under chapter 34.05 RCW to the director. Appeals shall be
filed within thirty days of receipt of notice imposing any penalty.
(3) The penalty imposed shall become due and payable thirty days
after receipt of a notice imposing the penalty unless an appeal is
filed. Whenever an appeal of any penalty incurred under this chapter
is filed, the penalty shall become due and payable only upon completion
of all review proceedings and the issuance of a final order confirming
the penalty in whole or in part.
(4) If the amount of any penalty is not paid within thirty days
after it becomes due and payable, the attorney general, upon the
request of the director, shall bring an action in the name of the state
of Washington in the superior court of Thurston county or of any county
in which such violator may do business, to recover such penalty. In
all such actions the procedure and rules of evidence shall be the same
as an ordinary civil action. All penalties recovered under this
section shall be paid into the state's general fund.

Sec. 9 RCW 77.55.081 and 2005 c 146 s 401 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By June 30, 1997, the department shall develop rules for
projects conducted solely for the removal or control of various aquatic
noxious weeds other than spartina and purple loosestrife and for
activities or hydraulic projects for controlling purple loosestrife not
covered by RCW 77.55.051(2). Following the adoption of the rules, the
department shall produce and distribute a pamphlet describing the
methods of removing or controlling the aquatic noxious weeds that are
approved under the rules. The pamphlet serves as the permit for any
project that is conducted solely for the removal or control of such
aquatic noxious weeds and that is conducted as described in the
pamphlet. No further permit is required for such a project.
(2) From time to time as information becomes available, the
department shall adopt similar rules for additional aquatic noxious
weeds or additional activities for removing or controlling aquatic
noxious weeds not governed by RCW 77.55.051 (1) and (2) and shall
produce and distribute one or more pamphlets describing these methods
of removal or control. Such a pamphlet serves as the permit for any
project that is conducted solely for the removal or control of such
aquatic noxious weeds and that is conducted as described in the
pamphlet. No further permit is required for such a project.
(3) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the department from
requiring a permit for those parts of hydraulic projects that are not
specifically for the control or removal of spartina, purple
loosestrife, or other aquatic noxious weeds.
(4) Permittees conducting activities under authority of pamphlets
issued under this section must possess proof of payment of any
applicable fees required by section 6 of this act.

Sec. 10 RCW 77.55.091 and 2005 c 146 s 402 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Small scale prospecting and mining shall not require a permit
under this chapter if the prospecting is conducted in accordance with
rules established by the department.
(2) By December 31, 1998, the department shall adopt rules
applicable to small scale prospecting and mining activities subject to
this section. The department shall develop the rules in cooperation
with the recreational mining community and other interested parties.
(3) Within two months of adoption of the rules, the department
shall distribute an updated gold and fish pamphlet that describes
methods of mineral prospecting that are consistent with the
department's rule. The pamphlet shall be written to clearly indicate
the prospecting methods that require a permit under this chapter and
the prospecting methods that require compliance with the pamphlet. To
the extent possible, the department shall use the provisions of the
gold and fish pamphlet to minimize the number of specific provisions of
a written permit issued under this chapter.
(4) Permittees conducting activities under authority of pamphlets
issued under this section must possess proof of payment of any
applicable fees required by section 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Section 6 of this act expires July 1, 2012.

--- END ---