BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
ACCOUNTABILITY FRAMEWORK
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 The legislature finds that it is the
state's responsibility to create a coherent and effective
accountability framework for the continuous improvement for all schools
and districts. This system must provide an excellent and equitable
education for all students; an aligned federal/state accountability
system; and the tools necessary for schools and districts to be
accountable. These tools include the necessary accounting and data
reporting systems, assessment systems to monitor student achievement,
and a system of general support, targeted assistance, and if necessary,
intervention.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction is
responsible for developing and implementing the accountability tools to
build district capacity and working within federal and state
guidelines. The legislature assigned the state board of education
responsibility and oversight for creating an accountability framework.
This framework provides a unified system of support for challenged
schools that aligns with basic education, increases the level of
support based upon the magnitude of need, and uses data for decisions.
Such a system will identify schools and their districts for recognition
as well as for additional state support. For a specific group of
challenged schools, defined as persistently lowest-achieving schools,
and their districts, it is necessary to provide a required action
process that creates a partnership between the state and local district
to target funds and assistance to turn around the identified lowest-achieving schools.
Phase I of this accountability system will recognize schools that
have done an exemplary job of raising student achievement and closing
the achievement gaps using the state board of education's
accountability index. Phase I will also target the lowest five percent
of persistently lowest-achieving schools defined under federal
guidelines to provide federal funds and federal intervention models
through a voluntary option in 2010, and for those who do not volunteer
and have not improved student achievement, a required action process
beginning in 2011.
Phase II of this accountability system will work toward
implementing the state board of education's accountability index for
identification of schools in need of improvement, including those that
are not Title I schools, and the use of state and local intervention
models and state funds through a required action process beginning in
2013, in addition to the federal program. Federal approval of the
state board of education's accountability index must be obtained or
else the federal guidelines for persistently lowest-achieving schools
will continue to be used.
The expectation from implementation of this accountability system
is the improvement of student achievement for all students to prepare
them for postsecondary education, work, and global citizenship in the
twenty-first century.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "All students group" means those students in grades three
through eight and high school who take the state's assessment in
reading and mathematics required under 20 U.S.C. Sec. 6311(b)(3).
(2) "Title I" means Title I, part A of the federal elementary and
secondary education act of 1965 (ESEA) (20 U.S.C. Secs. 6311-6322).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 (1) Beginning in 2010, and each year
thereafter, by December 1st, the superintendent of public instruction
shall annually identify schools that are the persistently lowest-achieving schools in the state. A school shall be identified as one of
the state's persistently lowest-achieving schools if the school is a
Title I school, or a school that is eligible for but does not receive
Title I funds, that is among the lowest-achieving five percent of
schools in the state.
(2) The criteria for determining whether a school is among the
persistently lowest-achieving five percent of Title I schools or Title
I eligible schools under subsection (1) of this section shall be
established by the superintendent of public instruction. The criteria
must meet all federal requirements for the receipt of a federal school
improvement grant under the American recovery and reinvestment act of
2009 and Title I of the elementary and secondary act of 1965, and take
into account both:
(a) The academic achievement of the "all students" group in a
school in terms of proficiency on the state's assessment, and any
alternative assessments, in reading and mathematics combined; and
(b) The school's lack of progress on the mathematics and reading
assessments over a number of years in the "all students" group.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 (1) Beginning in January 2011, the
superintendent of public instruction shall annually recommend to the
state board of education school districts for designation as required
action districts. A district with at least one school identified as a
persistently lowest-achieving school shall be designated as a required
action district if it meets the criteria established by the
superintendent. However, a school district shall not be recommended
for designation as a required action district if the district was
awarded a federal school improvement grant by the superintendent in
2010, and for three consecutive years following the receipt of the
grant it implemented a federal school intervention model at each school
identified for improvement. The state board of education may designate
a district that received a school improvement grant in 2010 as a
required action district if after three years of voluntarily
implementing a plan the district continues to have a school identified
as persistently lowest-achieving and meets the criteria for designation
established by the superintendent of public instruction.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall provide a school
district superintendent with written notice of the recommendation for
designation as a required action district by certified mail or personal
service. A school district superintendent may request reconsideration
of the superintendent of public instruction's recommendation. The
reconsideration shall be limited to a determination of whether the
school district met the criteria for being recommended as a required
action district. A request for reconsideration must be in writing and
served on the superintendent of public instruction within ten days of
service of the notice of the superintendent's recommendation.
(3) The state board of education shall annually designate those
districts recommended by the superintendent in subsection (1) of this
section as required action districts. A district designated as a
required action district shall be required to notify all parents of
students attending a school identified as a persistently lowest-achieving school in the district of the state board of education's
designation of the district as a required action district and the
process for complying with the requirements set forth in sections 105
through 110 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 (1) The superintendent of public
instruction shall contract with an external review team to conduct an
academic performance audit of the district and each persistently
lowest-achieving school in a required action district to identify the
potential reasons for the school's low performance and lack of
progress. The review team must consist of persons under contract with
the superintendent who have expertise in comprehensive school and
district reform and may not include staff from the agency, the school
district that is the subject of the audit, or members or staff of the
state board of education.
(2) The audit must be conducted based on criteria developed by the
superintendent of public instruction and must include but not be
limited to an examination of the following:
(a) Student demographics;
(b) Mobility patterns;
(c) School feeder patterns;
(d) The performance of different student groups on assessments;
(e) Effective school leadership;
(f) Strategic allocation of resources;
(g) Clear and shared focus on student learning;
(h) High standards and expectations for all students;
(i) High level of collaboration and communication;
(j) Aligned curriculum, instruction, and assessment to state
standards;
(k) Frequency of monitoring of learning and teaching;
(l) Focused professional development;
(m) Supportive learning environment;
(n) High level of family and community involvement; and
(o) Alternative secondary schools best practices.
(3) Audit findings must be made available to the local school
district, its staff, the community, and the state board of education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 (1) The local school district
superintendent and local school board of a school district designated
as a required action district must submit a required action plan to the
superintendent of public instruction for approval. Unless otherwise
required by subsection (3) of this section, the plan must be submitted
under a schedule as required by the superintendent of public
instruction. A required action plan must be developed in collaboration
with administrators, teachers, and other staff, parents, unions
representing any employees within the district, students, and other
representatives of the local community. The superintendent of public
instruction shall provide a district with assistance in developing its
plan if requested, including providing assistance to ensure the plan is
consistent with federal guidelines. The school board must conduct a
public hearing to allow for comment on a proposed required action plan.
(2) A required action plan must include all of the following:
(a) Implementation of one of the four federal intervention models
required for the receipt of a federal school improvement grant in those
persistently lowest-achieving schools that the district will be
focusing on for required action. However, a district may not establish
a charter school under a federal intervention model without express
legislative authority. The intervention models are the turnaround,
restart, school closure, and transformation models. The intervention
model selected must address the concerns raised in the academic
performance audit and be intended to improve student performance to
allow a school district to be removed from the list of districts
designated as a required action district by the state board of
education within three years of implementation of the plan;
(b) Submission of an application for a federal school improvement
grant to the superintendent of public instruction;
(c) A budget that provides for adequate resources to implement the
federal model selected and any other requirements of the plan;
(d) A description of the changes in the district's or school's
existing policies, structures, agreements, processes, and practices
that are intended to attain significant achievement gains for all
students enrolled in the school;
(e) Identification of the measures that the school district will
use in assessing student achievement at a school identified as a
persistently lowest-achieving school, which include improving
mathematics and reading student achievement and graduation rates as
defined by the office of the superintendent of public instruction that
enable the schools to no longer be identified as a persistently lowest-achieving school.
(3)(a) For any district designated for required action, the parties
to any collective bargaining agreement negotiated, renewed, or extended
under chapter 41.59 or 41.56 RCW after the effective date of this
section must reopen the agreement, or negotiate an addendum, if needed,
to make changes to terms and conditions of employment that are
necessary to implement a required action plan.
(b) If the school district and the employee organizations are
unable to agree on the terms of an addendum or modification to an
existing collective bargaining agreement, the parties, including all
labor organizations affected under the required action plan, shall
request the public employment relations commission to, and the
commission shall, appoint an employee of the commission to act as a
mediator to assist in the resolution of a dispute between the school
district and the employee organizations. Beginning in 2011, and each
year thereafter, mediation shall commence no later than April 15th.
All mediations held under this section shall include the employer and
representatives of all affected bargaining units.
(c) If the executive director of the public employment relations
commission, upon the recommendation of the assigned mediator, finds
that the employer and any affected bargaining unit are unable to reach
agreement following a reasonable period of negotiations and mediation,
but by no later than May 15th of the year in which mediation occurred,
the executive director shall certify any disputed issues for a decision
by the superior court in the county where the school district is
located. The issues for determination by the superior court must be
limited to the issues certified by the executive director.
(d) The process for filing with the court in this subsection (3)(d)
must be used in the case where the executive director certifies issues
for a decision by the superior court.
(i) The school district shall file a petition with the superior
court, by no later than May 20th of the same year in which the issues
were certified, setting forth the following:
(A) The name, address, and telephone number of the school district
and its principal representative;
(B) The name, address, and telephone number of the employee
organizations and their principal representatives;
(C) A description of the bargaining units involved;
(D) A copy of the unresolved issues certified by the executive
director for a final and binding decision by the court; and
(E) The academic performance audit that the office of the
superintendent of public instruction completed for the school district.
(ii) Within seven days after the filing of the petition, each party
shall file with the court the proposal it is asking the court to order
be implemented in a required action plan for the district for each
issue certified by the executive director. Contemporaneously with the
filing of the proposal, a party must file a brief with the court
setting forth the reasons why the court should order implementation of
its proposal in the final plan.
(iii) Following receipt of the proposals and briefs of the parties,
the court must schedule a date and time for a hearing on the petition.
The hearing must be limited to argument of the parties or their counsel
regarding the proposals submitted for the court's consideration. The
parties may waive a hearing by written agreement.
(iv) The court must enter an order selecting the proposal for
inclusion in a required action plan that best responds to the issues
raised in the school district's academic performance audit, and allows
for the award of a federal school improvement grant to the district
from the office of the superintendent of public instruction to
implement one of the four federal intervention models. The court's
decision must be issued no later than June 15th of the year in which
the petition is filed and is final and binding on the parties. However
the court's decision is subject to appeal only in the case where it
does not allow the school district to implement a required action plan
consistent with the requirements for the award of a federal school
improvement grant by the superintendent of public instruction.
(e) Each party shall bear its own costs and attorneys' fees
incurred under this statute.
(f) Any party that proceeds with the process in this section after
knowledge that any provision of this section has not been complied with
and who fails to state its objection in writing is deemed to have
waived its right to object.
(4) All contracts entered into between a school district and an
employee must be consistent with this section and allow school
districts designated as required action districts to implement one of
the four federal models in a required action plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 (1) A required action plan developed by a
district's school board and superintendent must be submitted to the
superintendent of public instruction for approval. The superintendent
of public instruction must accept for inclusion in any required action
plan the final decision by the superior court on any issue certified by
the executive director of the public employment relations commission
under the process in section 106 of this act. The superintendent of
public instruction shall approve a plan proposed by a school district
only if it meets the requirements set forth in section 106 of this act.
Any addendum or modification to an existing collective bargaining
agreement related to student achievement or school improvement and
negotiated under section 106 of this act or by agreement of the
district and the exclusive bargaining representative shall not go into
effect until approval of a required action plan by the superintendent
of public instruction.
(2) If the superintendent of public instruction does not approve a
proposed plan, the superintendent must notify the local school board
and local district's superintendent in writing with an explicit
rationale for why the plan was not approved. Nonapproval by the
superintendent of public instruction of the local school district's
initial required action plan submitted is not intended to trigger any
actions under section 108 of this act. With the assistance of the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, the superintendent
and school board of the required action district shall either: (a)
Submit a new plan to the superintendent of public instruction for
approval within forty days of the notification that the plan was
rejected, or (b) submit a request to the state board of education for
reconsideration of the superintendent's rejection within ten days of
the notification that the plan was rejected. The reconsideration by
the state board of education shall be based on whether the
superintendent of public instruction gave appropriate consideration to
the unique circumstances and characteristics of the local school
district whose plan was rejected. The state board may reaffirm the
decision of the superintendent of public instruction, recommend that
the superintendent reconsider the rejection, or recommend changes to
the plan that should be considered by the district and the
superintendent of public instruction to secure approval of the plan.
The superintendent of public instruction shall consider the
recommendations of the state board of education and issue a decision in
writing to the local school district and the state board of education.
If the school district must submit a new required action plan to the
superintendent of public instruction, the district must submit the plan
within forty days of the superintendent's decision. The state board of
education and superintendent of public instruction must develop
timelines and procedures for their deliberations so that school
districts can implement a required action plan within the time frame
required under this section.
(3) If federal funds are not available, the plan is not required to
be implemented until such funding becomes available. A required action
plan must be implemented in the immediate school year following the
district's designation as a required action district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 The superintendent of public instruction
may require a school district that has not submitted a final required
action plan for approval, or has submitted but not received approval of
a required action plan by the beginning of the school year in which the
plan is intended to be implemented, to redirect the district's Title I
funds based on the academic performance audit findings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 A school district must implement a
required action plan upon approval by the superintendent of public
instruction. The office of superintendent of public instruction must
provide the required action district with technical assistance and
federal school improvement grant funds, if available, to implement its
approved plan. The district must submit a report to the superintendent
of public instruction that provides the progress the district is making
in meeting the student achievement goals based on the state's
assessments, identifying strategies and assets used to solve audit
findings, and establishing evidence of meeting plan implementation
benchmarks, as set forth in the required action plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 (1) The superintendent of public
instruction must provide a report to the state board of education twice
a year regarding the progress made by all school districts designated
as required action districts.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction must recommend to the
state board of education that a school district be released from the
designation as a required action district after the district implements
a required action plan for a period of three years, has made progress
as defined by the superintendent of public instruction in reading and
mathematics on the state's assessment over the past three consecutive
years, and no longer has a school within the district identified as
persistently lowest achieving. The state board shall release a school
district from the designation as a required action district upon
confirmation that the district has met the requirements for a release.
(3) If the state board of education determines that the required
action district has not met the requirements for release, the district
remains in required action and must submit a new or revised plan under
the process set forth in section 106 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 111 The superintendent of public instruction
and the state board of education each have the authority to adopt rules
in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to implement this
chapter.

Sec. 112 RCW 28A.305.225 and 2009 c 548 s 503 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education shall continue to refine the
development of an accountability framework that creates a unified
system of support for challenged schools, that aligns with basic
education, increases the level of support based upon the magnitude of
need, and uses data for decisions.
(2) The state board of education shall develop an accountability
index to identify schools and districts for recognition, for continuous
improvement, and for additional state support. The index shall be
based on criteria that are fair, consistent, and transparent.
Performance shall be measured using multiple outcomes and indicators
including, but not limited to, graduation rates and results from
statewide assessments. The index shall be developed in such a way as
to be easily understood by both employees within the schools and
districts, as well as parents and community members. It is the
legislature's intent that the index provide feedback to schools and
districts to self-assess their progress, and enable the identification
of schools with exemplary student performance and those that need
assistance to overcome challenges in order to achieve exemplary student
performance. ((Once the accountability index has identified schools
that need additional help, a more thorough analysis will be done to
analyze specific conditions in the district including but not limited
to the level of state resources a school or school district receives in
support of the basic education system, achievement gaps for different
groups of students, and community support.
(3) Based on the accountability index and in consultation with the
superintendent of public instruction, the state board of education
shall develop a proposal and timeline for implementation of a
comprehensive system of voluntary support and assistance for schools
and districts. The timeline must take into account and accommodate
capacity limitations of the K-12 educational system. Changes that have
a fiscal impact on school districts, as identified by a fiscal analysis
prepared by the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
shall take effect only if formally authorized by the legislature
through the omnibus appropriations act or other enacted legislation.
(4)(a) The state board of education shall develop a proposal and
implementation timeline for a more formalized comprehensive system
improvement targeted to challenged schools and districts that have not
demonstrated sufficient improvement through the voluntary system. The
timeline must take into account and accommodate capacity limitations of
the K-12 educational system. The proposal and timeline shall be
submitted to the education committees of the legislature by December 1,
2009, and shall include recommended legislation and recommended
resources to implement the system according to the timeline developed.
(b) The proposal shall outline a process for addressing performance
challenges that will include the following features: (i) An academic
performance audit using peer review teams of educators that considers
school and community factors in addition to other factors in developing
recommended specific corrective actions that should be undertaken to
improve student learning; (ii) a requirement for the local school board
plan to develop and be responsible for implementation of corrective
action plan taking into account the audit findings, which plan must be
approved by the state board of education at which time the plan becomes
binding upon the school district to implement; and (iii) monitoring of
local district progress by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction. The proposal shall take effect only if formally
authorized by the legislature through the omnibus appropriations act or
other enacted legislation.
(5))) (3) The state board of education, in cooperation with the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall annually
recognize schools for exemplary performance as measured on the state
board of education accountability index.
(4) In coordination with the superintendent of public instruction,
the state board of education shall seek approval from the United States
department of education for use of the accountability index and the
state system of support, assistance, and intervention, to replace the
federal accountability system under P.L. 107-110, the no child left
behind act of 2001.
(((6))) (5) The state board of education shall work with the
education data center established within the office of financial
management and the technical working group established in section 112,
chapter 548, Laws of 2009 to determine the feasibility of using the
prototypical funding allocation model as not only a tool for allocating
resources to schools and districts but also as a tool for schools and
districts to report to the state legislature and the state board of
education on how the state resources received are being used.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 113 (1) The legislature finds that a unified
and equitable system of education accountability must include
expectations and benchmarks for improvement, along with support for
schools and districts to make the necessary changes that will lead to
success for all students. Such a system must also clearly address the
consequences for persistent lack of improvement. Establishing a
process for school districts to prepare and implement a required action
plan is one such consequence. However, to be truly accountable to
students, parents, the community, and taxpayers, the legislature must
also consider what should happen if a required action district
continues not to make improvement after an extended period of time.
Without an answer to this significant question, the state's system of
education accountability is incomplete. Furthermore, accountability
must be appropriately shared among various levels of decision makers,
including in the building, in the district, and at the state.
(2)(a) A joint select committee on education accountability is
established with the following members:
(i) The president of the senate shall appoint two members from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate.
(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint two
members from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives.
(b) The committee shall choose its cochairs from among its
membership.
(3) The committee shall:
(a) Identify and analyze options for a complete system of education
accountability, particularly consequences in the case of persistent
lack of improvement by a required action district;
(b) Identify and analyze appropriate decision-making
responsibilities and accompanying consequences at the building,
district, and state level within such an accountability system;
(c) Examine models and experiences in other states;
(d) Identify the circumstances under which significant state action
may be required; and
(e) Analyze the financial, legal, and practical considerations that
would accompany significant state action.
(4) Staff support for the committee must be provided by the senate
committee services and the house of representatives office of program
research.
(5) The committee shall submit an interim report to the education
committees of the legislature by September 1, 2011, and a final report
with recommendations by September 1, 2012.
(6) This section expires June 30, 2013.

PART II
COMMON CORE STANDARDS ADOPTION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By August 2, 2010, the superintendent of public instruction may
revise the state essential academic learning requirements authorized
under RCW 28A.655.070 for mathematics, reading, writing, and
communication by provisionally adopting a common set of standards for
students in grades kindergarten through twelve. The revised state
essential academic learning requirements shall be substantially
identical with the standards developed by a multistate consortium in
which Washington participated, be consistent with the requirements of
RCW 28A.655.070, and may include additional standards if the additional
standards do not exceed fifteen percent of the standards for each
content area. However, the superintendent of public instruction shall
not take steps to implement the provisionally adopted standards until
the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate
have an opportunity to review the standards.
(2) By January 1, 2011, the superintendent of public instruction
shall submit to the education committees of the house of
representatives and the senate:
(a) A detailed comparison of the provisionally adopted standards
and the state essential academic learning requirements as of the
effective date of this section, including the comparative level of
rigor and specificity of the standards and the implications of any
identified differences; and
(b) An estimated timeline and costs to the state and to school
districts to implement the provisionally adopted standards, including
providing necessary training, realignment of curriculum, adjustment of
state assessments, and other actions.
(3) The superintendent may implement the revisions to the essential
academic learning requirements under this section after the 2011
legislative session unless otherwise directed by the legislature.

PART III
ACCOUNTABILITY TO PARENTS AND COMMUNITY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
Beginning with the 2010-11 school year, each school shall conduct
outreach and seek feedback from a broad and diverse range of parents,
other individuals, and organizations in the community regarding their
experiences with the school. The school shall summarize the responses
in its annual report under RCW 28A.655.110.

Sec. 302 RCW 28A.655.110 and 1999 c 388 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 1994-95 school year, to provide the local
community and electorate with access to information on the educational
programs in the schools in the district, each school shall publish
annually a school performance report and deliver the report to each
parent with children enrolled in the school and make the report
available to the community served by the school. The annual
performance report shall be in a form that can be easily understood and
be used by parents, guardians, and other members of the community who
are not professional educators to make informed educational decisions.
As data from the assessments in RCW 28A.655.060 becomes available, the
annual performance report should enable parents, educators, and school
board members to determine whether students in the district's schools
are attaining mastery of the student learning goals under RCW
28A.150.210, and other important facts about the schools' performance
in assisting students to learn. The annual report shall make
comparisons to a school's performance in preceding years ((and shall
include school level goals under RCW 28A.655.050)), student performance
relative to the goals and the percentage of students performing at each
level of the assessment, a comparison of student performance at each
level of the assessment to the previous year's performance, and
information regarding school-level plans to achieve the goals.
(2) The annual performance report shall include, but not be limited
to: (a) A brief statement of the mission of the school and the school
district; (b) enrollment statistics including student demographics; (c)
expenditures per pupil for the school year; (d) a summary of student
scores on all mandated tests; (e) a concise annual budget report; (f)
student attendance, graduation, and dropout rates; (g) information
regarding the use and condition of the school building or buildings;
(h) a brief description of the learning improvement plans for the
school; (i) a summary of the feedback from parents and community
members obtained under section 301 of this act; and (((i))) (j) an
invitation to all parents and citizens to participate in school
activities.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop by June
30, 1994, and update periodically, a model report form, which shall
also be adapted for computers, that schools may use to meet the
requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this section. In order to
make school performance reports broadly accessible to the public, the
superintendent of public instruction, to the extent feasible, shall
make information on each school's report available on or through the
superintendent's internet web site.

PART IV
TECHNICAL PROVISIONS
Sec. 401 RCW 41.56.100 and 1989 c 45 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A public employer shall have the authority to engage in
collective bargaining with the exclusive bargaining representative and
no public employer shall refuse to engage in collective bargaining with
the exclusive bargaining representative((: PROVIDED, That nothing
contained herein shall require any public employer)). However, a
public employer is not required to bargain collectively with any
bargaining representative concerning any matter which by ordinance,
resolution or charter of said public employer has been delegated to any
civil service commission or personnel board similar in scope, structure
and authority to the board created by chapter 41.06 RCW.
(2) Upon the failure of the public employer and the exclusive
bargaining representative to conclude a collective bargaining
agreement, any matter in dispute may be submitted by either party to
the commission. This subsection does not apply to negotiations and
mediations conducted between a school district employer and an
exclusive bargaining representative under section 106 of this act. If
a public employer implements its last and best offer where there is no
contract settlement, allegations that either party is violating the
terms of the implemented offer shall be subject to grievance
arbitration procedures if and as such procedures are set forth in the
implemented offer, or, if not in the implemented offer, if and as such
procedures are set forth in the parties' last contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 A new section is added to chapter 41.56
RCW to read as follows:
All collective bargaining agreements entered into after the
effective date of this section between a school district employer and
school district employees under this chapter, as well as bargaining
agreements existing on the effective date of this section but renewed
or extended after the effective date of this section, shall be
consistent with section 106 of this act.

Sec. 403 RCW 41.59.120 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 288 s 13 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Either an employer or an exclusive bargaining representative
may declare that an impasse has been reached between them in collective
bargaining and may request the commission to appoint a mediator for the
purpose of assisting them in reconciling their differences and
resolving the controversy on terms which are mutually acceptable. If
the commission determines that its assistance is needed, not later than
five days after the receipt of a request therefor, it shall appoint a
mediator in accordance with rules and regulations for such appointment
prescribed by the commission. The mediator shall meet with the parties
or their representatives, or both, forthwith, either jointly or
separately, and shall take such other steps as he may deem appropriate
in order to persuade the parties to resolve their differences and
effect a mutually acceptable agreement. The mediator, without the
consent of both parties, shall not make findings of fact or recommend
terms of settlement. The services of the mediator, including, if any,
per diem expenses, shall be provided by the commission without cost to
the parties. Nothing in this subsection (1) shall be construed to
prevent the parties from mutually agreeing upon their own mediation
procedure, and in the event of such agreement, the commission shall not
appoint its own mediator unless failure to do so would be inconsistent
with the effectuation of the purposes and policy of this chapter.
(2) If the mediator is unable to effect settlement of the
controversy within ten days after his or her appointment, either party,
by written notification to the other, may request that their
differences be submitted to fact-finding with recommendations, except
that the time for mediation may be extended by mutual agreement between
the parties. Within five days after receipt of the aforesaid written
request for fact-finding, the parties shall select a person to serve as
fact finder and obtain a commitment from that person to serve. If they
are unable to agree upon a fact finder or to obtain such a commitment
within that time, either party may request the commission to designate
a fact finder. The commission, within five days after receipt of such
request, shall designate a fact finder in accordance with rules and
regulations for such designation prescribed by the commission. The
fact finder so designated shall not be the same person who was
appointed mediator pursuant to subsection (1) of this section without
the consent of both parties.
The fact finder, within five days after his appointment, shall meet
with the parties or their representatives, or both, either jointly or
separately, and make inquiries and investigations, hold hearings, and
take such other steps as he may deem appropriate. For the purpose of
such hearings, investigations and inquiries, the fact finder shall have
the power to issue subpoenas requiring the attendance and testimony of
witnesses and the production of evidence. If the dispute is not
settled within ten days after his appointment, the fact finder shall
make findings of fact and recommend terms of settlement within thirty
days after his appointment, which recommendations shall be advisory
only.
(3) Such recommendations, together with the findings of fact, shall
be submitted in writing to the parties and the commission privately
before they are made public. Either the commission, the fact finder,
the employer, or the exclusive bargaining representative may make such
findings and recommendations public if the dispute is not settled
within five days after their receipt from the fact finder.
(4) The costs for the services of the fact finder, including, if
any, per diem expenses and actual and necessary travel and subsistence
expenses, and any other incurred costs, shall be borne by the
commission without cost to the parties.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an
employer and an exclusive bargaining representative from agreeing to
substitute, at their own expense, their own procedure for resolving
impasses in collective bargaining for that provided in this section or
from agreeing to utilize for the purposes of this section any other
governmental or other agency or person in lieu of the commission.
(6) Any fact finder designated by an employer and an exclusive
representative or the commission for the purposes of this section shall
be deemed an agent of the state.
(7) This section does not apply to negotiations and mediations
conducted under section 106 of this act.

Sec. 404 RCW 41.59.910 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 288 s 19 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) This chapter shall supersede existing statutes not expressly
repealed to the extent that there is a conflict between a provision of
this chapter and those other statutes. Except as otherwise expressly
provided herein, nothing in this chapter shall be construed to annul,
modify or preclude the renewal or continuation of any lawful agreement
entered into prior to January 1, 1976 between an employer and an
employee organization covering wages, hours, and terms and conditions
of employment. Where there is a conflict between any collective
bargaining agreement and any resolution, rule, policy or regulation of
the employer or its agents, the terms of the collective bargaining
agreement shall prevail.
(2) All collective bargaining agreements entered into after the
effective date of this section between an employer and educational
employees under this chapter, as well as bargaining agreements existing
on the effective date of this section but renewed or extended after the
effective date of this section, shall be consistent with section 106 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 405 Sections 101 through 111 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 28A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 406 RCW 28A.305.225 is recodified as a section
in the chapter created in section 405 of this act.

--- END ---