BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The department of early learning shall
develop recommendations for the legislature for the implementation of
a continuing license under chapter 43.215 RCW. The recommendations
shall be developed with input from licensed providers and include the
following:
(a) A description of tasks and resources necessary to streamline
administrative paperwork used for license renewal and focus the
department's licensing resources toward timely on-site inspections,
investigation of complaints, and other enforcement activities;
(b) An appropriate schedule for on-site inspections to adequately
monitor compliance with licensing standards;
(c) A method for licensors to access the complete history of a
licensed facility, including but not limited to results of previous
monitoring inspections, and any complaints or compliance agreements,
when conducting on-site inspections;
(d) A strategy for assuring all required background checks are
completed on schedule and that documentation of the results of those
checks is correctly filed and accessible to licensors; and
(e) A process for tracking the timeliness of on-site inspections to
monitor compliance with licensing standards.
(2) The department of early learning also shall develop a plan for
legislative review for the development and evaluation of weighted rules
for child care licensing. The plan shall reflect appropriate use of
any available risk-modeling data being developed by other states, and
shall describe:
(a) Resources and tasks necessary for collecting and analyzing data
from pertinent sources in order to establish an evidence-based
framework for risk modeling and conduct a comorbidity analysis;
(b) Options, including funding needed, for acquiring the technology
necessary to develop and periodically evaluate the effectiveness and
appropriateness of weighted rules;
(c) Preliminary estimates of administrative and operational
efficiencies that could be achieved from one or more licensing
technology solutions;
(d) Appropriate processes for the inclusion of the child care
community, including parents and providers, in the development and use
of weighted rules; and
(e) Training and communication strategies necessary to safely shift
the entire licensed child care system, including family home, center-based, and after-school providers, to a weighted rule system.
(3) The department of early learning shall submit to the
appropriate committees of the legislature a report with recommendations
required in subsection (1) of this section by December 1, 2010, and a
report with the plan required under subsection (2) of this section by
February 1, 2011.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.215.260 and 2006 c 265 s 307 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each agency shall make application for a license or renewal of
license to the department on forms prescribed by the department. Upon
receipt of such application, the department shall either grant or deny
a license within ninety days. A license shall be granted if the agency
meets the minimum requirements set forth in this chapter and the
departmental requirements consistent with ((the [this])) this chapter,
except that an initial license may be issued as provided in RCW
43.215.280. Licenses provided for in this chapter shall be issued for
a period of three years. The licensee, however, shall advise the
director of any material change in circumstances which might constitute
grounds for reclassification of license as to category. The license
issued under this chapter is not transferable and applies only to the
licensee and the location stated in the application. For licensed
family day care homes having an acceptable history of child care, the
license may remain in effect for two weeks after a move.
(2) Upon receiving a request for renewal of a license, the
department may use its findings from the most recent on-site monitoring
inspection of the licensed facility and incorporate those findings into
the renewal process in order to streamline the license renewal
paperwork and eliminate redundancies between on-site monitoring and
license renewal.

--- END ---