BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.68.020 and 2009 c 564 s 1802 and 2009 c 564 s 918
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
There is created an account in the custody of the state treasurer
to be known as the judicial information system account. The
administrative office of the courts shall maintain and administer the
account, in which shall be deposited all moneys received from in-state
noncourt users and any out-of-state users of the judicial information
system ((and moneys as specified in RCW 2.68.040)) for the purposes of
providing judicial information system access to noncourt users and
providing an adequate level of automated services to the judiciary.
The legislature shall appropriate the funds in the account for the
purposes of the judicial information system. The account shall be used
for the acquisition of equipment, software, supplies, services, and
other costs incidental to the acquisition, development, operation, and
administration of information services, telecommunications, systems,
software, supplies, and equipment, including the payment of principal
and interest on items paid in installments. During the 2007-2009
fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the judicial
information system account to the state general fund such amounts as
reflect the excess fund balance of the account. During the 2009-2011
fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the judicial
information system account to the state general fund such amounts as
reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 2 RCW 2.68.040 and 1994 c 8 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) To support the ((judicial information system)) access to
justice account provided for in ((RCW 2.68.020)) section 3 of this act,
the supreme court may provide by rule for an increase in fines,
penalties, and assessments, and the increased amount shall be forwarded
to the state treasurer for deposit in the account:
(a) Pursuant to the authority of RCW 46.63.110(((2))) (3), the sum
of ten dollars to any penalty collected by a court pursuant to supreme
court infraction rules for courts of limited jurisdiction;
(b) Pursuant to RCW 3.62.060, a mandatory appearance cost in the
initial sum of ten dollars to be assessed on all defendants; and
(c) Pursuant to RCW 46.63.110(((5)))(6), a ten-dollar assessment
for each account for which a person requests a time payment schedule.
(2) Notwithstanding a provision of law or rule to the contrary, the
assessments provided for in this section may not be waived or suspended
and shall be immediately due and payable upon forfeiture, conviction,
deferral of prosecution, or request for time payment, as each shall
occur.
(3) The supreme court is requested to adjust these assessments for
inflation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 2.68 RCW
to read as follows:
The access to justice account is created in the state treasury.
All receipts from the assessment provided in RCW 2.68.040 must be
deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only to
fund the office of public defense and the office of civil legal aid.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.84.092 and 2009 c 479 s 31, 2009 c 472 s 5, and
2009 c 451 s 8 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate
share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily
balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search
and rescue account, the budget stabilization account, the capitol
building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia
river basin water supply development account, the common school
construction fund, the county arterial preservation account, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of licensing services
account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the
developmental disabilities community trust account, the drinking water
assistance account, the drinking water assistance administrative
account, the drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern
Washington University capital projects account, the education
construction fund, the education legacy trust account, the election
account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account,
the access to justice account, the essential rail assistance account,
The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the federal
forest revolving account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the freight
congestion relief account, the freight mobility investment account, the
freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective
fund, the public health services account, the health system capacity
account, the personal health services account, the high capacity
transportation account, the state higher education construction
account, the higher education construction account, the highway bond
retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety
account, the high occupancy toll lanes operations account, the
industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement
account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial
retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account,
the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax
account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
multimodal transportation account, the municipal criminal justice
assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization
account, the natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land
account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual
surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement
system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan
revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health
supplemental account, the public transportation systems account, the
public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction
account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puyallup tribal
settlement account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the
recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program
account, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust
account, the rural Washington loan fund, the site closure account, the
small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C
account, the special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance
account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state
investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled
trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state route
number 520 corridor account, the supplemental pension account, the
Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system
plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and
plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco
settlement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account),
the transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the
transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement
board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure
account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain
injury account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of
Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building
account, the urban arterial trust account, the volunteer firefighters'
and reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer
firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington
fruit express account, the Washington judicial retirement system
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3
account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the
Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the
normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the
scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All
earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4) shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund
pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

--- END ---