BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.171 and 2008 c 231 s 28 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A term of confinement ordered in a sentence pursuant to this
chapter shall be tolled by any period of time during which the offender
has absented himself or herself from confinement without the prior
approval of the entity in whose custody the offender has been placed.
A term of partial confinement shall be tolled during any period of time
spent in total confinement pursuant to a new conviction ((or pursuant
to sanctions for violation of sentence conditions on a separate felony
conviction)).
(2) Any term of community custody shall be tolled by any period of
time during which the offender has absented himself or herself from
supervision without prior approval of the entity under whose
supervision the offender has been placed.
(3) Any period of community custody shall be tolled during any
period of time the offender is in confinement for any reason((.
However, if an)), unless the offender is detained pursuant to RCW
9.94A.740 or 9.94A.631 ((and is later found not to have violated a
condition or requirement of community custody, time spent in
confinement due to such detention shall not toll the period of
community custody)) on or after July 1, 2010, for the period of time
prior to the hearing or for confinement pursuant to sanctions imposed
for violation of sentence conditions, in which case, the period of
community custody shall not toll. However, sanctions that result in
the imposition of the remaining sentence or the original sentence will
continue to toll the period of community custody. In addition,
inpatient treatment ordered by the court in lieu of jail time shall not
toll the period of community custody.
(4) For terms of confinement or community custody, the date for the
tolling of the sentence shall be established by the entity responsible
for the confinement or supervision.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "tolling" means the period of
time in which community custody or confinement time is paused and for
which the offender does not receive credit towards the term ordered.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act takes effect July 1,
2010.

--- END ---