BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.030 and 2009 c 375 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the indeterminate sentence review board created
under chapter 9.95 RCW.
(2) "Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit," or
"collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department,
means that the department, either directly or through a collection
agreement authorized by RCW 9.94A.760, is responsible for monitoring
and enforcing the offender's sentence with regard to the legal
financial obligation, receiving payment thereof from the offender, and,
consistent with current law, delivering daily the entire payment to the
superior court clerk without depositing it in a departmental account.
(3) "Commission" means the sentencing guidelines commission.
(4) "Community corrections officer" means an employee of the
department who is responsible for carrying out specific duties in
supervision of sentenced offenders and monitoring of sentence
conditions.
(5) "Community custody" means that portion of an offender's
sentence of confinement in lieu of earned release time or imposed as
part of a sentence under this chapter and served in the community
subject to controls placed on the offender's movement and activities by
the department.
(6) "Community protection zone" means the area within eight hundred
eighty feet of the facilities and grounds of a public or private
school.
(7) "Community restitution" means compulsory service, without
compensation, performed for the benefit of the community by the
offender.
(8) "Confinement" means total or partial confinement.
(9) "Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant to Title
10 or 13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of guilty, and
acceptance of a plea of guilty.
(10) "Crime-related prohibition" means an order of a court
prohibiting conduct that directly relates to the circumstances of the
crime for which the offender has been convicted, and shall not be
construed to mean orders directing an offender affirmatively to
participate in rehabilitative programs or to otherwise perform
affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts necessary to monitor
compliance with the order of a court may be required by the department.
(11) "Criminal history" means the list of a defendant's prior
convictions and juvenile adjudications, whether in this state, in
federal court, or elsewhere.
(a) The history shall include, where known, for each conviction (i)
whether the defendant has been placed on probation and the length and
terms thereof; and (ii) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and
the length of incarceration.
(b) A conviction may be removed from a defendant's criminal history
only if it is vacated pursuant to RCW 9.96.060, 9.94A.640, 9.95.240, or
a similar out-of-state statute, or if the conviction has been vacated
pursuant to a governor's pardon.
(c) The determination of a defendant's criminal history is distinct
from the determination of an offender score. A prior conviction that
was not included in an offender score calculated pursuant to a former
version of the sentencing reform act remains part of the defendant's
criminal history.
(12) "Criminal street gang" means any ongoing organization,
association, or group of three or more persons, whether formal or
informal, having a common name or common identifying sign or symbol,
having as one of its primary activities the commission of criminal
acts, and whose members or associates individually or collectively
engage in or have engaged in a pattern of criminal street gang
activity. This definition does not apply to employees engaged in
concerted activities for their mutual aid and protection, or to the
activities of labor and bona fide nonprofit organizations or their
members or agents.
(13) "Criminal street gang associate or member" means any person
who actively participates in any criminal street gang and who
intentionally promotes, furthers, or assists in any criminal act by the
criminal street gang.
(14) "Criminal street gang-related offense" means any felony or
misdemeanor offense, whether in this state or elsewhere, that is
committed for the benefit of, at the direction of, or in association
with any criminal street gang, or is committed with the intent to
promote, further, or assist in any criminal conduct by the gang, or is
committed for one or more of the following reasons:
(a) To gain admission, prestige, or promotion within the gang;
(b) To increase or maintain the gang's size, membership, prestige,
dominance, or control in any geographical area;
(c) To exact revenge or retribution for the gang or any member of
the gang;
(d) To obstruct justice, or intimidate or eliminate any witness
against the gang or any member of the gang;
(e) To directly or indirectly cause any benefit, aggrandizement,
gain, profit, or other advantage for the gang, its reputation,
influence, or membership; or
(f) To provide the gang with any advantage in, or any control or
dominance over any criminal market sector, including, but not limited
to, manufacturing, delivering, or selling any controlled substance
(chapter 69.50 RCW); arson (chapter 9A.48 RCW); trafficking in stolen
property (chapter 9A.82 RCW); promoting prostitution (chapter 9A.88
RCW); human trafficking (RCW 9A.40.100); or promoting pornography
(chapter 9.68 RCW).
(15) "Day fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing court that
equals the difference between the offender's net daily income and the
reasonable obligations that the offender has for the support of the
offender and any dependents.
(16) "Day reporting" means a program of enhanced supervision
designed to monitor the offender's daily activities and compliance with
sentence conditions, and in which the offender is required to report
daily to a specific location designated by the department or the
sentencing court.
(17) "Department" means the department of corrections.
(18) "Determinate sentence" means a sentence that states with
exactitude the number of actual years, months, or days of total
confinement, of partial confinement, of community custody, the number
of actual hours or days of community restitution work, or dollars or
terms of a legal financial obligation. The fact that an offender
through earned release can reduce the actual period of confinement
shall not affect the classification of the sentence as a determinate
sentence.
(19) "Disposable earnings" means that part of the earnings of an
offender remaining after the deduction from those earnings of any
amount required by law to be withheld. For the purposes of this
definition, "earnings" means compensation paid or payable for personal
services, whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonuses, or
otherwise, and, notwithstanding any other provision of law making the
payments exempt from garnishment, attachment, or other process to
satisfy a court-ordered legal financial obligation, specifically
includes periodic payments pursuant to pension or retirement programs,
or insurance policies of any type, but does not include payments made
under Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020 and 50.40.050,
or Title 74 RCW.
(20) "Drug offender sentencing alternative" is a sentencing option
available to persons convicted of a felony offense other than a violent
offense or a sex offense and who are eligible for the option under RCW
9.94A.660.
(21) "Drug offense" means:
(a) Any felony violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of
a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.4013) or forged prescription for a
controlled substance (RCW 69.50.403);
(b) Any offense defined as a felony under federal law that relates
to the possession, manufacture, distribution, or transportation of a
controlled substance; or
(c) Any out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws
of this state would be a felony classified as a drug offense under (a)
of this subsection.
(22) "Earned release" means earned release from confinement as
provided in RCW 9.94A.728.
(23) "Escape" means:
(a) Sexually violent predator escape (RCW 9A.76.115), escape in the
first degree (RCW 9A.76.110), escape in the second degree (RCW
9A.76.120), willful failure to return from furlough (RCW 72.66.060),
willful failure to return from work release (RCW 72.65.070), or willful
failure to be available for supervision by the department while in
community custody (RCW 72.09.310); or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as an escape
under (a) of this subsection.
(24) "Felony traffic offense" means:
(a) Vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW
46.61.522), eluding a police officer (RCW 46.61.024), felony hit-and-run injury-accident (RCW 46.52.020(4)), felony driving while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502(6)), or
felony physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504(6)); or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a felony
traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.
(25) "Fine" means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing
court to be paid by the offender to the court over a specific period of
time.
(26) "First-time offender" means any person who has no prior
convictions for a felony and is eligible for the first-time offender
waiver under RCW 9.94A.650.
(27) "Home detention" means a program of partial confinement
available to offenders wherein the offender is confined in a private
residence subject to electronic surveillance.
(28) "Legal financial obligation" means a sum of money that is
ordered by a superior court of the state of Washington for legal
financial obligations which may include restitution to the victim,
statutorily imposed crime victims' compensation fees as assessed
pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, court costs, county or interlocal drug funds,
court-appointed attorneys' fees, and costs of defense, fines, and any
other financial obligation that is assessed to the offender as a result
of a felony conviction. Upon conviction for vehicular assault while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW
46.61.522(1)(b), or vehicular homicide while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a), legal financial
obligations may also include payment to a public agency of the expense
of an emergency response to the incident resulting in the conviction,
subject to RCW 38.52.430.
(29) "Minor child" means a biological or adopted child of the
offender who is under age eighteen at the time of the offender's
current offense.
(30) "Most serious offense" means any of the following felonies or
a felony attempt to commit any of the following felonies:
(a) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or
criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A
felony;
(b) Assault in the second degree;
(c) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(d) Child molestation in the second degree;
(e) Controlled substance homicide;
(f) Extortion in the first degree;
(g) Incest when committed against a child under age fourteen;
(h) Indecent liberties;
(i) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(j) Leading organized crime;
(k) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(l) Manslaughter in the second degree;
(m) Promoting prostitution in the first degree;
(n) Rape in the third degree;
(o) Robbery in the second degree;
(p) Sexual exploitation;
(q) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving of
a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner;
(r) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of
any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of
any vehicle in a reckless manner;
(s) Any other class B felony offense with a finding of sexual
motivation;
(t) Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW
9.94A.825;
(u) Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to December 2,
1993, that is comparable to a most serious offense under this
subsection, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense
that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a
most serious offense under this subsection;
(v)(i) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW
9A.88.100(1) (a), (b), and (c), chapter 260, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess.
as it existed until July 1, 1979, RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c) as
it existed from July 1, 1979, until June 11, 1986, and RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(a), (b), and (d) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988;
(ii) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988,
if: (A) The crime was committed against a child under the age of
fourteen; or (B) the relationship between the victim and perpetrator is
included in the definition of indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through July 27, 1997,
or RCW 9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993,
through July 27, 1997;
(w) Any out-of-state conviction for a felony offense with a finding
of sexual motivation if the minimum sentence imposed was ten years or
more; provided that the out-of-state felony offense must be comparable
to a felony offense under Title 9 or 9A RCW and the out-of-state
definition of sexual motivation must be comparable to the definition of
sexual motivation contained in this section.
(((30))) (31) "Nonviolent offense" means an offense which is not a
violent offense.
(((31))) (32) "Offender" means a person who has committed a felony
established by state law and is eighteen years of age or older or is
less than eighteen years of age but whose case is under superior court
jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030 or has been transferred by the
appropriate juvenile court to a criminal court pursuant to RCW
13.40.110. In addition, for the purpose of community custody
requirements under this chapter, "offender" also means a misdemeanor or
gross misdemeanor probationer convicted of an offense included in RCW
9.94A.501(1) and ordered by a superior court to probation under the
supervision of the department pursuant to RCW 9.92.060, 9.95.204, or
9.95.210. Throughout this chapter, the terms "offender" and
"defendant" are used interchangeably.
(((32))) (33) "Partial confinement" means confinement for no more
than one year in a facility or institution operated or utilized under
contract by the state or any other unit of government, or, if home
detention or work crew has been ordered by the court or home detention
has been ordered by the department as part of the parenting program, in
an approved residence, for a substantial portion of each day with the
balance of the day spent in the community. Partial confinement
includes work release, home detention, work crew, and a combination of
work crew and home detention.
(((33))) (34) "Pattern of criminal street gang activity" means:
(a) The commission, attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation of, or any
prior juvenile adjudication of or adult conviction of, two or more of
the following criminal street gang-related offenses:
(i) Any "serious violent" felony offense as defined in this
section, excluding Homicide by Abuse (RCW 9A.32.055) and Assault of a
Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120);
(ii) Any "violent" offense as defined by this section, excluding
Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130);
(iii) Deliver or Possession with Intent to Deliver a Controlled
Substance (chapter 69.50 RCW);
(iv) Any violation of the firearms and dangerous weapon act
(chapter 9.41 RCW);
(v) Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300);
(vi) Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310);
(vii) Malicious Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080);
(viii) Harassment where a subsequent violation or deadly threat is
made (RCW 9A.46.020(2)(b));
(ix) Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120);
(x) Any felony conviction by a person eighteen years of age or
older with a special finding of involving a juvenile in a felony
offense under RCW 9.94A.833;
(xi) Residential Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025);
(xii) Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030);
(xiii) Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070);
(xiv) Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080);
(xv) Theft of a Motor Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.065);
(xvi) Possession of a Stolen Motor Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.068);
(xvii) Taking a Motor Vehicle Without Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070);
(xviii) Taking a Motor Vehicle Without Permission 2 (RCW
9A.56.075);
(xix) Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120);
(xx) Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130);
(xxi) Intimidating a Witness (RCW 9A.72.110);
(xxii) Tampering with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120);
(xxiii) Reckless Endangerment (RCW 9A.36.050);
(xxiv) Coercion (RCW 9A.36.070);
(xxv) Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020); or
(xxvi) Malicious Mischief 3 (RCW 9A.48.090);
(b) That at least one of the offenses listed in (a) of this
subsection shall have occurred after July 1, 2008;
(c) That the most recent committed offense listed in (a) of this
subsection occurred within three years of a prior offense listed in (a)
of this subsection; and
(d) Of the offenses that were committed in (a) of this subsection,
the offenses occurred on separate occasions or were committed by two or
more persons.
(((34))) (35) "Persistent offender" is an offender who:
(a)(i) Has been convicted in this state of any felony considered a
most serious offense; and
(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (a) of this
subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least two separate
occasions, whether in this state or elsewhere, of felonies that under
the laws of this state would be considered most serious offenses and
would be included in the offender score under RCW 9.94A.525; provided
that of the two or more previous convictions, at least one conviction
must have occurred before the commission of any of the other most
serious offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or
(b)(i) Has been convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape
of a child in the first degree, child molestation in the first degree,
rape in the second degree, rape of a child in the second degree, or
indecent liberties by forcible compulsion; (B) any of the following
offenses with a finding of sexual motivation: Murder in the first
degree, murder in the second degree, homicide by abuse, kidnapping in
the first degree, kidnapping in the second degree, assault in the first
degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the first
degree, assault of a child in the second degree, or burglary in the
first degree; or (C) an attempt to commit any crime listed in this
subsection (((34))) (35)(b)(i); and
(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this
subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least one occasion,
whether in this state or elsewhere, of an offense listed in (b)(i) of
this subsection or any federal or out-of-state offense or offense under
prior Washington law that is comparable to the offenses listed in
(b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for rape of a child in the
first degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection
only when the offender was sixteen years of age or older when the
offender committed the offense. A conviction for rape of a child in
the second degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this
subsection only when the offender was eighteen years of age or older
when the offender committed the offense.
(((35))) (36) "Predatory" means: (a) The perpetrator of the crime
was a stranger to the victim, as defined in this section; (b) the
perpetrator established or promoted a relationship with the victim
prior to the offense and the victimization of the victim was a
significant reason the perpetrator established or promoted the
relationship; or (c) the perpetrator was: (i) A teacher, counselor,
volunteer, or other person in authority in any public or private school
and the victim was a student of the school under his or her authority
or supervision. For purposes of this subsection, "school" does not
include home-based instruction as defined in RCW 28A.225.010; (ii) a
coach, trainer, volunteer, or other person in authority in any
recreational activity and the victim was a participant in the activity
under his or her authority or supervision; or (iii) a pastor, elder,
volunteer, or other person in authority in any church or religious
organization, and the victim was a member or participant of the
organization under his or her authority.
(((36))) (37) "Private school" means a school regulated under
chapter 28A.195 or 28A.205 RCW.
(((37))) (38) "Public school" has the same meaning as in RCW
28A.150.010.
(((38))) (39) "Restitution" means a specific sum of money ordered
by the sentencing court to be paid by the offender to the court over a
specified period of time as payment of damages. The sum may include
both public and private costs.
(((39))) (40) "Risk assessment" means the application of the risk
instrument recommended to the department by the Washington state
institute for public policy as having the highest degree of predictive
accuracy for assessing an offender's risk of reoffense.
(((40))) (41) "Serious traffic offense" means:
(a) Nonfelony driving while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502), nonfelony actual physical control
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.504), reckless driving (RCW 46.61.500), or hit-and-run an
attended vehicle (RCW 46.52.020(5)); or
(b) Any federal, out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for
an offense that under the laws of this state would be classified as a
serious traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.
(((41))) (42) "Serious violent offense" is a subcategory of violent
offense and means:
(a)(i) Murder in the first degree;
(ii) Homicide by abuse;
(iii) Murder in the second degree;
(iv) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(v) Assault in the first degree;
(vi) Kidnapping in the first degree;
(vii) Rape in the first degree;
(viii) Assault of a child in the first degree; or
(ix) An attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to
commit one of these felonies; or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a serious
violent offense under (a) of this subsection.
(((42))) (43) "Sex offense" means:
(a)(i) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW other than
RCW 9A.44.130(12);
(ii) A violation of RCW 9A.64.020;
(iii) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9.68A RCW other than
RCW 9.68A.080; or
(iv) A felony that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt,
criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit such crimes;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a sex
offense in (a) of this subsection;
(c) A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW
9.94A.835 or 13.40.135; or
(d) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a sex
offense under (a) of this subsection.
(((43))) (44) "Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes
for which the defendant committed the crime was for the purpose of his
or her sexual gratification.
(((44))) (45) "Standard sentence range" means the sentencing
court's discretionary range in imposing a nonappealable sentence.
(((45))) (46) "Statutory maximum sentence" means the maximum length
of time for which an offender may be confined as punishment for a crime
as prescribed in chapter 9A.20 RCW, RCW 9.92.010, the statute defining
the crime, or other statute defining the maximum penalty for a crime.
(((46))) (47) "Stranger" means that the victim did not know the
offender twenty-four hours before the offense.
(((47))) (48) "Total confinement" means confinement inside the
physical boundaries of a facility or institution operated or utilized
under contract by the state or any other unit of government for twenty-four hours a day, or pursuant to RCW 72.64.050 and 72.64.060.
(((48))) (49) "Transition training" means written and verbal
instructions and assistance provided by the department to the offender
during the two weeks prior to the offender's successful completion of
the work ethic camp program. The transition training shall include
instructions in the offender's requirements and obligations during the
offender's period of community custody.
(((49))) (50) "Victim" means any person who has sustained
emotional, psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or
property as a direct result of the crime charged.
(((50))) (51) "Violent offense" means:
(a) Any of the following felonies:
(i) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an
attempt to commit a class A felony;
(ii) Criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a
class A felony;
(iii) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(iv) Manslaughter in the second degree;
(v) Indecent liberties if committed by forcible compulsion;
(vi) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(vii) Arson in the second degree;
(viii) Assault in the second degree;
(ix) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(x) Extortion in the first degree;
(xi) Robbery in the second degree;
(xii) Drive-by shooting;
(xiii) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving
of a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a
reckless manner; and
(xiv) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of
any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of
any vehicle in a reckless manner;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a violent
offense in (a) of this subsection; and
(c) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a violent
offense under (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(((51))) (52) "Work crew" means a program of partial confinement
consisting of civic improvement tasks for the benefit of the community
that complies with RCW 9.94A.725.
(((52))) (53) "Work ethic camp" means an alternative incarceration
program as provided in RCW 9.94A.690 designed to reduce recidivism and
lower the cost of corrections by requiring offenders to complete a
comprehensive array of real-world job and vocational experiences,
character-building work ethics training, life management skills
development, substance abuse rehabilitation, counseling, literacy
training, and basic adult education.
(((53))) (54) "Work release" means a program of partial confinement
available to offenders who are employed or engaged as a student in a
regular course of study at school.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An offender is eligible for the parenting sentencing
alternative if:
(a) The high end of the standard sentence range for the current
offense is greater than one year;
(b) The offender has no prior or current convictions for a sex
offense or violent offense;
(c) The offender has not been found by the United States attorney
general to be subject to a deportation detainer or order and does not
become subject to a deportation order during the period of the
sentence;
(d) The offender signs any release of information waivers required
to allow information regarding current or prior child welfare cases to
be shared with the department and the court; and
(e) The offender has physical custody of his or her minor child or
is a legal guardian or custodian with physical custody of a child under
the age of eighteen at the time of the current offense.
(2) To assist the court in making its determination, the court may
order the department to complete either a risk assessment report or a
chemical dependency screening report as provided in RCW 9.94A.500, or
both reports prior to sentencing.
(3) If the court is considering this alternative, the court shall
request that the department contact the children's administration of
the Washington state department of social and health services to
determine if the agency has any open or prior cases of substantiated
referrals of abuse and/or neglect involving the offender or if the
agency is aware of any substantiated cases of abuse and/or neglect with
a tribal child welfare agency involving the offender.
(a) If it is determined the offender has an open case of
substantiated referrals of abuse and/or neglect with the children's
administration or a child welfare agency, the department will provide
the release of information waiver and request that the children's
administration or the tribal child welfare agency provide a report to
the court. The children's administration will provide a report within
seven business days of the request that will include, at the minimum,
the following:
(i) Legal status of the child welfare case;
(ii) Length of time the children's administration has been involved
with the offender;
(iii) Legal status of the case and permanent plan;
(iv) If the child has special needs;
(v) Whether or not the offender has been cooperative with services
ordered by a juvenile court under a child welfare case; and
(vi) If the offender has been convicted of a crime against a child.
(b) If a report is required from a tribal child welfare agency, the
department shall attempt to obtain information that is similar to what
is required for the report provided by the children's administration in
a timely manner.
(c) If it is determined the offender does not have an open case
with the children's administration or with a tribal child welfare
agency but has prior such involvement, the department will obtain
information from the children's administration on the number and type
of past substantiated referrals of abuse and neglect and report that
information to the court. If the children's administration has never
had any substantiated referrals or an open case with the offender, the
department will inform the court.
(4) If the sentencing court determines that the offender is
eligible for a sentencing alternative under this section and that the
sentencing alternative is appropriate and should be imposed, the court
shall waive imposition of a sentence within the standard sentence range
and impose a sentence consisting of twelve months of community custody.
The court shall consider the offender's criminal history when
determining if the alternative is appropriate.
(5) When a court imposes a sentence of community custody under this
section:
(a) The court may impose conditions as provided in RCW 9.94A.703
and may impose other affirmative conditions as the court considers
appropriate.
(b) The department may impose conditions as authorized in RCW
9.94A.704 that may include, but are not limited to:
(i) Parenting classes;
(ii) Chemical dependency treatment;
(iii) Mental health treatment;
(iv) Vocational training;
(v) Offender change programs;
(vi) Life skills classes.
(c) The department shall report to the court if the offender
commits any violations of his or her sentence conditions.
(6) The department shall provide the court with quarterly progress
reports that state the offender's progress in required programming
and/or treatment and other supervision conditions. When an offender
has an open child welfare case, the department will seek to coordinate
services with the children's administration.
(7)(a) The court may bring any offender sentenced under this
section back into court at any time during the period of community
custody on its own initiative to evaluate the offender's progress in
treatment, or to determine if any violations of the conditions of the
sentence have occurred.
(b) If the offender is brought back to court, the court may modify
the conditions of the community custody or impose sanctions under (c)
of this subsection.
(c) The court may order the offender to serve a term of total
confinement within the standard range of the offender's current offense
at any time during the period of community custody, if the offender
violates the conditions or requirements of the sentence or if the
offender is failing to make satisfactory progress in treatment.
(d) An offender ordered to serve a term of total confinement under
(c) of this subsection shall receive credit for any time previously
served in confinement under this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.501 and 2009 c 376 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall supervise every offender convicted of a
misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor offense who is sentenced to probation
in superior court, pursuant to RCW 9.92.060, 9.95.204, or 9.95.210, for
an offense included in (a) and (b) of this subsection. The superior
court shall order probation for:
(a) Offenders convicted of fourth degree assault, violation of a
domestic violence court order pursuant to RCW 10.99.040, 10.99.050,
26.09.300, 26.10.220, 26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070, or 74.34.145,
and who also have a prior conviction for one or more of the following:
(i) A violent offense;
(ii) A sex offense;
(iii) A crime against a person as provided in RCW 9.94A.411;
(iv) Fourth degree assault; or
(v) Violation of a domestic violence court order; and
(b) Offenders convicted of:
(i) Sexual misconduct with a minor second degree;
(ii) Custodial sexual misconduct second degree;
(iii) Communication with a minor for immoral purposes; and
(iv) Failure to register pursuant to RCW 9A.44.130.
(2) Misdemeanor and gross misdemeanor offenders supervised by the
department pursuant to this section shall be placed on community
custody.
(3) The department shall supervise every felony offender sentenced
to community custody whose risk assessment, conducted pursuant to
subsection (6) of this section, classifies the offender as one who is
at a high risk to reoffend.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the
department shall supervise an offender sentenced to community custody
regardless of risk classification if the offender:
(a) Has a current conviction for a sex offense or a serious violent
offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;
(b) Has been identified by the department as a dangerous mentally
ill offender pursuant to RCW 72.09.370;
(c) Has an indeterminate sentence and is subject to parole pursuant
to RCW 9.95.017;
(d) Was sentenced under RCW 9.94A.650, 9.94A.660, section 2 of this
act, or 9.94A.670; or
(e) Is subject to supervision pursuant to RCW 9.94A.745.
(5) The department is not authorized to, and may not, supervise any
offender sentenced to a term of community custody or any probationer
unless the offender or probationer is one for whom supervision is
required under subsection (1), (2), (3), or (4) of this section.
(6) The department shall conduct a risk assessment for every felony
offender sentenced to a term of community custody who may be subject to
supervision under this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.94A.505 and 2009 c 389 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When a person is convicted of a felony, the court shall impose
punishment as provided in this chapter.
(2)(a) The court shall impose a sentence as provided in the
following sections and as applicable in the case:
(i) Unless another term of confinement applies, a sentence within
the standard sentence range established in RCW 9.94A.510 or 9.94A.517;
(ii) RCW 9.94A.701 and 9.94A.702, relating to community custody;
(iii) RCW 9.94A.570, relating to persistent offenders;
(iv) RCW 9.94A.540, relating to mandatory minimum terms;
(v) RCW 9.94A.650, relating to the first-time offender waiver;
(vi) RCW 9.94A.660, relating to the drug offender sentencing
alternative;
(vii) RCW 9.94A.670, relating to the special sex offender
sentencing alternative;
(viii) Section 2 of this act, relating to the parenting sentencing
alternative;
(ix) RCW 9.94A.507, relating to certain sex offenses;
(((ix))) (x) RCW 9.94A.535, relating to exceptional sentences;
(((x))) (xi) RCW 9.94A.589, relating to consecutive and concurrent
sentences;
(((xi))) (xii) RCW 9.94A.603, relating to felony driving while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug and felony
physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug.
(b) If a standard sentence range has not been established for the
offender's crime, the court shall impose a determinate sentence which
may include not more than one year of confinement; community
restitution work; a term of community custody under RCW 9.94A.702 not
to exceed one year; and/or other legal financial obligations. The
court may impose a sentence which provides more than one year of
confinement and a community custody term under RCW 9.94A.701 if the
court finds reasons justifying an exceptional sentence as provided in
RCW 9.94A.535.
(3) If the court imposes a sentence requiring confinement of thirty
days or less, the court may, in its discretion, specify that the
sentence be served on consecutive or intermittent days. A sentence
requiring more than thirty days of confinement shall be served on
consecutive days. Local jail administrators may schedule court-ordered
intermittent sentences as space permits.
(4) If a sentence imposed includes payment of a legal financial
obligation, it shall be imposed as provided in RCW 9.94A.750,
9.94A.753, 9.94A.760, and 43.43.7541.
(5) Except as provided under RCW 9.94A.750(4) and 9.94A.753(4), a
court may not impose a sentence providing for a term of confinement or
community custody that exceeds the statutory maximum for the crime as
provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(6) The sentencing court shall give the offender credit for all
confinement time served before the sentencing if that confinement was
solely in regard to the offense for which the offender is being
sentenced.
(7) The court shall order restitution as provided in RCW 9.94A.750
and 9.94A.753.
(8) As a part of any sentence, the court may impose and enforce
crime-related prohibitions and affirmative conditions as provided in
this chapter.
(9) In any sentence of partial confinement, the court may require
the offender to serve the partial confinement in work release, in a
program of home detention, on work crew, or in a combined program of
work crew and home detention.

Sec. 5 RCW 9.94A.701 and 2009 c 375 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If an offender is sentenced to the custody of the department
for one of the following crimes, the court shall, in addition to the
other terms of the sentence, sentence the offender to community custody
for three years:
(a) A sex offense not sentenced under RCW 9.94A.507;
(b) A serious violent offense; or
(c) A violation of RCW 9A.44.130(11)(a) committed on or after June
7, 2006, when a court sentences the person to a term of confinement of
one year or less.
(2) A court shall, in addition to the other terms of the sentence,
sentence an offender to community custody for eighteen months when the
court sentences the person to the custody of the department for a
violent offense that is not considered a serious violent offense.
(3) A court shall, in addition to the other terms of the sentence,
sentence an offender to community custody for one year when the court
sentences the person to the custody of the department for:
(a) Any crime against persons under RCW 9.94A.411(2);
(b) An offense involving the unlawful possession of a firearm under
RCW 9.41.040, where the offender is a criminal street gang member or
associate; or
(c) A felony offense under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, committed on
or after July 1, 2000.
(4) If an offender is sentenced under the drug offender sentencing
alternative, the court shall impose community custody as provided in
RCW 9.94A.660.
(5) If an offender is sentenced under the special ((sexual [sex]))
sex offender sentencing alternative, the court shall impose community
custody as provided in RCW 9.94A.670.
(6) If an offender is sentenced to a work ethic camp, the court
shall impose community custody as provided in RCW 9.94A.690.
(7) If an offender is sentenced under the parenting sentencing
alternative, the court shall impose a term of community custody as
provided in section 2 of this act.
(8) If a sex offender is sentenced as a nonpersistent offender
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.507, the court shall impose community custody as
provided in that section.
(((8))) (9) The term of community custody specified by this section
shall be reduced by the court whenever an offender's standard range
term of confinement in combination with the term of community custody
exceeds the statutory maximum for the crime as provided in RCW
9A.20.021.

Sec. 6 RCW 9.94A.728 and 2009 c 455 s 2, 2009 c 441 s 1, and 2009
c 399 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
No person serving a sentence imposed pursuant to this chapter and
committed to the custody of the department shall leave the confines of
the correctional facility or be released prior to the expiration of the
sentence except as follows:
(1) An offender may earn early release time as authorized by RCW
9.94A.729;
(2) An offender may leave a correctional facility pursuant to an
authorized furlough or leave of absence. In addition, offenders may
leave a correctional facility when in the custody of a corrections
officer or officers;
(3)(a) The secretary may authorize an extraordinary medical
placement for an offender when all of the following conditions exist:
(i) The offender has a medical condition that is serious and is
expected to require costly care or treatment;
(ii) The offender poses a low risk to the community because he or
she is currently physically incapacitated due to age or the medical
condition or is expected to be so at the time of release; and
(iii) It is expected that granting the extraordinary medical
placement will result in a cost savings to the state.
(b) An offender sentenced to death or to life imprisonment without
the possibility of release or parole is not eligible for an
extraordinary medical placement.
(c) The secretary shall require electronic monitoring for all
offenders in extraordinary medical placement unless the electronic
monitoring equipment interferes with the function of the offender's
medical equipment or results in the loss of funding for the offender's
medical care, in which case, an alternative type of monitoring shall be
utilized. The secretary shall specify who shall provide the monitoring
services and the terms under which the monitoring shall be performed.
(d) The secretary may revoke an extraordinary medical placement
under this subsection at any time.
(e) Persistent offenders are not eligible for extraordinary medical
placement;
(4) The governor, upon recommendation from the clemency and pardons
board, may grant an extraordinary release for reasons of serious health
problems, senility, advanced age, extraordinary meritorious acts, or
other extraordinary circumstances;
(5) No more than the final six months of the offender's term of
confinement may be served in partial confinement designed to aid the
offender in finding work and reestablishing himself or herself in the
community or no more than the final twelve months of the offender's
term of confinement may be served in partial confinement as part of the
parenting plan in subsection (6) of this section. This is in addition
to that period of earned early release time that may be exchanged for
partial confinement pursuant to RCW 9.94A.729(5)(d);
(6) For offenders not sentenced under section 2 of this act, but
otherwise eligible under (a) of this subsection, no more than the final
twelve months of the offender's term of confinement may be served in
partial confinement as home detention as part of the parenting program
developed by the department.
(a) The secretary may transfer an offender from a correctional
facility to home detention in the community if it is determined that
the parenting program is an appropriate placement and when all of the
following conditions exist:
(i) The offender is serving a sentence in which the high end of the
range is greater than one year;
(ii) The offender has no current convictions for a felony that is
a sex offense or a violent offense;
(iii) The offender has not been found by the United States attorney
general to be subject to a deportation detainer or order and does not
become subject to a deportation order during the period of the
sentence;
(iv) The offender signs any release of information waivers required
to allow information regarding current or prior child welfare cases to
be shared with the department and the court;
(v) The offender:
(A) Has physical or legal custody of a minor child;
(B) Has a proven, established, ongoing, and substantial
relationship with his or her minor child that existed prior to the
commission of the current offense; or
(C) Is a legal guardian of a child that was under the age of
eighteen at the time of the current offense; and
(vi) It is determined by the department that such a placement would
be in the best interests of the child.
(b) For those offenders that the department is considering for
partial confinement as part of the parenting program, the department
shall inquire of children's administration and the individual if there
are prior substantiated referrals for abuse or neglect, and if there is
an open case. If there is a current open child welfare case with the
children's administration or a tribal jurisdiction, the department will
seek input from the children's administration or the involved tribal
jurisdiction as to the status of the child welfare case and
recommendations regarding the location of the offender, and services
required of offenders by the department and the court governing the
individual's child welfare case. The department and its officers,
agents, and employees shall not be liable for the acts of offenders
participating in the parenting program unless the department or its
officers, agents, and employees acted with willful and wanton
disregard.
(c) All offenders placed on home detention as part of the parenting
program shall provide an approved residence and living arrangement
prior to transfer to home detention.
(d) While in the community on home detention as part of the
parenting program, the department shall:
(i) Require the offender to be placed on electronic home
monitoring;
(ii) Require the offender to participate in programming and
treatment that the supervising community corrections officer determines
is needed;
(iii) Assign a community corrections officer who will monitor the
offender's compliance with conditions of partial confinement and
programming requirements; and
(iv) If the offender has an open child welfare case with the
children's administration of the Washington state department of social
and health services, collaborate and communicate with the identified
social worker in the provision of services.
(e) The department has the authority to return any offender serving
partial confinement in the parenting program to total confinement if
the offender is not complying with sentence requirements;
(7) The governor may pardon any offender;
(((7))) (8) The department may release an offender from confinement
any time within ten days before a release date calculated under this
section;
(((8))) (9) An offender may leave a correctional facility prior to
completion of his or her sentence if the sentence has been reduced as
provided in RCW 9.94A.870; and
(((9))) (10) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section,
an offender sentenced for a felony crime listed in RCW 9.94A.540 as
subject to a mandatory minimum sentence of total confinement shall not
be released from total confinement before the completion of the listed
mandatory minimum sentence for that felony crime of conviction unless
allowed under RCW 9.94A.540.

Sec. 7 RCW 9.94A.734 and 2007 c 199 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Home detention may not be imposed for offenders convicted of
the following offenses, unless imposed as partial confinement in the
department's parenting plan under RCW 9.94A.728(6):
(a) A violent offense;
(b) Any sex offense;
(c) Any drug offense;
(d) Reckless burning in the first or second degree as defined in
RCW 9A.48.040 or 9A.48.050;
(e) Assault in the third degree as defined in RCW 9A.36.031;
(f) Assault of a child in the third degree;
(g) Unlawful imprisonment as defined in RCW 9A.40.040; or
(h) Harassment as defined in RCW 9A.46.020.
Home detention may be imposed for offenders convicted of possession of
a controlled substance under RCW 69.50.4013 or forged prescription for
a controlled substance under RCW 69.50.403 if the offender fulfills the
participation conditions set forth in this section and is monitored for
drug use by a treatment alternatives to street crime program or a
comparable court or agency-referred program.
(2) Home detention may be imposed for offenders convicted of
burglary in the second degree as defined in RCW 9A.52.030 or
residential burglary conditioned upon the offender:
(a) Successfully completing twenty-one days in a work release
program;
(b) Having no convictions for burglary in the second degree or
residential burglary during the preceding two years and not more than
two prior convictions for burglary or residential burglary;
(c) Having no convictions for a violent felony offense during the
preceding two years and not more than two prior convictions for a
violent felony offense;
(d) Having no prior charges of escape; and
(e) Fulfilling the other conditions of the home detention program.
(3) Home detention may be imposed for offenders convicted of taking
a motor vehicle without permission in the second degree as defined in
RCW 9A.56.075, theft of a motor vehicle as defined under RCW 9A.56.065,
or possession of a stolen motor vehicle as defined under RCW 9A.56.068
conditioned upon the offender:
(a) Having no convictions for taking a motor vehicle without
permission, theft of a motor vehicle or possession of a stolen motor
vehicle during the preceding five years and not more than two prior
convictions for taking a motor vehicle without permission, theft of a
motor vehicle or possession of a stolen motor vehicle;
(b) Having no convictions for a violent felony offense during the
preceding two years and not more than two prior convictions for a
violent felony offense;
(c) Having no prior charges of escape; and
(d) Fulfilling the other conditions of the home detention program.
(4) Participation in a home detention program shall be conditioned
upon:
(a) The offender obtaining or maintaining current employment or
attending a regular course of school study at regularly defined hours,
or the offender performing parental duties to offspring or minors
normally in the custody of the offender;
(b) Abiding by the rules of the home detention program; and
(c) Compliance with court-ordered legal financial obligations. The
home detention program may also be made available to offenders whose
charges and convictions do not otherwise disqualify them if medical or
health-related conditions, concerns or treatment would be better
addressed under the home detention program, or where the health and
welfare of the offender, other inmates, or staff would be jeopardized
by the offender's incarceration. Participation in the home detention
program for medical or health-related reasons is conditioned on the
offender abiding by the rules of the home detention program and
complying with court-ordered restitution.

Sec. 8 RCW 9.94A.190 and 2009 c 28 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A sentence that includes a term or terms of confinement
totaling more than one year shall be served in a facility or
institution operated, or utilized under contract, by the state, or in
home detention pursuant to RCW 9.94A.728(6). Except as provided in
subsection (3) or (5) of this section, a sentence of not more than one
year of confinement shall be served in a facility operated, licensed,
or utilized under contract, by the county, or if home detention or work
crew has been ordered by the court, in the residence of either the
offender or a member of the offender's immediate family.
(2) If a county uses a state partial confinement facility for the
partial confinement of a person sentenced to confinement for not more
than one year, the county shall reimburse the state for the use of the
facility as provided in this subsection. The office of financial
management shall set the rate of reimbursement based upon the average
per diem cost per offender in the facility. The office of financial
management shall determine to what extent, if any, reimbursement shall
be reduced or eliminated because of funds provided by the legislature
to the department for the purpose of covering the cost of county use of
state partial confinement facilities. The office of financial
management shall reestablish reimbursement rates each even-numbered
year.
(3) A person who is sentenced for a felony to a term of not more
than one year, and who is committed or returned to incarceration in a
state facility on another felony conviction, either under the
indeterminate sentencing laws, chapter 9.95 RCW, or under this chapter
shall serve all terms of confinement, including a sentence of not more
than one year, in a facility or institution operated, or utilized under
contract, by the state, consistent with the provisions of RCW
9.94A.589.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a sentence
imposed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.660 which has a standard sentence range
of over one year, regardless of length, shall be served in a facility
or institution operated, or utilized under contract, by the state.
(5) Sentences imposed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.507 shall be served in
a facility or institution operated, or utilized under contract, by the
state.

Sec. 9 RCW 9.94A.6332 and 2009 c 375 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
The procedure for imposing sanctions for violations of sentence
conditions or requirements is as follows:
(1) If the offender was sentenced under the drug offender
sentencing alternative, any sanctions shall be imposed by the
department or the court pursuant to RCW 9.94A.660.
(2) If the offender was sentenced under the special ((sexual
[sex])) sex offender sentencing alternative, any sanctions shall be
imposed by the department or the court pursuant to RCW 9.94A.670.
(3) If the offender was sentenced under the parenting sentencing
alternative, any sanctions shall be imposed by the department or by the
court pursuant to section 2 of this act.
(4) If a sex offender was sentenced pursuant to RCW 9.94A.507, any
sanctions shall be imposed by the board pursuant to RCW 9.95.435.
(((4))) (5) In any other case, if the offender is being supervised
by the department, any sanctions shall be imposed by the department
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.737. If a probationer is being supervised by the
department pursuant to RCW 9.92.060, 9.95.204, or 9.95.210, upon
receipt of a violation hearing report from the department, the court
retains any authority that those statutes provide to respond to a
probationer's violation of conditions.
(((5))) (6) If the offender is not being supervised by the
department, any sanctions shall be imposed by the court pursuant to RCW
9.94A.6333.

Sec. 10 RCW 9.94A.633 and 2009 c 375 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) An offender who violates any condition or requirement of a
sentence may be sanctioned with up to sixty days' confinement for each
violation.
(b) In lieu of confinement, an offender may be sanctioned with work
release, home detention with electronic monitoring, work crew,
community restitution, inpatient treatment, daily reporting, curfew,
educational or counseling sessions, supervision enhanced through
electronic monitoring, or any other sanctions available in the
community.
(2) If an offender was under community custody pursuant to one of
the following statutes, the offender may be sanctioned as follows:
(a) If the offender was transferred to community custody in lieu of
earned early release in accordance with RCW 9.94A.728(2), the offender
may be transferred to a more restrictive confinement status to serve up
to the remaining portion of the sentence, less credit for any period
actually spent in community custody or in detention awaiting
disposition of an alleged violation.
(b) If the offender was sentenced under the drug offender
sentencing alternative set out in RCW 9.94A.660, the offender may be
sanctioned in accordance with that section.
(c) If the offender was sentenced under the parenting sentencing
alternative set out in section 2 of this act, the offender may be
sanctioned in accordance with that section.
(d) If the offender was sentenced under the special ((sexual
[sex])) sex offender sentencing alternative set out in RCW 9.94A.670,
the suspended sentence may be revoked and the offender committed to
serve the original sentence of confinement.
(((d))) (e) If the offender was sentenced to a work ethic camp
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.690, the offender may be reclassified to serve
the unexpired term of his or her sentence in total confinement.
(((e))) (f) If a sex offender was sentenced pursuant to RCW
9.94A.507, the offender may be transferred to a more restrictive
confinement status to serve up to the remaining portion of the
sentence, less credit for any period actually spent in community
custody or in detention awaiting disposition of an alleged violation.
(3) If a probationer is being supervised by the department pursuant
to RCW 9.92.060, 9.95.204, or 9.95.210, the probationer may be
sanctioned pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The department
shall have authority to issue a warrant for the arrest of an offender
who violates a condition of community custody, as provided in RCW
9.94A.716. Any sanctions shall be imposed by the department pursuant
to RCW 9.94A.737. The department shall provide a copy of the violation
hearing report to the sentencing court in a timely manner. Nothing in
this subsection is intended to limit the power of the sentencing court
to respond to a probationer's violation of conditions.

--- END ---