BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 24.03.265 and 1986 c 240 s 39 are each amended to read
as follows:
Superior courts ((shall have full power to liquidate the assets and
affairs of)) may dissolve a corporation:
(1) ((In an action by a member, director, or the attorney general
when it is made to appear)) In a proceeding by the attorney general, if
it is established that the corporation:
(a) Obtained its articles of incorporation through fraud; or
(b) Has exceeded or abused, and is continuing to exceed or abuse
the authority conferred upon it by law.
(2) Except as provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws,
in a proceeding by fifty members or members holding at least five
percent of the voting power, whichever is less, or by a director or
member of a designated body, if it is established that:
(a) ((That)) The directors are deadlocked in the management of the
corporate affairs, the members, if any, are unable to break the
deadlock, and ((that)) irreparable injury to the corporation or its
mission is ((being suffered or is)) threatened ((by reason thereof, and
either that the members are unable to break the deadlock or there are
no members having voting rights; or)) or being suffered because of the
deadlock;
(b) ((That the acts of)) The directors or those in control of the
corporation ((are)) have acted, are acting, or will act in a manner
that is illegal, oppressive, or fraudulent; ((or))
(c) ((That)) The members are deadlocked in voting power and have
failed, for a period that includes at least two consecutive annual
meeting dates, to elect successors to directors whose terms have, or
otherwise would have, expired;
(d) The corporate assets are being misapplied or wasted; or
(((d) That)) (e) The corporation ((is unable to carry out its
purposes)) has insufficient assets to continue its activities and it is
no longer able to assemble a quorum of directors or members.
(((2))) (3) In ((an action)) a proceeding by a creditor, if it is
established that:
(a) ((When the claim of the creditor)) The creditor's claim has
been reduced to judgment ((and an)), the execution ((thereon has been))
on the judgment returned unsatisfied, and ((it is established that))
the corporation is insolvent; or
(b) ((When)) The corporation has admitted in ((writing)) a record
that the creditor's claim ((of the creditor)) is due and owing and ((it
is established that)) the corporation is insolvent.
(((3) Upon application by a)) (4) In a proceeding by the
corporation to have its voluntary dissolution continued under ((the
supervision of the)) court supervision.
(((4) When an action has been filed by the attorney general to
dissolve a corporation under the provisions of this chapter and it is
established that liquidation of its affairs should precede the entry of
a decree of dissolution.
Proceedings under subsections (1), (2), or (3) of this section
shall be brought in the county in which the registered office or the
principal office of the corporation is situated.
It shall not be necessary to make directors or members parties to
any such action or proceedings unless relief is sought against them
personally.))

Sec. 2 RCW 24.03.270 and 1967 c 235 s 55 are each amended to read
as follows:
((In proceedings to liquidate the assets and affairs of a
corporation the court shall have the power to)) (1) Venue for a
proceeding brought by the attorney general to dissolve a corporation
lies in the court specified in RCW 24.03.260. Venue for a proceeding
brought by any other party named in RCW 24.03.265 lies in the county
where a corporation's principal office or, if none in this state, its
registered office is or was last located.
(2) It is not necessary to make directors or members parties to a
proceeding to dissolve a corporation unless relief is sought against
them individually.
(3) A court in a proceeding brought to dissolve a corporation may
issue injunctions, ((to)) appoint a receiver or ((receivers)) custodian
pendente lite((,)) with ((such)) all powers and duties as the court((,
from time to time, may direct, and to take such other proceedings as
may be requisite)) directs, take other action required to preserve the
corporate assets wherever ((situated)) located, and carry on the
affairs of the corporation until a full hearing can be ((had)) held.
((After a hearing had upon such notice as the court may direct to
be given to all parties to the proceedings and to any other parties in
interest designated by the court, the court may appoint a liquidating
receiver or receivers with authority to collect the assets of the
corporation. Such liquidating receiver or receivers shall have
authority, subject to the order of the court, to sell, convey and
dispose of all or any part of the assets of the corporation wherever
situated, either at public or private sale. The order appointing such
liquidating receiver or receivers shall state their powers and duties.
Such powers and duties may be increased or diminished at any time
during the proceedings.))
(4) A court in a judicial proceeding brought to dissolve a
corporation may appoint one or more receivers to wind up and liquidate,
or one or more custodians to manage, the affairs of the corporation.
The court shall hold a hearing, after giving notice to all parties to
the proceeding and any interested persons designated by the court,
before appointing a receiver or custodian. The court appointing a
receiver or custodian has exclusive jurisdiction over the corporation
and all of its property wherever located.
(5) The court may require the receiver or custodian to post bond,
with or without sureties, in an amount the court directs.
(6) The court shall describe the powers and duties of the receiver
or custodian in its appointing order, which may be amended from time to
time. Among other powers:
(a) The receiver may: (i) Dispose of all or any part of the assets
of the nonprofit corporation wherever located, at a public or private
sale, if authorized by the court; and (ii) sue and defend in his or her
own name as receiver of the corporation in all courts of this state;
(b) The custodian may exercise all of the powers of the
corporation, through or in place of its board of directors and any
designated body, to the extent necessary to manage the affairs of the
corporation consistent with its mission and in the best interests of
its members, if any, and creditors.
(7) During a receivership, the court may redesignate the receiver
a custodian, and during a custodianship may redesignate the custodian
a receiver, if doing so is consistent with the mission of the nonprofit
corporation and in the best interests of the corporation, its members,
and creditors.
(8) The court from time to time during the receivership or
custodianship may order compensation paid and expense disbursements or
reimbursements made to the receiver or custodian and counsel from the
assets of the nonprofit corporation or proceeds from the sale of the
assets.
(9) The assets of the corporation or the proceeds resulting from
the sale, conveyance, or other disposition thereof shall be applied and
distributed as follows:
(((1))) (a) All costs and expenses of the court proceedings and all
liabilities and obligations of the corporation shall be paid, satisfied
and discharged, or adequate provision shall be made therefor;
(((2))) (b) Assets held by the corporation upon condition requiring
return, transfer or conveyance, which condition occurs by reason of the
dissolution or liquidation, shall be returned, transferred or conveyed
in accordance with such requirements;
(((3))) (c) Assets received and held by the corporation subject to
limitations permitting their use only for charitable, religious,
eleemosynary, benevolent, educational or similar purposes, but not held
upon a condition requiring return, transfer or conveyance by reason of
the dissolution or liquidation, shall be transferred or conveyed to one
or more domestic or foreign corporations, societies or organizations
engaged in activities substantially similar to those of the dissolving
or liquidating corporation as the court may direct;
(((4))) (d) Other assets, if any, shall be distributed in
accordance with the provisions of the articles of incorporation or the
bylaws to the extent that the articles of incorporation or bylaws
determine the distributive rights of members, or any class or classes
of members, or provide for distribution to others;
(((5))) (e) Any remaining assets may be distributed to such
persons, societies, organizations or domestic or foreign corporations,
whether for profit or not for profit, specified in the plan of
distribution adopted as provided in this chapter, or where no plan of
distribution has been adopted, as the court may direct.
((The court shall have power to allow, from time to time, as
expenses of the liquidation compensation to the receiver or receivers
and to attorneys in the proceeding, and to direct the payment thereof
out of the assets of the corporation or the proceeds of any sale or
disposition of such assets.
A receiver of a corporation appointed under the provisions of this
section shall have authority to sue and defend in all courts in his own
name as receiver of such corporation. The court appointing such
receiver shall have exclusive jurisdiction of the corporation and its
property, wherever situated.))
(10) Subsections (4) through (8) of this section do not apply to a
corporation that is a religious organization.

Sec. 3 RCW 24.03.290 and 1967 c 235 s 59 are each amended to read
as follows:
((In proceedings to liquidate the assets and affairs of a
corporation, when the costs and expenses of such proceedings and all
debts, obligations, and liabilities of the corporation shall have been
paid and discharged and all of its remaining property and assets
distributed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, or in
case its property and assets are not sufficient to satisfy and
discharge such costs, expenses, debts, and obligations, and all the
property and assets have been applied so far as they will go to their
payment, the court shall enter a decree dissolving the corporation,
whereupon the existence of the corporation shall cease.))
(1) If after a hearing the court determines that one or more
grounds for judicial dissolution under RCW 24.03.265 exist, the court
may enter a decree dissolving the corporation and specifying the
effective date of the dissolution, and the clerk of the court shall
deliver a certified copy of the decree to the secretary of state, who
shall file it.
(2) After entering the decree of dissolution, the court shall
direct the winding up and liquidation of the corporation's affairs in
accordance with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is prospective and applies only to
actions or proceedings commenced on or after the effective date of this
section.

--- END ---