BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This section provides an alternative process for awarding
contracts for construction, building, renovation, remodeling,
alteration, repair, or improvement of university buildings and
facilities in which critical patient care or highly specialized medical
research is located. These provisions may be used, in lieu of other
procedures to award contracts for such work, when the estimated cost of
the work is equal to or less than five million dollars and the project
involves construction, renovation, remodeling, or alteration of
improvements within a building that is used directly for critical
patient care or highly specialized medical research.
(2) The university may create a single critical patient care or
specialized medical research facilities roster or may create multiple
critical patient care or specialized medical research facilities
rosters for different trade specialties or categories of anticipated
work. At least once a year, the university shall publish in a
newspaper of general circulation a notice of the existence of the
roster or rosters and solicit a statement of qualifications from
contractors who wish to be on the roster or rosters of prime
contractors. In addition, qualified contractors shall be added to the
roster or rosters at any time they submit a written request, necessary
records, and meet the qualifications established by the university.
The university may require eligible contractors desiring to be placed
on a roster to keep current records of any applicable licenses,
certifications, registrations, bonding, insurance, or other appropriate
matters on file with the university as a condition of being placed on
a roster or rosters. Placement on a roster shall be on the basis of
qualifications.
(3) The public solicitation of qualifications shall include but not
be limited to:
(a) A description of the types of projects to be completed and
where possible may include programmatic, performance, and technical
requirements and specifications;
(b) The reasons for using the critical patient care and specialized
medical research roster process;
(c) A description of the qualifications to be required of a
contractor, including submission of an accident prevention program;
(d) A description of the process the university will use to
evaluate qualifications, including evaluation factors and the relative
weight of factors;
(e) The form of the contract to be awarded;
(f) A description of the administrative process by which the
required qualifications, evaluation process, and project types may be
appealed; and
(g) A description of the administrative process by which decisions
of the university may be appealed.
(4) The university shall establish a committee to evaluate the
contractors submitting qualifications. Evaluation criteria for
selection of the contractor or contractors to be included on a roster
shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) Ability of a contractor's professional personnel;
(b) A contractor's past performance on similar projects, including
but not limited to medical facilities, and involving either negotiated
work or other public works contracts;
(c) The contractor's ability to meet time and budget requirements;
(d) The contractor's ability to provide preconstruction services,
as appropriate;
(e) The contractor's capacity to successfully complete the project;
(f) The contractor's approach to executing projects;
(g) The contractor's approach to safety and the contractor's safety
history; and
(h) The contractor's record of performance, integrity, judgment,
and skills.
(5) Contractors meeting the evaluation committee's criteria for
selection must be placed on the applicable roster or rosters.
(6) When a project is selected for delivery through this roster
process, the university must establish a procedure for securing written
quotations from all contractors on a roster to assure that a
competitive price is established. Invitations for quotations shall
include an estimate of the scope and nature of the work to be performed
as well as materials and equipment to be furnished. Plans and
specifications must be included in the invitation but may not be
detailed. Award of a project must be made to the responsible bidder
submitting the lowest responsive bid.
(7) The university shall make an effort to solicit proposals from
certified minority or certified woman-owned contractors to the extent
permitted by the Washington state civil rights act, RCW 49.60.400.
(8) Beginning in September 2010 and every other year thereafter,
the university shall provide a report to the capital projects advisory
review board which must, at a minimum, include a list of rosters used,
contracts awarded, and a description of outreach to and participation
by women and minority-owned businesses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW
to read as follows:
The alternative process for awarding contracts established in
section 1 of this act terminates June 30, 2015, as provided in section
3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW
to read as follows:
Section 1 of this act, as now existing or hereinafter amended, is
repealed, effective June 30, 2016.

--- END ---