BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 By December 1, 2010, the governor shall
submit to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature a report that identifies the agency designated by the
governor as the single state medicaid agency and a plan for
transferring, as necessary, the functions related to that designation.
In preparing the plan, the governor must consider, at a minimum, the
following:
(1) The terms and conditions of any federal medicaid waiver related
to financing the basic health plan granted as a result of the request
submitted to the federal department of health and human services by the
department on January 19, 2010;
(2) The policy goal of integrating medical, behavioral health, and
long-term care services for individuals with co-occurring disorders or
complex health needs;
(3) The need for uniform policies, based on the best available
scientific and medical evidence, across state purchased health care
programs as provided in RCW 41.05.013;
(4) The labor impacts, including the transfer of employees and the
effect on current bargaining units and collective bargaining
agreements.

--- END ---