BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
Health carriers may offer a health benefit plan that is actuarially
equivalent to the same schedule of covered basic health care services
established by the administrator of the health care authority for
nonsubsidized enrollees. The health benefit plan may include physician
services, inpatient and outpatient hospital services, prescription
drugs and medications, and other services that may be necessary for
basic health care. Health carriers must be subject to the same
provisions of Title 48 RCW as required of the Washington basic health
care plan under RCW 70.47.130.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---