BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the economic
well-being and stability of the fishing industry and the conservation
of the food fish resources of the state of Washington are best served
by allocating an equal amount of time to gill net gear and purse seine
gear to harvest salmon in Puget Sound.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Whenever the commission authorizes commercial fishing for
salmon within the waters described within this chapter, the commission
shall adopt rules specifying weekly fishing schedules for gill net and
purse seine gear that provide:
(a) An equal amount of time opened during each week to take salmon;
and
(b) Alternate first day of the week openings to each gear type.
(2) Exceptions to this equal time provision may be made only when:
(a) Estimates obtained by direct, on-water sampling of each gear
type show a disproportionate amount of the bycatch mortality of
incidentally encountered fish or other species associated with fishing
by either gear type;
(b) Economic analyses of Puget Sound commercial salmon conclusively
demonstrate that allocating a greater amount of time to either gear
type will improve the economic well-being and stability of the fishing
industry; or
(c) The total allowable harvest, determined by the department on
the basis of either preseason forecast or in-season gathered
information, is insufficient to allow openings for both gill net and
purse seine gears.
(3) Nothing in this section limits commission authority under RCW
77.50.010.

--- END ---