BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.250 and 2008 c 81 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at retail, except persons taxable as retailers under other
provisions of this chapter, as to such persons, the amount of tax with
respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to the gross proceeds of
sales of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.471 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax imposed under
chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or
82.08.0263, except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260(11) or
subsection (3) of this section, as to such persons, the amount of tax
with respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to the gross
proceeds of sales of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.484
percent.
(3)(a) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person classified by the
federal aviation administration as a federal aviation regulation part
145 certificated repair station and that is engaging within this state
in the business of making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax
imposed under chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261,
82.08.0262, or 82.08.0263, as to such persons, the amount of tax with
respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to the gross proceeds of
sales of the business, multiplied by the rate of .2904 percent.
(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this
subsection (3) must file a complete annual report with the department
under RCW 82.32.--- (section 103, chapter -- (SHB 3066), Laws of 2010).

Sec. 2 RCW 82.08.809 and 2005 c 296 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of new
passenger cars, light duty trucks, and medium duty passenger vehicles,
which are exclusively powered by a clean alternative fuel.
(2) The seller must keep records necessary for the department to
verify eligibility under this section.
(3) As used in this section, "clean alternative fuel" means natural
gas, propane, hydrogen, or electricity, when used as a fuel in a motor
vehicle that meets the California motor vehicle emission standards in
Title 13 of the California code of regulations, effective January 1,
2005, and the rules of the Washington state department of ecology.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2011.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.12.809 and 2005 c 296 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Until July 1, 2011, the provisions of this chapter do not apply
in respect to the use of new passenger cars, light duty trucks, and
medium duty passenger vehicles, which are exclusively powered by a
clean alternative fuel.
(2) "Clean alternative fuel" has the same meaning as provided in
RCW 82.08.809.
(3) A taxpayer is not liable for the tax imposed in RCW 82.12.020
on the use, on or after July 1, 2011, of a passenger car, light duty
truck, or medium duty passenger vehicle exclusively powered by a clean
alternative fuel, if the taxpayer used such vehicle in this state
before July 1, 2011, and the use was exempt under this section from the
tax imposed in RCW 82.12.020.

Sec. 4 RCW 84.36.635 and 2008 c 268 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Alcohol fuel" means any alcohol made from a product other than
petroleum or natural gas, which is used alone or in combination with
gasoline or other petroleum products for use as a fuel for motor
vehicles, farm implements, and machines or implements of husbandry.
(b) "Anaerobic digester" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
82.08.900.
(c) "Biodiesel feedstock" means oil that is produced from an
agricultural crop for the sole purpose of ultimately producing
biodiesel fuel.
(d) "Biodiesel fuel" means a mono alkyl ester of long chain fatty
acids derived from vegetable oils or animal fats for use in
compression-ignition engines and that meets the requirements of the
American society of testing and materials specification D 6751 in
effect as of January 1, 2003.
(2)(a) All buildings, machinery, equipment, and other personal
property which are used primarily for the manufacturing of alcohol
fuel, biodiesel fuel, biodiesel feedstock, or the operation of an
anaerobic digester, the land upon which this property is located, and
land that is reasonably necessary in the manufacturing of alcohol fuel,
biodiesel fuel, biodiesel feedstock, or the operation of an anaerobic
digester, but not land necessary for growing of crops, which together
comprise a new manufacturing facility or an addition to an existing
manufacturing facility, are exempt from property taxation for the six
assessment years following the date on which the facility or the
addition to the existing facility becomes operational.
(b) For manufacturing facilities which produce products in addition
to alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock, the amount of
the property tax exemption ((shall be)) is based upon the annual
percentage of the total value of all products manufactured that is the
value of the alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, and biodiesel feedstock
manufactured.
(3) Claims for exemptions authorized by this section ((shall)) must
be filed with the county assessor on forms prescribed by the department
of revenue and furnished by the assessor. Once filed, the exemption is
valid for six years and ((shall)) may not be renewed. The assessor
((shall)) must verify and approve claims as the assessor determines to
be justified and in accordance with this section. No claims may be
filed after December 31, ((2009)) 2015, except for claims for anaerobic
digesters, which may be filed no later than December 31, 2012.
(4) The department of revenue may promulgate such rules, pursuant
to chapter 34.05 RCW, as necessary to properly administer this section.
(5) A person claiming the exemption provided in this section must
file a complete annual survey with the department under RCW 82.32.---(section 102, chapter -- (SHB 3066), Laws of 2010).

Sec. 5 RCW 84.36.640 and 2003 c 339 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "wood biomass fuel" means a
pyrolytic liquid fuel or synthesis gas-derived liquid fuel, used in
internal combustion engines, and produced from wood, forest, or field
residue, or dedicated energy crops that do not include wood pieces that
have been treated with chemical preservatives such as creosote,
pentachlorophenol, or copper-chroma-arsenic.
(2)(a) All buildings, machinery, equipment, and other personal
property which is used primarily for the manufacturing of wood biomass
fuel, the land upon which this property is located, and land that is
reasonably necessary in the manufacturing of wood biomass fuel, but not
land necessary for growing of crops, which together comprise a new
manufacturing facility or an addition to an existing manufacturing
facility, are exempt from property taxation for the six assessment
years following the date on which the facility or the addition to the
existing facility becomes operational.
(b) For manufacturing facilities which produce products in addition
to wood biomass fuel, the amount of the property tax exemption ((shall
be)) is based upon the annual percentage of the total value of all
products manufactured that is the value of the wood biomass fuel
manufactured.
(3) Claims for exemptions authorized by this section ((shall)) must
be filed with the county assessor on forms prescribed by the department
of revenue and furnished by the assessor. Once filed, the exemption is
valid for six years and ((shall)) may not be renewed. The assessor
((shall)) must verify and approve claims as the assessor determines to
be justified and in accordance with this section. No claims may be
filed after December 31, ((2009)) 2015.
(4) The department of revenue may promulgate such rules, pursuant
to chapter 34.05 RCW, as necessary to properly administer this section.
(5) A person claiming the exemption provided in this section must
file a complete annual survey with the department under RCW 82.32.---(section 102, chapter -- (SHB 3066), Laws of 2010).

Sec. 6 RCW 82.29A.135 and 2008 c 268 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Alcohol fuel" means any alcohol made from a product other than
petroleum or natural gas, which is used alone or in combination with
gasoline or other petroleum products for use as a fuel for motor
vehicles, farm implements, and machines or implements of husbandry.
(b) "Anaerobic digester" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
82.08.900.
(c) "Biodiesel feedstock" means oil that is produced from an
agricultural crop for the sole purpose of ultimately producing
biodiesel fuel.
(d) "Biodiesel fuel" means a mono alkyl ester of long chain fatty
acids derived from vegetable oils or animal fats for use in
compression-ignition engines and that meets the requirements of the
American society of testing and materials specification D 6751 in
effect as of January 1, 2003.
(e) "Wood biomass fuel" means a pyrolytic liquid fuel or synthesis
gas-derived liquid fuel, used in internal combustion engines, and
produced from wood, forest, or field residue, or dedicated energy crops
that do not include wood pieces that have been treated with chemical
preservatives such as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper-chroma-arsenic.
(2)(a) All leasehold interests in buildings, machinery, equipment,
and other personal property which are used primarily for the
manufacturing of alcohol fuel, wood biomass fuel, biodiesel fuel,
biodiesel feedstock, or the operation of an anaerobic digester, the
land upon which this property is located, and land that is reasonably
necessary in the manufacturing of alcohol fuel, wood biomass fuel,
biodiesel fuel, biodiesel feedstock, or the operation of an anaerobic
digester, but not land necessary for growing of crops, which together
comprise a new manufacturing facility or an addition to an existing
manufacturing facility, are exempt from leasehold taxes for a period of
six years from the date on which the facility or the addition to the
existing facility becomes operational.
(b) For manufacturing facilities which produce products in addition
to alcohol fuel, wood biomass fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel
feedstock, the amount of the leasehold tax exemption ((shall be)) is
based upon the annual percentage of the total value of all products
manufactured that is the value of the alcohol fuel, wood biomass fuel,
biodiesel fuel, and biodiesel feedstock manufactured.
(3) Claims for exemptions authorized by this section ((shall)) must
be filed with the department of revenue on forms prescribed by the
department of revenue and furnished by the department of revenue. Once
filed, the exemption is valid for six years and ((shall)) may not be
renewed. The department of revenue ((shall)) must verify and approve
claims as the department of revenue determines to be justified and in
accordance with this section. No claims may be filed after December
31, ((2009)) 2015, except for claims for anaerobic digesters, which may
be filed no later than December 31, 2012.
(4) The department of revenue may promulgate such rules, pursuant
to chapter 34.05 RCW, as are necessary to properly administer this
section.
(5) A person claiming the exemption provided in this section must
file a complete annual survey with the department under RCW 82.32.---(section 102, chapter -- (SHB 3066), Laws of 2010).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) 2008 c 81 s 19 (uncodified);
(2) 2007 c 54 s 5;
(3) 2007 c 54 s 30 (uncodified);
(4) 2006 c 177 s 14 (uncodified); and
(5) 2005 c 296 s 6 (uncodified).

--- END ---