BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.225.020 and 2009 c 266 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If a child required to attend school under RCW 28A.225.010
fails to attend school without valid justification, the public school
in which the child is enrolled shall:
(a) Inform the child's custodial parent, parents, or guardian by a
notice in writing or by telephone whenever the child has failed to
attend school after one unexcused absence within any month during the
current school year. School officials shall inform the parent of the
potential consequences of additional unexcused absences. If the
custodial parent, parents, or guardian is not fluent in English, the
preferred practice is to provide this information in a language in
which the custodial parent, parents, or guardian is fluent;
(b) Schedule a conference or conferences with the custodial parent,
parents, or guardian and child at a time reasonably convenient for all
persons included for the purpose of analyzing the causes of the child's
absences after two unexcused absences within any month during the
current school year. If a regularly scheduled parent-teacher
conference day is to take place within thirty days of the second
unexcused absence, then the school district may schedule this
conference on that day; and
(c) Take steps to eliminate or reduce the child's absences. These
steps shall include, where appropriate, adjusting the child's school
program or school or course assignment, providing more individualized
or remedial instruction, providing appropriate vocational courses or
work experience, referring the child to a community truancy board, if
available, requiring the child to attend an alternative school or
program, or assisting the parent or child to obtain supplementary
services that might eliminate or ameliorate the cause or causes for the
absence from school. If the child's parent does not attend the
scheduled conference, the conference may be conducted with the student
and school official. However, the parent shall be notified of the
steps to be taken to eliminate or reduce the child's absence.
(2) The school shall collaborate with the community truancy board
on the ongoing implementation of research-based diversion programs
shown to reduce truancy rates.
(3) For purposes of this chapter, an "unexcused absence" means that
a child:
(a) Has failed to attend the majority of hours or periods in an
average school day or has failed to comply with a more restrictive
school district policy; and
(b) Has failed to meet the school district's policy for excused
absences.
(((3))) (4) If a child transfers from one school district to
another during the school year, the receiving school or school district
shall include the unexcused absences accumulated at the previous school
or from the previous school district for purposes of this section, RCW
28A.225.030, and 28A.225.015.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.225.030 and 1999 c 319 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If a child is required to attend school under RCW 28A.225.010
and if the actions taken by a school district under RCW 28A.225.020 are
not successful in substantially reducing an enrolled student's absences
from public school, not later than the seventh unexcused absence by a
child within any month during the current school year or not later than
the tenth unexcused absence during the current school year the school
district shall ((file a petition and supporting affidavit for a civil
action with the juvenile court alleging a violation of RCW 28A.225.010:
(a) By the parent; (b) by the child; or (c) by the parent and the
child. Except as provided in this subsection, no additional documents
need be filed with the petition.
(2) The district shall not later than the fifth unexcused absence
in a month:
(a))):
(1) Enter into an agreement with a student and parent that
establishes school attendance requirements;
(((b))) (2) Refer a student to a community truancy board, if
available, as defined in RCW 28A.225.025. The community truancy board
shall enter into an agreement with the student and parent that
establishes school attendance requirements and take other appropriate
actions to reduce the child's absences((; or
(c) File a petition under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The petition may be filed by a school district employee who is
not an attorney.
(4) If the school district fails to file a petition under this
section, the parent of a child with five or more unexcused absences in
any month during the current school year or upon the tenth unexcused
absence during the current school year may file a petition with the
juvenile court alleging a violation of RCW 28A.225.010.
(5) Petitions filed under this section may be served by certified
mail, return receipt requested. If such service is unsuccessful, or
the return receipt is not signed by the addressee, personal service is
required)), including use of truancy diversion and school reengagement
programs referenced in RCW 28A.225.020(2).

Sec. 3 2009 c 564 s 114 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,607,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,812,000
Judicial Information Systems Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,676,000
Judicial Stabilization Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,598,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $141,693,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 ((and $1,800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are)) is provided solely for school districts for
petitions to juvenile court for truant students as provided in RCW
28A.225.030 and 28A.225.035 and $1,800,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 is provided solely for school
districts to provide diversion and other activities to eliminate or
reduce truancy under RCW 28A.225.020. The office of the administrator
for the courts shall develop an interagency agreement with the
superintendent of public instruction to allocate the funding provided
in this subsection. Allocation of this money to school districts shall
be based on the number of petitions filed. This funding includes
amounts school districts may expend on the cost of serving petitions
filed under RCW 28A.225.030 by certified mail or by personal service or
for the performance of service of process for any hearing associated
with RCW 28A.225.030.
(2)(a) $8,252,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $8,253,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for distribution
to county juvenile court administrators to fund the costs of processing
truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth petitions.
The administrator for the courts, in conjunction with the juvenile
court administrators, shall develop an equitable funding distribution
formula. The formula shall neither reward counties with higher than
average per-petition processing costs nor shall it penalize counties
with lower than average per-petition processing costs.
(b) Each fiscal year during the 2009-11 fiscal biennium, each
county shall report the number of petitions processed and the total
actual costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and
at-risk youth petitions. Counties shall submit the reports to the
administrator for the courts no later than 45 days after the end of the
fiscal year. The administrator for the courts shall electronically
transmit this information to the chairs and ranking minority members of
the house of representatives appropriations committee and the senate
ways and means committee no later than 60 days after a fiscal year
ends. These reports are deemed informational in nature and are not for
the purpose of distributing funds.
(3) The distributions made under this subsection and distributions
from the county criminal justice assistance account made pursuant to
section 801 of this act constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs
for any new programs or increased level of service for purposes of RCW
43.135.060.
(4) $5,700,000 of the judicial information systems account--state
appropriation is provided solely for modernization and integration of
the judicial information system.
(a) Of this amount, $1,700,000 is for the development of a
comprehensive enterprise-level information technology strategy and
detailed business and operational plans in support of that strategy,
and $4,000,000 is to continue to modernize and integrate current
systems and enhance case management functionality on an incremental
basis.
(b) The amount provided in this subsection may not be expended
without prior approval by the judicial information system committee in
consultation with the information services board. The administrator
shall regularly submit project plan updates for approval to the
judicial information system committee and the information services
board.
(c) The judicial information system committee and the information
services board shall review project progress on a regular basis and may
require quality assurance plans. The judicial information systems
committee and the information services board shall provide a report to
the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than November 1,
2011, on the status of the judicial information system modernization
and integration, and the consistency of the project with the state's
architecture, infrastructure and statewide enterprise view of service
delivery.
(5) $3,000,000 of the judicial information systems account--state
appropriation is provided solely for replacing computer equipment at
state courts, and at state judicial agencies. The administrator for
the courts shall prioritize equipment replacement purchasing and shall
fund those items that are most essential or critical. By October 1,
2010, the administrative office of the courts shall report to the
appropriate legislative fiscal committees on expenditures for equipment
under this subsection.
(6) $12,000 of the judicial information systems account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 1954 (sealing juvenile records). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(7) $106,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $106,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the twenty-third superior
court judge position in Pierce county. The funds appropriated in this
subsection shall be expended only if the judge is appointed and serving
on the bench.
(8) It is the intent of the legislature that the reductions in
appropriations in this section shall be achieved, to the greatest
extent possible, by reducing those state government administrative
costs that do not affect direct client services or direct service
delivery or programs. The agency shall, to the greatest extent
possible, reduce spending in those areas that shall have the least
impact on implementing its mission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---