BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 2011-12 school year, all professional
educator standards board-approved teacher preparation programs must
administer to all preservice candidates the evidence-based assessment
of teaching effectiveness adopted by the professional educator
standards board. Candidates completing teacher preparation programs in
the 2012-13 school year and thereafter must successfully pass this
assessment. Assessment results from persons completing each
preparation program must be reported annually by the professional
educator standards board to the governor and the education and fiscal
committees of the legislature by December 1st.
(2) The professional educator standards board and the
superintendent of public instruction, as determined by the board, may
contract with one or more third parties for:
(a) The administration, scoring, and reporting of scores of the
assessment under this section;
(b) Related clerical and administrative activities; or
(c) Any combination of the purposes of this subsection (2).
(3) Candidates for residency certification who are required to
successfully complete the assessment under this section, and who are
charged a fee for the assessment by a third party contracted with under
this section, shall pay the fee charged by the contractor directly to
the contractor. Such fees shall be reasonably related to the actual
costs of the contractor in providing the assessment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
By September 30, 2010, the professional educator standards board
shall review and revise teacher and administrator preparation program
approval standards and proposal review procedures at the residency
certificate level to ensure they are rigorous and appropriate standards
for an expanded range of potential providers, including community
colleges and nonhigher education providers. All approved providers
must adhere to the same standards and comply with the same
requirements.
Beginning September 30, 2010, the professional educator standards
board must accept proposals for community college or nonhigher
education providers of educator preparation programs. Proposals must
be processed and considered by the board as expeditiously as possible.
By September 1, 2011, all professional educator standards board-approved residency teacher preparation programs at institutions of
higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 that are not a partner in
an alternative route program approved by the board are encouraged to
submit a proposal to the board to offer one or more of the alternative
route programs that meet the requirements of RCW 28A.660.020 and
28A.660.040.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.660.020 and 2006 c 263 s 816 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((Each)) The professional educator standards board shall
transition the alternative route partnership grant program from a
separate competitive grant program to a preparation program model to be
expanded among approved preparation program providers. Alternative
routes are partnerships between professional educator standards board-approved preparation programs, Washington school districts, and other
partners as appropriate.
(2) Each prospective teacher preparation program provider, in
cooperation with a Washington school district or consortia of school
districts applying ((for the)) to operate alternative route
certification program shall ((submit a)) include in its proposal to the
Washington professional educator standards board ((specifying)):
(a) The route or routes the partnership program intends to offer
and a detailed description of how the routes will be structured and
operated by the partnership;
(b) The estimated number of candidates that will be enrolled per
route;
(c) An identification, indication of commitment, and description of
the role of approved teacher preparation programs ((that are)) and
partnering ((with the)) district or consortia of districts;
(d) An assurance ((of)) that the district ((provision of)) or
approved preparation program provider will provide adequate training
for mentor teachers ((either through participation in a state mentor
training academy or district-provided training that meets state-established mentor-training standards)) specific to the mentoring of
alternative route candidates;
(e) An assurance that significant time will be provided for mentor
teachers to spend with the alternative route teacher candidates
throughout the internship. Partnerships must provide each candidate
with intensive classroom mentoring until such time as the candidate
demonstrates the competency necessary to manage the classroom with less
intensive supervision and guidance from a mentor;
(f) A description of the rigorous screening process for applicants
to alternative route programs, including entry requirements specific to
each route, as provided in RCW 28A.660.040; ((and))
(g) A summary of procedures that provide flexible completion
opportunities for candidates to achieve a residency certificate; and
(h) The design and use of a teacher development plan for each
candidate. The plan shall specify the alternative route coursework and
training required of each candidate and shall be developed by comparing
the candidate's prior experience and coursework with the state's new
performance-based standards for residency certification and adjusting
any requirements accordingly. The plan may include the following
components:
(i) A minimum of one-half of a school year, and an additional
significant amount of time if necessary, of intensive mentorship during
field experience, starting with full-time mentoring and progressing to
increasingly less intensive monitoring and assistance as the intern
demonstrates the skills necessary to take over the classroom with less
intensive support. ((For route one and two candidates,)) Before the
supervision is diminished, the mentor of the teacher candidate at the
school and the supervisor of the teacher candidate from the ((higher
education)) teacher preparation program must both agree that the
teacher candidate is ready to manage the classroom with less intensive
supervision((. For route three and four candidates, the mentor of the
teacher candidate shall make the decision));
(ii) Identification of performance indicators based on the
knowledge and skills standards required for residency certification by
the Washington professional educator standards board;
(iii) Identification of benchmarks that will indicate when the
standard is met for all performance indicators;
(iv) A description of strategies for assessing candidate
performance on the benchmarks;
(v) Identification of one or more tools to be used to assess a
candidate's performance once the candidate has been in the classroom
for about one-half of a school year; ((and))
(vi) A description of the criteria that would result in residency
certification after about one-half of a school year but before the end
of the program; and
(vii) A description of how the district intends for the alternative
route program to support its workforce development plan and how the
presence of alternative route interns will advance its school
improvement plans.
(((2))) (3) To the extent funds are appropriated for this purpose,
((districts)) alternative route programs may apply for program funds to
pay stipends to trained mentor teachers of interns during the mentored
internship. The per intern amount of mentor stipend provided by state
funds shall not exceed five hundred dollars.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.660.040 and 2009 c 192 s 1 and 2009 c 166 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
((Partnership grants funded)) Alternative route programs under this
chapter shall operate one to four specific route programs. Successful
completion of the program shall make a candidate eligible for residency
teacher certification. ((For route one and two candidates,)) The
mentor of the teacher candidate at the school and the supervisor of the
teacher candidate from the ((higher education)) teacher preparation
program must both agree that the teacher candidate has successfully
completed the program. ((For route three and four candidates, the
mentor of the teacher candidate shall make the determination that the
candidate has successfully completed the program.))
(1) ((Partnership grant programs seeking funds to operate))
Alternative route programs operating route one programs shall enroll
currently employed classified instructional employees with transferable
associate degrees seeking residency teacher certification with
endorsements in special education, bilingual education, or English as
a second language. It is anticipated that candidates enrolled in this
route will complete both their baccalaureate degree and requirements
for residency certification in two years or less, including a mentored
internship to be completed in the final year. In addition, partnership
programs shall uphold entry requirements for candidates that include:
(a) District or building validation of qualifications, including
one year of successful student interaction and leadership as a
classified instructional employee;
(b) Successful passage of the statewide basic skills exam((, when
available)); and
(c) Meeting the age, good moral character, and personal fitness
requirements adopted by rule for teachers.
(2) ((Partnership grant programs seeking funds to operate))
Alternative route programs operating route two programs shall enroll
currently employed classified staff with baccalaureate degrees seeking
residency teacher certification in subject matter shortage areas and
areas with shortages due to geographic location. Candidates enrolled
in this route must complete a mentored internship complemented by
flexibly scheduled training and coursework offered at a local site,
such as a school or educational service district, or online or via
video-conference over the K-20 network, in collaboration with the
partnership program's higher education partner. In addition,
partnership grant programs shall uphold entry requirements for
candidates that include:
(a) District or building validation of qualifications, including
one year of successful student interaction and leadership as classified
staff;
(b) A baccalaureate degree from a regionally accredited institution
of higher education. The individual's college or university grade
point average may be considered as a selection factor;
(c) Successful completion of the ((content test, once the state
content test is available)) subject matter assessment required by RCW
28A.410.220(3);
(d) Meeting the age, good moral character, and personal fitness
requirements adopted by rule for teachers; and
(e) Successful passage of the statewide basic skills exam((, when
available)).
(3) ((Partnership grant)) Alternative route programs seeking funds
to operate route three programs shall enroll individuals with
baccalaureate degrees, who are not employed in the district at the time
of application. When selecting candidates for certification through
route three, districts and approved preparation program providers shall
give priority to individuals who are seeking residency teacher
certification in subject matter shortage areas or shortages due to
geographic locations. ((For route three only, the districts may
include additional candidates in nonshortage subject areas if the
candidates are seeking endorsements with a secondary grade level
designation as defined by rule by the professional educator standards
board. The districts shall disclose to candidates in nonshortage
subject areas available information on the demand in those subject
areas.)) Cohorts of candidates for this route shall attend an
intensive summer teaching academy, followed by a full year employed by
a district in a mentored internship, followed, if necessary, by a
second summer teaching academy. In addition, partnership programs
shall uphold entry requirements for candidates that include:
(a) A baccalaureate degree from a regionally accredited institution
of higher education. The individual's grade point average may be
considered as a selection factor;
(b) Successful completion of the ((content test, once the state
content test is available)) subject matter assessment required by RCW
28A.410.220(3);
(c) External validation of qualifications, including demonstrated
successful experience with students or children, such as reference
letters and letters of support from previous employers;
(d) Meeting the age, good moral character, and personal fitness
requirements adopted by rule for teachers; and
(e) Successful passage of the statewide basic skills exam((s, when
available)).
(4) ((Partnership grant programs seeking funds to operate))
Alternative route programs operating route four programs shall enroll
individuals with baccalaureate degrees, who are employed in the
district at the time of application, or who hold conditional teaching
certificates or emergency substitute certificates. Cohorts of
candidates for this route shall attend an intensive summer teaching
academy, followed by a full year employed by a district in a mentored
internship. If employed on a conditional certificate, the intern may
serve as the teacher of record, supported by a well-trained mentor. In
addition, partnership programs shall uphold entry requirements for
candidates that include:
(a) A baccalaureate degree from a regionally accredited institution
of higher education. The individual's grade point average may be
considered as a selection factor;
(b) Successful completion of the ((content test, once the state
content test is available)) subject matter assessment required by RCW
28A.410.220(3);
(c) External validation of qualifications, including demonstrated
successful experience with students or children, such as reference
letters and letters of support from previous employers;
(d) Meeting the age, good moral character, and personal fitness
requirements adopted by rule for teachers; and
(e) Successful passage of the statewide basic skills exam((s, when
available)).
(5) Applicants for alternative route programs who are eligible
veterans or national guard members and who meet the entry requirements
for the alternative route program for which application is made shall
be given preference in admission.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.660.050 and 2009 c 539 s 3 and 2009 c 192 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for these
purposes, the conditional scholarship programs in this chapter are
created under the following guidelines:
(1) The programs shall be administered by the higher education
coordinating board. In administering the programs, the higher
education coordinating board has the following powers and duties:
(a) To adopt necessary rules and develop guidelines to administer
the programs;
(b) To collect and manage repayments from participants who do not
meet their service obligations; and
(c) To accept grants and donations from public and private sources
for the programs.
(2) Requirements for participation in the conditional scholarship
programs are as provided in this subsection (2).
(a) The alternative route conditional scholarship program is
limited to interns of ((the partnership grant)) professional educator
standards board-approved alternative routes to teaching programs under
RCW 28A.660.040. For fiscal year 2011, priority must be given to
fiscal year 2010 participants in the alternative route partnership
program. In order to receive conditional scholarship awards,
recipients shall:
(i) Be accepted and maintain enrollment in alternative
certification routes through ((the partnership grant)) a professional
educator standards board-approved program;
(ii) Continue to make satisfactory progress toward completion of
the alternative route certification program and receipt of a residency
teaching certificate; and
(iii) Receive no more than the annual amount of the scholarship,
not to exceed eight thousand dollars, for the cost of tuition, fees,
and educational expenses, including books, supplies, and transportation
for the alternative route certification program in which the recipient
is enrolled. The board may adjust the annual award by the average rate
of resident undergraduate tuition and fee increases at the state
universities as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.
(b) The pipeline for paraeducators conditional scholarship program
is limited to qualified paraeducators as provided by RCW 28A.660.042.
In order to receive conditional scholarship awards, recipients shall:
(i) Be accepted and maintain enrollment at a community and
technical college for no more than two years and attain an associate of
arts degree;
(ii) Continue to make satisfactory progress toward completion of an
associate of arts degree. This progress requirement is a condition for
eligibility into a route one program of the alternative routes to
teacher certification program for a mathematics, special education, or
English as a second language endorsement; and
(iii) Receive no more than the annual amount of the scholarship,
not to exceed four thousand dollars, for the cost of tuition, fees, and
educational expenses, including books, supplies, and transportation for
the alternative route certification program in which the recipient is
enrolled. The board may adjust the annual award by the average rate of
tuition and fee increases at the state community and technical
colleges.
(c) The retooling to teach mathematics and science conditional
scholarship program is limited to current K-12 teachers ((and
individuals having an elementary education certificate but who are not
employed in positions requiring an elementary education certificate as
provided by RCW 28A.660.045)). In order to receive conditional
scholarship awards:
(i) Individuals currently employed as teachers shall pursue a
middle level mathematics or science, or secondary mathematics or
science endorsement; or
(ii) Individuals who are certificated with an elementary education
endorsement((, but not employed in positions requiring an elementary
education certificate,)) shall pursue an endorsement in middle level
mathematics or science, or both; and
(iii) Individuals shall use one of the pathways to endorsement
processes to receive a mathematics or science endorsement, or both,
which shall include passing a mathematics or science endorsement test,
or both tests, plus observation and completing applicable coursework to
attain the proper endorsement; and
(iv) Individuals shall receive no more than the annual amount of
the scholarship, not to exceed three thousand dollars, for the cost of
tuition, test fees, and educational expenses, including books,
supplies, and transportation for the endorsement pathway being pursued.
(3) The Washington professional educator standards board shall
select individuals to receive conditional scholarships. In selecting
recipients, preference shall be given to eligible veterans or national
guard members.
(4) For the purpose of this chapter, a conditional scholarship is
a loan that is forgiven in whole or in part in exchange for service as
a certificated teacher employed in a Washington state K-12 public
school. The state shall forgive one year of loan obligation for every
two years a recipient teaches in a public school. Recipients who fail
to continue a course of study leading to residency teacher
certification or cease to teach in a public school in the state of
Washington in their endorsement area are required to repay the
remaining loan principal with interest.
(5) Recipients who fail to fulfill the required teaching obligation
are required to repay the remaining loan principal with interest and
any other applicable fees. The higher education coordinating board
shall adopt rules to define the terms for repayment, including
applicable interest rates, fees, and deferments.
(6) The higher education coordinating board may deposit all
appropriations, collections, and any other funds received for the
program in this chapter in the future teachers conditional scholarship
account authorized in RCW 28B.102.080.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
Beginning with the 2010 school year and annually thereafter, each
educational service district, in cooperation with the professional
educator standards board, must convene representatives from school
districts within that region and professional educator standards board-approved educator preparation programs to review district and regional
educator workforce data, make biennial projections of certificate
staffing needs, and identify how recruitment and enrollment plans in
educator preparation programs reflect projected need.

Sec. 7 RCW 28B.76.230 and 2005 c 258 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall develop a comprehensive and ongoing assessment
process to analyze the need for additional degrees and programs,
additional off-campus centers and locations for degree programs, and
consolidation or elimination of programs by the four-year institutions.
(2) As part of the needs assessment process, the board shall
examine:
(a) Projections of student, employer, and community demand for
education and degrees, including liberal arts degrees, on a regional
and statewide basis;
(b) Current and projected degree programs and enrollment at public
and private institutions of higher education, by location and mode of
service delivery; ((and))
(c) Data from the workforce training and education coordinating
board and the state board for community and technical colleges on the
supply and demand for workforce education and certificates and
associate degrees; and
(d) Data from the professional educator standards board.
(3) Every two years the board shall produce, jointly with the state
board for community and technical colleges, the professional educator
standards board, and the workforce training and education coordinating
board, an assessment of the number and type of higher education and
training credentials required to match employer demand for a skilled
and educated workforce. The assessment shall include the number of
forecasted net job openings at each level of higher education and
training and the number of credentials needed to match the forecast of
net job openings.
(4) The board shall determine whether certain major lines of study
or types of degrees, including applied degrees or research-oriented
degrees, shall be assigned uniquely to some institutions or
institutional sectors in order to create centers of excellence that
focus resources and expertise.
(5) The following activities are subject to approval by the board:
(a) New degree programs by a four-year institution;
(b) Creation of any off-campus program by a four-year institution;
(c) Purchase or lease of major off-campus facilities by a four-year
institution or a community or technical college;
(d) Creation of higher education centers and consortia;
(e) New degree programs and creation of off-campus programs by an
independent college or university in collaboration with a community or
technical college; and
(f) Applied baccalaureate degree programs developed by colleges
under RCW 28B.50.810.
(6) Institutions seeking board approval under this section must
demonstrate that the proposal is justified by the needs assessment
developed under this section. Institutions must also demonstrate how
the proposals align with or implement the statewide strategic master
plan for higher education under RCW 28B.76.200.
(7) The board shall develop clear guidelines and objective
decision-making criteria regarding approval of proposals under this
section, which must include review and consultation with the
institution and other interested agencies and individuals.
(8) The board shall periodically recommend consolidation or
elimination of programs at the four-year institutions, based on the
needs assessment analysis.

Sec. 8 RCW 28B.76.335 and 2007 c 396 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
As part of the state needs assessment process conducted by the
board in accordance with RCW 28B.76.230, the board, in collaboration
with the professional educator standards board, shall assess the need
for additional ((baccalaureate)) degree and certificate programs in
Washington that specialize in teacher preparation ((in mathematics,
science, and technology)) to meet regional or subject-area shortages.
If the board determines that there is a need for additional programs,
then the board shall encourage the appropriate institutions of higher
education or institutional sectors to create such a program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 28B.76 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board must establish boundaries for service regions for
institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016
implementing professional educator standards board-approved educator
preparation programs. Regions shall be established to encourage and
support, not exclude, the reach of public higher education institutions
across the state.
(2) Based on the data in the assessment in RCW 28B.76.230 and
28B.76.335, the board shall determine whether reasonable teacher
preparation program access for prospective teachers is available in
each region. If access is determined to be inadequate in a region, the
institution of higher education responsible for the region shall submit
a plan for meeting the access need to the board.
(3) Partnerships with other teacher preparation program providers
and the use of appropriate technology shall be considered. The board
shall review the plan and, as appropriate, assist the institution in
developing support and resources for implementing the plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The college board shall select up to three community colleges
to develop and offer a program of study leading to a baccalaureate
degree with a residency teaching certificate. The program must lead to
endorsement in a subject matter shortage area. To the maximum extent
possible, the colleges selected shall be geographically dispersed to
enhance access in underserved areas of the state. The college board
and the professional educator standards board shall provide technical
assistance to the colleges in developing and submitting the program for
approval.
(2) A college selected under this section may develop the
curriculum for and design and deliver courses leading to a
baccalaureate degree. However, programs developed under this section
are subject to approval by the college board under RCW 28B.50.090, the
higher education coordinating board under RCW 28B.76.230, and the
professional educator standards board under RCW 28A.410.210 before the
college may enroll students in upper division courses or apply courses
offered toward required competencies for teacher certification or
endorsement. The boards shall coordinate their review and approval
processes to expedite approval.
(3) The college board and the professional educator standards board
shall evaluate the experience of the programs established under this
section and submit a report to the governor and the legislature by
January 10, 2014, regarding whether additional programs should be
authorized.

Sec. 11 RCW 28B.50.020 and 2009 c 64 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The purpose of this chapter is to provide for the dramatically
increasing number of students requiring high standards of education
either as a part of the continuing higher education program or for
occupational education and training, or for adult basic skills and
literacy education, by creating a new, independent system of community
and technical colleges which will:
(1) Offer an open door to every citizen, regardless of his or her
academic background or experience, at a cost normally within his or her
economic means;
(2) Ensure that each college district shall offer thoroughly
comprehensive educational, training, and service programs to meet the
needs of both the communities and students served by combining high
standards of excellence in academic transfer courses; realistic and
practical courses in occupational education, both graded and ungraded;
community services of an educational, cultural, and recreational
nature; and adult education, including basic skills and general,
family, and workforce literacy programs and services;
(3) Provide for basic skills and literacy education, and
occupational education and technical training at technical colleges in
order to prepare students for careers in a competitive workforce;
(4) Provide or coordinate related and supplemental instruction for
apprentices at community and technical colleges;
(5) Provide administration by state and local boards which will
avoid unnecessary duplication of facilities or programs; and which will
encourage efficiency in operation and creativity and imagination in
education, training, and service to meet the needs of the community and
students;
(6) Allow for the growth, improvement, flexibility and modification
of the community colleges and their education, training, and service
programs as future needs occur; and
(7) Establish firmly that, except on a pilot basis as provided
under RCW 28B.50.810 and section 10 of this act, community colleges
are, for purposes of academic training, two year institutions, and are
an independent, unique, and vital section of our state's higher
education system, separate from both the common school system and other
institutions of higher learning, and never to be considered for
conversion into four-year liberal arts colleges.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 28A.660.010 (Partnership grant program) and 2004 c 23 s 1
& 2001 c 158 s 2;
(2) RCW 28A.415.100 (Student teaching centers -- Legislative
recognition -- Intent) and 1991 c 258 s 1;
(3) RCW 28A.415.105 (Definitions) and 2006 c 263 s 811, 1995 c 335
s 403, & 1991 c 258 s 2;
(4) RCW 28A.415.125 (Network of student teaching centers) and 2006
c 263 s 812 & 1991 c 258 s 6;
(5) RCW 28A.415.130 (Allocation of funds for student teaching
centers) and 2006 c 263 s 813 & 1991 c 258 s 7;
(6) RCW 28A.415.135 (Alternative means of teacher placement) and
1991 c 258 s 8;
(7) RCW 28A.415.140 (Field experiences) and 1991 c 258 s 9;
(8) RCW 28A.415.145 (Rules) and 2006 c 263 s 814 & 1991 c 258 s 10;
and
(9) RCW 28A.660.030 (Partnership grants -- Selection -- Administration)
and 2004 c 23 s 3, 2003 c 410 s 2, & 2001 c 158 s 4.

--- END ---