BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.15.040 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 32 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
If certain insurance coverages cannot be procured from authorized
insurers, such coverages, hereinafter designated as "surplus lines,"
may be procured from unauthorized insurers subject to the following
conditions:
(1) The insurance must be procured through a licensed surplus line
broker.
(2) The insurance must not be procurable, after diligent effort has
been made to do so from among a majority of the insurers authorized to
transact that kind of insurance in this state.
(3) Coverage ((shall)) must not be procured from an unauthorized
insurer for the purpose of securing a lower premium rate than would be
accepted by any authorized insurer nor to secure any other competitive
advantage.
(4) The commissioner may by ((regulation)) rule establish the
degree of effort required to comply with subsections (2) and (3) of
this section.
(5) At the time of the procuring of any such insurance ((an
affidavit)) a declaration setting forth the facts referred to in
subsections (2) and (3) of this section must be executed by the surplus
line broker. Such ((affidavit shall)) declaration must be ((filed
with)) submitted to the commissioner within thirty days after the
insurance is procured. The declaration may be in electronic, digital,
or other format or form as designated by the commissioner. The
declaration must include the following certification:

"I certify (or declare) under penalty of perjury that the
foregoing is true and correct."

. . . . . . . . . . . .

Date and Place . . . . . . . .(Signature) . . . . . . . . . . . .

(6) A declaration submitted under this section constitutes an oath
required or authorized by law under chapter 9A.72 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.19.410 and 2009 c 549 s 7095 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The commissioner may permit the organization and operation of
examining bureaus for the examination of policies, daily reports,
binders, renewal certificates, endorsements, and other evidences of
insurance or of the cancellation thereof, for the purpose of
ascertaining that lawful rates are being charged.
(2) A bureau shall examine documents with regard to such kinds of
insurance as the commissioner may, after hearing, reasonably require to
be submitted for examination. A bureau may examine documents as to
such other kinds of insurance as the issuing insurers may voluntarily
submit for examination. Upon request of the commissioner, a bureau
shall also examine ((affidavits)) declarations filed pursuant to RCW
48.15.040, surplus lines contracts and related documents, and shall
make recommendations to the commissioner to assist the commissioner in
determining whether surplus lines have been procured in accordance with
chapter 48.15 RCW and rules issued thereunder.
(3) No bureau shall operate unless licensed by the commissioner as
to the kinds of insurance as to which it is permitted so to examine.
To qualify for a license a bureau shall:
(a) Be owned in trust for the benefit of all the insurers regularly
using its services, under a trust agreement approved by the
commissioner.
(b) Make its services available without discrimination to all
authorized insurers applying therefor, subject to such reasonable rules
and regulations as to the obligations of insurers using its services,
as to the conduct of its affairs, and as to the correction of errors
and omissions in documents examined by it as are approved by the
commissioner.
(c) Have no manager or other employee who is an employee of an
insurer other than to the extent that he or she is an employee of the
bureau owned by insurers through such trust agreement.
(d) Pay to the commissioner a fee of ten dollars for issuance of
its license.
(4) Such license shall be of indefinite duration and shall remain
in force until revoked by the commissioner or terminated at the request
of the bureau. The commissioner may revoke the license, after hearing,
(a) if the bureau is no longer qualified therefor;
(b) if the bureau fails to comply with a proper order of the
commissioner;
(c) if the bureau violates or knowingly participates in the
violation of any provision of this code.
(5) Any person aggrieved by any rule, regulation, act or omission
of a bureau may appeal to the commissioner therefrom. The commissioner
shall hold a hearing upon such appeal, and shall make such order upon
the hearing as he or she deems to be proper.
(6) Every such bureau operating in this state shall be subject to
the supervision of the commissioner, and the commissioner shall examine
it as provided in chapter 48.03 RCW of this code.
(7) Every examining bureau shall keep adequate records of the
outstanding errors and omissions found in coverages examined by it and
of its receipts and disbursements, and shall hold as confidential all
information contained in documents submitted to it for examination.
(8) The commissioner shall not license an additional bureau for the
examination of documents relative to a kind of insurance if such
documents are being examined by a then existing licensed bureau. Any
examining bureau operating in this state immediately prior to the
effective date of this code under any law of this state repealed as of
such date, shall have prior right to apply for and secure a license
under this section.

--- END ---