BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) No later than thirty days after the
effective date of this section, the office of financial management
shall establish a working group on language access services.
(2) The working group shall include members that have experience
and knowledge of language access services in Washington state,
including representatives of a statewide association representing
hospitals, community health providers, a statewide association
representing physicians and physician assistants, a statewide labor
union currently working with language access providers, statewide
professional interpreter associations, community-based organizations
that advocate for persons with limited English proficiency, and
language access providers.
(3) The working group shall develop a plan to improve the
efficiency and effectiveness of language access services. The plan
shall describe the best possible means by which the following criteria
are achieved: Administrative and overhead costs, including brokers and
language access agencies, are reduced by at least fifty percent;
timeliness and flexibility for medical providers is improved; the pool
of qualified interpreters is stabilized; and fraud and abuse are
prevented.
(4) The office of financial management shall report the findings of
the working group to the legislature and the governor no later than
September 30, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the entities listed in RCW 41.56.020, this
chapter applies to the governor with respect to language access
providers. Solely for the purposes of collective bargaining and as
expressly limited under subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the
governor is the public employer of language access providers who,
solely for the purposes of collective bargaining, are public employees.
The governor or the governor's designee shall represent the public
employer for bargaining purposes.
(2) There shall be collective bargaining, as defined in RCW
41.56.030, between the governor and language access providers, except
as follows:
(a) A statewide unit of all language access providers is the only
unit appropriate for purposes of collective bargaining under RCW
41.56.060;
(b) The exclusive bargaining representative of language access
providers in the unit specified in (a) of this subsection shall be the
representative chosen in an election conducted pursuant to RCW
41.56.070.
Bargaining authorization cards furnished as the showing of interest
in support of any representation petition or motion for intervention
filed under this section are exempt from disclosure under chapter 42.56
RCW;
(c) Notwithstanding the definition of "collective bargaining" in
RCW 41.56.030(4), the scope of collective bargaining for language
access providers under this section is limited solely to: (i) Economic
compensation; (ii) rules and procedures regarding payments, work rules,
and reimbursements; (iii) certification procedures, professional
development, and training; (iv) labor-management committees; (v)
grievance procedures; and (vi) other economic matters. Retirement
benefits are not subject to collective bargaining. By such obligation
neither party may be compelled to agree to a proposal or be required to
make a concession unless otherwise provided in this chapter;
(d) In addition to the entities listed in the mediation and
interest arbitration provisions of RCW 41.56.430 through 41.56.470 and
41.56.480, the provisions apply to the governor or the governor's
designee and the exclusive bargaining representative of language access
providers, except that:
(i) In addition to the factors to be taken into consideration by an
interest arbitration panel under RCW 41.56.465, the panel shall
consider the financial ability of the state to pay for the compensation
and benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement;
(ii) The decision of the arbitration panel is not binding on the
legislature and, if the legislature does not approve the request for
funds necessary to implement the compensation and benefit provisions of
the arbitrated collective bargaining agreement, the decision is not
binding on the state;
(e) Language access providers do not have the right to strike.
(3) Language access providers who are public employees solely for
the purposes of collective bargaining under subsection (1) of this
section are not, for that reason, employees of the state for any other
purpose. This section applies only to the governance of the collective
bargaining relationship between the employer and language access
providers as provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(4) Each party with whom the department of social and health
services contracts for language access services and each of their
subcontractors shall provide to the department an accurate list of
language access providers, as defined in RCW 41.56.030, including their
names, addresses, and other contact information, annually by January
30th, except that initially the lists must be provided within thirty
days of the effective date of this section. The department shall, upon
request, provide a list of all language access providers, including
their names, addresses, and other contact information, to a labor union
seeking to represent language access providers.
(5) This section does not create or modify:
(a) The department's obligation to comply with the federal statute
and regulations; and
(b) The legislature's right to make programmatic modifications to
the delivery of state services under chapter 74.04 RCW. The governor
may not enter into, extend, or renew any agreement under this chapter
that does not expressly reserve the legislative rights described in
this subsection.
(6) Upon meeting the requirements of subsection (7) of this
section, the governor must submit, as a part of the proposed biennial
or supplemental operating budget submitted to the legislature under RCW
43.88.030, a request for funds necessary to implement the compensation
and benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement entered
into under this section or for legislation necessary to implement the
agreement.
(7) A request for funds necessary to implement the compensation and
benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement entered into
under this section may not be submitted by the governor to the
legislature unless the request has been:
(a) Submitted to the director of financial management by October
1st prior to the legislative session at which the requests are to be
considered, except that, for initial negotiations under this section,
the request may not be submitted before July 1, 2011; and
(b) Certified by the director of financial management as
financially feasible for the state or reflective of a binding decision
of an arbitration panel reached under subsection (2)(d) of this
section.
(8) The legislature must approve or reject the submission of the
request for funds as a whole. If the legislature rejects or fails to
act on the submission, any collective bargaining agreement must be
reopened for the sole purpose of renegotiating the funds necessary to
implement the agreement.
(9) If, after the compensation and benefit provisions of an
agreement are approved by the legislature, a significant revenue
shortfall occurs resulting in reduced appropriations, as declared by
proclamation of the governor or by resolution of the legislature, both
parties shall immediately enter into collective bargaining for a
mutually agreed upon modification of the agreement.
(10) After the expiration date of any collective bargaining
agreement entered into under this section, all of the terms and
conditions specified in the agreement remain in effect until the
effective date of a subsequent agreement, not to exceed one year from
the expiration date stated in the agreement.
(11) In enacting this section, the legislature intends to provide
state action immunity under federal and state antitrust laws for the
joint activities of language access providers and their exclusive
bargaining representative to the extent the activities are authorized
by this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.56.030 and 2007 c 184 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Public employer" means any officer, board, commission,
council, or other person or body acting on behalf of any public body
governed by this chapter, or any subdivision of such public body. For
the purposes of this section, the public employer of district court or
superior court employees for wage-related matters is the respective
county legislative authority, or person or body acting on behalf of the
legislative authority, and the public employer for nonwage-related
matters is the judge or judge's designee of the respective district
court or superior court.
(2) "Public employee" means any employee of a public employer
except any person (a) elected by popular vote, or (b) appointed to
office pursuant to statute, ordinance or resolution for a specified
term of office as a member of a multimember board, commission, or
committee, whether appointed by the executive head or body of the
public employer, or (c) whose duties as deputy, administrative
assistant or secretary necessarily imply a confidential relationship to
(i) the executive head or body of the applicable bargaining unit, or
(ii) any person elected by popular vote, or (iii) any person appointed
to office pursuant to statute, ordinance or resolution for a specified
term of office as a member of a multimember board, commission, or
committee, whether appointed by the executive head or body of the
public employer, or (d) who is a court commissioner or a court
magistrate of superior court, district court, or a department of a
district court organized under chapter 3.46 RCW, or (e) who is a
personal assistant to a district court judge, superior court judge, or
court commissioner. For the purpose of (e) of this subsection, no more
than one assistant for each judge or commissioner may be excluded from
a bargaining unit.
(3) "Bargaining representative" means any lawful organization which
has as one of its primary purposes the representation of employees in
their employment relations with employers.
(4) "Collective bargaining" means the performance of the mutual
obligations of the public employer and the exclusive bargaining
representative to meet at reasonable times, to confer and negotiate in
good faith, and to execute a written agreement with respect to
grievance procedures and collective negotiations on personnel matters,
including wages, hours and working conditions, which may be peculiar to
an appropriate bargaining unit of such public employer, except that by
such obligation neither party shall be compelled to agree to a proposal
or be required to make a concession unless otherwise provided in this
chapter.
(5) "Commission" means the public employment relations commission.
(6) "Executive director" means the executive director of the
commission.
(7) "Uniformed personnel" means: (a) Law enforcement officers as
defined in RCW 41.26.030 employed by the governing body of any city or
town with a population of two thousand five hundred or more and law
enforcement officers employed by the governing body of any county with
a population of ten thousand or more; (b) correctional employees who
are uniformed and nonuniformed, commissioned and noncommissioned
security personnel employed in a jail as defined in RCW
70.48.020(((5))) (9), by a county with a population of seventy thousand
or more, and who are trained for and charged with the responsibility of
controlling and maintaining custody of inmates in the jail and
safeguarding inmates from other inmates; (c) general authority
Washington peace officers as defined in RCW 10.93.020 employed by a
port district in a county with a population of one million or more; (d)
security forces established under RCW 43.52.520; (e) firefighters as
that term is defined in RCW 41.26.030; (f) employees of a port district
in a county with a population of one million or more whose duties
include crash fire rescue or other firefighting duties; (g) employees
of fire departments of public employers who dispatch exclusively either
fire or emergency medical services, or both; or (h) employees in the
several classes of advanced life support technicians, as defined in RCW
18.71.200, who are employed by a public employer.
(8) "Institution of higher education" means the University of
Washington, Washington State University, Central Washington University,
Eastern Washington University, Western Washington University, The
Evergreen State College, and the various state community colleges.
(9) "Home care quality authority" means the authority under chapter
74.39A RCW.
(10) "Individual provider" means an individual provider as defined
in RCW 74.39A.240(4) who, solely for the purposes of collective
bargaining, is a public employee as provided in RCW 74.39A.270.
(11) "Child care subsidy" means a payment from the state through a
child care subsidy program established pursuant to RCW 74.12.340 or
74.08A.340, 45 C.F.R. Sec. 98.1 through 98.17, or any successor
program.
(12) "Family child care provider" means a person who: (a) Provides
regularly scheduled care for a child or children in the home of the
provider or in the home of the child or children for periods of less
than twenty-four hours or, if necessary due to the nature of the
parent's work, for periods equal to or greater than twenty-four hours;
(b) receives child care subsidies; and (c) is either licensed by the
state under RCW 74.15.030 or is exempt from licensing under chapter
74.15 RCW.
(13) "Adult family home provider" means a provider as defined in
RCW 70.128.010 who receives payments from the medicaid and state-funded
long-term care programs.
(14)(a) "Language access provider" means any independent contractor
who provides spoken language interpreter services for department of
social and health services appointments or medicaid enrollee
appointments, or provided these services on or after January 1, 2009,
and before the effective date of this section, whether paid by a
broker, foreign language agency, or the department.
(b) "Language access provider" does not mean an owner, manager, or
employee of a broker or a language access agency.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.56.113 and 2007 c 184 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon the written authorization of an individual provider, a
family child care provider, ((or)) an adult family home provider, or a
language access provider within the bargaining unit and after the
certification or recognition of the bargaining unit's exclusive
bargaining representative, the state as payor, but not as the employer,
shall, subject to subsection (3) of this section, deduct from the
payments to an individual provider, a family child care provider,
((or)) an adult family home provider, or a language access provider the
monthly amount of dues as certified by the secretary of the exclusive
bargaining representative and shall transmit the same to the treasurer
of the exclusive bargaining representative.
(2) If the governor and the exclusive bargaining representative of
a bargaining unit of individual providers, family child care providers,
((or)) adult family home providers, or language access providers enter
into a collective bargaining agreement that:
(a) Includes a union security provision authorized in RCW
41.56.122, the state as payor, but not as the employer, shall, subject
to subsection (3) of this section, enforce the agreement by deducting
from the payments to bargaining unit members the dues required for
membership in the exclusive bargaining representative, or, for
nonmembers thereof, a fee equivalent to the dues; or
(b) Includes requirements for deductions of payments other than the
deduction under (a) of this subsection, the state, as payor, but not as
the employer, shall, subject to subsection (3) of this section, make
such deductions upon written authorization of the individual provider,
family child care provider, ((or)) adult family home provider, or
language access provider.
(3)(a) The initial additional costs to the state in making
deductions from the payments to individual providers, family child care
providers, ((and)) adult family home providers, and language access
providers under this section shall be negotiated, agreed upon in
advance, and reimbursed to the state by the exclusive bargaining
representative.
(b) The allocation of ongoing additional costs to the state in
making deductions from the payments to individual providers, family
child care providers, ((or)) adult family home providers, or language
access providers under this section shall be an appropriate subject of
collective bargaining between the exclusive bargaining representative
and the governor unless prohibited by another statute. If no
collective bargaining agreement containing a provision allocating the
ongoing additional cost is entered into between the exclusive
bargaining representative and the governor, or if the legislature does
not approve funding for the collective bargaining agreement as provided
in RCW 74.39A.300, 41.56.028, or 41.56.029, as applicable, the ongoing
additional costs to the state in making deductions from the payments to
individual providers, family child care providers, ((or)) adult family
home providers, or language access providers under this section shall
be negotiated, agreed upon in advance, and reimbursed to the state by
the exclusive bargaining representative.
(4) The governor and the exclusive bargaining representative of a
bargaining unit of family child care providers may not enter into a
collective bargaining agreement that contains a union security
provision unless the agreement contains a process, to be administered
by the exclusive bargaining representative of a bargaining unit of
family child care providers, for hardship dispensation for license-exempt family child care providers who are also temporary assistance
for needy families recipients or WorkFirst participants.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.04.810 and 2007 c 184 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Individual providers, as defined in RCW 74.39A.240, and family
child care providers, ((as defined in RCW 41.56.030, and)) adult family
home providers, and language access providers, all as defined in RCW
41.56.030, are not employees of the state or any of its political
subdivisions and are specifically and entirely excluded from all
provisions of this title, except as provided in RCW 74.39A.270,
41.56.028, and 41.56.029.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.01.047 and 2007 c 184 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
RCW 43.01.040 through 43.01.044 do not apply to individual
providers under RCW 74.39A.220 through 74.39A.300, family child care
providers under RCW 41.56.028, or adult family home providers under RCW
41.56.029, or language access providers under section 2 of this act.

Sec. 7 RCW 74.04.025 and 1998 c 245 s 143 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department and the office of administrative hearings shall
ensure that bilingual services are provided to non-English speaking
applicants and recipients. The services shall be provided to the
extent necessary to assure that non-English speaking persons are not
denied, or unable to obtain or maintain, services or benefits because
of their inability to speak English.
(2) If the number of non-English speaking applicants or recipients
sharing the same language served by any community service office client
contact job classification equals or exceeds fifty percent of the
average caseload of a full-time position in such classification, the
department shall, through attrition, employ bilingual personnel to
serve such applicants or recipients.
(3) Regardless of the applicant or recipient caseload of any
community service office, each community service office shall ensure
that bilingual services required to supplement the community service
office staff are provided through contracts with ((interpreters, local
agencies, or other community resources)) language access providers.
(4) The department shall certify, authorize, and qualify language
access providers in a manner consistent with any collective bargaining
agreement entered into pursuant to section 2 of this act as needed to
maintain a pool of certified, authorized, and qualified providers.
(5) Initial client contact materials shall inform clients in all
primary languages of the availability of interpretation services for
non-English speaking persons. Basic informational pamphlets shall be
translated into all primary languages.
(((5))) (6) To the extent all written communications directed to
applicants or recipients are not in the primary language of the
applicant or recipient, the department and the office of administrative
hearings shall include with the written communication a notice in all
primary languages of applicants or recipients describing the
significance of the communication and specifically how the applicants
or recipients may receive assistance in understanding, and responding
to if necessary, the written communication. The department shall
assure that sufficient resources are available to assist applicants and
recipients in a timely fashion with understanding, responding to, and
complying with the requirements of all such written communications.
(((6))) (7) As used in this section((,)):
(a) "Language access provider" means any independent contractor who
provides spoken language interpreter services for department
appointments or medicaid enrollee appointments, or provided these
services on or after January 1, 2009, and before the effective date of
this section, whether paid by a broker, foreign language agency, or the
department. "Language access provider" does not mean an owner,
manager, or employee of a broker or a language access agency.
(b) "Primary languages" includes but is not limited to Spanish,
Vietnamese, Cambodian, Laotian, and Chinese.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

--- END ---