BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 38.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that recent flooding events over the last
several years have put citizens and businesses in devastating
situations that have resulted in extreme economic loss. This is
particularly critical near the perimeters of rivers and the low-lying
areas of Pierce county. While it is important for the state to provide
public safety and emergency response during an emergency resulting from
a natural disaster, it is equally important to provide emergency
preparedness and disaster mitigation information prior to an emergency,
and recovery and disaster mitigation help after an emergency; all of
which will contribute to making the public more prepared during an
emergency response.
(2) Washington state's topography, geography, location, and history
show that certain areas of the state are at particular risk to both
natural disasters and human-caused disasters. The economic impact from
the 2007 flood disasters alone in Washington were estimated at over
five hundred million dollars. Winter weather conditions and water
levels near such Pierce county rivers as the Puyallup, White,
Nisqually, and Carbon rivers, the Carbon river valley, as well as the
creeks and rivers near the base of Mount Rainier alone provide the
possibility of sudden flood conditions on any given day in parts of
Pierce county. These changes may include rapidly rising water, river
flooding, widespread inundation, road closures, utility disruptions,
loss of homes, and the loss and closure of many businesses in the
Sumner, Orting, Milton, McMillan, and Wilkeson areas located in Pierce
county. Severe flooding has the potential to damage businesses
throughout the state and the western United States. In response,
Washington state and local governments have implemented all hazards
emergency management and disaster response plans. However, recent
studies have revealed the lack of a secure funding source that impedes
Pierce county's ability to fully integrate and coordinate comprehensive
disaster preparedness planning.
(3) Recognizing that all disasters are local disasters, the
legislature intends to strengthen emergency response, mitigation,
preparation, and coordination by establishing a source of funding for
flood control and relocation of those private citizens and businesses
that may be displaced during a flood disaster.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The sum of ten million dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium
ending June 30, 2011, from the state building construction account to
the Washington military department, working in cooperation with the
flood division of the department of ecology, the Pierce county
emergency management department, and other respective local
governments, as appropriate, to participate in flood hazard mitigation
and response projects for the Pierce county area.
(2) The Washington military department shall administer the Pierce
county flood assistance funds and establish rules for its
administration in consultation with the emergency management council
and the Washington state emergency management association. The
Washington military department shall use the ten million dollars in
appropriated funding for relocation costs (including, but not limited
to, land acquisition) of public facilities, infrastructure, and
citizens and businesses that are displaced by Pierce county flooding
conditions.
(3) Projects funded under this section shall include, but need not
be limited to, projects that will promote neighborhood level public
education on disaster preparedness.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---