BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.17.400 and 2007 c 27 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 49.17.400
through 49.17.430 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Apprentice operator or trainee" means a crane operator who has
not met requirements established by the department under RCW 49.17.430.
(2) "Attachments" includes, but is not limited to, crane-attached
or suspended hooks, magnets, grapples, clamshell buckets, orange peel
buckets, concrete buckets, drag lines, personnel platforms, augers, or
drills and pile-driving equipment.
(3) "Certified crane inspector" means a crane inspector who has
been certified by the department.
(4) "Construction" means all or any part of excavation,
construction, erection, alteration, repair, demolition, and dismantling
of buildings and other structures and all related operations; the
excavation, construction, alteration, and repair of sewers, trenches,
caissons, conduits, pipelines, roads, and all related operations; the
moving of buildings and other structures, and the construction,
alteration, repair, or removal of wharfs, docks, bridges, culverts,
trestles, piers, abutments, or any other related construction,
alteration, repair, or removal work. "Construction" does not include
manufacturing facilities or powerhouses. "Construction" does not mean
the delivery of materials to a job site to the extent this exclusion is
not in conflict with standards adopted or recognized under the
authority of the occupational safety and health act of 1970 (P.L. 91-956; 84 Stat. 1590) as determined by the department by rule.
(5) "Crane" means power-operated equipment used in construction
that can hoist, lower, and horizontally move a suspended load. "Crane"
includes, but is not limited to: Articulating cranes, such as knuckle-boom cranes; crawler cranes; floating cranes; cranes on barges;
locomotive cranes; mobile cranes, such as wheel-mounted, rough-terrain,
all-terrain, commercial truck mounted, and boom truck cranes;
multipurpose machines when configured to hoist and lower by means of a
winch or hook and horizontally move a suspended load; industrial
cranes, such as carry-deck cranes; dedicated pile drivers;
service/mechanic trucks with a hoisting device; a crane on a monorail;
tower cranes, such as fixed jib, hammerhead boom, luffing boom, and
self-erecting; pedestal cranes; portal cranes; overhead and gantry
cranes; straddle cranes; side-boom tractors; derricks; and variations
of such equipment.
(6) "Crane operator" means an individual engaged in the operation
of a crane.
(7) "Professional engineer" means a professional engineer as
defined in RCW 18.43.020.
(8) "Qualified crane operator" means a crane operator who meets the
requirements established by the department under RCW 49.17.430.
(9) "Safety or health standard" means a standard adopted under this
chapter.

--- END ---