BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 By December 1, 2010, the department of
health shall:
(1) Examine and improve hospital discharge and follow-up care
procedures for premature infants born earlier than thirty-seven weeks
gestational age to promote standardized and coordinated processes as
premature infants leave the hospital from either a level 1 well baby
nursery, level 2 step down or transitional nursery, or level 3 neonatal
intensive care unit and transition to follow-up care by a health care
provider in the community;
(2) Use guidance from the centers for medicare and medicaid
services' neonatal outcomes improvement project to implement programs
to improve newborn outcomes, reduce newborn health costs, and establish
ongoing quality improvement for newborns; and
(3) Report data regarding the incidence and cause of
rehospitalization in the first six months of life for infants born
premature at earlier than thirty-seven weeks gestational age to the
appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives.

--- END ---