BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to regulate soil
science and wetland science as professions by establishing minimum
standards of ethical conduct and professional responsibility and by
establishing professional education and experience requirements for
those persons representing to the public that they are soil scientists
or wetland scientists certified by the state. Nothing in this chapter
prevents uncertified soil scientists or uncertified wetland scientists
from conducting their normal work and activities, as long as they do
not use the regulated title defined in this chapter. Nothing in this
chapter prevents other professionals in related agriculture, earth and
physical sciences from performing their normal and customary work and
activities as long as they do not use the regulated title defined in
this chapter. This list of other professionals includes, but is not
limited to: Engineers, geologists, geotechnical professionals,
architects, landscape architects, foresters, agronomists, farmers, and
ranchers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the regulatory board created in section 5 of this
act.
(2) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of licensing.
(4) "Holder" means a person who has been issued a certificate under
this chapter.
(5) "Responsible charge" means the exercise of fully independent
control and direction of soil science or wetland science work, or both,
or the supervision of the work, and being fully responsible,
answerable, accountable, or liable for the results.
(6) "Soil" means a living ecosystem that is composed of living and
once-living organic materials combined with inorganic mineral materials
derived from the break down and weathering of rocks at the earth's
surface. Soil develops as a result of weathering processes that
reflect effects of climate, topography or position on landscape, and
biogeochemical processes acting on the original parent material over
time. These changes occur as a result of the four agents of soil
formation: Additions, losses, translocations, and transformations.
Soil extends from the surface of the earth down to undifferentiated or
unweathered parent material.
(a) "Soil science" means the science that:
(i) Involves the study of various aspects of the living soil
ecosystem and includes the following focused subject areas:
(A) Soil physics;
(B) Soil chemistry and mineralogy;
(C) Soil biochemistry;
(D) Soil fertility; and
(E) Soil genesis, soil geomorphology, and classification; and
(ii) Can be used to provide information for projects including, but
not limited to, the following:
(A) Management of water quantity by calculating hydraulic
conductivity and utilizing or monitoring near-surface infiltration and
percolation capabilities on a soil-specific basis;
(B) Treatment of polluted water using soil microbial populations
working in concert with natural soil chemistry and mineralogy;
(C) Treatment of polluted soils using soil biochemical and physical
applications;
(D) Preparation of soil erosion control plans, or evaluation of
soil erosion potential;
(E) Interpretation of soil morphology or hydrology that indicates
a wetland condition;
(F) Conservation, protection, and enhancement of soil carbon
sequestration and storage processes for the purposes of reducing carbon
dioxide and other greenhouse gases; and
(G) Preparation of detailed soil maps that can be used for
site-specific soil management, such as erosion control plans.
(b) "Soil science" does not describe a state-regulated practice,
and does not mean the study, description, amelioration, or engineering
of unconsolidated materials above bedrock as defined in traditional
practice of geologists, engineers, and foresters. Soil science
specifically does not include practice of soil mechanics or the
evaluation of mass wasting or landslide processes with the exception of
studies involved with surface soil erosion and standard soil physics
processes.
(7) "State certified soil scientist" means a person who, by reason
of the person's knowledge of soil science, mathematics, the
environment, and the supporting physical and life sciences, acquired by
education and practical experience, has met the qualifications
established under this chapter, and has been issued a certificate as a
soil scientist by the director.
(8) "State certified wetland scientist" means a person who, by
reason of the person's knowledge of wetland science, mathematics, the
environment, and the supporting physical and life sciences, acquired by
education and practical experience, has met the qualifications
established under this chapter, and has been issued a certificate as a
wetland scientist by the director.
(9) "Wetland" as defined in RCW 36.70A.030, means an area that:
(a) Predominantly supports wetland vegetation;
(b) Has hydric soils; and
(c) Has wetland hydrology.
(10) "Wetland science" means the science that:
(a) Studies wetland systems and includes, but is not limited to,
the following focused subject areas:
(i) Wetland delineation, which is the formal identification and
marking of the wetland boundary on the land surface;
(ii) Wetland mitigation, which provides compensation to offset
wetland or wetland buffer losses as required by federal, state, or
local regulations;
(iii) Wetland classification, which defines and groups wetlands
into discrete ecologically or geomorphically based units which are used
to create management plans or to rate wetlands;
(iv) Wetland rating, which is used to evaluate a wetland's quality
based on individual functions and values;
(v) Wetland monitoring, including vegetation and near-surface
hydrology monitoring; and
(vi) Wetland ecology, which evaluates the interrelationship of
organisms and their wetland environments; and
(b) Can be used to provide information for projects including, but
not limited to, the following:
(i) Providing assistance with defining developable portions of a
property, based on local regulations, as might be limited by wetland or
stream presence and their related buffers; or
(ii) Assessing wetland type or functions for purposes of
identifying compensation or mitigation; or
(iii) Carrying out long-term wetland monitoring programs, intended
to define whether an implemented mitigation plan has met specified
permit requirements and conditions established by local, state, or
federal government officials.
"Wetland science" does not describe a state-regulated practice, and
does not mean the study, description, and amelioration of wetlands as
is specifically defined or carried out in traditional practice of
geologists, engineers, and foresters.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, it is unlawful for a person to use in connection with the
person's name or otherwise assume or advertise the title state
certified soil scientist, state certified wetland scientist, or a title
conveying the impression that the person is a state-certified soil
scientist or state-certified wetland scientist unless the person has
received the appropriate certification under this chapter.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section may not be interpreted to apply
to:
(a) Officers and employees of the United States using the title of
certified soil scientist or certified wetland scientist solely as such
officers or employees;
(b) Persons using the title of certified soil scientist or
certified wetland scientist on manuscripts or reports resulting from
research at an academic institution; and
(c) Persons using the title of certified soil scientist or
certified wetland scientist while teaching soil science or wetland
science or related physical or natural sciences in an academic
institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Whether a person or entity hires or does not
hire a person certified under this chapter is not admissible in an
action for damages or negligence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1)(a) There is created a board for soil
scientists and wetland scientists consisting of seven members appointed
by the director.
(b) Three members must be conversant with and experienced in the
soil science profession; three members must be conversant with and
experienced in the wetland science profession; and one member must
represent the public. Subsequent to the initial appointments, all
members except for the public member must be certified under this
chapter. Each member of the board must be a resident of the state.
The public member may not be or may not have ever been a state
certified soil scientist or a state certified wetland scientist and may
not employ or may not be employed by, or professionally or financially
associated with, a state certified soil scientist or state certified
wetland scientist.
(c) The director shall deliver a certificate of appointment to each
member of the board. The individuals appointed to the board must be
chosen from across the state, and from both public and private sectors,
utilizing geographic and experiential diversity as much as possible.
The terms of the members of the board must be three years, except that
the initial appointees to the board shall serve the following terms to
be specified by the director: Two members for one year; two members
for two years; and three members for three years. No member of the
board is eligible for reappointment to a third consecutive term, but
any member is eligible for reappointment after an absence of at least
one year from the board. Any member who is reappointed following an
absence of at least one year from the board is eligible for
reappointment to a second consecutive term and is again eligible for
reappointment after an absence of at least one year from the board. No
member of the board, other than the public member, may be considered
for reappointment if not certified in accordance with this chapter.
(2)(a) Members of the board serve until replaced by a subsequent
appointment, even if their appointment exceeds the length of their
term, but may resign prior to completing the term of appointment.
(b) The director may for just cause remove a member of the
regulatory board. The director shall appoint a new member to fill any
vacancy in the regulatory board for the remainder of the unexpired
term.
(3) The board shall elect a chair, a vice-chair, and a secretary.
The secretary may delegate his or her authority to the executive
director.
(4) The director shall employ an executive director, subject to
approval of the board.
(5) Members of the board must be compensated in accordance with RCW
43.03.240 and must be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(6) Four members constitute a quorum of the board.
(7) At the request of the board, the director may appoint
additional temporary members to the board for assistance with rule
development and technical advice on complaints. Temporary members must
meet the same minimum qualifications as regular members of the board.
Temporary members have all the powers, duties, and immunities of
regular members of the board and must be compensated in accordance with
RCW 43.03.240 and must be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance
with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The director shall limit the term of
temporary members to one year, but may extend the original appointment
up to one additional year at the request of the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The board has the following authority in
administering this chapter:
(1) To adopt, amend, and rescind rules as deemed necessary to carry
out this chapter;
(2) To establish the minimum qualification for applicants for
certification as provided by this chapter;
(3) To approve the method of administration for examinations
required by this chapter or by rule;
(4) To adopt or recognize examinations prepared by other
organizations;
(5) To set the time and place of examinations, with the approval of
the director;
(6) To adopt standards of professional conduct and practice. Rules
of professional conduct will be consistent with those outlined for
similarly regulated professions; and
(7) To take disciplinary action for violations of this chapter, as
provided in chapter 18.235 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The director has the following authority in
administering this chapter:
(1) To adopt fees as provided in RCW 43.24.086;
(2) To administer certification examinations approved by the board;
and
(3) To make appointments or modify appointments to the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) An applicant who applies for soil
scientist certification or wetland scientist certification before July
1, 2012, is considered qualified for certification, without further
written examination, if the applicant meets the standards described in
subsections (2)(a) and (3) of this section for soil scientists and
subsections (2)(a) and (4) of this section for wetland scientists.
After July 1, 2012, the applicants must meet all of the standards
described in subsections (2) and (3) of this section for soil
scientists and subsections (2) and (4) of this section for wetland
scientists in order to qualify for certification.
(2) In order to become either a state certified soil scientist or
a state certified wetland scientist, an applicant must:
(a) Be of good moral and ethical character as attested to by
letters of reference submitted by the applicant or as otherwise
determined by the director; and
(b) Pass an examination developed or accepted by the board covering
soil science subject matter for the soil scientist applicant or wetland
science subject matter for the wetland scientist applicant.
(3) For a Washington state certified soil scientist, an applicant
must:
(a) Have graduated from a course of study from an accredited
college or university with a four-year degree in soil science, or other
physical, or natural resources science curriculum considered
satisfactory to the board; and
(b) Have a documented record of a minimum of five years of
experience, obtained after completion of the majority of the academic
requirements specified in this section, in soil science work of a
character satisfactory to the board, demonstrating that the applicant
is qualified to assume responsible charge of the work upon
certification as a soil scientist. At least two years of the
experience must be gained under the supervision of a soil scientist
certified or credentialed in this or any other state, or under the
supervision of others who, in the opinion of the board, are qualified
to have responsible charge of soil science work. The board may accept
up to two years of postgraduate study, either M.S. or Ph.D., in soil
science research, or up to two years of research or teaching of soil
science at the college or university level, as qualifying experience,
provided that the graduate work, research or teaching, in the judgment
of the board, is comparable to experience obtained in the practice of
soil science.
(4) For a wetland scientist, the applicant must:
(a) Have graduated from a course of study from an accredited
college or university with a four-year degree in wetland science,
biology, ecology, soil science, environmental science, hydrology,
environmental studies, or other biological, physical, or natural
resources science curriculums considered satisfactory to the board.
Other qualifying education or training may be accepted, including
continuing education classes or formal training in wetland science
outside of a college environment if the training is reviewed and
considered satisfactory to the board; and
(b) Have a documented record of a minimum of three years of
professional experience obtained after completion of the majority of
academic requirements specified in this section, in wetland science
work of a character satisfactory to the board, demonstrating that the
applicant is qualified to assume responsible charge of the work upon
certification as a wetland scientist. At least two years of the
experience must be gained under the supervision of a wetland scientist
certified or credentialed in this or any other state, or under the
supervision of others who, in the opinion of the board, are qualified
to have responsible charge of wetland science work. The board may
accept up to two years of postgraduate study, either M.S. or Ph.D., in
wetland science research, or up to two years of research or teaching of
wetland science at the college or university level, as qualifying
experience, provided that the graduate work, research or teaching, in
the judgment of the board, is comparable to experience obtained in the
practice of wetland science.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The examination for a soil scientist's
certificate or a wetland scientist's certificate shall be held at least
annually at such time and place as the board determines.
(2) The board shall determine the content, scope, and grading
process of the examination. The board may adopt an appropriate
national examination and grading procedure.
(3) Applicants who fail to pass any section of the examination
shall be permitted to retake the parts failed as prescribed by the
board. If the entire examination is not successfully completed within
five years, a retake of the entire examination shall be required.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 An application for certification must be
filed with the director on a form provided by the director. The
director may require any information and documentation that reasonably
relates to the need to determine whether the applicant meets the
criteria for certification. Fees for initial certification include
issuance of a certificate and are nonrefundable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) The director shall issue a certificate
to any applicant who has satisfactorily met all of the requirements of
this chapter for certification as a soil scientist or wetland
scientist. The certificate must show the full name of the holder, have
a unique certification number, and be signed by the director. The
issuance by the director of a certificate to an individual is prima
facie evidence that the person is entitled to all the rights and
privileges of a state certified soil scientist or a state certified
wetland scientist while the certificate remains unrevoked or unexpired.
(2) Each holder must obtain a seal of the design authorized by the
director, bearing the holder's name, certification number, and the
legend "Washington state certified soil scientist" or "Washington state
certified wetland scientist." Soil science or wetland science reports,
plans, and other technical documents prepared by or under the
responsible charge of the holder must be signed, dated, and stamped
with the seal or facsimile of the seal. Each signature and stamping
constitutes a certification by the holder that the document was
prepared by or under the holder's responsible charge and that, to the
holder's knowledge and belief, the document was prepared in accordance
with the requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The director may, upon application and
payment of a fee determined by the director as provided in RCW
43.24.086, issue a certificate to any person who holds valid
credentials issued by the proper authority of any state, territory, or
possession of the United States, District of Columbia, or any foreign
country, if the applicant's qualifications, as evaluated by the board,
meet the requirements of this chapter and the rules adopted by the
board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The board shall require persons certified
under this chapter to obtain continuing professional development or
continuing education. The board may also require these certificate
holders to demonstrate maintenance of knowledge and skills as a
condition of certificate renewal, including peer review of work
products.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Certificates issued under this chapter must
be renewed periodically on a date to be set by the director. Fees for
renewals must be set by the director by rule as provided in RCW
43.24.086. Any holder who fails to pay the prescribed fee must have
his or her certificate classified as delinquent. Certificate holders
who fail to pay the renewal fee within thirty days of the due date
shall pay a penalty fee equal to one year's renewal. Any certificate
that has been delinquent for five years or more may be reinstated in
conformance with rules adopted by the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 All receipts from fees and fines collected
under this chapter must be deposited into the business and professions
account described in RCW 43.24.150. Expenditures from the fees and
fines collected under this chapter deposited in the account may be used
only for the purposes of administering this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 In addition to the unprofessional conduct
described in RCW 18.235.130, the following conduct, acts, and
conditions constitute unprofessional conduct:
(1) Violating any of the provisions of this chapter or the rules
adopted under this chapter;
(2) Committing any other act, or failing to act, in a manner
contrary to normal professional conduct or contrary to a standard
generally expected of those practicing soil science or wetland science;
(3) Failing to respond to inquiries from clients or other
professionals regarding conflicts with the holder's work, opinions, or
procedures, in a manner that would be expected from a prudent
practitioner;
(4) Modifying another holder's work without notifying that holder
and clearly describing the modifications in writing and signing the
report describing the modifications. However, this subsection does not
apply when the plans, maps, or documents are modified by the owner to
reflect changes over time for the owner's own purposes and are not used
for submittals or bid documents;
(5) Offering or accepting money, goods, or other favors as
inducement to receive favorable consideration for a professional
assignment or as an inducement to approve, authorize, or influence the
granting of a professional assignment;
(6) Soliciting or accepting gratuities, directly or indirectly,
from contractors, their agents, or other parties dealing with clients
or employers in connection with work for which the holder is
responsible;
(7) Using privileged information coming to the holder in the course
of his or her assignments as a means of making personal profit beyond
their professional compensation;
(8) Requesting, proposing, or accepting professional commissions on
a contingent basis under circumstances in which the holder's integrity
may be compromised;
(9) Falsifying records, making false statements, intimidating or
slandering professional peers;
(10) Willfully attempting to interfere with a director's
investigation by falsifying records, making false statements, or
intimidating or influencing witnesses; or
(11) Willfully attempting to suborn another person to violate the
law, public policy, or his or her code of professional ethics.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 The director shall immediately suspend the
certificate of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW
74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person
who is not in compliance with a child support order. If the person has
continued to meet all other requirements for a certificate under this
chapter during the suspension, reissuance of the certificate must be
automatic upon the director's receipt of a release issued by the
department of social and health services stating that the holder is in
compliance with the child support order. The procedure in RCW
74.20A.320 is the exclusive administrative remedy for contesting the
establishment of noncompliance with a child support order, and
suspension of a certificate under this section, and satisfies the
requirements of RCW 34.05.422.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 The director shall suspend the certificate
or registration of any person who has been certified by a lending
agency and reported to the department for nonpayment or default on a
federally or state-guaranteed educational loan or service-conditional
scholarship. Prior to the suspension, the agency must provide the
person an opportunity for a brief adjudicative proceeding under RCW
34.05.485 through 34.05.494 and issue a finding of nonpayment or
default on a federally or state-guaranteed educational loan or
service-conditional scholarship. The person's certificate or
registration may not be reissued until the person provides the director
a written release issued by the lending agency stating that the person
is making payments on the loan in accordance with a repayment agreement
approved by the lending agency. If the person has continued to meet
all other requirements for certification or registration during the
suspension, reinstatement is automatic upon receipt of the notice and
payment of any reinstatement fee the director may impose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 The uniform regulation of business and
professions act, chapter 18.235 RCW, governs the issuance and denial of
certificates, and the discipline of holders under this chapter.

Sec. 20 RCW 18.235.020 and 2009 c 412 s 22 and 2009 c 102 s 5 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) This chapter applies only to the director and the boards and
commissions having jurisdiction in relation to the businesses and
professions licensed under the chapters specified in this section.
This chapter does not apply to any business or profession not licensed
under the chapters specified in this section.
(2)(a) The director has authority under this chapter in relation to
the following businesses and professions:
(i) Auctioneers under chapter 18.11 RCW;
(ii) Bail bond agents and bail bond recovery agents under chapter
18.185 RCW;
(iii) Camping resorts' operators and salespersons under chapter
19.105 RCW;
(iv) Commercial telephone solicitors under chapter 19.158 RCW;
(v) Cosmetologists, barbers, manicurists, and estheticians under
chapter 18.16 RCW;
(vi) Court reporters under chapter 18.145 RCW;
(vii) Driver training schools and instructors under chapter 46.82
RCW;
(viii) Employment agencies under chapter 19.31 RCW;
(ix) For hire vehicle operators under chapter 46.72 RCW;
(x) Limousines under chapter 46.72A RCW;
(xi) Notaries public under chapter 42.44 RCW;
(xii) Private investigators under chapter 18.165 RCW;
(xiii) Professional boxing, martial arts, and wrestling under
chapter 67.08 RCW;
(xiv) Real estate appraisers under chapter 18.140 RCW;
(xv) Real estate brokers and salespersons under chapters 18.85 and
18.86 RCW;
(xvi) Security guards under chapter 18.170 RCW;
(xvii) Sellers of travel under chapter 19.138 RCW;
(xviii) Timeshares and timeshare salespersons under chapter 64.36
RCW;
(xix) Whitewater river outfitters under chapter 79A.60 RCW; ((and))
(xx) Home inspectors under chapter 18.280 RCW; and
(xxi) Body artists, body piercers, and tattoo artists, and body
art, body piercing, and tattooing shops and businesses, under chapter
18.300 RCW.
(b) The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter
are as follows:
(i) The state board of registration for architects established in
chapter 18.08 RCW;
(ii) The Washington state collection agency board established in
chapter 19.16 RCW;
(iii) The state board of registration for professional engineers
and land surveyors established in chapter 18.43 RCW governing licenses
issued under chapters 18.43 and 18.210 RCW;
(iv) The funeral and cemetery board established in chapter 18.39
RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.39 and 68.05 RCW;
(v) The state board of registration for landscape architects
established in chapter 18.96 RCW; ((and))
(vi) The state geologist licensing board established in chapter
18.220 RCW; and
(vii) The state board of soil scientists and wetland scientists
established in chapter 18.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section
25 of this act).
(3) In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the
disciplinary authority may grant or deny licenses based on the
conditions and criteria established in this chapter and the chapters
specified in subsection (2) of this section. This chapter also governs
any investigation, hearing, or proceeding relating to denial of
licensure or issuance of a license conditioned on the applicant's
compliance with an order entered under RCW 18.235.110 by the
disciplinary authority.

Sec. 21 RCW 18.235.020 and 2009 c 412 s 22, 2009 c 370 s 20, and
2009 c 102 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) This chapter applies only to the director and the boards and
commissions having jurisdiction in relation to the businesses and
professions licensed under the chapters specified in this section.
This chapter does not apply to any business or profession not licensed
under the chapters specified in this section.
(2)(a) The director has authority under this chapter in relation to
the following businesses and professions:
(i) Auctioneers under chapter 18.11 RCW;
(ii) Bail bond agents and bail bond recovery agents under chapter
18.185 RCW;
(iii) Camping resorts' operators and salespersons under chapter
19.105 RCW;
(iv) Commercial telephone solicitors under chapter 19.158 RCW;
(v) Cosmetologists, barbers, manicurists, and estheticians under
chapter 18.16 RCW;
(vi) Court reporters under chapter 18.145 RCW;
(vii) Driver training schools and instructors under chapter 46.82
RCW;
(viii) Employment agencies under chapter 19.31 RCW;
(ix) For hire vehicle operators under chapter 46.72 RCW;
(x) Limousines under chapter 46.72A RCW;
(xi) Notaries public under chapter 42.44 RCW;
(xii) Private investigators under chapter 18.165 RCW;
(xiii) Professional boxing, martial arts, and wrestling under
chapter 67.08 RCW;
(xiv) Real estate appraisers under chapter 18.140 RCW;
(xv) Real estate brokers and salespersons under chapters 18.85 and
18.86 RCW;
(xvi) Security guards under chapter 18.170 RCW;
(xvii) Sellers of travel under chapter 19.138 RCW;
(xviii) Timeshares and timeshare salespersons under chapter 64.36
RCW;
(xix) Whitewater river outfitters under chapter 79A.60 RCW; ((and))
(xx) Home inspectors under chapter 18.280 RCW; and
(xxi) Body artists, body piercers, and tattoo artists, and body
art, body piercing, and tattooing shops and businesses, under chapter
18.300 RCW.
(b) The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter
are as follows:
(i) The state board of registration for architects established in
chapter 18.08 RCW;
(ii) The Washington state collection agency board established in
chapter 19.16 RCW;
(iii) The state board of registration for professional engineers
and land surveyors established in chapter 18.43 RCW governing licenses
issued under chapters 18.43 and 18.210 RCW;
(iv) The funeral and cemetery board established in chapter 18.39
RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.39 and 68.05 RCW;
(v) The state board of licensure for landscape architects
established in chapter 18.96 RCW; ((and))
(vi) The state geologist licensing board established in chapter
18.220 RCW; and
(vii) The state board of soil scientists and wetland scientists
established in chapter 18.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section
25 of this act).
(3) In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the
disciplinary authority may grant or deny licenses based on the
conditions and criteria established in this chapter and the chapters
specified in subsection (2) of this section. This chapter also governs
any investigation, hearing, or proceeding relating to denial of
licensure or issuance of a license conditioned on the applicant's
compliance with an order entered under RCW 18.235.110 by the
disciplinary authority.

Sec. 22 RCW 43.24.150 and 2009 c 429 s 4 and 2009 c 370 s 19 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The business and professions account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from business or professional licenses,
registrations, certifications, renewals, examinations, or civil
penalties assessed and collected by the department from the following
chapters must be deposited into the account:
(a) Chapter 18.11 RCW, auctioneers;
(b) Chapter 18.16 RCW, cosmetologists, barbers, and manicurists;
(c) Chapter 18.145 RCW, court reporters;
(d) Chapter 18.165 RCW, private investigators;
(e) Chapter 18.170 RCW, security guards;
(f) Chapter 18.185 RCW, bail bond agents;
(g) Chapter 18.280 RCW, home inspectors;
(h) Chapter 19.16 RCW, collection agencies;
(i) Chapter 19.31 RCW, employment agencies;
(j) Chapter 19.105 RCW, camping resorts;
(k) Chapter 19.138 RCW, sellers of travel;
(l) Chapter 42.44 RCW, notaries public;
(m) Chapter 64.36 RCW, timeshares; ((and))
(n) Chapter 67.08 RCW, boxing, martial arts, and wrestling; and
(o) Chapter 18.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 25 of
this act), soil scientists and wetland scientists.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for expenses incurred in
carrying out these business and professions licensing activities of the
department. Any residue in the account shall be accumulated and shall
not revert to the general fund at the end of the biennium.
(2) The director shall biennially prepare a budget request based on
the anticipated costs of administering the business and professions
licensing activities listed in subsection (1) of this section, which
shall include the estimated income from these business and professions
fees.

Sec. 23 RCW 43.24.150 and 2009 c 429 s 4, 2009 c 412 s 21, and
2009 c 370 s 19 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The business and professions account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from business or professional licenses,
registrations, certifications, renewals, examinations, or civil
penalties assessed and collected by the department from the following
chapters must be deposited into the account:
(a) Chapter 18.11 RCW, auctioneers;
(b) Chapter 18.16 RCW, cosmetologists, barbers, and manicurists;
(c) Chapter 18.145 RCW, court reporters;
(d) Chapter 18.165 RCW, private investigators;
(e) Chapter 18.170 RCW, security guards;
(f) Chapter 18.185 RCW, bail bond agents;
(g) Chapter 18.280 RCW, home inspectors;
(h) Chapter 19.16 RCW, collection agencies;
(i) Chapter 19.31 RCW, employment agencies;
(j) Chapter 19.105 RCW, camping resorts;
(k) Chapter 19.138 RCW, sellers of travel;
(l) Chapter 42.44 RCW, notaries public;
(m) Chapter 64.36 RCW, timeshares;
(n) Chapter 67.08 RCW, boxing, martial arts, and wrestling; ((and))
(o) Chapter 18.300 RCW, body art, body piercing, and tattooing; and
(p) Chapter 18.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 25 of
this act), soil scientists and wetland scientists.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for expenses incurred in
carrying out these business and professions licensing activities of the
department. Any residue in the account shall be accumulated and shall
not revert to the general fund at the end of the biennium.
(2) The director shall biennially prepare a budget request based on
the anticipated costs of administering the business and professions
licensing activities listed in subsection (1) of this section, which
shall include the estimated income from these business and professions
fees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 Sections 1 through 19 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 Sections 20 and 22 of this act expire July
1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 Sections 1, 2, 4 through 10, 15, 21, 23,
and 24 of this act take effect July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 Sections 3, 11 through 14, and 16 through
19 of this act take effect July 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 The director of the department of licensing
may take the necessary steps to ensure that sections 3, 10 through 13,
and 15 through 19 of this act are implemented by July 1, 2012.

--- END ---