BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The Washington institute for public
policy shall, in collaboration with the department of social and health
services and other applicable entities, undertake a search for a
validated mental health assessment tool or combination of tools to be
used by designated mental health professionals when undertaking
assessments of individuals for detention, commitment, and revocation
under the involuntary treatment act pursuant to chapter 71.05 RCW.
(2) This section expires June 30, 2011.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.05.020 and 2009 c 320 s 1 and 2009 c 217 s 20 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Admission" or "admit" means a decision by a physician or
psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner that a person should
be examined or treated as a patient in a hospital;
(2) "Antipsychotic medications" means that class of drugs primarily
used to treat serious manifestations of mental illness associated with
thought disorders, which includes, but is not limited to atypical
antipsychotic medications;
(3) "Attending staff" means any person on the staff of a public or
private agency having responsibility for the care and treatment of a
patient;
(4) "Commitment" means the determination by a court that a person
should be detained for a period of either evaluation or treatment, or
both, in an inpatient or a less restrictive setting;
(5) "Conditional release" means a revocable modification of a
commitment, which may be revoked upon violation of any of its terms;
(6) "Crisis stabilization unit" means a short-term facility or a
portion of a facility licensed by the department of health and
certified by the department of social and health services under RCW
71.24.035, such as an evaluation and treatment facility or a hospital,
which has been designed to assess, diagnose, and treat individuals
experiencing an acute crisis without the use of long-term
hospitalization;
(7) "Custody" means involuntary detention under the provisions of
this chapter or chapter 10.77 RCW, uninterrupted by any period of
unconditional release from commitment from a facility providing
involuntary care and treatment;
(8) "Department" means the department of social and health
services;
(9) "Designated chemical dependency specialist" means a person
designated by the county alcoholism and other drug addiction program
coordinator designated under RCW 70.96A.310 to perform the commitment
duties described in chapters 70.96A and 70.96B RCW;
(10) "Designated crisis responder" means a mental health
professional appointed by the county or the regional support network to
perform the duties specified in this chapter;
(11) "Designated mental health professional" means a mental health
professional designated by the county or other authority authorized in
rule to perform the duties specified in this chapter;
(12) "Detention" or "detain" means the lawful confinement of a
person, under the provisions of this chapter;
(13) "Developmental disabilities professional" means a person who
has specialized training and three years of experience in directly
treating or working with persons with developmental disabilities and is
a psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse
practitioner, or social worker, and such other developmental
disabilities professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the
secretary;
(14) "Developmental disability" means that condition defined in RCW
71A.10.020(3);
(15) "Discharge" means the termination of hospital medical
authority. The commitment may remain in place, be terminated, or be
amended by court order;
(16) "Evaluation and treatment facility" means any facility which
can provide directly, or by direct arrangement with other public or
private agencies, emergency evaluation and treatment, outpatient care,
and timely and appropriate inpatient care to persons suffering from a
mental disorder, and which is certified as such by the department. A
physically separate and separately operated portion of a state hospital
may be designated as an evaluation and treatment facility. A facility
which is part of, or operated by, the department or any federal agency
will not require certification. No correctional institution or
facility, or jail, shall be an evaluation and treatment facility within
the meaning of this chapter;
(17) "Gravely disabled" means a condition in which a person, as a
result of a mental disorder: (a) Is in danger of serious physical harm
resulting from a failure to provide for his or her essential human
needs of health or safety; or (b) manifests severe deterioration in
routine functioning evidenced by repeated and escalating loss of
cognitive or volitional control over his or her actions and is not
receiving such care as is essential for his or her health or safety;
(18) "Habilitative services" means those services provided by
program personnel to assist persons in acquiring and maintaining life
skills and in raising their levels of physical, mental, social, and
vocational functioning. Habilitative services include education,
training for employment, and therapy. The habilitative process shall
be undertaken with recognition of the risk to the public safety
presented by the person being assisted as manifested by prior charged
criminal conduct;
(19) "History of one or more violent acts" refers to the period of
time ten years prior to the filing of a petition under this chapter,
excluding any time spent, but not any violent acts committed, in a
mental health facility or in confinement as a result of a criminal
conviction;
(20) "Imminent" means the state or condition of being likely to
occur at any moment or near at hand, rather than distant or remote;
(21) "Individualized service plan" means a plan prepared by a
developmental disabilities professional with other professionals as a
team, for a person with developmental disabilities, which shall state:
(a) The nature of the person's specific problems, prior charged
criminal behavior, and habilitation needs;
(b) The conditions and strategies necessary to achieve the purposes
of habilitation;
(c) The intermediate and long-range goals of the habilitation
program, with a projected timetable for the attainment;
(d) The rationale for using this plan of habilitation to achieve
those intermediate and long-range goals;
(e) The staff responsible for carrying out the plan;
(f) Where relevant in light of past criminal behavior and due
consideration for public safety, the criteria for proposed movement to
less-restrictive settings, criteria for proposed eventual discharge or
release, and a projected possible date for discharge or release; and
(g) The type of residence immediately anticipated for the person
and possible future types of residences;
(22) "Information related to mental health services" means all
information and records compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course
of providing services to either voluntary or involuntary recipients of
services by a mental health service provider. This may include
documents of legal proceedings under this chapter or chapter 71.34 or
10.77 RCW, or somatic health care information;
(23) "Judicial commitment" means a commitment by a court pursuant
to the provisions of this chapter;
(24) "Legal counsel" means attorneys and staff employed by county
prosecutor offices or the state attorney general acting in their
capacity as legal representatives of public mental health service
providers under RCW 71.05.130;
(25) "Likelihood of serious harm" means:
(a) A substantial risk that: (i) Physical harm will be inflicted
by a person upon his or her own person, as evidenced by threats or
attempts to commit suicide or inflict physical harm on oneself; (ii)
physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon another, as evidenced
by behavior which has caused such harm or which places another person
or persons in reasonable fear of sustaining such harm; or (iii)
physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon the property of
others, as evidenced by behavior which has caused substantial loss or
damage to the property of others; ((or))
(b) The person has threatened the physical safety of another and
has a history of one or more violent acts; or
(c) The person has taken an action or engaged in behavior,
accompanied by signs of mental disorder that, when considered in light
of past behavior of the respondent, is likely to be followed in the
near future by an attempt to do physical harm or cause substantial
property destruction;
(26) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional
impairment which has substantial adverse effects on a person's
cognitive or volitional functions;
(27) "Mental health professional" means a psychiatrist,
psychologist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner,
psychiatric nurse, or social worker, and such other mental health
professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;
(28) "Mental health service provider" means a public or private
agency that provides mental health services to persons with mental
disorders as defined under this section and receives funding from
public sources. This includes, but is not limited to, hospitals
licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, evaluation and treatment facilities
as defined in this section, community mental health service delivery
systems or community mental health programs as defined in RCW
71.24.025, facilities conducting competency evaluations and restoration
under chapter 10.77 RCW, and correctional facilities operated by state
and local governments;
(29) "Peace officer" means a law enforcement official of a public
agency or governmental unit, and includes persons specifically given
peace officer powers by any state law, local ordinance, or judicial
order of appointment;
(30) "Private agency" means any person, partnership, corporation,
or association that is not a public agency, whether or not financed in
whole or in part by public funds, which constitutes an evaluation and
treatment facility or private institution, or hospital, which is
conducted for, or includes a department or ward conducted for, the care
and treatment of persons who are mentally ill;
(31) "Professional person" means a mental health professional and
shall also mean a physician, psychiatric advanced registered nurse
practitioner, registered nurse, and such others as may be defined by
rules adopted by the secretary pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter;
(32) "Psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner" means a
person who is licensed as an advanced registered nurse practitioner
pursuant to chapter 18.79 RCW; and who is board certified in advanced
practice psychiatric and mental health nursing;
(33) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician
and surgeon in this state who has in addition completed three years of
graduate training in psychiatry in a program approved by the American
medical association or the American osteopathic association and is
certified or eligible to be certified by the American board of
psychiatry and neurology;
(34) "Psychologist" means a person who has been licensed as a
psychologist pursuant to chapter 18.83 RCW;
(35) "Public agency" means any evaluation and treatment facility or
institution, or hospital which is conducted for, or includes a
department or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons
with mental illness, if the agency is operated directly by, federal,
state, county, or municipal government, or a combination of such
governments;
(36) "Registration records" include all the records of the
department, regional support networks, treatment facilities, and other
persons providing services to the department, county departments, or
facilities which identify persons who are receiving or who at any time
have received services for mental illness;
(37) "Release" means legal termination of the commitment under the
provisions of this chapter;
(38) "Resource management services" has the meaning given in
chapter 71.24 RCW;
(39) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social
and health services, or his or her designee;
(40) "Serious violent offense" has the same meaning as provided in
RCW 9.94A.030;
(41) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or further
advanced degree from an accredited school of social work or a degree
deemed equivalent under rules adopted by the secretary;
(42) "Therapeutic court personnel" means the staff of a mental
health court or other therapeutic court which has jurisdiction over
defendants who are dually diagnosed with mental disorders, including
court personnel, probation officers, a court monitor, prosecuting
attorney, or defense counsel acting within the scope of therapeutic
court duties;
(43) "Treatment records" include registration and all other records
concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time have received
services for mental illness, which are maintained by the department, by
regional support networks and their staffs, and by treatment
facilities. Treatment records include mental health information
contained in a medical bill including but not limited to mental health
drugs, a mental health diagnosis, provider name, and dates of service
stemming from a medical service. Treatment records do not include
notes or records maintained for personal use by a person providing
treatment services for the department, regional support networks, or a
treatment facility if the notes or records are not available to others;
(44) "Violent act" means behavior that resulted in homicide,
attempted suicide, nonfatal injuries, or substantial damage to
property.

Sec. 3 RCW 71.05.150 and 2007 c 375 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When a designated mental health professional receives
information alleging that a person, as a result of a mental disorder:
(i) Presents a likelihood of serious harm; or (ii) is gravely disabled;
the designated mental health professional may, after investigation and
evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the reliability and
credibility of any person providing information to initiate detention,
if satisfied that the allegations are true and that the person will not
voluntarily seek appropriate treatment, file a petition for initial
detention. Before filing the petition, the designated mental health
professional must personally interview the person, unless the person
refuses an interview, and determine whether the person will voluntarily
receive appropriate evaluation and treatment at an evaluation and
treatment facility or in a crisis stabilization unit. The designated
mental health professional may consider information provided by
families, landlords, neighbors, or others with significant contact and
history of involvement with the person, if the information is readily
and reasonably available.
(2)(a) An order to detain to a designated evaluation and treatment
facility for not more than a seventy-two-hour evaluation and treatment
period may be issued by a judge of the superior court upon request of
a designated mental health professional, whenever it appears to the
satisfaction of a judge of the superior court:
(i) That there is probable cause to support the petition; and
(ii) That the person has refused or failed to accept appropriate
evaluation and treatment voluntarily.
(b) The petition for initial detention, signed under penalty of
perjury, or sworn telephonic testimony may be considered by the court
in determining whether there are sufficient grounds for issuing the
order.
(c) The order shall designate retained counsel or, if counsel is
appointed from a list provided by the court, the name, business
address, and telephone number of the attorney appointed to represent
the person.
(3) The designated mental health professional shall then serve or
cause to be served on such person, his or her guardian, and
conservator, if any, a copy of the order together with a notice of
rights, and a petition for initial detention. After service on such
person the designated mental health professional shall file the return
of service in court and provide copies of all papers in the court file
to the evaluation and treatment facility and the designated attorney.
The designated mental health professional shall notify the court and
the prosecuting attorney that a probable cause hearing will be held
within seventy-two hours of the date and time of outpatient evaluation
or admission to the evaluation and treatment facility. The person
shall be permitted to be accompanied by one or more of his or her
relatives, friends, an attorney, a personal physician, or other
professional or religious advisor to the place of evaluation. An
attorney accompanying the person to the place of evaluation shall be
permitted to be present during the admission evaluation. Any other
individual accompanying the person may be present during the admission
evaluation. The facility may exclude the individual if his or her
presence would present a safety risk, delay the proceedings, or
otherwise interfere with the evaluation.
(4) The designated mental health professional may notify a peace
officer to take such person or cause such person to be taken into
custody and placed in an evaluation and treatment facility. At the
time such person is taken into custody there shall commence to be
served on such person, his or her guardian, and conservator, if any, a
copy of the original order together with a notice of rights and a
petition for initial detention.

Sec. 4 RCW 71.05.240 and 2009 c 293 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a petition is filed for fourteen day involuntary treatment
or ninety days of less restrictive alternative treatment, the court
shall hold a probable cause hearing within seventy-two hours of the
initial detention of such person as determined in RCW 71.05.180. If
requested by the detained person or his or her attorney, the hearing
may be postponed for a period not to exceed forty-eight hours. The
hearing may also be continued subject to the conditions set forth in
RCW 71.05.210 or subject to the petitioner's showing of good cause for
a period not to exceed twenty-four hours. A relative of the person may
provide the court with pertinent information at the probable cause
hearing.
(2) The court at the time of the probable cause hearing and before
an order of commitment is entered shall inform the person both orally
and in writing that the failure to make a good faith effort to seek
voluntary treatment as provided in RCW 71.05.230 will result in the
loss of his or her firearm rights if the person is subsequently
detained for involuntary treatment under this section.
(3) At the conclusion of the probable cause hearing, if the court
finds by a preponderance of the evidence that such person, as the
result of mental disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm, or is
gravely disabled, and, after considering less restrictive alternatives
to involuntary detention and treatment, finds that no such alternatives
are in the best interests of such person or others, the court shall
order that such person be detained for involuntary treatment not to
exceed fourteen days in a facility certified to provide treatment by
the department. If the court finds that such person, as the result of
a mental disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm, or is gravely
disabled, but that treatment in a less restrictive setting than
detention is in the best interest of such person or others, the court
shall order an appropriate less restrictive course of treatment for not
to exceed ninety days.
(4) The court shall specifically state to such person and give such
person notice in writing that if involuntary treatment beyond the
fourteen day period or beyond the ninety days of less restrictive
treatment is to be sought, such person will have the right to a full
hearing or jury trial as required by RCW 71.05.310. The court shall
also state to the person and provide written notice that the person is
barred from the possession of firearms and that the prohibition remains
in effect until a court restores his or her right to possess a firearm
under RCW 9.41.047.

Sec. 5 RCW 71.05.310 and 2005 c 504 s 709 are each amended to
read as follows:
The court shall conduct a hearing on the petition for ninety day
treatment within five judicial days of the first court appearance after
the probable cause hearing. The court may continue the hearing upon
the written request of the person named in the petition or the person's
attorney, for good cause shown, which continuance shall not exceed five
additional judicial days. If the person named in the petition requests
a jury trial, the trial shall commence within ten judicial days of the
first court appearance after the probable cause hearing. The burden of
proof shall be by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence and shall be
upon the petitioner. The person shall be present at such proceeding,
which shall in all respects accord with the constitutional guarantees
of due process of law and the rules of evidence pursuant to RCW
71.05.360 (8) and (9). A relative of the person may provide the court
with pertinent information at the proceeding.
During the proceeding, the person named in the petition shall
continue to be treated until released by order of the superior court.
If no order has been made within thirty days after the filing of the
petition, not including extensions of time requested by the detained
person or his or her attorney, the detained person shall be released.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2010, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---