BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Native American tribes have depended on the state's marine
waters and its resources for countless generations and continue to do
so for cultural, spiritual, economic, and subsistence purposes.
(b) The state has long demonstrated a strong commitment to
protecting the state's marine waters, which are abundant in natural
resources, contain a treasure of biological diversity, and are a source
of multiple uses by the public supporting the economies of nearby
communities as well as the entire state, including: Marine-based
industries and activities such as cargo, fuel, and passenger
transportation; commercial, recreational, and tribal fishing;
aquaculture; seafood processing; tourism; scientific research; and many
related goods and services. These multiple uses as well as new
emerging uses, such as renewable ocean energy, constitute a management
challenge for sustaining resources and coordinating state decision
making in a proactive, comprehensive and ecosystem-based manner.
(c) Washington's marine waters are part of a west coast-wide large
marine ecosystem known as the California current, and the Puget Sound
and Columbia river estuaries constitute two of the three largest
estuaries that are part of this large marine ecosystem. Puget Sound
and the Columbia river are estuaries of national significance under the
national estuary program, and the outer coast includes the Olympic
national marine sanctuary.
(d) Washington is working in cooperation with the states of Oregon
and California and federal agencies on ocean and ocean health
management issues through the west coast governors' agreement on ocean
health, and with the government of British Columbia on shared waters
management issues through the British Columbia-Washington coastal and
ocean task force.
(e) Washington has initiated comprehensive management programs to
protect and promote compatible uses of these waters. These include:
The development of a comprehensive ecosystem-based management plan
known as the Puget Sound action agenda; shoreline plans for shorelines
around the state; management plans for state-owned aquatic lands and
their associated waters statewide; and watershed and salmon recovery
management plans in the upland areas of Puget Sound, the coast, and the
Columbia river. Data and data management tools have also been
developed to support these management and planning activities, such as
the coastal atlas managed by the department of ecology and the shore
zone database managed by the department of natural resources.
(f) For marine waters specifically, Washington has formed several
mechanisms to improve coordination and management. A legislatively
authorized task force formed by the governor identified priority
recommendations for improving state management of ocean resources
through Washington's ocean action plan in 2006. The governor further
formed an ongoing interagency team that assists the department of
ecology in implementing these recommendations. There is an extensive
network of marine resources committees within Puget Sound and on the
outer coast and the Columbia river to promote and support local
involvement identifying and conducting local priority marine projects
and some have been involved in local planning and management. Through
the Olympic coast intergovernmental policy council, the state has also
formalized its working relationship with coastal tribes and the federal
government in the management of the Olympic coast national marine
sanctuary.
(g) Reports by the United States commission on oceans policy, the
Pew oceans commission, and the joint oceans commission initiative
recommend the adoption of a national ocean policy under which states
and coastal communities would have a principal role in developing and
implementing ecosystem-based management of marine waters. Acting on
these recommendations, the president of the United States recently
formed an interagency task force charged with developing a national
ocean policy and a framework for marine spatial planning that involves
all governmental levels, including state, tribal, and local
governments. To further develop and implement such a planning
framework, it is anticipated that federal cooperation and support will
be available to coastal states that are engaged in marine and coastal
resource management and planning, including marine spatial planning.
(2) The purpose of this chapter is to build upon existing statewide
Puget Sound, coastal, and Columbia river efforts. When resources
become available, the state intends to augment the marine spatial
component of existing plans and to improve the coordination among state
agencies in the development and implementation of marine management
plans.
(3) It is also the purpose of this chapter to establish policies to
guide state agencies and local governments when exercising jurisdiction
over proposed uses and activities in these waters. Specifically, in
conducting marine spatial planning, and in augmenting existing marine
management plans with marine spatial planning components, the state
must:
(a) Continue to recognize the rights of native American tribes
regarding marine natural resources;
(b) Base all planning on sufficient science. This includes
identifying gaps in existing information, recommend a strategy for
acquiring science needed to strengthen marine spatial plans, and create
a process to adjust plans once additional scientific information is
available;
(c) Coordinate with all stakeholders, including nongovernmental
organizations, that are significantly involved in the collection of
scientific information, ecosystem protection and restoration, or other
activities related to marine spatial planning;
(d) Recognize that marine ecosystems span tribal, state, and
international boundaries and that planning has to be coordinated with
all entities with jurisdiction or authority in order to be effective;
(e) Establish or further promote an ecosystem-based management
approach including linking marine spatial plans to adjacent nearshore
and upland spatial or ecosystem-based plans;
(f) Ensure that all marine spatial plans are linked to measurable
environmental outcomes;
(g) Establish a performance management system to monitor
implementation of any new marine spatial plan;
(h) Establish an ocean stewardship policy that takes into account
the existing natural, social, cultural, historic, and economic uses;
(i) Recognize that commercial, tribal, and recreational fisheries
are an integral part of our state's culture and contribute substantial
economic benefits;
(j) Value biodiversity and ecosystem health, and protect special,
sensitive, or unique estuarine and marine life and habitats, including
important spawning, rearing, and migration areas for finfish and
productive shellfish habitats;
(k) Integrate this planning with existing plans and ongoing
planning in the same marine waters and provide additional mechanisms
for improving coordination and aligning management;
(l) Promote recovery of listed species under state and federal
endangered species acts plans pursuant to those plans; and
(m) Fulfill the state's public trust and tribal treaty trust
responsibilities in managing the state's ocean waters in a sustainable
manner for current and future generations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Aquatic lands" includes all tidelands, shorelands, harbor
areas, and the beds of navigable waters, and must be construed to be
coextensive with the term "aquatic lands" as defined in RCW 79.105.060.
(2) "Aquatic lands habitat conservation plan" means a legally
binding plan developed by the department of natural resources and
agreed to by the appropriate federal agencies, to protect the habitat
of threatened and endangered species on state-owned aquatic lands.
(3) "Exclusive economic zone waters" means marine waters from the
offshore state boundary to the boundary of the exclusive economic zone,
over which the United States government has primary jurisdiction.
(4) "Marine counties" includes Clallam, Jefferson, Grays Harbor,
Wahkiakum, San Juan, Whatcom, Skagit, Island, Snohomish, King, Pierce,
Thurston, Mason, Kitsap, and Pacific counties.
(5) "Marine ecosystem" means the physical, biological, and chemical
components and processes and their interactions in marine waters and
aquatic lands, including humans.
(6) "Marine interagency team" or "team" means the marine
interagency team created under section 3 of this act.
(7) "Marine management plan" and "marine waters management plan"
means any plan guiding activities on and uses of the state's marine
waters, and may include a marine spatial plan or element.
(8) "Marine resources committees" means those committees organized
by coastal local governments under RCW 36.125.020.
(9) "Marine spatial planning" means a public process of analyzing
and allocating the spatial and temporal distribution of human
activities in marine areas to achieve ecological, economic, and social
objectives. Often this type of planning is done to reduce conflicts
among uses, to reduce environmental impacts, to facilitate compatible
uses, to align management decisions, and to meet other objectives
determined by the planning process. Marine spatial planning ensures
environmental protection and facilitates uses that do no harm to the
environment.
(10) "Marine waters" means aquatic lands and waters under tidal
influence, including saltwaters and estuaries to the ordinary high
water mark lying within the boundaries of the state. This definition
also includes the Columbia river estuary to the extent of tidal
influence.
(11) "Outer coast" has the same meaning as the term "coastal
waters" as defined in RCW 43.143.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The office of the governor shall chair
a marine interagency team that is composed of representatives of each
of the agencies in the governor's natural resources cabinet with
management responsibilities for marine waters, including the
independent agencies. A representative from a federal agency with lead
responsibility for marine spatial planning must be invited to serve as
a liaison to the team to help ensure consistency with federal actions
and policy. The team must conduct the assessment authorized in section
4 of this act, assist state agencies under section 5 of this act with
the review and coordination of such planning with their existing and
ongoing planning, and conduct the marine spatial planning authorized in
section 6 of this act.
(2) The team may not commence any activities authorized under
sections 5 and 6 of this act until federal, private, or other nonstate
funding is secured specifically for these activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The marine interagency team created in
section 3 of this act must assess and recommend a potential framework
for conducting marine spatial planning and integrating the planning
into existing management plans. The assessment must include, but not
be limited to, recommendations for:
(a) Including a marine spatial component into the Puget Sound
action agenda;
(b) Integrating marine spatial planning into management efforts for
the Columbia river estuary, working with the state of Oregon; and
(c) Developing a marine management plan containing a marine spatial
component for the outer coast, to be incorporated within the
comprehensive marine spatial plan authorized under section 6 of this
act.
(2) The assessment authorized under subsection (1) of this section
must also:
(a) Summarize existing goals and objectives for: Plans in Puget
Sound, the Columbia river estuary, and the outer coast, including the
Puget Sound action agenda; shoreline plans for shorelines around the
state; management plans for state-owned aquatic lands and their
associated waters statewide; and watershed and salmon recovery
management plans. The state aquatic lands habitat conservation plan,
once approved by the federal government, must also be included;
(b) Develop recommended goals and objectives for marine spatial
planning that integrate with existing policies and regulations, and
recommend a schedule to develop marine ecosystem health indicators,
considering the views and recommendations of affected stakeholders and
governmental agencies;
(c) Summarize how the existing goals and objectives as well as
recommended goals and objectives are consistent or inconsistent with
those adopted by other states for the west coast large marine
ecosystem, and with those goals and objectives articulated in relevant
national oceans policies and the national framework for marine spatial
planning;
(d) Identify the existing management activities and spatial data
related to these priorities and objectives and the key needs for
incorporating marine spatial planning into existing statewide plans;
and
(e) Provide recommendations on achieving a unified approach to
database management and delivery that would support marine spatial
planning throughout the state.
(3) The results of this assessment must be provided to the
appropriate legislative committees by December 15, 2010.
(4) This section expires June 30, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Concurrently or prior to the assessment
and planning activities provided in sections 4 and 6 of this act, and
subject to available funding for this purpose, all state agencies with
marine waters planning and management responsibilities are authorized
to include marine spatial data and marine spatial planning elements
into their existing plans and ongoing planning.
(2) The director of the Puget Sound partnership under the direction
of the leadership council created in RCW 90.71.220 may integrate marine
spatial information and planning provisions into the action agenda.
The information may be used to address gaps or improve the
effectiveness of the spatial planning component of the action agenda,
such as in addressing potential new uses such as renewable energy
projects.
(3) The governor and the commissioner of public lands, working with
appropriate marine management and planning agencies, are authorized to
work cooperatively with the applicable west coast states, Canadian
provinces, and with federal agencies, through existing cooperative
entities such as the west coast governor's agreement, the coastal and
oceans task force, the Pacific coast collaborative, the Puget Sound
federal caucus, and the United States and Canada cooperative agreement
working group, to explore the benefits of developing joint marine
spatial plans or planning frameworks in the shared waters of the Salish
Sea, the Columbia river estuary, and in the exclusive economic zone
waters. The governor and commissioner may approve the adoption of
shared marine spatial plans or planning frameworks where they determine
it would further policies of this chapter and chapter 43.143 RCW.
(4) On an ongoing basis, the director of the department of ecology
shall work with other state agencies with marine management
responsibilities, tribal governments, marine resources committees,
local and federal agencies, and marine waters stakeholders to compile
marine spatial information and to incorporate this information into
ongoing plans. This work may be integrated with the comprehensive
marine spatial plan authorized under section 6 of this act when that
planning process is initiated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Upon the receipt of federal, private, or
other nonstate funding for this purpose, together with any required
match of state funding that may be specifically provided for this
purpose, the marine interagency team shall coordinate the development
of a comprehensive marine spatial plan for the state's marine waters,
including recommendations to the appropriate federal agencies regarding
the exclusive economic zone waters. The plan may be developed in
geographic segments, and may incorporate or be developed as an element
of existing marine plans, such as the Puget Sound action agenda and the
aquatic lands habitat conservation plan. The chair of the team may
designate a state agency with marine management responsibilities to
take the lead in developing and recommending particular segments or
elements of the comprehensive marine spatial plan.
(2) The marine spatial plan must be developed and implemented in a
manner that:
(a) Recognizes and respects existing uses and tribal treaty rights;
(b) Promotes protection and restoration of ecosystem processes to
a level that will enable long-term sustainable production of ecosystem
goods and services;
(c) Addresses potential impacts of climate change and sea level
rise upon current and projected marine waters uses and shoreline and
coastal impacts;
(d) Fosters and encourages sustainable uses that provide economic
opportunity without significant adverse environmental impacts;
(e) Preserves and enhances public access;
(f) Protects and encourages working waterfronts and supports the
infrastructure necessary to sustain marine industry, commercial
shipping, and other water-dependent uses;
(g) Fosters public participation in decision making and significant
involvement of communities adjacent to the state's marine waters; and
(h) Integrates existing management plans and authorities and makes
recommendations for aligning plans to the extent practicable.
(3) To ensure the effective stewardship of the state's marine
waters held in trust for the benefit of the people, the marine spatial
plan must rely upon existing data and resources, but also identify data
gaps and, as possible, procure missing data necessary for planning.
(4) The marine spatial plan must include but not be limited to:
(a) An ecosystem assessment that analyzes the health and status of
Washington marine waters including key social, economic, and ecological
characteristics and incorporates the best available scientific
information, including relevant marine data. This assessment should
seek to identify key threats to plan goals, analyze risk and management
scenarios, and develop key ecosystem indicators. In addition, the plan
should incorporate existing adaptive management strategies underway by
local, state, or federal entities and provide an adaptive management
element to incorporate new information and consider revisions to the
plan based upon research, monitoring, and evaluation;
(b) Using and relying upon existing plans and processes and
additional management measures to guide decisions among uses proposed
for specific geographic areas of the state's marine and estuarine
waters consistent with applicable state laws and programs that control
or address developments in the state's marine waters;
(c) A series of maps that, at a minimum, summarize available data
on: The key ecological aspects of the marine ecosystem, including
physical and biological characteristics, as well as areas that are
environmentally sensitive or contain unique or sensitive species or
biological communities that must be conserved and warrant protective
measures; human uses of marine waters, particularly areas with high
value for fishing; and appropriate locations with high potential for
renewable energy production with minimal potential for conflicts with
other existing uses or sensitive environments;
(d) An element that sets forth the state's recommendations to the
federal government for use priorities and limitations, siting criteria,
and protection of unique and sensitive biota and ocean floor features
within the exclusive economic zone waters consistent with the policies
and management criteria contained in this chapter and chapter 43.143
RCW;
(e) An implementation strategy describing how the plan's management
measures and other provisions will be considered and implemented
through existing state and local authorities; and
(f) A framework for coordinating state agency and local government
review of proposed renewable energy development uses requiring multiple
permits and other approvals that provide for the timely review and
action upon renewable energy development proposals while ensuring
protection of sensitive resources and minimizing impacts to other
existing or projected uses in the area.
(5) If the director of the department of fish and wildlife
determines that a fisheries management element is appropriate for
inclusion in the marine management plan, this element may include the
incorporation of existing management plans and procedures and standards
for consideration in adopting and revising fisheries management plans
in cooperation with the appropriate tribal governments.
(6) Any provision of the marine management plan that does not have
as its primary purpose the management of commercial or recreational
fishing but that has an impact on this fishing must minimize the
negative impacts on the fishing. The team must accord substantial
weight to recommendations from the director of the department of fish
and wildlife for plan revisions to minimize the negative impacts.
(7) The marine management plan must recognize existing uses.
(8) The plan must identify any provisions of existing management
plans that are substantially inconsistent with the plan.
(9) In developing the marine spatial plan, the team shall implement
a strong public participation strategy that seeks input from throughout
the state and particularly from communities adjacent to ocean waters.
Public review and comment must be sought and incorporated with regard
to planning the scope of work as well as in regard to significant
drafts prior to finalizing the plan.
(10) The team must complete the plan within twenty-four months of
the initiation of planning under this section.
(11) The director of the department of ecology shall submit the
completed marine spatial plan, or elements of such a plan not
previously submitted, to the appropriate federal agency for review and
incorporation into the state's federally approved coastal zone
management plan.
(12) Subsequent to the adoption of the marine spatial plan, the
team may periodically review and adopt revisions to the plan to
incorporate new information and to recognize and incorporate provisions
in other marine management plans. The team must accord the public an
opportunity to review and comment upon significant proposed revisions
to the marine spatial plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Upon the adoption of the marine spatial
plan under section 6 of this act, each state agency and local
government must make decisions in a manner that ensures conformance
with the applicable provisions of the marine spatial plan.
(2) The director of the department of ecology, in consultation with
the department of natural resources and the Puget Sound partnership,
shall periodically review existing management plans maintained by state
agencies and local governments that cover the same marine waters as the
marine spatial plan, and for any substantial inconsistency with the
marine spatial plan the director shall make recommendations to the
agency or to the local government for revisions to eliminate the
inconsistency.
(3) Not later than four years following adoption of the marine
spatial plan under section 6 of this act, the directors of the
department of ecology and the Puget Sound partnership, jointly with the
commissioner of public lands, shall report to the appropriate marine
waters committees in the senate and house of representatives describing
provisions of existing management plans that are substantially
inconsistent with the marine spatial plan, and making recommendations
for eliminating the inconsistency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 No authority is created under this act to
affect in any way any project, use, or activity in the state's marine
waters existing prior to or during the development and review of the
marine spatial plan. No authority is created under this chapter to
supersede the current authority of any state agency or local
government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 43.21F RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the duties prescribed in RCW 43.21F.045, the
department must develop guidance applicable to all state agencies for
achieving a unified state position upon matters involving the siting
and operation of renewable energy facilities in the state's coastal and
estuarine marine waters. The guidance must provide procedures for
coordinating the views and responsibilities of any state agency with
jurisdiction or expertise over the matter under consideration, which
may include federal policy proposals, activities, permits, licenses, or
the extension of funding for activities in or affecting the state's
marine waters. In developing the guidance, the director must consult
with agencies with primary responsibilities for permitting and
management of marine waters and bedlands, including the departments of
natural resources, ecology, transportation, and fish and wildlife, and
the state parks and recreation commission, the Puget Sound partnership,
and the energy facility site evaluation council. The director must
also consult and incorporate relevant information from the regional
activities related to renewable energy siting in marine waters,
including those under the west coast governors' agreement on ocean
health.
(2) The director must adopt the guidance by June 30, 2011.
(3) This section is intended to promote consistency and multiple
agency coordination in developing positions and exercising jurisdiction
in matters involving the siting and operation of renewable energy
facilities and does not diminish or abrogate the authority or
jurisdiction of any state agency over such matters established under
any other law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) The marine resources stewardship trust
account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from income
derived from the investment of amounts credited to the account, any
grants, gifts, or donations to the state for the purposes of marine
spatial planning, data compilation, research, or monitoring, and any
appropriations made to the account must be deposited in the account.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
(2) Expenditures from the account may be used for the purposes of
marine spatial planning, research, monitoring, and for the restoration
or enhancement of marine habitat or resources.

Sec. 11 RCW 43.84.092 and 2009 c 479 s 31, 2009 c 472 s 5, and
2009 c 451 s 8 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate
share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily
balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search
and rescue account, the budget stabilization account, the capitol
building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia
river basin water supply development account, the common school
construction fund, the county arterial preservation account, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of licensing services
account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the
developmental disabilities community trust account, the drinking water
assistance account, the drinking water assistance administrative
account, the drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern
Washington University capital projects account, the education
construction fund, the education legacy trust account, the election
account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account,
the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College
capital projects account, the federal forest revolving account, the
ferry bond retirement fund, the freight congestion relief account, the
freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal
account, the grade crossing protective fund, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health
services account, the high capacity transportation account, the state
higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway
infrastructure account, the highway safety account, the high occupancy
toll lanes operations account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources
stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the mobile home
park relocation fund, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety
education account, the multimodal transportation account, the municipal
criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account, the natural resources deposit account, the oyster
reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the
perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities
construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public
health supplemental account, the public transportation systems account,
the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital
construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the
Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real estate appraiser
commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional
mobility grant program account, the resource management cost account,
the rural arterial trust account, the rural Washington loan fund, the
site closure account, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the
special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve
account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol
highway account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the
supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account,
the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco
prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the
transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement
account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account,
the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation
partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tuition
recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund,
the University of Washington building account, the urban arterial trust
account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and
pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve
officers' administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account,
the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety
employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the
state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 1 through 8 and 10 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---