BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.04.295 and 2007 c 510 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Medium-speed electric vehicle" means a self-propelled,
electrically powered four-wheeled motor vehicle, equipped with a roll
cage or crush-proof body design, whose speed attainable in one mile is
more than ((thirty)) twenty-five miles per hour but not more than
thirty-five miles per hour and otherwise meets or exceeds the federal
regulations set forth in 49 C.F.R. Sec. 571.500.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.61.723 and 2007 c 510 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a person
may operate a medium-speed electric vehicle upon a highway of this
state having a speed limit of ((thirty-five)) forty-five miles per hour
or less if:
(a) The person does not operate a medium-speed electric vehicle
upon state highways that are listed in chapter 47.17 RCW;
(b) The person does not operate a medium-speed electric vehicle
upon a highway of this state without first having obtained and having
in full force and effect a current and proper vehicle license and
display vehicle license number plates in compliance with chapter 46.16
RCW;
(c) The person does not operate a medium-speed electric vehicle
upon a highway of this state without first obtaining a valid driver's
license issued to Washington residents in compliance with chapter 46.20
RCW;
(d) The person does not operate a medium-speed electric vehicle
subject to registration under chapter 46.16 RCW on a highway of this
state unless the person is insured under a motor vehicle liability
policy in compliance with chapter 46.30 RCW; and
(e) The person operating a medium-speed electric vehicle does not
cross a roadway with a speed limit in excess of ((thirty-five)) forty-five miles per hour, unless the crossing begins and ends on a roadway
with a speed limit of ((thirty-five)) forty-five miles per hour or less
and occurs at an intersection of approximately ninety degrees, except
that the operator of a medium-speed electric vehicle must not cross an
uncontrolled intersection of streets and highways that are part of the
state highway system subject to Title 47 RCW unless that intersection
has been authorized by local authorities under subsection (3) of this
section.
(2) Any person who violates this section commits a traffic
infraction.
(3) This section does not prevent local authorities, with respect
to streets and highways under their jurisdiction and within the
reasonable exercise of their police power, from regulating the
operation of medium-speed electric vehicles on streets and highways
under their jurisdiction by resolution or ordinance of the governing
body, if the regulation is consistent with this title, except that:
(a) Local authorities may not authorize the operation of medium-speed electric vehicles on streets and highways that are part of the
state highway system subject to Title 47 RCW;
(b) Local authorities may not prohibit the operation of medium-
speed electric vehicles upon highways of this state having a speed
limit of thirty-five miles per hour or less; and
(c) Local authorities may not establish requirements for the
registration and licensing of medium-speed electric vehicles.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.61.725 and 2003 c 353 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Absent prohibition by local authorities authorized under this
section and except as prohibited elsewhere in this section, a person
may operate a neighborhood electric vehicle upon a highway of this
state having a speed limit of ((thirty-five)) forty-five miles per hour
or less if:
(a) The person does not operate a neighborhood electric vehicle
upon state highways that are listed in chapter 47.17 RCW;
(b) The person does not operate a neighborhood electric vehicle
upon a highway of this state without first having obtained and having
in full force and effect a current and proper vehicle license and
display vehicle license number plates in compliance with chapter 46.16
RCW;
(c) The person does not operate a neighborhood electric vehicle
upon a highway of this state without first obtaining a valid driver's
license issued to Washington residents in compliance with chapter 46.20
RCW;
(d) The person does not operate a neighborhood electric vehicle
subject to registration under chapter 46.16 RCW on a highway of this
state unless the person is insured under a motor vehicle liability
policy in compliance with chapter 46.30 RCW; and
(e) The person operating a neighborhood electric vehicle does not
cross a roadway with a speed limit in excess of ((thirty-five)) forty-five miles per hour, unless the crossing begins and ends on a roadway
with a speed limit of ((thirty-five)) forty-five miles per hour or less
and occurs at an intersection of approximately ninety degrees, except
that the operator of a neighborhood electric vehicle must not cross an
uncontrolled intersection of streets and highways that are part of the
state highway system subject to Title 47 RCW unless that intersection
has been authorized by local authorities provided elsewhere in this
section.
(2) Any person who violates this section commits a traffic
infraction.
(3) This section does not prevent local authorities, with respect
to streets and highways under their jurisdiction and within the
reasonable exercise of their police power, from regulating the
operation of neighborhood electric vehicles on streets and highways
under their jurisdiction by resolution or ordinance of the governing
body, if the regulation is consistent with the provisions of this
title, except that:
(a) Local authorities may not authorize the operation of
neighborhood electric vehicles on streets and highways that are part of
the state highway system subject to the provisions of Title 47 RCW;
(b) Local authorities may not prohibit the operation of
neighborhood electric vehicles upon highways of this state having a
speed limit of twenty-five miles per hour or less; and
(c) Local authorities are prohibited from establishing any
requirements for the registration and licensing of neighborhood
electric vehicles.

--- END ---