BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.105.005 and 1990 c 208 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is a purpose of this chapter to provide for coordinated planning
and management of state information services by consolidating the
operational functions of information technology, including servers and
networks, for state government within the department of information
services and to consider outsourcing to the private sector a
significant portion of information technology services where feasible
and cost-effective. ((The legislature recognizes that information
systems, telecommunications, equipment, software, and services must
satisfy the needs of end users and that many appropriate and cost-effective alternatives exist for meeting these needs, such as shared
mainframe computing, shared voice, data, and video telecommunications
services, local area networks, departmental minicomputers, and
microcomputers.))

Sec. 2 RCW 43.105.017 and 1992 c 20 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature that:
(1) State government use voice, data, and video telecommunications
technologies to:
(a) Transmit and increase access to live, interactive classroom
instruction and training;
(b) Provide for interactive public affairs presentations, including
a public forum for state and local issues;
(c) Facilitate communications and exchange of information among
state and local elected officials and the general public;
(d) Enhance statewide communications within state agencies; and
(e) Through the use of telecommunications, reduce time lost due to
travel to in-state meetings;
(2) Information be shared and administered in a coordinated manner,
except when prevented by agency responsibilities for security, privacy,
or confidentiality;
(3) ((The primary responsibility for the management and use of
information, information systems, telecommunications, equipment,
software, and services rests with each agency head;
(4))) Resources be used in the most efficient manner and services
be shared when cost-effective;
(((5))) (4) A structure be created to:
(a) Plan and manage telecommunications and computing networks;
(b) Increase agencies' awareness of information sharing
opportunities; and
(c) Assist agencies in implementing such possibilities;
(((6))) (5) An acquisition process for equipment, proprietary
software, and related services be established that meets the needs of
the users, considers the exchange of information, and promotes fair and
open competition;
(((7))) (6) To the greatest extent possible, major information
technology projects be implemented on an incremental basis;
(((8))) (7) The state maximize opportunities to exchange and share
data and information by moving toward implementation of open system
architecture based upon interface standards providing for application
and data portability and interoperability;
(((9))) (8) To the greatest extent possible, the state recognize
any price performance advantages which may be available in midrange and
personal computing architecture;
(((10))) (9) The state improve recruitment, retention, and training
of information technology professional staff;
(((11))) (10) Plans, proposals, and acquisitions for information
services be reviewed from a financial and management perspective as
part of the budget process; and
(((12))) (11) State government adopt policies and procedures that
maximize the use of existing video telecommunications resources,
coordinate and develop video telecommunications in a manner that is
cost-effective and encourages shared use, and ensure the appropriate
use of video telecommunications to fulfill identified needs.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.105.020 and 2009 c 565 s 32, 2009 c 509 s 7, and
2009 c 486 s 14 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly ((required [requires])) requires otherwise.
(1) "Administrator" means the community technology opportunity
program administrator designated by the department.
(2) "Backbone network" means the shared high-density portions of
the state's telecommunications transmission facilities. It includes
specially conditioned high-speed communications carrier lines,
multiplexors, switches associated with such communications lines, and
any equipment and software components necessary for management and
control of the backbone network.
(3) "Board" means the information services board.
(4) "Broadband" means a high-speed, high capacity transmission
medium, using land-based, satellite, wireless, or any other mechanism,
that can carry either signals or transmit data, or both, over long
distances by using a wide range of frequencies.
(5) "Committee" means the state interoperability executive
committee.
(6) "Common vendor registration and bid notification system" has
the definition in RCW 39.29.006.
(7) "Community technology programs" means programs that are engaged
in diffusing information and communications technology in local
communities, particularly in unserved and underserved areas of the
state. These programs may include, but are not limited to, programs
that provide education and skill-building opportunities, hardware and
software, internet connectivity, digital media literacy, development of
locally relevant content, and delivery of vital services through
technology.
(8) "Council" means the advisory council on digital inclusion
created in RCW 43.105.400.
(9) "Department" means the department of information services.
(10) "Director" means the director of the department.
(11) "Educational sectors" means those institutions of higher
education, school districts, and educational service districts that use
the network for distance education, data transmission, and other uses
permitted by the K-20 board.
(12) "Equipment" means the machines, devices, and transmission
facilities used in information processing, such as computers, word
processors, terminals, telephones, wireless communications system
facilities, cables, and any physical facility necessary for the
operation of such equipment.
(13) "High-speed internet" means broadband.
(14) "Information" includes, but is not limited to, data, text,
voice, and video.
(15) "Information processing" means the electronic capture,
collection, storage, manipulation, transmission, retrieval, and
presentation of information in the form of data, text, voice, or image
and includes telecommunications and office automation functions.
(16) "Information services" means data processing,
telecommunications, office automation, and computerized information
systems.
(17) "Information technology portfolio" or "portfolio" means a
strategic management process documenting relationships between agency
missions and information technology and telecommunications investments.
(18) "K-20 educational network board" or "K-20 board" means the K-20 educational network board created in RCW 43.105.800.
(19) "K-20 network" means the network established in RCW
43.105.820.
(20) "K-20 network technical steering committee" or "committee"
means the K-20 network technical steering committee created in RCW
43.105.810.
(21) "Local governments" includes all municipal and quasi municipal
corporations and political subdivisions, and all agencies of such
corporations and subdivisions authorized to contract separately.
(22) "Oversight" means a process of comprehensive risk analysis and
management designed to ensure optimum use of information technology
resources and telecommunications.
(23) "Proprietary software" means that software offered for sale or
license.
(24) "Purchased services" means services provided by a vendor to
accomplish routine, continuing, and necessary functions. This term
includes, but is not limited to, services acquired for equipment
maintenance and repair, operation of a physical plant, security,
computer hardware and software installation and maintenance,
telecommunications installation and maintenance, data entry, keypunch
services, programming services, and computer time-sharing.
(25) "Small business" has the definition in RCW 39.29.006.
(26) "Telecommunications" means the transmission of information by
wire, radio, optical cable, electromagnetic, or other means.
(27) "Video telecommunications" means the electronic
interconnection of two or more sites for the purpose of transmitting
and/or receiving visual and associated audio information. Video
telecommunications shall not include existing public television
broadcast stations as currently designated by the department of
commerce under chapter 43.330 RCW.
(28) "Authorized preferred provider" means the entity selected by
the office of financial management under section 10 of this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.105.052 and 2000 c 180 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall:
(1) Perform all duties and responsibilities the board delegates to
the department, including but not limited to:
(a) The review of agency information technology portfolios and
related requests; and
(b) Implementation of statewide and interagency policies,
standards, and guidelines;
(2) Direct the formulation and creation of policies, guidelines,
standards, and specifications for the purchase, development, and
maintenance of information technology for state agencies including, but
not limited to, those:
(a) Required to support state and local government exchange,
acquisition, storage, use, sharing, and distribution of geographic or
base map data and related technologies; and
(b) Necessary to support a unified approach to information
technology across the totality of state government, thereby ensuring
that the citizens and businesses of the state receive the greatest
possible security, value, and convenience from investments made in
technology;
(3) Direct the development of policies and procedures, in
consultation with the office of financial management and the board,
that are integrated into the state's strategic planning and performance
budgeting processes and that state agencies and public institutions of
higher education must follow in developing information technology plans
and technology-related budget requests. These policies and procedures
must require consideration of the contribution of current and proposed
technology expenditures to the support of agency and institution
priority functional activities, as well as current and future operating
expenses, and must be used by all state agencies and public
institutions of higher education in preparing budget requests;
(4)(a) Review budget requests for information technology from state
agencies and public institutions of higher education and recommend
budget priorities to the office of financial management. This review
includes, but is not limited to, all data processing or other related
projects for amounts exceeding one hundred thousand dollars in which
the agency or institution has entered into or plans to enter into a
contract, agreement, or other financing agreement or other arrangement
that requires the state to either pay for the contract by foregoing
revenue collections, or allows or assigns to another party the
collection on behalf or for the state any fees, charges, or other
assessments or revenues to pay for the project.
(b) For each project, the agency or institution shall provide to
the department: (i) A summary of the terms; (ii) the anticipated
duration; and (iii) the cost or charges to any user, whether a state
agency or institution or other party not directly a party to the
project arrangements. The descriptions must also include any terms or
conditions that bind the state or restrict the state's operations and
the methods of procurement employed to reach the terms;
(5) Direct the development of policies and procedures for the
effective management of investments in information technology
throughout its entire life cycle including, but not limited to, project
definition, procurement, development, implementation, operation,
performance evaluation, and enhancement or retirement. The policies
and procedures must include, at a minimum, the periodic review by the
director of state agency and public institution of higher education
information technology projects estimated to cost one million dollars
or more or deemed to be mission-critical or of statewide application by
the director;
(6) Periodically evaluate the feasibility of outsourcing
information technology resources and services and outsource those
resources and services that are feasible and beneficial to the state;
(7) Direct the compilation and maintenance of an inventory of
information technology including, but not limited to, personnel,
facilities, equipment, goods, and contracts for services;
(8) Evaluate the needs of state agencies with regard to:
(a) A consistent, reliable, and secure information technology
infrastructure;
(b) Existing capabilities with regard to building and supporting
that infrastructure; and
(c) Recommended approaches to ensure the future development,
maintenance, and financing of an information technology infrastructure
befitting the needs of state agencies and the service level
requirements of its citizens;
(9) Develop and adopt policies, standards, and guidelines for
managing information technology by state agencies and institutions;
(10) Develop and adopt policies, standards, and guidelines for the
procurement of all information technology and telecommunications goods
and services for state agencies;
(11) Make available information services to state agencies and
local governments and public benefit nonprofit corporations ((on a full
cost-recovery basis)). For the purposes of this section "public
benefit nonprofit corporation" means a public benefit nonprofit
corporation as defined in RCW 24.03.005 that is receiving local, state,
or federal funds either directly or through a public agency other than
an Indian tribe or political subdivision of another state. These
services may include, but are not limited to:
(a) Telecommunications services for voice, data, and video;
(b) Mainframe computing services;
(c) Support for departmental and microcomputer evaluation,
installation, and use;
(d) Equipment acquisition assistance, including leasing, brokering,
and establishing master contracts;
(e) Facilities management services for information technology
equipment, equipment repair, and maintenance service;
(f) Negotiation with local cable companies and local governments to
provide for connection to local cable services to allow for access to
these public and educational channels in the state;
(g) Office automation services;
(h) System development services; and
(i) Training((.
These services are for discretionary use by customers and customers
may elect other alternatives for service if those alternatives are more
cost-effective or provide better service. Agencies may be required to
use the backbone network portions of the telecommunications services
during an initial start-up period not to exceed three years));
(((3))) (12) Establish rates and fees for services provided by the
department to ((assure)) ensure that the services component of the
department is self-supporting. A billing rate plan shall be developed
for a two-year period to coincide with the budgeting process. The rate
plan shall be subject to review at least annually by the customer
advisory board. The rate plan shall show the proposed rates by each
cost center and will show the components of the rate structure as
mutually determined by the department and the customer advisory board.
The same rate structure will apply to all user agencies of each cost
center. The rate plan and any adjustments to rates shall be approved
by the office of financial management. The services component shall
not subsidize the operations of the strategic planning and policy
component;
(((4))) (13) With the advice of the information services board and
agencies, develop a state strategic information technology plan and
performance reports as required under RCW 43.105.160;
(((5))) (14) Develop plans for the department's achievement of
statewide goals and objectives set forth in the state strategic
information technology plan required under RCW 43.105.160. These plans
shall address such services as telecommunications, central and
distributed computing, local area networks, office automation, and end
user computing. The department shall seek the advice of the customer
advisory board and the board in the development of these plans;
(((6))) (15) Under direction of the information services board and
in collaboration with the department of personnel, and other agencies
as may be appropriate, develop training plans and coordinate training
programs that are responsive to the needs of agencies;
(((7))) (16) Identify opportunities for the effective use of
information services and coordinate appropriate responses to those
opportunities;
(((8))) (17) Assess agencies' projects, acquisitions, plans,
information technology portfolios, or overall information processing
performance as requested by the board, agencies, the director of
financial management, or the legislature. Agencies may be required to
reimburse the department for agency-requested reviews;
(((9))) (18) Develop planning, budgeting, and expenditure reporting
requirements, in conjunction with the office of financial management,
for agencies to follow;
(((10))) (19) Assist the office of financial management with
budgetary and policy review of agency plans for information services;
(((11))) (20) Provide staff support from the strategic planning and
policy component to the board for:
(a) Meeting preparation, notices, and minutes;
(b) Promulgation of policies, standards, and guidelines adopted by
the board;
(c) Supervision of studies and reports requested by the board;
(d) Conducting reviews and assessments as directed by the board;
(((12))) (21) Be the lead agency in coordinating video
telecommunications services for all state agencies and develop,
pursuant to board policies, standards and common specifications for
leased and purchased telecommunications equipment. The department
shall not evaluate the merits of school curriculum, higher education
course offerings, or other education and training programs proposed for
transmission and/or reception using video telecommunications resources.
Nothing in this section shall abrogate or abridge the legal
responsibilities of licensees of telecommunications facilities as
licensed by the federal communication commission on March 27, 1990; and
(((13))) (22) Perform all other matters and things necessary to
carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Develop an approval process for proposed major information
technology projects by state agencies to ensure the projects conform to
the state strategic information technology plan developed under RCW
43.105.160;
(2) Establish minimum qualifications, training, and standards for
project managers;
(3) Review and approve all procurement solicitations involving
major information technology projects;
(4) Develop and update a project management methodology to be used
by state agencies in the development of information technology;
(5) Direct the development of any statewide or multiagency
enterprise projects;
(6) Develop and update an information clearinghouse that identifies
best practices and new developments in information technology,
including detailed information regarding the state's previous
experiences with the development of major information technology
projects;
(7) Direct the development of policies, procedures, and standards,
in consultation with the board, for assessing security risks,
determining the appropriate security measures, and performing security
audits of government databases and data communications. At a minimum,
these policies, procedures, and standards must address the scope of
security audits and which entities are authorized to conduct security
audits; and
(8) Designate a government entity to oversee, plan, and coordinate
the conduct of periodic security audits of all executive branch
agencies and institutions of higher education regarding the protection
of government databases and data communications. The designated
government entity may contract with a private firm or firms that
specialize in conducting such audits subject to the approval of the
director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall have the following powers and duties
concerning the development, operation, and management of
telecommunications and information technology services used by state
agencies:
(1) To manage and coordinate the various telecommunications
facilities and communications services, centers, and operations used by
the state;
(2) To acquire, lease, or construct facilities and equipment as
necessary to deliver comprehensive communications services and to
maintain the facilities and equipment, owned or leased;
(3) To reduce server inventory by consolidating servers
geographically;
(4) To optimize telephony architecture statewide through
centralization of telephony;
(5) To centralize control of personal computer and server
replacement cycles and streamline personal computer support statewide;
(6) To provide technical assistance to state agencies in such areas
as:
(a) Designing management information systems;
(b) Performing systems development services, including design,
application programming, and maintenance;
(c) Conducting research and sponsoring demonstration projects
pertaining to all facets of telecommunications and communications
services; and
(d) Planning and forecasting for future needs in communications and
information technology services; and
(7) To develop and implement information, billing, and collection
systems that will assist state agencies in forecasting their needs and
managing their operations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All information technology and telecommunications goods and
services must be procured by:
(a) The department for its own benefit or on behalf of other state
agencies or institutions; or
(b) Other agencies and institutions to the extent authorized by the
department.
(2) The director shall disapprove any procurement that does not
conform to the statewide strategic information technology plan or to
the individual information technology portfolios of state agencies or
institutions.
(3) All statewide contracts and agreements made and entered into by
the department for the purchase of communications services,
telecommunications facilities, and information technology goods and
services must provide for the inclusion of counties, cities, and towns
in the contracts and agreements. Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW
41.06.142, the department may enter into multiple vendor contracts for
the referenced services, facilities, and goods and services.
(4) The department may designate categories of information
technology goods and services that may be procured by state agencies
without seeking prior authorization from the department.
(5) This section does not apply to the legislative branch.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.105.172 and 1999 c 80 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Information technology portfolios prepared by state agencies
shall reflect (((1))):
(a) Links among an agency's objectives, business plan, and
technology;
(((2))) (b) Analysis of the effect of an agency's proposed new
technology investments on its existing infrastructure and business
functions; and
(((3))) (c) Analysis of the effect of proposed information
technology investments on the state's information technology
infrastructure.
(2) The director of each state agency shall designate an existing
employee to be the agency's information technology resource who is
responsible for:
(a) Preparing and updating the agency's information technology
portfolio under RCW 43.105.170; and
(b) Complying with the procedures, policies, and guidelines
established by the director under section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) By September 1, 2010, the office of
financial management, in consultation with the director of the
department of information services and the department of information
services, shall develop a migration strategy to consolidate all
operational information technology staff and resources within the
department of information services, with a completion date of January
1, 2012. Except as provided in (d) of this subsection, this strategy
must:
(a) Transfer all operational information technology staff from
state agencies to the department of information services according to
the following schedule:
(i) Fifty or less full-time equivalents: January 1, 2011;
(ii) Fifty to four hundred full-time equivalents: July 1, 2011;
and
(iii) Four hundred or more full-time equivalents: January 1, 2012;
(b) Direct state agencies to use information technology shared
services provided by the department of information services or its
authorized preferred provider;
(c) Transfer newly established information technology positions to
the department of information services beginning January 1, 2011, at
the discretion of the director of the department of information
services;
(d) Transfer the administrative information technology support
functions of the office of financial management and the department of
personnel to the department of information services by January 1, 2011;
and
(e) Report to the governor and the legislature on the progress and
timeline for completion of the migration by December 1, 2010, and
December 1, 2011.
(2) On or before January 1, 2012, the director of the department of
information services shall fully implement the systems development
standards, policies, and methodologies required by this act.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "operational information
technology staff" includes all information technology employees of
state agencies that provide: (a) Customer service support to personal
computers; (b) infrastructure services, such as database
administration, security administration, data center or server room
operations, and server administration; and (c) communications services,
such as network administration, radio support, and telephone systems
support. "Operational information technology staff" does not include
information technology employees that provide information technology
planning and strategy, support for portable and specialized devices,
radio support, or agency-specific application services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 43.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The office, in consultation with the department of information
services, may enter into and consummate, under terms and conditions
approved by the office, an agreement or agreements in the name of the
state of Washington to contract with one or more authorized preferred
providers to provide certain information technology functions and
services for state government that are currently provided by the
department of information services or state agencies for a period of up
to ten years.
(2) The office, in consultation with the department of information
services, shall review information technology functions and services
being used in state government and their associated costs and determine
which information technology functions and services would be the most
feasible and cost-effective to contract for with the private sector.
(3) The office may engage in a sealed bid process to select one or
more authorized preferred providers under this chapter to provide those
information technology functions and services identified under
subsection (2) of this section to be the most feasible and cost-effective to outsource.
(4) An authorized preferred provider:
(a) May incur debts and liabilities on its behalf, but may not
obligate the state for payment, nor may the state otherwise be liable
for the debts or obligations of the authorized preferred provider;
(b) Is subject to an annual audit by a certified public accounting
firm. The state auditor may review the corporation's audited financial
reports; and
(c) Must, upon termination of the contract, relinquish any assets
or real property to the state of Washington that were owned or managed
by the department of information services or the state prior to the
contract.
(5) For the purposes of this section, the office is exempt from the
limitations imposed by RCW 41.06.142 regarding competitive contracting
or by other statute or common law principle that would otherwise limit
its ability to contract for services outside the department.
(6) This section does not apply to the legislative branch.

Sec. 11 RCW 41.06.142 and 2008 c 267 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any department, agency, or institution of higher education may
purchase services, including services that have been customarily and
historically provided by employees in the classified service under this
chapter, by contracting with individuals, nonprofit organizations,
businesses, employee business units, or other entities if the following
criteria are met:
(a) The invitation for bid or request for proposal contains
measurable standards for the performance of the contract;
(b) Employees in the classified service whose positions or work
would be displaced by the contract are provided an opportunity to offer
alternatives to purchasing services by contract and, if these
alternatives are not accepted, compete for the contract under
competitive contracting procedures in subsection (4) of this section;
(c) The contract with an entity other than an employee business
unit includes a provision requiring the entity to consider employment
of state employees who may be displaced by the contract;
(d) The department, agency, or institution of higher education has
established a contract monitoring process to measure contract
performance, costs, service delivery quality, and other contract
standards, and to cancel contracts that do not meet those standards;
and
(e) The department, agency, or institution of higher education has
determined that the contract results in savings or efficiency
improvements. The contracting agency must consider the consequences
and potential mitigation of improper or failed performance by the
contractor.
(2) Any provision contrary to or in conflict with this section in
any collective bargaining agreement in effect on July 1, 2005, is not
effective beyond the expiration date of the agreement.
(3) Contracting for services that is expressly mandated by the
legislature or was authorized by law prior to July 1, 2005, including
contracts and agreements between public entities, shall not be subject
to the processes set forth in subsections (1), (4), and (5) of this
section.
(4) Competitive contracting shall be implemented as follows:
(a) At least ninety days prior to the date the contracting agency
requests bids from private entities for a contract for services
provided by classified employees, the contracting agency shall notify
the classified employees whose positions or work would be displaced by
the contract. The employees shall have sixty days from the date of
notification to offer alternatives to purchasing services by contract,
and the agency shall consider the alternatives before requesting bids.
(b) If the employees decide to compete for the contract, they shall
notify the contracting agency of their decision. Employees must form
one or more employee business units for the purpose of submitting a bid
or bids to perform the services.
(c) The director of personnel, with the advice and assistance of
the department of general administration, shall develop and make
available to employee business units training in the bidding process
and general bid preparation.
(d) The director of general administration, with the advice and
assistance of the department of personnel, shall, by rule, establish
procedures to ensure that bids are submitted and evaluated in a fair
and objective manner and that there exists a competitive market for the
service. Such rules shall include, but not be limited to: (i)
Prohibitions against participation in the bid evaluation process by
employees who prepared the business unit's bid or who perform any of
the services to be contracted; (ii) provisions to ensure no bidder
receives an advantage over other bidders and that bid requirements are
applied equitably to all parties; and (iii) procedures that require the
contracting agency to receive complaints regarding the bidding process
and to consider them before awarding the contract. Appeal of an
agency's actions under this subsection is an adjudicative proceeding
and subject to the applicable provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, the
administrative procedure act, with the final decision to be rendered by
an administrative law judge assigned under chapter 34.12 RCW.
(e) An employee business unit's bid must include the fully
allocated costs of the service, including the cost of the employees'
salaries and benefits, space, equipment, materials, and other costs
necessary to perform the function. An employee business unit's cost
shall not include the state's indirect overhead costs unless those
costs can be attributed directly to the function in question and would
not exist if that function were not performed in state service.
(f) A department, agency, or institution of higher education may
contract with the department of general administration to conduct the
bidding process.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) "Employee business unit" means a group of employees who perform
services to be contracted under this section and who submit a bid for
the performance of those services under subsection (4) of this section.
(b) "Indirect overhead costs" means the pro rata share of existing
agency administrative salaries and benefits, and rent, equipment costs,
utilities, and materials associated with those administrative
functions.
(c) "Competitive contracting" means the process by which classified
employees of a department, agency, or institution of higher education
compete with businesses, individuals, nonprofit organizations, or other
entities for contracts authorized by subsection (1) of this section.
(6) The requirements of this section do not apply to RCW
74.13.031(5) or sections 7 and 10 of this act.

Sec. 12 RCW 43.105.060 and 1987 c 504 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
State and local government agencies are authorized to enter into
any contracts with the department, an authorized preferred provider, or
its successor which may be necessary or desirable to effectuate the
purposes and policies of this chapter or for maximum utilization of
facilities and services which are the subject of this chapter.

Sec. 13 RCW 43.105.200 and 1992 c 20 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, in the
case of institutions of higher education, the provisions of this
chapter ((20, Laws of 1992, apply to business and administrative
applications but)) do not apply to academic and research
((applications)) projects, research initiatives, or instructional
programs, but do apply to the business and administrative applications
institutions of higher education.
(2) Technology investments in research projects, research
initiatives, or instructional programs at institutions of higher
education estimated to cost one million dollars or more of general fund
state appropriations may be reviewed by the board if the projects are
deemed mission-critical by the institution or of statewide application
by the director. The director, in consultation with institutions of
higher education, shall develop and provide to the institutions
criteria to be used in determining whether projects are mission-critical.

Sec. 14 RCW 43.105.170 and 1999 c 80 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each agency shall develop an information technology portfolio
consistent with RCW ((43.105.095)) 43.105.172. The superintendent of
public instruction shall develop its portfolio in conjunction with
educational service districts and statewide or regional providers of K-12 education information technology services.
(2) Agency portfolios shall include, but not be limited to, the
following:
(a) A baseline assessment of the agency's information technology
resources and capabilities that will serve as the benchmark for
subsequent planning and performance measures;
(b) A statement of the agency's mission, goals, and objectives for
information technology, including goals and objectives for achieving
electronic access to agency records, information, and services;
(c) An explanation of how the agency's mission, goals, and
objectives for information technology support and conform to the state
strategic information technology plan developed under RCW 43.105.160;
(d) An implementation strategy to provide electronic access to
public records and information. This implementation strategy must be
assembled to include:
(i) Compliance with Title 40 RCW;
(ii) Adequate public notice and opportunity for comment;
(iii) Consideration of a variety of electronic technologies,
including those that help transcend geographic locations, standard
business hours, economic conditions of users, and disabilities;
(iv) Methods to educate both state employees and the public in the
effective use of access technologies;
(e) Projects and resources required to meet the objectives of the
portfolio; and
(f) Where feasible, estimated schedules and funding required to
implement identified projects.
(3) Portfolios developed under subsection (1) of this section shall
be submitted to the department for review and forwarded along with the
department's recommendations to the board for review and approval. The
board may reject, require modification to, or approve portfolios as
deemed appropriate by the board. Portfolios submitted under this
subsection shall be updated and submitted for review and approval as
necessary.
(4) Each agency shall prepare and submit to the department a
biennial performance report that evaluates progress toward the
objectives articulated in its information technology portfolio. The
superintendent of public instruction shall develop its portfolio in
conjunction with educational service districts and statewide or
regional providers of K-12 education information technology services.
The report shall include:
(a) An evaluation of the agency's performance relating to
information technology;
(b) An assessment of progress made toward implementing the agency
information technology portfolio;
(c) Progress toward electronic access to public information and
enabling citizens to have two-way interaction for obtaining information
and services from agencies; and
(d) An inventory of agency information services, equipment, and
proprietary software.
(5) The ((department, with the approval of the)) board((,)) shall
establish standards, elements, form, and format for plans and reports
developed under this section.
(6) Agency activities to increase electronic access to public
records and information, as required by this section, must be
implemented within available resources and existing agency planning
processes.
(7) The board may exempt any agency from any or all of the
requirements of this section.

Sec. 15 RCW 43.105.830 and 2004 c 276 s 909 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1))) The K-20 technology account is hereby created in the state
treasury. The department of information services shall deposit into
the account moneys received from legislative appropriations, gifts,
grants, and endowments for the buildout and installation of the K-20
telecommunication system. The account shall be subject to
appropriation and may be expended solely for the K-20 telecommunication
system. Disbursements from the account shall be on authorization of
the director of the department of information services with approval of
the board.
(((2) During the 2003-2005 biennium, the legislature may transfer
moneys from the K-20 technology account to the state general fund such
amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.))

Sec. 16 RCW 43.105.835 and 2004 c 276 s 910 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The education technology revolving fund is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from billings under
subsection (2) of this section must be deposited in the revolving fund.
Only the director of the department of information services or the
director's designee may authorize expenditures from the fund. The
revolving fund shall be used to pay for network operations, transport,
equipment, software, supplies, and services, maintenance and
depreciation of on-site data, and shared infrastructure, and other
costs incidental to the development, operation, and administration of
shared educational information technology services, telecommunications,
and systems. The revolving fund shall not be used for the acquisition,
maintenance, or operations of local telecommunications infrastructure
or the maintenance or depreciation of on-premises video equipment
specific to a particular institution or group of institutions.
(2) The revolving fund and all disbursements from the revolving
fund are subject to the allotment procedure under chapter 43.88 RCW,
but an appropriation is not required for expenditures. The department
of information services shall, in consultation with entities connected
to the network under RCW 43.105.820 and subject to the review and
approval of the office of financial management, establish and implement
a billing structure for network services identified in subsection (1)
of this section.
(3) The department shall charge those public entities connected to
the K-20 ((telecommunications [telecommunication system]))
telecommunication system under RCW 43.105.820 an annual copayment per
unit of transport connection as determined by the legislature after
consideration of the K-20 board's recommendations. This copayment
shall be deposited into the revolving fund to be used for the purposes
in subsection (1) of this section. It is the intent of the legislature
to appropriate to the revolving fund such moneys as necessary to cover
the costs for transport, maintenance, and depreciation of data
equipment located at the individual public institutions, maintenance
and depreciation of the network backbone, and services provided to the
network under RCW 43.105.815.
(((4) During the 2003-05 biennium, the legislature may transfer
moneys from the education technology revolving fund to the state
general fund and the data processing revolving fund such amounts as
reflect the excess fund balance of the account.))

--- END ---