BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.85.011 and 1994 c 249 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that administrative rules adopted by state
agencies can have a disproportionate impact on the state's small
businesses because of the size of those businesses. This
disproportionate impact reduces competition, innovation, employment,
and new employment opportunities, and threatens the very existence of
some small businesses. Before adopting administrative rules, agencies
must make a thorough, realistic, and comprehensive assessment of the
economic impact and burdens it places on the businesses that must
comply with the rules. The legislature therefore enacts the Regulatory
Fairness Act with the intent of reducing the disproportionate impact of
state administrative rules on small business and ensuring that the full
impact and costs of all proposed agency rules are understood prior to
their adoption.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.85.020 and 2007 c 239 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply through this chapter unless
the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Industry" means all of the businesses in this state in any one
four-digit standard industrial classification as published by the
United States department of commerce, or the North American industry
classification system as published by the executive office of the
president and the office of management and budget. However, if the use
of a four-digit standard industrial classification or North American
industry classification system would result in the release of data that
would violate state confidentiality laws, "industry" means all
businesses in a three-digit standard industrial classification or the
North American industry classification system.
(2) "Minor cost" means a cost per business that is less than three-tenths of one percent of annual revenue or income, or one hundred
dollars, whichever is greater, or one percent of annual payroll.
However, for the rules of the department of social and health services
"minor cost" means cost per business that is less than fifty dollars of
annual cost per client or other appropriate unit of service. In all
cases, an agency must consider the cumulative cost to a business of all
sections of all proposed rules in the rule-making notice when making a
"minor cost" determination.
(3) "Small business" means any business entity, including a sole
proprietorship, corporation, partnership, or other legal entity, that
is owned and operated independently from all other businesses, and that
has fifty or fewer employees.
(4) "Small business economic impact statement" means a statement
meeting the requirements of RCW 19.85.040 prepared by a state agency
pursuant to RCW 19.85.030.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.85.030 and 2007 c 239 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In the adoption of a rule under chapter 34.05 RCW, an agency
shall prepare a small business economic impact statement: (a) If the
proposed rule will impose more than minor costs on businesses in an
industry; or (b) if requested to do so by a majority vote of the joint
administrative rules review committee within forty-five days of
receiving the notice of proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320.
However, if the agency has completed the pilot rule process as defined
by RCW 34.05.313 before filing the notice of a proposed rule, the
agency is not required to prepare a small business economic impact
statement.
An agency shall prepare the small business economic impact
statement in accordance with RCW 19.85.040, and file it with the code
reviser along with the notice required under RCW 34.05.320. An agency
shall file a statement prepared at the request of the joint
administrative rules review committee with the code reviser upon its
completion before the adoption of the rule. An agency shall provide a
copy of the small business economic impact statement to any person
requesting it. An agency shall post a copy of the small business
economic impact statement on the agency's web site along with the
proposed rule or rules if the agency posts the proposed rule or rules
on its web site.
(2) Based upon the extent of disproportionate impact on small
business identified in the statement prepared under RCW 19.85.040, the
agency shall, where legal and feasible in meeting the stated objectives
of the statutes upon which the rule is based, reduce the costs imposed
by the rule on small businesses. Methods to reduce the costs on small
businesses may include:
(a) Reducing, modifying, or eliminating substantive regulatory
requirements;
(b) Simplifying, reducing, or eliminating recordkeeping and
reporting requirements;
(c) Reducing the frequency of inspections;
(d) Delaying compliance timetables;
(e) Reducing or modifying fine schedules for noncompliance; or
(f) Any other mitigation techniques.
(3) If the agency determines it cannot reduce the costs imposed by
the rule on small businesses, the agency shall provide a clear
explanation of why it has made that determination and include that
statement with its filing of the proposed rule pursuant to RCW
34.05.320.
(4)(a) All small business economic impact statements are subject to
selective review by the joint administrative rules review committee
pursuant to RCW 34.05.630.
(b) Any person affected by a proposed rule where there is (([a]))
a small business economic impact statement may petition the joint
administrative rules review committee for review pursuant to the
procedure in RCW 34.05.655.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.85.040 and 2007 c 239 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A small business economic impact statement must include a brief
description of the reporting, recordkeeping, and other compliance
requirements of the proposed rule, and the kinds of professional
services that a small business is likely to need in order to comply
with such requirements. It shall analyze and document the costs of
compliance for businesses required to comply with the proposed rule
adopted pursuant to RCW 34.05.320, including costs of equipment,
supplies, labor, professional services, and increased administrative
costs. It shall consider, based on input received, whether compliance
with the rule will cause businesses to lose sales or revenue. To
determine whether the proposed rule will have a disproportionate cost
impact on small businesses, the impact statement must compare the cost
of compliance for small business with the cost of compliance for the
ten percent of businesses that are the largest businesses required to
comply with the proposed rules using one or more of the following as a
basis for comparing costs:
(a) Cost per employee;
(b) Cost per hour of labor; or
(c) Cost per one hundred dollars of sales.
(2) A small business economic impact statement must also include:
(a) A statement of the steps taken by the agency to reduce the
costs of the rule on small businesses as required by RCW 19.85.030(2),
or reasonable justification for not doing so, addressing the options
listed in RCW 19.85.030(2);
(b) A description of how the agency will involve small businesses
in the development of the rule;
(c) A list of industries that will be required to comply with the
rule. However, this subsection (2)(c) shall not be construed to
preclude application of the rule to any business or industry to which
it would otherwise apply; and
(d) An estimate of the number of jobs that will be created or lost
as the result of compliance with the proposed rule.
(3) To obtain information for purposes of this section, an agency:
(a) May survey a representative sample of affected businesses or
trade associations;
(b) Must consult with a wide range of for-profit and other industry
sources that will be impacted by the proposed rule;
(c) May not rely solely on economic modeling; and
(d) Should, whenever possible, appoint a committee under RCW
34.05.310(2) to assist in the accurate assessment of the costs of a
proposed rule, and the means to reduce the costs imposed on small
business.
(4) The agency must disclose opinions and analysis submitted by
individuals that substantially differ or conflict with the agency's
analysis of the economic impacts and administrative burdens of the
proposed rules. Failure to disclose such conflicting or substantially
different opinions or analysis raised during the public rule-making
process creates a rebuttable presumption that the rule has not been
adopted in accordance with all applicable provisions of law for
purposes of RCW 34.05.620 and 34.05.630.

Sec. 5 RCW 34.05.328 and 2003 c 165 s 2 and 2003 c 39 s 13 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) ((Before adopting a rule described in subsection (5) of this
section, an agency shall:
(a) Clearly state in detail the general goals and specific
objectives of the statute that the rule implements;
(b) Determine that the rule is needed to achieve the general goals
and specific objectives stated under (a) of this subsection, and
analyze alternatives to rule making and the consequences of not
adopting the rule;
(c) Provide notification in the notice of proposed rule making
under RCW 34.05.320 that a preliminary cost-benefit analysis is
available. The preliminary cost-benefit analysis must fulfill the
requirements of the cost-benefit analysis under (d) of this subsection.
If the agency files a supplemental notice under RCW 34.05.340, the
supplemental notice shall include notification that a revised
preliminary cost-benefit analysis is available. A final cost-benefit
analysis shall be available when the rule is adopted under RCW
34.05.360;
(d) Determine that the probable benefits of the rule are greater
than its probable costs, taking into account both the qualitative and
quantitative benefits and costs and the specific directives of the
statute being implemented;
(e) Determine, after considering alternative versions of the rule
and the analysis required under (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection,
that the rule being adopted is the least burdensome alternative for
those required to comply with it that will achieve the general goals
and specific objectives stated under (a) of this subsection;
(f) Determine that the rule does not require those to whom it
applies to take an action that violates requirements of another federal
or state law;
(g) Determine that the rule does not impose more stringent
performance requirements on private entities than on public entities
unless required to do so by federal or state law;
(h) Determine if the rule differs from any federal regulation or
statute applicable to the same activity or subject matter and, if so,
determine that the difference is justified by the following:
(i) A state statute that explicitly allows the agency to differ
from federal standards; or
(ii) Substantial evidence that the difference is necessary to
achieve the general goals and specific objectives stated under (a) of
this subsection; and
(i) Coordinate the rule, to the maximum extent practicable, with
other federal, state, and local laws applicable to the same activity or
subject matter.
(2) In making its determinations pursuant to subsection (1)(b)
through (h) of this section, the agency shall place in the rule-making
file documentation of sufficient quantity and quality so as to persuade
a reasonable person that the determinations are justified.
(3) Before adopting rules described in subsection (5) of this
section, an agency shall place in the rule-making file a rule
implementation plan for rules filed under each adopting order. The
plan shall describe how the agency intends to:
(a) Implement and enforce the rule, including a description of the
resources the agency intends to use;
(b) Inform and educate affected persons about the rule;
(c) Promote and assist voluntary compliance; and
(d) Evaluate whether the rule achieves the purpose for which it was
adopted, including, to the maximum extent practicable, the use of
interim milestones to assess progress and the use of objectively
measurable outcomes.
(4) After adopting a rule described in subsection (5) of this
section regulating the same activity or subject matter as another
provision of federal or state law, an agency shall do all of the
following:
(a) Provide to the business assistance center a list citing by
reference the other federal and state laws that regulate the same
activity or subject matter;
(b) Coordinate implementation and enforcement of the rule with the
other federal and state entities regulating the same activity or
subject matter by making every effort to do one or more of the
following:
(i) Deferring to the other entity;
(ii) Designating a lead agency; or
(iii) Entering into an agreement with the other entities specifying
how the agency and entities will coordinate implementation and
enforcement.
If the agency is unable to comply with this subsection (4)(b), the
agency shall report to the legislature pursuant to (c) of this
subsection;
(c) Report to the joint administrative rules review committee:
(i) The existence of any overlap or duplication of other federal or
state laws, any differences from federal law, and any known overlap,
duplication, or conflict with local laws; and
(ii) Make recommendations for any legislation that may be necessary
to eliminate or mitigate any adverse effects of such overlap,
duplication, or difference.
(5)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, this section
applies to:
(i) Significant legislative rules of the departments of ecology,
labor and industries, health, revenue, social and health services, and
natural resources, the employment security department, the forest
practices board, the office of the insurance commissioner, and to the
legislative rules of the department of fish and wildlife implementing
chapter 77.55 RCW; and
(ii) Any rule of any agency, if this section is voluntarily made
applicable to the rule by the agency, or is made applicable to the rule
by a majority vote of the joint administrative rules review committee
within forty-five days of receiving the notice of proposed rule making
under RCW 34.05.320.
(b) This section does not apply to:
(i) Emergency rules adopted under RCW 34.05.350;
(ii) Rules relating only to internal governmental operations that
are not subject to violation by a nongovernment party;
(iii) Rules adopting or incorporating by reference without material
change federal statutes or regulations, Washington state statutes,
rules of other Washington state agencies, shoreline master programs
other than those programs governing shorelines of statewide
significance, or, as referenced by Washington state law, national
consensus codes that generally establish industry standards, if the
material adopted or incorporated regulates the same subject matter and
conduct as the adopting or incorporating rule;
(iv) Rules that only correct typographical errors, make address or
name changes, or clarify language of a rule without changing its
effect;
(v) Rules the content of which is explicitly and specifically
dictated by statute;
(vi) Rules that set or adjust fees or rates pursuant to legislative
standards; or
(vii) Rules of the department of social and health services
relating only to client medical or financial eligibility and rules
concerning liability for care of dependents.
(c) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) A "procedural rule" is a rule that adopts, amends, or repeals
(A) any procedure, practice, or requirement relating to any agency
hearings; (B) any filing or related process requirement for making
application to an agency for a license or permit; or (C) any policy
statement pertaining to the consistent internal operations of an
agency.
(ii) An "interpretive rule" is a rule, the violation of which does
not subject a person to a penalty or sanction, that sets forth the
agency's interpretation of statutory provisions it administers.
(iii) A "significant legislative rule" is a rule other than a
procedural or interpretive rule that (A) adopts substantive provisions
of law pursuant to delegated legislative authority, the violation of
which subjects a violator of such rule to a penalty or sanction; (B)
establishes, alters, or revokes any qualification or standard for the
issuance, suspension, or revocation of a license or permit; or (C)
adopts a new, or makes significant amendments to, a policy or
regulatory program.
(d) In the notice of proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320, an
agency shall state whether this section applies to the proposed rule
pursuant to (a)(i) of this subsection, or if the agency will apply this
section voluntarily.
(6))) The definitions in this subsection (1) apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Interpretive rule" means a rule, the violation of which does
not subject a person to a penalty or sanction, that sets forth the
agency's interpretation of statutory provisions it administers.
(b) "Procedural rule" means a rule that adopts, amends, or repeals:
(i) Any procedure, practice, or requirement relating to any agency
hearings; (ii) any filing or related process requirement for making
application to an agency for a license or permit; or (iii) any policy
statement pertaining to the consistent internal operations of an
agency.
(c) "Return on investment" means the time period required for full
recovery of any initial and ongoing monetary or capital outlays
necessary to comply with the proposed rule or rules.
(d) "Significant legislative rule" means a rule other than a
procedural or interpretive rule that: (i) Adopts substantive
provisions of law pursuant to delegated legislative authority, the
violation of which subjects a violator of the rule to a penalty or
sanction; (ii) establishes, alters, or revokes any qualification or
standard for the issuance, suspension, or revocation of a license or
permit; or (iii) adopts a new, or makes significant amendments to, a
policy or regulatory program.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, this section
applies to:
(i) Significant legislative rules of any agency; and
(ii) Any rule of any agency, if this section is voluntarily made
applicable to the rule by the agency, or is made applicable to the rule
by a majority vote of the joint administrative rules review committee
within forty-five days of receiving the notice of proposed rule making
under RCW 34.05.320.
(b) This section does not apply to:
(i) Emergency rules adopted under RCW 34.05.350;
(ii) Rules relating only to internal governmental operations that
are not subject to violation by a nongovernment party;
(iii) Rules adopting or incorporating by reference without material
change federal statutes or regulations, Washington state statutes,
rules of other Washington state agencies, shoreline master programs
other than those programs governing shorelines of statewide
significance, or, as referenced by Washington state law, national
consensus codes that generally establish industry standards, if the
material adopted or incorporated regulates the same subject matter and
conduct as the adopting or incorporating rule;
(iv) Rules that only correct typographical errors, make address or
name changes, or clarify language of a rule without changing its
effect;
(v) Rules the content of which is explicitly and specifically
dictated by statute;
(vi) Rules that set or adjust fees or rates pursuant to legislative
standards; or
(vii) Rules of the department of social and health services
relating only to client medical or financial eligibility and rules
concerning liability for care of dependents.
(c) In the notice of proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320, an
agency shall state whether this section applies to the proposed rule
pursuant to (a)(i) of this subsection, or if the agency will apply this
section voluntarily.
(3) Before adopting a rule described in subsection (2) of this
section, an agency shall:
(a) Clearly state in detail the general goals and specific
objectives of the statute that the rule implements;
(b) Determine that the rule is needed to achieve the general goals
and specific objectives stated under (a) of this subsection, and
analyze alternatives to rule making and the consequences of not
adopting the rule;
(c) Provide notification in the notice of proposed rule making
under RCW 34.05.320 that a preliminary cost-benefit analysis is
available. The preliminary cost-benefit analysis must fulfill the
requirements of the cost-benefit analysis under (d) of this subsection.
If the agency files a supplemental notice under RCW 34.05.340, the
supplemental notice must include notification that a revised
preliminary cost-benefit analysis is available. A final cost-benefit
analysis must be available when the rule is adopted under RCW
34.05.360;
(d) Determine that the probable benefits of the rule are greater
than its probable costs, taking into account:
(i) Both the qualitative and quantitative benefits and costs and
the specific directives of the statute being implemented; and
(ii) The initial costs required to comply with the proposed rule
and the expected return on investment;
(e) Determine, after considering alternative versions of the rule
and the analysis required under (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection,
that the rule being adopted is the least burdensome alternative for
those required to comply with it that will achieve the general goals
and specific objectives stated under (a) of this subsection;
(f) Determine that the rule does not require those to whom it
applies to take an action that violates requirements of another federal
or state law;
(g) Determine that the rule does not impose more stringent
performance requirements on private entities than on public entities
unless required to do so by federal or state law;
(h) Determine if the rule differs from any federal regulation or
statute applicable to the same activity or subject matter and, if so,
determine that the difference is justified by the following:
(i) A state statute that explicitly allows the agency to differ
from federal standards; or
(ii) Substantial evidence that the difference is necessary to
achieve the general goals and specific objectives stated under (a) of
this subsection; and
(i) Coordinate the rule, to the maximum extent practicable, with
other federal, state, and local laws applicable to the same activity or
subject matter.
(4) In making its determinations pursuant to subsection (3) of this
section, the agency shall proactively consult with a wide range of for-profit and other industry sources that will be impacted by the proposed
rule and place in the rule-making file documentation of sufficient
quantity and quality so as to persuade a reasonable person that the
determinations are justified.
(5) Before adopting rules described in subsection (2) of this
section, the agency shall:
(a) Disclose opinions and analysis submitted by individuals that
substantially differ or conflict with the agency's analysis of the
economic impacts and administrative burdens of the proposed rules.
Failure to disclose such conflicting or substantially different
opinions or analysis raised during the public rule-making process
creates a rebuttable presumption that the rule has not been adopted in
accordance with all applicable provisions of law for purposes of RCW
34.05.620 and 34.05.630.
(b) Place in the rule-making file a rule implementation plan for
rules filed under each adopting order. The plan must describe how the
agency intends to:
(i) Implement and enforce the rule, including a description of the
resources the agency intends to use;
(ii) Inform and educate affected persons about the rule;
(iii) Promote and assist voluntary compliance; and
(iv) Evaluate whether the rule achieves the purpose for which it
was adopted including, to the maximum extent practicable, the use of
interim milestones to assess progress and the use of objectively
measurable outcomes.
(6) After adopting a rule described in subsection (2) of this
section regulating the same activity or subject matter as another
provision of federal or state law, an agency shall do all of the
following:
(a) Provide to the department of commerce a list citing by
reference the other federal and state laws that regulate the same
activity or subject matter;
(b) Coordinate implementation and enforcement of the rule with the
other federal and state entities regulating the same activity or
subject matter by making every effort to do one or more of the
following:
(i) Deferring to the other entity;
(ii) Designating a lead agency; or
(iii) Entering into an agreement with the other entities specifying
how the agency and entities will coordinate implementation and
enforcement.
If the agency is unable to comply with this subsection (6)(b), the
agency shall report to the legislature pursuant to (c) of this
subsection;
(c) Report to the joint administrative rules review committee:
(i) The existence of any overlap or duplication of other federal or
state laws, any differences from federal law, and any known overlap,
duplication, or conflict with local laws; and
(ii) Make recommendations for any legislation that may be necessary
to eliminate or mitigate any adverse effects of such overlap,
duplication, or difference.
(7) By January 31, 1996, and by January 31st of each even-numbered
year thereafter, the office of financial management, after consulting
with state agencies, counties, and cities, and business, labor, and
environmental organizations, shall report to the governor and the
legislature regarding the effects of this section on the regulatory
system in this state. The report shall document:
(a) The rules proposed to which this section applied and to the
extent possible, how compliance with this section affected the
substance of the rule, if any, that the agency ultimately adopted;
(b) The costs incurred by state agencies in complying with this
section;
(c) Any legal action maintained based upon the alleged failure of
any agency to comply with this section, the costs to the state of such
action, and the result;
(d) The extent to which this section has adversely affected the
capacity of agencies to fulfill their legislatively prescribed mission;
(e) The extent to which this section has improved the acceptability
of state rules to those regulated; and
(f) Any other information considered by the office of financial
management to be useful in evaluating the effect of this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 34.05.353 and 2004 c 31 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An agency may file notice for the expedited adoption of rules
in accordance with the procedures set forth in this section for rules
meeting any one of the following criteria:
(a) The proposed rules relate only to internal governmental
operations that are not subject to violation by a person;
(b) The proposed rules adopt or incorporate by reference without
material change federal statutes or regulations, Washington state
statutes, rules of other Washington state agencies, shoreline master
programs other than those programs governing shorelines of statewide
significance, or, as referenced by Washington state law, national
consensus codes that generally establish industry standards, if the
material adopted or incorporated regulates the same subject matter and
conduct as the adopting or incorporating rule;
(c) The proposed rules only correct typographical errors, make
address or name changes, or clarify language of a rule without changing
its effect;
(d) The content of the proposed rules is explicitly and
specifically dictated by statute;
(e) The proposed rules have been the subject of negotiated rule
making, pilot rule making, or some other process that involved
substantial participation by interested parties before the development
of the proposed rule; or
(f) The proposed rule is being amended after a review under RCW
34.05.328.
(2) An agency may file notice for the expedited repeal of rules
under the procedures set forth in this section for rules meeting any
one of the following criteria:
(a) The statute on which the rule is based has been repealed and
has not been replaced by another statute providing statutory authority
for the rule;
(b) The statute on which the rule is based has been declared
unconstitutional by a court with jurisdiction, there is a final
judgment, and no statute has been enacted to replace the
unconstitutional statute;
(c) The rule is no longer necessary because of changed
circumstances; or
(d) Other rules of the agency or of another agency govern the same
activity as the rule, making the rule redundant.
(3) The expedited rule-making process must follow the requirements
for rule making set forth in RCW 34.05.320, except that the agency is
not required to prepare a small business economic impact statement
under RCW 19.85.025, a statement indicating whether the rule
constitutes a significant legislative rule under RCW
34.05.328(((5)(c)(iii))) (1)(d), or a significant legislative rule
analysis under RCW 34.05.328. An agency is not required to prepare
statements of inquiry under RCW 34.05.310 or conduct a hearing for the
expedited rule making. The notice for the expedited rule making must
contain a statement in at least ten-point type, that is substantially
in the following form:

NOTICE

THIS RULE IS BEING PROPOSED UNDER AN EXPEDITED RULE-MAKING PROCESS THAT WILL ELIMINATE THE NEED FOR THE AGENCY TO
HOLD PUBLIC HEARINGS, PREPARE A SMALL BUSINESS ECONOMIC IMPACT
STATEMENT, OR PROVIDE RESPONSES TO THE CRITERIA FOR A
SIGNIFICANT LEGISLATIVE RULE. IF YOU OBJECT TO THIS USE OF THE
EXPEDITED RULE-MAKING PROCESS, YOU MUST EXPRESS YOUR OBJECTIONS
IN WRITING AND THEY MUST BE SENT TO (INSERT NAME AND ADDRESS)
AND RECEIVED BY (INSERT DATE).

(4) The agency shall send either a copy of the notice of the
proposed expedited rule making, or a summary of the information on the
notice, to any person who has requested notification of proposals for
expedited rule making or of regular agency rule making, as well as the
joint administrative rules review committee, within three days after
its publication in the Washington State Register. An agency may charge
for the actual cost of providing a requesting party mailed copies of
these notices. The notice of the proposed expedited rule making must
be preceded by a statement substantially in the form provided in
subsection (3) of this section. The notice must also include an
explanation of the reasons the agency believes the expedited rule-making process is appropriate.
(5) The code reviser shall publish the text of all rules proposed
for expedited adoption, and the citation and caption of all rules
proposed for expedited repeal, along with the notice required in this
section in a separate section of the Washington State Register. Once
the notice of expedited rule making has been published in the
Washington State Register, the only changes that an agency may make in
the noticed materials before their final adoption or repeal are to
correct typographical errors.
(6) Any person may file a written objection to the expedited rule
making. The objection must be filed with the agency rules coordinator
within forty-five days after the notice of the proposed expedited rule
making has been published in the Washington State Register. A person
who has filed a written objection to the expedited rule making may
withdraw the objection.
(7) If no written objections to the expedited rule making are filed
with the agency within forty-five days after the notice of proposed
expedited rule making is published, or if all objections that have been
filed are withdrawn by the persons filing the objections, the agency
may enter an order adopting or repealing the rule without further
notice or a public hearing. The order must be published in the manner
required by this chapter for any other agency order adopting, amending,
or repealing a rule.
(8) If a written notice of objection to the expedited rule making
is timely filed with the agency and is not withdrawn, the notice of
proposed expedited rule making published under this section is
considered a statement of inquiry for the purposes of RCW 34.05.310,
and the agency may initiate further rule-making proceedings in
accordance with this chapter.
(9) As used in this section, "expedited rule making" includes both
the expedited adoption of rules and the expedited repeal of rules.

Sec. 7 RCW 50.13.060 and 2008 c 120 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Governmental agencies, including law enforcement agencies,
prosecuting agencies, and the executive branch, whether state, local,
or federal shall have access to information or records deemed private
and confidential under this chapter if the information or records are
needed by the agency for official purposes and:
(a) The agency submits an application in writing to the employment
security department for the records or information containing a
statement of the official purposes for which the information or records
are needed and specific identification of the records or information
sought from the department; and
(b) The director, commissioner, chief executive, or other official
of the agency has verified the need for the specific information in
writing either on the application or on a separate document; and
(c) The agency requesting access has served a copy of the
application for records or information on the individual or employing
unit whose records or information are sought and has provided the
department with proof of service. Service shall be made in a manner
which conforms to the civil rules for superior court. The requesting
agency shall include with the copy of the application a statement to
the effect that the individual or employing unit may contact the public
records officer of the employment security department to state any
objections to the release of the records or information. The
employment security department shall not act upon the application of
the requesting agency until at least five days after service on the
concerned individual or employing unit. The employment security
department shall consider any objections raised by the concerned
individual or employing unit in deciding whether the requesting agency
needs the information or records for official purposes.
(2) The requirements of subsections (1) and (9) of this section
shall not apply to the state legislative branch. The state legislature
shall have access to information or records deemed private and
confidential under this chapter, if the legislature or a legislative
committee finds that the information or records are necessary and for
official purposes. If the employment security department does not make
information or records available as provided in this subsection, the
legislature may exercise its authority granted by chapter 44.16 RCW.
(3) In cases of emergency the governmental agency requesting access
shall not be required to formally comply with the provisions of
subsection (1) of this section at the time of the request if the
procedures required by subsection (1) of this section are complied with
by the requesting agency following the receipt of any records or
information deemed private and confidential under this chapter. An
emergency is defined as a situation in which irreparable harm or damage
could occur if records or information are not released immediately.
(4) The requirements of subsection (1)(c) of this section shall not
apply to governmental agencies where the procedures would frustrate the
investigation of possible violations of criminal laws or to the release
of employing unit names, addresses, number of employees, and aggregate
employer wage data for the purpose of state governmental agencies
preparing small business economic impact statements under chapter 19.85
RCW or preparing cost-benefit analyses under RCW 34.05.328(((1))) (3)
(c) and (d). Information provided by the department and held to be
private and confidential under state or federal laws must not be
misused or released to unauthorized parties. A person who misuses such
information or releases such information to unauthorized parties is
subject to the sanctions in RCW 50.13.080.
(5) Governmental agencies shall have access to certain records or
information, limited to such items as names, addresses, social security
numbers, and general information about benefit entitlement or employer
information possessed by the department, for comparison purposes with
records or information possessed by the requesting agency to detect
improper or fraudulent claims, or to determine potential tax liability
or employer compliance with registration and licensing requirements.
In those cases the governmental agency shall not be required to comply
with subsection (1)(c) of this section, but the requirements of the
remainder of subsection (1) of this section must be satisfied.
(6) Governmental agencies may have access to certain records and
information, limited to employer information possessed by the
department for purposes authorized in chapter 50.38 RCW. Access to
these records and information is limited to only those individuals
conducting authorized statistical analysis, research, and evaluation
studies. Only in cases consistent with the purposes of chapter 50.38
RCW are government agencies not required to comply with subsection
(1)(c) of this section, but the requirements of the remainder of
subsection (1) of this section must be satisfied. Information provided
by the department and held to be private and confidential under state
or federal laws shall not be misused or released to unauthorized
parties subject to the sanctions in RCW 50.13.080.
(7) Disclosure to governmental agencies of information or records
obtained by the employment security department from the federal
government shall be governed by any applicable federal law or any
agreement between the federal government and the employment security
department where so required by federal law. When federal law does not
apply to the records or information state law shall control.
(8) The department may provide information for purposes of
statistical analysis and evaluation of the WorkFirst program or any
successor state welfare program to the department of social and health
services, the office of financial management, and other governmental
entities with oversight or evaluation responsibilities for the program
in accordance with RCW 43.20A.080. The confidential information
provided by the department shall remain the property of the department
and may be used by the authorized requesting agencies only for
statistical analysis, research, and evaluation purposes as provided in
RCW 74.08A.410 and 74.08A.420. The department of social and health
services, the office of financial management, or other governmental
entities with oversight or evaluation responsibilities for the program
are not required to comply with subsection (1)(c) of this section, but
the requirements of the remainder of subsection (1) of this section and
applicable federal laws and regulations must be satisfied. The
confidential information used for evaluation and analysis of welfare
reform supplied to the authorized requesting entities with regard to
the WorkFirst program or any successor state welfare program are exempt
from public inspection and copying under chapter 42.56 RCW.
(9) The disclosure of any records or information by a governmental
agency which has obtained the records or information under this section
is prohibited unless the disclosure is (a) directly connected to the
official purpose for which the records or information were obtained or
(b) to another governmental agency which would be permitted to obtain
the records or information under subsection (4) or (5) of this section.
(10) In conducting periodic salary or fringe benefit studies
pursuant to law, the department of personnel shall have access to
records of the employment security department as may be required for
such studies. For such purposes, the requirements of subsection (1)(c)
of this section need not apply.
(11)(a) To promote the reemployment of job seekers, the
commissioner may enter into data-sharing contracts with partners of the
one-stop career development system. The contracts shall provide for
the transfer of data only to the extent that the transfer is necessary
for the efficient provisions of workforce programs, including but not
limited to public labor exchange, unemployment insurance, worker
training and retraining, vocational rehabilitation, vocational
education, adult education, transition from public assistance, and
support services. The transfer of information under contracts with
one-stop partners is exempt from subsection (1)(c) of this section.
(b) An individual who applies for services from the department and
whose information will be shared under (a) of this subsection (11) must
be notified that his or her private and confidential information in the
department's records will be shared among the one-stop partners to
facilitate the delivery of one-stop services to the individual. The
notice must advise the individual that he or she may request that
private and confidential information not be shared among the one-stop
partners and the department must honor the request. In addition, the
notice must:
(i) Advise the individual that if he or she requests that private
and confidential information not be shared among one-stop partners, the
request will in no way affect eligibility for services;
(ii) Describe the nature of the information to be shared, the
general use of the information by one-stop partner representatives, and
among whom the information will be shared;
(iii) Inform the individual that shared information will be used
only for the purpose of delivering one-stop services and that further
disclosure of the information is prohibited under contract and is not
subject to disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW; and
(iv) Be provided in English and an alternative language selected by
the one-stop center or job service center as appropriate for the
community where the center is located.
If the notice is provided in-person, the individual who does not
want private and confidential information shared among the one-stop
partners must immediately advise the one-stop partner representative of
that decision. The notice must be provided to an individual who
applies for services telephonically, electronically, or by mail, in a
suitable format and within a reasonable time after applying for
services, which shall be no later than ten working days from the
department's receipt of the application for services. A one-stop
representative must be available to answer specific questions regarding
the nature, extent, and purpose for which the information may be
shared.
(12) To facilitate improved operation and evaluation of state
programs, the commissioner may enter into data-sharing contracts with
other state agencies only to the extent that such transfer is necessary
for the efficient operation or evaluation of outcomes for those
programs. The transfer of information by contract under this
subsection is exempt from subsection (1)(c) of this section.
(13) The misuse or unauthorized release of records or information
by any person or organization to which access is permitted by this
chapter subjects the person or organization to a civil penalty of five
thousand dollars and other applicable sanctions under state and federal
law. Suit to enforce this section shall be brought by the attorney
general and the amount of any penalties collected shall be paid into
the employment security department administrative contingency fund.
The attorney general may recover reasonable attorneys' fees for any
action brought to enforce this section.

--- END ---