BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 4.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This section applies to an action maintained as a class action
in which the settlement agreement or judgment includes a monetary
award, including compensatory or punitive and exemplary damages,
restitution, or any other payment of money due from each defendant to
the members of the class.
(2) It is the policy of this state, insofar as it is not
inconsistent with federal law, that for unpaid moneys remaining after
the distribution of monetary awards to the members of the class in a
class action described in subsection (1) of this section, the court
shall:
(a) Retain up to twenty-five percent to use for any purpose
permitted under law and court rules; and
(b) Distribute the remainder of the unpaid moneys to the class
action charitable contribution account created in subsection (3) of
this section.
(3) The class action charitable contribution account is created in
the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Moneys in the account may be expended for purposes that
have a direct or indirect relationship to the objectives of the class
action litigation from which the unpaid moneys were awarded or
otherwise promote the interests of the members of the class as
determined by the legislature.

--- END ---