BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.08.055 and 2009 c 201 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each applicant for or recipient of public assistance shall
complete and sign a physical application or, if available, electronic
application for assistance which shall contain or be verified by a
written declaration that it is signed under the penalties of perjury.
The department may make electronic applications available. The
application must include a question asking whether the applicant has
been denied assistance, disenrolled, or terminated from any public
assistance program within five years prior to the date of the
application. The application must include space for the applicant to
explain the particular circumstances of any denial, disenrollment, or
termination. The secretary, by rule and regulation, may require that
any other forms filled out by applicants or recipients of public
assistance shall contain or be verified by a written declaration that
it is made under the penalties of perjury and such declaration shall be
in lieu of any oath otherwise required, and each applicant shall be so
informed at the time of the signing. The application and signature
verification shall be in accordance with federal requirements for that
program.
(2) Any applicant for or recipient of public assistance who
willfully makes and signs any application, statement, other paper, or
electronic record which contains or is verified by a written
declaration that it is made under the penalties of perjury and which he
or she does not believe to be true and correct as to every material
matter is guilty of a class B felony punishable according to chapter
9A.20 RCW.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) "Electronic record" means a record generated, communicated,
received, or stored by electronic means for use in an information
system or for transmission from one information system to another.
(b) "Electronic signature" means a signature in electronic form
attached to or logically associated with an electronic record
including, but not limited to, a digital signature. An electronic
signature is a paperless way to sign a document using an electronic
sound, symbol, or process, attached to or logically associated with a
record and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the
record.
(c) "Sign" includes signing by physical signature, if available, or
electronic signature. An application must contain a signature in
either physical or, if available, electronic form.

--- END ---