BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that Washington's
building and construction trades along with their linked suppliers of
goods and services including but not limited to various sectors in
manufacturing; wholesale and retail trade; professional, scientific,
and technical services; agriculture and forestry; and information
services have been disproportionately affected during the current
economic downturn. The construction industry alone has suffered nearly
sixty thousand job losses, which is nearly thirty percent of its
workforce, in the last two years with the most severe losses focused in
the residential sector.
(2) Building new homes and reinvigorating the housing market will
create a positive ripple of economic activity throughout the entire
state. The construction industry has the potential to generate
billions of dollars in our state, tens of thousands of jobs, and much
needed taxable revenue for the state, counties, and local governments.
The industry employs a wide spectrum of workers ranging from entry
level to professionals and is a broad-based source of family wage jobs.
The construction industry plays an integral role in the green economy,
representing over forty percent of the green jobs in 2008.
(3) The legislature finds that impact fees and their associated
carrying costs can easily add tens of thousands of dollars to the cost
of a new home. These fees are in addition to the many permitting fees,
utility fees, property taxes, and real estate excise taxes paid by the
property owners. Impact fees artificially inflate the cost of a new
home beyond the actual value of the home.
(4) The legislature recognizes the great degree to which the state
of Washington and its local governments depend on the revenues and jobs
generated from the construction and sale of new homes and intends to
help jumpstart the state economy. By suspending these fees, builders
will be more likely to obtain financing in these tight financial
markets to cover the actual cost to build enabling them to reemploy
thousands of laid-off workers and break even in the current real estate
market.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.02.050 and 1994 c 257 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature:
(a) To ensure that adequate facilities are available to serve new
growth and development;
(b) To promote orderly growth and development by establishing
standards by which counties, cities, and towns may require, by
ordinance, that new growth and development pay a proportionate share of
the cost of new facilities needed to serve new growth and development;
and
(c) To ensure that impact fees are imposed through established
procedures and criteria so that specific developments do not pay
arbitrary fees or duplicative fees for the same impact.
(2) Except as provided in section 4 of this act, counties, cities,
and towns that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 are
authorized to impose impact fees on development activity as part of the
financing for public facilities, provided that the financing for system
improvements to serve new development must provide for a balance
between impact fees and other sources of public funds and cannot rely
solely on impact fees.
(3) The impact fees:
(a) ((Shall)) Must only be imposed for system improvements that are
reasonably related to the new development;
(b) ((Shall)) May not exceed a proportionate share of the costs of
system improvements that are reasonably related to the new development;
and
(c) ((Shall)) Must be used for system improvements that will
reasonably benefit the new development.
(4)(a) Impact fees may be collected and spent only for the public
facilities defined in RCW 82.02.090 which are addressed by a capital
facilities plan element of a comprehensive land use plan adopted
pursuant to the provisions of RCW 36.70A.070 or the provisions for
comprehensive plan adoption contained in chapter 36.70, 35.63, or
35A.63 RCW. After the date a county, city, or town is required to
adopt its development regulations under chapter 36.70A RCW, continued
authorization to collect and expend impact fees ((shall be)) is
contingent on the county, city, or town adopting or revising a
comprehensive plan in compliance with RCW 36.70A.070, and on the
capital facilities plan identifying:
(((a))) (i) Deficiencies in public facilities serving existing
development and the means by which existing deficiencies will be
eliminated within a reasonable period of time;
(((b))) (ii) Additional demands placed on existing public
facilities by new development; and
(((c))) (iii) Additional public facility improvements required to
serve new development.
(b) If the capital facilities plan of the county, city, or town is
complete other than for the inclusion of those elements which are the
responsibility of a special district, the county, city, or town may
impose impact fees to address those public facility needs for which the
county, city, or town is responsible.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.92.030 and 1988 c 179 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Local governments may develop and adopt programs for the purpose of
jointly funding, from public and private sources, transportation
improvements necessitated in whole or in part by economic development
and growth within their respective jurisdictions. Local governments
((shall)) must adopt the programs by ordinance after notice and public
hearing. Each program ((shall)) must contain the elements described in
this section.
(1) The program ((shall)) must identify the geographic boundaries
of the entire area or areas generally benefited by the proposed off-site transportation improvements and within which transportation impact
fees will be imposed under this chapter.
(2) The program ((shall)) must be based on an adopted
comprehensive, long-term transportation plan identifying the proposed
off-site transportation improvements reasonable and necessary to meet
the future growth needs of the designated plan area and intended to be
covered by this joint funding program, including acquisition of right-of-way, construction and reconstruction of all major and minor
arterials and intersection improvements, and identifying design
standards, levels of service, capacities, and costs applicable to the
program. The program ((shall)) must also indicate how the
transportation plan is coordinated with applicable transportation plans
for the region and for adjacent jurisdictions. The program ((shall))
must also indicate how public transportation and ride-sharing
improvements and services will be used to reduce off-site
transportation impacts from development.
(3) The program ((shall)) must include at least a six-year capital
funding program, updated annually, identifying the specific public
sources and amounts of revenue necessary to pay for that portion of the
cost of all off-site transportation improvements contained in the
transportation plan that will not foreseeably be funded by
transportation impact fees. The program ((shall)) must include a
proposed schedule for construction and expenditures of funds. The
funding plan ((shall)) must consider the additional local tax revenue
estimated to be generated by new development within the plan area if
all or a portion of the additional revenue is proposed to be earmarked
as future appropriations for such off-site transportation improvements.
(4) Except as provided in section 4 of this act, the program
((shall)) must authorize transportation impact fees to be imposed on
new development within the plan area for the purpose of providing a
portion of the funding for reasonable and necessary off-site
transportation improvements to solve the cumulative impacts of planned
growth and development in the plan area. Off-site transportation
impacts ((shall)) must be measured as a pro rata share of the capacity
of the off-site transportation improvements being funded under the
program. The fees ((shall)) must not exceed the amount that the local
government can demonstrate is reasonably necessary as a direct result
of the proposed development.
(5) The program ((shall)) must provide that the funds collected as
a result of a particular new development ((shall)) must be used in
substantial part to pay for improvements mitigating the impacts of the
development or be refunded to the property owners of record. Fees paid
toward more than one transportation improvement may be pooled and
expended on any one of the improvements mitigating the impact of the
development. The funds ((shall)) must be expended in all cases within
six years of collection by the local government or the unexpended funds
((shall)) must be refunded.
(6) The program ((shall)) must also describe the formula, timing,
security, credits, and other terms and conditions affecting the amount
and method of payment of the transportation impact fees as further
provided for in RCW 39.92.040. In calculating the amount of the fee,
local government ((shall)) must consider and give credit for the
developer's participation in public transportation and ride-sharing
improvements and services.
(7) The administrative element of the program ((shall)) must
include: An opportunity for administrative appeal by the developer and
hearing before an independent examiner of the amount of the
transportation impact fee imposed; establishment of a designated
account for the public and private funds appropriated or collected for
the transportation improvements identified in the plan; methods to
enforce collection of the public and private funds identified in the
program; designation of the administrative departments or other
entities responsible for administering the program, including
determination of fee amounts, transportation planning, and
construction; and provisions for future amendment of the program
including the addition of other off-site transportation improvements.
The program ((shall)) may not be amended in a manner to relieve local
government of any contractual obligations made to prior developers.
(8) The program ((shall)) must provide that private transportation
impact fees shall not be collected for any off-site transportation
improvement that is incapable of being reasonably carried out because
of lack of public funds or other foreseeable impediment.
(9) The program ((shall)) must provide that no transportation
impact fee may be imposed on a development by local government pursuant
to this program when mitigation of the same off-site transportation
impacts for the development is being required by any government agency
pursuant to any other local, state, or federal law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As of July 1, 2010, counties, cities, and transportation
benefit districts created under chapter 36.73 RCW may not impose impact
fees under RCW 82.02.050(2) or 39.92.030.
(2) This section does not limit the authority of a county, city, or
transportation benefit district to impose impact fees upon development
activities that were approved by the applicable county or city prior to
July 1, 2010.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 3 of this act expire June
30, 2012.

--- END ---