BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the current
administrative process for property taxes fails to adequately protect
taxpayers. Improving the transparency and fairness of the property tax
system will help increase taxpayer confidence that they are being
treated fairly. This act is intended to give greater taxpayer
protections in the appeals process and provide more information to
taxpayers so they can make informed decisions.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.40.0301 and 1994 c 301 s 35 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon review by any court, or appellate body, of a determination of
the valuation of property for purposes of taxation, it ((shall be
presumed that the determination)) is the burden of the public official
charged with the duty of establishing such value to show it is correct
((but this presumption shall not be a defense against any correction
indicated by clear, cogent and convincing evidence)).

Sec. 3 RCW 84.48.010 and 2001 c 187 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Prior to July 15th, the county legislative authority ((shall))
must form a board for the equalization of the assessment of the
property of the county. The members of ((said)) the board ((shall))
must receive a per diem amount as set by the county legislative
authority for each day of actual attendance of the meeting of the board
of equalization to be paid out of the current expense fund of the
county((: PROVIDED, That)). However, when the county legislative
authority constitute the board they ((shall)) must only receive their
compensation as members of the county legislative authority. The board
of equalization ((shall)) must meet in open session for this purpose
annually on the 15th day of July and, having each taken an oath fairly
and impartially to perform their duties as members of ((such)) the
board, they ((shall)) must examine and compare the returns of the
assessment of the property of the county and proceed to equalize the
same, so that each tract or lot of real property and each article or
class of personal property ((shall)) must be entered on the assessment
list at its true and fair value, according to the measure of value used
by the county assessor in such assessment year, which is presumed to be
correct under RCW 84.40.0301, and subject to the following rules:
((First.)) (a) They ((shall)) must raise the valuation of each
tract or lot or item of real property which is returned below its true
and fair value to such price or sum as to be the true and fair value
thereof, after at least five days' notice ((shall have been)) is given
in writing to the owner or agent.
((Second.)) (b) They ((shall)) must reduce the valuation of each
tract or lot or item which is returned above its true and fair value to
such price or sum as to be the true and fair value thereof.
((Third.)) (c) They ((shall)) must raise the valuation of each
class of personal property which is returned below its true and fair
value to such price or sum as to be the true and fair value thereof,
and they ((shall)) must raise the aggregate value of the personal
property of each individual whenever the aggregate value is less than
the true valuation of the taxable personal property possessed by such
individual, to such sum or amount as to be the true value thereof,
after at least five days' notice ((shall have been)) is given in
writing to the owner or agent thereof.
((Fourth.)) (d) They ((shall)) must reduce the valuation of each
class of personal property enumerated on the detail and assessment list
of the current year, which is returned above its true and fair value,
to such price or sum as to be the true and fair value thereof; and they
((shall)) must reduce the aggregate valuation of the personal property
of such individual who has been assessed at too large a sum to such sum
or amount as was the true and fair value of the personal property.
((Fifth.)) (e) The board may review all claims for either real or
personal property tax exemption as determined by the county assessor,
and shall consider any taxpayer appeals from the decision of the
assessor thereon to determine (((1))) (i) if the taxpayer is entitled
to an exemption, and (((2))) (ii) if so, the amount thereof.
(2) For any real property equalized under this section, the board
must determine separate true and fair values for the land and each
improvement located thereon if so requested by the owner or person
responsible for payment of taxes on the property.
(3) The clerk of the board ((shall)) must keep an accurate journal
or record of the proceedings and orders of ((said)) the board showing
the facts and evidence upon which their action is based, and the
((said)) record ((shall)) must be published the same as other
proceedings of county legislative authority, and ((shall)) must make a
true record of the changes of the descriptions and assessed values
ordered by the county board of equalization. The assessor ((shall))
must correct the real and personal assessment rolls in accordance with
the changes made by the said county board of equalization, and the
assessor ((shall)) must make duplicate abstracts of such corrected
values, one copy of which ((shall)) must be retained in the office, and
one copy forwarded to the department of revenue on or before the
eighteenth day of August next following the meeting of the county board
of equalization.
(4) The county board of equalization ((shall)) must meet on the
15th day of July and may continue in session and adjourn from time to
time during a period not to exceed four weeks, but ((shall)) must
remain in session not less than three days((: PROVIDED, That)).
However, the county board of equalization with the approval of the
county legislative authority may convene at any time when petitions
filed exceed twenty-five, or ten percent of the number of appeals filed
in the preceding year, whichever is greater.
(5) No taxes, except special taxes, ((shall)) may be extended upon
the tax rolls until the property valuations are equalized by the
department of revenue for the purpose of raising the state revenue.
(6) County legislative authorities ((as such shall)) have at no
time ((have)) any authority to change the valuation of the property of
any person or to release or commute in whole or in part the taxes due
on the property of any person.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.36.071 and 2006 c 311 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided to the contrary in RCW 82.14.036, 82.46.021,
or 82.80.090, the ballot title of any referendum filed on an enactment
or portion of an enactment of a local government and any other question
submitted to the voters of a local government consists of three
elements: (a) An identification of the enacting legislative body and
a statement of the subject matter; (b) a concise description of the
measure; and (c) a question. If the referendum or question relates to
a property tax levy, the ballot title must state that the levy is new
or a replacement and include a comparison of the financial impact from
a taxing district's prior year levy, if any, and the current ballot, in
both dollar and percentage change terms. Ballot questions related to
multiple year levies must include an estimate of the financial impact
in the first year of the proposed levy as compared to the taxing
district's prior year levy, if any, in both dollar and percentage
terms. Ballot questions under RCW 84.55.050 must include an estimate
of the financial impact in the first year of the levy increase as
compared to the taxing district's last levy, in both dollar and
percentage terms. For all ballot titles relating to a property tax
levy, with the exception of specific levy rate questions posed under
RCW 84.55.050, any indicated levy rate must be described as advisory
only. The ballot title must conform with the requirements and be
displayed substantially as provided under RCW 29A.72.050, except that
the concise description must not exceed ((seventy-five)) eighty-five
words; however, a concise description submitted on behalf of a proposed
or existing regional transportation investment district may exceed
seventy-five words. If the local governmental unit is a city or a
town, the concise statement ((shall)) must be prepared by the city or
town attorney. If the local governmental unit is a county, the concise
statement shall be prepared by the prosecuting attorney of the county.
If the unit is a unit of local government other than a city, town, or
county, the concise statement ((shall)) must be prepared by the
prosecuting attorney of the county within which the majority area of
the unit is located.
(2) A referendum measure on the enactment of a unit of local
government shall be advertised in the manner provided for nominees for
elective office.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply if another
provision of law specifies the ballot title for a specific type of
ballot question or proposition.

Sec. 5 RCW 29A.36.210 and 2004 c 80 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ballot proposition authorizing a taxing district to impose
the regular property tax levies authorized in RCW 36.69.145, 67.38.130,
84.52.069, or 84.52.135 ((shall)) must contain in substance the
following:

"Shall the . . . . . . (insert the name of the taxing district) be
authorized to impose regular property tax levies of . . . . . . (insert
the maximum rate) or less per thousand dollars of assessed valuation
for each of . . . . . . (insert the maximum number of years allowable)
consecutive years, an increase of (insert dollar amount), (insert # %),
from the previous year's levy?
Yes. . . . . . . . . . . . □
No . . . . . . . . . . . . □"
Each voter ((shall)) must indicate either "Yes" or "No" on his or
her ballot in accordance with the procedures established under this
title.

(2) The ballot proposition authorizing a taxing district to impose
a permanent regular tax levy under RCW 84.52.069 ((shall)) must contain
the following:

"Shall the . . . . . (insert the name of the taxing district) be
authorized to impose a PERMANENT regular property levy of . . . . .
(insert the maximum rate) or less per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation, an increase of (insert dollar amount), (insert # %), from
the previous year's levy?
Yes. . . . . . . . . . . . □
No . . . . . . . . . . . . □"
(3) In addition to the requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of
this section, the ballot proposition must include a comparison of the
financial impact from a taxing district's prior year levy, if any, and
the current ballot, in both dollar and percentage change terms. Ballot
questions related to multiple year levies must include an estimate of
the financial impact in the first year of the proposed levy as compared
to the taxing district's prior year levy, if any, in both dollar and
percentage terms.

Sec. 6 RCW 84.52.054 and 2007 c 54 s 27 are each amended to read
as follows:
The additional tax provided for in Article VII, section 2 of the
state Constitution, and specifically authorized by RCW 84.52.052,
84.52.053, 84.52.0531, and 84.52.130, ((shall)) must be set forth in
terms of dollars on the ballot of the proposition to be submitted to
the voters, together with an estimate of the dollar rate of tax levy
that will be required to produce the dollar amount((; and)). The
ballot proposition must state that the levy is new or a replacement and
include a comparison of the financial impact from a taxing district's
prior year levy if any, and the current ballot, in both dollar and
percentage change terms. Ballot questions related to multiple year
levies must include an estimate of the financial impact in the first
year of the proposed levy as compared to the taxing district's prior
year's levy, if any, in both dollar and percentage terms. The
estimated levy rate must be described as advisory only. The county
assessor, in spreading this tax upon the rolls, ((shall)) must
determine the eventual dollar rate required to produce the amount of
dollars so voted upon, regardless of the estimate of dollar rate of tax
levy carried in said proposition. In the case of a school district or
fire protection district proposition for a particular period, the
dollar amount and the corresponding estimate of the dollar rate of tax
levy ((shall)) must be set forth for each of the years in that period.
The dollar amount for each annual levy in the particular period may be
equal or in different amounts.

Sec. 7 RCW 84.55.050 and 2009 c 551 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to any otherwise applicable statutory dollar rate
limitations, regular property taxes may be levied by or for a taxing
district in an amount exceeding the limitations provided for in this
chapter if such levy is authorized by a proposition approved by a
majority of the voters of the taxing district voting on the proposition
at a general election held within the district or at a special election
within the taxing district called by the district for the purpose of
submitting such proposition to the voters. Any election held pursuant
to this section ((shall)) must be held not more than twelve months
prior to the date on which the proposed levy is to be made, except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section. The ballot of the
proposition ((shall)) must state the dollar rate proposed and shall
clearly state the conditions, if any, which are applicable under
subsection (4) of this section and must conform with the requirements
of RCW 29A.36.071.
(2)(a) Subject to statutory dollar limitations, a proposition
placed before the voters under this section may authorize annual
increases in levies for multiple consecutive years, up to six
consecutive years, during which period each year's authorized maximum
legal levy ((shall)) must be used as the base upon which an increased
levy limit for the succeeding year is computed, but the ballot
proposition must conform with the requirements of RCW 29A.36.071 and
state the dollar rate proposed only for the first year of the
consecutive years and must state the limit factor, or a specified index
to be used for determining a limit factor, such as the consumer price
index, which need not be the same for all years, by which the regular
tax levy for the district may be increased in each of the subsequent
consecutive years. Elections for this purpose must be held at a
primary or general election. The title of each ballot measure must
state the limited purposes for which the proposed annual increases
during the specified period of up to six consecutive years ((shall))
will be used.
(b)(i) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (2)(b),
funds raised by a levy under this subsection may not supplant existing
funds used for the limited purpose specified in the ballot title. For
purposes of this subsection, existing funds means the actual operating
expenditures for the calendar year in which the ballot measure is
approved by voters. Actual operating expenditures excludes lost
federal funds, lost or expired state grants or loans, extraordinary
events not likely to reoccur, changes in contract provisions beyond the
control of the taxing district receiving the services, and major
nonrecurring capital expenditures.
(ii) The supplanting limitations in (b)(i) of this subsection do
not apply to levies approved by the voters in calendar years 2009,
2010, and 2011, in any county with a population of one million five
hundred thousand or more. This subsection (2)(b)(ii) only applies to
levies approved by the voters after July 26, 2009.
(iii) The supplanting limitations in (b)(i) of this subsection do
not apply to levies approved by the voters in calendar year 2009 and
thereafter in any county with a population less than one million five
hundred thousand. This subsection (2)(b)(iii) only applies to levies
approved by the voters after July 26, 2009.
(3) After a levy authorized pursuant to this section is made, the
dollar amount of such levy may not be used for the purpose of computing
the limitations for subsequent levies provided for in this chapter,
unless the ballot proposition expressly states that the levy made under
this section will be used for this purpose.
(4) If expressly stated, a proposition placed before the voters
under subsection (1) or (2) of this section may:
(a) Use the dollar amount of a levy under subsection (1) of this
section, or the dollar amount of the final levy under subsection (2) of
this section, for the purpose of computing the limitations for
subsequent levies provided for in this chapter;
(b) Limit the period for which the increased levy is to be made
under (a) of this subsection;
(c) Limit the purpose for which the increased levy is to be made
under (a) of this subsection, but if the limited purpose includes
making redemption payments on bonds, the period for which the increased
levies are made ((shall)) may not exceed nine years;
(d) Set the levy or levies at a rate less than the maximum rate
allowed for the district; or
(e) Include any combination of the conditions in this subsection.
(5) Except as otherwise expressly stated in an approved ballot
measure under this section, subsequent levies ((shall)) must be
computed as if:
(a) The proposition under this section had not been approved; and
(b) The taxing district had made levies at the maximum rates which
would otherwise have been allowed under this chapter during the years
levies were made under the proposition.

Sec. 8 RCW 84.40.045 and 2001 c 187 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The assessor ((shall)) must give notice of any change in the
true and fair value of real property for the tract or lot of land and
any improvements thereon no later than thirty days after appraisal((:
PROVIDED, That)). However:
(a) No such notice ((shall)) may be mailed during the period from
January 15 to February 15 of each year((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That));
and
(b) No notice need be sent with respect to changes in valuation of
forest land made pursuant to chapter 84.33 RCW.
(2) The notice ((shall)) must contain a statement of both the prior
and the new true and fair value, stating separately land and
improvement values, and a brief statement of the procedure for appeal
to the board of equalization and the time, date, and place of the
meetings of the board.
(3) The notice ((shall)) must be mailed by the assessor to the
taxpayer.
(4) The assessor must give notice of the true and fair value of
real property each year property is revalued under RCW 84.41.030
regardless of whether there has been a change in the value from the
prior year.
(5) If any taxpayer, as shown by the tax rolls, holds solely a
security interest in the real property which is the subject of the
notice, pursuant to a mortgage, contract of sale, or deed of trust,
such taxpayer ((shall)), upon written request of the assessor, must
supply, within thirty days of receipt of such request, to the assessor
the name and address of the person making payments pursuant to the
mortgage, contract of sale, or deed of trust, and thereafter such
person ((shall)) must also receive a copy of the notice provided for in
this section. Willful failure to comply with such request within the
time limitation provided for ((herein shall)) in this section makes
such taxpayer subject to a maximum civil penalty of five thousand
dollars. The penalties provided for ((herein shall be)) in this
section are recoverable in an action by the county prosecutor, and when
recovered ((shall)) must be deposited in the county current expense
fund. The assessor ((shall)) must make the request provided for by
this section during the month of January.

Sec. 9 RCW 84.56.330 and 1999 c 233 s 23 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person who has a lien by mortgage or otherwise, upon any
real property upon which any taxes have not been paid, may pay such
taxes, and the interest, penalty and costs thereon; and the receipt of
the county treasurer or other collecting official ((shall)) constitutes
an additional lien upon such land, to the amount therein stated, and
the amount so paid and the interest thereon at the rate specified in
the mortgage or other instrument ((shall be)) is collectible with, or
as a part of, and in the same manner as the amount secured by the
original lien((: PROVIDED, That)). However, the person paying such
taxes ((shall)) must pay the same as mortgagee or other lien holder and
((shall)) must procure the receipt of the county treasurer therefor,
showing the mortgage or other lien relationship of the person paying
such taxes, and the same ((shall)) must have been recorded with the
county auditor of the county wherein the ((said)) real estate is
situated, within ten days after the payment of such taxes and the
issuance of such receipt. It ((shall be)) is the duty of any treasurer
issuing such receipt to make notation thereon of the lien relationship
claim of the person paying such taxes. It ((shall be)) is the duty of
the county auditor in such cases to index and record such receipts in
the same manner as provided for the recording of liens on real estate,
upon the payment to the county auditor of the appropriate recording
fees by the person presenting the same for recording((: AND PROVIDED
FURTHER, That)). However, in the event the above provision be not
complied with, the lien created by any such payment ((shall be)) is
subordinate to the liens of all mortgages or encumbrances upon such
real property, which are senior to the mortgage or other lien of the
person so making such payment.
(2) The county treasurer must provide a copy of the tax statement
to those taxpayers with a notation of a lien relationship claim of the
person paying such taxes. When providing the tax statement, the
treasurer must clearly mark the statement with the words: "This is not
a bill, for your records only."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Section 2 of this act applies to court or
appellate reviews commenced on or after July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 3 through 9 of this act apply to
taxes levied for collection in 2011 and thereafter.

--- END ---