BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The higher education coordinating board shall convene a work
group to include representatives from the state board for community and
technical colleges, the state universities, the regional universities,
The Evergreen State College, and the office of the superintendent of
public instruction. In consultation with the association of Washington
school principals, the work group shall jointly develop and recommend
rules governing the acceptance of advanced placement and international
baccalaureate credit.
(2) The state board for community and technical colleges, the state
universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College,
and the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall each
adopt rules based on the work group's recommendations. The rules shall
address institutional obligations regarding the adoption and
publication of statewide standard minimum scores required for
acceptance of advanced placement and international baccalaureate
credit. The rules shall be written to encourage the maximum use of the
program and may not narrow or limit the enrollment options.
(3) Participation in the state student financial aid program, as
defined in chapter 28B.92 RCW, is conditioned on the acceptance of
advanced placement and international baccalaureate credit based on
rules developed and adopted under this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.600.290 and 2009 c 450 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction, the state board for
community and technical colleges, the higher education coordinating
board, and the public baccalaureate institutions shall jointly develop
and each adopt rules governing the college in the high school program.
The association of Washington school principals shall be consulted
during the rules development. The rules shall be written to encourage
the maximum use of the program and may not narrow or limit the
enrollment options.
(2) College in the high school programs shall each be governed by
a local contract between the district and the institution of higher
education, in compliance with the guidelines adopted by the
superintendent of public instruction, the state board for community and
technical colleges, and the public baccalaureate institutions.
(3) The college in the high school program must include the
provisions in this subsection.
(a) The high school and institution of higher education together
shall define the criteria for student eligibility. The institution of
higher education may charge tuition fees to participating students.
The amount of tuition fees charged shall be determined jointly by the
high schools and institution of higher education.
(b) School districts shall report no student for more than one
full-time equivalent including college in the high school courses.
(c) The funds received by the institution of higher education may
not be deemed tuition or operating fees and may be retained by the
institution of higher education.
(d) Enrollment information on persons registered under this section
must be maintained by the institution of higher education separately
from other enrollment information and may not be included in official
enrollment reports, nor may such persons be considered in any
enrollment statistics that would affect higher education budgetary
determinations.
(e) A school district must grant high school credit to a student
enrolled in a program course if the student successfully completes the
course. If no comparable course is offered by the school district, the
school district superintendent shall determine how many credits to
award for the course. The determination shall be made in writing
before the student enrolls in the course. The credits shall be applied
toward graduation requirements and subject area requirements. Evidence
of successful completion of each program course shall be included in
the student's secondary school records and transcript.
(f) An institution of higher education must grant college credit to
a student enrolled in a program course if the student successfully
completes the course. The college credit shall be applied toward
general education requirements or major requirements. If no comparable
course is offered by the college, the institution of higher education
at which the teacher of the program course is employed shall determine
how many credits to award for the course and whether the course
fulfills general education or major requirements. Evidence of
successful completion of each program course must be included in the
student's college transcript.
(g) Eleventh and twelfth grade students or students who have not
yet received a high school diploma or its equivalent and are eligible
to be in the eleventh or twelfth grades may participate in the college
in the high school program.
(h) Participating school districts must provide general information
about the college in the high school program to all students in grades
ten, eleven, and twelve and to the parents and guardians of those
students.
(i) Full-time and part-time faculty at institutions of higher
education, including adjunct faculty, are eligible to teach program
courses.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Institution of higher education" has the meaning in RCW
28B.10.016 and also includes a public tribal college located in
Washington and accredited by the Northwest commission on colleges and
universities or another accrediting association recognized by the
United States department of education.
(b) "Program course" means a college course offered in a high
school under the college in the high school program.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.92.030 and 2009 c 238 s 7 and 2009 c 215 s 5 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Board" means the higher education coordinating board.
(2) "Disadvantaged student" means a post high school student who by
reason of adverse cultural, educational, environmental, experiential,
familial or other circumstances is unable to qualify for enrollment as
a full-time student in an institution of higher education, who would
otherwise qualify as a needy student, and who is attending an
institution of higher education under an established program designed
to qualify the student for enrollment as a full-time student.
(3) "Financial aid" means loans and/or grants to needy students
enrolled or accepted for enrollment as a student at institutions of
higher education.
(4) "Institution" or "institutions of higher education" means:
(a) Any public university, college, community college, or technical
college operated by the state of Washington or any political
subdivision thereof; or
(b) Any other university, college, school, or institute in the
state of Washington offering instruction beyond the high school level
which is a member institution of an accrediting association recognized
by rule of the board for the purposes of this section: PROVIDED, That
any institution, branch, extension or facility operating within the
state of Washington which is affiliated with an institution operating
in another state must be a separately accredited member institution of
any such accrediting association, or a branch of a member institution
of an accrediting association recognized by rule of the board for
purposes of this section, that is eligible for federal student
financial aid assistance and has operated as a nonprofit college or
university delivering on-site classroom instruction for a minimum of
twenty consecutive years within the state of Washington, and has an
annual enrollment of at least seven hundred full-time equivalent
students: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no institution of higher education
shall be eligible to participate in a student financial aid program
unless it agrees to and complies with program rules ((and regulations))
adopted pursuant to RCW 28B.92.150 and section 1 of this act.
(5) "Needy student" means a posthigh school student of an
institution of higher education who demonstrates to the board the
financial inability, either through the student's parents, family
and/or personally, to meet the total cost of board, room, books, and
tuition and incidental fees for any semester or quarter. "Needy
student" also means an opportunity internship graduate as defined by
RCW 28C.18.162 who enrolls in a postsecondary program of study as
defined in RCW 28C.18.162 within one year of high school graduation.
(6) "Placebound student" means a student who (a) is unable to
complete a college program because of family or employment commitments,
health concerns, monetary inability, or other similar factors; and (b)
may be influenced by the receipt of an enhanced student financial aid
award to complete a baccalaureate degree at an eligible institution.

--- END ---