BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.155
RCW to read as follows:
In order for parents of a child with disabilities to participate
fully and effectively with school personnel in the consideration and
development of appropriate educational programs for their child,
policies adopted pursuant to RCW 28A.605.020 must provide that, upon
request by a parent, parents and parent-designated independent
evaluators and educational consultants shall be afforded timely access
for observations of the child's current program and of any program
proposed for the child, including both academic and nonacademic
components of any such program. Parents and their designees must be
afforded access of sufficient duration and extent to enable them to
evaluate the child's performance in a current program and the ability
of a proposed program to enable the child to make effective progress.
No conditions or restrictions may be imposed on the observations except
those necessary to ensure the safety of children in a program, the
integrity of a program while under observation, or the safeguarding of
personally identifiable information consistent with the requirements of
the federal family educational rights and privacy act and applicable
state laws.

--- END ---