BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.225
RCW to read as follows:
(1) School districts may apply and the office of the superintendent
of public instruction may select up to five school district applicants
to participate in a six-year attendance and graduation coach
demonstration project. Selections shall be made by August 31, 2010.
The project shall commence with the 2010-11 school year and continue
through the 2015-16 school year.
(2) For the duration of the demonstration project, participating
school districts may, but are not required to, adhere to the duties,
responsibilities, and timelines in RCW 28A.225.015 (2) and (3),
28A.225.020, and 28A.225.030. Any petition filed with a juvenile court
by a participating school district remains subject to the petition
requirements in this chapter except for the timelines in RCW
28A.225.015(3) and 28A.225.030(1).
(3) Annual allocation to a participating school district from
amounts appropriated in the operating budget to the administrator for
the courts for allocation by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction to school districts for truancy petitions shall be based on
the greater of:
(a) The actual number of petitions filed during the year; or
(b) The annual average number of petitions previously filed by the
participating school district during the 2006-07, 2007-08, and 2008-09
school years.
(4) A school district seeking to participate must submit an
application that includes:
(a) A description of the intervention, student support, and case
management and tracking services plan that will be implemented at the
elementary, middle, and high school levels to reduce absenteeism and
increase attendance and graduation rates;
(b) The number and minimum qualifications of certificated or
classified staff persons at the elementary, middle, and high school
levels who will provide the intervention, student support, and case
management and tracking services.
(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
establish criteria to evaluate the applications and select the
participating school districts.
(6) A participating district must implement the plan proposed in
its application. Any amendments to the plan must receive approval from
the office of the superintendent of public instruction before
implementation.
(7) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
monitor participating school districts to ensure that each district
implements the intervention, student support, and case management and
tracking services plan proposed in that district's application and any
approved amendments.
(8) A district determined by the office of the superintendent of
public instruction to be in noncompliance shall be notified that its
participation has been discontinued. Following receipt of
notification, the district must adhere to all of the duties,
responsibilities, and timelines in RCW 28A.225.015 (2) and (3),
28A.225.020, and 28A.225.030. Allocations to a school district for
which participation has been discontinued for noncompliance shall be
based on the number of petitions actually filed.
(9) The attendance and graduation coach demonstration project
terminates on September 1, 2016. By December 1, 2016, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall submit a report to the
education committees of the legislature regarding the project as a
whole, the various plans implemented, the results by district and
overall, and any recommendations.
(10) This section expires August 1, 2017.

--- END ---