BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 15.26.110 and 1969 c 129 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
The powers of the commission shall include the following:
(1) To elect a ((chairman)) chair, treasurer, and such other
officers as it deems advisable;
(2) To adopt any rules ((and regulations)) necessary to carry out
the purposes and provisions of this chapter, in conformance with the
provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW, as
enacted or hereafter amended;
(3) To administer and carry out the provisions of this chapter and
do all those things necessary to carry out its purposes;
(4) To employ and at its pleasure discharge a manager, secretary,
agents, and employees as it deems necessary, and prescribe their duties
and fix their compensation;
(5) To own, lease or contract for any real or personal property
necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter, and transfer and
convey the same;
(6) To establish offices and incur expenses and enter into
contracts and to create such liabilities as may be reasonable for
administration and enforcement of this chapter;
(7) Make necessary disbursements for the operation of the
commission in carrying out the purposes and provisions of this chapter;
(8) To employ, subject to the approval of the attorney general,
attorneys necessary, and to maintain in its own name any and all legal
actions, including actions for injunction, mandatory injunctions, or
civil recovery, or proceedings before administrative tribunals or other
government authorities necessary to carry out the purpose of this
chapter;
(9) To carry on any research which will or may benefit the
planting, production, harvesting, handling, processing, or shipment of
any tree fruit subject to the provisions of this chapter. To contract
with any person, private or public, public agency, federal, state or
local, or enter into agreements with other states or federal agencies,
to carry on such research jointly or enter into joint contracts with
such states or federal agencies or other recognized private or public
agencies, to carry on desired research provided for in this chapter;
(10) To appoint annually, ex officio commission members without a
vote who are experts in research whether public or private in any area
concerning or related to tree fruit to serve at the pleasure of the
commission;
(11) To establish a foundation using commission funds as grant
money for the benefit of the tree fruit industry. The foundation may
use commission funds for the purposes authorized by this chapter;
(12) To enter into contracts or interagency agreements with any
private or public agency, whether federal, state, or local, to carry
out the purposes provided in this chapter. Personal service contracts
must comply with chapter 39.29 RCW;
(13) To acquire or own intellectual property rights, licenses, or
patents and to collect royalties resulting from commission-funded
research;
(14) To engage in appropriate fund-raising activities for the
purpose of supporting activities of the commission authorized by this
chapter;
(15) To accept and expend or retain any gift, bequest,
contribution, or grant from private persons or private and public
agencies to carry out the purposes provided in this chapter; and
(16) Such other powers and duties that are necessary to carry out
the purpose of this chapter.

--- END ---