BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 27.53.070 and 2005 c 333 s 21 and 2005 c 274 s 243 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
It is the declared intention of the legislature that field
investigations on privately owned lands should be ((discouraged
except)) conducted by professional archaeologists in accordance with
both the provisions and spirit of this chapter ((and)). Persons having
knowledge of the location of archaeological sites or resources are
encouraged to communicate such information to the department. Such
information shall not constitute a public record which requires
disclosure pursuant to the exception authorized in chapter 42.56 RCW to
avoid site depredation.

--- END ---