BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.405.415 and 2009 c 539 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Certificated instructional staff who have attained
certification from the national board for professional teaching
standards shall receive a bonus each year in which they maintain the
certification. The bonus shall be calculated as follows: The annual
bonus shall be five thousand dollars in the 2007-08 school year.
Thereafter, the annual bonus shall increase by inflation. For the
2009-10 and 2010-11 school years the annual bonus shall be subject to
the availability of amounts appropriated for this purpose. During the
2011-2013 and 2013-2015 fiscal biennia, in addition to annual
adjustments for inflation, the bonus amount shall be additionally
increased such that, by the end of the 2014-15 school year, national
board bonus amounts are, at a minimum, equal to what they would have
been if annual adjustments for inflation had not been suspended during
the 2009-10 or 2010-11 school year.
(b) Beginning in the 2011-12 school year, educational staff
associates certified as school speech-language pathologists,
audiologists, psychologists, occupational therapists, physical
therapists, social workers, or school nurses, who have attained a
national certificate within their respective profession shall receive
a bonus each year in which they maintain the certification. The bonus
shall be in an amount equal to the bonus provided under (a) of this
subsection to certificated instructional staff with certification from
the national board for professional teaching standards.
(2)(a) Certificated instructional staff who have attained
certification from the national board for professional teaching
standards shall be eligible for bonuses in addition to that provided by
subsection (1) of this section if the individual is in an instructional
assignment in a school that meets the criteria under (b) of this
subsection. Beginning in the 2011-12 school year, educational staff
associates certified as school speech-language pathologists,
audiologists, psychologists, occupational therapists, physical
therapists, social workers, or school nurses, who have attained a
national certificate within their respective profession shall be
eligible for bonuses in addition to that provided by subsection (1) of
this section if the individuals are in assignments in schools that meet
the criteria under (b) of this subsection.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection, a school must be either:
(i) A high school in which at least fifty percent of the students
qualify for the free and reduced-price lunch program; (ii) a middle
school in which at least sixty percent of the students qualify for the
free and reduced-price lunch program; or (iii) an elementary school in
which at least seventy percent of the students qualify for the free and
reduced-price lunch program.
(3) The amount of the additional bonus under subsection (2) of this
section for those meeting the qualifications of subsection (2) of this
section is five thousand dollars.
(4) The bonuses provided under this section are in addition to
compensation received under a district's salary schedule adopted in
accordance with RCW 28A.405.200 and shall not be included in
calculations of a district's average salary and associated salary
limitations under RCW 28A.400.200.
(5) The bonuses provided under this section shall be paid in a lump
sum amount.

--- END ---