BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that recycling is an
important sector of the nation's economy. The United States recycling
information study found that recycling in the United States accounts
for fifty-six thousand establishments that have over one million
employees, with a total of thirty-seven billion dollars in payroll, all
of which generate two hundred thirty-six billion dollars in revenue.
The legislature further finds that the increased mobility of, and
number of, Washington state residents calls for an increase in
available recycling receptacles.
The legislature further finds that there is a need to conserve
energy and natural resources and the recycling of litter materials will
serve to accomplish that conservation.
The legislature further finds that the high quantity of litter
discarded in this state creates a public health hazard, which could be
alleviated by increased recycling.
The legislature further finds that the presence of recycling
receptacles prompts individuals to recycle items such as paper and
plastic bottles rather than throw them away.
Therefore, the purpose of this act is to promote public recycling
and prevent unnecessary waste of recyclable materials.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.93 RCW
to read as follows:
In communities where there is an established curbside service and
where recycling service is available to businesses, a recycling program
must be provided in the same place and the same quantities wherever
solid waste or litter receptacles are located, including the locations
required in WAC 173-310-040 and 173-310-050. A recycling program
includes provision of receptacles or reverse vending machines, and
provisions to transport and recycle the collected materials. The
recycling receptacles or reverse vending machines must be clearly
marked and must be provided for aluminum, paper, and plastic.

--- END ---