BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 59.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) If at the time of a tenant's death there is no other person
listed on the lease, the landlord, after waiting at least seven days
and making reasonable efforts to contact a family member of the
deceased tenant, may enter and take possession of any personal property
of the tenant found on the leasehold premises and may store the
property in a reasonably secure place.
(b) If a tenant dies on the leasehold premises, the landlord, after
the leasehold premises has been released by the coroner's office, may
immediately enter the leasehold premises to clean up any biohazardous
material from the death. The landlord may remove and dispose of
perishable goods, garbage, and debris.
(2) A landlord shall make reasonable efforts to provide a known
family member of the deceased tenant with a notice containing the name
and address of the landlord and informing the family member that a sale
or disposition of the deceased tenant's property shall take place on or
after a date that is not less than forty-five days after the notice is
sent by first-class mail to the tenant's last known address and to any
other address known to the landlord for the tenant and the family
member.
(3) If the landlord chooses to take possession of the unit before
the end of the month, the landlord shall deposit the prorated rent in
a trust account. This amount may be applied against the drayage and
storage charges and any other charges due to the landlord by the
deceased tenant.
(4) If at the time of a tenant's death there is no other person
listed on the lease, a person, other than the landlord or government
official, may not enter the deceased tenant's unit and remove the
tenant's personal property and household goods, other than burial
clothes, any pet or animal, the deceased tenant's will, or any
perishable items, without a certified copy of any testamentary letters
or affidavit of successor as described in RCW 11.62.010 or otherwise
meeting the requirements of RCW 11.62.010.
(5) If at the time of a tenant's death there is no other person
listed on the lease and at any time after forty days from the date of
the tenant's death, the landlord shall, upon payment of all reasonable
costs for drayage and storage, deliver the deceased tenant's personal
property to a person claiming to be a successor of the decedent upon
the receipt of proof of death and an affidavit made by the person
claiming to be the successor of the decedent that meets the
requirements of RCW 11.62.010.
(6) If after forty days, but before the date set for sale or
disposition set forth in the notice described in subsection (2) of this
section, a successor does not claim the deceased tenant's personal
property pursuant to chapter 11.62 RCW but a surviving relation of the
deceased tenant exists and claims possession of the tenant's personal
property, the surviving relation has a right to receive possession of
the deceased tenant's personal property upon providing to the landlord
a dated, signed, and notarized affidavit of next of kin that includes:
The date that the decedent passed away; the nature of the surviving
relation's relationship to the decedent; a statement that he or she is
the closest surviving relative; a request for the possession and
location of the decedent's personal property; and a statement agreeing
to indemnify and hold harmless the rental unit's owner, its agents,
employees, or principal from any third party who claims the right to
the decedent's personal property. The surviving relation must also
reimburse the landlord for the reasonable costs of drayage and storage
and for all other outstanding tenant financial obligations prior to
receiving the deceased tenant's personal property.

--- END ---