BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person manufacturing commercial airplanes in this state may
not claim any aerospace tax incentive if more than fifty percent of the
final assembly of any commercial airplane family manufactured by the
person occurs outside the state of Washington.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section.
(a) "Aerospace tax incentive" means a tax exemption, deduction,
credit, or preferential tax rate in RCW 82.04.260(11), 82.04.4463,
82.04.4461, 82.08.975, 82.08.980, 82.12.975, and 82.12.980.
(b) "Final assembly" means the activity of assembling an airplane
from components parts necessary for its mechanical operation such that
the finished commercial airplane is ready to deliver to the ultimate
consumer.
(3) This section applies to a person on the first day of the first
reporting period occurring after the condition in subsection (1) of
this section is met.

--- END ---