BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The intent of this act is to specify the
manner and circumstances under which family members are paid by the
department when they are employed by an agency licensed under chapter
70.127 RCW for in-home personal care services provided under the
medicaid in-home personal care program.
(2) The legislature recognizes that:
(a) Some clients receiving in-home care are best served by having
their own caregivers receive the oversight, monitoring, and support
provided by a home care agency;
(b) A recent financial analysis conducted by an independent analyst
found that payments by the state for agency employed family member
caregivers are much less than the previously calculated five dollars
per hour differential and could be a net amount less for family member
caregivers employed by agencies than for family member independent
providers;
(c) Clients for whom English is not a native language often require
extensive translation services which is better and more cost-effective
when provided by a family member supervised by an agency rather than by
a translator paid for by the state;
(d) Clients for whom English is not a native language and Native
American tribal members often have cultural needs that are best served
by family members who have the oversight, monitoring, and support of a
home care agency; and
(e) Clients of in-home services should have the ability to choose
whether their family member caregivers are employed by home care
agencies under certain circumstances.
(3) The legislature finds that:
(a) In-home care can be provided by family members employed by a
licensed agency in a cost-efficient manner, as compared to in-home care
provided by family member independent providers;
(b) The resources of the state are best and most cost-effectively
spent by allowing family members to be paid as employees of home care
agencies when the client has identifiable language or cultural needs or
when the client is unable to supervise his or her paid provider, has
poor decision-making skills with no understanding of consequences, or
is unable to make decisions;
(c) In those circumstances, in-home care provided by family member
agency employees can be the best option for the health care needs of
the clients; and
(d) Clients should have the ability to choose to have their family
member caregivers employed by a home care agency.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.39A.326 and 2009 c 571 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The department shall not pay a home care agency licensed
under chapter 70.127 RCW for in-home personal care or respite services
provided under this chapter, Title 71A RCW, or chapter 74.39 RCW if the
care is provided to a client by a family member of the client. To the
extent permitted under federal law, the provisions of this subsection
shall not apply if the family member providing care is older than the
client.
(b) The department may, on a case-by-case basis based on the
client's health and safety, make exceptions to (a) of this subsection
to authorize payment or to provide for payment during a transition
period of up to three months.
(2) The department shall pay for a home care agency licensed under
chapter 70.127 RCW for in-home personal care services provided under
the medicaid in-home personal care program if the care is provided to
a client by a family member of the client if:
(a) The client chooses care from a family member caregiver employed
by a licensed home care agency; and
(b)(i) The client's native language is a language other than
English;
(ii) The client is a registered member of a Native American tribe;
or
(iii) The client has been determined based on his or her annual
state assessment to have a cognitive performance scale score of two or
more or had decision making coded as poor decision making or unaware of
consequences of his or her decisions.
(3) The department shall take appropriate enforcement action
against a home care agency found to have charged the state for hours of
service for which the department is not authorized to pay under this
section, including requiring recoupment of any payment made for those
hours and, under criteria adopted by the department by rule,
terminating the contract of an agency that violates a recoupment
requirement.
(((3))) (4) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Client" means a person who has been deemed eligible by the
department to receive in-home personal care or respite services.
(b) "Family member" shall be liberally construed to include, but
not be limited to, a parent, child, sibling, aunt, uncle, cousin,
grandparent, grandchild, grandniece, or grandnephew, or such relatives
when related by marriage.
(((4))) (5) The department shall adopt rules to implement this
section. The rules shall not result in affecting the amount, duration,
or scope of the personal care or respite services benefit to which a
client may be entitled pursuant to RCW 74.09.520 or Title XIX of the
federal social security act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 74.39A.325 (In-home personal care or respite services--Electronic timekeeping) and 2009 c 571 s 2; and
(2) 2009 c 571 s 3 (uncodified).

--- END ---