BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.163.070 and 1990 c 53 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The authority may use any funds legally available to it for any
purpose specifically authorized by this chapter, or for otherwise
improving economic development in this state by assisting businesses
and farm enterprises that do not have access to capital at terms and
rates comparable to large corporations due to the location of the
business, the size of the business, the lack of financial expertise, or
other appropriate reasons: PROVIDED, That no funds of the state shall
be used for such purposes.
(2)(a) The legislature finds that many small businesses are
experiencing financial hardship because of the economic downturn in the
state and nation. The purpose of this subsection (2) is to provide for
a program of financial assistance to small businesses that, absent
these economic conditions, would otherwise remain viable.
(b) Until December 31, 2015, the authority shall develop and
conduct a small business loan guarantee program of up to three hundred
million dollars to provide access to capital for qualified small
businesses which are unable to obtain funding from private commercial
lenders on commercially reasonable terms or to qualify for federal
small business administration loans. Loans made through the program
may be for general business purposes, including working capital,
machinery and equipment, furniture and fixtures, land and building,
including purchase, renovation, and new construction, leasehold
improvements, and, under conditions determined by the authority, debt
refinancing.
(c) In conducting the small business loan guarantee program, the
authority may:
(i) Secure or provide guaranties or insurance for small business
loans to qualified small businesses or otherwise provide for such loans
through an eligible banking organization. For such purpose, the
authority may use any funds legally available to it, including proceeds
from the issuance of bonds authorized by this chapter; and
(ii) Adopt rules governing the program, including the terms and
conditions of borrower participation in the program and borrower
eligibility criteria.
(d) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) "Small business" means a business that has its principal office
located in Washington and its officers domiciled in Washington, and
that is independently owned and operated and together with affiliates
has fifty or fewer employees and average annual gross receipts of five
million dollars or less over the previous three consecutive years.
(ii) "Small business loan" means a loan made for use exclusively in
Washington to retain or expand a qualified small business.
(iii) "Qualified small business" is a small business that has
demonstrated a reasonable prospect of loan repayment of a small
business loan.

--- END ---