BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the number of
children who have been found to be victims of abuse is unacceptable.
This victimization often leads adult survivors into struggles with
depression, alcohol and drug addiction, and other mental illnesses.
There is evidence that indicates effective abuse prevention and
personal safety education can be very valuable in efforts to reduce
incidents of abuse. The legislature intends to address this issue by
establishing guidelines for schools to integrate effective programs
that teach students skills to prevent abuse. Furthermore, the
legislature intends to involve communities and families in the work of
the schools to enhance the efforts to prevent child abuse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in
consultation with professionals in the field of child abuse prevention
and interested organizations, shall establish a statewide child abuse
prevention program to be incorporated into existing programs at each
public school. The child abuse prevention program must:
(a) Use proven research-based curricula found effective in the
prevention of child abuse;
(b) Be provided to all students in an age-appropriate manner;
(c) Include peer-to-peer prevention education;
(d) Assist schools in communications with parents and community
members;
(e) Identify public and private resources that can be of assistance
to schools in their prevention efforts; and
(f) Provide frameworks to schools to engage and partner with
community and parents on programs to prevent child abuse.
(2) The child abuse prevention program in subsection (1) of this
section shall be in place and made available to school districts by
January 1, 2011.
(3) School districts shall include in their audits with the office
of the superintendent of public instruction a report on the
implementation of this section in each school. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall provide a report of its
findings under this section to appropriate committees of the
legislature.
(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
implement and conduct activities under this section using only federal
funding provided through the United States department of education for
school safety and prevention programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 28A.230.080 (Prevention of child abuse and neglect -- Written
policy -- Participation in and establishment of programs) and 1990 c 33
s 238 & 1987 c 489 s 6;
(2) RCW 28A.300.150 (Information on child abuse and neglect
prevention curriculum -- Rules) and 2006 c 263 s 705, 1994 c 245 s 8, &
1987 c 489 s 2; and
(3) RCW 28A.300.160 (Development of coordinated primary prevention
program for child abuse and neglect -- Office as lead agency) and 1995 c
399 s 21 & 1987 c 489 s 3.

--- END ---