BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Bottle" means any closed container which is labeled by a
manufacturer of bottled water and used to contain or convey bottled
water.
(2) "Bottled water" means all water which is sealed in bottles
offered for sale for human consumption.
(3) "Department" means the state department of revenue.
(4) "Manufacturer" means any processor, bottler, or other person
who fills or refills a bottle with bottled water and others engaged in
purifying, filtrating, or any other alteration of water for the purpose
of selling or reselling bottled water.
(5) "Person" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.030.
(6) "Purchaser" means any person who purchases in a retail sale.
(7) "Retail sale" means any sale to a person for use or
consumption, and not for resale.
(8) "Retailer" means any person who engages in the business of the
retail sale of bottled water in the state.
(9) "Sale" or "purchase" has the same meaning as "sale" as provided
in RCW 82.04.050.
(10) "Wholesaler" means any person who engages in the business of
selling or supplying bottled water to any person for resale in the
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A tax is imposed on each wholesale sale of
bottled water within the state. The rate of tax is 0.00296 dollars per
ounce.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Liability for payment of the tax imposed
under this chapter is to be borne by the wholesaler.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The wholesaler must remit the tax and
file returns in accordance with section 5 of this act.
(2) If any retailer located in the state receives or otherwise
obtains bottled water upon which the tax imposed under this chapter has
not been collected by any wholesaler, then the retailer shall remit the
tax directly to the department in accordance with section 5 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the tax imposed
in this chapter. The tax due dates, reporting periods, and return
requirements applicable to chapter 82.04 RCW apply equally to the tax
imposed in this chapter. The department must adopt rules to implement
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 All tax proceeds collected under this
chapter must be deposited in the public health services account created
in RCW 43.72.902 for the purpose of funding local health jurisdictions
to conduct core public health functions of statewide significance, as
defined in RCW 43.70.514.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

--- END ---