BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for wages paid to one or more employees at a rate that equals
or exceeds the livable wage rate for the county in which the employee
or employees are employed.
(2) The total amount of credits taken under this section in any
year by a person may not exceed fifteen percent of the taxes otherwise
due under this chapter.
(3) Credit under this section must be earned, and claimed against
taxes due under this chapter, for the tax reporting period in which the
wages are paid by the person claiming credit under this section. The
credit may not exceed the tax otherwise due under this chapter for the
tax reporting period. Unused credit may be carried over and used in
subsequent tax reporting periods. No refunds may be granted for
credits under this section.
(4) For purposes of this section, "livable wage rate" means the
livable wage rate for 2009 for the county in which the employee is
employed, as determined by the Washington state institute for public
policy in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington state institute for public policy must conduct a
study to determine the livable wage rate for 2009 for each county. The
institute must submit its findings to the governor, the legislature,
and the department by December 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act takes effect January
1, 2011.

--- END ---