BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
A law enforcement officer shall promptly notify child protective
services whenever a child is present in a vehicle being driven by a
person being arrested on probable cause for a drug or alcohol-related
driving offense. This section does not require law enforcement to take
custody of the child unless there is no person or agency having the
right to physical custody of the child available, or the officer has
reasonable grounds to believe the child should be taken into custody
pursuant to RCW 13.34.050 or 26.44.050. For purposes of this section,
"child" means any person under eighteen years of age.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 26.44 RCW
to read as follows:
A law enforcement officer shall promptly notify child protective
services whenever a child is present in a vehicle being driven by a
person being arrested on probable cause for a drug or alcohol-related
driving offense. This section does not require law enforcement to take
custody of the child unless there is no person or agency having the
right to physical custody of the child available, or the officer has
reasonable grounds to believe the child should be taken into custody
pursuant to RCW 13.34.050 or 26.44.050.

--- END ---