BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.214 and 2008 c 273 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(((a) Until June 30, 2011,)) "Newspaper" means:
(((i))) (a) A publication issued regularly at stated intervals at
least twice a month and printed on newsprint in tabloid or broadsheet
format folded loosely together without stapling, glue, or any other
binding of any kind, including any supplement of a printed newspaper;
and
(((ii))) (b) An electronic version of a printed newspaper that:
(((A))) (i) Shares content with the printed newspaper; and
(((B))) (ii) Is prominently identified by the same name as the
printed newspaper or otherwise conspicuously indicates that it is a
complement to the printed newspaper.
(((b))) (2) For purposes of this section, "supplement" means a
printed publication, including a magazine or advertising section, that
is:
(((i))) (a) Labeled and identified as part of the printed
newspaper; and
(((ii))) (b) Circulated or distributed:
(((A))) (i) As an insert or attachment to the printed newspaper; or
(((B))) (ii) Separate and apart from the printed newspaper so long
as the distribution is within the general circulation area of the
newspaper.
(((2) Beginning July 1, 2011, "newspaper" means a publication
issued regularly at stated intervals at least twice a month and printed
on newsprint in tabloid or broadsheet format folded loosely together
without stapling, glue, or any other binding of any kind, including any
supplement of a printed newspaper as defined in subsection (1)(b) of
this section.))

--- END ---