BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the fundamental
purposes of the unemployment insurance system are to provide partial
wage replacement to unemployed workers, to provide families and
communities with a degree of economic stability, and to counter the
harmful effects of economic downturns by providing the economy with an
economic stimulus. To that end, the legislature finds that eligibility
requirements, disqualification provisions, and benefit amounts related
to regular and additional benefits should be improved to enhance the
effects of the unemployment insurance system on individuals, families,
and communities. Furthermore, the legislature finds that unemployment
contributions should be adjusted to help unemployed and low-income
citizens access the training and education necessary to help them find
and keep living wage jobs, and to mitigate the effects of the most
recent economic downturn on employers and their ability to retain and
create jobs.

--- END ---