BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
repeal the Columbia River Gorge Compact with the Congress of the United
States and the state of Oregon due to the financial constraints facing
the state. While the legislature recognizes the importance of the
Columbia River Gorge National Scenic Area Act, P.L. 99-963, it finds it
can no longer support the financial obligations under this interstate
compact. The legislature intends to renegotiate the compact when
financial circumstances improve.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.97 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The governor's office shall work with the state of Oregon to
initiate dissolution of the Columbia River Gorge Compact. If the
governor's office determines that the Columbia River Gorge Compact
cannot be dissolved, the governor's office shall work to renegotiate
with the state of Oregon terms of the Columbia River Gorge Compact that
reflects accomplishments made since the first agreement in 1987 and
reflects the approved Columbia River Gorge scenic area management plan
as of June 2007.
(2) The governor may also pursue discussions with Klickitat,
Skamania, and Clark counties on developing a source of funding to
address the costs of local planning and permitting, and to identify
local options for implementing the Columbia River Gorge Compact.
(3) The governor's office shall report to the legislature by
December 31, 2010, on the status of dissolving or renegotiating the
Columbia River Gorge Compact.

--- END ---