BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The rules of the state superintendent of public instruction
under RCW 46.61.380 governing the marking of school buses shall allow
school districts to place advertising and educational material on and
in school buses if such advertising and education material is approved
by the school district board of directors. The advertising and
educational material shall not be placed on the front or rear of a
school bus.
(2) Revenue received by the school district for the school bus
advertising and educational material shall be deposited in the school
district's general fund or transportation vehicle fund.

--- END ---