BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.46.0335 and 1987 c 4 s 31 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The legislature hereby authorizes)) (1) Any person, association,
or organization ((to)) may conduct sports pool boards, bracket pools,
and fantasy sports leagues without a license to do so from the
commission but only when the outcome of which is dependent upon the
score, or scores, of a certain athletic contest or upon the outcome of
a contest or event not within the control of those engaged in the
sports pool board, bracket pool, or fantasy sports league and which is
conducted ((only)) in the following manner:
(((1))) (a) All money paid by entrants to enter the pool less taxes
is paid out as the prize or prizes to those persons having the winning
score or scores from the subject athletic contest or other outcome upon
which the pool or sports league is based; and
(b) The sports pool board, bracket pool, or fantasy sports league
records are available for inspection by any person participating, the
commission, or by any law enforcement agency upon demand at all times
before prize payment; and
(c) The person or organization conducting the sports pool board,
bracket pool, or fantasy sports league is conducting no other similar
activity on the same event; and
(d) The sports pool board, bracket pool, or fantasy sports league
conforms to the requirements of this chapter and any rules adopted
under this chapter; and
(e) The total amount of wagers placed by all entrants in the sports
pool board, bracket pool, or fantasy sports league does not exceed one
hundred dollars.
(2) In addition to the requirements of subsection (1) of this
section, sports pool boards must comply with the following:
(a) A board or piece of paper is divided into one hundred equal
squares, each of which constitutes a chance to win in the ((sports))
pool and each of which is offered directly to prospective contestants
at one dollar or less; and
(((2))) (b) The purchaser of each chance or square signs his or her
name on the face of each square or chance he or she purchases; and
(((3) At some time not later than prior to the start of the subject
athletic contest)) (c) The pool ((is)) must be closed before the start
of the subject athletic contest and no further chances in the pool
((are)) may be sold; and
(((4))) (d) After the pool is closed a prospective score is
assigned by random drawing to each square((;
(5) All money paid by entrants to enter the pool less taxes is paid
out as the prize or prizes to those persons holding squares assigned
the winning score or scores from the subject athletic contest;
(6) The sports pool board is available for inspection by any person
purchasing a chance thereon, the commission, or by any law enforcement
agency upon demand at all times prior to the payment of the prize;
(7) The person or organization conducting the pool is conducting no
other sports pool on the same athletic event; and
(8) The sports pool conforms to any rules and regulations of the
commission applicable thereto)).

--- END ---