BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.50A.030 and 2007 c 341 s 38 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall use the moneys in the water pollution control
revolving fund to provide financial assistance as provided in the water
quality act of 1987 and as provided in RCW 90.50A.040:
(1) To make loans, on the condition that:
(a) Such loans are made at or below market interest rates,
including interest free loans, at terms not to exceed twenty years;
(b) Annual principal and interest payments will commence not later
than one year after completion of any project and all loans will be
fully amortized not later then twenty years after project completion;
(c) The recipient of a loan will establish a dedicated source of
revenue for repayment of loans; ((and))
(d) The fund will be credited with all payments of principal and
interest on all loans; and
(e) The loans will be used in accordance with federal clean water
state revolving fund appropriations allowances and restrictions.
(2) Loans may be made for the following purposes:
(a) To public bodies for the construction or replacement of water
pollution control facilities as defined in section 212 of the federal
water quality act of 1987;
(b) For the implementation of a management program established
under section 319 of the federal water quality act of 1987 relating to
the management of nonpoint sources of pollution, subject to the
requirements of that act; and
(c) For development and implementation of a conservation and
management plan under section 320 of the federal water quality act of
1987 relating to the national estuary program, subject to the
requirements of that act.
(3) The department may also use the moneys in the fund for the
following purposes:
(a) To buy or refinance the water pollution control facilities'
debt obligations of public bodies at or below market rates, if such
debt was incurred after March 7, 1985;
(b) To guarantee, or purchase insurance for, public body
obligations for water pollution control facility construction or
replacement or activities if the guarantee or insurance would improve
credit market access or reduce interest rates, or to provide loans to
a public body for this purpose;
(c) As a source of revenue or security for the payment of principal
and interest on revenue or general obligation bonds issued by the state
if the proceeds of the sale of such bonds will be deposited in the
fund;
(d) To earn interest on fund accounts; and
(e) To pay the expenses of the department in administering the
water pollution control revolving fund according to administrative
reserves authorized by federal and state law.
(4) The department shall present a biennial progress report on the
use of moneys from the account to the appropriate committees of the
legislature. The report shall consist of a list of each recipient,
project description, and amount of the grant, loan, or both.
(5) The department may not use the moneys in the water pollution
control revolving fund for grants.
(6) The department shall give preference to projects that:
(a) Increase protection and improvement of water quality and public
health;
(b) Cost the residential ratepayers a higher amount to finance
without state assistance than other projects cost;
(c) Require action under federal and state permits and compliance
orders, including projects with a history of noncompliance;
(d) Are ready to proceed with planning, design, or construction;
(e) Are cost-effective based on an analysis of alternatives,
including regionalization;
(f) Are located in evergreen communities recognized under RCW
35.105.030, except that entities not eligible for designation as an
evergreen community shall not be given less preferential treatment than
an evergreen community;
(g) Have established programs to mitigate nonpoint pollution of the
surface or subterranean water sought to be protected by the water
pollution control facility, if the jurisdiction has the authority to
regulate storm water;
(h) Have adopted and are implementing: (i) A sewer use ordinance
or resolution and equitable sewer user charge system or (ii) a storm
water ordinance or resolution meeting permit requirements and storm
water fee system, whichever is applicable.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.48.110 and 2007 c 343 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except under subsection (2) of this section, all engineering
reports, plans, and specifications for the construction of new sewerage
systems, sewage treatment or disposal plants or systems, or for
improvements or extensions to existing sewerage systems or sewage
treatment or disposal plants, and the proposed method of future
operation and maintenance of said facility or facilities, shall be
submitted to and be approved by the department, before construction
thereof may begin. No approval shall be given until the department is
satisfied that said plans and specifications and the methods of
operation and maintenance submitted are adequate to protect the quality
of the state's waters as provided for in this chapter. Approval under
this chapter is not required for large on-site sewage systems permitted
by the department of health under chapter 70.118B RCW or for on-site
sewage systems regulated by local health jurisdictions under rules of
the state board of health.
(b) The department shall require, through the development of rules,
that plans established in this subsection include the following
elements:
(i) Reviews and updates of sewer plans on a six-year cycle,
including asset management and financial planning;
(ii) An equitable sewer user charge system for residential,
commercial, and industrial users to cover all financial obligation of
the planned community sewer utility;
(iii) Connection fees for new connections to a sewer system that
reflect a fair share cost of infrastructure from which new connections
will benefit;
(iv) A capital wastewater facilities reserve fund dedicated to
paying for wastewater infrastructure and equipment replacement; and
(v) A sewer use ordinance or resolution that restricts certain
connections and wastes to protect a local government's investment and
enhance the wastewater treatment's process stability and effluent
quality. At a minimum, the ordinance or resolution must:
(A) Require new sewers and connections to be properly designed and
constructed;
(B) Require a provision with a timeline and proximity in which
existing and future residences must connect to the sewer system;
(C) Prohibit inflow sources into the sewer system; and
(D) Prohibit introduction of toxic or hazardous wastes into the
sewer system in an amount or concentration that endangers the public's
safety or the physical integrity of the system which may cause
violations of the national pollutant discharge elimination system
permit or state waste discharge permit.
(2) To promote efficiency in service delivery and intergovernmental
cooperation in protecting the quality of the state's waters, the
department may delegate the authority for review and approval of
engineering reports, plans, and specifications for the construction of
new sewerage systems, sewage treatment or disposal plants or systems,
or for improvements or extensions to existing sewerage system or sewage
treatment or disposal plants, and the proposed method of future
operations and maintenance of said facility or facilities and
industrial pretreatment systems, to local units of government
requesting such delegation and meeting criteria established by the
department.
(3) For any new or revised general sewer plan submitted for review
under this section, the department shall review and either approve,
conditionally approve, reject, or request amendments within ninety days
of the receipt of the submission of the plan. The department may
extend this ninety-day time limitation for new submittals by up to an
additional ninety days if insufficient time exists to adequately review
the general sewer plan. For rejections of plans or extensions of the
timeline, the department shall provide in writing to the local
government entity the reason for such action. In addition, the
governing body of the local government entity and the department may
mutually agree to an extension of the deadlines contained in this
section.

--- END ---