BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.38.115 and 1996 c 178 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Certificates of need shall be issued, denied, suspended, or
revoked by the designee of the secretary in accord with the provisions
of this chapter and rules of the department which establish review
procedures and criteria for the certificate of need program.
(2) Criteria for the review of certificate of need applications,
except as provided in subsection (3) of this section for health
maintenance organizations, shall include but not be limited to
consideration of the following:
(a) The need that the population served or to be served by such
services has for such services;
(b) The availability of less costly or more effective alternative
methods of providing such services;
(c) The financial feasibility and the probable impact of the
proposal on the cost of and charges for providing health services in
the community to be served;
(d) In the case of health services to be provided, (i) the
availability of alternative uses of project resources for the provision
of other health services, (ii) the extent to which such proposed
services will be accessible to all residents of the area to be served,
and (iii) the need for and the availability in the community of
services and facilities for osteopathic physicians and surgeons and
allopathic physicians and their patients. The department shall
consider the application in terms of its impact on existing and
proposed institutional training programs for doctors of osteopathic
medicine and surgery and medicine at the student, internship, and
residency training levels;
(e) In the case of a construction project, the costs and methods of
the proposed construction, including the cost and methods of energy
provision, and the probable impact of the construction project reviewed
(i) on the cost of providing health services by the person proposing
such construction project and (ii) on the cost and charges to the
public of providing health services by other persons;
(f) The special needs and circumstances of osteopathic hospitals,
nonallopathic services and children's hospitals;
(g) Improvements or innovations in the financing and delivery of
health services which foster cost containment and serve to promote
quality assurance and cost-effectiveness;
(h) In the case of health services proposed to be provided, the
efficiency and appropriateness of the use of existing services and
facilities similar to those proposed;
(i) In the case of existing services or facilities, the quality of
care provided by such services or facilities in the past;
(j) In the case of hospital certificate of need applications,
whether the hospital meets or exceeds the regional average level of
charity care, as determined by the secretary; ((and))
(k) In the case of nursing home applications:
(i) The availability of other nursing home beds in the planning
area to be served; and
(ii) The availability of other services in the community to be
served. Data used to determine the availability of other services will
include but not be limited to data provided by the department of social
and health services;
(l) Whether or not the project or facility is expected to help
reduce disparate health outcomes among minority or underserved
populations; and
(m) Whether or not the facility or project is expected to relieve
health care shortages in or among medically underserved areas or
medically underserved populations as designated by the health resources
and services administration of the United States department of health
and human services.
(3) A certificate of need application of a health maintenance
organization or a health care facility which is controlled, directly or
indirectly, by a health maintenance organization, shall be approved by
the department if the department finds:
(a) Approval of such application is required to meet the needs of
the members of the health maintenance organization and of the new
members which such organization can reasonably be expected to enroll;
and
(b) The health maintenance organization is unable to provide,
through services or facilities which can reasonably be expected to be
available to the organization, its health services in a reasonable and
cost-effective manner which is consistent with the basic method of
operation of the organization and which makes such services available
on a long-term basis through physicians and other health professionals
associated with it.
A health care facility, or any part thereof, with respect to which
a certificate of need was issued under this subsection may not be sold
or leased and a controlling interest in such facility or in a lease of
such facility may not be acquired unless the department issues a
certificate of need approving the sale, acquisition, or lease.
(4) Until the final expiration of the state health plan as provided
under RCW ((70.38.919)) 70.38.018, the decision of the department on a
certificate of need application shall be consistent with the state
health plan in effect, except in emergency circumstances which pose a
threat to the public health. The department in making its final
decision may issue a conditional certificate of need if it finds that
the project is justified only under specific circumstances. The
conditions shall directly relate to the project being reviewed. The
conditions may be released if it can be substantiated that the
conditions are no longer valid and the release of such conditions would
be consistent with the purposes of this chapter.
(5) Criteria adopted for review in accordance with subsection (2)
of this section may vary according to the purpose for which the
particular review is being conducted or the type of health service
reviewed.
(6) The department shall specify information to be required for
certificate of need applications. Within fifteen days of receipt of
the application, the department shall request additional information
considered necessary to the application or start the review process.
Applicants may decline to submit requested information through written
notice to the department, in which case review starts on the date of
receipt of the notice. Applications may be denied or limited because
of failure to submit required and necessary information.
(7) Concurrent review is for the purpose of comparative analysis
and evaluation of competing or similar projects in order to determine
which of the projects may best meet identified needs. Categories of
projects subject to concurrent review include at least new health care
facilities, new services, and expansion of existing health care
facilities. The department shall specify time periods for the
submission of applications for certificates of need subject to
concurrent review, which shall not exceed ninety days. Review of
concurrent applications shall start fifteen days after the conclusion
of the time period for submission of applications subject to concurrent
review. Concurrent review periods shall be limited to one hundred
fifty days, except as provided for in rules adopted by the department
authorizing and limiting amendment during the course of the review, or
for an unresolved pivotal issue declared by the department.
(8) Review periods for certificate of need applications other than
those subject to concurrent review shall be limited to ninety days.
Review periods may be extended up to thirty days if needed by a review
agency, and for unresolved pivotal issues the department may extend up
to an additional thirty days. A review may be extended in any case if
the applicant agrees to the extension.
(9) The department or its designee, shall conduct a public hearing
on a certificate of need application if requested unless the review is
expedited or subject to emergency review. The department by rule shall
specify the period of time within which a public hearing must be
requested and requirements related to public notice of the hearing,
procedures, recordkeeping and related matters.
(10)(a) Any applicant denied a certificate of need or whose
certificate of need has been suspended or revoked has the right to an
adjudicative proceeding. The proceeding is governed by chapter 34.05
RCW, the Administrative Procedure Act.
(b) Any health care facility or health maintenance organization
that: (i) Provides services similar to the services provided by the
applicant and under review pursuant to this subsection; (ii) is located
within the applicant's health service area; and (iii) testified or
submitted evidence at a public hearing held pursuant to subsection (9)
of this section, shall be provided an opportunity to present oral or
written testimony and argument in a proceeding under this subsection:
PROVIDED, That the health care facility or health maintenance
organization had, in writing, requested to be informed of the
department's decisions.
(c) If the department desires to settle with the applicant prior to
the conclusion of the adjudicative proceeding, the department shall so
inform the health care facility or health maintenance organization and
afford them an opportunity to comment, in advance, on the proposed
settlement.
(11) An amended certificate of need shall be required for the
following modifications of an approved project:
(a) A new service requiring review under this chapter;
(b) An expansion of a service subject to review beyond that
originally approved;
(c) An increase in bed capacity;
(d) A significant reduction in the scope of a nursing home project
without a commensurate reduction in the cost of the nursing home
project, or a cost increase (as represented in bids on a nursing home
construction project or final cost estimates acceptable to the person
to whom the certificate of need was issued) if the total of such
increases exceeds twelve percent or fifty thousand dollars, whichever
is greater, over the maximum capital expenditure approved. The review
of reductions or cost increases shall be restricted to the continued
conformance of the nursing home project with the review criteria
pertaining to financial feasibility and cost containment.
(12) An application for a certificate of need for a nursing home
capital expenditure which is determined by the department to be
required to eliminate or prevent imminent safety hazards or correct
violations of applicable licensure and accreditation standards shall be
approved.
(13)(a) Replacement of existing nursing home beds in the same
planning area by an existing licensee who has operated the beds for at
least one year shall not require a certificate of need under this
chapter. The licensee shall give written notice of its intent to
replace the existing nursing home beds to the department and shall
provide the department with information as may be required pursuant to
rule. Replacement of the beds by a party other than the licensee is
subject to certificate of need review under this chapter, except as
otherwise permitted by subsection (14) of this section.
(b) When an entire nursing home ceases operation, the licensee or
any other party who has secured an interest in the beds may reserve his
or her interest in the beds for eight years or until a certificate of
need to replace them is issued, whichever occurs first. However, the
nursing home, licensee, or any other party who has secured an interest
in the beds must give notice of its intent to retain the beds to the
department of health no later than thirty days after the effective date
of the facility's closure. Certificate of need review shall be
required for any party who has reserved the nursing home beds except
that the need criteria shall be deemed met when the applicant is the
licensee who had operated the beds for at least one year, who has
operated the beds for at least one year immediately preceding the
reservation of the beds, and who is replacing the beds in the same
planning area.
(14) In the event that a licensee, who has provided the department
with notice of his or her intent to replace nursing home beds under
subsection (13)(a) of this section, engages in unprofessional conduct
or becomes unable to practice with reasonable skill and safety by
reason of mental or physical condition, pursuant to chapter 18.130 RCW,
or dies, the building owner shall be permitted to complete the nursing
home bed replacement project, provided the building owner has secured
an interest in the beds.

--- END ---