BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 38.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that recent flooding events over the last
several years have put citizens and businesses in devastating
situations that have resulted in extreme economic loss. This is
particularly acute in the Nisqually river area where miles of river
flow through forested mountainous terrain, rolling farmlands, past
small towns, through the Fort Lewis military reservation and the
Nisqually Indian reservation, and enters Puget Sound. While it is
important for the state to provide public safety and emergency response
during an emergency resulting from a natural disaster, it is equally
important to provide emergency preparedness and disaster mitigation
information prior to an emergency, and recovery and disaster mitigation
help after an emergency; all of which will contribute to making the
public more prepared during an emergency response.
(2) Washington state's topography, geography, location, and history
show that certain areas of the state are at particular risk to both
natural disasters and human-caused disasters. The economic impact from
the 2007 flood disasters alone in Washington were estimated at over
five hundred million dollars. The Nisqually river is unique in
Washington state in having as its headwaters a glacier in a national
park, and its estuary within a national wildlife refuge where severe
storms and weather conditions can often cause flooding on roads,
trigger landslides, and river overflows that greatly exceed river
capacity in the Nisqually river valley area. These changes may include
rapidly rising water, Nisqually river flooding, wildlife habitat
disruption, widespread inundation, road closures, utility disruptions,
loss of homes, and the loss and closure of many businesses in the
northern Thurston and lower Pierce county areas located in the
Nisqually river valley. Severe flooding has the potential to damage
businesses throughout the state and the western United States. In
response, Washington state and local governments have implemented all
hazards emergency management and disaster response plans. However,
recent studies have revealed the lack of a secure funding source that
impedes the Nisqually river valley's ability to fully integrate and
coordinate comprehensive disaster preparedness planning.
(3) Recognizing that all disasters are local disasters, the
legislature intends to strengthen emergency response, mitigation,
preparation, and coordination by establishing a source of funding for
flood control and relocation of those private citizens and businesses
that may be displaced during a flood disaster.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The sum of seven million five hundred
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2011, from the state
building construction account to the Washington military department,
working in cooperation with the flood division of the department of
ecology, the Nisqually river council, and other respective local
governments, as appropriate, to participate in flood hazard mitigation
and response projects for the Nisqually river valley area.
(2) The Washington military department shall administer the
Nisqually river flood assistance funds and establish rules for its
administration in consultation with the emergency management council
and the Washington state emergency management association. The
Washington military department shall use the appropriated funds for
flood prevention, mitigation costs, emergency response, and relocation
costs (including, but not limited to, land acquisition) of public
facilities, infrastructure, and citizens and businesses that are
displaced by Nisqually river flooding conditions.
(3) Projects funded under this section shall include, but need not
be limited to, projects that will promote neighborhood level public
education on disaster preparedness.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---