BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.46.060 and 1959 c 294 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director, to the extent necessary in order to prevent
curtailment of opportunities for employment, shall by ((regulations))
rule provide for (((1))) (a) the employment of learners, of
apprentices, and of messengers employed primarily in delivering letters
and messages, under special certificates issued pursuant to
((regulations)) rules of the director, at such wages lower than the
minimum wage applicable under RCW 49.46.020 and subject to such
limitations as to time, number, proportion, and length of service as
the director shall prescribe, and (((2))) (b) the employment of
individuals whose earning capacity is impaired by age or physical or
mental deficiency or injury, under special certificates issued by the
director, at such wages lower than the minimum wage applicable under
RCW 49.46.020 and for such period as shall be fixed in such
certificates.
(2)(a) The director shall by rule establish procedures for the
issuance of special training certificates to employers to pay wages to
new employees during a training period at seventy-five percent of the
minimum wage required under RCW 49.46.020 or the minimum wage rate
required under federal law, whichever is greater. The training period
may last only for a maximum of six hundred eighty hours. Employers may
only use this special training certificate once per employee. Only
employers with fifty employees or fewer may use the special training
certificate. Employees working under this special training certificate
may not constitute more than ten percent of the employer's workforce,
except that employers with fewer than ten employees may employ one
employee at a time using the special training certificate.
(b) If an employer discharges an employee working under the special
training certificate prior to the completion of six hundred eighty
hours, the employer must notify the director and provide an explanation
for the discharge. The employer may not replace the discharged
employee with another employee working under a special training
certificate for one year from the date of the discharge.

--- END ---