BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.08A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the goal of the Washington WorkFirst
program is economic self-sufficiency for families through unsubsidized
employment. The legislature also finds that matching available
resources with families' needs and developing a comprehensive plan
assists families in attaining lasting self-sufficiency through
employment.
(2) The legislature also finds that the primary purposes of the
temporary assistance for needy families program are: (a) To help job
ready participants secure gainful employment; (b) to assist parents to
prepare for and obtain sustainable employment that will lift the family
out of poverty and lead to economic self-sufficiency; and (c) to
provide basic income assistance and support to parents who are disabled
or otherwise exempt from work activity requirements under federal law.
(3) The legislature further finds that parents who have adequate
job skills and experiences should be referred to job search activities
that will lead to employment.
(4) The legislature also finds that completion of appropriate
educational and training programs is necessary for some families to
achieve economic self-sufficiency through employment because research
demonstrates that without adequate levels of education or training, job
search activities alone have no measurable impact on a family's ability
to become and remain economically self-sufficient.
(5) The legislature further finds that while many families have
been successful in permanently leaving the program of temporary
assistance for needy families, statistics indicate that families
continue to return to the program in the absence of adequate education
and training.
(6) In order to provide work opportunities for parents with
significant barriers to employment, the legislature intends to build
upon the successes of the community jobs program and to provide
subsidized employment opportunities to parents who are unable to find
employment after earnest efforts at job search or education and
training activities.
(7) The legislature recognizes the vital importance of early
childhood development and the significant developmental risks presented
for children living in low-income households, particularly during
critical developmental stages. Therefore, the legislature intends to
reform components of Washington's subsidized childcare program by
redesigning the eligibility determination process to promote: (a)
Stability for children and (b) predictability for parents who are
either working or preparing and searching for work and the childcare
providers who are serving low-income families.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish and implement policies in the
working connections child care program to promote stability and quality
of care for children from low-income households. Policies for the
expenditure of funds constituting the working connections child care
program must be consistent with the outcome measures defined in RCW
74.08A.410 and the standards established in this section intended to
promote continuity of care for children.
(2) Beginning in fiscal year 2011, for families with children
enrolled in an early childhood education and assistance program, a head
start program, or an early head start program, authorizations for the
working connections child care subsidy shall be effective for twelve
months unless a change in circumstances necessitates reauthorization
sooner than twelve months.
(3) The department, in consultation with the department of social
and health services, shall report to the legislature by September 1,
2011, with:
(a) An analysis of the impact of the twelve-month authorization
period on the stability of child care, program costs, and
administrative savings; and
(b) Recommendations for expanding the application of the twelve-month authorization period to additional populations of children in
care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.08A RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington WorkFirst subcabinet, in consultation with the
governor, shall:
(1) Reevaluate the structure and policies of the WorkFirst program
in the context of legislative intent expressed in section 1 of this
act, and in consideration of the relevant research relating to family
economic self-sufficiency and the completion of training and education
programs shown to be correlated with increased earnings and career
growth;
(2) Develop a proposal for redesigning the state's use of temporary
assistance for needy families funds in a manner that makes optimum use
of all funds available in the state to promote more families moving out
of poverty to sustainable self-sufficiency. The subcabinet must report
the proposal to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2010. The proposal must include the following elements:
(a) A process for conducting a reassessment for persons who have
been unable to achieve sustainable self-sufficiency through employment
after receiving WorkFirst assistance for fifty-four months. The
reassessment must be designed to determine if referral to community
jobs or other services, including education and training opportunities,
is appropriate or necessary to assist the person in attaining self-sufficiency for the family;
(b) A plan for referring persons who have been unsuccessful in
finding sustainable employment to the community jobs program or other
wage-subsidized employment program established under RCW 74.08A.320.
Referrals should complement other activities that might be identified
in a reassessment under (a) of this subsection; and
(c) A schedule for the development and implementation of three
pathways to family self-sufficiency that will guide case management and
engage parents early in developing a comprehensive plan to achieve
self-sufficiency while addressing families' current basic needs. The
pathways must address appropriate referrals for:
(i) Persons who have: (A) Marketable job skills, adequate
education, or experience and attachment to the job force, (B)
transportation, (C) safe child care arrangements in place, and (D) no
unaddressed barriers to employment;
(ii) Persons who have: (A) Few or no marketable job skills, (B)
little experience or attachment to the job force, (C) no high school
diploma or equivalent, or (D) a need to complete adult basic education
or other activities to remove barriers to employment; and
(iii) Persons who are: (A) Incapacitated and unemployable, (B)
caring for a child with a disability, or (C) the primary caregiver for
a family member with a disability; and
(3)(a) Adopt the goal of increasing the percentage of households
receiving temporary assistance for needy families that move into the
middle-income bracket or higher, and delineate specific program
strategies within the proposal required in subsection (2) of this
section to reach that goal.
(b) The proposal developed under subsection (2) of this section
shall also include an estimate by the office of financial management,
in consultation with other state agencies, of the percentage of
Washington residents with incomes in the middle-income bracket or
higher, and the percentage of WorkFirst clients who have historically
moved into the middle-income bracket or higher. The office of
financial management shall continue, by December 1 of every year
thereafter, to estimate and report the percentage of Washington
residents with incomes in the middle-income bracket or higher to the
governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature.
(c) For purposes of this section, "middle-income bracket" means
family incomes between two hundred and five hundred percent of the 2009
federal poverty level, as determined by the United States department of
health and human services for a family of four, adjusted annually for
inflation.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.08A.285 and 2003 c 383 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The WorkFirst program operated by the department to meet the
federal work requirements specified in P.L. 104-193 shall contain a job
search component. The component shall consist of instruction on how to
secure a job and assisted job search activities to locate and retain
employment. Nonexempt recipients of temporary assistance for needy
families shall participate in an initial job search for no more than
twelve consecutive weeks, when appropriate, given the recipient's
marketable job skills, attachment to the labor force, and level of
education or training. Each recipient shall receive a work skills
assessment upon referral to the job search program. The work skills
assessment shall include but not be limited to education, employment
history, employment strengths, and job skills. The recipient's ability
to obtain employment will be reviewed periodically thereafter and, if
it is clear at any time that further participation in a job search will
not be productive, the department shall assess the recipient pursuant
to RCW 74.08A.260. The department shall refer recipients unable to
find employment through the initial job search period to ((work))
activities that will develop their skills or knowledge to make them
more employable, including additional job search and job readiness
assistance.

Sec. 5 RCW 74.08A.320 and 1997 c 58 s 325 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall establish a wage subsidy program to be known
as the community jobs program for recipients of temporary assistance
for needy families who have barriers to employment, lack experience and
attachment to the job force, or have been unsuccessful in securing
employment leading to family self-sufficiency. The department shall
give preference in job placements to private sector employers that have
agreed to participate in the wage subsidy program. The department
shall identify characteristics of employers who can meet the employment
goals stated in RCW 74.08A.410. The department shall use these
characteristics in identifying which employers may participate in the
program. The department shall adopt rules for the participation of
recipients of temporary assistance for needy families in the wage
subsidy program. Participants in the program established under this
section may not be employed if: (1) The employer has terminated the
employment of any current employee or otherwise caused an involuntary
reduction of its workforce in order to fill the vacancy so created with
the participant; or (2) the participant displaces or partially
displaces current employees. Employers providing positions created
under this section shall meet the requirements of chapter 49.46 RCW.
This section shall not diminish or result in the infringement of
obligations or rights under chapters 41.06, 41.56, and 49.36 RCW and
the national labor relations act, 29 U.S.C. Ch. 7. The department
shall establish such local and statewide advisory boards, including
business and labor representatives, as it deems appropriate to assist
in the implementation of the wage subsidy program. Once the recipient
is hired, the wage subsidy shall be authorized for up to nine months.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 RCW 74.08A.200 (Intent -- Washington
WorkFirst) and 1997 c 58 s 301 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 It is the intent of the legislature that
this act be implemented within the funding appropriated in the 2009-11
biennial budget. No additional appropriations will be provided for its
implementation.

--- END ---