BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to automobile
parking charges charged by the state to employees of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.29A RCW
to read as follows:
All leasehold interests in state-owned property used for automobile
parking by employees of the state are exempt from tax under this
chapter.

--- END ---