BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.13.360 and 2009 c 520 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No later than January 1, 2011, the department shall convert its
current contracts with providers into performance-based contracts. In
accomplishing this conversion, the department shall decrease the total
number of contracts it uses to purchase services from providers.
(2) ((No later than July 1, 2012)) According to the schedule set by
the legislature when funding is specifically appropriated by the
legislature for implementation of the demonstration site under RCW
74.13.368(4)(a):
(a) ((In the demonstration sites selected under RCW
74.13.368(4)(a),)) Child welfare services in the demonstration sites
shall be provided by supervising agencies with whom the department has
entered into performance-based contracts. Supervising agencies may
enter into subcontracts with other licensed agencies; and
(b) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, and
notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the department may not
directly provide child welfare services to families and children
provided child welfare services by supervising agencies in the
demonstration sites selected under RCW 74.13.368(4)(a).
(3) ((No later than July 1, 2012,)) For families and children
provided child welfare services by supervising agencies in the
demonstration sites selected under RCW 74.13.368(4)(a), the department
is responsible for only the following:
(a) Monitoring the quality of services for which the department
contracts under this chapter;
(b) Ensuring that the services are provided in accordance with
federal law and the laws of this state, including the Indian child
welfare act;
(c) Providing child protection functions and services, including
intake and investigation of allegations of child abuse or neglect,
emergency shelter care functions under RCW 13.34.050, and referrals to
appropriate providers; and
(d) Issuing licenses pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW.
(4) ((No later than July 1, 2012,)) For families and children
provided child welfare services by supervising agencies in the
demonstration sites selected under RCW 74.13.368(4)(a), the department
may provide child welfare services only in an emergency or as a
provider of last resort. The department shall adopt rules describing
the circumstances under which the department may provide those
services. For purposes of this section, "provider of last resort"
means the department is unable to contract with a private agency to
provide child welfare services in a particular geographic area or,
after entering into a contract with a private agency, either the
contractor or the department terminates the contract.
(5) For purposes of this chapter, ((on and after September 1,
2010,)) performance-based contracts shall be structured to hold the
supervising agencies accountable for achieving the following goals in
order of importance: Child safety; child permanency, including
reunification; and child well-being.
(6) A federally recognized tribe located in this state may enter
into a performance-based contract with the department to provide child
welfare services to Indian children whether or not they reside on a
reservation.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.13.368 and 2009 c 520 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The child welfare transformation design committee is
established, with members as provided in this subsection.
(i) The governor or the governor's designee;
(ii) Four private agencies that, as of May 18, 2009, provide child
welfare services to children and families referred to them by the
department. Two agencies must be headquartered in western Washington
and two must be headquartered in eastern Washington. Two agencies must
have an annual budget of at least one million state-contracted dollars
and two must have an annual budget of less than one million state-contracted dollars;
(iii) The assistant secretary of the children's administration in
the department;
(iv) Two regional administrators in the children's administration
selected by the assistant secretary, one from one of the department's
administrative regions one or two, and one from one of the department's
administrative regions three, four, five, or six;
(v) The administrator for the division of licensed resources in the
children's administration;
(vi) Two nationally recognized experts in performance-based
contracts;
(vii) The attorney general or the attorney general's designee;
(viii) A representative of the collective bargaining unit that
represents the largest number of employees in the children's
administration;
(ix) A representative from the office of the family and children's
ombudsman;
(x) Four representatives from the Indian policy advisory committee
convened by the department's office of Indian policy and support
services;
(xi) Two currently elected or former superior court judges with
significant experience in dependency matters, selected by the superior
court judge's association;
(xii) One representative from partners for our children affiliated
with the University of Washington school of social work;
(xiii) A member of the Washington state racial disproportionality
advisory committee;
(xiv) A foster parent; and
(xv) A parent representative who has had personal experience with
the dependency system.
(b) The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives shall jointly appoint the members under (a)(ii), (xiv),
and (xv) of this subsection.
(c) The representative from partners for our children shall convene
the initial meeting of the committee no later than June 15, 2009.
(d) The cochairs of the committee shall be the assistant secretary
for the children's administration and another member selected by a
majority vote of those members present at the initial meeting.
(2) The committee shall establish a transition plan containing
recommendations to the legislature and the governor consistent with
this section for the provision of child welfare services by supervising
agencies pursuant to RCW 74.13.360.
(3) The plan shall include the following:
(a) A model or framework for performance-based contracts to be used
by the department that clearly defines:
(i) The target population;
(ii) The referral and exit criteria for the services;
(iii) The child welfare services including the use of evidence-based services and practices to be provided by contractors;
(iv) The roles and responsibilities of public and private agency
workers in key case decisions and functions. The description of roles
and responsibilities must describe the strategies to assure that no
public employee will be terminated from employment as a result of the
performance-based contracts for child welfare case management services
in the demonstration sites;
(v) Contract performance and outcomes, including those related to
eliminating racial disparities in child outcomes;
(vi) That supervising agencies will provide culturally competent
service;
(vii) How to measure whether each contractor has met the goals
listed in RCW 74.13.360(5); and
(viii) Incentives to meet performance outcomes;
(b) A method by which the department will substantially reduce its
current number of contracts for child welfare services;
(c) A method or methods by which clients will access community-based services, how private supervising agencies will engage other
services or form local service networks, develop subcontracts, and
share information and supervision of children;
(d) Methods to address the effects of racial disproportionality, as
identified in the 2008 Racial Disproportionality Advisory Committee
Report published by the Washington state institute for public policy in
June 2008;
(e) Methods for inclusion of the principles and requirements of the
centennial accord executed in November 2001, executed between the state
of Washington and federally recognized tribes in Washington state;
(f) Methods for assuring performance-based contracts adhere to the
letter and intent of the federal Indian child welfare act;
(g) Contract monitoring and evaluation procedures that will ensure
that children and families are receiving timely and quality services
and that contract terms are being implemented;
(h) A method or methods by which to ensure that the children's
administration has sufficiently trained and experienced staff to
monitor and manage performance-based contracts;
(i) A process by which to expand the capacity of supervising and
other private agencies to meet the service needs of children and
families in a performance-based contractual arrangement;
(j) A method or methods by which supervising and other private
agencies can expand services in underserved areas of the state;
(k) The appropriate amounts and procedures for the reimbursement of
supervising agencies given the proposed services restructuring;
(l) A method by which to access and enhance existing data systems
to include contract performance information;
(m) A financing arrangement for the contracts that examines:
(i) The use of case rates or performance-based fee-for-service
contracts that include incentive payments or payment schedules that
link reimbursement to outcomes; and
(ii) Ways to reduce a contractor's financial risk that could
jeopardize the solvency of the contractor, including consideration of
the use of a risk-reward corridor that limits risk of loss and
potential profits or the establishment of a statewide risk pool;
(n) A description of how the transition will impact the state's
ability to obtain federal funding and examine options to further
maximize federal funding opportunities and increased flexibility;
(o) A review of whether current administrative staffing levels in
the regions should be continued when the majority of child welfare
services are being provided by supervising agencies;
(p) A description of the costs of the transition, the initial
start-up costs and the mechanisms to periodically assess the overall
adequacy of funds and the fiscal impact of the changes, and the
feasibility of the plan and the impact of the plan on department
employees during the transition; and
(q) Identification of any statutory and regulatory revisions
necessary to accomplish the transition.
(4)(a) The committee, with the assistance of the department, shall
select two demonstration sites within which to implement chapter 520,
Laws of 2009. One site must be located on the eastern side of the
state. The other site must be located on the western side of the
state. Neither site must be wholly located in any of the department's
administrative regions. Implementation of the demonstration sites must
be accomplished according to the schedule to be set by the legislature
at the time funding is specifically appropriated by the legislature for
implementation of the demonstration sites.
(b) The committee shall develop two sets of performance outcomes to
be included in the performance-based contracts the department enters
into with supervising agencies. The first set of outcomes shall be
used for those cases transferred to a supervising agency over time.
The second set of outcomes shall be used for new entrants to the child
welfare system.
(c) The committee shall also identify methods for ensuring that
comparison of performance between supervising agencies and the existing
service delivery system takes into account the variation in the
characteristics of the populations being served as well as historical
trends in outcomes for those populations.
(5) The committee shall determine the appropriate size of the child
and family populations to be provided services under performance-based
contracts with supervising agencies. The committee shall also identify
the time frame within which cases will be transferred to supervising
agencies. The performance-based contracts entered into with
supervising agencies shall encompass the provision of child welfare
services to enough children and families in each demonstration site to
allow for the assessment of whether there are meaningful differences,
to be defined by the committee, between the outcomes achieved in the
demonstration sites and the comparison sites or populations. To ensure
adequate statistical power to assess these differences, the populations
served shall be large enough to provide a probability greater than
seventy percent that meaningful difference will be detected and a
ninety-five percent probability that observed differences are not due
to chance alone.
(6) When funding is appropriated by the legislature specifically
for the purpose of implementing the demonstration sites, the committee
shall also prepare as part of the plan a recommendation as to how to
implement chapter 520, Laws of 2009 so that full implementation of
chapter 520, Laws of 2009 is achieved ((no later than June 30, 2012))
in accordance with the schedule set by the legislature.
(7) The committee shall prepare the plan to manage the delivery of
child welfare services in a manner that achieves coordination of the
services and programs that deliver primary prevention services.
(8) Beginning June 30, 2009, the committee shall report quarterly
to the governor and the legislative children's oversight committee
established in RCW 44.04.220. ((From June 30, 2012, until January 1,
2015,)) After full implementation of the demonstration sites according
to the schedule set by the legislature, the committee need only report
twice a year. The committee shall report on its progress in meeting
its duties under subsections (2) and (3) of this section and on any
other matters the committee or the legislative children's oversight
committee or the governor deems appropriate. The portion of the plan
required in subsection (6) of this section shall be due to the
legislative children's oversight committee ((on or before June 1,
2010)) according to the schedule to be set by the legislature when
funding for the demonstration sites is specifically appropriated. The
reports shall be in written form.
(9) The committee, by majority vote, may establish advisory
committees as it deems necessary.
(10) All state executive branch agencies and the agencies with whom
the department contracts for child welfare services shall cooperate
with the committee and provide timely information as the chair or
cochairs may request. Cooperation by the children's administration
must include developing and scheduling training for supervising
agencies to access data and information necessary to implement and
monitor the contracts.
(11) It is expected that the administrative costs for the committee
will be supported through private funds.
(12) Staff support for the committee shall be provided jointly by
partners for our children and legislative staff.
(13) The committee is subject to chapters 42.30 (open public
meetings act) and 42.52 (ethics in public service) RCW.
(14) This section expires July 1, 2015.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.13.370 and 2009 c 520 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Based upon the recommendations of the child welfare
transformation design committee, including the two sets of outcomes
developed by the committee under RCW 74.13.368(4)(b), the Washington
state institute for public policy is to conduct a review of measurable
effects achieved by the supervising agencies and compare those
measurable effects with the existing services offered by the state.
The report on the measurable effects shall be provided to the governor
and the legislature no later than ((April 1, 2015)) the date prescribed
by the legislature at the time funding is appropriated by the
legislature specifically for the purpose of implementing the
demonstration sites.
(2) No later than June 30, 2011, the Washington state institute for
public policy shall provide the legislature and the governor an initial
report on the department's conversion to the use of performance-based
contracts as provided in RCW 74.13.360(1). No later than June 30,
2012, the Washington state institute for public policy shall provide
the governor and the legislature with a second report on the
department's conversion of its contracts to performance-based
contracts.
(3) The department shall respond to the Washington state institute
for public policy's request for data and other information with which
to complete these reports in a timely manner.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.13.372 and 2009 c 520 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Not later than June 1, 2015,)) The governor shall, based on the
report by the Washington state institute for public policy required by
RCW 74.13.370(1), determine whether to expand chapter 520, Laws of 2009
to the remainder of the state or terminate chapter 520, Laws of 2009.
The governor shall inform the legislature of his or her decision within
seven days of the decision. The department shall, regardless of the
decision of the governor regarding the delivery of child welfare
services, continue to purchase services through the use of performance-based contracts.

--- END ---