BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.04.080 and 2000 c 107 s 205 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Persons eligible for appointment as director shall have
practical knowledge of the habits and distribution of fish and
wildlife. The director shall supervise the administration and
operation of the department and perform the duties prescribed by law
and delegated by the commission. The director shall carry out the
basic goals and objectives prescribed under RCW 77.04.055. The
director may, consistent with this section, appoint and employ
necessary personnel. The director may delegate, in writing, to
department personnel the duties and powers necessary for efficient
operation and administration of the department.
(b) Only persons having general knowledge of the fisheries and
wildlife resources and of the commercial and recreational fishing
industry in this state are eligible for appointment as director. The
director shall not have a financial interest in the fishing industry or
a directly related industry. The director shall receive the salary
fixed by the governor under RCW 43.03.040.
(c) The director is the ex officio secretary of the commission and
shall attend its meetings and keep a record of its business.
(2)(a) Prior to appointing or employing an individual as the
regional director of a departmental suboffice, the department's
director must ensure that the candidate is fully vetted with the local
community.
(b) Full local vetting may only be assured if the regional director
candidate has met with, or at least shown a good faith attempt to meet
with, the following prior to the candidate's appointment:
(i) Each member of the state house of representatives whose
legislative district includes geographic areas included in the
applicable departmental region;
(ii) Each member of the state senate whose legislative district
includes geographic areas included in the applicable departmental
region; and
(iii) Each member of the county legislative authorities for every
county included in the applicable departmental region's geographic
area.
(c) If any one of the county legislative authorities votes, as a
body, in the majority to express nonconfidence in the regional director
candidate prior to the candidate's permanent appointment, the
department director must suspend that person's candidacy. Once a
person has his or her candidacy suspended under this section, he or she
may not be reconsidered for a regional director position for any
geographic area that contains the county or counties expressing
nonconfidence for a period of thirty-six months.
(d) This subsection applies to permanent appointments. A person
may serve as an interim regional director for up to three months prior
to satisfying the requirements of this section.

--- END ---