BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) It is the legislature's intent to
encourage immediate investments in technology facilities that can
provide an economic stimulus, sustain long-term jobs that provide
living wages, and help build the digital infrastructure that can enable
the state to be competitive for additional technology investment and
jobs.
(2) There is currently an intense competition for data center
construction and operation in many states including: Oregon, Arizona,
North and South Carolina, North Dakota, Iowa, Virginia, Texas, and
Illinois. Unprecedented incentives are available as a result of the
desire of these states to attract investments that will serve as a
catalyst for additional clusters of economic activity.
(3) Since the economic downturn, Washington has not succeeded in
attracting any private investments in these centers after siting six
major data centers between 2004 and 2007.
(4) Data center technology has advanced rapidly, with marked
increases in energy efficiency. Large, commercial-grade data centers
leverage the economies of scale to reduce energy consumption.
Combining digitized processes with the economies of scale recognized at
these data centers, today's enterprises can materially reduce the
energy they consume and greatly improve their efficiency.
(5) The legislature finds that a fifteen-month window that offers
an exemption for server and related electrical equipment and
installation will act as a stimulus to incent immediate investment.
This investment will bring jobs, tax revenues, and economic growth to
some of our state's rural areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An exemption from the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 is provided
for sales to qualifying businesses of eligible server equipment to be
installed, without intervening use, in an eligible computer data
center, and to charges made for labor and services rendered in respect
to installing eligible server equipment. The exemption also applies to
sales to qualifying businesses of eligible power infrastructure,
including labor and services rendered in respect to constructing,
installing, repairing, altering, or improving eligible power
infrastructure.
(2)(a) In order to claim the exemption under this section, a
qualifying business must submit an application to the department for an
exemption certificate. The application must include the information
necessary, as required by the department, to determine that a business
qualifies for the exemption under this section. The department must
issue exemption certificates to qualifying businesses. The department
may assign a unique identification number to each exemption certificate
issued under this section.
(b) A qualifying business claiming the exemption under this section
must present the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and
manner prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of
the certificate for the seller's files.
(3)(a) A qualifying business must establish within six years of the
first day of the calendar quarter in which the business first receives
an exemption under this section or section 3 of this act that it has
increased employment in the state by a minimum of thirty-five family
wage jobs from the date the eligible computer data center first became
operational. For purposes of this subsection, family wage jobs are new
permanent employment positions requiring forty hours of weekly work, or
their equivalent, on a full-time basis and paying a wage equivalent to
or greater than one hundred fifty percent of the per capita personal
income of the county in which the qualified project is located. The
qualifying business must provide health insurance coverage for
employees.
(b) All previously exempted sales and use taxes are immediately due
and payable for a qualifying business that does not meet the
requirements of this subsection.
(4) A qualifying business claiming an exemption under this section
or section 3 of this act must complete an annual report with the
department as required under section 103, chapter . . . (Substitute
House Bill No. 3066), Laws of 2010.
(5) For purposes of this section the following definitions apply
unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a)(i) "Computer data center" means a facility comprised of one or
more buildings constructed or refurbished specifically, and used
primarily, to house working servers, where the facility has the
following characteristics: (A) Uninterruptible power supplies,
generator backup power, or both; (B) sophisticated fire suppression and
prevention systems; and (C) enhanced physical security, such as:
Restricted access to the facility to selected personnel; permanent
security guards; video camera surveillance; an electronic system
requiring passcodes, keycards, or biometric scans, such as hand scans
and retinal or fingerprint recognition; or similar security features.
(ii) For a computer data center comprised of multiple buildings,
each separate building constructed or refurbished specifically, and
used primarily, to house working servers is considered a computer data
center if it has all of the characteristics listed in (a)(i)(A) through
(C) of this subsection (5).
(b) "Electronic data storage and data management services" include,
but are not limited to: Providing data storage and backup services,
providing computer processing power, hosting enterprise software
applications, and hosting web sites. The term also includes providing
services such as e-mail, web browsing and searching, media
applications, and other online services, regardless of whether a charge
is made for such services.
(c) "Eligible computer data center" means a computer data center:
(i) Located in a rural county as defined in RCW 82.14.370;
(ii) Having at least twenty thousand square feet dedicated to
housing working servers, where the server space has not previously been
dedicated to housing working servers; and
(iii) For which the commencement of construction occurs after March
31, 2010, and before July 1, 2011. For purposes of this section,
"commencement of construction" means the date that a building permit is
issued under the building code adopted under RCW 19.27.031 for
construction of the computer data center. The construction of a
computer data center includes the expansion, renovation, or other
improvements made to existing facilities, including leased or rented
space. "Commencement of construction" does not include soil testing,
site clearing and grading, site preparation, or any other related
activities that are initiated before the issuance of a building permit
for the construction of the foundation of a computer data center.
(d) "Eligible power infrastructure" means all fixtures and
equipment necessary for the transformation, distribution, or management
of electricity that is required to operate eligible server equipment
within an eligible computer data center. The term includes electrical
substations, generators, wiring, and cogeneration equipment.
(e) "Eligible server equipment" means the original server equipment
installed in an eligible computer data center on or after April 1,
2010, and replacement server equipment. For purposes of this
subsection (5)(e), "replacement server equipment" means server
equipment that: (i) Replaces existing server equipment, if the sale or
use of the server equipment to be replaced qualified for an exemption
under this section or section 3 of this act; and (ii) is installed and
put into regular use before April 1, 2018.
(f) "Qualifying business" means a business entity that exists for
the primary purpose of engaging in commercial activity for profit and
that is the owner or lessee of an eligible computer data center. The
term does not include the state or federal government or any of their
departments, agencies, and institutions; tribal governments; political
subdivisions of this state; or any municipal, quasi-municipal, public,
or other corporation created by the state or federal government, tribal
government, municipality, or political subdivision of the state.
(g) "Server" means blade or rack-mount server computers used in a
computer data center exclusively to provide electronic data storage and
data management services for internal use by the owner or lessee of the
computer data center, for clients of the owner or lessee of the
computer data center, or both. "Server" does not include personal
computers.
(h) "Server equipment" means the server chassis and all computer
hardware and software contained within the server chassis. "Server
equipment" does not include the racks upon which the server chassis is
installed, and computer peripherals such as keyboards, monitors,
printers, mice, and other devices that work outside of the computer.
(6) This section expires April 1, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An exemption from the tax imposed by RCW 82.12.020 is provided
for the use by qualifying businesses of eligible server equipment to be
installed, without intervening use, in an eligible computer data
center, and to the use of labor and services rendered in respect to
installing such server equipment. The exemption also applies to the
use of power infrastructure, including labor and services rendered in
respect to installing, repairing, altering, or improving such
infrastructure.
(2) A qualifying business is not eligible for the exemption under
this section unless the department issued an exemption certificate to
the qualifying business for the exemption provided in section 2 of this
act.
(3) The definitions in section 2 of this act apply to this section.
(4) This section expires April 1, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
April 1, 2010.

--- END ---