BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.93.070 and 1985 c 89 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to any other powers vested by law, a general authority
Washington peace officer who possesses a certificate of basic law
enforcement training or a certificate of equivalency or has been
exempted from the requirement therefor by the Washington state criminal
justice training commission may enforce the traffic or criminal laws of
this state throughout the territorial bounds of this state, under the
following enumerated circumstances:
(1) Upon the prior written consent of the sheriff or chief of
police in whose primary territorial jurisdiction the exercise of the
powers occurs;
(2) In response to an emergency involving an immediate threat to
human life or property;
(3) In response to a request for assistance pursuant to a mutual
law enforcement assistance agreement with the agency of primary
territorial jurisdiction or in response to the request of a peace
officer with enforcement authority;
(4) When the officer is transporting a prisoner;
(5) When the officer is executing an arrest warrant or search
warrant; ((or))
(6) When the officer is in fresh pursuit, as defined in RCW
10.93.120; or
(7) When issuing municipal code violation notices for traffic
infractions occurring within a municipality, as long as he or she is in
uniform and in a marked vehicle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.64 RCW
to read as follows:
If a general authority Washington peace officer, as defined in RCW
10.93.020, is in uniform and driving a marked vehicle, he or she has
the authority to issue municipal code violation notices for traffic
infractions occurring within a municipality.

--- END ---