BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.03.310 and 2009 c 564 s 925 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The citizens' commission on salaries for elected officials
shall study the relationship of salaries to the duties of members of
the legislature, all elected officials of the executive branch of state
government, and all judges of the supreme court, court of appeals,
superior courts, and district courts, and shall fix the salary for each
respective position.
(2) Except as provided otherwise in RCW 43.03.305 and this section,
the commission shall be solely responsible for its own organization,
operation, and action and shall enjoy the fullest cooperation of all
state officials, departments, and agencies.
(3) Members of the commission shall receive no compensation for
their services, but shall be eligible to receive a subsistence
allowance and travel expenses pursuant to RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(4) The members of the commission shall elect a chair from among
their number. The commission shall set a schedule of salaries by an
affirmative vote of not less than nine members of the commission.
(5) The commission shall file its initial schedule of salaries for
the elected officials with the secretary of state no later than the
first Monday in June, 1987, and shall file a schedule biennially
thereafter. Each such schedule shall be filed in legislative bill
form, shall be assigned a chapter number and published with the session
laws of the legislature, and shall be codified by the statute law
committee. The signature of the chair of the commission shall be
affixed to each schedule submitted to the secretary of state. The
chair shall certify that the schedule has been adopted in accordance
with the provisions of state law and with the rules, if any, of the
commission. Such schedules shall become effective ninety days after
the filing thereof, except as provided in Article XXVIII, section 1 of
the state Constitution. State laws regarding referendum petitions
shall apply to such schedules to the extent consistent with Article
XXVIII, section 1 of the state Constitution.
(6) Before the filing of any salary schedule, the commission shall
first develop a proposed salary schedule and then hold no fewer than
four regular meetings as defined by chapter 42.30 RCW to take public
testimony on the proposed schedule within the four months immediately
preceding the filing. In the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the commission
shall hold no more than two regular meetings as defined by chapter
42.30 RCW to take public testimony on the proposed schedule within the
four months immediately preceding the filing. At the last public
hearing that is held as a regular meeting on the proposed schedule, the
commission shall adopt the salary schedule as originally proposed or as
amended at that meeting that will be filed with the secretary of state.
(7) All meetings, actions, hearings, and business of the commission
shall be subject in full to the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30
RCW.
(8) Salaries of the officials referred to in subsection (1) of this
section that are in effect on January 12, 1987, shall continue until
modified by the commission under this section.
(9) If the economic and revenue forecast council's most recent
projection under Article VIII, section 12 of the state Constitution for
any fiscal year determines that employment growth will be less than one
percent, or if a general state salary freeze is established in law for
any fiscal year, then in that fiscal year the commission may not adopt
any salary increase for legislators, any salary increases for
legislators that were previously approved by the commission may not
take effect, and the prior salaries shall remain in effect until the
following fiscal biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act takes effect if the
proposed amendment to Article XXVIII, section 1 of the state
Constitution (House Joint Resolution . . . [H-4768.1]) is validly
submitted to and ratified by the voters at a general election held in
November 2010. If the proposed amendment is not approved and ratified,
this act is void in its entirety.

--- END ---