BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that state and local
governments across the country are experiencing serious budget
shortfalls. The legislature further finds that many of these
governments entered into contracts for high-risk derivatives deals with
termination clauses that left these governments with large fees owed to
financial institutions, further exacerbating their fiscal problems.
The legislature intends to determine whether state and local
governments in Washington state entered into these kinds of contracts
and examine ways to avoid the problems encountered by other
governments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 By December 1, 2010, the state investment
board, in consultation and cooperation with the state treasurer and
relevant cities and counties, shall submit a report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature on the following:
(1) A survey of current investment policies and practices by state
and local governments and limits in place to avoid high-risk and exotic
investment instruments;
(2) An identification of any governmental entities that could be
liable for large fees owed to financial institutions due to termination
clauses in contracts for derivatives deals; and
(3) Recommendations for legislative and policy changes to prevent
state and local governments from making high-risk investments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires July 1, 2011.

--- END ---