BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.18.042 and 2009 c 156 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any retired firefighter married to a spouse ineligible for
survivor benefits under RCW 41.18.040, 41.18.080, and 41.18.100 may
choose an actuarially equivalent benefit adopted by the board that pays
the retired firefighter a reduced retirement allowance, and upon death
such portion of the retired firefighter's reduced retirement allowance
as designated by the retired firefighter shall be continued throughout
the life of the spouse.
(2) A retired firefighter who married a spouse ineligible for
survivor benefits under RCW 41.18.040, 41.18.080, and 41.18.100 prior
to July 26, 2009, has one year after July 26, 2009, to designate their
spouse as a survivor beneficiary.
(3) A retired firefighter who married, on or after July 26, 2009,
a spouse ineligible for survivor benefits under RCW 41.18.040,
41.18.080, and 41.18.100 may designate their spouse as a survivor
beneficiary during a one-year period beginning one year after the date
of marriage to the spouse ineligible for survivor benefits.
(4) The benefit provided to a child survivor beneficiary under RCW
41.18.040, 41.18.080, and 41.18.100 shall not be affected or reduced by
the retired firefighter's selection of the actuarially reduced spousal
survivor benefit provided by this section, and shall be equivalent to
the amount payable as if the choice under subsection (1) of this
section was not made.
(((4))) (5)(a) Any retired firefighter who chose to receive a
reduced retirement allowance under subsection (1) of this section is
entitled to receive a retirement allowance adjusted in accordance with
(b) of this subsection if:
(i) The retiree's survivor spouse designated in subsection (1) of
this section predeceases the retiree; and
(ii) The retiree provides to the board proper proof of the
designated beneficiary's death.
(b) The retirement allowance payable to the retiree from the
beginning of the month following the date of the beneficiary's death
shall be the current monthly amount payable as if the selection under
subsection (1) of this section was not made.

--- END ---