BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.20A.890 and 2005 c 369 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A program for (a) the prevention and treatment of problem and
pathological gambling; and (b) the training of professionals in the
identification and treatment of problem and pathological gambling is
established within the department of social and health services, to be
administered by a qualified person who has training and experience in
problem gambling or the organization and administration of treatment
services for persons suffering from problem gambling. The department
may certify and contract with treatment facilities for any services
provided under the program. The department shall track program
participation and client outcomes.
(2) To receive treatment under subsection (1) of this section, a
person must:
(a) Need treatment for problem or pathological gambling, or because
of the problem or pathological gambling of a family member, but be
unable to afford treatment; and
(b) Be targeted by the department of social and health services as
being most amenable to treatment.
(3) Treatment under this section is available only to the extent of
the funds appropriated or otherwise made available to the department of
social and health services for this purpose. The department may
solicit and accept for use any gift of money or property made by will
or otherwise, and any grant of money, services, or property from the
federal government, any tribal government, the state, or any political
subdivision thereof or any private source, and do all things necessary
to cooperate with the federal government or any of its agencies or any
tribal government in making an application for any grant.
(4) The department may adopt rules establishing standards for the
review and certification of treatment facilities under this program.
(5) The department of social and health services shall establish an
advisory committee to assist it in designing, managing, and evaluating
the effectiveness of the program established in this section. The
advisory committee shall give due consideration in the design and
management of the program that persons who hold licenses or contracts
issued by the gambling commission, horse racing commission, and lottery
commission are not excluded from, or discouraged from, applying to
participate in the program. The committee shall include, at a minimum,
persons knowledgeable in the field of problem and pathological gambling
and persons representing tribal gambling, privately owned nontribal
gambling, and the state lottery.
(((5))) (6) For purposes of this section, "pathological gambling"
is a mental disorder characterized by loss of control over gambling,
progression in preoccupation with gambling and in obtaining money to
gamble, and continuation of gambling despite adverse consequences.
"Problem gambling" is an earlier stage of pathological gambling which
compromises, disrupts, or damages family or personal relationships or
vocational pursuits.

--- END ---