BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The department shall impose an annual
license fee of two thousand five hundred dollars for the access or
transfer of geographic information system spatial layers and tabular
data information on sites that have archaeological, historic
archaeological, cultural, or burial importance related to cemeteries,
burials, and graves (human remains). The department will provide this
information up to four times per year, and no interagency agreements
will be executed without a fee. The department shall exempt students
doing research from the fee on a case-by-case basis. Businesses with
fewer than five employees and gross annual revenues of less than fifty
thousand dollars shall be exempt from the fee. No fee shall be imposed
to access only historical information through the online report system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The historic and archaeological geographic
information system account is created in the state treasury. All
receipts from the annual license fee imposed pursuant to section 1 of
this act must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may
be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may
be used only for the creation, maintenance, and improvement for
recordkeeping or geographic information system maintenance for sites
that have archaeological, historic archaeological, cultural, or burial
importance related to cemeteries, burials, and graves (human remains).

Sec. 3 RCW 43.84.092 and 2009 c 479 s 31, 2009 c 472 s 5, and
2009 c 451 s 8 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate
share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily
balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search
and rescue account, the budget stabilization account, the capitol
building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia
river basin water supply development account, the common school
construction fund, the county arterial preservation account, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of licensing services
account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the
developmental disabilities community trust account, the drinking water
assistance account, the drinking water assistance administrative
account, the drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern
Washington University capital projects account, the education
construction fund, the education legacy trust account, the election
account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account,
the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College
capital projects account, the federal forest revolving account, the
ferry bond retirement fund, the freight congestion relief account, the
freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal
account, the historic and archaeological geographic information system
account, the grade crossing protective fund, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health
services account, the high capacity transportation account, the state
higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway
infrastructure account, the highway safety account, the high occupancy
toll lanes operations account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account,
the mobile home park relocation fund, the motor vehicle fund, the
motorcycle safety education account, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding
stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance
account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the
public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account,
the public facilities construction loan revolving account beginning
July 1, 2004, the public health supplemental account, the public
transportation systems account, the public works assistance account,
the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry
operations account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real
estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account,
the regional mobility grant program account, the resource management
cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural Washington
loan fund, the site closure account, the small city pavement and
sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife
account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees'
insurance reserve account, the state investment board expense account,
the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state
patrol highway account, the state route number 520 corridor account,
the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge
account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco
prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the
transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement
account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account,
the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation
partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tuition
recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund,
the University of Washington building account, the urban arterial trust
account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and
pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve
officers' administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account,
the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety
employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the
state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 and 2 of this act are each added
to chapter 43.334 RCW.

--- END ---