BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares the
following:
(1) The fish and wildlife of the state of Washington are a valuable
natural resource and an integral part of the economic and social fabric
of our state;
(2) A review of available literature and research indicates that
lead sinkers and jigs pose a significant hazard to water birds that
mistakenly ingest lead sinkers and jigs and experience lead poisoning;
(3) Lead is a toxic metal known to cause many health problems in
water birds and leads to an increasing susceptibility to disease,
predation, and infection. A single sinker can cause death within two
weeks;
(4) Lead has been linked to human health problems, including brain
damage, mental retardation, behavior problems, anemia, liver and kidney
damage, hearing loss, hyperactivity, developmental delays, other
physical and mental problems and, in extreme cases, death. Lower IQ
scores, slower development, and more attention problems have been
observed in children exposed to lead;
(5) Lead sinkers are small and easily swallowed, posing a toxic
hazard to children. Furthermore, many anglers make their own sinkers
or make sinkers in their home for sale to others. If proper
precautions are not used, lead vapors and dust can impact anyone within
the household; and
(6) Effective and comparably priced alternatives to lead sinkers
and jigs exist. It is irresponsible to continue to allow the use of
toxic products and their deposition in the waters of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Lead jig" means a lead weighted fishing hook, the lead portion
of which has a mass of one ounce or less or measures less than one inch
along its shortest axis.
(2) "Lead sinker" means a fishing sinker containing more than one-half of one percent lead by weight, the lead portion of which has a
mass of one ounce or less or that measures less than one inch along its
shortest axis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A person may not sell or offer for sale
within the state a lead sinker or lead jig.
(2) A violation of this section is a civil infraction for which a
fine of not less than one thousand dollars nor more than five thousand
dollars may be adjudged.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A person may not use a lead sinker for
fishing in the waters of the state.
(2) A violation of this section is a civil infraction for which the
following penalties apply:
(a) For the first offense, a minimum fine of one hundred twenty-five dollars.
(b) For the second offense, a minimum fine of five hundred dollars,
and forfeiture of all fishing tackle, rod and reel, and the loss of any
fishing license for a period of at least one year.
(c) For a third or subsequent offense, a minimum fine of one
thousand dollars, forfeiture of all fishing tackle, rod and reel, and
a lifetime loss of any fishing license.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The procedures for enforcement of sections
3 and 4 of this act are the same as the procedures for natural resource
infractions under chapter 7.84 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The department shall provide public
education and outreach to disseminate information regarding this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 3 and 4 of this act take effect
January 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 77 RCW.

--- END ---