BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The department shall impose an annual
license fee of one thousand five hundred dollars to access an online
report system that provides archaeological, historical, cemetery,
cultural, and human remains information. No fee shall be imposed to
access only historical information through the online report system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The geographic information system account is
created in the state treasury. All receipts from the annual license
fee imposed pursuant to section 1 of this act must be deposited into
the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the
creation, maintenance, and improvement to an online report system that
provides archaeological, historical, cemetery, cultural, and human
remains information.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.84.092 and 2009 c 479 s 31, 2009 c 472 s 5, and
2009 c 451 s 8 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate
share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily
balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search
and rescue account, the budget stabilization account, the capitol
building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia
river basin water supply development account, the common school
construction fund, the county arterial preservation account, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of licensing services
account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the
developmental disabilities community trust account, the drinking water
assistance account, the drinking water assistance administrative
account, the drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern
Washington University capital projects account, the education
construction fund, the education legacy trust account, the election
account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account,
the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College
capital projects account, the federal forest revolving account, the
ferry bond retirement fund, the freight congestion relief account, the
freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal
account, the geographic information system account, the grade crossing
protective fund, the public health services account, the health system
capacity account, the personal health services account, the high
capacity transportation account, the state higher education
construction account, the higher education construction account, the
highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the
highway safety account, the high occupancy toll lanes operations
account, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges'
retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the
judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise tax
account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and
use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park
relocation fund, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety
education account, the multimodal transportation account, the municipal
criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account, the natural resources deposit account, the oyster
reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the
perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities
construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public
health supplemental account, the public transportation systems account,
the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital
construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the
Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real estate appraiser
commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional
mobility grant program account, the resource management cost account,
the rural arterial trust account, the rural Washington loan fund, the
site closure account, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the
special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve
account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol
highway account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the
supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account,
the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco
prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the
transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement
account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account,
the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation
partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tuition
recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund,
the University of Washington building account, the urban arterial trust
account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and
pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve
officers' administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account,
the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety
employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the
state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 and 2 of this act are each added
to chapter 43.334 RCW.

--- END ---