BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.12.203 and 2005 c 303 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Notwithstanding RCW 84.36.010 or other statutes to the
contrary)) If requested by a county under RCW 77.12.201, the director
shall pay by April 30th of each year on game lands in each county((, if
requested by an election under RCW 77.12.201,)) an amount in lieu of
real property taxes ((equal to that amount paid on similar parcels of
open space land taxable under chapter 84.34 RCW or the greater of)).
The amount paid by the department to the county under this section must
be calculated by one of the following two methods as identified by the
requesting county:
(a) Seventy cents per acre of game lands located in the county per
year; or
(b) The amount ((paid)) of payments in lieu of taxes paid to the
county by the department in 1984 plus an additional amount for control
of noxious weeds equal to that which would be paid if such lands were
privately owned. ((This amount))
(2) Payments under this section shall not be assessed or ((paid))
required on department buildings, structures, facilities, game farms,
fish hatcheries, tidelands, or public fishing areas of less than one
hundred acres.
(((2))) (3) "Game lands," as used in this section and RCW
77.12.201, means those tracts one hundred acres or larger owned in fee
by the department and used for wildlife habitat and for public
recreational purposes. ((All)) However, any lands purchased for
wildlife habitat, public access, or recreation purposes with federal
funds in the Snake River drainage basin shall be considered game lands
regardless of acreage.
(((3))) (4) This section shall not apply to lands transferred after
April 23, 1990, to the department from other state agencies.
(((4))) (5) The county shall distribute the amount received under
this section in lieu of real property taxes to all property taxing
districts except the state in appropriate tax code areas the same way
it would distribute local property taxes from private property. The
county shall distribute the amount received under this section for weed
control to the appropriate weed district.
(6) This section applies to game lands held in fee by the
department regardless of the provisions of RCW 84.36.010 or other
relevant statutes exempting public ownership for local property taxes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Any county electing to receive payments
in lieu of taxes under RCW 77.12.201 for the 2010 calendar year
calculated at a level equal to the amount paid by similar parcels under
the open space classification of chapter 84.34 RCW may continue to
receive payments from the department of fish and wildlife at that level
for the 2010 payment cycle. However, all such counties must provide
additional notification prior to January 1, 2011, to the department of
fish and wildlife regarding whether they are still interested in
receiving payments under RCW 77.12.201 and identifying which method of
payment calculation under RCW 77.12.203, as amended by this act, is
preferred.
(2) Any notifications applicable to the 2011 payment cycle provided
to the department of fish and wildlife under RCW 77.12.201 prior to the
effective date of this section requesting payments in lieu of taxes
calculated at a level equal to the amount paid by similar parcels under
the open space classification of chapter 84.34 RCW are void and must be
resubmitted by the county in a notice identifying which method of
payment calculation under RCW 77.12.203, as amended by this act, is
preferred.

--- END ---