BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 On October 12, 2009, the department of
ecology issued an interpretive policy statement clarifying that a water
right is not required for rooftop rainwater harvesting. It is the
intent of legislature to reaffirm that households may collect rainwater
without a water right.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definition of "water resources" in RCW 43.27A.020 is not
intended to mean or imply that the water appropriation permit
requirements of this chapter apply to the capture, storage, and use of
rainwater if the water is collected from the roof of a building and is
used on the same land parcel on which it was captured or if rainwater
is captured and used for watering livestock or wildlife using a guzzler
mechanism. The department may prohibit new systems for the capture,
storage, and use of rainwater in a specific locality if it is
determined that existing water rights or streamflows would be impaired.
(2) Any person who believes that existing or proposed projects to
capture, store, and use rainwater are impairing or would impair their
water right may file a declaratory judgment action in a court of
competent jurisdiction for a determination of whether the rainwater
project or projects are having such an effect. The court may prescribe
such remedies as it deems equitable.
(3) For the purposes of this section, a roof must be part of a
fixed structure constructed above the ground, the primary purpose of
which is to provide shelter to people, animals, or materials.
(4) For the purposes of this section, a guzzler is a rain
collection device intended to capture and store rainwater to supply
animals with drinking water.

--- END ---