BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.19.534 and 2009 c 470 s 717 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) State agencies, the legislature, and departments shall purchase
for their use all goods and services required by the legislature,
agencies, or departments that are produced or provided in whole or in
part from class II inmate work programs operated by the department of
corrections through state contract. These goods and services shall not
be purchased from any other source unless, upon application by the
department or agency: (a) The department of general administration
finds that the articles or products do not meet the reasonable
requirements of the agency or department, (b) are not of equal or
better quality, or (c) the price of the product or service is higher
than that produced by the private sector. However, the criteria
contained in (a), (b), and (c) of this ((section)) subsection for
purchasing goods and services from sources other than correctional
industries do not apply to goods and services produced by correctional
industries that primarily replace goods manufactured or services
obtained from outside the state. The department of corrections and
department of general administration shall adopt administrative rules
that implement this section.
(2) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, and in conformance with
section 223(11), chapter 470, Laws of 2009, this section does not apply
to the purchase of uniforms by the Washington state ferries.
(3) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, any exemptions granted to
higher education institutions by the office of financial management
before January 1, 2010, must remain in effect for the 2009-2011 fiscal
biennium and the office of financial management may not rescind any
exemptions for the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---