BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that locating
acceptable housing for seniors is an important aspect of providing an
appropriate continuity of care for senior citizens.
(2) The legislature further finds that locating appropriate and
quality housing alternatives sometimes depends on the competence and
honesty of elder placement referral agencies attempting to assist with
placement.
(3) The legislature further finds that elder placement referral
agencies should have a formal system of oversight and experience
qualifications to promote better integration of senior housing choices.
(4) The legislature further finds that the registration of elder
placement referral agencies and the provision of proper oversight and
certification is in the interest of public health, safety, and welfare.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Unless the context clearly indicates
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout the
chapter.
(1) "Applicant" means an applicant for an elder placement referral
license.
(2) "Client" means a person, seeking or entering into an
arrangement for housing or services through an elder placement referral
agency.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of health.
(4) "Elder placement referral agency" and "agency" mean a business
in which (a) part of the business gross or net income is derived from
a fee received from individuals seeking placement in a senior housing
setting or from a senior housing provider and (b) any of the following
occur:
(i) Offering, promising, procuring, or attempting to procure
services or housing for applicants;
(ii) Giving information regarding where and from whom senior
housing or services for seniors may be obtained; or
(iii) Selling a list of service providers or a list of names of
persons or companies providing care services or housing for seniors.
Elder placement referral agency includes any person, bureau, senior
housing listing service, housing directories, or organization, that
offers, for a fee, to procure services or housing for any senior or
senior's representative.
(5) "Fee" means anything of value. The term includes money or
other valuable consideration or services or the promise of money or
other valuable consideration or services, received directly or
indirectly by an elder placement referral agency from a person seeking
senior services or senior housing, in payment for the service, or from
a senior housing provider or senior service provider as payment for a
placement or referral.
(6) "Person" includes any individual, firm, corporation,
partnership, association, company, society, manager, contractor,
subcontractor, bureau, agency, service, office, or an agent or any of
their employees.
(7) "Senior" includes any person who is fifty-five years of age or
older and who:
(a) Currently resides in senior housing; or
(b) Receives senior services.
(8) "Senior housing" means any type of housing designed for
prospective residents who are at least fifty-five years old. Senior
housing includes, but is not limited to, nursing homes licensed under
chapter 18.51 RCW, boarding homes licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW,
adult family homes licensed under chapter 70.128 RCW, and retirement
communities catering to adults at least fifty-five years old or at
least sixty-two years old.
(9) "Senior services" means any combination of services, including
in-home care, private duty care or private duty nursing designed for or
with the goal of allowing seniors to receive care and services at home
or in a home-like setting. Senior services providers must include, but
not be limited to, home health care licensed under chapter 70.126 RCW
and in-home service agencies licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 After January 1, 2011, a person may not
operate or maintain an elder placement referral agency in this state
without a license issued by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Each elder placement referral agency shall
keep records of all services rendered to applicants. These records
shall contain the name and address of the applicant by whom the
services were solicited; the name and address of the applicant; kind of
housing or services sought ordered by the applicant; kind of position
accepted by the applicant; probable duration of the housing, if known;
rate of rent or service to be paid; amount of the elder referral
agency's fee; dates and amounts of refund if any, and reason for such
refund; and the contract agreed to between the agency and applicant or
senior housing provider.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) An elder placement referral agency must
provide a client with a copy of the contract between the client and
elder placement referral agency that includes:
(a) The name, address, and telephone number of the elder placement
referral agency;
(b) The trade name of the agency, if any;
(c) The date of the contract;
(d) The name of the client;
(e) The amount of the fee to be charged the client or the senior
housing provider, or the method of computation of the fee, and the time
and method of payments;
(f) Acknowledgment that the agency will be acting as a
representative of the applicant seeking residence in a senior housing
community;
(g) A provision stating that the elder placement referral agency
may not require or request applicants to sign waivers of potential
liability for losses of personal property or injury; and
(h) A copy of this chapter of the revised code of Washington
attached.
(2) Before referral or placement, the elder placement referral
agency must conduct a preliminary assessment and develop a preliminary
care plan for each client that includes the following information:
(a) Medical history;
(b) Necessary and contraindicated medications;
(c) A licensed medical or health professional's diagnosis, unless
the individual objects for religious reasons;
(d) Significant known behaviors or symptoms that may cause concern
or require special care;
(e) Mental illness diagnosis, except where protected by
confidentiality laws;
(f) Level of personal care needs;
(g) Activities and service preferences; and
(h) Preferences regarding other issues important to the client,
such as food and daily routine.
(3) After conducting a preliminary assessment and developing a
preliminary care plan, but before referral or placement, the elder
placement referral agency must provide applicants with a list of all
potential placement options in the client's county of residence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The director shall administer the
provisions of this chapter and adopt reasonable rules for enforcing and
carrying out the provisions and purposes of this chapter.
(2) The director has supervisory and investigative authority over
all elder placement referral agencies. Upon receiving a complaint
against any agency, the director has the right to examine all books,
documents, or records in the possession of an elder placement referral
agency. In addition, the director may examine the office or offices
where business is conducted by a elder placement referral agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) As a condition of obtaining and
maintaining a valid elder placement referral agency license, each
agency must provide evidence of having liability insurance.
(2) The minimum amount of liability insurance required is one
million dollars combined single limit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 It is a misdemeanor for any person to
operate an elder placement referral agency business in this state
unless he has an elder placement referral agency license issued under
the provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 An employee of an elder placement referral
agency must pass a criminal background check every twenty-four months,
consistent with the requirements of RCW 43.43.842.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) An applicant for an elder placement
referral agency's license or a renewal must file with the director a
written application stating (a) the name and address of the applicant,
(b) the street address of the elder placement referral agency, (c) the
name of the general manager of the office, (d) the name of the
business, (e) whether or not the applicant has a financial interest in
the business to be carried on under the license, and (f) a recent
criminal background check for applicant. The application must be
signed by the applicant, sworn to before a notary public, and must
identify anyone holding over twenty percent interest in the agency. If
the applicant is a corporation, the application must state the names
and addresses of the officers and directors of the corporation and be
signed and sworn to by the president and secretary thereof. If the
applicant is a partnership, the application must also state the names
and addresses of all partners and must be signed and sworn to by all of
them. The application must also state whether the applicant is or has
been engaged in or interested in or employed by anyone engaged in the
business of an elder placement referral agency.
(2) The application must require a certification that no officer or
holder of more than twenty percent interest in the business has been
convicted of a felony that directly relates to the business for which
the license is sought within ten years of the application, or had any
judgment entered against the officer or holder of more than twenty
percent interest in any civil action involving fraud,
misrepresentation, or conversion.
(3) All applications for elder placement referral agency licenses
must be accompanied by a copy of the form of contract and fee schedule
to be used between the elder placement referral agency and the
applicant or between the elder placement referral agency and the senior
housing or senior housing provider.
(4) Every license application must require a recent credit history
report for the agency and its officers, partners, or those shareholders
owning more that twenty percent of the company. The director's
determination of financial instability or bad credit history is grounds
to deny a license.
(5) At the time of the application for or renewal of a license or
provisional license the licensee must pay a license fee as established
by the department.
(6) Each license is valid for a period of twelve months.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) An elder placement referral agency may
not charge or accept a fee or other consideration from an applicant or
senior housing provider (a) unless the elder placement referral agency
complies with the terms of a written contract as required by section 5
of this act, and (b) discloses the terms of the contract to the
applicant and senior housing provider before any referral, and (c)
refers an applicant to a senior services or senior housing provider
where the applicant obtains housing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 No license granted under this chapter may
be transferred without the consent of the director. An elder placement
referral agency shall not permit any person who is not identified in
the license application to become connected with the business as an
owner, member, officer, or director without the consent of the
director. The director may withhold consent for any reason that would
have been grounds for rejecting the original application if the person
had been identified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 In accordance with the provisions of this
chapter, the director may, by order, sanction the licensee of any elder
placement referral agency if the director finds that the applicant or
licensee has violated any provisions of this chapter, or failed to
comply with any rule or regulation issued by the director under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 (1) The provisions of this chapter relating
to the regulation of private elder placement referral agencies is
exclusive.
(2) This chapter may not be construed to affect or reduce the
authority of any political subdivision of the state of Washington to
provide for the licensing of private elder placement referral agencies
solely for revenue purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 The administration of this chapter is
governed by the provisions of the administrative procedure act, chapter
34.05 RCW, as now or hereafter amended.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 The uniform regulation of business and
professions act, chapter 18.235 RCW, governs unlicensed practice, the
issuance and denial of licenses, and the discipline of licensees under
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 This act shall be known and cited as the
"elder placement referral act."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Sections 2 through 17 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---