BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 76.04.005 and 2007 c 480 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
((As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings
indicated)) The definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Additional fire hazard" means a condition existing on any land
in the state:
(a) Covered wholly or in part by forest debris which is likely to
further the spread of fire and thereby endanger life or property; or
(b) When, due to the effects of disturbance agents, broken, down,
dead, or dying trees exist on forest land in sufficient quantity to be
likely to further the spread of fire within areas covered by a forest
health hazard warning or order issued by the commissioner of public
lands under RCW 76.06.180. The term "additional fire hazard" does not
include green trees or snags left standing in upland or riparian areas
under the provisions of RCW 76.04.465 or chapter 76.09 RCW.
(2) "Closed season" means the period between April 15th and October
15th, unless the department designates different dates because of
prevailing fire weather conditions.
(3) "Department" means the department of natural resources, or its
authorized representatives, as defined in chapter 43.30 RCW.
(4) "Department protected lands" means all lands subject to the
forest protection assessment under RCW 76.04.610 or covered under
contract or agreement pursuant to RCW 76.04.135 by the department.
(5) "Disturbance agent" means those forces that damage or kill
significant numbers of forest trees, such as insects, diseases, wind
storms, ice storms, and fires.
(6) "Emergency fire costs" means those costs incurred or approved
by the department for emergency forest fire suppression, including the
employment of personnel, rental of equipment, and purchase of supplies
over and above costs regularly budgeted and provided for nonemergency
fire expenses for the biennium in which the costs occur.
(7) "Forest debris" includes forest slash, chips, and any other
vegetative residue resulting from activities on forest land.
(8) "Forest fire service" includes all wardens, rangers, and other
persons employed especially for preventing or fighting forest fires.
(9) "Forest land" means any unimproved lands which have enough
trees, standing or down, or flammable material, to constitute in the
judgment of the department, a fire menace to life or property.
Sagebrush and grass areas east of the summit of the Cascade mountains
may be considered forest lands when such areas are adjacent to or
intermingled with areas supporting tree growth. Forest land, for
protection purposes, does not include structures.
(10) "Forest landowner," "owner of forest land," "landowner," or
"owner" means the owner or the person in possession of any public or
private forest land.
(11) "Forest material" means forest slash, chips, timber, standing
or down, or other vegetation.
(12) "Landowner operation" means every activity, and supporting
activities, of a forest landowner and the landowner's agents,
employees, or independent contractors or permittees in the management
and use of forest land subject to the forest protection assessment
under RCW 76.04.610 for the primary benefit of the owner. The term
includes, but is not limited to, the growing and harvesting of forest
products, the development of transportation systems, the utilization of
minerals or other natural resources, and the clearing of land. The
term does not include recreational and/or residential activities not
associated with these enumerated activities.
(13) "Participating landowner" means an owner of forest land whose
land is subject to the forest protection assessment under RCW
76.04.610.
(14) "Slash" means organic forest debris such as tree tops, limbs,
brush, and other dead flammable material remaining on forest land as a
result of a landowner operation.
(15) "Slash burning" means the planned and controlled burning of
forest debris on forest lands by broadcast burning, underburning, pile
burning, or other means, for the purposes of silviculture, hazard
abatement, or reduction and prevention or elimination of a fire hazard.
(16) "Suppression" means all activities involved in the containment
and control of forest fires, including the patrolling thereof until
such fires are extinguished or considered by the department to pose no
further threat to life or property.
(17) "Improved lands" means property on which a structure is
located but does not include roads, bridges, forest lands, or
unimproved lands.
(18)(a) "Unimproved lands" means those lands ((that will support
grass, brush and tree growth, or other flammable material when such
lands are not cleared or cultivated and, in the opinion of the
department, are a fire menace to life and property)) occupied by shrub-steppe vegetation and forest lands devoted primarily to production of
livestock or agricultural commodities for commercial purposes.
(b) "Unimproved lands" does not include improved lands.

Sec. 2 RCW 76.04.165 and 1995 c 151 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds and declares that forest and shrub-steppe
lands within the state are increasingly being used for residential
purposes; that the risk to life and property is increasing from forest
fires which may destroy developed property; that, based on the primary
missions for the respective fire control agencies established in this
chapter, adjustment of the geographic areas of responsibility has not
kept pace with the increasing use of forest lands for residential
purposes; and that the department should work with the state's other
fire control agencies to define geographic areas of responsibility that
are more consistent with their respective primary missions.
(2) To accomplish the purposes of subsection (1) of this section,
the department shall establish a procedure to clarify its geographic
areas of responsibility. The areas of department protection shall be
called forest protection zones and shall not necessarily include all
parcels paying a per parcel assessment as specified in RCW 76.04.610.
(a) Other than as specified in (b) of this subsection, the
department shall protect all forest land which the department is
obligated to protect and all state and privately owned unimproved lands
located outside of fire protection districts as of January 1, 2010.
(b) The forest protection zones shall include all forest land and
nonforested, unimproved land which the department is obligated to
protect but shall not include forest land and nonforested, unimproved
land within rural fire districts or municipal fire districts which
affected local fire control agencies agree, by mutual consent with the
department, is not appropriate for department protection. Forest land
and nonforested, unimproved land not included within a forest
protection zone established by mutual agreement of the department and
a rural fire district or a municipal fire district shall not be
assessed under RCW 76.04.610 or 76.04.630.
(3) After the department and any affected local fire protection
agencies have agreed on the boundary of a forest protection zone, the
department shall establish the boundary by rule under chapter 34.05
RCW.
(4) Except by agreement of the affected parties, the establishment
of forest protection zones shall not alter any mutual aid agreement.

Sec. 3 RCW 76.04.167 and 2001 c 279 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature hereby finds and declares that:
(a) Forest wildfires are a threat to public health and safety and
can cause catastrophic damage to public and private resources,
including clean air, clean water, fish and wildlife habitat, timber
resources, forest soils, scenic beauty, recreational opportunities,
economic and employment opportunities, structures, and other
improvements;
(b) Forest landowners and the public have a shared interest in
protecting forests and forest resources by preventing and suppressing
forest wildfires;
(c) A recent independent analysis of the state fire program
considered it imperative to restore a more equitable split between the
general fund and forest protection assessments;
(d) Without a substantial increase in forest protection funds, the
state's citizens will be paying much more money for emergency fire
suppression; and
(e) It is therefore the intent of the legislature that the costs of
fire protection be equitably shared between the forest protection
assessment account and state contributions to ensure that there will be
sufficient firefighters who are equipped and trained to respond quickly
to fires in order to keep fires small and manage those large fires that
do occur. In recognition of increases in landowner assessments, the
legislature declares its intent that increases in the state's share for
forest protection should be provided to stabilize the funding for the
forest protection program, and that sufficient state funds should be
committed to the forest protection program so that the recommendations
contained in the 1997 tridata report can be implemented on an equitable
basis.
(2) The legislature hereby finds and declares that it is in the
public interest to establish and maintain a complete, cooperative, and
coordinated forest fire protection and suppression program for the
state; that, second only to saving lives, the primary mission of the
department is protecting forest resources and suppressing forest and
nonforested, unimproved land wildfires; that a primary mission of rural
fire districts and municipal fire departments is protecting improved
property and suppressing structural fires; and that the most effective
way to protect structures is for the department to focus its efforts
and resources on aggressively suppressing forest wildfires.
(3) The legislature acknowledges that the department may use
discretionary authority to take actions that may prevent approaching
wildfire from destroying or damaging homes and other improvements,
although the legislature finds that this is not the primary mission of
the department as specified in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) The legislature also acknowledges the natural role of fire in
forest ecosystems, and finds and declares it in the public interest to
use fire under controlled conditions to prevent wildfires by
maintaining healthy forests and eliminating sources of fuel.

Sec. 4 RCW 76.04.016 and 1993 c 196 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department when acting, in good faith, in its statutory
capacity as a fire prevention and suppression agency, is carrying out
duties owed to the public in general and not to any individual person
or class of persons separate and apart from the public. Nothing
contained in this title, including but not limited to any provision
dealing with payment or collection of forest protection or fire
suppression assessments or actions taken by the department within its
discretionary authority that may prevent approaching wildfire from
destroying or damaging personal property, may be construed to evidence
a legislative intent that the duty to prevent and suppress forest fires
or the use of discretionary authority to take actions that may prevent
destruction or damage to personal property is owed to any individual
person or class of persons separate and apart from the public in
general. This section does not alter the department's duties and
responsibilities as a landowner.

Sec. 5 RCW 76.04.610 and 2007 c 110 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The department shall annually impose a per parcel assessment
of four dollars and sixty-six cents on each taxable parcel of land
within the state of Washington.
(b) If any owner of forest land or nonforested, unimproved land
outside a fire protection district boundary but within a forest
protection zone neglects or fails to provide adequate fire protection
as required by RCW 76.04.600, the department shall provide such
protection and shall annually impose the following assessments on each
parcel of such land: (i) A ((flat fee assessment of seventeen dollars
and fifty cents; and (ii) twenty-seven)) per acre assessment of twenty-four cents on each acre ((exceeding fifty acres)) within parcels lying
west of Okanogan, Chelan, Kittitas, Yakima, and Klickitat counties; and
(ii) a per acre assessment of forty-four cents on each acre within
parcels not specified in (b)(i) of this subsection.
(((b) Assessors may, at their option, collect the assessment on tax
exempt lands. If the assessor elects not to collect the assessment,
the department may bill the landowner directly.))
(2) ((An owner who has paid assessments on two or more parcels,
each containing fewer than fifty acres and each within the same county,
may obtain the following refund:
(a) If all the parcels together contain less than fifty acres, then
the refund is equal to the flat fee assessments paid, reduced by the
total of (i) seventeen dollars and (ii) the total of the amounts
retained by the county from such assessments under subsection (5) of
this section.
(b) If all the parcels together contain fifty or more acres, then
the refund is equal to the flat fee assessments paid, reduced by the
total of (i) seventeen dollars, (ii) twenty-seven cents for each acre
exceeding fifty acres, and (iii) the total of the amounts retained by
the county from such assessments under subsection (5) of this section.
Applications for refunds shall be submitted to the department on a
form prescribed by the department and in the same year in which the
assessments were paid. The department may not provide refunds to
applicants who do not provide verification that all assessments and
property taxes on the property have been paid. Applications may be
made by mail.
In addition to the procedures under this subsection,)) Property
owners with ((multiple)) ten or more parcels in ((a single county who
qualify for a refund under this section may apply)) one county may
elect to pay only one per parcel assessment provided that the property
owner applies to the department on an application listing all the
parcels owned in order to have the per acreage assessment computed on
all parcels but to have the per parcel assessment billed to a single
parcel. ((Property owners with the following number of parcels may
apply to the department in the year indicated:

Year Number of Parcels
2002 10 or more parcels
2003 8 or more parcels
2004 and thereafter 6 or more parcels))

The department must compute the correct assessment and allocate one
parcel in the county to use to collect the assessment. The county must
then bill the forest fire protection assessment on that one allocated
identified parcel. The landowner is responsible for notifying the
department of any changes in parcel ownership.
(3) ((Beginning January 1, 1991,)) Under the administration and at
the discretion of the department up to two hundred thousand dollars per
year of this assessment shall be used in support of those rural fire
districts assisting the department in fire protection services on
forest lands.
(4) For the purpose of this chapter, the department may divide the
forest lands of the state, or any part thereof, into districts, for
fire protection and assessment purposes, may classify lands according
to the character of timber prevailing, and the fire hazard existing,
and place unprotected lands under the administration of the proper
district. Amounts paid or contracted to be paid by the department for
protection of forest lands from funds at its disposal shall be a lien
upon the property protected, unless reimbursed by the owner within ten
days after October 1st of the year in which they were incurred. The
department shall be prepared to make statement thereof, upon request,
to a forest owner whose own protection has not been previously approved
as to its adequacy, the department shall report the same to the
assessor of the county in which the property is situated. The assessor
shall extend the amounts upon the tax rolls covering the property, and
upon authorization from the department shall levy the forest protection
assessment against the amounts of unimproved land as shown in each
ownership on the county assessor's records. The assessor may then
segregate on the records to provide that the improved land and
improvements thereon carry the millage levy designed to support the
rural fire protection districts as provided for in RCW 52.16.170.
(5) The amounts assessed shall be collected at the time, in the
same manner, by the same procedure, and with the same penalties
attached that general state and county taxes on the same property are
collected, except that errors in assessments may be corrected at any
time by the department certifying them to the treasurer of the county
in which the land involved is situated. Assessments shall be known and
designated as assessments of the year in which the amounts became
reimbursable. Upon the collection of assessments the county treasurer
shall place fifty cents of the total assessments paid on a parcel for
fire protection into the county current expense fund to defray the
costs of listing, billing, and collecting these assessments. The
treasurer shall then transmit the balance to the department.
Collections shall be applied against expenses incurred in carrying out
the provisions of this section, including necessary and reasonable
administrative costs incurred by the department in the enforcement of
these provisions. The department may also expend sums collected from
owners of forest lands or received from any other source for necessary
administrative costs in connection with the enforcement of RCW
76.04.660.
(6) When land against which forest protection assessments are
outstanding is acquired for delinquent taxes and sold at public
auction, the state shall have a prior lien on the proceeds of sale over
and above the amount necessary to satisfy the county's delinquent tax
judgment. The county treasurer, in case the proceeds of sale exceed
the amount of the delinquent tax judgment, shall immediately remit to
the department the amount of the outstanding forest protection
assessments.
(7) ((All nonfederal public bodies owning or administering forest
land included in a forest protection zone shall)) Forest land and
nonforested, unimproved lands located outside of a fire protection
district boundary as of January 1, 2010, and owned or administered by
nonfederal public bodies or having tax-exempt status shall be protected
from wildfire by the department but shall not pay the forest protection
assessments provided in this section and the special forest fire
suppression account assessments under RCW 76.04.630. ((The forest
protection assessments and special forest fire suppression account
assessments shall be payable by nonfederal public bodies from available
funds within thirty days following receipt of the written notice from
the department which is given after October 1st of the year in which
the protection was provided. Unpaid assessments are not a lien against
the nonfederal publicly owned land but shall constitute a debt by the
nonfederal public body to the department and are subject to interest
charges at the legal rate.))
(8) ((A public body, having failed to previously pay the forest
protection assessments required of it by this section, which fails to
suppress a fire on or originating from forest lands owned or
administered by it, is liable for the costs of suppression incurred by
the department or its agent and is not entitled to reimbursement of
costs incurred by the public body in the suppression activities.
(9))) The department may adopt rules to implement this section,
including, but not limited to, rules on levying and collecting forest
protection assessments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect January 1, 2011.

--- END ---