BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1)(a) A commission on health care insurance
reform is established, with members as provided in this subsection.
(i) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate.
(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint
one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives.
(iii) The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives jointly shall appoint eight members representing
business, labor, insurance carriers, and consumers.
(iv) The insurance commissioner shall serve as the chair of the
task force, and will be a nonvoting member, except in the case of a tie
vote.
(b) The insurance commissioner shall convene the initial meeting of
the commission on health care insurance reform.
(2) The commission on health care insurance reform shall review the
following issues:
(a) The individual health care market;
(b) The small group market;
(c) The association health plan market;
(d) Mandated benefits;
(e) Rating rules;
(f) Antidiscrimination provisions; and
(g) Any other aspect of health insurance the commission on health
care insurance reform deems appropriate.
(3) The commission on health care insurance reform shall report its
findings, recommendations, and legislation based upon its
recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 15, 2010.
(4) The senate and house of representatives shall approve or reject
the legislation containing the commission recommendations, without
amendment, by April 15, 2011.
(5) This section expires June 30, 2011.

--- END ---