BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.19.020 and 1996 c 69 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Advisory committee" means the advisory committee on minority
and women's business enterprises.
(2) "Broker" means a person that provides a bona fide service, such
as professional, technical, consultant, brokerage, or managerial
services and assistance in the procurement of essential personnel,
facilities, equipment, materials, or supplies required for performance
of a contract.
(3) "Department" means the department of commerce.
(4) "Director" means the director of the ((office of minority and
women's business enterprises)) department.
(((4))) (5) "Educational institutions" means the state
universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College,
and the community colleges.
(((5))) (6) "Goals" means annual overall agency goals, expressed as
a percentage of dollar volume, for participation by minority and women-owned and controlled businesses and shall not be construed as a minimum
goal for any particular contract or for any particular geographical
area. It is the intent of this chapter that such overall agency goals
shall be achievable and shall be met on a contract-by-contract or
class-of-contract basis.
(((6))) (7) "Goods and/or services" includes professional services
and all other goods and services.
(((7))) (8) "Office" means the office of minority and women's
business enterprises within the department.
(((8))) (9) "Person" includes one or more individuals,
partnerships, associations, organizations, corporations, cooperatives,
legal representatives, trustees and receivers, or any group of persons.
(((9))) (10) "Procurement" means the purchase, lease, or rental of
any goods or services.
(((10))) (11) "Public works" means all work, construction, highway
and ferry construction, alteration, repair, or improvement other than
ordinary maintenance, which a state agency or educational institution
is authorized or required by law to undertake.
(((11))) (12) "State agency" includes the state of Washington and
all agencies, departments, offices, divisions, boards, commissions, and
correctional and other types of institutions.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.19.030 and 1996 c 69 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is hereby created the office of minority and women's
business enterprises within the department. ((The governor shall
appoint a director for the office, subject to confirmation by the
senate. The director may employ a deputy director and a confidential
secretary, both of which shall be exempt under chapter 41.06 RCW, and
such staff as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this
chapter.))
(2) The office shall consult with the minority and women's business
enterprises advisory committee to:
(((1))) (a) Develop, plan, and implement programs to provide an
opportunity for participation by qualified minority and women-owned and
controlled businesses in public works and the process by which goods
and services are procured by state agencies and educational
institutions from the private sector;
(((2))) (b) Develop a comprehensive plan insuring that qualified
minority and women-owned and controlled businesses are provided an
opportunity to participate in public contracts for public works and
goods and services;
(((3))) (c) Identify barriers to equal participation by qualified
minority and women-owned and controlled businesses in all state agency
and educational institution contracts;
(((4))) (d) Establish annual overall goals for participation by
qualified minority and women-owned and controlled businesses for each
state agency and educational institution to be administered on a
contract-by-contract basis or on a class-of-contracts basis;
(((5))) (e) Develop and maintain a central minority and women's
business enterprise certification list for all state agencies and
educational institutions. No business is entitled to certification
under this chapter unless it meets the definition of small business
concern as established by the office. All applications for
certification under this chapter shall be sworn under oath; and
(((6))) (f) Develop, implement, and operate a system of monitoring
compliance with this chapter((;
(7)).
(3) The director shall:
(a) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative
procedure act, governing: (((a))) (i) Establishment of agency goals;
(((b))) (ii) development and maintenance of a central minority and
women's business enterprise certification program, including a
definition of "small business concern" which shall be consistent with
the small business requirements defined under section 3 of the small
business act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 632, and its implementing regulations as
guidance; (((c))) (iii) procedures for monitoring and enforcing
compliance with goals, regulations, contract provisions, and this
chapter; (((d))) (iv) utilization of standard clauses by state agencies
and educational institutions, as specified in RCW 39.19.050; and
(((e))) (v) determination of an agency's or educational institution's
goal attainment consistent with the limitations of RCW 39.19.075;
(((8))) (b) Submit an annual report to the governor and the
legislature outlining the progress in implementing this chapter;
(((9))) (c) Investigate complaints of violations of this chapter
with the assistance of the involved agency or educational institution;
and
(((10))) (d) Cooperate and act jointly or by division of labor with
the United States or other states, and with political subdivisions of
the state of Washington and their respective minority, socially and
economically disadvantaged and women business enterprise programs to
carry out the purposes of this chapter. However, the power which may
be exercised by the ((office)) director under this subsection permits
investigation and imposition of sanctions only if the investigation
relates to a possible violation of chapter 39.19 RCW, and not to
violation of local ordinances, rules, regulations, however denominated,
adopted by political subdivisions of the state.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.19.041 and 1995 c 269 s 1302 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director or the director's designee may establish ad hoc
advisory committees, as necessary, to assist in the development of
policies to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 39.19.060 and 1996 c 288 s 28 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each state agency and educational institution shall comply with the
annual goals established for that agency or institution under this
chapter for public works and procuring goods or services. This chapter
applies to all public works and procurement by state agencies and
educational institutions, including all contracts and other procurement
under chapters 28B.10, 39.04, 39.29, 43.19, and 47.28 RCW. Each state
agency shall adopt a plan, developed in consultation with the director
or the director's designee and the advisory committee, to insure that
minority and women-owned businesses are afforded the maximum
practicable opportunity to directly and meaningfully participate in the
execution of public contracts for public works and goods and services.
The plan shall include specific measures the agency will undertake to
increase the participation of certified minority and women-owned
businesses. The ((office)) director shall annually notify the
governor, the state auditor, and the joint legislative audit and review
committee of all agencies and educational institutions not in
compliance with this chapter.

Sec. 5 RCW 39.19.250 and 2009 c 348 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purpose of annual reporting on progress required by
section 1 of this act, each state agency and educational institution
shall submit data to the office and the office of minority and women's
business enterprises on the participation by qualified minority and
women-owned and controlled businesses in the agency's or institution's
contracts and other related information requested by the director or
the director's designee. The director ((of the office of minority and
women's business enterprises)) or the director's designee shall
determine the content and format of the data and the reporting
schedule, which must be at least annually.
(2) The office must develop and maintain a list of contact people
at each state agency and educational institution ((that is)) who are
able to present to hearings of the appropriate committees of the
legislature its progress in carrying out the purposes of chapter 39.19
RCW.
(3) The ((office)) director must submit a report aggregating the
data received from each state agency and educational institution to the
legislature and the governor.

Sec. 6 RCW 39.19.150 and 1987 c 328 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any city, county, town, special purpose district, public
corporation created by the state, municipal corporation, or quasi-municipal corporation having reason to believe that a particular
minority and women's business enterprise should not have been certified
under RCW 39.19.140 may petition the office for reconsideration. The
basis for the petition may be one or more of the following:
(a) The ((office's)) department's rules ((or regulations)) were
improperly applied; or
(b) Material facts relating to the minority and women's business
enterprise's certification application to the office are untrue.
(2) The petitioner shall carry the burden of persuasion. The
affected minority or women's business enterprise shall receive notice
of the petition and an opportunity to respond.
(3) After reviewing the information presented in support of and in
opposition to the petition, the ((office)) director shall issue a
written decision, granting or denying the petition. If the ((office))
director grants the petition, ((it)) the director may revoke, suspend,
or refuse to renew the certification or impose sanctions under this
chapter as appropriate.
(4) The ((office's)) director's decision on a petition is
administratively final and the rights of appeal set out in the ((office
regulations)) department rules shall apply. A certification shall
remain in effect while a petition is pending.

Sec. 7 RCW 39.19.200 and 1993 c 195 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The minority and women's business enterprises account is created in
the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from RCW 39.19.210,
39.19.220, and 39.19.230 shall be deposited in the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes
defraying all or part of the costs of the ((office)) department in
administering this chapter. Only the director or the director's
designee may authorize expenditures from the account. Moneys in the
account may be spent only after appropriation.

Sec. 8 RCW 39.19.210 and 1993 c 195 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((office)) department may charge a reasonable fee or other
appropriate charge, to be set by rule adopted by the ((office))
department under chapter 34.05 RCW, to a business using the services of
the ((office)) department under this chapter.

Sec. 9 RCW 39.19.220 and 1993 c 195 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((office)) department may charge to a political subdivision in
this state a reasonable fee or other appropriate charge, to be set by
rule adopted by the ((office)) department under chapter 34.05 RCW,
prorated on the relative benefit to the political subdivision, for the
certification under this chapter of a business.

Sec. 10 RCW 39.19.230 and 1993 c 195 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((office)) department may charge to a state agency and
educational institutions, as both are defined in RCW 39.19.020, a
reasonable fee or other appropriate charge, to be set by rule adopted
by the ((office)) department under chapter 34.05 RCW, based upon the
state agency's or educational institution's expenditure level of funds
subject to the ((office)) department.

Sec. 11 RCW 42.17.2401 and 2009 c 565 s 24 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 42.17.240, the term "executive state
officer" includes:
(1) The chief administrative law judge, the director of
agriculture, the administrator of the Washington basic health plan, the
director of the department of services for the blind, the director of
the state system of community and technical colleges, the director of
commerce, the secretary of corrections, the director of early learning,
the director of ecology, the commissioner of employment security, the
chair of the energy facility site evaluation council, the secretary of
the state finance committee, the director of financial management, the
director of fish and wildlife, the executive secretary of the forest
practices appeals board, the director of the gambling commission, the
director of general administration, the secretary of health, the
administrator of the Washington state health care authority, the
executive secretary of the health care facilities authority, the
executive secretary of the higher education facilities authority, the
executive secretary of the horse racing commission, the executive
secretary of the human rights commission, the executive secretary of
the indeterminate sentence review board, the director of the department
of information services, the executive director of the state investment
board, the director of labor and industries, the director of licensing,
the director of the lottery commission, ((the director of the office of
minority and women's business enterprises,)) the director of parks and
recreation, the director of personnel, the executive director of the
public disclosure commission, the executive director of the Puget Sound
partnership, the director of the recreation and conservation office,
the director of retirement systems, the director of revenue, the
secretary of social and health services, the chief of the Washington
state patrol, the executive secretary of the board of tax appeals, the
secretary of transportation, the secretary of the utilities and
transportation commission, the director of veterans affairs, the
president of each of the regional and state universities and the
president of The Evergreen State College, and each district and each
campus president of each state community college;
(2) Each professional staff member of the office of the governor;
(3) Each professional staff member of the legislature; and
(4) Central Washington University board of trustees, the boards of
trustees of each community college and each technical college, each
member of the state board for community and technical colleges, state
convention and trade center board of directors, committee for deferred
compensation, Eastern Washington University board of trustees,
Washington economic development finance authority, The Evergreen State
College board of trustees, executive ethics board, forest practices
appeals board, forest practices board, gambling commission, life
sciences discovery fund authority board of trustees, Washington health
care facilities authority, each member of the Washington health
services commission, higher education coordinating board, higher
education facilities authority, horse racing commission, state housing
finance commission, human rights commission, indeterminate sentence
review board, board of industrial insurance appeals, information
services board, recreation and conservation funding board, state
investment board, commission on judicial conduct, legislative ethics
board, liquor control board, lottery commission, marine oversight
board, Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning
council, parks and recreation commission, board of pilotage
commissioners, pollution control hearings board, public disclosure
commission, public pension commission, shorelines hearings board,
public employees' benefits board, salmon recovery funding board, board
of tax appeals, transportation commission, University of Washington
board of regents, utilities and transportation commission, Washington
state maritime commission, Washington personnel resources board,
Washington public power supply system executive board, Washington State
University board of regents, Western Washington University board of
trustees, and fish and wildlife commission.

Sec. 12 RCW 43.63A.690 and 2005 c 302 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall provide technical assistance and loan
packaging services that enable minority and women-owned business
enterprises to obtain financing under the linked deposit program
created under RCW 43.86A.060.
(2) The department((, in consultation with the office of minority
and women's business enterprises,)) shall develop indicators to measure
the performance of the linked deposit program in the areas of job
creation or retention and providing access to capital to minority or
women's business enterprises.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 RCW 41.06.082 (Office of minority and
women's business enterprises -- Certain personnel exempted from chapter)
and 1983 c 120 s 14 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 (1) The office of minority and women's
business enterprises is transferred to the department of commerce to be
an office within the department of commerce.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the office of minority
and women's business enterprises shall be delivered to the custody of
the department of commerce. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment,
motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the office of
minority and women's business enterprises shall be made available to
the department of commerce. All funds, credits, or other assets held
by the office of minority and women's business enterprises shall be
assigned to the department of commerce.
(b) Any appropriations made to the office of minority and women's
business enterprises shall, on the effective date of this section, be
transferred and credited to the department of commerce.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel,
funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other
tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the
performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of
financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the office of minority and women's business
enterprises classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service
law, are transferred and assigned to the department of commerce to
perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any
loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate
thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil
service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the office of
minority and women's business enterprises shall be continued and acted
upon by the department of commerce. All existing contracts and
obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the
department of commerce.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the office of minority and women's business enterprises shall not
affect the validity of any act performed before the effective date of
this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) The existing bargaining units of employees of the office of
minority and women's business enterprises transferred to the department
of commerce under this section shall be transferred in their entirety
without the merging of other bargaining units or the inclusion of
employees from other bargaining units. Nothing contained in this
section may be construed to alter any of the existing collective
bargaining units unless and until the bargaining unit has been modified
by action of the public employment relations commission as provided by
law. Therefore, the certification of the existing bargaining units
shall remain. However, the public employment relations commission may,
upon request, amend the certification to reflect the name of the new
agency. Nothing in this section may be construed to alter the
provisions of any existing collective bargaining agreement until the
agreement has expired. The existing bargaining units of employees
transferred under this section shall continue to be subject to the
provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---