BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.22 RCW
to read as follows:
The county auditor shall charge a surcharge of sixty-two dollars
for each document recorded, which is in addition to any other charge
allowed by law. The surcharge in this section applies only to
assignments or substitutions of previously recorded deeds of trust.
The funds collected under this section must be transmitted monthly to
the state treasurer who shall deposit the funds in the Washington
housing trust fund account created in RCW 43.185.030.

--- END ---