BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the provision of information
technology in state government lacks strategic coordination,
transparency, and meaningful enterprise-wide direction and oversight.
It is no longer economically sustainable or technically feasible for
state agencies to obtain and provide large-scale, commonly utilized
information technology products and services on an individual, agency-by-agency basis without coordination. Instead, the state needs a
strong, enterprise-based information technology strategy to ensure the
public's needs are being met and the state is receiving the highest
quality information technology products and services at the best price
from public or private providers. Developing a strong enterprise-wide
strategy also includes establishing clear lines of authority and
accountability within state agencies so that those services unique to
individual agencies receive the support required to effectively and
efficiently provide services to citizens. To accomplish these
objectives, the state needs to develop an open, transparent process for
determining the total cost of ownership for the information technology
products and services it provides, and to provide such information in
an easily accessible, public fashion. It is in the state's interest to
ensure that the wide range of disparate networks, systems, services,
and structures across state government become more closely coordinated,
organized, and structured. This type of coordinating effort is already
underway in the area of higher education through the efforts of the
higher education technology transformation task force and informally
within other areas. When more transparent technical and financial
information is readily available, the state can make sound policy
decisions about what information technology services should be provided
centrally on a shared services basis, and what products and services
may be best suited for either contracting with private providers or for
maintenance at the agency level. Furthermore, if attractive pricing
models and service level agreements are developed for enterprise-based
information technology services, the legislative and judicial branches
will have an incentive to participate in those services as well.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to organize, consolidate,
and, where appropriate, contract with private providers for technology
systems and resources in a strategic fashion that is based upon sound,
objective, nonpolitical, and independent technical and financial
criteria. The state needs to develop a clear, enterprise-based
statewide strategy for information technology to ensure that there is
transparency and accountability regarding how information technology
resources are being allocated, how decisions are being made, and who is
accountable for on-time, on-budget delivery.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) State agencies that are purchasing wireless devices or services
must make such purchases through the state master contract, unless the
state agency provides to the office of financial management evidence
that the state agency is securing its wireless devices or services from
another source for a lower cost than through participation in the state
master contract.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "state agency" means any
office, department, board, commission, or other unit of state
government, but does not include a unit of state government headed by
a statewide elected official, an institution of higher education as
defined in RCW 28B.10.016, the state board for community and technical
colleges, or agencies of the legislative or judicial branches of state
government.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.105.190 and 2005 c 319 s 111 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department, with the approval of the board, shall establish
standards and policies governing the planning, implementation, and
evaluation of major information technology projects, including those
proposed by the superintendent of public instruction, in conjunction
with educational service districts, or statewide or regional providers
of K-12 education information technology services. The standards and
policies shall:
(a) Establish criteria to identify projects which are subject to
this section. Such criteria shall include, but not be limited to,
significant anticipated cost, complexity, or statewide significance of
the project; and
(b) Establish a model process and procedures which agencies shall
follow in developing and implementing projects within their information
technology portfolios. Agencies may propose, for approval by the
department, a process and procedures unique to the agency. The
department may accept or require modification of such agency proposals
or the department may reject such agency proposals and require use of
the model process and procedures established under this subsection.
Any process and procedures developed under this subsection shall
require (i) distinct and identifiable phases upon which funding may be
based, (ii) user validation of products through system demonstrations
and testing of prototypes and deliverables, and (iii) other elements
identified by the board.
The director may terminate a major project if the director
determines that the project is not meeting or is not expected to meet
anticipated performance standards.
(2) The office of financial management shall establish policies and
standards consistent with portfolio-based information technology
management to govern the funding of projects developed under this
section. The policies and standards shall provide for:
(a) Funding of a project under terms and conditions mutually agreed
to by the director, the director of financial management, and the head
of the agency proposing the project. However, the office of financial
management may require incremental funding of a project on a phase-by-phase basis whereby funds for a given phase of a project may be
released only when the office of financial management determines, with
the advice of the department, that the previous phase is satisfactorily
completed;
(b) Acceptance testing of products to assure that products perform
satisfactorily before they are accepted and final payment is made; and
(c) Other elements deemed necessary by the office of financial
management.
(3)(a) The department shall evaluate projects based on the
demonstrated business needs and benefits; cost; technology scope and
feasibility; impact on the agency's information technology portfolio
and on the statewide infrastructure; and final project implementation
plan based upon available funding.
(b) Copies of project evaluations conducted under this subsection
shall be submitted to the office of financial management and the
chairs, ranking minority members, and staff coordinators of the
appropriations committees of the senate and house of representatives.
(c) If there are projects that receive funding from a
transportation fund or account, copies of those projects' evaluations
conducted under this subsection must be submitted to the chairs and
ranking minority members of the transportation committees of the senate
and the house of representatives.
(4) For the 2009-2011 biennium, the following limitations are
established upon information technology procurement:
(a) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, state agencies
are not permitted to purchase or implement new information technology
projects without securing prior authorization from the office of
financial management. The office of financial management may only
approve information technology projects that contribute towards an
enterprise strategy or meet a critical, localized need of the
requesting agency.
(b) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, state agencies
are not permitted to purchase servers, virtualization software, data
storage, or related software through their operational funds or through
a separate information technology budget item without securing prior
authorization from the office of financial management. The office of
financial management shall grant approval only if the purchase is
consistent with the state's overall migration strategy to the state
data center and critical to the operation of the agency.
(c) State agencies may purchase new information technology projects
or servers without securing prior authorization from the office of
financial management if the purchase by the agency is needed to address
an immediate and compelling threat to public safety.
(d) For the purposes of this subsection (4), "state agency" means
any office, department, board, commission, or other unit of state
government, but does not include a unit of state government headed by
a statewide elected official, an institution of higher education as
defined in RCW 28B.10.016, the state board for community and technical
colleges, or agencies of the legislative or judicial branches of state
government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.88 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As part of the biennial budget process, the office of financial
management shall collect from agencies, and agencies shall provide,
information to produce reports, summaries, and budget detail sufficient
to allow review, analysis, and documentation of all current and
proposed expenditures for information technology by state agencies.
Information technology budget detail must be included as part of the
budget submittal documentation required pursuant to RCW 43.88.030.
(2) The office of financial management must collect, and present as
part of the biennial budget documentation, information for all existing
information technology projects as defined by information services
board policy. The office of financial management must work with the
department of information services to maximize the ability to draw this
information from the information technology portfolio management data
collected by the department of information services pursuant to RCW
43.105.170. Connecting project information collected through the
portfolio management process with financial data developed under
subsection (1) of this section provides transparency regarding
expenditure data for existing technology projects.
(3) The biennial budget documentation submitted by the office of
financial management pursuant to RCW 43.88.030 must include an
information technology plan identifying proposed large information
technology projects. This plan must be presented using a method
similar to the capital budget, identifying project costs through stages
of the project and across fiscal periods and biennia from project
initiation to implementation. This information must be submitted
electronically, in a format to be determined by the office of financial
management and the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee.
(4) The office of financial management shall also institute a
method of accounting for information technology-related expenditures,
including creating common definitions for what constitutes an
information technology investment.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.88.560 and 1992 c 20 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director of financial management shall establish policies and
standards governing the funding of major information technology
projects as required under RCW 43.105.190(2). The director of
financial management shall also direct the collection of additional
information on information technology projects and submit an
information technology plan as required under section 4 of this act.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.105.041 and 2009 c 486 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall have the following powers and duties related to
information services:
(a) To develop standards and procedures governing the acquisition
and disposition of equipment, proprietary software and purchased
services, licensing of the radio spectrum by or on behalf of state
agencies, and confidentiality of computerized data. The board shall
coordinate with the office of financial management to develop
contracting standards for information technology acquisition and
purchased services and must work with state agencies to ensure
deployment of standardized contracts;
(b) To purchase, lease, rent, or otherwise acquire, dispose of, and
maintain equipment, proprietary software, and purchased services, or to
delegate to other agencies and institutions of state government, under
appropriate standards, the authority to purchase, lease, rent, or
otherwise acquire, dispose of, and maintain equipment, proprietary
software, and purchased services: PROVIDED, That, agencies and
institutions of state government are expressly prohibited from
acquiring or disposing of equipment, proprietary software, and
purchased services without such delegation of authority. The
acquisition and disposition of equipment, proprietary software, and
purchased services is exempt from RCW 43.19.1919 and, as provided in
RCW 43.19.1901, from the provisions of RCW 43.19.190 through 43.19.200,
except that the board, the department, and state agencies, as
delegated, must post notices of technology procurement bids on the
state's common vendor registration and bid notification system. This
subsection (1)(b) does not apply to the legislative branch;
(c) To develop statewide or interagency technical policies,
standards, and procedures;
(d) To review and approve standards and common specifications for
new or expanded telecommunications networks proposed by agencies,
public postsecondary education institutions, educational service
districts, or statewide or regional providers of K-12 information
technology services, and to assure the cost-effective development and
incremental implementation of a statewide video telecommunications
system to serve: Public schools; educational service districts;
vocational-technical institutes; community colleges; colleges and
universities; state and local government; and the general public
through public affairs programming;
(e) To provide direction concerning strategic planning goals and
objectives for the state. The board shall seek input from the
legislature and the judiciary;
(f) To develop and implement a process for the resolution of
appeals by:
(i) Vendors concerning the conduct of an acquisition process by an
agency or the department; or
(ii) A customer agency concerning the provision of services by the
department or by other state agency providers;
(g) To establish policies for the periodic review by the department
of agency performance which may include but are not limited to analysis
of:
(i) Planning, management, control, and use of information services;
(ii) Training and education; and
(iii) Project management;
(h) To set its meeting schedules and convene at scheduled times, or
meet at the request of a majority of its members, the chair, or the
director;
(i) To review and approve that portion of the ((department's))
budget ((requests)) that ((provides for)) may provide independent,
technical staff support to the board; and
(j) To develop procurement policies and procedures, such as
unbundled contracting and subcontracting, that encourage and facilitate
the purchase of products and services by state agencies and
institutions from Washington small businesses to the maximum extent
practicable and consistent with international trade agreement
commitments.
(2) Statewide technical standards to promote and facilitate
electronic information sharing and access are an essential component of
acceptable and reliable public access service and complement content-related standards designed to meet those goals. The board shall:
(a) Establish technical standards to facilitate electronic access
to government information and interoperability of information systems,
including wireless communications systems. Local governments are
strongly encouraged to follow the standards established by the board;
and
(b) Require agencies to consider electronic public access needs
when planning new information systems or major upgrades of systems.
In developing these standards, the board is encouraged to include
the state library, state archives, and appropriate representatives of
state and local government.
(3)(a) The board, in consultation with the K-20 board, has the duty
to govern, operate, and oversee the technical design, implementation,
and operation of the K-20 network including, but not limited to, the
following duties: Establishment and implementation of K-20 network
technical policy, including technical standards and conditions of use;
review and approval of network design; procurement of shared network
services and equipment; and resolving user/provider disputes concerning
technical matters. The board shall delegate general operational and
technical oversight to the K-20 network technical steering committee as
appropriate.
(b) The board has the authority to adopt rules under chapter 34.05
RCW to implement the provisions regarding the technical operations and
conditions of use of the K-20 network.
(4) The board shall review all information technology efforts under
its purview based on independent technical and financial information,
regardless of whether the projects or services are being provided by
public or private providers. This review must be conducted by
independent, technical staff support, subject to funds appropriated for
this specific purpose.
(5) In reviewing these efforts, the board, in consultation with the
office of financial management, shall review state agency information
technology budgets. The board may acquire project management
assistance to assist in its efforts under this act.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.105.180 and 1999 c 80 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Upon request of the office of financial management,)) (1) The
department, in coordination with the information services board and the
office of financial management, shall evaluate agency budget requests
for major information technology projects identified under RCW
43.105.190, including those proposed by the superintendent of public
instruction, in conjunction with educational service districts, or
statewide or regional providers of K-12 education information
technology services. The department shall submit recommendations for
funding all or part of such requests to the office of financial
management and to the chairs, ranking minority members, and staff
coordinators of the appropriations committees of the senate and house
of representatives. The department shall also submit recommendations
regarding consolidation of similar proposals or other efficiencies it
finds in reviewing proposals.
(2) The department, with the advice and approval of the office of
financial management and the information services board, shall
establish criteria, consistent with portfolio-based information
technology management, for the evaluation of agency budget requests
under this section. These budget requests shall be made in the context
of an agency's information technology portfolio; technology initiatives
underlying budget requests are subject to board review. Criteria shall
include, but not be limited to: Feasibility of the proposed projects,
consistency with the state strategic information technology plan,
consistency with information technology portfolios, appropriate
provision for public electronic access to information, evidence of
business process streamlining and gathering of business and technical
requirements, and services, costs, and benefits.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "state agency" includes every
state office, department, division, bureau, board, commission, or other
state agency, including offices headed by a statewide elected official,
and offices in the legislative and judicial branches of state
government, notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 44.68.105.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.105.160 and 2005 c 319 s 110 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall prepare a state strategic information
technology plan which shall establish a statewide mission, goals, and
objectives for the use of information technology, including goals for
electronic access to government records, information, and services.
The plan shall be developed in accordance with the standards and
policies established by the board and shall be submitted to the board
for review, modification as necessary, and approval. The department
shall seek the advice of the board in the development of this plan.
The plan approved under this section shall be updated as necessary
and submitted to the governor and the chairs and ranking minority
members of the appropriations committees of the senate and the house of
representatives.
(2) The department shall prepare a biennial state performance
report on information technology based on agency performance reports
required under RCW 43.105.170 and other information deemed appropriate
by the department. The report shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) An analysis, based upon agency portfolios, of the state's
information technology infrastructure, including its value, condition,
and capacity;
(b) An evaluation of performance relating to information
technology;
(c) An assessment of progress made toward implementing the state
strategic information technology plan, including progress toward
electronic access to public information and enabling citizens to have
two-way access to public records, information, and services;
(d) An analysis of the success or failure, feasibility, progress,
costs, and timeliness of implementation of major information technology
projects under RCW 43.105.190. At a minimum, the portion of the report
regarding major technology projects must include:
(i) Final total cost of ownership budget data for the entire life-cycle of the project, including capital and operational costs, broken
down by staffing costs, contracted service, hardware purchase or lease,
software purchase or lease, travel, and training. The original budget
must also be shown for comparison;
(ii) The original proposed project schedule and the final actual
project schedule;
(iii) Data regarding progress towards meeting the original goals
and performance measures of the project, particularly as it relates to
operating budget savings;
(iv) Discussion of lessons learned on the project, performance of
any contractors used, and reasons for project delays or cost increases;
and
(((e))) (v) Identification of benefits, cost avoidance, and cost
savings generated by major information technology projects developed
under RCW 43.105.190; and
(((f))) (e) An inventory of state information services, equipment,
and proprietary software.
Copies of the report shall be distributed biennially to the
governor and the chairs and ranking minority members of the
appropriations committees of the senate and the house of
representatives. The major technology section of the report must
examine major information technology projects completed in the previous
biennium to determine the performance of the implementing agency, cost
and value effectiveness, and timeliness and other performance metrics
necessary to assess the quality and value of the investment. The
report must also examine projects two years after completion for
progress toward meeting performance goals and operating budget savings.
The first report is due December 15, 2011, and every two years
thereafter.
(3) The legislative and judicial branches are encouraged to develop
information technology portfolios consistent with the provisions of RCW
43.105.172 and to prepare and submit to the department a biennial
performance report consistent with the provisions of RCW 43.105.170.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board, in consultation with the department and the office
of financial management, shall develop an enterprise-based strategy for
information technology in state government informed by information
technology expenditure information collected from state agencies
pursuant to section 4 of this act.
(2) In developing an enterprise-based strategy for the state, the
board is encouraged to consider the following strategies as possible
opportunities for achieving greater efficiency:
(a) Developing personal computer replacement policies for the
state, with consideration given to alternative models of personal
computer usage for state government use, such as thin client, software
as a service, browser-based functionality, mobile computing, and other
models that are less dependent upon traditional computing;
(b) Pursuing shared services initiatives across functional areas,
which may include services such as e-mail, telephony, and data storage;
(c) Pursuing pilot programs, such as a pilot to demonstrate the
value of application management services, to identify opportunities to
achieve operational efficiencies;
(d) Developing data storage policies and record retention
requirements and schedules for state agencies, in consultation with the
office of the secretary of state, the state archivist, and the state
records committee, where appropriate;
(e) Reviewing existing software maintenance contracts to identify
opportunities to renegotiate the price of those contracts or the level
of service; and
(f) Partnering with private providers for commonly utilized
information technology products and services.
(3) The legislative and judicial branches are encouraged to
coordinate with, and participate in, shared services initiatives, pilot
programs, and development of the enterprise-based strategy, where
appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) The office of financial management,
with the assistance of the department of information services, must
identify areas of potential savings that will achieve the savings
identified in the omnibus appropriations act. These areas shall
include, but not be limited to, wireless service, telephony, desktop
computers, electronic mail services, and data storage.
(2) The office of financial management shall work with the
appropriate state agencies, including the department of information
services, to generate savings that arise pursuant to this act from the
improved acquisition and delivery of information technology products
and services. To accomplish this objective, state agencies must
provide timely, accurate total cost of ownership data to the office of
financial management upon request regarding information technology
products and services. The savings must be at least equal to those
specified in the omnibus appropriations act. The office of financial
management shall reduce agency allotments by the amounts specified in
the omnibus appropriations act to reflect these savings. The allotment
reductions shall be placed in unallotted status and remain unexpended.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "state agency" means any
office, department, board, commission, or other unit of state
government, but does not include a unit of state government headed by
a statewide elected official, an institution of higher education as
defined in RCW 28B.10.016, the state board for community and technical
colleges, or agencies of the legislative or judicial branches of state
government.
(4) This section expires June 30, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 43.105
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The department, in collaboration with state agencies, shall
conduct an inventory from existing data sets of information technology
assets owned or leased by state agencies. This inventory must be used
to inform the development of a state information technology asset
management process. Prior to implementation of any state information
technology asset management process, the department must submit its
recommended approach, including an estimate of the associated
implementation costs, to the board for approval.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "state agency" includes every
state office, department, division, bureau, board, commission, or other
state agency, including offices headed by a statewide elected official,
and offices in the legislative and judicial branches of state
government, notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 44.68.105.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) The office of financial management, in
consultation with the department of information services and the
information services board, shall develop and execute a pilot program
to contract with one or more private providers for the delivery,
support, maintenance, and operation of information technology through
application managed services or other similar programs across one or
more functional areas of information technology, or for the information
technology needs of one or more state agencies. In selecting a private
provider for the pilot program, the office of financial management must
engage in a competitive bid process or request for proposals process.
(2) The objective of the pilot program will be to assess: (a) Each
agency's information technology application portfolio; (b)
opportunities to use best practices and tools; and (c) whether the
agency should proceed with application managed services or other
similar programs based on the results of the assessment.
(3) The department of information services and the office of
financial management shall prepare a report of the findings of the
pilot assessments by September 1, 2010, and a final report of the pilot
results by June 30, 2011. The final report must include the following:
Identification of short and long-term costs, risks, benefits, and other
organizational impacts of implementing application managed services or
other similar programs within the pilot agencies. The final report
must also identify opportunities for other state agencies to benefit
from application managed services or other similar programs. The
results of the pilot program must be provided to the information
services board, the governor, the senate committee on ways and means,
and the house of representatives committee on ways and means.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The department of information services
shall, by November 1, 2010, report on the efforts to develop a
centralized information project management office pursuant to section
142, chapter 522, Laws of 2007. The report shall address the current
status of the effort, lessons learned, and recommended changes to the
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 (1) The office of financial management
shall contract with an independent consultant to:
(a) Conduct a technical and financial analysis of the state's plan
for the consolidated state data center and office building; and
(b) Develop a strategic business plan outlining the various options
for use of the site that maximize taxpayer value consistent with the
terms of the finance lease and related agreements.
(2) The analysis must consist of, at a minimum, an assessment of
the following issues:
(a) The total capital and operational costs for the proposed data
center and office building;
(b) The occupancy rate for the consolidated state data center, as
compared to total capacity, that will result in revenue exceeding total
capital and operating expenses;
(c) The potential reallocation of resources that could result from
the consolidation of state data centers and office space; and
(d) The potential return on investment for the consolidated state
data center and office building that may be realized without impairing
any existing contractual rights under the terms of the financing lease
and related agreements.
(3) This review must build upon the analysis and migration strategy
for the consolidated state data center being prepared for the
department of information services.
(4) The strategic plan must be submitted to the governor and the
legislature by December 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 (1) The department of information services
and the office of financial management shall review existing statutes,
procedures, data, and organizational structures to identify
opportunities to increase efficiency, customer service, and
transparency in information technology. This effort shall include:
(a) Identifying and addressing financial data needed to
comprehensively evaluate information technology spending from an
enterprise perspective;
(b) A review of best practices in information technology
governance, including private sector practices and lessons learned from
other states; and
(c) A review of existing statutes regarding information technology
governance, standards, and financing to identify inconsistencies
between current law and best practices.
(2) The department of information services and the office of
financial management shall report findings and recommendations to the
governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December
1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 RCW 43.105.017 (Legislative intent) and
1992 c 20 s 6, 1990 c 208 s 2, & 1987 c 504 s 2 are each repealed.

--- END ---