BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.14.450 and 2009 c 551 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A county legislative authority may submit an authorizing
proposition to the county voters at a primary or general election and,
if the proposition is approved by a majority of persons voting, impose
a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The
title of each ballot measure must clearly state the purposes for which
the proposed sales and use tax will be used. ((Funds raised under this
tax shall not supplant existing funds used for these purposes, except
as follows: Up to one hundred percent may be used to supplant existing
funding in calendar year 2010; up to eighty percent may be used to
supplant existing funding in calendar year 2011; up to sixty percent
may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar year 2012; up to
forty percent may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar year
2013; and up to twenty percent may be used to supplant existing funding
in calendar year 2014. For purposes of this subsection, existing funds
means the actual operating expenditures for the calendar year in which
the ballot measure is approved by voters. Actual operating
expenditures excludes lost federal funds, lost or expired state grants
or loans, extraordinary events not likely to reoccur, changes in
contract provisions beyond the control of the county or city receiving
the services, and major nonrecurring capital expenditures.)) The rate
of tax under this section may not exceed three-tenths of one percent of
the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the article
used, in the case of a use tax.
(2)(a) A city legislative authority may submit an authorizing
proposition to the city voters at a primary or general election and, if
the proposition is approved by a majority of persons voting, impose a
sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The
title of each ballot measure must clearly state the purposes for which
the proposed sales and use tax will be used. The title of each ballot
measure must clearly state the purposes for which the proposed sales
and use tax will be used. The rate of tax under this subsection may
not exceed one-tenth of one percent of the selling price in the case of
a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of a use tax.
A city may not begin imposing a tax approved by the voters under this
subsection prior to January 1, 2011.
(b) If a county adopts an ordinance or resolution to submit a
ballot proposition to the voters to impose the sales and use tax under
subsection (1) of this section prior to a city within the county
adopting an ordinance or resolution to submit a ballot proposition to
the voters to impose the tax under this subsection, the rate of tax by
the city under this subsection may not exceed an amount that would
cause the total county and city tax rate under this section to exceed
three-tenths of one percent. This subsection (2)(b) also applies if
the county and city adopt an ordinance or resolution to impose sales
and use taxes under this section on the same date.
(c) If the city adopts an ordinance or resolution to impose the
sales and use tax under this subsection prior to the county in which
the city is located, the county must provide a credit against its tax
under subsection (1) of this section for the city tax under this
subsection to the extent the total county and city tax rate under this
section would exceed three-tenths of one percent.
(3) The tax authorized in this section is in addition to any other
taxes authorized by law and must be collected from those persons who
are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within the county.
(((3))) (4) The retail sale or use of motor vehicles, and the lease
of motor vehicles for up to the first thirty-six months of the lease,
are exempt from tax imposed under this section.
(((4))) (5) One-third of all money received under this section must
be used solely for criminal justice purposes, fire protection purposes,
or both. For the purposes of this subsection, "criminal justice
purposes" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.14.340.
(((5))) (6) Money received by a county under subsection (1) of this
section must be shared between the county and the cities as follows:
Sixty percent must be retained by the county and forty percent must be
distributed on a per capita basis to cities in the county.
(7) Tax proceeds received by a city imposing a tax under this
section must be shared between the county and city as follows: Fifteen
percent must be distributed to the county and eighty-five percent is
retained by the city.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.14.460 and 2009 c 551 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) (a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a county
legislative authority may authorize, fix, and impose a sales and use
tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter.
(b) Any city with a population over two hundred thousand and
located in a county with a population over eight hundred thousand may
authorize, fix, and impose the sales and use tax in lieu of the county
if the county has not imposed the tax authorized under (a) of this
subsection by January 1, 2011. If a city imposes the tax under this
subsection (1)(b) the county within which the city is located may not
impose the tax authorized under (a) of this subsection.
(2) The tax authorized in this section ((shall be)) is in addition
to any other taxes authorized by law and ((shall)) must be collected
from those persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08
and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the
county. The rate of tax ((shall)) equals one-tenth of one percent of
the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the article
used, in the case of a use tax.
(3) Moneys collected under this section ((shall)) must be used
solely for the purpose of providing for the operation or delivery of
chemical dependency or mental health treatment programs and services
and for the operation or delivery of therapeutic court programs and
services. For the purposes of this section, "programs and services"
includes, but is not limited to, treatment services, case management,
and housing that are a component of a coordinated chemical dependency
or mental health treatment program or service.
(4) All moneys collected under this section must be used solely for
the purpose of providing new or expanded programs and services as
provided in this section, except a portion of moneys collected under
this section may be used to supplant existing funding for these
purposes in any county as follows: Up to fifty percent may be used to
supplant existing funding in calendar year 2010; up to forty percent
may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar year 2011; up to
thirty percent may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar
year 2012; up to twenty percent may be used to supplant existing
funding in calendar year 2013; and up to ten percent may be used to
supplant existing funding in calendar year 2014.
(5) Nothing in this section may be interpreted to prohibit the use
of moneys collected under this section for the replacement of lapsed
federal funding previously provided for the operation or delivery of
services and programs as provided in this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.14.340 and 1995 c 309 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislative authority of any county may fix and impose a sales
and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter, provided that
such sales and use tax is subject to repeal by referendum, using the
procedures provided in RCW 82.14.036. The referendum procedure
provided in RCW 82.14.036 is the exclusive method for subjecting any
county sales and use tax ordinance or resolution to a referendum vote.
The tax authorized in this section shall be in addition to any
other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons
who are taxable by the state pursuant to chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW
upon the occurrence of any taxable event within such county. The rate
of tax shall equal one-tenth of one percent of the selling price (in
the case of a sales tax) or value of the article used (in the case of
a use tax).
When distributing moneys collected under this section, the state
treasurer shall distribute ten percent of the moneys to the county in
which the tax was collected. The remainder of the moneys collected
under this section shall be distributed to the county and the cities
within the county ratably based on population as last determined by the
office of financial management. In making the distribution based on
population, the county shall receive that proportion that the
unincorporated population of the county bears to the total population
of the county and each city shall receive that proportion that the city
incorporated population bears to the total county population.
Moneys received from any tax imposed under this section shall be
expended ((exclusively)) for criminal justice purposes ((and shall not
be used to replace or supplant existing funding)). Criminal justice
purposes are defined as activities that substantially assist the
criminal justice system, which may include circumstances where
ancillary benefit to the civil justice system occurs, and which
include((s)) human services, domestic violence services such as those
provided by domestic violence programs, community advocates, and legal
advocates, as defined in RCW 70.123.020. ((Existing funding for
purposes of this subsection is defined as calendar year 1989 actual
operating expenditures for criminal justice purposes. Calendar year
1989 actual operating expenditures for criminal justice purposes
exclude the following: Expenditures for extraordinary events not
likely to reoccur, changes in contract provisions for criminal justice
services, beyond the control of the local jurisdiction receiving the
services, and major nonrecurring capital expenditures.))
In the expenditure of funds for criminal justice purposes as
provided in this section, cities and counties, or any combination
thereof, are expressly authorized to participate in agreements,
pursuant to chapter 39.34 RCW, to jointly expend funds for criminal
justice purposes of mutual benefit. Such criminal justice purposes of
mutual benefit include, but are not limited to, the construction,
improvement, and expansion of jails, court facilities, ((and)) juvenile
justice facilities, and services with ancillary benefits to the civil
justice system.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.12.010 and 2009 c 535 s 304 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Purchase price" means the same as sales price as defined in
RCW 82.08.010;
(2)(a) "Value of the article used" shall be the purchase price for
the article of tangible personal property, the use of which is taxable
under this chapter. The term also includes, in addition to the
purchase price, the amount of any tariff or duty paid with respect to
the importation of the article used. In case the article used is
acquired by lease or by gift or is extracted, produced, or manufactured
by the person using the same or is sold under conditions wherein the
purchase price does not represent the true value thereof, the value of
the article used ((shall be)) is determined as nearly as possible
according to the retail selling price at place of use of similar
products of like quality and character under such rules as the
department may prescribe.
(b) In case the articles used are acquired by bailment, the value
of the use of the articles so used ((shall)) must be in an amount
representing a reasonable rental for the use of the articles so bailed,
determined as nearly as possible according to the value of such use at
the places of use of similar products of like quality and character
under such rules as the department of revenue may prescribe. In case
any such articles of tangible personal property are used in respect to
the construction, repairing, decorating, or improving of, and which
become or are to become an ingredient or component of, new or existing
buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or
for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city
housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing or attaching of any such articles therein or thereto,
whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by
virtue of installation, then the value of the use of such articles so
used ((shall be)) is determined according to the retail selling price
of such articles, or in the absence of such a selling price, as nearly
as possible according to the retail selling price at place of use of
similar products of like quality and character or, in the absence of
either of these selling price measures, such value may be determined
upon a cost basis, in any event under such rules as the department of
revenue may prescribe.
(c) In the case of articles owned by a user engaged in business
outside the state which are brought into the state for no more than one
hundred eighty days in any period of three hundred sixty-five
consecutive days and which are temporarily used for business purposes
by the person in this state, the value of the article used ((shall))
must be an amount representing a reasonable rental for the use of the
articles, unless the person has paid tax under this chapter or chapter
82.08 RCW upon the full value of the article used, as defined in (a) of
this subsection.
(d) In the case of articles manufactured or produced by the user
and used in the manufacture or production of products sold or to be
sold to the department of defense of the United States, the value of
the articles used ((shall be)) is determined according to the value of
the ingredients of such articles.
(e) In the case of an article manufactured or produced for purposes
of serving as a prototype for the development of a new or improved
product, the value of the article used ((shall be)) is determined by:
(i) The retail selling price of such new or improved product when first
offered for sale; or (ii) the value of materials incorporated into the
prototype in cases in which the new or improved product is not offered
for sale.
(f) In the case of an article purchased with a direct pay permit
under RCW 82.32.087, the value of the article used ((shall be)) is
determined by the purchase price of such article if, but for the use of
the direct pay permit, the transaction would have been subject to sales
tax;
(3) "Value of the service used" means the purchase price for the
digital automated service or other service, the use of which is taxable
under this chapter. If the service is received by gift or under
conditions wherein the purchase price does not represent the true value
thereof, the value of the service used ((shall be)) is determined as
nearly as possible according to the retail selling price at place of
use of similar services of like quality and character under rules the
department may prescribe;
(4) "Value of the extended warranty used" means the purchase price
for the extended warranty, the use of which is taxable under this
chapter. If the extended warranty is received by gift or under
conditions wherein the purchase price does not represent the true value
of the extended warranty, the value of the extended warranty used
((shall be)) is determined as nearly as possible according to the
retail selling price at place of use of similar extended warranties of
like quality and character under rules the department may prescribe;
(5) "Value of the digital good or digital code used" means the
purchase price for the digital good or digital code, the use of which
is taxable under this chapter. If the digital good or digital code is
acquired other than by purchase, the value of the digital good or
digital code must be determined as nearly as possible according to the
retail selling price at place of use of similar digital goods or
digital codes of like quality and character under rules the department
may prescribe;
(6) "Use," "used," "using," or "put to use" have their ordinary
meaning, and mean:
(a) With respect to tangible personal property, except for natural
gas and manufactured gas, the first act within this state by which the
taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or control over the article of
tangible personal property (as a consumer), and include installation,
storage, withdrawal from storage, distribution, or any other act
preparatory to subsequent actual use or consumption within this state;
(b) With respect to a service defined in RCW 82.04.050(2)(a), the
first act within this state after the service has been performed by
which the taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or control over the
article of tangible personal property upon which the service was
performed (as a consumer), and includes installation, storage,
withdrawal from storage, distribution, or any other act preparatory to
subsequent actual use or consumption of the article within this state;
(c) With respect to an extended warranty, the first act within this
state after the extended warranty has been acquired by which the
taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or control over the article of
tangible personal property to which the extended warranty applies, and
includes installation, storage, withdrawal from storage, distribution,
or any other act preparatory to subsequent actual use or consumption of
the article within this state;
(d) With respect to a digital good or digital code, the first act
within this state by which the taxpayer, as a consumer, views,
accesses, downloads, possesses, stores, opens, manipulates, or
otherwise uses or enjoys the digital good or digital code;
(e) With respect to a digital automated service, the first act
within this state by which the taxpayer, as a consumer, uses, enjoys,
or otherwise receives the benefit of the service;
(f) With respect to a service defined as a retail sale in RCW
82.04.050(6)(b), the first act within this state by which the taxpayer,
as a consumer, accesses the prewritten computer software; ((and))
(g) With respect to a service defined as a retail sale in RCW
82.04.050(2)(g), the first act within this state after the service has
been performed by which the taxpayer, as a consumer, views, accesses,
downloads, possesses, stores, opens, manipulates, or otherwise uses or
enjoys the digital good upon which the service was performed; and
(h) With respect to natural gas or manufactured gas, the use of
which is taxable under RCW 82.12.022, including gas that is also
taxable under the authority of RCW 82.14.230, the first act within this
state by which the taxpayer consumes the gas by burning the gas or
storing the gas in the taxpayer's own facilities for later consumption
by the taxpayer;
(7) "Taxpayer" and "purchaser" include all persons included within
the meaning of the word "buyer" and the word "consumer" as defined in
chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW;
(8)(a)(i) Except as provided in (a)(ii) of this subsection (8),
"retailer" means every seller as defined in RCW 82.08.010 and every
person engaged in the business of selling tangible personal property at
retail and every person required to collect from purchasers the tax
imposed under this chapter.
(ii) "Retailer" does not include a professional employer
organization when a covered employee coemployed with the client under
the terms of a professional employer agreement engages in activities
that constitute a sale of tangible personal property, extended
warranty, digital good, digital code, or a sale of any digital
automated service or service defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050
(2) (a) or (g), (3)(a), or (6)(b) that is subject to the tax imposed by
this chapter. In such cases, the client, and not the professional
employer organization, is deemed to be the retailer and is responsible
for collecting and remitting the tax imposed by this chapter.
(b) For the purposes of (a) of this subsection, the terms "client,"
"covered employee," "professional employer agreement," and
"professional employer organization" have the same meanings as in RCW
82.04.540;
(9) "Extended warranty" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.04.050(7);
(10) The meaning ascribed to words and phrases in chapters 82.04
and 82.08 RCW, insofar as applicable, ((shall have)) has full force and
effect with respect to taxes imposed under the provisions of this
chapter. "Consumer," in addition to the meaning ascribed to it in
chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW insofar as applicable, ((shall)) also
means any person who distributes or displays, or causes to be
distributed or displayed, any article of tangible personal property,
except newspapers, the primary purpose of which is to promote the sale
of products or services. With respect to property distributed to
persons within this state by a consumer as defined in this subsection
(10), the use of the property shall be deemed to be by such consumer.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.14.230 and 1989 c 384 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governing body of any city, while not required by
legislative mandate to do so, may, by resolution or ordinance for the
purposes authorized by this chapter, fix and impose on every person a
use tax for the privilege of using natural gas or manufactured gas in
the city as a consumer.
(2) The tax ((shall be)) is imposed in an amount equal to the value
of the article used by the taxpayer multiplied by the rate in effect
for the tax on natural gas businesses under RCW 35.21.870 in the city
in which the article is used. The "value of the article used," does
not include any amounts that are paid for the hire or use of a natural
gas business in transporting the gas subject to tax under this
subsection if those amounts are subject to tax under RCW 35.21.870.
(3) The tax imposed under this section ((shall)) does not apply to
the use of natural or manufactured gas if the person who sold the gas
to the consumer has paid a tax under RCW 35.21.870 with respect to the
gas for which exemption is sought under this subsection.
(4) There ((shall be)) is a credit against the tax levied under
this section in an amount equal to any tax paid by:
(a) The person who sold the gas to the consumer when that tax is a
gross receipts tax similar to that imposed pursuant to RCW 35.21.870 by
another ((state)) municipality or other unit of local government with
respect to the gas for which a credit is sought under this subsection;
or
(b) The person consuming the gas upon which a use tax similar to
the tax imposed by this section was paid to another ((state))
municipality or other unit of local government with respect to the gas
for which a credit is sought under this subsection.
(5) The use tax ((hereby)) imposed ((shall)) must be paid by the
consumer. The administration and collection of the tax ((hereby))
imposed ((shall be)) is pursuant to RCW 82.14.050.

Sec. 6 RCW 9.46.113 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 166 s 11 are each
amended to read as follows:
Any county, city or town which collects a tax on gambling
activities authorized pursuant to RCW 9.46.110 shall use the revenue
from such tax primarily for the purpose of ((enforcement of the
provisions of this chapter by the county, city or town law enforcement
agency)) public safety.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 2009 c 551 s 12 (uncodified) is hereby
repealed.

--- END ---