BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW
to read as follows:
Under Article IX, section 1 of the state Constitution, it is the
paramount duty of the state to make ample provision for the education
of all of Washington's children. According to the state supreme court,
this constitutional provision requires that the legislature define and
fully fund a program of K-12 basic education before the legislature
funds any other statutory programs. For these reasons, it is the
intent of the legislature to require that all appropriations for K-12
basic education, together with appropriations for other K-12 education
programs, be enacted into law before the legislature takes executive
action on other omnibus appropriations legislation.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.150.380 and 2009 c 479 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state legislature shall, at each regular session in an odd-numbered year, appropriate from the state general fund for the current
use of the common schools such amounts as needed for state support to
the common schools during the ensuing biennium as provided in this
chapter, RCW 28A.160.150 through 28A.160.210, 28A.300.170, and
28A.500.010.
(2) The state legislature shall also, at each regular session in an
odd-numbered year, appropriate from the general fund and education
construction fund for the purposes of and in accordance with the
provisions of the student achievement act during the ensuing biennium.
(3) Beginning with appropriations for the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium
and thereafter, appropriations for the purposes of this section and
other K-12 education purposes must be made in legislation that is
separate from the omnibus operating appropriations act. Such
appropriations must be enacted into law before it is in order for
either house of the legislature to take executive action on omnibus
operating appropriations legislation.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.150.380 and 2009 c 548 s 110 and 2009 c 479 s 16
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The state legislature shall, at each regular session in an odd-numbered year, appropriate for the current use of the common schools
such amounts as needed for state support to school districts during the
ensuing biennium for the program of basic education under RCW
28A.150.200.
(2) In addition to those state funds provided to school districts
for basic education, the legislature may appropriate funds to be
distributed to school districts for other factors and for other special
programs to enhance or enrich the program of basic education.
(3) The state legislature shall also, at each regular session in an
odd-numbered year, appropriate from the general fund and education
construction fund for the purposes of and in accordance with the
provisions of the student achievement act during the ensuing biennium.
(4) Beginning with appropriations for the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium
and thereafter, appropriations for the purposes of this section and
other K-12 education purposes must be made in legislation that is
separate from the omnibus operating appropriations act. Such
appropriations must be enacted into law before it is in order for
either house of the legislature to take executive action on omnibus
operating appropriations legislation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning with appropriations for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium and
thereafter, appropriations for the purposes of RCW 28A.150.380 and
other K-12 education purposes must be enacted into law before it is in
order for either house of the legislature to take executive action on
omnibus operating or transportation appropriations legislation.
The house of representatives and senate, jointly or separately, may
adopt rules or resolutions to implement their respective
responsibilities under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 2 of this act expires September 1,
2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) This act takes effect as provided for in
this section, if the proposed amendment to Article IX of the state
Constitution HJR . . . . (H-5033.2/10) is validly submitted to and is
approved and ratified by the voters at the next general election.
(2)(a) Sections 1, 2, and 4 of this act take effect January 1,
2011.
(b) Section 3 of this act takes effect September 1, 2012.
(3) If the proposed amendment is not approved and ratified, this
act is void in its entirety.

--- END ---