BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as the clean
water act of 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The legislature finds that nonpoint
water pollution and contaminated storm water runoff is a major problem
in the state creating a significant burden on the rivers, aquifers,
lakes, streams, and marine receiving waters across Washington.
(2) The legislature recognizes that the burden of nonpoint and
storm water pollution is caused by both increased volumes of water
runoff due to the expansion of impervious surfaces and the toxic
substances that pollute the runoff. The burden of storm water and
nonpoint pollution from hazardous substances is difficult to offset
because the source of pollution is not a single physical point, but
occurs wherever the toxic substances are manufactured, used, or
consumed.
(3) The legislature finds that the federal government and the state
of Washington have identified control of pollutants in storm water
runoff through national pollutant discharge elimination system phase I
and II municipal storm water permits as a requirement for the state and
local jurisdictions. Impacts from the polluted storm water may be
prevented or controlled through retrofit projects for existing
infrastructure as well as other means.
(4) The legislature finds that resources available to offset the
direct burdens of storm water pollution by hazardous substances are
insufficient to meet existing needs. Existing funding is raised
largely by local governments and is disproportionately borne by fees
levied on individuals and property owners.
(5) Finally, the legislature finds that increasing the tax on
hazardous substances is necessary to fund programs that will offset the
burdens that pollution places on the environment and the waters of the
state.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.21.030 and 1989 c 2 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A tax is imposed on the privilege of possession of hazardous
substances in this state. The rate of the tax ((shall be)) is seven-tenths of one percent multiplied by the wholesale value of the
substance.
(b) Beginning May 1, 2010, an additional tax is imposed on the
privilege of possession of hazardous substances in this state. The
rate of the tax is equal to one-tenth of one percent multiplied by the
wholesale value of the substance. Beginning July 1, 2011, and each
July 1st thereafter, the rate of tax under this subsection (1)(b) shall
be increased by one-tenth of one percent until the rate of tax under
this subsection (1)(b) is equal to four-tenths of one percent.
(2)(a) Moneys collected under ((this chapter shall)) subsection
(1)(a) of this section must be deposited in the toxics control accounts
under RCW 70.105D.070 and expended in accordance with the purposes
stated therein.
(b) Moneys collected under subsection (1)(b) of this section shall
be deposited as follows: (i) Eighty-four percent must be deposited in
the storm water account created in section 4 of this act; (ii) four
percent must be deposited into the Puget Sound recovery account to be
used as required under section 6 of this act; (iii) two percent must be
deposited in the state oil spill prevention account; and (iv) ten
percent must be deposited into the motor vehicle account to be used as
required under section 5 of this act.
(3) Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the tax imposed in this chapter.
The tax due dates, reporting periods, and return requirements
applicable to chapter 82.04 RCW apply equally to the tax imposed in
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The storm water account is created in the state treasury.
Receipts from the tax imposed under RCW 82.21.030(1)(b) must be
deposited in the account as set forth in RCW 82.21.030. Moneys in the
account are allocated to the department of ecology and may be spent
only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account must be used
on activities or projects that mitigate or prevent storm water
pollution as provided in this section.
(2)(a) After deducting the department's administrative costs of no
more than four percent of the appropriations included in the omnibus
operating and capital appropriations acts associated with administering
a competitive grant process, moneys must be distributed annually as
provided in (b) of this subsection:
(b)(i) By January 1, 2011, and by January 1st of each year
thereafter, seventy-five thousand dollars must be provided to each
jurisdiction that is subject to the national pollutant discharge
elimination system phase I or phase II requirements.
(ii) The remaining moneys must be allocated through a grant process
to local governments covered by national pollutant discharge
elimination system municipal phase I or phase II permits to fund local
government projects or activities that mitigate or prevent
contamination of storm water or the recontamination of receiving waters
previously remediated under federal or state-approved activities. To
be eligible, local governments must provide fifty percent of project or
activity costs from other nonstate fund sources. The department must
allocate eighty percent of the moneys distributed under this subsection
(2)(b)(ii) to cities with the remainder going to counties.
(3) The department must initiate the grant application process by
July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of transportation must use taxes deposited in
the motor vehicle account under RCW 82.21.030(2)(b) to fund activities
or projects that address contamination of storm water related to
transportation infrastructure through the implementation of the
department of transportation's national pollutant discharge elimination
system programs permitted under chapter 90.48 RCW. Activities and
projects that may be supported with these funds include, but are not
limited to: Construction, operation, inspection, monitoring, and
maintenance of storm water facilities; purchase, operation, and
maintenance of vactor trucks and vactor decant facilities; purchase,
maintenance, and operation of storm water management inventory,
mapping, and information systems; storm water pollution prevention plan
development and implementation; and storm water training. For the
purposes of this section, "storm water facilities" includes, but is not
limited to, ponds, biofiltration swales, storm water treatment tanks,
detention vaults, oil water separators, dry wells, catch basins, and
filters.
(2) The taxes deposited in the motor vehicle account under RCW
82.21.030(2)(b) may not be used for construction of storm water
facilities associated with new road construction. For purposes of this
section, "new roads" includes roads that are new alignments. Roads
that add to or replace an existing roadway are not "new roads."
(3) Beginning January 1, 2011, the department of transportation
must deliver a biennial report describing the use of the funds to the
governor and the appropriate legislative committees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 90.71 RCW
to read as follows:
Consistent with RCW 90.71.340, the Puget Sound partnership must use
taxes deposited in the Puget Sound recovery account as provided under
RCW 82.21.030(2)(b) to fund activities or capital projects that are
consistent with the prioritization of the 2020 action agenda.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.21.040 and 1989 c 2 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following are exempt from the tax imposed in this chapter:
(1) Any successive possession of a previously taxed hazardous
substance. If tax due under this chapter has not been paid with
respect to a hazardous substance, the department may collect the tax
from any person who has had possession of the hazardous substance. If
the tax is paid by any person other than the first person having
taxable possession of a hazardous substance, the amount of tax paid
shall constitute a debt owed by the first person having taxable
possession to the person who paid the tax.
(2) Any possession of a hazardous substance by a natural person
under circumstances where the substance is used, or is to be used, for
a personal or domestic purpose (and not for any business purpose) by
that person or a relative of, or person residing in the same dwelling
as, that person.
(3) Any possession of a hazardous substance amount which is
determined as minimal by the department of ecology and which is
possessed by a retailer for the purpose of making sales to ultimate
consumers. This exemption does not apply to pesticide or petroleum
products.
(4) Any possession of alumina or natural gas.
(5) Persons or activities which the state is prohibited from taxing
under the United States Constitution.
(6) Any persons possessing a hazardous substance where such
possession first occurred before March 1, 1989.
(7) With respect to the tax imposed under RCW 82.21.030(1)(b), any
possession of petroleum products that are exported for use or sale
outside this state as fuel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
May 1, 2010.

--- END ---