BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to relieve school
districts, cities, and counties of certain requirements imposed by the
state by revising these duties or making the duties optional rather
than mandatory.

TRUANCY MANDATES ON SCHOOL DISTRICTS
Sec. 2 RCW 28A.225.015 and 1999 c 319 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
SCHOOL DISTRICTS: TRUANCY. (1) If a parent enrolls a child who is
six or seven years of age in a public school, the child is required to
attend and that parent has the responsibility to ensure the child
attends for the full time that school is in session. An exception
shall be made to this requirement for children whose parents formally
remove them from enrollment if the child is less than eight years old
and a petition has not been filed against the parent under subsection
(3) of this section. The requirement to attend school under this
subsection does not apply to a child enrolled in a public school part-time for the purpose of receiving ancillary services. A child required
to attend school under this subsection may be temporarily excused upon
the request of his or her parent for purposes agreed upon by the school
district and parent.
(2) If a six or seven year-old child is required to attend public
school under subsection (1) of this section and that child has
unexcused absences, the public school in which the child is enrolled
((shall)) may:
(a) Inform the child's custodial parent, parents, or guardian by a
notice in writing, by e-mail, or by telephone whenever the child has
failed to attend school after one unexcused absence within any month
during the current school year;
(b) Request a conference or conferences to be conducted by
telephone or in person with the custodial parent, parents, or guardian
and child at a time reasonably convenient for all persons included for
the purpose of analyzing the causes of the child's absences after two
unexcused absences within any month during the current school year. If
a regularly scheduled parent-teacher conference day is to take place
within thirty days of the second unexcused absence, then the school
district may schedule this conference on that day; and
(c) Take steps to eliminate or reduce the child's absences. These
steps ((shall)) may include, where appropriate, adjusting the child's
school program or school or course assignment, providing more
individualized or remedial instruction, offering assistance in
enrolling the child in available alternative schools or programs, or
assisting the parent or child to obtain supplementary services that may
help eliminate or ameliorate the cause or causes for the absence from
school.
(3) If a child required to attend public school under subsection
(1) of this section has seven unexcused absences in a month or ten
unexcused absences in a school year, the school district shall file a
petition for civil action as provided in RCW 28A.225.035 against the
parent of the child.
(4) This section does not require a six or seven year old child to
enroll in a public or private school or to receive home-based
instruction. This section only applies to six or seven year old
children whose parents enroll them full time in public school and do
not formally remove them from enrollment as provided in subsection (1)
of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.225.020 and 2009 c 266 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
SCHOOL DISTRICTS: TRUANCY. (1) If a child required to attend
school under RCW 28A.225.010 fails to attend school without valid
justification, the public school in which the child is enrolled shall
take the following actions if the child is enrolled in the sixth grade
or above, and may take the following actions if the child is enrolled
in the fifth grade or below:
(a) Inform the child's custodial parent, parents, or guardian by a
notice in writing, by e-mail, or by telephone whenever the child has
failed to attend school after one unexcused absence within any month
during the current school year. School officials shall inform the
parent of the potential consequences of additional unexcused absences.
If the custodial parent, parents, or guardian is not fluent in English,
the preferred practice is to provide this information in a language in
which the custodial parent, parents, or guardian is fluent; and
(b) Schedule a conference or conferences to be conducted by
telephone or in person with the custodial parent, parents, or guardian
and child at a time reasonably convenient for all persons included for
the purpose of analyzing the causes of the child's absences after two
unexcused absences within any month during the current school year. If
a regularly scheduled parent-teacher conference day is to take place
within thirty days of the second unexcused absence, then the school
district may schedule this conference on that day((; and)).
(((c))) (2) The school may also take steps to eliminate or reduce
the child's absences. These steps ((shall)) may include, where
appropriate, adjusting the child's school program or school or course
assignment, providing more individualized or remedial instruction,
providing appropriate vocational courses or work experience, referring
the child to a community truancy board, if available, requiring the
child to attend an alternative school or program, or assisting the
parent or child to obtain supplementary services that might eliminate
or ameliorate the cause or causes for the absence from school. If the
child's parent does not attend the scheduled conference, the conference
may be conducted with the student and school official. However, the
parent shall be notified of the steps to be taken to eliminate or
reduce the child's absence.
(((2))) (3) For purposes of this chapter, an "unexcused absence"
means that a child:
(a) Has failed to attend the majority of hours or periods in an
average school day or has failed to comply with a more restrictive
school district policy; and
(b) Has failed to meet the school district's policy for excused
absences.
(((3))) (4) If a child transfers from one school district to
another during the school year, the receiving school or school district
shall include the unexcused absences accumulated at the previous school
or from the previous school district for purposes of this section, RCW
28A.225.030, and 28A.225.015.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.225.025 and 2009 c 266 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
SCHOOL DISTRICTS: TRUANCY. (1) For purposes of this chapter,
"community truancy board" means a board composed of members of the
local community in which the child attends school. Juvenile courts may
establish and operate community truancy boards. If the juvenile court
and the school district agree, a school district may establish and
operate a community truancy board under the jurisdiction of the
juvenile court. Juvenile courts may create a community truancy board
or may use other entities that exist or are created, such as diversion
units. However, a diversion unit or other existing entity must agree
before it is used as a truancy board. Duties of a community truancy
board shall include, but not be limited to, recommending methods for
improving school attendance such as assisting the parent or the child
to obtain supplementary services that might eliminate or ameliorate the
causes for the absences or suggesting to the school district that the
child enroll in another school, an alternative education program, an
education center, a skill center, a dropout prevention program, or
another public or private educational program.
(2) The legislature finds that utilization of community truancy
boards, or other diversion units that fulfill a similar function, is
the preferred means of intervention when preliminary methods of notice
and parent conferences and taking appropriate steps to eliminate or
reduce unexcused absences have not been effective in securing the
child's attendance at school. The legislature intends to encourage and
support the development and expansion of community truancy boards and
other diversion programs which are effective in promoting school
attendance and preventing the need for more intrusive intervention by
the court. ((Operation of a school truancy board does not excuse a
district from the obligation of filing a petition within the
requirements of RCW 28A.225.015(3).))

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.225.030 and 1999 c 319 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
SCHOOL DISTRICTS: TRUANCY. (1) If a child is required to attend
school under RCW 28A.225.010 and ((if the actions taken by a)) the
school district takes actions under RCW 28A.225.020 that are not
successful in substantially reducing an enrolled student's absences
from public school, not later than the seventh unexcused absence by a
child within any month during the current school year or not later than
the tenth unexcused absence during the current school year, the school
district ((shall)) may file a petition and supporting affidavit for a
civil action with the juvenile court alleging a violation of RCW
28A.225.010: (a) By the parent; (b) by the child; or (c) by the parent
and the child. Except as provided in this subsection, no additional
documents need be filed with the petition.
(2) The district ((shall not later than)) may, after the fifth
unexcused absence in a month:
(a) Enter into an agreement with a student and parent that
establishes school attendance requirements;
(b) Refer a student to a community truancy board, if available, as
defined in RCW 28A.225.025. The community truancy board shall enter
into an agreement with the student and parent that establishes school
attendance requirements and take other appropriate actions to reduce
the child's absences; or
(c) File a petition under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The petition may be filed by a school district employee who is
not an attorney.
(4) If the school district ((fails to)) does not file a petition
under this section, the parent of a child with five or more unexcused
absences in any month during the current school year or upon the tenth
unexcused absence during the current school year may file a petition
with the juvenile court alleging a violation of RCW 28A.225.010.
(5) Petitions filed under this section may be served by certified
mail, return receipt requested. If such service is unsuccessful, or
the return receipt is not signed by the addressee, personal service is
required.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.225.151 and 1996 c 134 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
SCHOOL DISTRICTS: TRUANCY. (1) As required under subsection (2)
of this section, ((each school)) if a school takes additional actions
provided in RCW 28A.225.030, it shall document the actions taken
((under RCW 28A.225.030)) and report this information to the school
district superintendent who shall compile the data for all the schools
in the district and prepare an annual school district report for each
school year and submit the report to the superintendent of public
instruction. The reports shall be made upon forms furnished by the
superintendent of public instruction and shall be transmitted as
determined by the superintendent of public instruction.
(2) The reports under subsection (1) of this section shall include:
(a) The number of enrolled students and the number of unexcused
absences;
(b) Documentation of the steps taken by the school district under
each subsection of RCW 28A.225.020 at the request of the superintendent
of public instruction. Each year, by May 1st, the superintendent of
public instruction shall select ten school districts to submit the
report at the end of the following school year. The ten districts
shall represent different areas of the state and be of varied sizes.
In addition, the superintendent of public instruction shall require any
district that fails to keep appropriate records to submit a full report
to the superintendent of public instruction under this subsection. All
school districts shall document steps taken under RCW 28A.225.020 in
each student's record, and make those records available upon request
consistent with the laws governing student records;
(c) The number of enrolled students with ten or more unexcused
absences in a school year or five or more unexcused absences in a month
during a school year;
(d) A description of any programs or schools developed to serve
students who have had five or more unexcused absences in a month or ten
in a year including information about the number of students in the
program or school and the number of unexcused absences of students
during and after participation in the program. The school district
shall also describe any placements in an approved private nonsectarian
school or program or certified program under a court order under RCW
28A.225.090; and
(e) The number of petitions filed by a school district with the
juvenile court.
(3) A report required under this section shall not disclose the
name or other identification of a child or parent.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall collect these
reports from all school districts and prepare an annual report for each
school year to be submitted to the legislature no later than December
15th of each year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 2 through 6 of this act take effect
July 1, 2010.

MANDATES IMPOSED ON CITIES
AND COUNTIES, AND OTHER LOCAL GOVERNMENTS
Sec. 8 RCW 35.22.620 and 2009 c 229 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
CITIES: PUBLIC WORKS REPORTING TO STATE AUDITOR. (1) As used in
this section, the term "public works" means as defined in RCW
39.04.010.
(2) A first-class city may have public works performed by contract
pursuant to public notice and call for competitive bids. As limited by
subsection (3) of this section, a first-class city may have public
works performed by city employees in any annual or biennial budget
period equal to a dollar value not exceeding ten percent of the public
works construction budget, including any amount in a supplemental
public works construction budget, over the budget period. The amount
of public works that a first-class city has a county perform for it
under RCW 35.77.020 shall be included within this ten percent
limitation.
If a first-class city has public works performed by public
employees in any budget period that are in excess of this ten percent
limitation, the amount in excess of the permitted amount shall be
reduced from the otherwise permitted amount of public works that may be
performed by public employees for that city in its next budget period.
Twenty percent of the motor vehicle fuel tax distributions to that city
shall be withheld if two years after the year in which the excess
amount of work occurred, the city has failed to so reduce the amount of
public works that it has performed by public employees. The amount so
withheld shall be distributed to the city when it has demonstrated in
its reports to the state auditor that the amount of public works it has
performed by public employees has been so reduced.
Whenever a first-class city has had public works performed in any
budget period up to the maximum permitted amount for that budget
period, all remaining public works within that budget period shall be
done by contract pursuant to public notice and call for competitive
bids.
The state auditor shall report to the state treasurer any
first-class city that exceeds this amount and the extent to which the
city has or has not reduced the amount of public works it has performed
by public employees in subsequent years.
(3) In addition to the percentage limitation provided in subsection
(2) of this section, a first-class city shall not have public employees
perform a public works project in excess of ninety thousand dollars if
more than a single craft or trade is involved with the public works
project, or a public works project in excess of forty-five thousand
dollars if only a single craft or trade is involved with the public
works project or the public works project is street signalization or
street lighting. A public works project means a complete project. The
restrictions in this subsection do not permit the division of the
project into units of work or classes of work to avoid the restriction
on work that may be performed by day labor on a single project.
(4) In addition to the accounting and record-keeping requirements
contained in RCW 39.04.070, every first-class city annually ((shall))
may prepare a report for the state auditor indicating the total public
works construction budget and supplemental public works construction
budget for that year, the total construction costs of public works
performed by public employees for that year, and the amount of public
works that is performed by public employees above or below ten percent
of the total construction budget. However, if a city budgets on a
biennial basis, this annual report ((shall)) may indicate the amount of
public works that is performed by public employees within the current
biennial period that is above or below ten percent of the total
biennial construction budget.
Each first-class city with a population of one hundred fifty
thousand or less ((shall)) may use the form required by RCW 43.09.205
to account and record costs of public works in excess of five thousand
dollars that are not let by contract.
(5) The cost of a separate public works project shall be the costs
of materials, supplies, equipment, and labor on the construction of
that project. The value of the public works budget shall be the value
of all the separate public works projects within the budget.
(6) The competitive bidding requirements of this section may be
waived by the city legislative authority pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if
an exemption contained within that section applies to the work or
contract.
(7) In lieu of the procedures of subsections (2) and (6) of this
section, a first-class city may let contracts using the small works
roster process in RCW 39.04.155.
Whenever possible, the city shall invite at least one proposal from
a minority or woman contractor who shall otherwise qualify under this
section.
(8) The allocation of public works projects to be performed by city
employees shall not be subject to a collective bargaining agreement.
(9) This section does not apply to performance-based contracts, as
defined in RCW 39.35A.020(4), that are negotiated under chapter 39.35A
RCW.
(10) Nothing in this section shall prohibit any first-class city
from allowing for preferential purchase of products made from recycled
materials or products that may be recycled or reused.

Sec. 9 RCW 36.27.020 and 1995 c 194 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
COUNTIES: REPORT FROM PROSECUTORS TO GOVERNOR AND LIQUOR CONTROL
BOARD. The prosecuting attorney shall:
(1) Be legal adviser of the legislative authority, giving ((them
[it])) it his or her written opinion when required by the legislative
authority or the chairperson thereof touching any subject which the
legislative authority may be called or required to act upon relating to
the management of county affairs;
(2) Be legal adviser to all county and precinct officers and school
directors in all matters relating to their official business, and when
required draw up all instruments of an official nature for the use of
said officers;
(3) Appear for and represent the state, county, and all school
districts subject to the supervisory control and direction of the
attorney general in all criminal and civil proceedings in which the
state or the county or any school district in the county may be a
party;
(4) Prosecute all criminal and civil actions in which the state or
the county may be a party, defend all suits brought against the state
or the county, and prosecute actions upon forfeited recognizances and
bonds and actions for the recovery of debts, fines, penalties, and
forfeitures accruing to the state or the county;
(5) Attend and appear before and give advice to the grand jury when
cases are presented to it for consideration and draw all indictments
when required by the grand jury;
(6) Institute and prosecute proceedings before magistrates for the
arrest of persons charged with or reasonably suspected of felonies when
the prosecuting attorney has information that any such offense has been
committed and the prosecuting attorney shall for that purpose attend
when required by them if the prosecuting attorney is not then in
attendance upon the superior court;
(7) Carefully tax all cost bills in criminal cases and take care
that no useless witness fees are taxed as part of the costs and that
the officers authorized to execute process tax no other or greater fees
than the fees allowed by law;
(8) Receive all cost bills in criminal cases before district judges
at the trial of which the prosecuting attorney was not present, before
they are lodged with the legislative authority for payment, whereupon
the prosecuting attorney may retax the same and the prosecuting
attorney must do so if the legislative authority deems any bill
exorbitant or improperly taxed;
(9) Present all violations of the election laws which may come to
the prosecuting attorney's knowledge to the special consideration of
the proper jury;
(10) Examine once in each year the official bonds of all county and
precinct officers and report to the legislative authority any defect in
the bonds of any such officer;
(11) ((Make an annual report to the governor as of the 31st of
December of each year setting forth the amount and nature of business
transacted by the prosecuting attorney in that year with such other
statements and suggestions as the prosecuting attorney may deem useful;
(12) Send to the state liquor control board at the end of each year
a written report of all prosecutions brought under the state liquor
laws in the county during the preceding year, showing in each case, the
date of trial, name of accused, nature of charges, disposition of case,
and the name of the judge presiding;
(13))) Seek to reform and improve the administration of criminal
justice and stimulate efforts to remedy inadequacies or injustice in
substantive or procedural law.

Sec. 10 RCW 36.34.010 and 1963 c 4 s 36.34.010 are each amended
to read as follows:
COUNTIES: SURPLUS PROPERTY VALUED AT LESS THAN FIVE HUNDRED
DOLLARS. Whenever it appears to the board of county commissioners that
it is for the best interests of the county and the taxing districts and
the people thereof that any part or parcel, or portion of such part or
parcel, of property, whether real, personal, or mixed, belonging to the
county, including tax title land, should be sold, the board shall sell
and convey such property, under the limitations and restrictions and in
the manner hereinafter provided.
The provisions of this chapter do not apply to county surplus
property valued at less than five hundred dollars. County surplus
property valued at less than five hundred dollars may be disposed of or
recycled.
In making such sales the board of county commissioners may sell any
timber, mineral, or other resources on any land owned by the county
separate and apart from the land in the same manner and upon the same
terms and conditions as provided in this chapter for the sale of real
property.
The board of county commissioners may reserve mineral rights in
such land and, if such reservation is made, any conveyance of the land
shall contain the following reservation:
"The party of the first part hereby expressly saves, excepts, and
reserves out of the grant hereby made, unto itself, its successors, and
assigns, forever, all oils, gases, coals, ores, minerals, gravel,
timber, and fossils of every name, kind, or description, and which may
be in or upon said lands above described; or any part thereof, and the
right to explore the same for such oils, gases, coals, ores, minerals,
gravel, timber and fossils; and it also hereby expressly saves and
reserves out of the grant hereby made, unto itself, its successors, and
assigns, forever, the right to enter by itself, its agents, attorneys,
and servants upon said lands, or any part or parts thereof, at any and
all times, for the purpose of opening, developing, and working mines
thereon, and taking out and removing therefrom all such oils, gases,
coal, ores, minerals, gravel, timber, and fossils, and to that end it
further expressly reserves out of the grant hereby made, unto itself,
its successors, and assigns, forever, the right by it or its agents,
servants, and attorneys at any and all times to erect, construct,
maintain, and use all such buildings, machinery, roads and railroads,
sink such shafts, remove such oil, and to remain on said lands or any
part thereof, for the business of mining and to occupy as much of said
lands as may be necessary or convenient for the successful prosecution
of such mining business, hereby expressly reserving to itself, its
successors, and assigns, as aforesaid, generally, all rights and powers
in, to, and over said land, whether herein expressed or not, reasonably
necessary or convenient to render beneficial and efficient the complete
enjoyment of the property and the rights hereby expressly reserved."
No rights shall be exercised under the foregoing reservation until
provision has been made to pay to the owner of the land upon which the
rights reserved are sought to be exercised, full payment for all
damages sustained by reason of entering upon the land: PROVIDED, That
if the owner for any cause refuses or neglects to settle the damages,
the county, its successors, or assigns, or any applicant for a lease or
contract from the county for the purpose of prospecting for or mining
valuable minerals, or operation contract, or lease, for mining coal, or
lease for extracting petroleum or natural gas, shall have the right to
institute such legal proceedings in the superior court of the county
wherein the land is situated, as may be necessary to determine the
damages which the owner of the land may suffer. Any of the reserved
minerals or other resources not exceeding two hundred dollars in value
may be sold, when the board deems it advisable, either with or without
publication of notice of sale, and in such manner as the board may
determine will be most beneficial to the county.

Sec. 11 RCW 39.44.210 and 1995 c 399 s 54 are each amended to
read as follows:
LOCAL GOVERNMENTS: REPORT TO DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE ON BONDS. For
each state or local government bond issued, the underwriter of the
issue shall supply the department of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce with information on the bond issue within twenty
days of its issuance. In cases where the issuer of the bond makes a
direct or private sale to a purchaser without benefit of an
underwriter, the issuer shall supply the required information. The
bond issue information shall be provided on a form prescribed by the
department of ((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce
and shall include but is not limited to: (1) The par value of the bond
issue; (2) the effective interest rates; (3) a schedule of maturities;
(4) the purposes of the bond issue; (5) cost of issuance information;
and (6) the type of bonds that are issued. A copy of the bond
covenants shall be supplied with this information.
For each state or local government bond issued, the issuer's bond
counsel promptly shall provide to the underwriter or to the department
of ((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce information
on the amount of any fees charged for services rendered with regard to
the bond issue.
Each local government that issues any type of bond ((shall)) may
make a report annually to the department of ((community, trade, and
economic development)) commerce that includes a summary of all the
outstanding bonds of the local government as of the first day of
January in that year. Such report ((shall)) may distinguish the
outstanding bond issues on the basis of the type of bond, as defined in
RCW 39.44.200, and ((shall)) may report the local government's
outstanding indebtedness compared to any applicable limitations on
indebtedness, including RCW 35.42.200, 39.30.010, and 39.36.020.

Sec. 12 RCW 84.14.100 and 2007 c 430 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
CITIES: MULTIFAMILY PROPERTY TAX EXEMPTION REPORTING. (1) Thirty
days after the anniversary of the date of the certificate of tax
exemption and each year for the tax exemption period, the owner of the
rehabilitated or newly constructed property shall file with a
designated authorized representative of the city an annual report
indicating the following:
(a) A statement of occupancy and vacancy of the rehabilitated or
newly constructed property during the twelve months ending with the
anniversary date;
(b) A certification by the owner that the property has not changed
use and, if applicable, that the property has been in compliance with
the affordable housing requirements as described in RCW 84.14.020 since
the date of the certificate approved by the city;
(c) A description of changes or improvements constructed after
issuance of the certificate of tax exemption; and
(d) Any additional information requested by the city in regards to
the units receiving a tax exemption.
(2) All cities, which issue certificates of tax exemption for
multiunit housing that conform to the requirements of this chapter,
((shall)) may report annually by December 31st of each year, beginning
in 2007, to the department of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce. The report ((must)) may include the following
information:
(a) The number of tax exemption certificates granted;
(b) The total number and type of units produced or to be produced;
(c) The number and type of units produced or to be produced meeting
affordable housing requirements;
(d) The actual development cost of each unit produced;
(e) The total monthly rent or total sale amount of each unit
produced;
(f) The income of each renter household at the time of initial
occupancy and the income of each initial purchaser of owner-occupied
units at the time of purchase for each of the units receiving a tax
exemption and a summary of these figures for the city; and
(g) The value of the tax exemption for each project receiving a tax
exemption and the total value of tax exemptions granted.

Sec. 13 RCW 84.40.175 and 1994 c 124 s 24 are each amended to
read as follows:
COUNTIES: VALUATION OF TAX-EXEMPT PUBLIC PROPERTY. At the time of
making the assessment of real property, the assessor shall enter each
description of property exempt under the provisions of chapter 84.36
RCW, and ((value and)) list the same in the manner and subject to the
same rule as the assessor is required to assess all other property,
designating in each case to whom such property belongs. Except as
otherwise provided in law, the assessor is not required to value
property exempt under the provisions of RCW 84.36.010. However, with
respect to publicly owned property exempt from taxation under
provisions of RCW 84.36.010, the assessor shall value only such
property as is leased to or occupied by a private person under an
agreement allowing such person to occupy or use such property for a
private purpose when a request for such valuation is received from the
department of revenue or the lessee of such property for use in
determining the taxable rent as provided for in chapter 82.29A RCW:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That this section shall not prohibit any assessor
from valuing any public property leased to or occupied by a private
person for private purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 MUNICIPALITIES: REPORTING ON ENERGY
CONSERVATION MEASURES. RCW 43.19.691 (Municipalities -- Energy audits
and efficiency) and 2005 c 299 s 5 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 As used in this act, captions constitute no
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---