BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 An unprecedented shortfall in state general
fund and transportation revenues has threatened the state's ability to
fund vital services and provide adequate transportation infrastructure.
Cities, counties, and public transportation systems have also been hurt
by the downturn in the economy. For this reason, the legislature is
enacting an excise tax equivalent to one percent that will be reduced
to one-half of a percent when the state's unemployment decreases to six
and five-tenths percent for four continuous months and is eliminated
when the unemployment rate decreases to five percent for four
continuous months. The additional funding will keep people working,
strengthen the safety net for citizens by providing vital needed
services, and adding jobs as the economy begins to rebound through
investing in the state's economy and infrastructure. The intent is to
help people and the economy through the economic crisis, but when the
economy has recovered, this tax will no longer be required and will be
replaced by revenue being automatically generated through the
revitalized economic growth in the state.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.08.020 and 2009 c 469 s 802 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is levied and ((there shall be)) collected a tax on each
retail sale in this state equal to six and five-tenths percent of the
selling price.
(2) There is levied and ((there shall be)) collected an additional
tax on each retail car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is
licensed in this state, equal to five and nine-tenths percent of the
selling price. The revenue collected under this subsection ((shall))
must be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in
RCW 47.66.070.
(3)(a) Beginning July 1, 2003, there is levied and collected an
additional tax of three-tenths of one percent of the selling price on
each retail sale of a motor vehicle in this state, other than retail
car rentals taxed under subsection (2) of this section. The revenue
collected under this subsection ((shall)) must be deposited in the
multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.
(((4))) (b) For purposes of this subsection (3) ((of this
section)), "motor vehicle" has the meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320,
but does not include farm tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW
46.04.180 and 46.04.181, off-road and nonhighway vehicles as defined in
RCW 46.09.020, and snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.10.010.
(4)(a) Beginning June 30, 2010, there is levied and collected an
additional tax of one percent of the selling price on each retail sale
in this state. Of the revenue collected under this subsection:
(i) Eighty percent of the revenue must be deposited in the general
fund;
(ii) Seventeen percent of the revenue must be deposited in the
motor vehicle account and must be used for highway construction,
preservation, and maintenance; and
(iii) Three percent of the revenue must be deposited into the
multimodal account and must be used for public transportation systems,
which include only those systems defined as a "municipality" in RCW
35.58.272. Department of transportation public transportation jointly
with public transportation systems must develop a grant program. The
program grants must be awarded based upon mutually agreed
performance-based outcome criteria. The department of transportation
at the end of each biennium must report to the house and senate
transportation committees on the performance of the grant program.
(b)(i) When the state's unemployment rate decreases to six and
five-tenths percent for four continuous months, the rate of one percent
in this subsection (4) must be reduced to one-half of one percent.
(ii) When the state's unemployment rate decreases to five percent
for four continuous months, no additional tax may be imposed under this
subsection (4).
(5) Beginning on December 8, 2005, 0.16 percent of the taxes
collected under subsection (1) of this section ((shall)) must be
dedicated to funding comprehensive performance audits required under
RCW 43.09.470. The revenue identified in this subsection ((shall))
must be deposited in the performance audits of government account
created in RCW 43.09.475.
(6) The taxes imposed under this chapter ((shall)) apply to
successive retail sales of the same property.
(7)(a) Until January 1, 2011, the tax imposed in subsection (3) of
this section and the dedication of revenue provided for in subsection
(5) of this section((,)) do not apply with respect to the sales of new
passenger cars, light duty trucks, and medium duty passenger vehicles,
which utilize hybrid technology and have a United States environmental
protection agency estimated highway gasoline mileage rating of at least
forty miles per gallon.
(b) As used in this subsection, "hybrid technology" means
propulsion units powered by both electricity and gasoline.
(8) The rates provided in this section apply to taxes imposed under
chapter 82.12 RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.08.020 and 2006 c 1 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) There is levied and ((there shall be)) collected a tax on each
retail sale in this state equal to six and five-tenths percent of the
selling price.
(2) There is levied and ((there shall be)) collected an additional
tax on each retail car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is
licensed in this state, equal to five and nine-tenths percent of the
selling price. The revenue collected under this subsection ((shall))
must be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in
RCW 47.66.070.
(3)(a) Beginning July 1, 2003, there is levied and collected an
additional tax of three-tenths of one percent of the selling price on
each retail sale of a motor vehicle in this state, other than retail
car rentals taxed under subsection (2) of this section. The revenue
collected under this subsection ((shall)) must be deposited in the
multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.
(((4))) (b) For purposes of this subsection (3) ((of this
section)), "motor vehicle" has the meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320,
but does not include farm tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW
46.04.180 and 46.04.181, off-road and nonhighway vehicles as defined in
RCW 46.09.020, and snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.10.010.
(4)(a) Beginning June 30, 2010, there is levied and collected an
additional tax of one percent of the selling price on each retail sale
in this state. Of the revenue collected under this subsection:
(i) Eighty percent of the revenue must be deposited in the general
fund;
(ii) Seventeen percent of the revenue must be deposited in the
motor vehicle account and must be used for highway construction,
preservation, and maintenance; and
(iii) Three percent of the revenue must be deposited into the
multimodal account and must be used for public transportation systems,
which include only those systems defined as a "municipality" in RCW
35.58.272. Department of transportation public transportation jointly
with public transportation systems must develop a grant program. The
program grants must be awarded based upon mutually agreed
performance-based outcome criteria. The department of transportation
at the end of each biennium must report to the house and senate
transportation committees on the performance of the grant program.
(b)(i) When the state's unemployment rate decreases to six and
five-tenths percent for four continuous months, the rate of one percent
in this subsection (4) must be reduced to one-half of one percent.
(ii) When the state's unemployment rate decreases to five percent
for four continuous months, no additional tax may be imposed under this
subsection (4).
(5) Beginning on December 8, 2005, 0.16 percent of the taxes
collected under subsection (1) of this section ((shall)) must be
dedicated to funding comprehensive performance audits required under
RCW 43.09.470. The revenue identified in this subsection ((shall))
must be deposited in the performance audits of government account
created in RCW 43.09.475.
(6) The taxes imposed under this chapter ((shall)) apply to
successive retail sales of the same property.
(7) The rates provided in this section apply to taxes imposed under
chapter 82.12 RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at retail of motor vehicle fuel or special fuel; as to
such persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to
the gross proceeds of sales of the business multiplied by the rate of
1.5 percent.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Motor vehicle fuel" has the same meaning as provided in
chapter 82.36 RCW; and
(b) "Special fuel" has the same meaning as provided in chapter
82.38 RCW.
(3)(a) 0.314 percent received from the excise tax imposed in this
section must be distributed to the general fund and 0.686 percent must
be distributed to the local government transportation account created
in section 5 of this act and must be distributed as follows:
(i) Fifty percent must be distributed to cities and towns monthly
by the state treasurer based on the office of financial management's
official population forecast. Funds must be used for transportation
with a minimum of fifty percent of the funds dedicated to roadway
preservation and maintenance;
(ii) Fifty percent must be distributed to counties monthly by the
state treasurer based on county road miles recognized by the county
road administration board. Funds must be used for transportation with
a minimum of fifty percent of the funds dedicated to roadway
preservation and maintenance.
(b)(i) When the state's unemployment rate decreases to six and
five-tenths percent for four continuous months, the rate of one percent
in this subsection (3) must be reduced to one-half of one percent.
(ii) When the state's unemployment rate decreases to five percent
for four continuous months, no additional tax may be imposed under this
subsection (3).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW
to read as follows:
The local government transportation account is created in the motor
vehicle fund. Expenditures from the account must be used by cities,
towns, and counties for transportation purposes only.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.84.092 and 2009 c 479 s 31, 2009 c 472 s 5, and
2009 c 451 s 8 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate
share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily
balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search
and rescue account, the budget stabilization account, the capitol
building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia
river basin water supply development account, the common school
construction fund, the county arterial preservation account, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of licensing services
account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the
developmental disabilities community trust account, the drinking water
assistance account, the drinking water assistance administrative
account, the drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern
Washington University capital projects account, the education
construction fund, the education legacy trust account, the election
account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account,
the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College
capital projects account, the federal forest revolving account, the
ferry bond retirement fund, the freight congestion relief account, the
freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal
account, the grade crossing protective fund, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health
services account, the high capacity transportation account, the state
higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway
infrastructure account, the highway safety account, the high occupancy
toll lanes operations account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
local government transportation account, the local leasehold excise tax
account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and
use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park
relocation fund, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety
education account, the multimodal transportation account, the municipal
criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account, the natural resources deposit account, the oyster
reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the
perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities
construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public
health supplemental account, the public transportation systems account,
the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital
construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the
Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real estate appraiser
commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional
mobility grant program account, the resource management cost account,
the rural arterial trust account, the rural Washington loan fund, the
site closure account, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the
special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve
account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol
highway account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the
supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account,
the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco
prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the
transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement
account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account,
the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation
partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tuition
recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund,
the University of Washington building account, the urban arterial trust
account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and
pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve
officers' administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account,
the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety
employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the
state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1, 2, and 4 through 6 of this act
take effect July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Section 2 of this act expires January 1,
2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Section 3 of this act takes effect January
1, 2011.

--- END ---