BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 83.100.040 and 2005 c 516 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A tax in an amount computed as provided in this section is
imposed on every transfer of property located in Washington. For the
purposes of this section, any intangible property owned by a resident
is located in Washington.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the amount of
tax is the amount provided in the following table:

If Washington Taxable

The amount of Tax Equals
Of Washington
Taxable Estate Value
Greater than

Estate is at least But Less Than Initial Tax Amount Plus Tax Rate %

$0 $1,000,000 $0 ((10.00)) 20.00% $0

$1,000,000 $2,000,000 (($100,000))
$200,000 ((14.00)) 28.00% $1,000,000

$2,000,000 $3,000,000 (($240,000))
$480,000 ((15.00)) 30.00% $2,000,000

$3,000,000 $4,000,000 (($390,000))
$780,000 ((16.00)) 32.00% $3,000,000

$4,000,000 $6,000,000 (($550,000))
$1,100,000 ((17.00)) 34.00% $4,000,000

$6,000,000 $7,000,000 (($890,000))
$1,780,000 ((18.00)) 36.00% $6,000,000

$7,000,000 $9,000,000 (($1,070,000))
$2,140,000 ((18.50)) 37.00% $7,000,000

Above $9,000,000 (($1,440,000))
$2,880,000 ((19.00)) 38.00% Above $9,000,000

(b) If any property in the decedent's estate is located outside of
Washington, the amount of tax is the amount determined in (a) of this
subsection multiplied by a fraction. The numerator of the fraction is
the value of the property located in Washington. The denominator of
the fraction is the value of the decedent's gross estate. Property
qualifying for a deduction under RCW 83.100.046 ((shall be)) is
excluded from the numerator and denominator of the fraction.
(3) The tax imposed under this section is a stand-alone estate tax
that incorporates only those provisions of the internal revenue code as
amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2005, that do not conflict with
the provisions of this chapter. The tax imposed under this chapter is
independent of any federal estate tax obligation and is not affected by
termination of the federal estate tax.

Sec. 2 RCW 83.100.230 and 2008 c 329 s 924 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The education legacy trust account is created in the state
treasury. Money in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
(2) Expenditures from the account ((may)) must be used only ((for
deposit into the student achievement fund and for)) as follows:
(a) Fifty percent of the money deposited must be used for expanding
access to higher education through funding for new enrollments and
financial aid, and other educational improvement efforts; and
(b) Fifty percent of the money deposited must be used for grants to
Washington high school graduates for either the graduate's:
(i) First year of tuition at a Washington community college; or
(ii) First term of tuition at Eastern Washington University,
Central Washington University, Western Washington University, The
Evergreen State College, University of Washington, or Washington State
University.
(c) During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account may
also be transferred into the state general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act applies prospectively only and only
applies to estates of decedents dying on or after April 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
April 1, 2010.

--- END ---