BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.46.421 and 2008 c 263 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The purpose of part E of this chapter is to determine nursing
facility medicaid payment rates that((, in the aggregate for all
participating nursing facilities, are in accordance with the biennial
appropriations act.
(2)(a) The department shall use the nursing facility medicaid
payment rate methodologies described in this chapter to determine
initial component rate allocations for each medicaid nursing facility.
(b) The initial component rate allocations shall be subject to
adjustment as provided in this section in order to assure that the
statewide average payment rate to nursing facilities is less than or
equal to the statewide average payment rate specified in the biennial
appropriations act.
(3) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as creating a legal
right or entitlement to any payment that (a) has not been adjusted
under this section or (b) would cause the statewide average payment
rate to exceed the statewide average payment rate specified in the
biennial appropriations act.
(4)(a) The statewide average payment rate for any state fiscal year
under the nursing facility payment system, weighted by patient days,
shall not exceed the annual statewide weighted average nursing facility
payment rate identified for that fiscal year in the biennial
appropriations act.
(b) If the department determines that the weighted average nursing
facility payment rate calculated in accordance with this chapter is
likely to exceed the weighted average nursing facility payment rate
identified in the biennial appropriations act, then the department
shall adjust all nursing facility payment rates proportional to the
amount by which the weighted average rate allocations would otherwise
exceed the budgeted rate amount. Any such adjustments for the current
fiscal year shall only be made prospectively, not retrospectively, and
shall be applied proportionately to each component rate allocation for
each facility.
(c) If any final order or final judgment, including a final order
or final judgment resulting from an adjudicative proceeding or judicial
review permitted by chapter 34.05 RCW, would result in an increase to
a nursing facility's payment rate for a prior fiscal year or years, the
department shall consider whether the increased rate for that facility
would result in the statewide weighted average payment rate for all
facilities for such fiscal year or years to be exceeded. If the
increased rate would result in the statewide average payment rate for
such year or years being exceeded, the department shall increase that
nursing facility's payment rate to meet the final order or judgment
only to the extent that it does not result in an increase to the
statewide weighted average payment rate for all facilities)) are
consistent with efficiency, economy, and quality of care and are
sufficient to enlist enough providers so that care and services are
available under the medicaid plan at least to the extent that care and
services are available to the general population in the state. The
requirements under this subsection must be interpreted consistent with
42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(a)(30)(A). In every instance, medicaid payment
rates must bear a reasonable relationship to the costs of providing
quality care incurred by efficiently and economically operated nursing
facilities.
(2) Nursing facility medicaid payment rates derived through
methodologies consistent with the purpose of part E of this chapter, as
described in subsection (1) of this section, must not be implemented
unless and until the department provides documented proof to the
legislature that the resulting rates are consistent with efficiency,
economy, and quality of care and are sufficient to enlist enough
providers so that care and services are available under the state
medicaid plan to the extent that such care and services are available
to the general population in the state, consistent with 42 U.S.C. Sec.
1396a(a)(30)(A).
(3) The documented proof referred to in subsection (2) of this
section requires an analysis of the relationship between proposed
reimbursement rates and actual costs incurred by the nursing facilities
for providing quality care and services to medicaid beneficiaries. At
a minimum, this analysis must rely on responsible cost studies that
provide reliable data as a basis for rate setting. This analysis must
be performed and considered before establishing or changing
reimbursement rates or methodologies.

--- END ---