BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.405.415 and 2009 c 539 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Certificated instructional staff who have attained
certification from the national board for professional teaching
standards shall receive a bonus each year in which they maintain the
certification and are in an instructional assignment in a Washington
public school. The bonus shall be calculated as follows: The annual
bonus shall be five thousand dollars in the 2007-08 school year.
Thereafter, the annual bonus shall increase by inflation, except as
otherwise provided in this section. For the 2009-10 and 2010-11 school
years the annual bonus shall be subject to the availability of amounts
appropriated for this purpose. During the 2011-2013 and 2013-2015
fiscal biennia, in addition to annual adjustments for inflation, the
bonus amount shall be additionally increased such that, by the end of
the 2014-15 school year, national board bonus amounts are, at a
minimum, equal to what they would have been if annual adjustments for
inflation had not been suspended during the 2009-10 or 2010-11 school
year.
(2) Certificated instructional staff who have attained
certification from the national board for professional teaching
standards shall be eligible for bonuses in addition to that provided by
subsection (1) of this section if the individual is in an instructional
assignment in ((a school in which at least seventy percent of the
students qualify for the free and reduced-price lunch program)):
(a) A high school where at least fifty percent of student headcount
enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced price lunch;
(b) A middle school where at least sixty percent of student
headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced price
lunch; or
(c) An elementary school where at least seventy percent of student
headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced price
lunch.
(3) The amount of the additional bonus under subsection (2) of this
section for those meeting the qualifications of subsection (2) of this
section is ((five)) two thousand five hundred dollars for the 2010-11
school year, and thereafter may be adjusted as provided in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(4) The bonuses provided under this section are in addition to
compensation received under a district's salary schedule adopted in
accordance with RCW 28A.405.200 and shall not be included in
calculations of a district's average salary and associated salary
limitations under RCW 28A.400.200.
(5) The bonuses provided under this section shall be paid in a lump
sum amount.

--- END ---