BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The state treasurer shall transfer two
hundred twenty-nine million dollars from the budget stabilization
account to the state general fund for fiscal year 2011.
(2) The transfer in subsection (1) of this section is to minimize
reductions to public school programs in the 2010 supplemental omnibus
operating budget.

--- END ---