BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.09.110 and 1995 c 216 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of social and health services shall be responsible
for all costs relating to the evaluation and treatment of persons
committed to their custody whether in a secure facility or under a less
restrictive alternative under any provision of this chapter. The
secretary shall adopt rules for the reimbursement of costs relating to
evaluations by experts. Reimbursement may be obtained by the
department for the cost of care and treatment of persons committed to
its custody whether in a secure facility or under a less restrictive
alternative pursuant to RCW 43.20B.330 through 43.20B.370.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.09.800 and 2000 c 44 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary shall adopt rules under the administrative procedure
act, chapter 34.05 RCW, for the oversight and operation of the program
established pursuant to this chapter. Such rules shall include
provisions for an annual inspection of the special commitment center,
reimbursement of costs related to evaluations by experts, and
requirements for treatment plans and the retention of records.

--- END ---