BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided under subsection (2) of this section,
beginning with the 2010-11 school year, rules adopted by the
superintendent of public instruction under RCW 28A.150.260 that define
a full-time equivalent student for state funding purposes shall not
permit a school district to report enrollment of students in grades
kindergarten through six who are enrolled either on a part-time or
full-time basis in alternative learning experiences. Except as
provided under subsection (2) of this section, alternative learning
experiences for students in grades kindergarten through six are not
considered a course of study for purposes of counting enrolled
students.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to a student with
disabilities under chapter 28A.155 RCW if alternative learning
experiences are determined through a properly formulated individualized
education program to be the appropriate educational placement for the
student.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.150.262 and 2009 c 542 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
Under RCW 28A.150.260, the superintendent of public instruction
shall revise the definition of a full-time equivalent student to
include students who receive instruction through alternative learning
experience online programs, but only for students enrolled in grades
seven through twelve or students with disabilities as described in
section 1(2) of this act. As used in this section, an "alternative
learning experience online program" is a set of online courses or an
online school program as defined in RCW 28A.250.010 that is delivered
to students in whole or in part independently from a regular classroom
schedule. The superintendent of public instruction has the authority
to adopt rules to implement the revised definition beginning with the
2005-2007 biennium for school districts claiming state funding for the
programs. The superintendent of public instruction has the authority
to revise the rules to include only students enrolled in grades seven
through twelve and students with disabilities as described in section
1(2) of this act beginning with the 2010-11 school year. The rules
shall include but not be limited to the following:
(1) Defining a full-time equivalent student under RCW 28A.150.260
or part-time student under RCW 28A.150.350 based upon the district's
estimated average weekly hours of learning activity as identified in
the student's learning plan, as long as the student is found, through
monthly evaluation, to be making satisfactory progress; the rules shall
require districts providing programs under this section to nonresident
students to establish procedures that address, at a minimum, the
coordination of student counting for state funding so that no student
is counted for more than one full-time equivalent in the aggregate;
(2) Requiring the board of directors of a school district offering,
or contracting under RCW 28A.150.305 to offer, an alternative learning
experience online program to adopt and annually review written policies
for each program and program provider and to receive an annual report
on its digital alternative learning experience online programs from its
staff;
(3) Requiring each school district offering or contracting to offer
an alternative learning experience online program to report annually to
the superintendent of public instruction on the types of programs and
course offerings, and number of students participating;
(4) Requiring completion of a program self-evaluation;
(5) Requiring documentation of the district of the student's
physical residence;
(6) Requiring that supervision, monitoring, assessment, and
evaluation of the alternative learning experience online program be
provided by certificated instructional staff;
(7) Requiring each school district offering courses or programs to
identify the ratio of certificated instructional staff to full-time
equivalent students enrolled in such courses or programs, and to
include a description of their ratio as part of the reports required
under subsections (2) and (3) of this section;
(8) Requiring reliable methods to verify a student is doing his or
her own work; the methods may include proctored examinations or
projects, including the use of web cams or other technologies.
"Proctored" means directly monitored by an adult authorized by the
school district;
(9) Requiring, for each student receiving instruction in an
alternative learning experience online program, a learning plan that
includes a description of course objectives and information on the
requirements a student must meet to successfully complete the program
or courses. The rules shall allow course syllabi and other additional
information to be used to meet the requirement for a learning plan;
(10) Requiring that the district assess the educational progress of
enrolled students at least annually, using, for full-time students, the
state assessment for the student's grade level and using any other
annual assessments required by the school district. Part-time students
shall also be assessed at least annually. However, part-time students
who are either receiving home-based instruction under chapter 28A.200
RCW or who are enrolled in an approved private school under chapter
28A.195 RCW are not required to participate in the assessments required
under chapter 28A.655 RCW. The rules shall address how students who
reside outside the geographic service area of the school district are
to be assessed;
(11) Requiring that each student enrolled in the program have
direct personal contact with certificated instructional staff at least
weekly until the student completes the course objectives or the
requirements in the learning plan. Direct personal contact is for the
purposes of instruction, review of assignments, testing, evaluation of
student progress, or other learning activities. Direct personal
contact may include the use of telephone, e-mail, instant messaging,
interactive video communication, or other means of digital
communication;
(12) Requiring state-funded public schools or public school
programs whose primary purpose is to provide alternative learning
experience online learning programs to receive accreditation through
the Northwest association of accredited schools or another national,
regional, or state accreditation program listed by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction after consultation with the
Washington coalition for online learning;
(13) Requiring state-funded public schools or public school
programs whose primary purpose is to provide alternative learning
experience online learning to provide information to students and
parents on whether or not the courses or programs: Cover one or more
of the school district's learning goals or of the state's essential
academic learning requirements or whether they permit the student to
meet one or more of the state's or district's graduation requirements;
and
(14) Requiring that a school district that provides one or more
alternative learning experience online courses to a student provide the
parent or guardian of the student, prior to the student's enrollment,
with a description of any difference between home-based education as
described in chapter 28A.200 RCW and the enrollment option selected by
the student. The parent or guardian shall sign documentation attesting
to his or her understanding of the difference and the documentation
shall be retained by the district and made available for audit.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.150.305 and 2002 c 291 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board of directors of school districts may contract with
alternative educational service providers for eligible students.
Alternative educational service providers that the school district may
contract with include, but are not limited to:
(a) Other schools;
(b) Alternative education programs not operated by the school
district;
(c) Education centers;
(d) Skills centers;
(e) The Washington national guard youth challenge program;
(f) Dropout prevention programs; or
(g) Other public or private organizations, excluding sectarian or
religious organizations.
(2) Eligible students include students who are likely to be
expelled or who are enrolled in the school district but have been
suspended, are academically at risk, or who have been subject to
repeated disciplinary actions due to behavioral problems. Beginning
with the 2010-11 school year, eligible students do not include students
enrolled in grades kindergarten through six for purposes of an
alternative learning experience, except for students with disabilities
as described in section 1(2) of this act if the contractor is an agency
approved under RCW 28A.155.060.
(3) If a school district board of directors chooses to initiate
specialized programs for students at risk of expulsion or who are
failing academically by contracting out with alternative educational
service providers identified in subsection (1) of this section, the
school district board of directors and the organization must specify
the specific learning standards that students are expected to achieve.
Placement of the student shall be jointly determined by the school
district, the student's parent or legal guardian, and the alternative
educational service provider.
(4) For the purpose of this section, the superintendent of public
instruction shall adopt rules for reporting and documenting enrollment.
Students may reenter at the grade level appropriate to the student's
ability. Students who are sixteen years of age or older may take the
GED test.
(5) The board of directors of school districts may require that
students who would otherwise be suspended or expelled attend schools or
programs listed in subsection (1) of this section as a condition of
continued enrollment in the school district.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.320.035 and 1997 c 267 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board of directors of a school district may contract with
other school districts, educational service districts, public or
private organizations, agencies, schools, or individuals to implement
the board's powers and duties. The board of directors of a school
district may contract for goods and services, including but not limited
to contracts for goods and services as specifically authorized in
statute or rule, as well as other educational, instructional, and
specialized services. When a school district board of directors
contracts for educational, instructional, or specialized services, the
purpose of the contract must be to improve student learning or
achievement.
(2) A contract under ((subsection (1) of)) this section may not be
made with a religious or sectarian organization or school where the
contract would violate the state or federal Constitution.
(3) Beginning with the 2010-11 school year, a contract under this
section may not be made to provide alternative learning experiences for
students enrolled in grades kindergarten through six, except for
students with disabilities as described in of section 1(2) of this act
if the contractor is an agency approved under RCW 28A.155.060.

--- END ---