BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.83.023 and 2007 c 259 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department has the authority to collect a fee of ((three))
eight dollars and ((fifty)) forty cents from the parents or other
responsible party of each infant screened for congenital disorders as
defined by the state board of health under RCW 70.83.020 to fund
specialty clinics that provide treatment services for those with the
defined disorders. The fee may also be used to support organizations
conducting community outreach, education, and adult support related to
sickle cell disease. The fee may be collected through the facility
where a screening specimen is obtained. The fee is a billable expense.

--- END ---