BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.24.115 and 1986 c 305 s 601 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A covenant, promise, agreement or understanding in, or in
connection with or collateral to, a contract or agreement relative to
the construction, alteration, repair, addition to, subtraction from,
improvement to, or maintenance of, any building, highway, road,
railroad, excavation, or other structure, project, development, or
improvement attached to real estate, including moving and demolition in
connection therewith, purporting to indemnify against liability for
damages arising out of bodily injury to persons or damage to property:
(((1))) (a) Caused by or resulting from the sole negligence of the
indemnitee, his or her agents or employees is against public policy and
is void and unenforceable;
(((2))) (b) Caused by or resulting from the concurrent negligence
of (((a))) (i) the indemnitee or the indemnitee's agents or employees,
and (((b))) (ii) the indemnitor or the indemnitor's agents or
employees, is valid and enforceable only to the extent of the
indemnitor's negligence and only if the agreement specifically and
expressly provides therefor, and may waive the indemnitor's immunity
under industrial insurance, Title 51 RCW, only if the agreement
specifically and expressly provides therefor and the waiver was
mutually negotiated by the parties. This subsection applies to
agreements entered into after June 11, 1986.
(2) A covenant, promise, agreement or understanding in, or in
connection with or collateral to, a contract or agreement with an
agency, as defined in RCW 39.80.020, for architect, landscape
architect, engineering, or land surveying services, purporting to
indemnify, including the cost to defend, the public agency by the
architect, landscape architect, engineer, or land surveyor against
liability for claims against the public agency, are unenforceable,
except for claims that arise out of, pertain to, or relate to the
negligence, recklessness, or willful misconduct of the architect,
landscape architect, engineer, or land surveyor. This section shall
not be waived or modified by contractual agreement, act, or omission of
the parties. Contractual provisions, clauses, covenants, or agreements
not expressly prohibited herein are reserved to the agreement of the
parties.

--- END ---