BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the Washington
state ferries system is a critical component of the state's highway
system. The legislature further finds that ferry system revenues are
inadequate to support the capital requirements of aging vessels and
terminals, and operating cost growth is fast outpacing the growth of
fare revenue and gas tax revenue dedicated to the ferry system. As
such, and drawing on more than four consecutive years of legislative
analysis and operating policy reforms, the legislature finds that a
realignment of the ferry compensation policy framework is an
appropriate next step toward the legislature's long-term goal of
assuring sustainable, cost-effective ferry service. The legislature
further intends to address increasing costs of operating the ferry
system in a manner that balances the interests of the ferry system,
ferry workforce, and the fare payers.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.64.200 and 2006 c 164 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
As the first step in the performance of their duty to bargain, the
employer and the employee organization shall endeavor to agree upon
impasse procedures. Unless otherwise agreed to by the employee
organization and the employer in their impasse procedures, the
arbitrator or panel ((is limited to selecting the most reasonable
offer, in its judgment, of the final offers on each impasse item
submitted by the parties. The employee organization and the employer
may mutually agree to the impasse procedure under which the arbitrator
or panel may)) shall issue a decision it deems just and appropriate
with respect to each impasse item. If the parties fail to agree upon
impasse procedures under this section, the impasse procedures provided
in RCW 47.64.210 and 47.64.230 and 47.64.300 through 47.64.320 apply.
It is unlawful for either party to refuse to participate in the impasse
procedures provided in RCW 47.64.210 and 47.64.230 and 47.64.300
through 47.64.320.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.64.320 and 2006 c 164 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The mediator, arbitrator, or arbitration panel may consider
only matters that are subject to bargaining under this chapter.
(2) The decision of an arbitrator or arbitration panel is not
binding on the legislature and, if the legislature does not approve the
funds necessary to implement provisions pertaining to compensation and
fringe benefit provisions of an arbitrated collective bargaining
agreement, is not binding on the state, the department of
transportation, or the ferry employee organization.
(3) In making its determination, the arbitrator or arbitration
panel shall be mindful of the legislative purpose under RCW 47.64.005
and 47.64.006 and, as additional standards or guidelines to aid it in
reaching a decision, shall take into consideration the following
factors:
(a) The financial ability of the department to pay for the
compensation and fringe benefit provisions of a collective bargaining
agreement;
(b) Past collective bargaining contracts between the parties
including the bargaining that led up to the contracts;
(((b))) (c) The constitutional and statutory authority of the
employer;
(((c))) (d) Stipulations of the parties;
(((d))) (e) The results of the salary survey as required in RCW
47.64.220;
(((e))) (f) Comparison of wages, hours, employee benefits, and
conditions of employment of the involved ferry employees with those of:
(i) Public and private sector employees in states along the west coast
of the United States, including Alaska, and in British Columbia doing
directly comparable but not necessarily identical work, giving
consideration to factors peculiar to the area and the classifications
involved, or (ii) other state employees doing directly comparable but
not necessarily identical work, giving consideration to factors
peculiar to the area and the classifications involved;
(((f))) (g) Changes in any of the foregoing circumstances during
the pendency of the proceedings;
(((g))) (h) The limitations on ferry toll increases and operating
subsidies as may be imposed by the legislature; and
(((h))) (i) Other factors that are normally or traditionally taken
into consideration in the determination of matters that are subject to
bargaining under this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 47.28.030 and 2007 c 218 s 90 are each amended to read
as follows:
A state highway shall be constructed, altered, repaired, or
improved, and improvements located on property acquired for
right-of-way purposes may be repaired or renovated pending the use of
such right-of-way for highway purposes, by contract or state forces.
The work or portions thereof may be done by state forces when the
estimated costs thereof are less than fifty thousand dollars and
effective July 1, 2005, sixty thousand dollars, or less than one
hundred twenty thousand dollars for work performed on ferry vessels or
terminals: PROVIDED, That when delay of performance of such work would
jeopardize a state highway or constitute a danger to the traveling
public, the work may be done by state forces when the estimated cost
thereof is less than eighty thousand dollars and effective July 1,
2005, one hundred thousand dollars. When the department of
transportation determines to do the work by state forces, it shall
enter a statement upon its records to that effect, stating the reasons
therefor. To enable a larger number of small businesses, and minority,
and women contractors to effectively compete for department of
transportation contracts, the department may adopt rules providing for
bids and award of contracts for the performance of work, or furnishing
equipment, materials, supplies, or operating services whenever any work
is to be performed and the engineer's estimate indicates the cost of
the work would not exceed eighty thousand dollars and effective July 1,
2005, one hundred thousand dollars. The rules adopted under this
section:
(1) Shall provide for competitive bids to the extent that
competitive sources are available except when delay of performance
would jeopardize life or property or inconvenience the traveling
public; and
(2) Need not require the furnishing of a bid deposit nor a
performance bond, but if a performance bond is not required then
progress payments to the contractor may be required to be made based on
submittal of paid invoices to substantiate proof that disbursements
have been made to laborers, material suppliers, mechanics, and
subcontractors from the previous partial payment; and
(3) May establish prequalification standards and procedures as an
alternative to those set forth in RCW 47.28.070, but the
prequalification standards and procedures under RCW 47.28.070 shall
always be sufficient.
The department of transportation shall comply with such goals and
rules as may be adopted by the office of minority and women's business
enterprises to implement chapter 39.19 RCW with respect to contracts
entered into under this chapter. The department may adopt such rules
as may be necessary to comply with the rules adopted by the office of
minority and women's business enterprises under chapter 39.19 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The department shall develop a methodology
for giving public visibility to the cost service tradeoffs among
sailing schedules, crew schedules, crew costs, and operating costs with
a goal of enabling crew and passenger cost lowering suggestions to be
considered during each schedule development cycle. The methodology is
to be reported to the transportation committees of the legislature by
September 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The governor shall consult with the affected
unions to conduct a comprehensive review of the current array of
bargaining units and contracts associated with the Washington ferry
service with a view to proposing any appropriate improvements which may
assure the long-term viability of a career workforce within a cost-effective service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The sum of seven million three hundred
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated from the Puget Sound ferry operations account to the
department of transportation solely for the purposes of travel time
associated with Washington state ferries employees. The amounts
provided in this section are contingent upon the provision of data to
the legislature for a transparent analysis of travel pay policies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---