BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.39A.073 and 2009 c 580 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Effective ((January)) July 1, 2011, except as provided in RCW
18.88B.040, all persons employed as long-term care workers for the
elderly or persons with disabilities must meet the minimum training
requirements in this section within one hundred twenty calendar days of
employment.
(2) All persons employed as long-term care workers must obtain
seventy-five hours of entry-level training approved by the department.
A long-term care worker must accomplish five of these seventy-five
hours before becoming eligible to provide care.
(3) Training required by subsection (4)(c) of this section will be
applied towards training required under RCW 18.20.270 or 70.128.230 as
well as any statutory or regulatory training requirements for long-term
care workers employed by supportive living providers.
(4) Only training curriculum approved by the department may be used
to fulfill the training requirements specified in this section. The
seventy-five hours of entry-level training required shall be as
follows:
(a) Before a long-term care worker is eligible to provide care, he
or she must complete two hours of orientation training regarding his or
her role as caregiver and the applicable terms of employment;
(b) Before a long-term care worker is eligible to provide care, he
or she must complete three hours of safety training, including basic
safety precautions, emergency procedures, and infection control; and
(c) All long-term care workers must complete seventy hours of
long-term care basic training, including training related to core
competencies and population specific competencies.
(5) The department shall only approve training curriculum that:
(a) Has been developed with input from consumer and worker
representatives; and
(b) Requires comprehensive instruction by qualified instructors on
the competencies and training topics in this section.
(6) Individual providers under RCW 74.39A.270 shall be compensated
for training time required by this section.
(7) The department of health shall adopt rules by ((August 1,
2010)) January 1, 2011, to implement subsections (1), (2), and (3) of
this section.
(8) The department shall adopt rules by ((August 1, 2010)) January
1, 2011, to implement subsections (4) and (5) of this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.39A.075 and 2009 c 580 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Effective ((January)) July 1, 2011, a biological, step, or
adoptive parent who is the individual provider only for his or her
developmentally disabled son or daughter must receive twelve hours of
training relevant to the needs of adults with developmental
disabilities within the first one hundred twenty days of becoming an
individual provider.
(2) Effective ((January)) July 1, 2011, individual providers
identified in (a) and (b) of this subsection must complete thirty-five
hours of training within the first one hundred twenty days of becoming
an individual provider. Five of the thirty-five hours must be
completed before becoming eligible to provide care. Two of these five
hours shall be devoted to an orientation training regarding an
individual provider's role as caregiver and the applicable terms of
employment, and three hours shall be devoted to safety training,
including basic safety precautions, emergency procedures, and infection
control. Individual providers subject to this requirement include:
(a) An individual provider caring only for his or her biological,
step, or adoptive child or parent unless covered by subsection (1) of
this section; and
(b) Before January 1, 2014, a person hired as an individual
provider who provides twenty hours or less of care for one person in
any calendar month.
(3) Only training curriculum approved by the department may be used
to fulfill the training requirements specified in this section. The
department shall only approve training curriculum that:
(a) Has been developed with input from consumer and worker
representatives; and
(b) Requires comprehensive instruction by qualified instructors.
(4) The department shall adopt rules by ((August 1, 2010)) January
1, 2011, to implement this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.39A.085 and 2009 c 580 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall deny payment to any individual provider of
home care services who has not been certified by the department of
health as a home care aide as required under chapter ((2, Laws of
2009)) 18.88B RCW or, if exempted from certification by RCW 18.88B.040,
has not completed his or her required training pursuant to ((chapter 2,
Laws of 2009)) RCW 74.39A.075.
(2) The department may terminate the contract of any individual
provider of home care services, or take any other enforcement measure
deemed appropriate by the department if the individual provider's
certification is revoked under chapter ((2, Laws of 2009)) 18.88B RCW
or, if exempted from certification by RCW 18.88B.040, has not completed
his or her required training pursuant to ((chapter 2, Laws of 2009))
RCW 74.39A.075.
(3) The department shall take appropriate enforcement action
related to the contract of a private agency or facility licensed by the
state, to provide personal care services, other than an individual
provider, who knowingly employs a long-term care worker who is not a
certified home care aide as required under chapter ((2, Laws of 2009))
18.88B RCW or, if exempted from certification by RCW 18.88B.040, has
not completed his or her required training pursuant to ((chapter 2,
Laws of 2009)) RCW 74.39A.075.
(4) Chapter 34.05 RCW shall govern actions by the department under
this section.
(5) The department shall adopt rules by ((August 1, 2010)) January
1, 2011, to implement this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.39A.340 and 2009 c 580 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department of health shall ensure that all long-term care
workers shall complete twelve hours of continuing education training in
advanced training topics each year. This requirement applies beginning
on ((July 1, 2011)) January 1, 2012.
(2) Completion of continuing education as required in this section
is a prerequisite to maintaining home care aide certification under
chapter ((2, Laws of 2009)) 18.88B RCW.
(3) Unless voluntarily certified as a home care aide under chapter
((2, Laws of 2009)) 18.88B RCW, subsection (1) of this section does not
apply to:
(a) An individual provider caring only for his or her biological,
step, or adoptive child; and
(b) Before June 30, 2014, a person hired as an individual provider
who provides twenty hours or less of care for one person in any
calendar month.
(4) Only training curriculum approved by the department may be used
to fulfill the training requirements specified in this section. The
department shall only approve training curriculum that:
(a) Has been developed with input from consumer and worker
representatives; and
(b) Requires comprehensive instruction by qualified instructors.
(5) Individual providers under RCW 74.39A.270 shall be compensated
for training time required by this section.
(6) The department of health shall adopt rules by ((August 1,
2010)) January 1, 2011, to implement subsections (1), (2), and (3) of
this section.
(7) The department shall adopt rules by ((August 1, 2010)) January
1, 2011, to implement subsection (4) of this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.88B.020 and 2009 c 580 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Effective ((January)) July 1, 2011, except as provided in RCW
18.88B.040, the department of health shall require that any person
hired as a long-term care worker for the elderly or persons with
disabilities must be certified as a home care aide within one hundred
fifty days from the date of being hired.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 18.88B.040, certification as a home
care aide requires both completion of seventy-five hours of training
and successful completion of a certification examination pursuant to
RCW 74.39A.073 and 18.88B.030.
(3) No person may practice or, by use of any title or description,
represent himself or herself as a certified home care aide without
being certified pursuant to this chapter.
(4) The department of health shall adopt rules by ((August 1,
2010)) January 1, 2011, to implement this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.88B.040 and 2009 c 580 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following long-term care workers are not required to become a
certified home care aide pursuant to this chapter.
(1) Registered nurses, licensed practical nurses, certified nursing
assistants, medicare-certified home health aides, or other persons who
hold a similar health credential, as determined by the secretary of
health, or persons with special education training and an endorsement
granted by the superintendent of public instruction, as described in
RCW 28A.300.010, if the secretary of health determines that the
circumstances do not require certification. Individuals exempted by
this subsection may obtain certification as a home care aide from the
department of health without fulfilling the training requirements in
RCW 74.39A.073 but must successfully complete a certification
examination pursuant to RCW 18.88B.030.
(2) A person already employed as a long-term care worker prior to
((January)) July 1, 2011, who completes all of his or her training
requirements in effect as of the date he or she was hired, is not
required to obtain certification. Individuals exempted by this
subsection may obtain certification as a home care aide from the
department of health without fulfilling the training requirements in
RCW 74.39A.073 but must successfully complete a certification
examination pursuant to RCW 18.88B.030.
(3) All long-term care workers employed by supported living
providers are not required to obtain certification under this chapter.
(4) An individual provider caring only for his or her biological,
step, or adoptive child or parent is not required to obtain
certification under this chapter.
(5) Prior to June 30, 2014, a person hired as an individual
provider who provides twenty hours or less of care for one person in
any calendar month is not required to obtain certification under this
chapter.
(6) A long-term care worker exempted by this section from the
training requirements contained in RCW 74.39A.073 may not be prohibited
from enrolling in training pursuant to that section.
(7) The department of health shall adopt rules by ((August 1,
2010)) January 1, 2011, to implement this section.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.88B.050 and 2009 c 580 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs
uncertified practice, issuance of certificates, and the discipline of
persons with certificates under this chapter. The secretary of health
shall be the disciplinary authority under this chapter.
(2) The secretary of health may take action to immediately suspend
the certification of a long-term care worker upon finding that conduct
of the long-term care worker has caused or presents an imminent threat
of harm to a functionally disabled person in his or her care.
(3) If the secretary of health imposes suspension or conditions for
continuation of certification, the suspension or conditions for
continuation are effective immediately upon notice and shall continue
in effect pending the outcome of any hearing.
(4) The department of health shall take appropriate enforcement
action related to the licensure of a private agency or facility
licensed by the state, to provide personal care services, other than an
individual provider, who knowingly employs a long-term care worker who
is not a certified home care aide as required under this chapter or, if
exempted from certification by RCW 18.88B.040, has not completed his or
her required training pursuant to this chapter.
(5) Chapter 34.05 RCW shall govern actions by the department of
health under this section.
(6) The department of health shall adopt rules by ((August 1,
2010)) January 1, 2011, to implement this section.

Sec. 8 RCW 18.88A.115 and 2009 c 580 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
By ((August 1, 2010)) January 1, 2011, the department of health
shall develop, in consultation with the nursing care quality assurance
commission and consumer and worker representatives, rules permitting
reciprocity to the maximum extent possible under federal law between
home care aide certification and nursing assistant certification.

--- END ---