BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that text messaging is used in the
course of doing public business. The legislature also recognizes that
these messages are not retained by wireless service providers.
(2) Public agencies may not use text messaging functions on
publicly owned wireless devices unless those messages may be downloaded
and stored as public records.

--- END ---