BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 31.04.055 and 2001 c 81 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall issue and deliver a license to the applicant
to make loans in accordance with this chapter at the location specified
in the application if, after investigation, the director finds that:
(a) The applicant has paid all required fees;
(b) The applicant has submitted a complete application in
compliance with RCW 31.04.045;
(c) Neither the applicant nor its officers or principals have had
a license issued under this section or any other section, in this state
or another state, revoked or suspended within the last five years of
the date of filing of the application;
(d) Neither the applicant nor any of its officers or principals
have been convicted of a gross misdemeanor involving dishonesty or
financial misconduct or a felony or a violation of the banking laws of
this state or of the United States within seven years of the filing of
an application; ((and))
(e) Neither the applicant nor its officers or principals are a
director, officer, partner, agent, sole proprietor, owner, or principal
of (i) a check casher, licensed under chapter 31.45 RCW, that has a
small loan endorsement or (ii) a check seller, licensed under chapter
31.45 RCW, that has a small loan endorsement; and
(f) The financial responsibility, experience, character, and
general fitness of the applicant are such as to command the confidence
of the community and to warrant a belief that the business will be
operated honestly, fairly, and efficiently within the purposes of this
chapter.
(2) If the director does not find the conditions of subsection (1)
of this section have been met, the director shall not issue the
license. The director shall notify the applicant of the denial and
return to the applicant the bond posted and the sum paid by the
applicant as a license fee, retaining the investigation fee to cover
the costs of investigating the application. The director shall approve
or deny every application for license under this chapter within ninety
days from the filing of a complete application with the fees and the
approved bond.

--- END ---