BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 31.04 RCW
to read as follows:
No licensee may make a loan to a borrower under this chapter if
that borrower has an outstanding small loan with that licensee that was
made under chapter 31.45 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 31.45 RCW
to read as follows:
No licensee may make a small loan to a borrower under this chapter
if that borrower has an outstanding loan with that licensee that was
made under chapter 31.04 RCW.

--- END ---