BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature declares the following:
(1) Due to the recent economic crisis and the bursting of the
housing bubble, many homeowners find themselves in houses that are
worth less than their mortgages. The number of foreclosures in
Washington has increased dramatically and will likely continue to
increase for the next few years.
(2) Houses are worth more if they are kept or sold by their owners
than if they were foreclosed. When a bank forecloses on a house, the
house typically loses a great deal of value, as much as thirty percent
to fifty percent, not including the loss that the house has already
suffered because of the general economic downturn. Foreclosure can be
a time-consuming process, and empty houses are often difficult to
maintain. One badly maintained house can bring down the value of the
houses around it, leading to more homeowners having houses that are
worth less than the mortgages.
(3) The legislature intends to create incentives for lenders to
renegotiate loans for borrowers who have negative equity but who have
the ability to pay a lower mortgage that reflects the actual value of
the house.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 61.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, a shared appreciation loan
modification allows a borrower on a deed of trust for owner-occupied
residential real property who resides in a zip code zone where home
prices have dropped by at least twenty percent to have his or her loan
renegotiated to reflect the current market value of the home in
exchange for the beneficiary receiving up to fifty percent of the
future appreciation of the home. The future appreciation of the home
is determined by the price index of the home's zip code, as provided
under subsection (4) of this section. The modified loan amount under
the shared appreciation loan modification is equal to the previous loan
amount discounted by the percentage decline of the median house price
for the zip code. All other terms of the modified loan are not
changed, unless otherwise agreed by the parties.
(2) At least thirty days before the recording of a notice of sale
pursuant to RCW 61.24.040, a beneficiary must inform the borrower of
the option for a shared appreciation loan modification if:
(a) The property that is subject to a foreclosure sale is located
within a zip code zone in which the median house price has dropped by
at least twenty percent, as designated under subsection (4) of this
section;
(b) The debt under the borrower's current deed of trust on the
owner-occupied residential real property is greater than the real
property's market value; and
(c) The deed of trust is secured by the residential real property.
(3) If the borrower requests a shared appreciation loan
modification, the beneficiary must contact the borrower within thirty
days of the borrower's request and review with the borrower the
beneficiary's decision whether or not to enter into a shared
appreciation loan modification. Failure of the beneficiary to contact
the borrower under this subsection is a defense to any foreclosure.
(4)(a) Within twelve months after the effective date of this act,
the Washington state housing finance commission must create a statewide
list of zip codes where the median house price has dropped by at least
twenty percent from the peak prices of houses in that zip code. For
each zip code, the commission must provide median house prices starting
at the peak price and must update the list as often as practical.
(b) For the purpose of determining the future appreciation price of
the home, the house price index at the zip code level, as determined by
the commission's list, is the future appreciation price of the home as
of the date the borrower sells the home.
(5) A shared appreciation loan modification under this section is
not a sale or transfer for the purpose of the real estate excise tax
under chapter 82.45 RCW when the borrower on the shared appreciation
loan modification is the same borrower on the previous loan being
modified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.45 RCW
to read as follows:
A shared appreciation loan modification under section 2 of this act
is not a sale or transfer for the purpose of the real estate excise tax
when the borrower on the shared appreciation loan modification is the
same borrower on the previous loan being modified.

--- END ---