BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This chapter shall be known and cited as the
"Washington small business taxpayer bill of rights."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The legislature finds that taxes are one
of the most sensitive points of contact between citizens and their
government, and that there is a delicate balance between revenue
collection and taxpayers' rights and responsibilities.
(2) The legislature further finds that the Washington tax system is
based largely on voluntary compliance. The legislature also finds that
compliance is best achieved when: (a) The department provides accurate
tax information, instructions, and procedures to assist taxpayers to
voluntarily comply with applicable state excise tax laws; and (b)
taxpayers are not penalized for inadvertent mistakes.
(3) The legislature further finds that our excise tax system is
complicated and as a consequence, small businesses, often lacking
sophisticated tax advice, are especially at risk of making
unintentional mistakes with respect to their state tax obligations.
(4) The legislature intends to provide a small business taxpayer
bill of rights that: (a) Provides relief from unintentional mistakes
regarding state tax obligations; (b) requires the department to provide
information about a business's industry specific tax obligations at the
time of tax registration; and (c) requires the department to adhere to
any specific official written advice unless the department later
modifies the advice in writing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The department must administer this chapter.
The department must adopt rules as may be necessary to fully implement
this chapter and the rights established under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Small business taxpayers of the state of
Washington have:
(1) The right to receive industry specific tax guidance by the
department at the time the taxpayer initially registers his or her
business with the state;
(2) The right to a written explanation of the basis for any tax
deficiency assessments, interest, and penalties at the time the
assessments are issued;
(3) The right to have any interest and penalties on an assessment
waived if the assessment was a result of an unintentional act of the
taxpayer; and
(4) The right to rely on specific official written advice and
written tax reporting instructions from the department to that
taxpayer, and to have interest, penalties, and tax deficiency
assessments waived when the taxpayer has so relied to their proven
detriment unless the department provided later written tax reporting
instructions modifying the initial instructions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definition in this section applies throughout this
chapter.
"Small business taxpayer" means: (1) A taxpayer operating as a
sole proprietorship; (2) a taxpayer in its first year of business
operations and operating as a limited liability business where the
initial capital contributions to the business were less than five
hundred thousand dollars; or (3) a taxpayer with less than five hundred
thousand dollars in gross income in the prior calendar year.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.32.105 and 1998 c 304 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the department ((of revenue)) finds that the payment by a
taxpayer of a tax less than that properly due or the failure of a
taxpayer to pay any tax by the due date was the result of circumstances
beyond the control of the taxpayer, the department ((of revenue shall))
must waive or cancel any penalties imposed under this chapter with
respect to such tax.
(2) The department ((shall)) must waive or cancel the penalty
imposed under RCW 82.32.090(1) when the circumstances under which the
delinquency occurred do not qualify for waiver or cancellation under
subsection (1) of this section if:
(a) The taxpayer requests the waiver for a tax return required to
be filed under RCW 82.32.045, 82.14B.061, 82.23B.020, 82.27.060,
82.29A.050, or 84.33.086; and
(b) The taxpayer has timely filed and remitted payment on all tax
returns due for that tax program for a period of twenty-four months
immediately preceding the period covered by the return for which the
waiver is being requested.
(3) The department ((shall)) must waive or cancel interest imposed
under this chapter if:
(a) The failure to timely pay the tax was the direct result of
written instructions given the taxpayer by the department; or
(b) The extension of a due date for payment of an assessment of
deficiency was not at the request of the taxpayer and was for the sole
convenience of the department.
(4) The department must waive or cancel interest and penalties
imposed under this chapter for a small business taxpayer if the failure
to pay taxes due was not intentional. For the purposes of this
subsection, "small business taxpayer" has the same meaning as provided
in section 5 of this act.
(5) The department ((of revenue shall)) must adopt rules for the
waiver or cancellation of penalties and interest imposed by this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

--- END ---