BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 132 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:
(1) RCW 17.21.230 (Pesticide advisory board) and 1994 c 283 s 26,
1989 c 380 s 54, 1988 c 36 s 8, 1974 ex.s. c 20 s 1, 1971 ex.s. c 191
s 8, 1967 c 177 s 14, & 1961 c 249 s 23;
(2) RCW 17.21.240 (Pesticide advisory board -- Vacancies) and 1994 c
283 s 27, 1989 c 380 s 55, & 1961 c 249 s 24;
(3) RCW 17.21.250 (Pesticide advisory board -- Duties) and 1989 c 380
s 56 & 1961 c 249 s 25;
(4) RCW 17.21.260 (Pesticide advisory board -- Officers, meetings)
and 1994 c 283 s 28, 1989 c 380 s 57, & 1961 c 249 s 26; and
(5) RCW 17.21.270 (Pesticide advisory board -- Travel expenses) and
1989 c 380 s 58, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 24, & 1961 c 249 s 27((; and
(6) RCW 70.104.080 (Pesticide panel -- Generally) and 1994 c 264 s
41, 1991 c 3 s 363, & 1989 c 380 s 68)).

Sec. 2 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 150 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
Sections 1 through 118, ((125)) 120 through 122, and 124 through
((135, and 141 through 146)) 150 of ((this act)) chapter 7, Laws of
2010 1st sp. sess. are necessary for the immediate preservation of the
public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and
its existing public institutions, and take effect June 30, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 151 (uncodified) is
hereby repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
June 30, 2010.

--- END ---