BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 6.17.160 and 2007 c 37 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
The sheriff to whom the writ is directed and delivered shall
execute the same without delay as follows:
(1) Real property, including a vendee's interests under a real
estate contract, shall be levied on by recording a copy of the writ,
together with a description of the property attached, with the
recording officer of the county in which the real estate is situated.
(2) Personal property, capable of manual delivery, shall be levied
on by taking into custody. If the property or any part of it may be
concealed in a building or enclosure, the sheriff may publicly demand
delivery of the property. If the property is not delivered and if the
order of execution so directs, the sheriff may cause the building or
enclosure to be broken open and take possession of the property.
(3) Shares of stock and other investment securities shall be levied
on in accordance with the requirements of RCW ((62A.8-317)) 62A.8-112.
(4) A fund in court shall be levied on by leaving a copy of the
writ with the clerk of the court with notice in writing specifying the
fund.
(5) A franchise granted by a public or quasi-public corporation
shall be levied on by (a) serving a copy of the writ on, or mailing it
to, the judgment debtor as required by RCW 6.17.130 and (b) filing a
copy of the writ in the office of the auditor of the county in which
the franchise was granted together with a notice in writing that the
franchise has been levied on to be sold, specifying the time and place
of sale, the name of the owner, the amount of the judgment for which
the franchise is to be sold, and the name of the judgment creditor.
(6) A vendor's interest under a real estate contract shall be
levied on by (a) recording a copy of the writ, with descriptions of the
contract and of the real property covered by the contract, with the
recording officer of the county in which the real estate is located and
(b) serving a copy of the writ, with a copy of the descriptions, on, or
mailing the same to, the judgment debtor and the vendee under the
contract in the manner as described in RCW 6.17.130.
(7) Other intangible personal property may be levied on by serving
a copy of the writ on, or mailing it to, the judgment debtor in the
manner as required by RCW 6.17.130, together with a description of the
property. If the property is a claim on which suit has been commenced,
a copy of the writ and of the description shall also be filed with the
clerk of the court in which the suit is pending.

Sec. 2 RCW 6.27.140 and 2009 c 521 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The notice required by RCW 6.27.130(1) to be mailed to or
served on an individual judgment debtor shall be in the following form,
printed or typed in type no smaller than elite type:

NOTICE OF GARNISHMENT
AND OF YOUR RIGHTS

A Writ of Garnishment issued in a Washington court has been or
will be served on the garnishee named in the attached copy of
the writ. After receipt of the writ, the garnishee is required
to withhold payment of any money that was due to you and to
withhold any other property of yours that the garnishee held or
controlled. This notice of your rights is required by law.

YOU HAVE THE FOLLOWING EXEMPTION RIGHTS:

WAGES. If the garnishee is your employer who owes wages or
other personal earnings to you, your employer is required to
pay amounts to you that are exempt under state and federal
laws, as explained in the writ of garnishment. You should
receive a copy of your employer's answer, which will show how
the exempt amount was calculated. If the garnishment is for
child support, the exempt amount paid to you will be forty
percent of wages due you, but if you are supporting a spouse,
state registered domestic partner, or dependent child, you are
entitled to claim an additional ten percent as exempt.

BANK ACCOUNTS. If the garnishee is a bank or other institution
with which you have an account in which you have deposited
benefits such as Temporary Assistance for Needy Families,
Supplemental Security Income (SSI), Social Security, veterans'
benefits, unemployment compensation, or a United States
pension, you may claim the account as fully exempt if you have
deposited only such benefit funds in the account. It may be
partially exempt even though you have deposited money from
other sources in the same account. An exemption is also
available under RCW 26.16.200, providing that funds in a
community bank account that can be identified as the earnings
of a stepparent are exempt from a garnishment on the child
support obligation of the parent.

OTHER EXEMPTIONS. If the garnishee holds other property of
yours, some or all of it may be exempt under RCW 6.15.010, a
Washington statute that exempts ((up to five hundred dollars
of)) certain property of your choice (including ((up to one
hundred dollars in)) specified cash or money in a bank account)
and certain other property such as household furnishings, tools
of trade, and a motor vehicle (all limited by differing dollar
values).

HOW TO CLAIM EXEMPTIONS. Fill out the enclosed claim form and
mail or deliver it as described in instructions on the claim
form. If the plaintiff does not object to your claim, the
funds or other property that you have claimed as exempt must be
released not later than 10 days after the plaintiff receives
your claim form. If the plaintiff objects, the law requires a
hearing not later than 14 days after the plaintiff receives
your claim form, and notice of the objection and hearing date
will be mailed to you at the address that you put on the claim
form.

THE LAW ALSO PROVIDES OTHER EXEMPTION RIGHTS. IF NECESSARY, AN
ATTORNEY CAN ASSIST YOU TO ASSERT THESE AND OTHER RIGHTS, BUT
YOU MUST ACT IMMEDIATELY TO AVOID LOSS OF RIGHTS BY DELAY.

(2) The claim form required by RCW 6.27.130(1) to be mailed to or
served on an individual judgment debtor shall be in the following form,
printed or typed in type no smaller than elite type:

CAUTION: If the plaintiff objects to your claim, you will have to
go to court and give proof of your claim. For example, if you claim
that a bank account is exempt, you may have to show the judge your bank
statements and papers that show the source of the money you deposited
in the bank. Your claim may be granted more quickly if you attach
copies of such proof to your claim.

IF THE JUDGE DENIES YOUR EXEMPTION CLAIM, YOU WILL HAVE TO PAY THE
PLAINTIFF'S COSTS. IF THE JUDGE DECIDES THAT YOU DID NOT MAKE THE
CLAIM IN GOOD FAITH, HE OR SHE MAY DECIDE THAT YOU MUST PAY THE
PLAINTIFF'S ATTORNEY FEES.

Sec. 3 RCW 24.55.075 and 2009 c 436 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the electronic
signatures in global and national commerce act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001 et
seq.), but does not modify, limit, or supersede 15 U.S.C. Sec.
7001(((a))) (c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices
described in 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7003(b).

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.67.030 and 2009 c 296 s 2 and 2009 c 564 s 1804
are each reenacted to read as follows:
(1) All payments received from a participant in the Washington
customized employment training program created in RCW 28B.67.020 shall
be deposited into the employment training finance account, which is
hereby created in the custody of the state treasurer. Only the state
board for community and technical colleges may authorize expenditures
from the account and no appropriation is required for expenditures.
The money in the account must be used solely for training allowances
under the Washington customized employment training program created in
RCW 28B.67.020 and for providing up to seventy-five thousand dollars
per year for training, marketing, and facilitation services to increase
the use of the program. The deposit of payments under this section
from a participant shall cease when the board specifies that the
participant has met the monetary obligations of the program. During
the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the
employment training finance account to the state general fund such
amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the account.
(2) All revenue solicited and received under the provisions of RCW
28B.67.020(4) shall be deposited into the employment training finance
account to provide training allowances.
(3) The definitions in RCW 28B.67.010 apply to this section.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2012.

Sec. 5 RCW 36.16.050 and 1991 c 363 s 49 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every county official before he or she enters upon the duties of
his or her office shall furnish a bond conditioned that he or she will
faithfully perform the duties of his or her office and account for and
pay over all money which may come into his or her hands by virtue of
his or her office, and that he or she, or his or her executors or
administrators, will deliver to his or her successor safe and undefaced
all books, records, papers, seals, equipment, and furniture belonging
to his or her office. Bonds of elective county officers shall be as
follows:
(1) Assessor: Amount to be fixed and sureties to be approved by
proper county legislative authority;
(2) Auditor: Amount to be fixed at not less than ten thousand
dollars and sureties to be approved by the proper county legislative
authority;
(3) Clerk: Amount to be fixed in a penal sum not less than double
the amount of money liable to come into his or her hands and sureties
to be approved by the judge or a majority of the judges presiding over
the court of which he or she is clerk: PROVIDED, That the maximum bond
fixed for the clerk shall not exceed in amount that required for the
treasurer in ((a)) the same county ((of that class));
(4) Coroner: Amount to be fixed at not less than five thousand
dollars with sureties to be approved by the proper county legislative
authority;
(5) Members of the proper county legislative authority: Sureties
to be approved by the county clerk and the amounts to be:
(a) In each county with a population of one hundred twenty-five
thousand or more, twenty-five thousand dollars;
(b) In each county with a population of from seventy thousand to
less than one hundred twenty-five thousand, twenty-two thousand five
hundred dollars;
(c) In each county with a population of from forty (([thousand]))
thousand to less than seventy thousand, twenty thousand dollars;
(d) In each county with a population of from eighteen thousand to
less than forty thousand, fifteen thousand dollars;
(e) In each county with a population of from twelve thousand to
less than eighteen thousand, ten thousand dollars;
(f) In each county with a population of from eight thousand to less
than twelve thousand, seven thousand five hundred dollars;
(g) In all other counties, five thousand dollars;
(6) Prosecuting attorney: In the amount of five thousand dollars
with sureties to be approved by the proper county legislative
authority;
(7) Sheriff: Amount to be fixed and bond approved by the proper
county legislative authority at not less than five thousand nor more
than fifty thousand dollars; surety to be a surety company authorized
to do business in this state;
(8) Treasurer: Sureties to be approved by the proper county
legislative authority and the amounts to be fixed by the proper county
legislative authority at double the amount liable to come into the
treasurer's hands during his or her term, the maximum amount of the
bond, however, not to exceed:
(a) In each county with a population of two hundred ten thousand or
more, two hundred fifty thousand dollars;
(b) In each county with a population of from one hundred twenty-five thousand to less than two hundred ten thousand, two hundred
thousand dollars;
(c) In each county with a population of from eighteen thousand to
less than one hundred twenty-five thousand, one hundred fifty thousand
dollars;
(d) In all other counties, one hundred thousand dollars.
The treasurer's bond shall be conditioned that all moneys received
by him or her for the use of the county shall be paid as the proper
county legislative authority shall from time to time direct, except
where special provision is made by law for the payment of such moneys,
by order of any court, or otherwise, and for the faithful discharge of
his or her duties.
Bonds for other than elective officials, if deemed necessary by the
proper county legislative authority, shall be in such amount and form
as such legislative authority shall determine.
In the approval of official bonds, the chair may act for the county
legislative authority if it is not in session.

Sec. 6 RCW 36.70A.070 and 2005 c 360 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The comprehensive plan of a county or city that is required or
chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall consist of a map or maps,
and descriptive text covering objectives, principles, and standards
used to develop the comprehensive plan. The plan shall be an
internally consistent document and all elements shall be consistent
with the future land use map. A comprehensive plan shall be adopted
and amended with public participation as provided in RCW 36.70A.140.
Each comprehensive plan shall include a plan, scheme, or design for
each of the following:
(1) A land use element designating the proposed general
distribution and general location and extent of the uses of land, where
appropriate, for agriculture, timber production, housing, commerce,
industry, recreation, open spaces, general aviation airports, public
utilities, public facilities, and other land uses. The land use
element shall include population densities, building intensities, and
estimates of future population growth. The land use element shall
provide for protection of the quality and quantity of groundwater used
for public water supplies. Wherever possible, the land use element
should consider utilizing urban planning approaches that promote
physical activity. Where applicable, the land use element shall review
drainage, flooding, and storm water run-off in the area and nearby
jurisdictions and provide guidance for corrective actions to mitigate
or cleanse those discharges that pollute waters of the state, including
Puget Sound or waters entering Puget Sound.
(2) A housing element ensuring the vitality and character of
established residential neighborhoods that: (a) Includes an inventory
and analysis of existing and projected housing needs that identifies
the number of housing units necessary to manage projected growth; (b)
includes a statement of goals, policies, objectives, and mandatory
provisions for the preservation, improvement, and development of
housing, including single-family residences; (c) identifies sufficient
land for housing, including, but not limited to, government-assisted
housing, housing for low-income families, manufactured housing,
multifamily housing, and group homes and foster care facilities; and
(d) makes adequate provisions for existing and projected needs of all
economic segments of the community.
(3) A capital facilities plan element consisting of: (a) An
inventory of existing capital facilities owned by public entities,
showing the locations and capacities of the capital facilities; (b) a
forecast of the future needs for such capital facilities; (c) the
proposed locations and capacities of expanded or new capital
facilities; (d) at least a six-year plan that will finance such capital
facilities within projected funding capacities and clearly identifies
sources of public money for such purposes; and (e) a requirement to
reassess the land use element if probable funding falls short of
meeting existing needs and to ensure that the land use element, capital
facilities plan element, and financing plan within the capital
facilities plan element are coordinated and consistent. Park and
recreation facilities shall be included in the capital facilities plan
element.
(4) A utilities element consisting of the general location,
proposed location, and capacity of all existing and proposed utilities,
including, but not limited to, electrical lines, telecommunication
lines, and natural gas lines.
(5) Rural element. Counties shall include a rural element
including lands that are not designated for urban growth, agriculture,
forest, or mineral resources. The following provisions shall apply to
the rural element:
(a) Growth management act goals and local circumstances. Because
circumstances vary from county to county, in establishing patterns of
rural densities and uses, a county may consider local circumstances,
but shall develop a written record explaining how the rural element
harmonizes the planning goals in RCW 36.70A.020 and meets the
requirements of this chapter.
(b) Rural development. The rural element shall permit rural
development, forestry, and agriculture in rural areas. The rural
element shall provide for a variety of rural densities, uses, essential
public facilities, and rural governmental services needed to serve the
permitted densities and uses. To achieve a variety of rural densities
and uses, counties may provide for clustering, density transfer, design
guidelines, conservation easements, and other innovative techniques
that will accommodate appropriate rural densities and uses that are not
characterized by urban growth and that are consistent with rural
character.
(c) Measures governing rural development. The rural element shall
include measures that apply to rural development and protect the rural
character of the area, as established by the county, by:
(i) Containing or otherwise controlling rural development;
(ii) Assuring visual compatibility of rural development with the
surrounding rural area;
(iii) Reducing the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land
into sprawling, low-density development in the rural area;
(iv) Protecting critical areas, as provided in RCW 36.70A.060, and
surface water and groundwater resources; and
(v) Protecting against conflicts with the use of agricultural,
forest, and mineral resource lands designated under RCW 36.70A.170.
(d) Limited areas of more intensive rural development. Subject to
the requirements of this subsection and except as otherwise
specifically provided in this subsection (5)(d), the rural element may
allow for limited areas of more intensive rural development, including
necessary public facilities and public services to serve the limited
area as follows:
(i) Rural development consisting of the infill, development, or
redevelopment of existing commercial, industrial, residential, or
mixed-use areas, whether characterized as shoreline development,
villages, hamlets, rural activity centers, or crossroads developments.
(A) A commercial, industrial, residential, shoreline, or mixed-use
area shall be subject to the requirements of (d)(iv) of this
subsection, but shall not be subject to the requirements of (c)(ii) and
(iii) of this subsection.
(B) Any development or redevelopment other than an industrial area
or an industrial use within a mixed-use area or an industrial area
under this subsection (5)(d)(i) must be principally designed to serve
the existing and projected rural population.
(C) Any development or redevelopment in terms of building size,
scale, use, or intensity shall be consistent with the character of the
existing areas. Development and redevelopment may include changes in
use from vacant land or a previously existing use so long as the new
use conforms to the requirements of this subsection (5);
(ii) The intensification of development on lots containing, or new
development of, small-scale recreational or tourist uses, including
commercial facilities to serve those recreational or tourist uses, that
rely on a rural location and setting, but that do not include new
residential development. A small-scale recreation or tourist use is
not required to be principally designed to serve the existing and
projected rural population. Public services and public facilities
shall be limited to those necessary to serve the recreation or tourist
use and shall be provided in a manner that does not permit low-density
sprawl;
(iii) The intensification of development on lots containing
isolated nonresidential uses or new development of isolated cottage
industries and isolated small-scale businesses that are not principally
designed to serve the existing and projected rural population and
nonresidential uses, but do provide job opportunities for rural
residents. Rural counties may allow the expansion of small-scale
businesses as long as those small-scale businesses conform with the
rural character of the area as defined by the local government
according to RCW 36.70A.030(((14))) (15). Rural counties may also
allow new small-scale businesses to utilize a site previously occupied
by an existing business as long as the new small-scale business
conforms to the rural character of the area as defined by the local
government according to RCW 36.70A.030(((14))) (15). Public services
and public facilities shall be limited to those necessary to serve the
isolated nonresidential use and shall be provided in a manner that does
not permit low-density sprawl;
(iv) A county shall adopt measures to minimize and contain the
existing areas or uses of more intensive rural development, as
appropriate, authorized under this subsection. Lands included in such
existing areas or uses shall not extend beyond the logical outer
boundary of the existing area or use, thereby allowing a new pattern of
low-density sprawl. Existing areas are those that are clearly
identifiable and contained and where there is a logical boundary
delineated predominately by the built environment, but that may also
include undeveloped lands if limited as provided in this subsection.
The county shall establish the logical outer boundary of an area of
more intensive rural development. In establishing the logical outer
boundary, the county shall address (A) the need to preserve the
character of existing natural neighborhoods and communities, (B)
physical boundaries, such as bodies of water, streets and highways, and
land forms and contours, (C) the prevention of abnormally irregular
boundaries, and (D) the ability to provide public facilities and public
services in a manner that does not permit low-density sprawl;
(v) For purposes of (d) of this subsection, an existing area or
existing use is one that was in existence:
(A) On July 1, 1990, in a county that was initially required to
plan under all of the provisions of this chapter;
(B) On the date the county adopted a resolution under RCW
36.70A.040(2), in a county that is planning under all of the provisions
of this chapter under RCW 36.70A.040(2); or
(C) On the date the office of financial management certifies the
county's population as provided in RCW 36.70A.040(5), in a county that
is planning under all of the provisions of this chapter pursuant to RCW
36.70A.040(5).
(e) Exception. This subsection shall not be interpreted to permit
in the rural area a major industrial development or a master planned
resort unless otherwise specifically permitted under RCW 36.70A.360 and
36.70A.365.
(6) A transportation element that implements, and is consistent
with, the land use element.
(a) The transportation element shall include the following
subelements:
(i) Land use assumptions used in estimating travel;
(ii) Estimated traffic impacts to state-owned transportation
facilities resulting from land use assumptions to assist the department
of transportation in monitoring the performance of state facilities, to
plan improvements for the facilities, and to assess the impact of land-use decisions on state-owned transportation facilities;
(iii) Facilities and services needs, including:
(A) An inventory of air, water, and ground transportation
facilities and services, including transit alignments and general
aviation airport facilities, to define existing capital facilities and
travel levels as a basis for future planning. This inventory must
include state-owned transportation facilities within the city or
county's jurisdictional boundaries;
(B) Level of service standards for all locally owned arterials and
transit routes to serve as a gauge to judge performance of the system.
These standards should be regionally coordinated;
(C) For state-owned transportation facilities, level of service
standards for highways, as prescribed in chapters 47.06 and 47.80 RCW,
to gauge the performance of the system. The purposes of reflecting
level of service standards for state highways in the local
comprehensive plan are to monitor the performance of the system, to
evaluate improvement strategies, and to facilitate coordination between
the county's or city's six-year street, road, or transit program and
the ((department of transportation's six-year)) office of financial
management's ten-year investment program. The concurrency requirements
of (b) of this subsection do not apply to transportation facilities and
services of statewide significance except for counties consisting of
islands whose only connection to the mainland are state highways or
ferry routes. In these island counties, state highways and ferry route
capacity must be a factor in meeting the concurrency requirements in
(b) of this subsection;
(D) Specific actions and requirements for bringing into compliance
locally owned transportation facilities or services that are below an
established level of service standard;
(E) Forecasts of traffic for at least ten years based on the
adopted land use plan to provide information on the location, timing,
and capacity needs of future growth;
(F) Identification of state and local system needs to meet current
and future demands. Identified needs on state-owned transportation
facilities must be consistent with the statewide multimodal
transportation plan required under chapter 47.06 RCW;
(iv) Finance, including:
(A) An analysis of funding capability to judge needs against
probable funding resources;
(B) A multiyear financing plan based on the needs identified in the
comprehensive plan, the appropriate parts of which shall serve as the
basis for the six-year street, road, or transit program required by RCW
35.77.010 for cities, RCW 36.81.121 for counties, and RCW 35.58.2795
for public transportation systems. The multiyear financing plan should
be coordinated with the ((six-year improvement)) ten-year investment
program developed by the ((department of transportation)) office of
financial management as required by RCW 47.05.030;
(C) If probable funding falls short of meeting identified needs, a
discussion of how additional funding will be raised, or how land use
assumptions will be reassessed to ensure that level of service
standards will be met;
(v) Intergovernmental coordination efforts, including an assessment
of the impacts of the transportation plan and land use assumptions on
the transportation systems of adjacent jurisdictions;
(vi) Demand-management strategies;
(vii) Pedestrian and bicycle component to include collaborative
efforts to identify and designate planned improvements for pedestrian
and bicycle facilities and corridors that address and encourage
enhanced community access and promote healthy lifestyles.
(b) After adoption of the comprehensive plan by jurisdictions
required to plan or who choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, local
jurisdictions must adopt and enforce ordinances which prohibit
development approval if the development causes the level of service on
a locally owned transportation facility to decline below the standards
adopted in the transportation element of the comprehensive plan, unless
transportation improvements or strategies to accommodate the impacts of
development are made concurrent with the development. These strategies
may include increased public transportation service, ride sharing
programs, demand management, and other transportation systems
management strategies. For the purposes of this subsection (6),
"concurrent with the development" ((shall)) means that improvements or
strategies are in place at the time of development, or that a financial
commitment is in place to complete the improvements or strategies
within six years.
(c) The transportation element described in this subsection (6),
((and)) the six-year plans required by RCW 35.77.010 for cities, RCW
36.81.121 for counties, and RCW 35.58.2795 for public transportation
systems, and the ten-year investment program required by RCW 47.05.030
for the state, must be consistent.
(7) An economic development element establishing local goals,
policies, objectives, and provisions for economic growth and vitality
and a high quality of life. The element shall include: (a) A summary
of the local economy such as population, employment, payroll, sectors,
businesses, sales, and other information as appropriate; (b) a summary
of the strengths and weaknesses of the local economy defined as the
commercial and industrial sectors and supporting factors such as land
use, transportation, utilities, education, workforce, housing, and
natural/cultural resources; and (c) an identification of policies,
programs, and projects to foster economic growth and development and to
address future needs. A city that has chosen to be a residential
community is exempt from the economic development element requirement
of this subsection.
(8) A park and recreation element that implements, and is
consistent with, the capital facilities plan element as it relates to
park and recreation facilities. The element shall include: (a)
Estimates of park and recreation demand for at least a ten-year period;
(b) an evaluation of facilities and service needs; and (c) an
evaluation of intergovernmental coordination opportunities to provide
regional approaches for meeting park and recreational demand.
(9) It is the intent that new or amended elements required after
January 1, 2002, be adopted concurrent with the scheduled update
provided in RCW 36.70A.130. Requirements to incorporate any such new
or amended elements shall be null and void until funds sufficient to
cover applicable local government costs are appropriated and
distributed by the state at least two years before local government
must update comprehensive plans as required in RCW 36.70A.130.

Sec. 7 RCW 41.45.150 and 2009 c 561 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2009, and ending June 30, 2015, maximum
annual contribution rates are established for the portion of the
employer contribution rate for the public employees' retirement system
and the public safety employees' retirement system that is used for the
sole purpose of amortizing that portion of the unfunded actuarial
accrued liability in the public employees' retirement system plan 1
that excludes any amounts required to amortize plan 1 benefit
improvements effective after June 30, 2009. The maximum rates are:

Fiscal Year ending:

2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015

1.25% 1.25% 3.75% 4.50% 5.25% 6.00%

(2) Beginning September 1, 2009, and ending August 31, 2015,
maximum annual contribution rates are established for the portion of
the employer contribution rate for the school employees' retirement
system that is used for the sole purpose of amortizing that portion of
the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 that excludes any amounts required to amortize
plan 1 benefit improvements effective after June 30, 2009. The maximum
rates are:

Fiscal Year ending:

2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015

1.25% 1.25% 3.75% 4.50% 5.25% 6.00%

(3) Beginning September 1, 2009, and ending August 31, 2015,
maximum annual contribution rates are established for the portion of
the employer contribution rate for the teachers' retirement system that
is used for the sole purpose of amortizing that portion of the unfunded
actuarial accrued liability in the teachers' retirement system plan 1
that excludes any amounts required to amortize plan 1 benefit
improvements effective after June 30, 2009. The maximum rates are:

Fiscal Year ending:

2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015

2.04% 2.04% 6.50% 7.50% 8.50% 9.50%

(4) Beginning July 1, 2015, a minimum 5.25 percent contribution is
established as part of the basic employer contribution rate for the
public employees' retirement system and the public safety employees'
retirement system, to be used for the sole purpose of amortizing that
portion of the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 that excludes any amounts required
to amortize plan 1 benefit improvements effective after June 30, 2009.
This minimum contribution rate shall remain effective until the
actuarial value of assets in plan 1 of the public employees' retirement
system equals one hundred ((twenty-five)) percent of the actuarial
accrued liability.
(5) Beginning September 1, 2015, a minimum 5.25 percent
contribution is established as part of the basic employer contribution
rate for the school employees' retirement system, to be used for the
sole purpose of amortizing that portion of the unfunded actuarial
accrued liability in the public employees' retirement system plan 1
that excludes any amounts required to amortize plan 1 benefit
improvements effective after June 30, 2009. This minimum contribution
rate shall remain effective until the actuarial value of assets in plan
1 of the public employees' retirement system equals one hundred percent
of the actuarial accrued liability.
(6) Beginning September 1, 2015, a minimum 8.00 percent
contribution is established as part of the basic employer contribution
rate for the teachers' retirement system, to be used for the sole
purpose of amortizing that portion of the unfunded actuarial accrued
liability in the teachers' retirement system plan 1 that excludes any
amounts required to amortize plan 1 benefit improvements effective
after June 30, 2009. This minimum contribution rate shall remain
effective until the actuarial value of assets in plan 1 of the
teachers' retirement system equals one hundred percent of the actuarial
accrued liability.
(7) Upon completion of each biennial actuarial valuation, the state
actuary shall review the appropriateness of the minimum contribution
rates and recommend to the council any adjustments as may be needed due
to material changes in benefits or actuarial assumptions, methods, or
experience. Any changes adopted by the council shall be subject to
revision by the legislature.

Sec. 8 RCW 67.28.180 and 2007 c 189 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the conditions set forth in subsections (2) and (3)
of this section, the legislative body of any county or any city, is
authorized to levy and collect a special excise tax of not to exceed
two percent on the sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging
that is subject to tax under chapter 82.08 RCW.
(2) Any levy authorized by this section shall be subject to the
following:
(a) Any county ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to this
section shall contain, in addition to all other provisions required to
conform to this chapter, a provision allowing a credit against the
county tax for the full amount of any city tax imposed pursuant to this
section upon the same taxable event.
(b) In the event that any county has levied the tax authorized by
this section and has, prior to June 26, 1975, either pledged the tax
revenues for payment of principal and interest on city revenue or
general obligation bonds authorized and issued pursuant to RCW
67.28.150 through 67.28.160 or has authorized and issued revenue or
general obligation bonds pursuant to the provisions of RCW 67.28.150
through 67.28.160, such county shall be exempt from the provisions of
(a) of this subsection, to the extent that the tax revenues are pledged
for payment of principal and interest on bonds issued at any time
pursuant to the provisions of RCW 67.28.150 through 67.28.160:
PROVIDED, That so much of such pledged tax revenues, together with any
investment earnings thereon, not immediately necessary for actual
payment of principal and interest on such bonds may be used: (i) In
any county with a population of one million or more, for repayment
either of limited tax levy general obligation bonds or of any county
fund or account from which a loan was made, the proceeds from the bonds
or loan being used to pay for constructing, installing, improving, and
equipping stadium capital improvement projects, and to pay for any
engineering, planning, financial, legal and professional services
incident to the development of such stadium capital improvement
projects, regardless of the date the debt for such capital improvement
projects was or may be incurred; (ii) in any county with a population
of one million or more, for repayment or refinancing of bonded
indebtedness incurred prior to January 1, 1997, for any purpose
authorized by this section or relating to stadium repairs or
rehabilitation, including but not limited to the cost of settling legal
claims, reimbursing operating funds, interest payments on short-term
loans, and any other purpose for which such debt has been incurred if
the county has created a public stadium authority to develop a stadium
and exhibition center under RCW 36.102.030; or (iii) in other counties,
for county-owned facilities for agricultural promotion until January 1,
2009, and thereafter for any purpose authorized in this chapter.
A county is exempt under this subsection with respect to city
revenue or general obligation bonds issued after April 1, 1991, only if
such bonds mature before January 1, 2013. If any county located east
of the crest of the Cascade mountains has levied the tax authorized by
this section and has, prior to June 26, 1975, pledged the tax revenue
for payment of principal and interest on city revenue or general
obligation bonds, the county is exempt under this subsection with
respect to revenue or general obligation bonds issued after January 1,
2007, only if the bonds mature before January 1, 2021. Such a county
may only use funds under this subsection (2)(b) for constructing or
improving facilities authorized under this chapter, including county-owned facilities for agricultural promotion, and must perform an annual
financial audit of organizations receiving funding on the use of the
funds.
As used in this subsection (2)(b), "capital improvement projects"
may include, but not be limited to a stadium restaurant facility,
restroom facilities, artificial turf system, seating facilities,
parking facilities and scoreboard and information system adjacent to or
within a county owned stadium, together with equipment, utilities,
accessories and appurtenances necessary thereto. The stadium
restaurant authorized by this subsection (2)(b) shall be operated by a
private concessionaire under a contract with the county.
(c)(i) No city within a county exempt under subsection (2)(b) of
this section may levy the tax authorized by this section so long as
said county is so exempt.
(ii) If bonds have been issued under RCW 43.99N.020 and any
necessary property transfers have been made under RCW 36.102.100, no
city within a county with a population of one million or more may levy
the tax authorized by this section before January 1, 2021.
(iii) However, in the event that any city in a county described in
(i) or (ii) of this subsection (2)(c) has levied the tax authorized by
this section and has, prior to June 26, 1975, authorized and issued
revenue or general obligation bonds pursuant to the provisions of RCW
67.28.150 through 67.28.160, such city may levy the tax so long as the
tax revenues are pledged for payment of principal and interest on bonds
issued at any time pursuant to the provisions of RCW 67.28.150 through
67.28.160.
(3) Any levy authorized by this section by a county that has levied
the tax authorized by this section and has, prior to June 26, 1975,
either pledged the tax revenues for payment of principal and interest
on city revenue or general obligation bonds authorized and issued
pursuant to RCW 67.28.150 through 67.28.160 or has authorized and
issued revenue or general obligation bonds pursuant to the provisions
of RCW 67.28.150 through 67.28.160 shall be subject to the following:
(a) Taxes collected under this section in any calendar year before
2013 in excess of five million three hundred thousand dollars shall
only be used as follows:
(i) Seventy-five percent from January 1, 1992, through December 31,
2000, and seventy percent from January 1, 2001, through December 31,
2012, for art museums, cultural museums, heritage museums, the arts,
and the performing arts. Moneys spent under this subsection (3)(a)(i)
shall be used for the purposes of this subsection (3)(a)(i) in all
parts of the county.
(ii) Twenty-five percent from January 1, 1992, through December 31,
2000, and thirty percent from January 1, 2001, through December 31,
2012, for the following purposes and in a manner reflecting the
following order of priority: Stadium purposes as authorized under
subsection (2)(b) of this section; acquisition of open space lands;
youth sports activities; and tourism promotion. If all or part of the
debt on the stadium is refinanced, all revenues under this subsection
(3)(a)(ii) shall be used to retire the debt.
(b) From January 1, 2013, through December 31, 2015, in a county
with a population of one million or more, all revenues under this
section shall be used to retire the debt on the stadium, or deposited
in the stadium and exhibition center account under RCW 43.99N.060 after
the debt on the stadium is retired.
(c) From January 1, 2016, through December 31, 2020, in a county
with a population of one million or more, all revenues under this
section shall be deposited in the stadium and exhibition center account
under RCW 43.99N.060.
(d) At least seventy percent of moneys spent under (a)(i) of this
subsection for the period January 1, 1992, through December 31, 2000,
shall be used only for the purchase, design, construction, and
remodeling of performing arts, visual arts, heritage, and cultural
facilities, and for the purchase of fixed assets that will benefit art,
heritage, and cultural organizations. For purposes of this subsection,
fixed assets are tangible objects such as machinery and other equipment
intended to be held or used for ten years or more. Moneys received
under this subsection (3)(d) may be used for payment of principal and
interest on bonds issued for capital projects. Qualifying
organizations receiving moneys under this subsection (3)(d) must be
financially stable and have at least the following:
(i) A legally constituted and working board of directors;
(ii) A record of artistic, heritage, or cultural accomplishments;
(iii) Been in existence and operating for at least two years;
(iv) Demonstrated ability to maintain net current liabilities at
less than thirty percent of general operating expenses;
(v) Demonstrated ability to sustain operational capacity subsequent
to completion of projects or purchase of machinery and equipment; and
(vi) Evidence that there has been independent financial review of
the organization.
(e) At least forty percent of the revenues distributed pursuant to
(a)(i) of this subsection for the period January 1, 2001, through
December 31, 2012, shall be deposited in an account and shall be used
to establish an endowment. Principal in the account shall remain
permanent and irreducible. The earnings from investments of balances
in the account may only be used for the purposes of (a)(i) of this
subsection.
(f) School districts and schools shall not receive revenues
distributed pursuant to (a)(i) of this subsection.
(g) Moneys distributed to art museums, cultural museums, heritage
museums, the arts, and the performing arts, and moneys distributed for
tourism promotion shall be in addition to and may not be used to
replace or supplant any other funding by the legislative body of the
county.
(h) As used in this section, "tourism promotion" includes
activities intended to attract visitors for overnight stays, arts,
heritage, and cultural events, and recreational, professional, and
amateur sports events. Moneys allocated to tourism promotion in a
((class AA)) county with a population of one million or more shall be
allocated to nonprofit organizations formed for the express purpose of
tourism promotion in the county. Such organizations shall use moneys
from the taxes to promote events in all parts of the ((class AA))
county.
(i) No taxes collected under this section may be used for the
operation or maintenance of a public stadium that is financed directly
or indirectly by bonds to which the tax is pledged. Expenditures for
operation or maintenance include all expenditures other than
expenditures that directly result in new fixed assets or that directly
increase the capacity, life span, or operating economy of existing
fixed assets.
(j) No ad valorem property taxes may be used for debt service on
bonds issued for a public stadium that is financed by bonds to which
the tax is pledged, unless the taxes collected under this section are
or are projected to be insufficient to meet debt service requirements
on such bonds.
(k) If a substantial part of the operation and management of a
public stadium that is financed directly or indirectly by bonds to
which the tax is pledged is performed by a nonpublic entity or if a
public stadium is sold that is financed directly or indirectly by bonds
to which the tax is pledged, any bonds to which the tax is pledged
shall be retired. This subsection (3)(k) does not apply in respect to
a public stadium under chapter 36.102 RCW transferred to, owned by, or
constructed by a public facilities district under chapter 36.100 RCW or
a stadium and exhibition center.
(l) The county shall not lease a public stadium that is financed
directly or indirectly by bonds to which the tax is pledged to, or
authorize the use of the public stadium by, a professional major league
sports franchise unless the sports franchise gives the right of first
refusal to purchase the sports franchise, upon its sale, to local
government. This subsection (3)(l) does not apply to contracts in
existence on April 1, 1986.
If a court of competent jurisdiction declares any provision of this
subsection (3) invalid, then that invalid provision shall be null and
void and the remainder of this section is not affected.

Sec. 9 RCW 82.45.180 and 2009 c 308 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) For taxes collected by the county under this chapter, the
county treasurer shall collect a five-dollar fee on all transactions
required by this chapter where the transaction does not require the
payment of tax. A total of five dollars shall be collected in the form
of a tax and fee, where the calculated tax payment is less than five
dollars. Through June 30, 2006, the county treasurer shall place one
percent of the taxes collected by the county under this chapter and the
treasurer's fee in the county current expense fund to defray costs of
collection. After June 30, 2006, the county treasurer shall place one
and three-tenths percent of the taxes collected by the county under
this chapter and the treasurer's fee in the county current expense fund
to defray costs of collection. For taxes collected by the county under
this chapter before July 1, 2006, the county treasurer shall pay over
to the state treasurer and account to the department of revenue for the
proceeds at the same time the county treasurer remits funds to the
state under RCW 84.56.280. For taxes collected by the county under
this chapter after June 30, 2006, on a monthly basis the county
treasurer shall pay over to the state treasurer the month's
transmittal. The month's transmittal must be received by the state
treasurer by 12:00 p.m. on the last working day of each month. The
county treasurer shall account to the department for the month's
transmittal by the twentieth day of the month following the month in
which the month's transmittal was paid over to the state treasurer.
The state treasurer shall deposit the proceeds in the general fund.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, the definitions in this
subsection apply.
(i) "Close of business" means the time when the county treasurer
makes his or her daily deposit of proceeds.
(ii) "Month's transmittal" means all proceeds deposited by the
county through the close of business of the day that is two working
days before the last working day of the month. This definition of
"month's transmittal" shall not be construed as requiring any change in
a county's practices regarding the timing of its daily deposits of
proceeds.
(iii) "Proceeds" means moneys collected and receipted by the county
from the taxes imposed by this chapter, less the county's share of the
proceeds used to defray the county's costs of collection allowable in
(a) of this subsection.
(iv) "Working day" means a calendar day, except Saturdays, Sundays,
and all legal holidays as provided in RCW 1.16.050.
(2) For taxes collected by the department of revenue under this
chapter, the department shall remit the tax to the state treasurer who
shall deposit the proceeds of any state tax in the general fund. The
state treasurer shall deposit the proceeds of any local taxes imposed
under chapter 82.46 RCW in the local real estate excise tax account
hereby created in the state treasury. Moneys in the local real estate
excise tax account may be spent only for distribution to counties,
cities, and towns imposing a tax under chapter 82.46 RCW. Except as
provided in RCW 43.08.190, all earnings of investments of balances in
the local real estate excise tax account shall be credited to the local
real estate excise tax account and distributed to the counties, cities,
and towns monthly. Monthly the state treasurer shall make distribution
from the local real estate excise tax account to the counties, cities,
and towns the amount of tax collected on behalf of each taxing
authority. The state treasurer shall make the distribution under this
subsection without appropriation.
(3)(a) The real estate excise tax electronic technology account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. An appropriation is not
required for expenditures and the account is not subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.
(b) Through June 30, 2010, the county treasurer shall collect an
additional five-dollar fee on all transactions required by this
chapter, regardless of whether the transaction requires the payment of
tax. The county treasurer shall remit this fee to the state treasurer
at the same time the county treasurer remits funds to the state under
subsection (1) of this section. The state treasurer shall place money
from this fee in the real estate excise tax electronic technology
account. By the twentieth day of the subsequent month, the state
treasurer shall distribute to each county treasurer according to the
following formula: Three-quarters of the funds available shall be
equally distributed among the thirty-nine counties; and the balance
shall be ratably distributed among the counties in direct proportion to
their population as it relates to the total state's population based on
most recent statistics by the office of financial management.
(c) When received by the county treasurer, the funds shall be
placed in a special real estate excise tax electronic technology fund
held by the county treasurer to be used exclusively for the
development, implementation, and maintenance of an electronic
processing and reporting system for real estate excise tax affidavits.
Funds may be expended to make the system compatible with the automated
real estate excise tax system developed by the department and
compatible with the processes used in the offices of the county
assessor and county auditor. Any funds held in the account that are
not expended by the earlier of: July 1, 2015, or at such time that the
county treasurer is utilizing an electronic processing and reporting
system for real estate excise tax affidavits compatible with the
department and compatible with the processes used in the offices of the
county assessor and county ((assessor [auditor])) auditor, revert to
the special real estate and property tax administration assistance
account in accordance with subsection (5)(c) of this section.
(4) Beginning July 1, 2010, through December 31, 2013, the county
treasurer shall continue to collect the additional five-dollar fee in
subsection (3) of this section on all transactions required by this
chapter, regardless of whether the transaction requires the payment of
tax. During this period, the county treasurer shall remit this fee to
the state treasurer at the same time the county treasurer remits funds
to the state under subsection (1) of this section. The state treasurer
shall place money from this fee in the annual property revaluation
grant account created in RCW 84.41.170.
(5)(a) The real estate and property tax administration assistance
account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. An
appropriation is not required for expenditures and the account is not
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.
(b) Beginning January 1, 2014, the county treasurer must continue
to collect the additional five-dollar fee in subsection (3) of this
section on all transactions required by this chapter, regardless of
whether the transaction requires the payment of tax. The county
treasurer shall deposit one-half of this fee in the special real estate
and property tax administration assistance account in accordance with
(c) of this subsection and remit the balance to the state treasurer at
the same time the county treasurer remits funds to the state under
subsection (1) of this section. The state treasurer must place money
from this fee in the real estate and property tax administration
assistance account. By the twentieth day of the subsequent month, the
state treasurer must distribute the funds to each county treasurer
according to the following formula: One-half of the funds available
must be equally distributed among the thirty-nine counties; and the
balance must be ratably distributed among the counties in direct
proportion to their population as it relates to the total state's
population based on most recent statistics by the office of financial
management.
(c) When received by the county treasurer, the funds must be placed
in a special real estate and property tax administration assistance
account held by the county treasurer to be used for:
(i) Maintenance and operation of an annual revaluation system for
property tax valuation; and
(ii) Maintenance and operation of an electronic processing and
reporting system for real estate excise tax affidavits.

Sec. 10 2010 c 204 s 1105 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
Sections 101 through 504, 506 through 601, ((and)) 603 through 702,
and 801 through 1103 of ((this act)) chapter 204, Laws of 2010 take
effect January 1, 2012.

Sec. 11 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 132 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:
(1) RCW 17.21.230 (Pesticide advisory board) and 1994 c 283 s 26,
1989 c 380 s 54, 1988 c 36 s 8, 1974 ex.s. c 20 s 1, 1971 ex.s. c 191
s 8, 1967 c 177 s 14, & 1961 c 249 s 23;
(2) RCW 17.21.240 (Pesticide advisory board -- Vacancies) and 1994 c
283 s 27, 1989 c 380 s 55, & 1961 c 249 s 24;
(3) RCW 17.21.250 (Pesticide advisory board -- Duties) and 1989 c 380
s 56 & 1961 c 249 s 25;
(4) RCW 17.21.260 (Pesticide advisory board -- Officers, meetings)
and 1994 c 283 s 28, 1989 c 380 s 57, & 1961 c 249 s 26; and
(5) RCW 17.21.270 (Pesticide advisory board -- Travel expenses) and
1989 c 380 s 58, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 24, & 1961 c 249 s 27((; and
(6) RCW 70.104.080 (Pesticide panel -- Generally) and 1994 c 264 s
41, 1991 c 3 s 363, & 1989 c 380 s 68)).

Sec. 12 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 150 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
Sections 1 through 118, ((125)) 120 through 122, and 124 through
((135, and 141 through 146)) 150 of ((this act)) chapter 7, Laws of
2010 1st sp. sess. are necessary for the immediate preservation of the
public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and
its existing public institutions, and take effect June 30, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 151 (uncodified) is
hereby repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Sections 11 through 13 of this act are
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health,
or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect June 30, 2010.

--- END ---