BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that ongoing access to
postsecondary education is good for the economy of our state, the well-being of our communities, and ensures the strength of our democracy by
supporting an informed and critically thinking citizenry. It is the
intent of the legislature to provide local supplemental tuition support
for 13th and 14th years of postsecondary educational opportunities
within the state community or technical college that is within the
jurisdiction of the funding source.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.50.090 and 2010 c ... (ESSB 6359) s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
The college board ((shall have)) has general supervision and
control over the state system of community and technical colleges. In
addition to the other powers and duties imposed upon the college board
by this chapter, the college board ((shall be)) is charged with the
following powers, duties, and responsibilities:
(1) Review the budgets prepared by the boards of trustees, prepare
a single budget for the support of the state system of community and
technical colleges and adult education, and submit this budget to the
governor as provided in RCW 43.88.090;
(2) Establish guidelines for the disbursement of funds; and receive
and disburse such funds for adult education and maintenance and
operation and capital support of the college districts in conformance
with the state and district budgets, and in conformance with chapter
43.88 RCW;
(3) Ensure, through the full use of its authority:
(a) That each college district, in coordination with colleges,
within a regional area, ((shall)) must offer thoroughly comprehensive
educational, training, and service programs to meet the needs of both
the communities and students served by combining high standards of
excellence in academic transfer courses; realistic and practical
courses in occupational education, both graded and ungraded; and
community services of an educational, cultural, and recreational
nature; and adult education, including basic skills and general,
family, and workforce literacy programs and services;
(b) That each college district ((shall)) must maintain an open-door
policy, to the end that no student will be denied admission because of
the location of the student's residence or because of the student's
educational background or ability; that, insofar as is practical in the
judgment of the college board, curriculum offerings will be provided to
meet the educational and training needs of the community generally and
the students thereof; and that all students, regardless of their
differing courses of study, will be considered, known and recognized
equally as members of the student body((: PROVIDED, That)). However,
the administrative officers of a community or technical college may
deny admission to a prospective student or attendance to an enrolled
student if, in their judgment, the student would not be competent to
profit from the curriculum offerings of the college, or would, by his
or her presence or conduct, create a disruptive atmosphere within the
college not consistent with the purposes of the institution. This
subsection (3)(b) ((shall)) does not apply to competency, conduct, or
presence associated with a disability in a person twenty-one years of
age or younger attending a technical college;
(4) Prepare a comprehensive master plan for the development of
community and technical college education and training in the state;
and assist the office of financial management in the preparation of
enrollment projections to support plans for providing adequate college
facilities in all areas of the state. The master plan ((shall)) must
include implementation of the vision, goals, priorities, and strategies
in the statewide strategic master plan for higher education under RCW
28B.76.200 based on the community and technical college system's role
and mission. The master plan ((shall)) must also contain measurable
performance indicators and benchmarks for gauging progress toward
achieving the goals and priorities;
(5) Define and administer criteria and guidelines for the
establishment of new community and technical colleges or campuses
within the existing districts;
(6) Establish criteria and procedures for modifying district
boundary lines and consolidating district structures to form multiple
campus districts consistent with the purposes set forth in RCW
28B.50.020 as now or hereafter amended and in accordance therewith make
such changes as it deems advisable;
(7) Establish minimum standards to govern the operation of the
community and technical colleges with respect to:
(a) Qualifications and credentials of instructional and key
administrative personnel, except as otherwise provided in the state
plan for vocational education,
(b) Internal budgeting, accounting, auditing, and financial
procedures as necessary to supplement the general requirements
prescribed pursuant to chapter 43.88 RCW,
(c) The content of the curriculums and other educational and
training programs, and the requirement for degrees and certificates
awarded by the colleges,
(d) Standard admission policies,
(e) Eligibility of courses to receive state fund support;
(8) Establish and administer criteria and procedures for all
capital construction including the establishment, installation, and
expansion of facilities within the various college districts;
(9) Encourage innovation in the development of new educational and
training programs and instructional methods; coordinate research
efforts to this end; and disseminate the findings thereof;
(10) Exercise any other powers, duties and responsibilities
necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter;
(11) Authorize the various community and technical colleges to
offer programs and courses in other districts when it determines that
such action is consistent with the purposes set forth in RCW 28B.50.020
as now or hereafter amended;
(12) Notwithstanding any other law or statute regarding the sale of
state property, sell or exchange and convey any or all interest in any
community and technical college real and personal property, except such
property as is received by a college district in accordance with RCW
28B.50.140(8), when it determines that such property is surplus or that
such a sale or exchange is in the best interests of the community and
technical college system;
(13) In order that the treasurer for the state board for community
and technical colleges appointed in accordance with RCW 28B.50.085 may
make vendor payments, the state treasurer will honor warrants drawn by
the state board providing for an initial advance on July 1, 1982, of
the current biennium and on July 1 of each succeeding biennium from the
state general fund in an amount equal to twenty-four percent of the
average monthly allotment for such budgeted biennium expenditures for
the state board for community and technical colleges as certified by
the office of financial management; and at the conclusion of such
initial month and for each succeeding month of any biennium, the state
treasurer will reimburse expenditures incurred and reported monthly by
the state board treasurer in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW((:
PROVIDED, That)). However, the reimbursement to the state board for
actual expenditures incurred in the final month of each biennium
((shall)) must be less the initial advance made in such biennium;
(14) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (12) of this
section, may receive such gifts, grants, conveyances, devises, and
bequests of real or personal property from private sources as may be
made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, whenever the terms and
conditions thereof will aid in carrying out the community and technical
college programs and may sell, lease or exchange, invest or expend the
same or the proceeds, rents, profits and income thereof according to
the terms and conditions thereof; and adopt regulations to govern the
receipt and expenditure of the proceeds, rents, profits and income
thereof; ((and))
(15) The college board ((shall have)) has the power of eminent
domain; and
(16) Levy a property tax as provided in section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 84.52 RCW
to read as follows:
A community college district under chapter 28B.50 RCW may impose a
regular property tax levy in an amount not to exceed twenty-five cents
per thousand dollars of assessed value. A community college district
must use any taxes collected under this section for the purposes of
chapter 28B.50 RCW. Taxes collected under this section may not be used
to supplant existing state funds currently allocated to a community
college district. For the purposes of this section, "existing state
funds" means the amount of funds allocated by the state to the
community college district for the fiscal year prior to the fiscal year
in which the property tax levy authorized under this section is first
imposed.

Sec. 4 RCW 84.52.010 and 2009 c 551 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as is permitted under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes ((shall))
must be levied or voted in specific amounts.
The rate percent of all taxes for state and county purposes, and
purposes of taxing districts coextensive with the county, ((shall))
must be determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the
respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the
assessed valuation of the property of the county, as shown by the
completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent of all taxes
levied for purposes of taxing districts within any county ((shall))
must be determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the
respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the
assessed valuation of the property of the taxing districts
respectively.
When a county assessor finds that the aggregate rate of tax levy on
any property, that is subject to the limitations set forth in RCW
84.52.043 or 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations provided in either of
these sections, the assessor ((shall)) must recompute and establish a
consolidated levy in the following manner:
(1) The full certified rates of tax levy for state, county, county
road district, and city or town purposes shall be extended on the tax
rolls in amounts not exceeding the limitations established by law;
however any state levy ((shall)) takes precedence over all other levies
and shall not be reduced for any purpose other than that required by
RCW 84.55.010. If, as a result of the levies imposed under RCW
36.54.130, 84.34.230, 84.52.069, 84.52.105, the portion of the levy by
a metropolitan park district that was protected under RCW 84.52.120,
84.52.125, 84.52.135, and 84.52.140, the combined rate of regular
property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation
exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then
these levies ((shall)) must be reduced as follows:
(a) The levy imposed by a county under RCW 84.52.140 ((shall)) must
be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or shall be eliminated;
(b) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the portion of the levy by a fire
protection district that is protected under RCW 84.52.125 shall be
reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or shall be eliminated;
(c) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by a county under
RCW 84.52.135 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds
one percent of the true and fair value of any property or must be
eliminated;
(d) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by a ferry
district under RCW 36.54.130 must be reduced until the combined rate no
longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property
or must be eliminated;
(e) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the portion of the levy by a
metropolitan park district that is protected under RCW 84.52.120 shall
be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or shall be eliminated;
(f) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, then the levies imposed under RCW
84.34.230, 84.52.105, and any portion of the levy imposed under RCW
84.52.069 that is in excess of thirty cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis until the combined
rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property or shall be eliminated; and
(g) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, then the thirty cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value of tax levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069
((shall)) must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one
percent of the true and fair value of any property or eliminated.
(2) The certified rates of tax levy subject to these limitations by
all junior taxing districts imposing taxes on such property ((shall))
must be reduced or eliminated as follows to bring the consolidated levy
of taxes on such property within the provisions of these limitations:
(a) First, the certified property tax levy rates of those junior
taxing districts authorized under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, 35.95A.100,
and 67.38.130 ((shall)), and section 3 of this act must be reduced on
a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(b) Second, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of flood control
zone districts ((shall)) must be reduced on a pro rata basis or
eliminated;
(c) Third, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of all other junior
taxing districts, other than fire protection districts, regional fire
protection service authorities, library districts, the first fifty cent
per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park
districts, and the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levies for public hospital districts, ((shall)) must be
reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(d) Fourth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levies for metropolitan park districts created on or after
January 1, 2002, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(e) Fifth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized to fire
protection districts under RCW 52.16.140 and 52.16.160 and regional
fire protection service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1) (b) and (c)
((shall)) must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated; and
(f) Sixth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized for fire
protection districts under RCW 52.16.130, regional fire protection
service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1)(a), library districts,
metropolitan park districts created before January 1, 2002, under their
first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, and
public hospital districts under their first fifty cent per thousand
dollars of assessed valuation levy, ((shall)) must be reduced on a pro
rata basis or eliminated.

--- END ---