BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.--- and 2010 1st sp.s. c ... (2ESSB 6143) s 1101
are each amended to read as follows:
(1) Beginning May 1, 2010, through June 30, 2013, an additional
rate of tax of 0.30 percent is added to the rate provided for in RCW
((82.04.255,)) 82.04.285((,)) and 82.04.290(2)(a).
(2)(a) The additional rate in subsection (1) of this section does
not apply to persons engaging within this state in business as a
hospital. "Hospital" has the meaning provided in chapter 70.41 RCW but
also includes any hospital that comes within the scope of chapter 71.12
RCW if the hospital is also licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW.
(b) The additional rate in subsection (1) of this section does not
apply to amounts received from performing scientific research and
development services including but not limited to research and
development in the physical, engineering, and life sciences (such as
agriculture, bacteriological, biotechnology, chemical, life sciences,
and physical science research and development laboratories or
services).

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.4451 and 2010 1st sp.s. c ... (2ESSB 6143) s
1102 are each amended to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed against the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter, as
provided in this section. Except for taxpayers that report at least
fifty percent of their taxable amount under RCW ((82.04.255,))
82.04.290(2)(a)((,)) and 82.04.285, the maximum credit for a taxpayer
for a reporting period is thirty-five dollars multiplied by the number
of months in the reporting period, as determined under RCW 82.32.045.
For a taxpayer that reports at least fifty percent of its taxable
amount under RCW ((82.04.255,)) 82.04.290(2)(a)((,)) and 82.04.285, the
maximum credit for a reporting period is seventy dollars multiplied by
the number of months in the reporting period, as determined under RCW
82.32.045.
(2) When the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter is
equal to or less than the maximum credit, a credit is allowed equal to
the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter.
(3) When the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter exceeds
the maximum credit, a reduced credit is allowed equal to twice the
maximum credit, minus the tax otherwise due under this chapter, but not
less than zero.
(4) The department may prepare a tax credit table consisting of tax
ranges using increments of no more than five dollars and a
corresponding tax credit to be applied to those tax ranges. The table
shall be prepared in such a manner that no taxpayer will owe a greater
amount of tax by using the table than would be owed by performing the
calculation under subsections (1) through (3) of this section. A table
prepared by the department under this subsection must be used by all
taxpayers in taking the credit provided in this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.32.045 and 2010 1st sp.s. c ... (2ESSB 6143) s 1103
are each amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, payments of the
taxes imposed under chapters 82.04, 82.08, 82.12, 82.14, and 82.16 RCW,
along with reports and returns on forms prescribed by the department,
are due monthly within twenty-five days after the end of the month in
which the taxable activities occur.
(2) The department of revenue may relieve any taxpayer or class of
taxpayers from the obligation of remitting monthly and may require the
return to cover other longer reporting periods, but in no event may
returns be filed for a period greater than one year. For these
taxpayers, tax payments are due on or before the last day of the month
next succeeding the end of the period covered by the return.
(3) The department of revenue may also require verified annual
returns from any taxpayer, setting forth such additional information as
it may deem necessary to correctly determine tax liability.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the
department may relieve any person of the requirement to file returns if
the following conditions are met:
(a) The person's value of products, gross proceeds of sales, or
gross income of the business, from all business activities taxable
under chapter 82.04 RCW, is less than:
(i) Twenty-eight thousand dollars per year; or
(ii) Forty-six thousand six hundred and sixty-seven dollars per
year for persons generating at least fifty percent of their taxable
amount from activities taxable under RCW ((82.04.255,))
82.04.290(2)(a)((,)) and 82.04.285;
(b) The person's gross income of the business from all activities
taxable under chapter 82.16 RCW is less than twenty-four thousand
dollars per year; and
(c) The person is not required to collect or pay to the department
of revenue any other tax or fee which the department is authorized to
collect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
May 1, 2010.

--- END ---