BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
Sec. 101 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 101 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,505,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,146,000))
$30,934,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($65,651,000))
$64,439,000

Sec. 102 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 102 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SENATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,960,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,631,000))
$24,020,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,591,000))
$48,980,000

Sec. 103 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 104 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,748,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,916,000))
$1,796,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,664,000))
$3,544,000

Sec. 104 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 105 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF THE STATE ACTUARY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,000))
$19,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,305,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,525,000))
$3,524,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $25,000 of the department of retirement systems--state
appropriation is provided solely for the continued study of local
government liabilities for postretirement medical benefits for members
of plan 1 of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement
system.
(2) $51,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the state actuary
to contract with the Washington state institute for public policy for
a study of the disability benefits provided to the plan 2 and plan 3
members of the public employees' retirement system, the teachers'
retirement system, and the school employees' retirement system. Among
the options the institute shall examine include statutory changes to
the retirement systems and insurance products. The institute shall
report its findings and recommendations to the select committee on
pension policy by November 1, 2009.
(3) $30,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the state actuary
to contract with the Washington state institute for public policy to
continue the study of long-term disability benefits for public
employees as authorized by subsection (2) of this section during the
2010 legislative interim. The purpose of the study is to develop the
options identified in the 2009 legislative interim disability benefit
study, including options related to the public employees' benefits
board programs, other long-term disability insurance programs, and
public employee retirement system benefits. The institute shall report
no later than November 17, 2010, new findings and any additional
recommendations on the options to the select committee on pension
policy, the senate committee on ways and means, and the house committee
on ways and means. The Washington state institute for public policy
shall work with the health care authority to coordinate analysis and
recommendations with its contracted disability vendor and appropriate
stakeholders.
(4) $175,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for the office of the state actuary to
conduct an independent assessment of alternatives for assuring the
long-term financial solvency of the guaranteed education tuition
program including suspension of the program. In conducting this
review, the office may contract for assistance, and shall consult with
the higher education coordinating board, the operating budget
committees of the legislature, the office of financial management, and
the state's public colleges and universities. The office shall report
findings, an assessment of the major alternatives, and suggested
actions to the governor and to the relevant legislative committees by
November 15, 2009.

Sec. 105 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 108 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,115,000))
$992,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $505,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 is provided solely for the support
of legislative redistricting efforts. Prior to the appointment of the
redistricting commission, the secretary of the senate and chief clerk
of the house of representatives may jointly authorize the expenditure
of these funds to facilitate preparations for the 2012 redistricting
effort. Following the appointment of the commission, the house of
representatives and senate shall enter into an interagency agreement
with the commission authorizing the continued expenditure of these
funds for legislative redistricting support.

Sec. 106 2009 c 564 s 110 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPREME COURT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,912,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,948,000))
$6,844,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,860,000))
$13,756,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: It is the intent of the legislature that
the reductions in appropriations in this section shall be achieved, to
the greatest extent possible, by reducing those state government
administrative costs that do not affect direct client services or
direct service delivery or programs. The agency shall, to the greatest
extent possible, reduce spending in those areas that shall have the
least impact on implementing its mission.

Sec. 107 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 110 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE LAW LIBRARY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,925,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,659,000))
$1,592,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,584,000))
$3,517,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: It is the intent of the legislature that
the reductions in appropriations in this section shall be achieved, to
the greatest extent possible, by reducing those state government
administrative costs that do not affect direct client services or
direct service delivery or programs. The agency shall, to the greatest
extent possible, reduce spending in those areas that shall have the
least impact on implementing its mission.

Sec. 108 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 111 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,632,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,969,000))
$15,517,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,601,000))
$31,149,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: It is the intent of the legislature that
the reductions in appropriations in this section shall be achieved, to
the greatest extent possible, by reducing those state government
administrative costs that do not affect direct client services or
direct service delivery or programs. The agency shall, to the greatest
extent possible, reduce spending in those areas that shall have the
least impact on implementing its mission.

Sec. 109 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 113 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,644,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($52,562,000))
$49,760,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $979,000
Judicial Information Systems Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,406,000
Judicial Stabilization Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,598,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($146,189,000))
$143,387,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and (($1,800,000)) $1,687,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for school
districts for petitions to juvenile court for truant students as
provided in RCW 28A.225.030 and 28A.225.035. The office of the
administrator for the courts shall develop an interagency agreement
with the superintendent of public instruction to allocate the funding
provided in this subsection. Allocation of this money to school
districts shall be based on the number of petitions filed. This
funding includes amounts school districts may expend on the cost of
serving petitions filed under RCW 28A.225.030 by certified mail or by
personal service or for the performance of service of process for any
hearing associated with RCW 28A.225.030.
(2)(a) $8,252,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and (($8,253,000)) $7,734,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for
distribution to county juvenile court administrators to fund the costs
of processing truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth
petitions. The administrator for the courts, in conjunction with the
juvenile court administrators, shall develop an equitable funding
distribution formula. The formula shall neither reward counties with
higher than average per-petition processing costs nor shall it penalize
counties with lower than average per-petition processing costs.
(b) Each fiscal year during the 2009-11 fiscal biennium, each
county shall report the number of petitions processed and the total
actual costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and
at-risk youth petitions. Counties shall submit the reports to the
administrator for the courts no later than 45 days after the end of the
fiscal year. The administrator for the courts shall electronically
transmit this information to the chairs and ranking minority members of
the house of representatives appropriations committee and the senate
ways and means committee no later than 60 days after a fiscal year
ends. These reports are deemed informational in nature and are not for
the purpose of distributing funds.
(3) The distributions made under this subsection and distributions
from the county criminal justice assistance account made pursuant to
section 801 of this act constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs
for any new programs or increased level of service for purposes of RCW
43.135.060.
(4) $5,700,000 of the judicial information systems account--state
appropriation is provided solely for modernization and integration of
the judicial information system.
(a) Of this amount, $1,700,000 is for the development of a
comprehensive enterprise-level information technology strategy and
detailed business and operational plans in support of that strategy,
and $4,000,000 is to continue to modernize and integrate current
systems and enhance case management functionality on an incremental
basis.
(b) The amount provided in this subsection may not be expended
without prior approval by the judicial information system committee.
The administrator shall regularly submit project plan updates for
approval to the judicial information system committee.
(c) The judicial information system committee shall review project
progress on a regular basis and may require quality assurance plans.
The judicial information systems committee shall provide a report to
the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than November 1,
2011, on the status of the judicial information system modernization
and integration, and the consistency of the project with the state's
architecture, infrastructure and statewide enterprise view of service
delivery.
(d) $100,000 of the judicial information systems account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the administrative office of the
courts, in coordination with the judicial information system committee,
to conduct an independent third-party executive-level review of the
judicial information system. This review shall examine, at a minimum,
the scope of the current project plan, governance structure, and
organizational change management procedures. The review will also
benchmark the system plans against similarly sized projects in other
states or localities, review the large scale program risks, and
estimate life cycle costs, including capital and on-going operational
expenditures.
(5) $3,000,000 of the judicial information systems account--state
appropriation is provided solely for replacing computer equipment at
state courts, and at state judicial agencies. The administrator for
the courts shall prioritize equipment replacement purchasing and shall
fund those items that are most essential or critical. By October 1,
2010, the administrative office of the courts shall report to the
appropriate legislative fiscal committees on expenditures for equipment
under this subsection.
(6) $12,000 of the judicial information systems account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 1954 (sealing juvenile records). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(7) $106,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $106,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the twenty-third superior
court judge position in Pierce county. The funds appropriated in this
subsection shall be expended only if the judge is appointed and serving
on the bench.
(8) It is the intent of the legislature that the reductions in
appropriations in this section shall be achieved, to the greatest
extent possible, by reducing those state government administrative
costs that do not affect direct client services or direct service
delivery or programs. The agency shall, to the greatest extent
possible, reduce spending in those areas that shall have the least
impact on implementing its mission.
(9) $44,000 of the judicial information systems account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement chapter 272, Laws of 2010
(SHB 2680; guardianship).
(10) $274,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011 is provided solely for the office of public guardianship to
provide guardianship services for low-income incapacitated persons.
(11) $3,797,000 of the judicial information systems account--state
appropriation is provided solely for continued planning and
implementation of improvements to the court case management system.

Sec. 110 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 114 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,385,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,591,000))
$24,288,000
Judicial Stabilization Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,923,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($52,899,000))
$52,596,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature that the reductions in
appropriations in this section shall be achieved, to the greatest
extent possible, by reducing those state government administrative
costs that do not affect direct client services or direct service
delivery or programs. The agency shall, to the greatest extent
possible, reduce spending in those areas that shall have the least
impact on implementing its mission.
(2) The amounts provided include funding for expert and
investigative services in death penalty personal restraint petitions.

Sec. 111 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 115 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF CIVIL LEGAL AID
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,175,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,984,000))
$10,446,000
Judicial Stabilization Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,155,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,314,000))
$22,776,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) An amount not to exceed $40,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2010 and an amount not to exceed $40,000
of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2011 may be
used to provide telephonic legal advice and assistance to otherwise
eligible persons who are sixty years of age or older on matters
authorized by RCW 2.53.030(2) (a) through (k) regardless of household
income or asset level.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature that the reductions in
appropriations in this section shall be achieved, to the greatest
extent possible, by reducing those state government administrative
costs that do not affect direct client services or direct service
delivery or programs. The agency shall, to the greatest extent
possible, reduce spending in those areas that shall have the least
impact on implementing its mission.

Sec. 112 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 116 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,836,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,705,000))
$5,346,000
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,041,000))
$12,682,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $1,500,000 of the economic development
strategic reserve account appropriation is provided solely for efforts
to assist with currently active industrial recruitment efforts that
will bring new jobs to the state or will retain headquarter locations
of major companies currently housed in the state.

Sec. 113 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 117 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $752,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($765,000))
$682,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,605,000))
$1,524,000

Sec. 114 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 119 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,105,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,869,000))
$13,535,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,082,000
Archives and Records Management Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,990,000
Charitable Organization Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $76,000
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $757,000
Election Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $77,000
Local Government Archives Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,515,000
Election Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,163,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($96,634,000))
$95,300,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $4,101,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's
share of primary and general election costs and the costs of conducting
mandatory recounts on state measures. Counties shall be reimbursed
only for those odd-year election costs that the secretary of state
validates as eligible for reimbursement.
(2)(a) $1,897,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and (($2,076,000)) $1,845,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for
contracting with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel-to-gavel
television coverage of state government deliberations and other events
of statewide significance during the 2009-2011 biennium. The funding
level for each year of the contract shall be based on the amount
provided in this subsection. The nonprofit organization shall be
required to raise contributions or commitments to make contributions,
in cash or in kind, in an amount equal to forty percent of the state
contribution. The office of the secretary of state may make full or
partial payment once all criteria in this subsection have been
satisfactorily documented.
(b) The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding
is necessary to ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage
of public affairs. For that purpose, the secretary of state shall
enter into a contract with the nonprofit organization to provide public
affairs coverage.
(c) The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent
audit, an annual financial statement, and an annual report, including
benchmarks that measure the success of the nonprofit organization in
meeting the intent of the program.
(d) No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection
may be used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:
(i) Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any
legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by any
county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of
Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of any
rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state
agency;
(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or
(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel,
lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.
(3) The appropriations in this section are based upon savings
assumed from the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6122 (election
costs).
(4) In implementing budget reductions, the office of the secretary
of state must make its first priority to maintain funding for the
elections division.
(5) $76,000 of the charitable organization education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 is provided solely to implement
Second Substitute House Bill No. 2576 (corporation and charity fees).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2010, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $77,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for deposit to the election account.

Sec. 115 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 125 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,732,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,848,000))
$5,272,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,026,000
New Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,350,000
Legal Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $220,909,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($238,135,000))
$237,559,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual
legal services expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for
each agency receiving legal services. The report shall be submitted to
the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the
senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days after the
end of each fiscal year. As part of its by agency report to the
legislative fiscal committees and the office of financial management,
the office of the attorney general shall include information detailing
the agency's expenditures for its agency-wide overhead and a breakdown
by division of division administration expenses.
(2) Prior to entering into any negotiated settlement of a claim
against the state that exceeds five million dollars, the attorney
general shall notify the director of financial management and the
chairs of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of
representatives committee on ways and means.
(3) The office of the attorney general is authorized to expend
$2,100,000 from the Zyprexa and other cy pres awards towards consumer
protection costs in accordance with uses authorized in the court
orders.
(4) The attorney general shall annually report to the fiscal
committees of the legislature all new cy pres awards and settlements
and all new accounts, disclosing their intended uses, balances, the
nature of the claim or account, proposals, and intended timeframes for
the expenditure of each amount. The report shall be distributed
electronically and posted on the attorney general's web site. The
report shall not be printed on paper or distributed physically.
(5) The executive ethics board must produce a report by the end of
the calendar year for the legislature regarding performance measures on
the efficiency and effectiveness of the board, as well as on
performance measures to measure and monitor the ethics and integrity of
all state agencies.
(6) $53,000 of the legal services revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 3026 (school district compliance with state
and federal civil rights laws).

Sec. 116 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 129 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,189,000))
$21,089,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,152,000))
$18,285,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,103,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,270,000
State Auditing Services Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $278,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($70,017,000))
$68,050,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $188,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5945 (Washington health partnership plan).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(2) The office of financial management shall conduct a study on
alternatives for consolidating or transferring activities and
responsibilities of the state lottery commission, state horse racing
commission, state liquor control board, and the state gambling
commission to achieve cost savings and regulatory efficiencies. In
conducting the study, the office of financial management shall consult
with the legislative fiscal committees. Further, the office of
financial management shall establish an advisory group to include, but
not be limited to, representatives of affected businesses, state
agencies or entities, local governments, and stakeholder groups. The
office of financial management shall submit a final report to the
governor and the legislative fiscal committees by November 15, 2009.
(((4))) (3) $110,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 is provided solely to implement Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6578 (multiagency permitting teams). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2010, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(((5))) (4) The office of financial management shall, with the
assistance of the natural resources cabinet as created in executive
order 09-07, reduce the number of facilities being leased by the state
by consolidating, wherever possible, regional offices and storage
facilities of the natural resource agencies. The office of financial
management and the natural resources cabinet shall submit a report on
the progress of this effort and the associated savings to the
appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature no later than December
1, 2010.
(((7))) (5)(a) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the purposes of the office
of financial management:
(i) Conducting a technical and financial analysis of the state's
plan for the consolidated state data center and office building; and
(ii) Developing a strategic business plan outlining the various
options for use of the site that maximize taxpayer value consistent
with the terms of the finance lease and related agreements.
(b) The analysis required in (a)(i) of this subsection must consist
of, at a minimum, an assessment of the following issues:
(i) The total capital and operational costs for the proposed data
center and office building;
(ii) The occupancy rate for the consolidated state data center, as
compared to total capacity, that will result in revenue exceeding total
capital and operating expenses;
(iii) The potential reallocation of resources that could result
from the consolidation of state data centers and office space; and
(iv) The potential return on investment for the consolidated state
data center and office building that may be realized without impairing
any existing contractual rights under the terms of the financing lease
and related agreements.
(c) This review must build upon the analysis and migration strategy
for the consolidated state data center being prepared for the
department of information services.
(d) The strategic plan must be submitted to the governor and the
legislature by December 1, 2010.
(((8))) (6) Appropriations in this section include amounts
sufficient to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 3178
(technology efficiencies).

Sec. 117 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 136 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $109,472,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($112,319,000))
$113,279,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,933,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter
Control -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $130,000
Waste Tire Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Real Estate Excise Tax Grant Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,429,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $87,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($231,391,000))
$232,351,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $469,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $374,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5368 (annual property revaluation). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2009, the amounts in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $4,653,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $4,242,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are for the implementation of revenue enhancement
strategies. The strategies must include increased out-of-state
auditing and compliance, the purchase of third party data sources for
enhanced audit selection, and increased traditional auditing and
compliance efforts.
(3) $3,127,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,737,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6173
(sales tax compliance). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) $1,294,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $3,085,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are for the implementation of Second Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6143 (excise tax law modifications). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2010, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(5) $163,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011 is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No.
6846 (enhanced 911 services). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2010, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $1,200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011 is provided solely for making the necessary preparations for
implementation of the working families tax exemption pursuant to RCW
82.08.0206 in 2012.

Sec. 118 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 152 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE GROWTH MANAGEMENT HEARINGS BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,642,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,424,000))
$1,334,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,066,000))
$2,976,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $13,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 is provided solely for Substitute
House Bill No. 2935 (hearings boards/environment and land use). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2010, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(End of part)

PART II
HUMAN SERVICES
Sec. 201 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- CHILDREN AND FAMILY
SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $315,002,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($306,947,000))
$293,707,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($506,248,000))
$497,964,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,320,000
Home Security Fund Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,183,000))
$9,983,000
Domestic Violence Prevention Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,154,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $725,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,143,579,000))
$1,121,855,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $937,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and (($742,000)) $696,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to contract for
the operation of one pediatric interim care facility. The facility
shall provide residential care for up to thirteen children through two
years of age. Seventy-five percent of the children served by the
facility must be in need of special care as a result of substance abuse
by their mothers. The facility shall also provide on-site training to
biological, adoptive, or foster parents. The facility shall provide at
least three months of consultation and support to parents accepting
placement of children from the facility. The facility may recruit new
and current foster and adoptive parents for infants served by the
facility. The department shall not require case management as a
condition of the contract.
(2) $369,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $366,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011, and $316,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for up to three nonfacility-based programs for the
training, consultation, support, and recruitment of biological, foster,
and adoptive parents of children through age three in need of special
care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers, except that each
program may serve up to three medically fragile nonsubstance-abuse-affected children. In selecting nonfacility-based programs, preference
shall be given to programs whose federal or private funding sources
have expired or that have successfully performed under the existing
pediatric interim care program.
(3) $2,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and (($93,000)) $88,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011, and (($2,407,000)) $2,256,000 of
the home security fund--state appropriation are provided solely for
secure crisis residential centers. Within appropriated amounts, the
department shall collaborate with providers to maintain no less than
forty-five beds that are geographically representative of the state.
The department shall examine current secure crisis residential staffing
requirements, flexible payment options, center specific waivers, and
other appropriate methods to accomplish this outcome.
(4) A maximum of $73,209,000 of the general fund--state
appropriations and $54,596,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriations for the 2009-11 biennium shall be expended for
behavioral rehabilitative services and these amounts are provided
solely for this purpose. The department shall work with behavioral
rehabilitative service providers to safely keep youth with emotional,
behavioral, or medical needs at home, with relatives, or with other
permanent placement resources and decrease the length of service
through improved emotional, behavioral, or medical outcomes for
children in behavioral rehabilitative services in order to achieve the
appropriated levels.
(a) Contracted providers shall act in good faith and accept the
hardest to serve children, to the greatest extent possible, in order to
improve their emotional, behavioral, or medical conditions.
(b) The department and the contracted provider shall mutually agree
and establish an exit date for when the child is to exit the behavioral
rehabilitative service provider. The department and the contracted
provider should mutually agree, to the greatest extent possible, on a
viable placement for the child to go to once the child's treatment
process has been completed. The child shall exit only when the
emotional, behavioral, or medical condition has improved or if the
provider has not shown progress toward the outcomes specified in the
signed contract at the time of exit. This subsection (b) does not
prevent or eliminate the department's responsibility for removing the
child from the provider if the child's emotional, behavioral, or
medical condition worsens or is threatened.
(c) The department is encouraged to use performance-based contracts
with incentives directly tied to outcomes described in this section.
The contracts should incentivize contracted providers to accept the
hardest to serve children and incentivize improvement in children's
emotional, mental, and medical well-being within the established exit
date. The department is further encouraged to increase the use of
behavioral rehabilitative service group homes, wrap around services to
facilitate and support placement of youth at home with relatives, or
other permanent resources, and other means to control expenditures.
(d) The total foster care per capita amount shall not increase more
than four percent in the 2009-11 biennium and shall not include
behavioral rehabilitative service.
(5) Within amounts provided for the foster care and adoption
support programs, the department shall control reimbursement decisions
for foster care and adoption support cases such that the aggregate
average cost per case for foster care and for adoption support does not
exceed the amounts assumed in the projected caseload expenditures.
(6) (($14,460,000)) $14,187,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 and $6,231,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to provide
contracted prevention and early intervention services. The legislature
recognizes the need for flexibility as the department transitions to
performance-based contracts. The following services are included in
the prevention and early intervention block grant: Crisis family
intervention services, family preservation services, intensive family
preservation services, evidence-based programs, public health nurses,
and early family support services. The legislature intends for the
department to maintain and build on existing evidence-based and
research-based programs with the goal of utilizing contracted
prevention and intervention services to keep children safe at home and
to safely reunify families. Priority shall be given to proven
intervention models, including evidence-based prevention and early
intervention programs identified by the Washington state institute for
public policy and the department. The department shall include
information on the number, type, and outcomes of the evidence-based
programs being implemented in its reports on child welfare reform
efforts and shall provide the legislature and governor a report
regarding the allocation of resources in this subsection by September
30, 2010. The department shall expend federal funds under this
subsection in compliance with federal regulations.
(7) $36,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, (($36,000)) $34,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2011, and (($31,000)) $29,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of
chapter 465, Laws of 2007 (child welfare).
(8) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and (($125,000)) $118,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for continuum of
care services. $100,000 of this amount is for Casey family partners
and $25,000 of this amount is for volunteers of America crosswalk in
fiscal year 2010. (($100,000)) $95,000 of this amount is for Casey
family partners and (($25,000)) $23,000 of this amount is for
volunteers of America crosswalk in fiscal year 2011.
(9) $1,904,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, (($1,832,000)) $1,717,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011, and (($357,000)) $335,000 of the
general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely to contract
with medical professionals for comprehensive safety assessments of
high-risk families and for foster care assessments. The safety
assessments will use validated assessment tools to guide intervention
decisions through the identification of additional safety and risk
factors. The department will maintain the availability of
comprehensive foster care assessments and follow up services for
children in out-of-home care who do not have permanent plans,
comprehensive safety assessments for families receiving in-home child
protective services or family voluntary services, and comprehensive
safety assessments for families with an infant age birth to fifteen
days where the infant was, at birth, diagnosed as substance exposed and
the department received an intake referral related to the infant due to
the substance exposure. The department must consolidate contracts,
streamline administration, and explore efficiencies to achieve savings.
(10) $7,679,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, (($6,643,000)) $6,226,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011, and (($4,971,000)) $4,658,000 of
the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for court-ordered supervised visits between parents and dependent children and
for sibling visits. The department shall work collaboratively with the
juvenile dependency courts and revise the supervised visit
reimbursement procedures to stay within appropriations without impeding
reunification outcomes between parents and dependent children. The
department shall report to the legislative fiscal committees on
September 30, 2010, and December 30, 2010, the number of children in
foster care who receive supervised visits, their frequency, length of
time of each visit, and whether reunification is attained.
(11) $145,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, (($871,000)) $817,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011, and (($773,000)) $724,000 of the
home security fund--state appropriation is provided solely for street
youth program services.
(12) $1,522,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, (($1,340,000)) $1,256,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011, and (($1,464,000)) $1,372,000 of
the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for the
department to recruit foster parents. The recruitment efforts shall
include collaborating with community-based organizations and current or
former foster parents to recruit foster parents.
(13) $493,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, (($303,000)) $284,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011, $466,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation, and $725,000 of the education legacy trust
account--state appropriation are provided solely for children's
administration to contract with an educational advocacy provider with
expertise in foster care educational outreach. Funding is provided
solely for contracted education coordinators to assist foster children
in succeeding in K-12 and higher education systems. Funding shall be
prioritized to regions with high numbers of foster care youth and/or
regions where backlogs of youth that have formerly requested
educational outreach services exist. The department shall utilize
private matching funds to maintain educational advocacy services.
(14) $1,677,000 of the home security fund account--state
appropriation is provided solely for HOPE beds.
(15) $5,193,000 of the home security fund account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the crisis residential centers.
(16) The appropriations in this section reflect reductions in the
appropriations for the children's administration administrative
expenses. It is the intent of the legislature that these reductions
shall be achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by reducing those
administrative costs that do not affect direct client services or
direct service delivery or programs.
(17) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the
department shall contract for a pilot project with family and community
networks in Whatcom county and up to four additional counties to
provide services. The pilot project shall be designed to provide a
continuum of services that reduce out-of-home placements and the
lengths of stay for children in out-of-home placement. The department
and the community networks shall collaboratively select the additional
counties for the pilot project and shall collaboratively design the
contract. Within the framework of the pilot project, the contract
shall seek to maximize federal funds. The pilot project in each county
shall include the creation of advisory and management teams which
include members from neighborhood-based family advisory committees,
residents, parents, youth, providers, and local and regional department
staff. The Whatcom county team shall facilitate the development of
outcome-based protocols and policies for the pilot project and develop
a structure to oversee, monitor, and evaluate the results of the pilot
projects. The department shall report the costs and savings of the
pilot project to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
November 1 of each year.
(18) $157,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and (($157,000)) $148,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the
department to contract with a nonprofit entity for a reunification
pilot project in Whatcom and Skagit counties. The contract for the
reunification pilot project shall include a rate of $46.16 per hour for
evidence-based interventions, in combination with supervised visits, to
provide 3,564 hours of services to reduce the length of stay for
children in the child welfare system. The contract shall also include
evidence-based intensive parenting skills building services and family
support case management services for 38 families participating in the
reunification pilot project. The contract shall include the
flexibility for the nonprofit entity to subcontract with trained
providers.
(19) $303,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, (($418,000)) $392,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011, and (($257,000)) $241,000 of the
general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely to implement
Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1961 (increasing adoptions act).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(20) $98,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and (($98,000)) $92,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the
department to contract with an agency that is working in partnership
with, and has been evaluated by, the University of Washington school of
social work to implement promising practice constellation hub models of
foster care support.
(21) The legislature intends for the department to reduce the time
a child remains in the child welfare system. The department shall
establish a measurable goal and report progress toward meeting that
goal to the legislature by January 15 of each fiscal year of the 2009-11 fiscal biennium. To the extent that actual caseloads exceed those
assumed in this section, it is the intent of the legislature to address
those issues in a manner similar to all other caseload programs.
(22) $715,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and (($715,000)) $671,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for services
provided through children's advocacy centers.
(23) (($11,000)) $10,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2011 and $3,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of chapter 224,
Laws of 2010 (confinement alternatives). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2010, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(24) $1,867,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, (($1,790,000)) $1,677,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011, and (($4,673,000)) $4,379,000 of
the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for the
department to contract for medicaid treatment child care (MTCC)
services. Children's administration case workers, local public health
nurses and case workers from the temporary assistance for needy
families program shall refer children to MTCC services, as long as the
children meet the eligibility requirements as outlined in the
Washington state plan for the MTCC services.
(25) The department shall contract for at least one pilot project
with adolescent services providers to deliver a continuum of short-term
crisis stabilization services. The pilot project shall include
adolescent services provided through secure crisis residential centers,
crisis residential centers, and hope beds. The department shall work
with adolescent service providers to maintain availability of
adolescent services and maintain the delivery of services in a
geographically representative manner. The department shall examine
current staffing requirements, flexible payment options, center-specific licensing waivers, and other appropriate methods to achieve
savings and streamline the delivery of services. The legislature
intends for the pilot project to provide flexibility to the department
to improve outcomes and to achieve more efficient utilization of
existing resources, while meeting the statutory goals of the adolescent
services programs. The department shall provide an update to the
appropriate legislative committees and governor on the status of the
pilot project implementation by December 1, 2010.
(26) To ensure expenditures remain within available funds
appropriated in this section as required by RCW 74.13A.005 and
74.13A.020, the secretary shall not set the amount of any adoption
assistance payment or payments, made pursuant to RCW 26.33.320 and
74.13A.005 through 74.13A.080, to more than ninety percent of the
foster care maintenance payment for that child had he or she remained
in a foster family home during the same period. This subsection does
not apply to adoption assistance agreements in existence on the
effective date of this section.
(27) Receipts from fees per chapter 289, Laws of 2010, as deposited
into the prostitution prevention and intervention account for services
provided to sexually exploited children as defined in RCW 13.32A.030 in
secure and semi-secure crisis residential centers with access to staff
trained to meet their specific needs shall be used to expand capacity
for secure crisis residential centers and not supplant existing
funding.
(28) The appropriations in this section reflect reductions to the
foster care maintenance payment rates during fiscal year 2011.

Sec. 202 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- JUVENILE
REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $103,437,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($97,761,000))
$96,167,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,715,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,899,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,896,000
Juvenile Accountability Incentive Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,805,000
State Efficiency and Restructuring Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,958,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($216,471,000))
$214,877,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $353,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $353,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for deposit in the county criminal
justice assistance account for costs to the criminal justice system
associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997
(juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are
intended to provide funding for county adult court costs associated
with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be
distributed in accordance with RCW 82.14.310.
(2) $3,408,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $2,898,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in
this subsection are intended to provide funding for county impacts
associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and
shall be distributed to counties as prescribed in the current
consolidated juvenile services (CJS) formula.
(3) $3,716,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $3,716,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to implement community juvenile
accountability grants pursuant to chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile
code revisions). Funds provided in this subsection may be used solely
for community juvenile accountability grants, administration of the
grants, and evaluations of programs funded by the grants.
(4) $1,427,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,206,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to implement alcohol and substance
abuse treatment programs for locally committed offenders. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall award these moneys on a competitive
basis to counties that submitted a plan for the provision of services
approved by the division of alcohol and substance abuse. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall develop criteria for evaluation of
plans submitted and a timeline for awarding funding and shall assist
counties in creating and submitting plans for evaluation.
(5) $3,066,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $3,066,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for grants to county juvenile
courts for the following programs identified by the Washington state
institute for public policy (institute) in its October 2006 report:
"Evidence-Based Public Policy Options to Reduce Future Prison
Construction, Criminal Justice Costs and Crime Rates": Functional
family therapy, multi-systemic therapy, aggression replacement training
and interagency coordination programs, or other programs with a
positive benefit-cost finding in the institute's report. County
juvenile courts shall apply to the juvenile rehabilitation
administration for funding for program-specific participation and the
administration shall provide grants to the courts consistent with the
per-participant treatment costs identified by the institute.
(6) $1,287,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,287,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for expansion of the following
treatments and therapies in juvenile rehabilitation administration
programs identified by the Washington state institute for public policy
in its October 2006 report: "Evidence-Based Public Policy Options to
Reduce Future Prison Construction, Criminal Justice Costs and Crime
Rates": Multidimensional treatment foster care, family integrated
transitions, and aggression replacement training. The administration
may concentrate delivery of these treatments and therapies at a limited
number of programs to deliver the treatments in a cost-effective
manner.
(7)(a) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2011, the juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall administer a block grant, rather
than categorical funding, of consolidated juvenile service funds,
community juvenile accountability act grants, the chemical dependency
disposition alternative funds, the mental health disposition
alternative, and the sentencing disposition alternative for the purpose
of serving youth adjudicated in the juvenile justice system. In making
the block grant, the juvenile rehabilitation administration shall
follow the following formula and will prioritize evidence-based
programs and disposition alternatives and take into account juvenile
courts program-eligible youth in conjunction with the number of youth
served in each approved evidence-based program or disposition
alternative: (i) Thirty-seven and one-half percent for the at-risk
population of youth ten to seventeen years old; (ii) fifteen percent
for moderate and high-risk youth; (iii) twenty-five percent for
evidence-based program participation; (iv) seventeen and one-half
percent for minority populations; (v) three percent for the chemical
dependency disposition alternative; and (vi) two percent for the mental
health and sentencing dispositional alternatives. Funding for the
special sex offender disposition alternative (SSODA) shall not be
included in the block grant, but allocated on the average daily
population in juvenile courts. Funding for the evidence-based
expansion grants shall be excluded from the block grant formula. Funds
may be used for promising practices when approved by the juvenile
rehabilitation administration and juvenile courts, through the
community juvenile accountability act committee, based on the criteria
established in consultation with Washington state institute for public
policy and the juvenile courts.
(b) It is the intent of the legislature that the juvenile
rehabilitation administration phase the implementation of the formula
provided in subsection (1) of this section by including a stop-loss
formula of three percent in fiscal year 2011, five percent in fiscal
year 2012, and five percent in fiscal year 2013. It is further the
intent of the legislature that the evidence-based expansion grants be
incorporated into the block grant formula by fiscal year 2013 and SSODA
remain separate unless changes would result in increasing the cost
benefit savings to the state as identified in (c) of this subsection.
(c) The juvenile rehabilitation administration and the juvenile
courts shall establish a block grant funding formula oversight
committee with equal representation from the juvenile rehabilitation
administration and the juvenile courts. The purpose of this committee
is to assess the ongoing implementation of the block grant funding
formula, utilizing data-driven decision making and the most current
available information. The committee will be cochaired by the juvenile
rehabilitation administration and the juvenile courts, who will also
have the ability to change members of the committee as needed to
achieve its purpose. Initial members will include one juvenile court
representative from the finance committee, the community juvenile
accountability act committee, the risk assessment quality assurance
committee, the executive board of the Washington association of
juvenile court administrators, the Washington state center for court
research, and a representative of the superior court judges
association; two representatives from the juvenile rehabilitation
administration headquarters program oversight staff, two
representatives of the juvenile rehabilitation administration regional
office staff, one representative of the juvenile rehabilitation
administration fiscal staff and a juvenile rehabilitation
administration division director. The committee may make changes to
the formula categories other than the evidence-based program and
disposition alternative categories if it is determined the changes will
increase statewide service delivery or effectiveness of evidence-based
program or disposition alternative resulting in increased cost benefit
savings to the state. Long-term cost benefit must be considered.
Percentage changes may occur in the evidence-based program or
disposition alternative categories of the formula should it be
determined the changes will increase evidence-based program or
disposition alternative delivery and increase the cost benefit to the
state. These outcomes will also be considered in determining when
evidence-based expansion or special sex offender disposition
alternative funds should be included in the block grant or left
separate.
(d) The juvenile courts and administrative office of the courts
shall be responsible for collecting and distributing information and
providing access to the data systems to the juvenile rehabilitation
administration and the Washington state institute for public policy
related to program and outcome data. The juvenile rehabilitation
administration and the juvenile courts will work collaboratively to
develop program outcomes that reinforce the greatest cost benefit to
the state in the implementation of evidence-based practices and
disposition alternatives.
(e) By December 1, 2010, the Washington state institute for public
policy shall report to the office of financial management and
appropriate committees of the legislature on the administration of the
block grant authorized in this subsection. The report shall include
the criteria used for allocating the funding as a block grant and the
participation targets and actual participation in the programs subject
to the block grant.
(8) $3,700,000 of the Washington auto theft prevention authority
account--state appropriation is provided solely for competitive grants
to community-based organizations to provide at-risk youth intervention
services, including but not limited to, case management, employment
services, educational services, and street outreach intervention
programs. Projects funded should focus on preventing, intervening, and
suppressing behavioral problems and violence while linking at-risk
youth to pro-social activities. The department may not expend more
than $1,850,000 per fiscal year. The costs of administration must not
exceed four percent of appropriated funding for each grant recipient.
Each entity receiving funds must report to the juvenile rehabilitation
administration on the number and types of youth served, the services
provided, and the impact of those services upon the youth and the
community.
(9) The appropriations in this section assume savings associated
with the transfer of youthful offenders age eighteen or older whose
sentences extend beyond age twenty-one to the department of corrections
to complete their sentences. Prior to transferring an offender to the
department of corrections, the juvenile rehabilitation administration
shall evaluate the offender to determine the offender's physical and
emotional suitability for transfer.

Sec. 203 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- MENTAL HEALTH
PROGRAM
(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES/REGIONAL SUPPORT NETWORKS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $273,648,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $278,530,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $519,456,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,674,000
Hospital Safety Net Assessment Fund--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,476,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,091,784,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $113,689,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $113,689,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for persons and
services not covered by the medicaid program. This is a reduction of
$11,606,000 each fiscal year from the nonmedicaid funding that was
allocated for expenditure by regional support networks during fiscal
year 2009 prior to supplemental budget reductions. This $11,606,000
reduction shall be distributed among regional support networks
proportional to each network's share of the total state population. To
the extent possible, levels of regional support network spending shall
be maintained in the following priority order: (i) Crisis and
commitment services; (ii) community inpatient services; and (iii)
residential care services, including personal care and emergency
housing assistance.
(b) $10,400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $9,100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $1,300,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the department and regional
support networks to contract for implementation of high-intensity
program for active community treatment (PACT) teams. The department
shall work with regional support networks and the center for medicare
and medicaid services to integrate eligible components of the PACT
service delivery model into medicaid capitation rates no later than
January 2011, while maintaining consistency with all essential elements
of the PACT evidence-based practice model.
(c) $6,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $6,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the western Washington
regional support networks to provide either community- or hospital
campus-based services for persons who require the level of care
provided by the program for adaptive living skills (PALS) at western
state hospital.
(d) The number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional
support networks at eastern state hospital shall be 192 per day. The
number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional support
networks at western state hospital shall be 617 per day during the
first quarter of fiscal year 2010, and 587 per day thereafter. Beds in
the program for adaptive living skills (PALS) are not included in the
preceding bed allocations. The department shall separately charge
regional support networks for persons served in the PALS program.
(e) From the general fund--state appropriations in this subsection,
the secretary of social and health services shall assure that regional
support networks reimburse the aging and disability services
administration for the general fund--state cost of medicaid personal
care services that enrolled regional support network consumers use
because of their psychiatric disability.
(f) $4,582,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $4,582,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for mental health services for
mentally ill offenders while confined in a county or city jail and for
facilitating access to programs that offer mental health services upon
release from confinement.
(g) The department is authorized to continue to contract directly,
rather than through contracts with regional support networks, for
children's long-term inpatient facility services.
(h) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to continue performance-based
incentive contracts to provide appropriate community support services
for individuals with severe mental illness who were discharged from the
state hospitals as part of the expanding community services initiative.
These funds will be used to enhance community residential and support
services provided by regional support networks through other state and
federal funding.
(i) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the Spokane regional support
network to implement services to reduce utilization and the census at
eastern state hospital. Such services shall include:
(i) High intensity treatment team for persons who are high
utilizers of psychiatric inpatient services, including those with co-occurring disorders and other special needs;
(ii) Crisis outreach and diversion services to stabilize in the
community individuals in crisis who are at risk of requiring inpatient
care or jail services;
(iii) Mental health services provided in nursing facilities to
individuals with dementia, and consultation to facility staff treating
those individuals; and
(iv) Services at the sixteen-bed evaluation and treatment facility.
At least annually, the Spokane regional support network shall
assess the effectiveness of these services in reducing utilization at
eastern state hospital, identify services that are not optimally
effective, and modify those services to improve their effectiveness.
(j) The department shall return to the Spokane regional support
network fifty percent of the amounts assessed against the network
during the last six months of calendar year 2009 for state hospital
utilization in excess of its contractual limit. The regional support
network shall use these funds for operation during its initial months
of a new sixteen-bed evaluation and treatment facility that will enable
the network to reduce its use of the state hospital, and for diversion
and community support services for persons with dementia who would
likely otherwise require care at the state hospital.
(k) The department is directed to identify and implement program
efficiencies and benefit changes in its delivery of medicaid managed-care services that are sufficient to operate within the state and
federal appropriations in this section. Such actions may include but
are not limited to methods such as adjusting the care access standards;
improved utilization management of ongoing, recurring, and high-intensity services; and increased uniformity in provider payment rates.
The department shall ensure that the capitation rate adjustments
necessary to accomplish these efficiencies and changes are distributed
uniformly and equitably across all regional support networks statewide.
The department is directed to report to the relevant legislative fiscal
and policy committees at least thirty days prior to implementing rate
adjustments reflecting these changes.
(l) In developing the new medicaid managed care rates under which
the public mental health managed care system will operate during the
five years beginning in fiscal year 2011, the department should seek to
estimate the reasonable and necessary cost of efficiently and
effectively providing a comparable set of medically necessary mental
health benefits to persons of different acuity levels regardless of
where in the state they live. Actual prior period spending in a
regional administrative area shall not be a key determinant of future
payment rates. The department shall report to the office of financial
management and to the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the
legislature on its proposed new waiver and mental health managed care
rate-setting approach by October 1, 2009, and again at least sixty days
prior to implementation of new capitation rates.
(m) In implementing the new public mental health managed care
payment rates for fiscal year 2011, the department shall to the maximum
extent possible within each regional support network's allowable rate
range establish rates so that there is no increase or decrease in the
total state and federal funding that the regional support network would
receive if it were to continue to be paid at its October 2009 through
June 2010 rates. The department shall additionally revise the draft
rates issued January 28, 2010, to more accurately reflect the lower
practitioner productivity inherent in the delivery of services in
extremely rural regions in which a majority of the population reside in
frontier counties, as defined and designated by the national center for
frontier communities.
(n) $1,529,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,529,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to reimburse Pierce and Spokane
counties for the cost of conducting 180-day commitment hearings at the
state psychiatric hospitals.
(o) The legislature intends and expects that regional support
networks and contracted community mental health agencies shall make all
possible efforts to, at a minimum, maintain current compensation levels
of direct care staff. Such efforts shall include, but not be limited
to, identifying local funding that can preserve client services and
staff compensation, achieving administrative reductions at the regional
support network level, and engaging stakeholders on cost-savings ideas
that maintain client services and staff compensation. For purposes of
this section, "direct care staff" means persons employed by community
mental health agencies whose primary responsibility is providing direct
treatment and support to people with mental illness, or whose primary
responsibility is providing direct support to such staff in areas such
as client scheduling, client intake, client reception, client records-keeping, and facilities maintenance.
(p) Regional support networks may use local funds to earn
additional federal medicaid match, provided the locally matched rate
does not exceed the upper-bound of their federally allowable rate
range, and provided that the enhanced funding is used only to provide
medicaid state plan or waiver services to medicaid clients.
Additionally, regional support networks may use a portion of the state
funds allocated in accordance with (a) of this subsection to earn
additional medicaid match, but only to the extent that the application
of such funds to medicaid services does not diminish the level of
crisis and commitment, community inpatient, residential care, and
outpatient services presently available to persons not eligible for
medicaid.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $119,423,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($123,012,000))
$118,010,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $153,425,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,614,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($460,474,000))
$455,472,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The state psychiatric hospitals may use funds appropriated in
this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital group
purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.
(b) $231,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $231,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a community partnership
between western state hospital and the city of Lakewood to support
community policing efforts in the Lakewood community surrounding
western state hospital. The amounts provided in this subsection (2)(b)
are for the salaries, benefits, supplies, and equipment for one full-time investigator, one full-time police officer, and one full-time
community service officer at the city of Lakewood.
(c) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for payment to the city of
Lakewood for police services provided by the city at western state
hospital and adjacent areas.
(d) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011 is provided solely for support of the psychiatric security
review panel established pursuant to Senate Bill No. 6610. If Senate
Bill No. 6610 is not enacted by June 30, 2010, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

(3) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,819,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,092,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,142,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,053,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $1,511,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,511,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for children's evidence based
mental health services. Funding is sufficient to continue serving
children at the same levels as fiscal year 2009.
(b) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011 is provided solely for consultation, training, and technical
assistance to regional support networks on strategies for effective
service delivery in very sparsely populated counties.
(c) $60,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011 is provided solely for the department to contract with the
Washington state institute for public policy for completion of the
research reviews to be conducted in accordance with chapter 263, Laws
of 2010.
(d) $60,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011 is provided solely for the department to contract with the
Washington state institute for public policy for completion of the
research reviews to be conducted in accordance with section 1, chapter
280, Laws of 2010.
(e) $60,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011 is provided solely for implementation of sections 2 and 3,
chapter 280, Laws of 2010. The department shall use these funds to
contract with the Washington state institute for public policy for
completion of an assessment of (i) the extent to which the number of
persons involuntarily committed for 3, 14, and 90 days is likely to
increase as a result of the revised commitment standards; (ii) the
availability of community treatment capacity to accommodate that
increase; (iii) strategies for cost-effectively leveraging state,
local, and private resources to increase community involuntary
treatment capacity; and (iv) the extent to which increases in
involuntary commitments are likely to be offset by reduced utilization
of correctional facilities, publicly-funded medical care, and state
psychiatric hospitalizations.

(4) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,078,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,070,000))
$3,958,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,219,000))
$7,207,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,367,000))
$15,243,000

The department is authorized and encouraged to continue its
contract with the Washington state institute for public policy to
provide a longitudinal analysis of long-term mental health outcomes as
directed in chapter 334, Laws of 2001 (mental health performance
audit); to build upon the evaluation of the impacts of chapter 214,
Laws of 1999 (mentally ill offenders); and to assess program outcomes
and cost effectiveness of the children's mental health pilot projects
as required by chapter 372, Laws of 2006.

Sec. 204 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITIES PROGRAM
(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $307,348,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($338,299,000))
$337,658,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($902,900,000))
$902,043,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,548,547,000))
$1,547,049,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income
(SSI) state supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical
assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state
supplemental payments.
(b)(i) Amounts appropriated in this section reflect a reduction to
funds appropriated for in-home care. The department shall reduce the
number of in-home hours authorized. The reduction shall be scaled
based on the acuity level of care recipients. The largest hour
reductions shall be to lower acuity patients and the smallest hour
reductions shall be to higher acuity patients. In doing so, the
department shall comply with all maintenance of effort requirements
contained in the American reinvestment and recovery act.
(ii) $508,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011 and $822,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the department to partially restore the reductions
to in-home care that are taken in (b)(i) of this subsection. The
department will use the same formula to restore personal care hours
that it used to reduce personal care hours.
(c) Amounts appropriated in this section are sufficient to develop
and implement the use of a consistent, statewide outcome-based vendor
contract for employment and day services by April 1, 2011. The rates
paid to vendors under this contract shall also be made consistent. In
its description of activities the agency shall include activity
listings and dollars appropriated for: Employment services, day
services, child development services and county administration of
services to the developmentally disabled. The department shall begin
reporting to the office of financial management on these activities
beginning in fiscal year 2010.
(d) $302,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $831,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011, and $1,592,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for health care benefits pursuant to a collective
bargaining agreement negotiated with the exclusive bargaining
representative of individual providers established under RCW
74.39A.270.
(e)(i) $682,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $1,651,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $1,678,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the state's contribution to the
training partnership, as provided in RCW 74.39A.360, pursuant to a
collective bargaining agreement negotiated with the exclusive
bargaining representative of individual providers established under RCW
74.39A.270.
(ii) The federal portion of the amounts in this subsection (g) is
contingent upon federal approval of participation in contributions to
the trust and shall remain unallotted and placed in reserve status
until the office of financial management and the department of social
and health services receive federal approval.
(iii) Expenditures for the purposes specified in this subsection
(g) shall not exceed the amounts provided in this subsection.
(f) Within the amounts appropriated in this subsection (1), the
department shall implement all necessary rules to facilitate the
transfer to a department home and community-based services (HCBS)
waiver of all eligible individuals who (i) currently receive services
under the existing state-only employment and day program or the
existing state-only residential program, and (ii) otherwise meet the
waiver eligibility requirements. The amounts appropriated are
sufficient to ensure that all individuals currently receiving services
under the state-only employment and day and state-only residential
programs who are not transferred to a department HCBS waiver will
continue to receive services.
(g) In addition to other reductions, the appropriations in this
subsection reflect reductions targeted specifically to state government
administrative costs. These administrative reductions shall be
achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by reducing those
administrative costs that do not affect direct client services or
direct service delivery or programs.
(h) The department shall not pay a home care agency licensed under
chapter 70.127 RCW for personal care services provided by a family
member, pursuant to Substitute House Bill No. 2361 (modifying state
payments for in-home care).
(i) Within the appropriations of this section, the department shall
reduce all seventeen payment levels of the seventeen-level payment
system from the fiscal year 2009 levels for boarding homes, boarding
homes contracted as assisted living, and adult family homes. Excluded
from the reductions are exceptional care rate add-ons. The long-term
care program may develop add-ons to pay exceptional care rates to adult
family homes and boarding homes with specialty contracts to provide
support for the following specifically eligible clients:
(i) Persons with AIDS or HIV-related diseases who might otherwise
require nursing home or hospital care;
(ii) Persons with Alzheimer's disease and related dementia who
might otherwise require nursing home care; and
(iii) Persons with co-occurring mental illness and long-term care
needs who are eligible for expanded community services and who might
otherwise require state and local psychiatric hospital care.
Within amounts appropriated, exceptional add-on rates for AIDS/HIV,
dementia specialty care, and expanded community services may be
standardized within each program.
(j) The amounts appropriated in this subsection reflect a reduction
in funds available for employment and day services. In administering
this reduction the department shall negotiate with counties and their
vendors so that this reduction, to the greatest extent possible, is
achieved by reducing vendor rates and allowable contract administrative
charges (overhead) and not through reductions to direct client services
or direct service delivery or programs.
(k) As part of the needs assessment instrument, the department may
collect data on family income for minor children with developmental
disabilities and all individuals who are receiving state-only funded
services. The department may ensure that this information is collected
as part of the client assessment process.
(l) $116,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $2,689,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $1,772,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for employment services and required
waiver services. Priority consideration for this new funding shall be
young adults with developmental disabilities living with their family
who need employment opportunities and assistance after high school
graduation. Services shall be provided for both waiver and nonwaiver
clients. Fifty percent of the general fund appropriation shall be
utilized for graduates served on a home and community-based services
waiver and fifty percent of the general fund appropriation shall be
used for nonwaiver clients.
(((q))) (m) $81,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010, $599,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $1,111,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the department to provide
employment and day services for eligible students who are currently on
a waiver and will graduate from high school during fiscal years 2010
and 2011.
(((t))) (n) The automatic award of additional hours of personal
care for people with special meal preparation or incontinence needs is
eliminated. Authorization of service hours will be based upon the
individual's assessed needs.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,422,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($65,685,000))
$64,404,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($210,473,000))
$207,986,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,441,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($360,021,000))
$356,253,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income
(SSI) state supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical
assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state
supplemental payments.
(b) The developmental disabilities program is authorized to use
funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods and supplies
through direct contracting with vendors when the program determines it
is cost-effective to do so.
(c) $721,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $721,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the department to fulfill its
contracts with the school districts under chapter 28A.190 RCW to
provide transportation, building space, and other support services as
are reasonably necessary to support the educational programs of
students living in residential habilitation centers.
(d) In addition to other reductions, the appropriations in this
subsection reflect reductions targeted specifically to state government
administrative costs. These administrative reductions shall be
achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by reducing those
administrative costs that do not affect direct client services or
direct service delivery or programs.

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,407,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,379,000))
$1,369,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,319,000))
$1,301,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,105,000))
$4,077,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: In addition to other reductions, the
appropriations in this subsection reflect reductions targeted
specifically to state government administrative costs. These
administrative reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent
possible, by reducing those administrative costs that do not affect
direct client services or direct service delivery or programs.

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,631,000
((TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,631,000))

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this subsection are
available solely for the infant toddler early intervention program.

Sec. 205 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- AGING AND ADULT
SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $616,837,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($638,535,000))
$639,163,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,953,289,000))
$1,954,300,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,013,000
Traumatic Brain Injury Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,136,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,230,810,000))
$3,232,449,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) For purposes of implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted
average nursing facility payment rate shall not exceed $169.85 for
fiscal year 2010 and shall not exceed $166.24 for fiscal year 2011,
including the rate add-on described in subsection (12) of this section.
There will be no adjustments for economic trends and conditions in
fiscal years 2010 and 2011. The economic trends and conditions factor
or factors defined in the biennial appropriations act shall not be
compounded with the economic trends and conditions factor or factors
defined in any other biennial appropriations acts before applying it to
the component rate allocations established in accordance with chapter
74.46 RCW. When no economic trends and conditions factor for either
fiscal year is defined in a biennial appropriations act, no economic
trends and conditions factor or factors defined in any earlier biennial
appropriations act shall be applied solely or compounded to the
component rate allocations established in accordance with chapter 74.46
RCW.
(2) After examining actual nursing facility cost information, the
legislature finds that the medicaid nursing facility rates calculated
pursuant to Substitute House Bill No. 3202 or Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6872 (nursing facility medicaid payments) provide sufficient
reimbursement to efficient and economically operating nursing
facilities and bears a reasonable relationship to costs.
(3) In accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW, the department shall
issue no additional certificates of capital authorization for fiscal
year 2010 and no new certificates of capital authorization for fiscal
year 2011 and shall grant no rate add-ons to payment rates for capital
improvements not requiring a certificate of need and a certificate of
capital authorization for fiscal year 2011.
(4) The long-term care program may develop and pay enhanced rates
for exceptional care to nursing homes for persons with traumatic brain
injuries who are transitioning from hospital care. The cost per
patient day for caring for these clients in a nursing home setting may
be equal to or less than the cost of caring for these clients in a
hospital setting.
(5) Within the appropriations of this section, the department shall
reduce all seventeen payment levels of the seventeen-level payment
system from the fiscal year 2009 levels for boarding homes, boarding
homes contracted as assisted living, and adult family homes. Excluded
from the reductions are exceptional care rate add-ons. The long-term
care program may develop add-ons to pay exceptional care rates to adult
family homes and boarding homes with specialty contracts to provide
support for the following specifically eligible clients:
(a) Persons with AIDS or HIV-related diseases who might otherwise
require nursing home or hospital care;
(b) Persons with Alzheimer's disease and related dementia who might
otherwise require nursing home care; and
(c) Persons with co-occurring mental illness and long-term care
needs who are eligible for expanded community services and who might
otherwise require state and local psychiatric hospital care.
Within amounts appropriated, exceptional add-on rates for AIDS/HIV,
dementia specialty care, and expanded community services may be
standardized within each program.
(6)(a) Amounts appropriated in this section reflect a reduction to
funds appropriated for in-home care. The department shall reduce the
number of in-home hours authorized. The reduction shall be scaled
based on the acuity level of care recipients. The largest hour
reductions shall be to lower acuity patients and the smallest hour
reductions shall be to higher acuity patients. In doing so, the
department shall comply with all maintenance of effort requirements
contained in the American reinvestment and recovery act.
(b) $3,070,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011 and $4,980,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the department to partially restore the reduction
to in-home care that are taken in (a) of this subsection. The
department will use the same formula to restore personal care hours
that it used to reduce personal care hours.
(7) $536,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $1,477,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $2,830,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for health care benefits pursuant to
a collective bargaining agreement negotiated with the exclusive
bargaining representative of individual providers established under RCW
74.39A.270.
(8)(a) $1,212,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010, $2,934,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2011, and $2,982,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the state's contribution to the
training partnership, as provided in RCW 74.39A.360, pursuant to a
collective bargaining agreement negotiated with the exclusive
bargaining representative of individual providers established under RCW
74.39A.270.
(b) $330,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $660,000 of the general fund-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011, and $810,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for transfer from the department to the training
partnership, as provided in RCW 74.39A.360, for infrastructure and
instructional costs associated with training of individual providers,
pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement negotiated with the
exclusive bargaining representative of individual providers established
under RCW 74.39A.270.
(c) The federal portion of the amounts in this subsection is
contingent upon federal approval of participation in contributions to
the trust and shall remain unallotted and placed in reserve status
until the office of financial management and the department of social
and health services receive federal approval.
(d) Expenditures for the purposes specified in this subsection
shall not exceed the amounts provided in this subsection.
(9) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
may expand the new freedom waiver program to accommodate new waiver
recipients throughout the state. As possible, and in compliance with
current state and federal laws, the department shall allow current
waiver recipients to transfer to the new freedom waiver.
(10) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income
(SSI) state supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical
assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state
supplemental payments.
(11) $3,955,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $4,239,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $10,190,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the continued operation of
community residential and support services for persons who are older
adults or who have co-occurring medical and behavioral disorders and
who have been discharged or diverted from a state psychiatric hospital.
These funds shall be used to serve individuals whose treatment needs
constitute substantial barriers to community placement, who no longer
require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient hospital level of
care, and who no longer meet the criteria for inpatient involuntary
commitment. Coordination of these services will be done in partnership
between the mental health program and the aging and disability services
administration.
(12) Within the funds provided, the department shall continue to
provide an add-on per medicaid resident day per facility not to exceed
$1.57. The add-on shall be used to increase wages, benefits, and/or
staffing levels for certified nurse aides; or to increase wages and/or
benefits for dietary aides, housekeepers, laundry aides, or any other
category of worker whose statewide average dollars-per-hour wage was
less than $15 in calendar year 2008, according to cost report data.
The add-on may also be used to address resulting wage compression for
related job classes immediately affected by wage increases to low-wage
workers. The department shall continue reporting requirements and a
settlement process to ensure that the funds are spent according to this
subsection. The department shall adopt rules to implement the terms of
this subsection.
(13) $1,840,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,877,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for operation of the volunteer
services program. Funding shall be prioritized towards serving
populations traditionally served by long-term care services to include
senior citizens and persons with disabilities.
(14) In accordance with chapter 74.39 RCW, the department may
implement two medicaid waiver programs for persons who do not qualify
for such services as categorically needy, subject to federal approval
and the following conditions and limitations:
(a) One waiver program shall include coverage of care in community
residential facilities. Enrollment in the waiver shall not exceed 600
persons at any time.
(b) The second waiver program shall include coverage of in-home
care. Enrollment in this second waiver shall not exceed 200 persons at
any time.
(c) The department shall identify the number of medically needy
nursing home residents, and enrollment and expenditures on each of the
two medically needy waivers, on monthly management reports.
(d) If it is necessary to establish a waiting list for either
waiver because the budgeted number of enrollment opportunities has been
reached, the department shall track how the long-term care needs of
applicants assigned to the waiting list are met.
(15) The department shall establish waiting lists to the extent
necessary to assure that annual expenditures on the community options
program entry systems (COPES) program do not exceed appropriated
levels. In establishing and managing any such waiting list, the
department shall assure priority access to persons with the greatest
unmet needs, as determined by department assessment processes.
(16) The department shall contract for housing with service models,
such as cluster care, to create efficiencies in service delivery and
responsiveness to unscheduled personal care needs by clustering hours
for clients that live in close proximity to each other.
(17) The department shall not pay a home care agency licensed under
chapter 70.127 RCW for personal care services provided by a family
member, pursuant to Substitute House Bill No. 2361 (modifying state
payments for in-home care).
(18) $209,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $781,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011, and $1,293,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely to implement Engrossed House Bill No. 2194
(extraordinary medical placement for offenders). The department shall
work in partnership with the department of corrections to identify
services and find placements for offenders who are released through the
extraordinary medical placement program. The department shall
collaborate with the department of corrections to identify and track
cost savings to the department of corrections, including medical cost
savings and to identify and track expenditures incurred by the aging
and disability services program for community services and by the
medical assistance program for medical expenses. A joint report
regarding the identified savings and expenditures shall be provided to
the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal
committees of the legislature by November 30, 2010. If this bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(19) In accordance with RCW 18.51.050, 18.20.050, and 43.135.055,
the department is authorized to increase nursing facility and boarding
home fees in fiscal year 2011 as necessary to meet the actual costs of
conducting the licensure, inspection, and regulatory programs.
(a) $1,035,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation
assumes that the current annual renewal license fee for nursing
facilities shall be increased to $327 per bed beginning in fiscal year
2011.
(b) $1,806,000 of the general fund--local appropriation assumes
that the current annual renewal license fee for boarding homes shall be
increased to $106 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2011.
(((22))) (20) $2,566,000 of the traumatic brain injury account--state appropriation is provided solely to continue services for persons
with traumatic brain injury (TBI) as defined in RCW 74.31.020 through
74.31.050. The TBI advisory council shall provide a report to the
legislature by December 1, 2010, on the effectiveness of the functions
overseen by the council and shall provide recommendations on the
development of critical services for individuals with traumatic brain
injury.
(((23))) (21) The automatic award of additional hours of personal
care for people with special meal preparation or incontinence needs is
eliminated. Authorization of service hours will be based upon the
individual's assessed needs.
(((24))) (22) For calendar year 2009, the department shall
calculate split settlements covering two periods January 1, 2009,
through June 30, 2009, and July 1, 2009, through December 31, 2009.
For the second period beginning July 1, 2009, the department may
partially or totally waive settlements only in specific cases where a
nursing home can demonstrate significant decreases in costs from the
first period.
(((25))) (23) $72,000 of the traumatic brain injury account
appropriation and $116,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for a direct care rate add-on to any nursing
facility specializing in the care of residents with traumatic brain
injuries where more than 50 percent of residents are classified with
this condition based upon the federal minimum data set assessment.
(((26))) (24) $69,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010, $1,289,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2011, and $2,050,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the department to maintain
enrollment in the adult day health services program. New enrollments
are authorized for up to 1,575 clients or to the extent that
appropriated funds are available to cover additional clients.
(((27))) (25) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2011 is provided solely for the department to contract
for the provision of an individual provider referral registry.
(((28))) (26) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 and $100,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the department to contract with
a consultant to evaluate and make recommendations on a pay-for-performance payment subsidy system. The department shall organize one
workgroup meeting with the consultant where nursing home stakeholders
may provide input on pay-for-performance ideas. The consultant shall
review pay-for- performance strategies used in other states to sustain
and enhance quality-improvement efforts in nursing facilities. The
evaluation shall include a review of the centers for medicare and
medicaid services demonstration project to explore the feasibility of
pay-for- performance systems in medicare certified nursing facilities.
The consultant shall develop a report to include:
(a) Best practices used in other states for pay-for-performance
strategies incorporated into medicaid nursing home payment systems;
(b) The relevance of existing research to Washington state;
(c) A summary and review of suggestions for pay-for-performance
strategies provided by nursing home stakeholders in Washington state;
and
(d) An evaluation of the effectiveness ((on)) of a variety of
performance measures.
(((29))) (27) $4,100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2010, $4,174,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011, and $8,124,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation are provided for the operation of the
management services division of the aging and disability services
administration. This includes but is not limited to the budget,
contracts, accounting, decision support, information technology, and
rate development activities for programs administered by the aging and
disability services administration. Nothing in this subsection is
intended to exempt the management services division of the aging and
disability services administration from reductions directed by the
secretary. However, funds provided in this subsection shall not be
transferred elsewhere within the department nor used for any other
purpose.

Sec. 206 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ECONOMIC SERVICES
PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($564,492,000))
$564,242,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($581,459,000))
$565,617,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,223,832,000))
$1,220,752,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,816,000
Administrative Contingency Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,336,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,425,935,000))
$2,406,763,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $303,393,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010, (($285,913,000)) $285,057,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2011, $24,336,000 of the
administrative contingency account--state appropriation, and
$778,606,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided
solely for all components of the WorkFirst program. The department
shall use moneys from the administrative contingency account for
WorkFirst job placement services provided by the employment security
department. Within the amounts provided for the WorkFirst program, the
department may provide assistance using state-only funds for families
eligible for temporary assistance for needy families. In addition,
within the amounts provided for WorkFirst the department shall:
(a) Establish a career services work transition program;
(b) Continue to implement WorkFirst program improvements that are
designed to achieve progress against outcome measures specified in RCW
74.08A.410. Outcome data regarding job retention and wage progression
shall be reported quarterly to appropriate fiscal and policy committees
of the legislature for families who leave assistance, measured after 12
months, 24 months, and 36 months. The department shall also report the
percentage of families who have returned to temporary assistance for
needy families after 12 months, 24 months, and 36 months;
(c) Submit a report electronically by October 1, 2009, to the
fiscal committees of the legislature containing a spending plan for the
WorkFirst program. The plan shall identify how spending levels in the
2009-2011 biennium will be adjusted to stay within available federal
grant levels and the appropriated state-fund levels;
(d) Provide quarterly fiscal reports to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing information
on the amount expended from general fund--state and general fund--federal by activity((;
(e) Maintain the fiscal year 2009 grant standard for the temporary
assistance for needy families grant)).
(((3))) (2) The department and the office of financial management
shall electronically report quarterly the expenditures, maintenance of
effort allotments, expenditure amounts, and caseloads for the WorkFirst
program to the legislative fiscal committees.
(((4))) (3) $16,783,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2011 and $62,000,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for all components of the WorkFirst
program in order to maintain services to January 2011. The legislature
intends to work with the governor to design and implement fiscal and
programmatic modifications to provide for the sustainability of the
program. The funding in this subsection assumes that no other
expenditure reductions will be made prior to January 2011 other than
those assumed in the appropriation levels in this act.
(((5))) (4) $94,322,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2010 and (($97,168,000)) $84,904,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2011, net of recoveries, are
provided solely for cash assistance and other services to recipients in
the cash program pursuant to chapter 8, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.
(security lifeline act), including persons in the unemployable,
expedited, and aged, blind, and disabled components of the program. It
is the intent of the legislature that the lifeline incapacity
determination and progressive evaluation process regulations be
carefully designed to accurately identify those persons who have been
or will be incapacitated for at least ninety days. The incapacity
determination and progressive evaluation process regulations in effect
on January 1, 2010, cannot be amended until at least September 30,
2010; except that provisions related to the use of administrative
review teams may be amended, and obsolete terminology and functional
assessment language may be updated on or after July 1, 2010, in a
manner that only minimally impacts the outcome of incapacity
evaluations. After September 30, 2010, the incapacity determination
and progressive evaluation process regulations may be amended only if
the reports under (a) and (b) of this subsection have been submitted,
and find that expenditures will exceed the appropriated level by three
percent or more.
(a) The department and the caseload forecast council shall, by
September 21, 2010, submit a report to the legislature based upon the
most recent caseload forecast and actual expenditure data available, as
to whether expenditures for the lifeline-unemployable grants in fiscal
year 2011 will exceed $69,648,000 for fiscal year 2011 in the 2010
supplemental operating budget by three percent or more. If
expenditures will exceed the appropriated amount for lifeline-unemployable grants by three percent or more, the department may adopt
regulations modifying incapacity determination and progressive
evaluation process regulations after September 30, 2010.
(b) On or before September 21, 2010, the department shall submit a
report to the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the legislature
that includes the following information regarding any regulations
proposed for adoption that would modify the lifeline incapacity
determination and progressive evaluation process:
(i) A copy of the proposed changes and a concise description of the
changes;
(ii) A description of the persons who would likely be affected by
adoption of the regulations, including their impairments, age,
education, and work history;
(iii) An estimate of the number of persons who, on a monthly basis
through June 2013, would be denied lifeline benefits if the regulations
were adopted, expressed as a number, as a percentage of total
applicants, and as a percentage of the number of persons granted
lifeline benefits in each month;
(iv) An estimate of the number of persons who, on a monthly basis
through June 2013, would have their lifeline benefits terminated
following an eligibility review if the regulations were adopted,
expressed as a number, as a percentage of the number of persons who
have had an eligibility review in each month, and as a percentage of
the total number of persons currently receiving lifeline-unemployable
benefits in each month; and
(v) Intended improvements in employment or treatment outcomes among
persons receiving lifeline benefits that could be attributable to the
changes in the regulations.
(c) Within these amounts:
(i) The department shall aggressively pursue opportunities to
transfer lifeline clients to general assistance expedited coverage and
to facilitate client applications for federal supplemental security
income when the client's incapacities indicate that he or she would be
likely to meet the federal disability criteria for supplemental
security income. The department shall initiate and file the federal
supplemental security income interim agreement as quickly as possible
in order to maximize the recovery of federal funds;
(ii) The department shall review the lifeline caseload to identify
recipients that would benefit from assistance in becoming naturalized
citizens, and thus be eligible to receive federal supplemental security
income benefits. Those cases shall be given high priority for
naturalization funding through the department;
(iii) The department shall actively coordinate with local workforce
development councils to expedite access to worker retraining programs
for lifeline clients in those regions of the state with the greatest
number of such clients;
(iv) By July 1, 2009, the department shall enter into an
interagency agreement with the department of veterans' affairs to
establish a process for referral of veterans who may be eligible for
veteran's services. This agreement must include outstationing
department of veterans' affairs staff in selected community service
office locations in King and Pierce counties to facilitate applications
for veterans' services; and
(v) In addition to any earlier evaluation that may have been
conducted, the department shall intensively evaluate those clients who
have been receiving lifeline benefits for twelve months or more as of
July 1, 2009, or thereafter, if the available medical and incapacity
related evidence indicates that the client is unlikely to meet the
disability standard for federal supplemental security income benefits.
The evaluation shall identify services necessary to eliminate or
minimize barriers to employment, including mental health treatment,
substance abuse treatment and vocational rehabilitation services. The
department shall expedite referrals to chemical dependency treatment,
mental health and vocational rehabilitation services for these clients.
(vi) The appropriations in this subsection reflect a change in the
earned income disregard policy for lifeline clients. It is the intent
of the legislature that the department shall adopt the temporary
assistance for needy families earned income policy for the lifeline
program.
(((6))) (5) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for naturalization services.
(((7))) (6)(a) $3,550,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2010 is provided solely for refugee employment
services, of which $2,650,000 is provided solely for the department to
pass through to statewide refugee assistance organizations for limited
English proficiency pathway services; and $3,550,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2011 is provided solely for
refugee employment services, of which $2,650,000 is provided solely for
the department to pass through to statewide refugee assistance
organizations for limited English proficiency pathway services.
(b) The legislature intends that the appropriation in this
subsection for the 2009-11 fiscal biennium will maintain funding for
refugee programs at a level at least equal to expenditures on these
programs in the 2007-09 fiscal biennium.
(((8))) (7) The appropriations in this section reflect reductions
in the appropriations for the economic services administration's
administrative expenses. It is the intent of the legislature that
these reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by
reducing those administrative costs that do not affect direct client
services or direct service delivery or program.
(((9))) (8) $855,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, $719,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation,
and $2,907,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of the opportunity portal, the
food stamp employment and training program, and the disability lifeline
program under Second Substitute House Bill No. 2782 (security lifeline
act). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2010, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((10))) (9) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 is provided solely for the department to award grants
to small mutual assistance or small community-based organizations that
contract with the department for immigrant and refugee assistance
services. The funds shall be awarded to provide funding for community
groups to provide transitional assistance, language skills, and other
resources to improve refugees' economic self-sufficiency through the
effective use of social services, financial services, and medical
assistance.

Sec. 207 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ALCOHOL AND
SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $81,982,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($82,393,000))
$82,379,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($148,034,000))
$148,018,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,718,000
Criminal Justice Treatment Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,743,000
Problem Gambling Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,456,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($334,326,000))
$334,296,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
may contract with the University of Washington and community-based
providers for the provision of the parent-child assistance program.
For all contractors, indirect charges for administering the program
shall not exceed ten percent of the total contract amount.
(2) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
shall continue to provide for chemical dependency treatment services
for adult medicaid eligible and general assistance-unemployable
patients.
(3) In addition to other reductions, the appropriations in this
section reflect reductions targeted specifically to state government
administrative costs. These administrative reductions shall be
achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by reducing those
administrative costs that do not affect direct client services or
direct service delivery or programs.
(4) $2,247,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011 is provided solely for the implementation of the lifeline
program under Second Substitute House Bill No. 2782 (security lifeline
act). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2010, the amount provided
in this subsection shall lapse.
(5) $3,500,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation (from the
substance abuse prevention and treatment federal block grant) is
provided solely for the continued funding of existing county drug and
alcohol use prevention programs.

Sec. 208 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,697,203,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,789,973,000))
$1,752,373,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,086,632,000))
$6,047,652,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,249,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,075,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,464,000
Hospital Safety Net Assessment Fund--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $260,036,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,890,632,000))
$9,814,052,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Based on quarterly expenditure reports and caseload forecasts,
if the department estimates that expenditures for the medical
assistance program will exceed the appropriations, the department shall
take steps including but not limited to reduction of rates or
elimination of optional services to reduce expenditures so that total
program costs do not exceed the annual appropriation authority.
(2) In determining financial eligibility for medicaid-funded
services, the department is authorized to disregard recoveries by
Holocaust survivors of insurance proceeds or other assets, as defined
in RCW 48.104.030.
(3) The legislature affirms that it is in the state's interest for
Harborview medical center to remain an economically viable component of
the state's health care system.
(4) When a person is ineligible for medicaid solely by reason of
residence in an institution for mental diseases, the department shall
provide the person with the same benefits as he or she would receive if
eligible for medicaid, using state-only funds to the extent necessary.
(5) In accordance with RCW 74.46.625, $6,000,000 of the general
fund -- federal appropriation is provided solely for supplemental
payments to nursing homes operated by public hospital districts. The
public hospital district shall be responsible for providing the
required nonfederal match for the supplemental payment, and the
payments shall not exceed the maximum allowable under federal rules.
It is the legislature's intent that the payments shall be supplemental
to and shall not in any way offset or reduce the payments calculated
and provided in accordance with part E of chapter 74.46 RCW. It is the
legislature's further intent that costs otherwise allowable for rate-setting and settlement against payments under chapter 74.46 RCW shall
not be disallowed solely because such costs have been paid by revenues
retained by the nursing home from these supplemental payments. The
supplemental payments are subject to retrospective interim and final
cost settlements based on the nursing homes' as-filed and final
medicare cost reports. The timing of the interim and final cost
settlements shall be at the department's discretion. During either the
interim cost settlement or the final cost settlement, the department
shall recoup from the public hospital districts the supplemental
payments that exceed the medicaid cost limit and/or the medicare upper
payment limit. The department shall apply federal rules for
identifying the eligible incurred medicaid costs and the medicare upper
payment limit.
(6) $1,110,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation and
$1,105,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2011 are provided solely for grants to rural hospitals. The department
shall distribute the funds under a formula that provides a relatively
larger share of the available funding to hospitals that (a) serve a
disproportionate share of low-income and medically indigent patients,
and (b) have relatively smaller net financial margins, to the extent
allowed by the federal medicaid program.
(7) $9,818,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011, and $9,865,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation
are provided solely for grants to nonrural hospitals. The department
shall distribute the funds under a formula that provides a relatively
larger share of the available funding to hospitals that (a) serve a
disproportionate share of low-income and medically indigent patients,
and (b) have relatively smaller net financial margins, to the extent
allowed by the federal medicaid program.
(8) The department shall continue the inpatient hospital certified
public expenditures program for the 2009-11 biennium. The program
shall apply to all public hospitals, including those owned or operated
by the state, except those classified as critical access hospitals or
state psychiatric institutions. The department shall submit reports to
the governor and legislature by November 1, 2009, and by November 1,
2010, that evaluate whether savings continue to exceed costs for this
program. If the certified public expenditures (CPE) program in its
current form is no longer cost-effective to maintain, the department
shall submit a report to the governor and legislature detailing
cost-effective alternative uses of local, state, and federal resources
as a replacement for this program. During fiscal year 2010 and fiscal
year 2011, hospitals in the program shall be paid and shall retain one
hundred percent of the federal portion of the allowable hospital cost
for each medicaid inpatient fee-for-service claim payable by medical
assistance and one hundred percent of the federal portion of the
maximum disproportionate share hospital payment allowable under federal
regulations. Inpatient medicaid payments shall be established using an
allowable methodology that approximates the cost of claims submitted by
the hospitals. Payments made to each hospital in the program in each
fiscal year of the biennium shall be compared to a baseline amount.
The baseline amount will be determined by the total of (a) the
inpatient claim payment amounts that would have been paid during the
fiscal year had the hospital not been in the CPE program based on the
reimbursement rates developed, implemented, and consistent with
policies approved in the 2009-11 biennial operating appropriations act
(chapter 564, Laws of 2009) and in effect on July 1, 2009, (b) one half
of the indigent assistance disproportionate share hospital payment
amounts paid to and retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005,
and (c) all of the other disproportionate share hospital payment
amounts paid to and retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005
to the extent the same disproportionate share hospital programs exist
in the 2009-11 biennium. If payments during the fiscal year exceed the
hospital's baseline amount, no additional payments will be made to the
hospital except the federal portion of allowable disproportionate share
hospital payments for which the hospital can certify allowable match.
If payments during the fiscal year are less than the baseline amount,
the hospital will be paid a state grant equal to the difference between
payments during the fiscal year and the applicable baseline amount.
Payment of the state grant shall be made in the applicable fiscal year
and distributed in monthly payments. The grants will be recalculated
and redistributed as the baseline is updated during the fiscal year.
The grant payments are subject to an interim settlement within eleven
months after the end of the fiscal year. A final settlement shall be
performed. To the extent that either settlement determines that a
hospital has received funds in excess of what it would have received as
described in this subsection, the hospital must repay the excess
amounts to the state when requested. $20,403,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2010, of which $6,570,000 is
appropriated in section 204(1) of this act, and $29,480,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2011, of which
$6,570,000 is appropriated in section 204(1) of this act, are provided
solely for state grants for the participating hospitals. CPE hospitals
will receive the inpatient and outpatient reimbursement rate
restorations in section 9 and rate increases in section 10(1)(b) of
Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2956 (hospital safety net
assessment) funded through the hospital safety net assessment fund
rather than through the baseline mechanism specified in this
subsection.
(9) The department is authorized to use funds appropriated in this
section to purchase goods and supplies through direct contracting with
vendors when the department determines it is cost-effective to do so.
(10) $93,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $93,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the department to pursue a federal Medicaid waiver
pursuant to Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5945 (Washington health
partnership plan). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(11) The department shall require managed health care systems that
have contracts with the department to serve medical assistance clients
to limit any reimbursements or payments the systems make to providers
not employed by or under contract with the systems to no more than the
medical assistance rates paid by the department to providers for
comparable services rendered to clients in the fee-for-service delivery
system.
(12) A maximum of $241,141,000 in total funds from the general
fund--state, general fund--federal, and tobacco and prevention control
account--state appropriations may be expended in the fiscal biennium
for the medical program pursuant to chapter 8, Laws of 2010 1st sp.
sess. (security lifeline act), and these amounts are provided solely
for this program. Of these amounts, $10,749,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2010 and $10,892,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for payments to
hospitals for providing outpatient services to low income patients who
are recipients of lifeline benefits. Pursuant to RCW 74.09.035, the
department shall not expend for the lifeline medical care services
program any amounts in excess of the amounts provided in this
subsection.
(13) Mental health services shall be included in the services
provided through the managed care system for lifeline clients under
chapter 8, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess. In transitioning lifeline
clients to managed care, the department shall attempt to deliver care
to lifeline clients through medical homes in community and migrant
health centers. The department, in collaboration with the carrier,
shall seek to improve the transition rate of lifeline clients to the
federal supplemental security income program. The department shall
renegotiate the contract with the managed care plan that provides
services for lifeline clients to maximize state retention of future
hospital savings as a result of improved care coordination. The
department, in collaboration with stakeholders, shall propose a new
name for the lifeline program.
(14) The department shall evaluate the impact of the use of a
managed care delivery and financing system on state costs and outcomes
for lifeline medical clients. Outcomes measured shall include state
costs, utilization, changes in mental health status and symptoms, and
involvement in the criminal justice system.
(15) The department shall report to the governor and the fiscal
committees of the legislature by June 1, 2010, on its progress toward
achieving a twenty percentage point increase in the generic
prescription drug utilization rate.
(16) State funds shall not be used by hospitals for advertising
purposes.
(17) $24,356,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation
and $35,707,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided
solely for the implementation of professional services supplemental
payment programs. The department shall seek a medicaid state plan
amendment to create a professional services supplemental payment
program for University of Washington medicine professional providers no
later than July 1, 2009. The department shall apply federal rules for
identifying the shortfall between current fee-for-service medicaid
payments to participating providers and the applicable federal upper
payment limit. Participating providers shall be solely responsible for
providing the local funds required to obtain federal matching funds.
Any incremental costs incurred by the department in the development,
implementation, and maintenance of this program will be the
responsibility of the participating providers. Participating providers
will retain the full amount of supplemental payments provided under
this program, net of any potential costs for any related audits or
litigation brought against the state. The department shall report to
the governor and the legislative fiscal committees on the prospects for
expansion of the program to other qualifying providers as soon as
feasibility is determined but no later than December 31, 2009. The
report will outline estimated impacts on the participating providers,
the procedures necessary to comply with federal guidelines, and the
administrative resource requirements necessary to implement the
program. The department will create a process for expansion of the
program to other qualifying providers as soon as it is determined
feasible by both the department and providers but no later than June
30, 2010.
(18) $9,075,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $8,588,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $39,747,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for development and implementation of
a replacement system for the existing medicaid management information
system. The amounts provided in this subsection are conditioned on the
department satisfying the requirements of section 902 of this act.
(19) $506,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011 and $657,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill
No. 1373 (children's mental health). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(20) Pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396(a)(25), the department shall
pursue insurance claims on behalf of medicaid children served through
its in-home medically intensive child program under WAC 388-551-3000.
The department shall report to the Legislature by December 31, 2009, on
the results of its efforts to recover such claims.
(21) The department may, on a case-by-case basis and in the best
interests of the child, set payment rates for medically intensive home
care services to promote access to home care as an alternative to
hospitalization. Expenditures related to these increased payments
shall not exceed the amount the department would otherwise pay for
hospitalization for the child receiving medically intensive home care
services.
(22) $425,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $790,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to continue children's health coverage outreach and
education efforts under RCW 74.09.470. These efforts shall rely on
existing relationships and systems developed with local public health
agencies, health care providers, public schools, the women, infants,
and children program, the early childhood education and assistance
program, child care providers, newborn visiting nurses, and other
community-based organizations. The department shall seek public-private partnerships and federal funds that are or may become available
to provide on-going support for outreach and education efforts under
the federal children's health insurance program reauthorization act of
2009.
(23) The department, in conjunction with the office of financial
management, shall implement a prorated inpatient payment policy.
(24) The department will pursue a competitive procurement process
for antihemophilic products, emphasizing evidence-based medicine and
protection of patient access without significant disruption in
treatment.
(25) The department will pursue several strategies towards reducing
pharmacy expenditures including but not limited to increasing generic
prescription drug utilization by 20 percentage points and promoting
increased utilization of the existing mail-order pharmacy program.
(26) The department shall reduce reimbursement for over-the-counter
medications while maintaining reimbursement for those over-the-counter
medications that can replace more costly prescription medications.
(27) The department shall seek public-private partnerships and
federal funds that are or may become available to implement health
information technology projects under the federal American recovery and
reinvestment act of 2009.
(28) The department shall target funding for maternity support
services towards pregnant women with factors that lead to higher rates
of poor birth outcomes, including hypertension, a preterm or low birth
weight birth in the most recent previous birth, a cognitive deficit or
developmental disability, substance abuse, severe mental illness,
unhealthy weight or failure to gain weight, tobacco use, or African
American or Native American race.
(29) $260,036,000 of the hospital safety net assessment fund--state
appropriation and $255,448,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute House Bill No. 2956 (hospital safety net assessment).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2010, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(30) $79,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $53,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1845 (medical
support obligations).
(31) $63,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $583,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011, and $864,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement Engrossed House Bill No. 2194
(extraordinary medical placement for offenders). The department shall
work in partnership with the department of corrections to identify
services and find placements for offenders who are released through the
extraordinary medical placement program. The department shall
collaborate with the department of corrections to identify and track
cost savings to the department of corrections, including medical cost
savings, and to identify and track expenditures incurred by the aging
and disability services program for community services and by the
medical assistance program for medical expenses. A joint report
regarding the identified savings and expenditures shall be provided to
the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal
committees of the legislature by November 30, 2010. If this bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(32) $73,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011 and $50,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely for supplemental services that will be provided to
offenders in lieu of a prison sentence pursuant to chapter 224, Laws of
2010 (Substitute Senate Bill No. 6639).
(33) Sufficient amounts are provided in this section to provide
full benefit dual eligible beneficiaries with medicare part D
prescription drug copayment coverage in accordance with RCW 74.09.520.
(34) In addition to other reductions, the appropriations in this
section reflect reductions targeted specifically to state government
administrative costs. These administrative reductions shall be
achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by reducing those
administrative costs that do not affect providers, direct client
services, or direct service delivery or programs.
(((36))) (35) $331,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010, $331,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $1,228,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the department to support the
activities of the Washington poison center. The department shall seek
federal authority to receive matching funds from the federal government
through the children's health insurance program.
(((37))) (36) $528,000 of the general fund--state appropriation and
$2,955,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided
solely for the implementation of the lifeline program under chapter 8,
Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess. (security lifeline act).
(((43))) (37) Reductions in dental services are to be achieved by
focusing on the fastest growing areas of dental care. Reductions in
preventative care, particularly for children, will be avoided to the
extent possible.
(((44))) (38) $1,307,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2011 and $1,770,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to continue to provide dental
services in calendar year 2011 for qualifying adults with developmental
disabilities. Services shall include preventive, routine, and emergent
dental care, and support for continued operation of the dental
education in care of persons with disabilities (DECOD) program at the
University of Washington.
(39) The department shall develop the capability to implement apple
health for kids express lane eligibility enrollments for children
receiving basic food assistance by June 30, 2011.
(((45))) (40)(a) The department, in coordination with the health
care authority, shall actively continue to negotiate a medicaid section
1115 waiver with the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services
that would provide federal matching funds for services provided to
persons enrolled in the basic health plan under chapter 70.47 RCW and
the medical care services program under RCW 74.09.035.
(b) If the waiver in (a) of this subsection is granted, the
department and the health care authority may implement the waiver if it
allows the program to remain within appropriated levels, after
providing notice of its terms and conditions to the relevant policy and
fiscal committees of the legislature in writing thirty days prior to
the planned implementation date of the waiver.
(((46))) (41) $704,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010, $812,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $1,516,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for maintaining employer-sponsored
insurance program staff, coordination of benefits unit staff, the
payment integrity audit team, and family planning nursing.
(((48))) (42) Every effort shall be made to maintain current
employment levels and achieve administrative savings through vacancies
and employee attrition. Efficiencies shall be implemented as soon as
possible in order to minimize actual reduction in force. The
department shall implement a management strategy that minimizes
disruption of service and negative impacts on employees.

Sec. 209 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- VOCATIONAL
REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,327,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,077,000))
$10,045,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($107,961,000))
$107,848,000
Telecommunications Devices for the Hearing and
Speech Impaired -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,976,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($134,341,000))
$134,196,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The vocational rehabilitation program
shall coordinate closely with the economic services program to serve
lifeline clients under chapter 8, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess. who are
referred for eligibility determination and vocational rehabilitation
services, and shall make every effort, within the requirements of the
federal rehabilitation act of 1973, to serve these clients.

Sec. 210 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- SPECIAL COMMITMENT
PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,827,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($46,922,000))
$47,051,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($95,749,000))
$95,878,000

Sec. 211 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ADMINISTRATION AND
SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,604,000))
$33,579,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,407,000))
$29,166,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($51,119,000))
$50,981,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,121,000
Institutional Impact Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($115,273,000))
$114,869,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: In addition to other reductions, the
appropriations in this section reflect reductions targeted specifically
to state government administrative costs. These administrative
reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by
reducing those administrative costs that do not affect direct client
services or direct service delivery or programs.
(1) $333,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the Washington state mentors
program to continue its public-private partnerships to provide
technical assistance and training to mentoring programs that serve at-risk youth.
(2) $445,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $445,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for funding of the teamchild
project through the governor's juvenile justice advisory committee.
(3) $178,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $178,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the juvenile detention
alternatives initiative.
(4) Amounts appropriated in this section reflect a reduction to the
family policy council. The family policy council shall reevaluate
staffing levels and administrative costs to ensure to the extent
possible a maximum ratio of grant moneys provided and administrative
costs.
(5) Amounts appropriated in this section reflect a reduction to the
council on children and families. The council on children and families
shall reevaluate staffing levels and administrative costs to ensure to
the extent possible a maximum ratio of grant moneys provided and
administrative costs.

Sec. 212 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $208,258,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($159,306,000))
$129,087,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,727,000
State Health Care Authority Administration Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,880,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $527,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($437,698,000))
$407,479,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within amounts appropriated in this section and sections 205
and 206 of this act, the health care authority shall continue to
provide an enhanced basic health plan subsidy for foster parents
licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW and workers in state-funded home care
programs. Under this enhanced subsidy option, foster parents eligible
to participate in the basic health plan as subsidized enrollees and
home care workers with family incomes below 200 percent of the federal
poverty level shall be allowed to enroll in the basic health plan at
the minimum premium amount charged to enrollees with incomes below
sixty-five percent of the federal poverty level.
(2) The health care authority shall require organizations and
individuals that are paid to deliver basic health plan services and
that choose to sponsor enrollment in the subsidized basic health plan
to pay 133 percent of the premium amount which would otherwise be due
from the sponsored enrollees.
(3) The administrator shall take at least the following actions to
assure that persons participating in the basic health plan are eligible
for the level of assistance they receive: (a) Require submission of
(i) income tax returns, and recent pay history, from all applicants, or
(ii) other verifiable evidence of earned and unearned income from those
persons not required to file income tax returns; (b) check employment
security payroll records at least once every twelve months on all
enrollees; (c) require enrollees whose income as indicated by payroll
records exceeds that upon which their subsidy is based to document
their current income as a condition of continued eligibility; (d)
require enrollees for whom employment security payroll records cannot
be obtained to document their current income at least once every six
months; (e) not reduce gross family income for self-employed persons by
noncash-flow expenses such as, but not limited to, depreciation,
amortization, and home office deductions, as defined by the United
States internal revenue service; and (f) pursue repayment and civil
penalties from persons who have received excessive subsidies, as
provided in RCW 70.47.060(9).
(4)(a) In order to maximize the funding appropriated for the basic
health plan, the health care authority is directed to make
modifications that will reduce the total number of subsidized enrollees
to approximately 65,000 by January 1, 2010. In addition to the reduced
enrollment, other modifications may include changes in enrollee premium
obligations, changes in benefits, enrollee cost-sharing, and
termination of the enrollment of individuals concurrently enrolled in
a medical assistance program as provided in Substitute House Bill No.
2341.
(b) The health care authority shall coordinate with the department
of social and health services to negotiate a medicaid section 1115
waiver with the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services that
would provide matching funds for services provided to persons enrolled
in the basic health plan under chapter 70.47 RCW.
(c) If the waiver in (b) of this subsection is granted, the health
care authority may implement the waiver if it allows the program to
remain within appropriated levels, after providing notice of its terms
and conditions to the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature in writing thirty days prior to the planned implementation
date of the waiver.
(5) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5360 (community collaboratives). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this
section shall lapse.
(6) The authority shall seek public-private partnerships and
federal funds that are or may become available to implement health
information technology projects under the federal American recovery and
reinvestment act of 2009.
(((9))) (7) $20,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $63,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the implementation of
chapter 220, Laws of 2010 (accountable care organizations).

Sec. 213 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $98,414,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $81,735,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $564,379,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $162,237,000
Hospital Data Collection Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $218,000
Health Professions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $82,850,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $603,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,206,000
Safe Drinking Water Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,731,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,862,000
Waterworks Operator Certification -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,522,000
Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $326,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,106,000
Medical Test Site Licensure Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,261,000
Youth Tobacco Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,512,000
Public Health Supplemental Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,804,000
Community and Economic Development Fee Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $298,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $292,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($44,196,000))
$41,196,000
Biotoxin Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,163,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,088,763,000))
$1,085,763,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department of health shall not initiate any services that
will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly
authorized in this act or other law. The department of health and the
state board of health shall not implement any new or amended rules
pertaining to primary and secondary school facilities until the rules
and a final cost estimate have been presented to the legislature, and
the legislature has formally funded implementation of the rules through
the omnibus appropriations act or by statute. The department may seek,
receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal
moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does
not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of
amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives
unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent
for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation that
provides appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated
state moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this
subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the
legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(2) In accordance with RCW 43.70.250 and 43.135.055, the department
is authorized to establish and raise fees in fiscal year 2011 as
necessary to meet the actual costs of conducting business and the
appropriation levels in this section. This authorization applies to
fees for the review of sewage tank designs, fees related to regulation
and inspection of farmworker housing, and fees associated with the
following professions: Acupuncture, dental, denturist, mental health
counselor, nursing, nursing assistant, optometry, radiologic
technologist, recreational therapy, respiratory therapy, social worker,
cardiovascular invasive specialist, and practitioners authorized under
chapter 18.240 RCW.
(3) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055 and RCW 43.70.250, the department is
authorized to establish fees by the amount necessary to fully support
the cost of activities related to the administration of long-term care
worker certification. The department is further authorized to increase
fees by the amount necessary to implement the regulatory requirements
of the following bills: House Bill No. 1414 (health care assistants),
House Bill No. 1740 (dental residency licenses), and House Bill No.
1899 (retired active physician licenses).
(4) $764,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the medical quality assurance commission to
maintain disciplinary staff and associated costs sufficient to reduce
the backlog of disciplinary cases and to continue to manage the
disciplinary caseload of the commission.
(5) $57,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $58,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the midwifery licensure and
regulatory program to offset a reduction in revenue from fees. The
department shall convene the midwifery advisory committee on a
quarterly basis to address issues related to licensed midwifery. The
appropriations in this section assume that the current application and
renewal fee for midwives shall be increased by fifty dollars and all
other fees for midwives be adjusted accordingly.
(6) Funding for the human papillomavirus vaccine shall not be
included in the department's universal vaccine purchase program in
fiscal year 2010. Remaining funds for the universal vaccine purchase
program shall be used to continue the purchase of all other vaccines
included in the program until May 1, 2010, at which point state funding
for the universal vaccine purchase program shall be discontinued.
(7) Beginning July 1, 2010, the department, in collaboration with
the department of social and health services, shall maximize the use of
existing federal funds, including section 317 of the federal public
health services act direct assistance as well as federal funds that may
become available under the American recovery and reinvestment act, in
order to continue to provide immunizations for low-income, nonmedicaid
eligible children up to three hundred percent of the federal poverty
level in state-sponsored health programs.
(8) The department shall eliminate outreach activities for the
health care directives registry and use the remaining amounts to
maintain the contract for the registry and minimal staffing necessary
to administer the basic entry functions for the registry.
(9) Funding in this section reflects a temporary reduction of
resources for the 2009-11 fiscal biennium for the state board of health
to conduct health impact reviews.
(10) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055 and 43.70.125, the department is
authorized to adopt rules to establish a fee schedule to apply to
applicants for initial certification surveys of health care facilities
for purposes of receiving federal health care program reimbursement.
The fees shall only apply when the department has determined that
federal funding is not sufficient to compensate the department for the
cost of conducting initial certification surveys. The fees for initial
certification surveys may be established as follows: Up to $1,815 for
ambulatory surgery centers, up to $2,015 for critical access hospitals,
up to $980 for end stage renal disease facilities, up to $2,285 for
home health agencies, up to $2,285 for hospice agencies, up to $2,285
for hospitals, up to $520 for rehabilitation facilities, up to $690 for
rural health clinics, and up to $7,000 for transplant hospitals.
(11) Funding for family planning grants for fiscal year 2011 is
reduced in the expectation that federal funding shall become available
to expand coverage of services for individuals through programs at the
department of social and health services. In the event that such
funding is not provided, the legislature intends to continue funding
through a supplemental appropriation at fiscal year 2010 levels.
$4,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation is provided solely
for the department of health-funded family planning clinic grants due
to federal funding not becoming available.
(12) $16,000,000 of the tobacco prevention and control account--state appropriation is provided solely for local health jurisdictions
to conduct core public health functions as defined in RCW 43.70.514.
(13) $100,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1414
(health care assistants). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(14) $42,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1740
(dentistry license issuance). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2009, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.
(15) $23,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 1899
(retired active physician licenses). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.
(16) $12,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $67,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation
are provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1510 (birth
certificates). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount
provided in this section shall lapse.
(17) $31,000 of the health professions account is provided for the
implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5850 (human
trafficking). If the bill is not enacted by June 2009, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(18) $282,000 of the health professions account is provided for the
implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5752 (dentists cost
recovery). If the bill is not enacted by June 2009, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(19) $106,000 of the health professions account is provided for the
implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5601 (speech language
assistants). If the bill is not enacted by June 2009, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(20) Subject to existing resources, the department of health is
encouraged to examine, in the ordinary course of business, current and
prospective programs, treatments, education, and awareness of
cardiovascular disease that are needed for a thriving and healthy
Washington.
(((22))) (21) $390,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement chapter 169, Laws of 2010
(nursing assistants). The amount provided in this subsection is from
fee revenue authorized by Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6582.
(((23))) (22) $10,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2010 and $40,000 of the health
professions account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are
provided solely for the department to study cost effective options for
collecting demographic data related to the health care professions
workforce to be submitted to the legislature by December 1, 2010.
(((24))) (23) $66,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement chapter 209, Laws of 2010
(pain management).
(((25))) (24) $10,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement chapter 92, Laws of 2010
(cardiovascular invasive specialists).
(((26))) (25) $23,000 of the general fund--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement chapter 182, Laws of 2010 (tracking
ephedrine, etc.).
(((27))) (26) The department is authorized to coordinate a tobacco
cessation media campaign using all appropriate media with the purpose
of maximizing the use of quit-line services and youth smoking
prevention.
(((29))) (27) It is the intent of the legislature that the
reductions in appropriations to the AIDS/HIV programs shall be
achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by reducing those state
government administrative costs that do not affect direct client
services or direct service delivery or programs. The agency shall, to
the greatest extent possible, reduce spending in those areas that shall
have the least impact on implementing these programs.
(((30))) (28) $400,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for granting to a willing local public
entity to provide emergency water supplies or water treatment for
households with individuals at high public health risk from nitrate-contaminated wells in the lower Yakima basin.
(((31))) (29) $100,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for an interagency contract to the
department of ecology to grant to agencies involved in improving
groundwater quality in the lower Yakima Valley. These agencies will
develop a local plan for improving water quality and reducing nitrate
contamination. The department of ecology will report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature and to the office of
financial management no later than December 1, 2010, summarizing
progress towards developing and implementing this plan.

Sec. 214 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
(1) ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,772,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($55,417,000))
$51,929,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($111,189,000))
$107,701,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) Within funds appropriated in this section, the department shall
seek contracts for chemical dependency vendors to provide chemical
dependency treatment of offenders in corrections facilities, including
corrections centers and community supervision facilities, which have
demonstrated effectiveness in treatment of offenders and are able to
provide data to show a successful treatment rate.
(b) $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the support of a statewide
council on mentally ill offenders that includes as its members
representatives of community-based mental health treatment programs,
current or former judicial officers, and directors and commanders of
city and county jails and state prison facilities. The council will
investigate and promote cost-effective approaches to meeting the long-term needs of adults and juveniles with mental disorders who have a
history of offending or who are at-risk of offending, including their
mental health, physiological, housing, employment, and job training
needs.

(2) CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $458,503,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($600,657,000))
$562,483,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $186,719,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,936,000
State Efficiency and Restructuring Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,522,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,286,337,000))
$1,248,163,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The department may expend funds generated by contractual
agreements entered into for mitigation of severe overcrowding in local
jails. Any funds generated in excess of actual costs shall be
deposited in the state general fund. Expenditures shall not exceed
revenue generated by such agreements and shall be treated as a recovery
of costs.
(b) The department shall accomplish personnel reductions with the
least possible impact on correctional custody staff, community custody
staff, and correctional industries. For the purposes of this
subsection, correctional custody staff means employees responsible for
the direct supervision of offenders.
(c) During the 2009-11 biennium, when contracts are established or
renewed for offender pay phone and other telephone services provided to
inmates, the department shall select the contractor or contractors
primarily based on the following factors: (i) The lowest rate charged
to both the inmate and the person paying for the telephone call; and
(ii) the lowest commission rates paid to the department, while
providing reasonable compensation to cover the costs of the department
to provide the telephone services to inmates and provide sufficient
revenues for the activities funded from the institutional welfare
betterment account.
(d) The Harborview medical center and the University of Washington
medical center shall provide inpatient and outpatient hospital services
to offenders confined in department of corrections facilities at a rate
no greater than the average rate that the department has negotiated
with other community hospitals in Washington state.
(e) A political subdivision which is applying for funding to
mitigate one-time impacts associated with construction or expansion of
a correctional institution, consistent with WAC 137-12A-030, may apply
for the mitigation funds in the fiscal biennium in which the impacts
occur or in the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.
(f) Within amounts provided in this subsection, the department,
jointly with the department of social and health services, shall
identify the number of offenders released through the extraordinary
medical placement program, the cost savings to the department of
corrections, including estimated medical cost savings, and the costs
for medical services in the community incurred by the department of
social and health services. The department and the department of
social and health services shall jointly report to the office of
financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the
legislature by November 30, 2010.
(g) $11,863,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, (($11,864,000)) $7,467,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011, and $2,336,000 of the general fund-private/local appropriation are provided solely for in-prison evidence-based programs and for the reception diagnostic center program as part
of the offender re-entry initiative.
(((i))) (h) The appropriations in this subsection are based on
savings assumed from ((decreasing the offender population at)) the
closure of the McNeil Island corrections center ((to 256 minimum
security offenders, decreasing the offender population at the Larch
corrections center to 240 offenders, the closure of)), the Ahtanum View
corrections center, and the ((closure of the)) Pine Lodge corrections
center for women.

(3) COMMUNITY SUPERVISION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,729,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($139,945,000))
$134,744,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($290,674,000))
$285,473,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The department shall accomplish personnel reductions with the
least possible impact on correctional custody staff, community custody
staff, and correctional industries. For the purposes of this
subsection, correctional custody staff means employees responsible for
the direct supervision of offenders.
(b) $2,083,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $2,083,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5525
(state institutions/release). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(c) The appropriations in this subsection are based upon savings
assumed from the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No.
5288 (supervision of offenders).
(d) $2,791,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $3,166,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for evidence-based community
programs and for community justice centers as part of the offender re-entry initiative.
(e) $418,300 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for the purposes of settling all claims in
Hilda Solis, Secretary of Labor, United States Department of Labor v.
State of Washington, Department of Corrections, United States District
Court, Western District of Washington, Cause No. C08-cv-05362-RJB. The
expenditure of this amount is contingent on the release of all claims
in the case, and total settlement costs shall not exceed the amount
provided in this subsection. If settlement is not fully executed by
June 30, 2010, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(f) $984,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011 is provided solely for supplemental services that will be
provided to offenders in lieu of a prison sentence, pursuant to chapter
224, Laws of 2010 (confinement alternatives).

(4) CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,574,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,547,000))
$2,441,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,121,000))
$5,015,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $132,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2010 and $132,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for
transfer to the jail industries board. The board shall use the amounts
provided only for administrative expenses, equipment purchases, and
technical assistance associated with advising cities and counties in
developing, promoting, and implementing consistent, safe, and efficient
offender work programs.

(5) INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,728,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($40,084,000))
$38,629,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($80,812,000))
$79,357,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The state prison institutions may use funds appropriated in
this subsection to rent uniforms from correctional industries in
accordance with existing legislative mandates.
(b) The state prison medical facilities may use funds appropriated
in this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital or
other group purchasing organizations when it is cost effective to do
so.

(End of Part)

PART III
NATURAL RESOURCES
Sec. 301 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 301 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $441,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($440,000))
$412,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($845,000))
$817,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,756,000))
$1,700,000

Sec. 302 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 302 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,552,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($52,725,000))
$46,925,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $82,079,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,688,000
Special Grass Seed Burning Research Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Reclamation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,649,000
Flood Control Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,943,000
State Emergency Water Projects Revolving Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,467,000
State Drought Preparedness Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities) -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $424,000
Freshwater Aquatic Algae Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $508,000
Water Rights Tracking System Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $116,000
Site Closure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $922,000
Wood Stove Education and Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $612,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,663,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $106,642,000
State Toxics Control Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $379,000
Local Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,690,000
Water Quality Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,018,000
Underground Storage Tank Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,270,000
Biosolids Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,866,000
Hazardous Waste Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,880,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,111,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,599,000
Air Operating Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,758,000
Freshwater Aquatic Weeds Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,693,000
Oil Spill Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,077,000
Metals Mining Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $535,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,210,000
Water Rights Processing Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $68,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($443,412,000))
$437,612,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $170,000 of the oil spill prevention account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a contract with the University of
Washington's sea grant program to continue an educational program
targeted to small spills from commercial fishing vessels, ferries,
cruise ships, ports, and marinas.
(2) $240,000 of the woodstove education and enforcement account--state appropriation is provided solely for citizen outreach efforts to
improve understanding of burn curtailments, the proper use of wood
heating devices, and public awareness of the adverse health effects of
woodsmoke pollution.
(3) $3,000,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation is
provided solely for contracted toxic-site cleanup actions at sites
where multiple potentially liable parties agree to provide funding.
(4) $3,600,000 of the local toxics account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the standby emergency rescue tug stationed at Neah
Bay.
(5) $811,000 of the state toxics account--state appropriation is
provided solely for oversight of toxic cleanup at facilities that
treat, store, and dispose of hazardous wastes.
(6) $1,456,000 of the state toxics account--state appropriation is
provided solely for toxic cleanup at sites where willing parties
negotiate prepayment agreements with the department and provide
necessary funding.
(7) $558,000 of the state toxics account--state appropriation and
$3,000,000 of the local toxics account--state appropriation are
provided solely for grants and technical assistance to Puget Sound-area
local governments engaged in updating shoreline master programs.
(8) $950,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for measuring water and habitat
quality to determine watershed health and assist salmon recovery,
beginning in fiscal year 2011.
(9) RCW 70.105.280 authorizes the department to assess reasonable
service charges against those facilities that store, treat, incinerate,
or dispose of dangerous or extremely hazardous waste that involves both
a nonradioactive hazardous component and a radioactive component.
Service charges may not exceed the costs to the department in carrying
out the duties in RCW 70.105.280. The current service charges do not
meet the costs of the department to carry out its duties. Pursuant to
RCW 43.135.055 and 70.105.280, the department is authorized to increase
the service charges no greater than 18 percent for fiscal year 2010 and
no greater than 15 percent for fiscal year 2011. Such service charges
shall include all costs of public participation grants awarded to
qualified entities by the department pursuant to RCW 70.105D.070(5) for
facilities at which such grants are recognized as a component of a
community relations or public participation plan authorized or required
as an element of a consent order, federal facility agreement or agreed
order entered into or issued by the department pursuant to any federal
or state law governing investigation and remediation of releases of
hazardous substances. Public participation grants funded by such
service charges shall be in addition to, and not in place of, any other
grants made pursuant to RCW 70.105D.070(5). Costs for the public
participation grants shall be billed individually to the mixed waste
facility associated with the grant.
(10) The department is authorized to increase the following fees in
the 2009-2011 biennium as necessary to meet the actual costs of
conducting business and the appropriation levels in this section:
Environmental lab accreditation, dam safety and inspection, biosolids
permitting, air emissions new source review, and manufacturer
registration and renewal.
(11) $63,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5797 (solid waste handling permits). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(12) $225,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $193,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute Bill No. 5560 (agency climate leadership). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(13) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for watershed planning
implementation grants to continue ongoing efforts to develop and
implement water agreements in the Nooksack Basin and the Bertrand
watershed. These amounts are intended to support project
administration; monitoring; negotiations in the Nooksack watershed
between tribes, the department, and affected water users; continued
implementation of a flow augmentation project; plan implementation in
the Fishtrap watershed; and the development of a water bank.
(14) $215,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $235,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to provide watershed planning
implementation grants for WRIA 32 to implement Substitute House Bill
No. 1580 (pilot local water management program). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(15) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the purpose of supporting the
trust water rights program and processing trust water right transfer
applications that improve instream flow.
(16)(a) The department shall convene a stock water working group
that includes: Legislators, four members representing agricultural
interests, three members representing environmental interests, the
attorney general or designee, the director of the department of ecology
or designee, the director of the department of agriculture or designee,
and affected federally recognized tribes shall be invited to send
participants.
(b) The group shall review issues surrounding the use of permit-exempt wells for stock-watering purposes and may develop
recommendations for legislative action.
(c) The working group shall meet periodically and report its
activities and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate
legislative committees by December 1, 2009.
(17) $73,000 of the water quality permit account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No.
1413 (water discharge fees). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2009, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(18) The department shall continue to work with the Columbia Snake
River irrigators' association to determine how seasonal water operation
and maintenance conservation can be utilized. In implementing this
proviso, the department shall also consult with the Columbia River
policy advisory group as appropriate.
(19) The department shall track any changes in costs, wages, and
benefits that would have resulted if House Bill No. 1716 (public
contract living wages), as introduced in the 2009 regular session of
the legislature, were enacted and made applicable to contracts and
related subcontracts entered into, renewed, or extended during the
2009-11 biennium. The department shall submit a report to the house of
representatives commerce and labor committee and the senate labor,
commerce, and consumer protection committee by December 1, 2011. The
report shall include data on any aggregate changes in wages and
benefits that would have resulted during the 2009-11 biennium.
(20) Within amounts appropriated in this section the department
shall develop recommendations by December 1, 2009, for a convenient and
effective mercury-containing light recycling program for residents,
small businesses, and small school districts throughout the state. The
department shall consider options including but not limited to, a
producer-funded program, a recycler-supported or recycle fee program,
a consumer fee at the time of purchase, general fund appropriations, or
a currently existing dedicated account. The department shall involve
and consult with stakeholders including persons who represent
retailers, waste haulers, recyclers, mercury-containing light
manufacturers or wholesalers, cities, counties, environmental
organizations and other interested parties. The department shall
report its findings and recommendations for a recycling program for
mercury-containing lights to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2009.
(21) $140,000 of the freshwater aquatic algae control account--state appropriation is provided solely for grants to cities, counties,
tribes, special purpose districts, and state agencies for capital and
operational expenses used to manage and study excessive saltwater algae
with an emphasis on the periodic accumulation of sea lettuce on Puget
Sound beaches.
(22) By December 1, 2009, the department in consultation with local
governments shall conduct a remedial action grant financing
alternatives report. The report shall address options for financing the
remedial action grants identified in the department's report, entitled
"House Bill 1761, Model Toxics Control Accounts Ten-Year Financing
Plan" and shall include but not be limited to the following: (a)
Capitalizing cleanup costs using debt insurance; (b) capitalizing
cleanup costs using prefunded cost-cap insurance; (c) other contractual
instruments with local governments; and (d) an assessment of overall
economic benefits of the remedial action grants funded using the
instruments identified in this section.
(23) $220,000 of the site closure account--state appropriation is
provided solely for litigation expenses associated with the lawsuit
filed by energy solutions, inc., against the Northwest interstate
compact on low-level radioactive waste management and its executive
director.
(24) $68,000 of the water rights processing account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6267 (water rights processing). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2010, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(25) $10,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5543 (mercury-containing lights). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2010, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(26) $300,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for piloting and evaluating two
coordinated, multijurisdictional permitting teams for nontransportation
projects.
(27)(a) $4,000,000 of the state drought preparedness account--state
appropriation is provided solely for response to a drought declaration
pursuant to chapter 43.83B RCW. If such a drought declaration occurs,
the department of ecology may provide funding to public bodies as
defined in RCW 43.83B.050 in connection with projects and measures
designed to alleviate drought conditions that may affect public health
and safety, drinking water supplies, agricultural activities, or fish
and wildlife survival.
(b) Projects or measures for which funding will be provided must be
connected with a water system, water source, or water body that is
receiving, or has been projected to receive, less than seventy-five
percent of normal water supply, as the result of natural drought
conditions. This reduction in water supply must be such that it is
causing, or will cause, undue hardship for the entities or fish or
wildlife depending on the water supply. The department shall issue
guidelines outlining grant program and matching fund requirements
within ten days of a drought declaration.

Sec. 303 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,176,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,311,000))
$18,309,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,892,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,000
Winter Recreation Program Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,556,000
Off Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $239,000
Snowmobile Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,842,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $368,000
Recreation Resources Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,802,000
NOVA Program Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,560,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $72,975,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account --
Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($150,094,000))
$148,092,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for a grant for the operation of
the Northwest avalanche center.
(2) Proceeds received from voluntary donations given by motor
vehicle registration applicants shall be used solely for the operation
and maintenance of state parks.
(3) With the passage of Substitute House Bill No. 2339 (state parks
system donation), the legislature finds that it has provided sufficient
funds to ensure that all state parks remain open during the 2009-11
biennium. The commission shall not close state parks unless the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2009, or revenue collections are
insufficient to fund the ongoing operation of state parks. By January
10, 2010, the commission shall provide a report to the legislature on
their budget and resources related to operating parks for the remainder
of the biennium.
(4) (((5))) The commission shall work with the department of
general administration to evaluate the commission's existing leases
with the intention of increasing net revenue to state parks. The
commission shall provide to the office of financial management and the
legislative fiscal committees no later than September 30, 2009, a list
of leases the commission proposes be managed by the department of
general administration.

Sec. 304 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 304 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,486,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,480,000))
$1,312,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,322,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $278,000
Firearms Range Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,000
Recreation Resources Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,710,000
NOVA Program Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,049,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,614,000))
$17,446,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $204,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $244,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 2157 (salmon recovery). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(2) The recreation and conservation office, under the direction of
the salmon recovery funding board, shall assess watershed and regional-scale capacity issues relating to the support and implementation of
salmon recovery. The assessment shall examine priority setting and
incentives to further promote coordination to ensure that effective and
efficient mechanisms for delivery of salmon recovery funding board
funds are being utilized. The salmon recovery funding board shall
distribute its operational funding to the appropriate entities based on
this assessment.
(3) The recreation and conservation office shall negotiate an
agreement with the Puget Sound partnership to consolidate or share
certain administrative functions currently performed by each agency
independently. The agencies shall proportionately share the costs of
such shared functions. Examples of shared functions may include, but
are not limited to, support for personnel, information technology,
grant and contract management, invasive species work, legislative
coordination, and policy and administrative support of various boards
and councils.

Sec. 305 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 305 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE ENVIRONMENTAL HEARINGS OFFICE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,108,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,104,000))
$1,035,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,212,000))
$2,143,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $46,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2010 is provided solely for tenant
improvement costs associated with moving the office to a new location.

Sec. 306 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 306 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,556,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,285,000))
$6,751,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,178,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,019,000))
$15,485,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: (((1))) In order to maintain a high degree
of customer service and accountability for conservation districts,
$125,000 is to support the conservation commission's administrative
activities related to the processing of conservation district invoices
and budgeting.

Sec. 307 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,263,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($34,337,000))
$30,560,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $85,799,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,211,000
Off Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $413,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,739,000
Recreational Fisheries Enhancement -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,472,000
Warm Water Game Fish Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,861,000
Eastern Washington Pheasant Enhancement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $851,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $207,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Prevention Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $833,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $86,878,000
Wildlife Account--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $101,000
Wildlife Account--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,367,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,426,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $487,000
Wildlife Rehabilitation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $269,000
Regional Fisheries Salmonid Recovery Account --
Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,001,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $876,000
Oyster Reserve Land Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $916,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($324,346,000))
$320,569,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $294,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of hatchery
reform recommendations defined by the hatchery scientific review group.
(2) $355,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $422,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the department to implement a
pilot project with the Confederated Tribes of the Colville Reservation
to develop expanded recreational fishing opportunities on Lake Rufus
Woods and its northern shoreline and to conduct joint enforcement of
lake fisheries on Lake Rufus Woods and adjoining waters, pursuant to
state and tribal intergovernmental agreements developed under the
Columbia River water supply program. For the purposes of the pilot
project:
(a) A fishing permit issued to a nontribal member by the Colville
Tribes shall satisfy the license requirement of RCW 77.32.010 on the
waters of Lake Rufus Woods and on the north shore of Lake Rufus Woods;
(b) The Colville Tribes have agreed to provide to holders of its
nontribal member fishing permits a means to demonstrate that fish in
their possession were lawfully taken in Lake Rufus Woods;
(c) A Colville tribal member identification card shall satisfy the
license requirement of RCW 77.32.010 on all waters of Lake Rufus Woods;
(d) The department and the Colville Tribes shall jointly designate
fishing areas on the north shore of Lake Rufus Woods for the purposes
of enhancing access to the recreational fisheries on the lake; and
(e) The Colville Tribes have agreed to recognize a fishing license
issued under RCW 77.32.470 or RCW 77.32.490 as satisfying the nontribal
member fishing permit requirements of Colville tribal law on the
reservation portion of the waters of Lake Rufus Woods and at designated
fishing areas on the north shore of Lake Rufus Woods;
(3) Prior to submitting its 2011-2013 biennial operating and
capital budget request related to state fish hatcheries to the office
of financial management, the department shall contract with the
hatchery scientific review group (HSRG) to review this request. This
review shall: (a) Determine if the proposed requests are consistent
with HSRG recommendations; (b) prioritize the components of the
requests based on their contributions to protecting wild salmonid
stocks and meeting the recommendations of the HSRG; and (c) evaluate
whether the proposed requests are being made in the most cost effective
manner. The department shall provide a copy of the HSRG review to the
office of financial management with their agency budget proposal.
(4) Within existing funds, the department shall continue
implementing its capital program action plan dated September 1, 2007,
including the purchase of the necessary maintenance and support costs
for the capital programs and engineering tools. The department shall
report to the office of financial management and the appropriate
committees of the legislature, its progress in implementing the plan,
including improvements instituted in its capital program, by September
30, 2010.
(5) $1,232,000 of the state wildlife account--state appropriation
is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1778 (fish
and wildlife). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $400,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $400,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for a state match to support the
Puget Sound nearshore partnership between the department and the U.S.
army corps of engineers.
(7) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for removal of derelict gear in
Washington waters.
(8) The department of fish and wildlife shall dispose of all Cessna
aircraft it currently owns. The proceeds from the aircraft shall be
deposited into the state wildlife account. Disposal of the aircraft
must occur no later than June 30, 2010. The department shall
coordinate with the department of natural resources on the installation
of fire surveillance equipment into its Partenavia aircraft. The
department shall make its Partenavia aircraft available to the
department of natural resources on a cost-reimbursement basis for its
use in coordinating fire suppression efforts. The two agencies shall
develop an interagency agreement that defines how they will share
access to the plane.
(9) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for an electron project fish passage study
consistent with the recommendations and protocols contained in the 2008
electron project downstream fish passage final report.
(10) $60,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $60,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute Bill No. 5560 (agency climate leadership). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(11) If sufficient new revenues are not identified to continue
hatchery operations, within the constraints of legally binding tribal
agreements, the department shall dispose of, by removal, sale, lease,
reversion, or transfer of ownership, the following hatcheries:
McKernan, Colville, Omak, Bellingham, Arlington, and Mossyrock.
Disposal of the hatcheries must occur by June 30, 2011, and any
proceeds received from disposal shall be deposited in the state
wildlife account. Within available funds, the department shall provide
quarterly reports on the progress of disposal to the office of
financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the
legislature. The first report shall be submitted no later than
September 30, 2009.
(12) $100,000 of the eastern Washington pheasant enhancement
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the department to
support efforts to enhance permanent and temporary pheasant habitat on
public and private lands in Grant, Franklin, and Adams counties. The
department may support efforts by entities including conservation
districts, nonprofit organizations, and landowners, and must require
such entities to provide significant nonstate matching resources, which
may be in the form of funds, material, or labor.
(13) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the
department of fish and wildlife shall develop a method for allocating
its administrative and overhead costs proportionate to program fund
use. As part of its 2011-2013 biennial operating budget, the
department shall submit a decision package that rebalances expenditure
authority for all agency funds based upon proportionate contributions.
(14) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the
department shall identify additional opportunities for partnerships in
order to keep fish hatcheries operational. Such partnerships shall aim
to maintain fish production and salmon recovery with less reliance on
state operating funds.
(15) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the
department shall work with stakeholders to develop a long-term funding
model that sustains the department's work of conserving species and
habitat, providing sustainable recreational and commercial
opportunities and using sound business practices. The funding model
analysis shall assess the appropriate uses of each fund source and
whether the department's current and projected revenue levels are
adequate to sustain its current programs. The department shall report
its recommended funding model including supporting analysis and
stakeholder participation summary to the office of financial management
and the appropriate committees of the legislature by October 1, 2010.
(16) By October 1, 2010, the department shall enter into an
interagency agreement with the department of natural resources for land
management services for the department's wildlife conservation and
recreation lands. Land management services may include but are not
limited to records management, real estate services such as surveying,
and land acquisition and disposal services. The interagency agreement
shall describe business processes, service delivery expectations, cost,
and timing. In the agreement, the department shall define its roles
and responsibilities. A draft agreement shall be submitted to the
office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of
the legislature by July 1, 2010.
(17) Prior to opening game management unit 490 to public hunting,
the department shall complete an environmental impact statement that
includes an assessment of how public hunting activities will impact the
ongoing protection of the public water supply.
(18) The department must work with appropriate stakeholders to
facilitate the disposition of salmon to best utilize the resource,
increase revenues to regional fisheries enhancement groups, and enhance
the provision of nutrients to food banks. By November 1, 2010, the
department must provide a report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature summarizing these discussions, outcomes, and
recommendations. After November 1, 2010, the department shall not
solicit or award a surplus salmon disposal contract without first
giving due consideration to implementing the recommendations developed
during the stakeholder process.
(19) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011 is provided solely for increased fish production at Voight
Creek hatchery.

Sec. 308 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,822,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($37,513,000))
$33,387,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,784,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,369,000
Forest Development Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,640,000
Off Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,406,000
Surveys and Maps Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,332,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,315,000
Resources Management Cost Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $78,704,000
Surface Mining Reclamation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,494,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Forest and Fish Support Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
Aquatic Land Dredged Material Disposal Site
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,333,000
Natural Resources Conservation Areas Stewardship
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $184,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $720,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $568,000
NOVA Program Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $974,000
Derelict Vessel Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,749,000
Agricultural College Trust Management Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,941,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($276,848,000))
$272,722,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,355,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $349,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for deposit into the agricultural
college trust management account and are provided solely to manage
approximately 70,700 acres of Washington State University's
agricultural college trust lands.
(2) $22,670,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $11,128,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $5,000,000 of the disaster response account--state appropriation are provided solely for emergency fire suppression.
None of the general fund and disaster response account amounts provided
in this subsection may be used to fund agency indirect and
administrative expenses. Agency indirect and administrative costs
shall be allocated among the agency's remaining accounts and
appropriations. The department of natural resources shall submit a
quarterly report to the office of financial management and the
legislative fiscal committees detailing information on current and
planned expenditures from the disaster response account. This work
shall be done in coordination with the military department.
(3) $5,000,000 of the forest and fish support account--state
appropriation is provided solely for adaptive management, monitoring,
and participation grants to tribes. If federal funding for this
purpose is reinstated, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(4) $600,000 of the derelict vessel removal account--state
appropriation is provided solely for removal of derelict and abandoned
vessels that have the potential to contaminate Puget Sound.
(5) $666,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is provided
solely to implement House Bill No. 2165 (forest biomass energy
project). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $5,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2010 and $5,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011 are provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No.
1038 (specialized forest products). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(7) $440,000 of the state general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $440,000 of the state general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for forest work
crews that support correctional camps and are contingent upon
continuing operations of Naselle youth camp at the level provided in
fiscal year 2008. The department shall consider using up to $2,000,000
of the general fund--federal appropriation to support and utilize
correctional camp crews to implement natural resource projects approved
by the federal government for federal stimulus funding.
(8) The department of natural resources shall dispose of the King
Air aircraft it currently owns. Before disposal and within existing
funds, the department shall transfer specialized equipment for fire
surveillance to the department of fish and wildlife's Partenavia
aircraft. Disposal of the aircraft must occur no later than June 30,
2010, and the proceeds from the sale of the aircraft shall be deposited
into the forest and fish support account. No later than June 30, 2011,
the department shall lease facilities in eastern Washington sufficient
to house the necessary aircraft, mechanics, and pilots used for forest
fire prevention and suppression.
(9) $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute Bill No. 5560 (agency climate leadership). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(10) $1,030,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 is provided solely for continuing
scientific studies already underway as part of the adaptive management
process. Funds may not be used to initiate new studies unless the
department secures new federal funding for the adaptive management
process.
(11) Within available funds, the department of natural resources
shall review the statutory method for determining aquatic lands lease
rates for private marinas, public marinas not owned and operated by
port districts, yacht clubs, and other entities leasing state land for
boat moorage. The review shall consider alternative methods for
determining rents for these entities for a fair distribution of rent,
consistent with the department management mandates for state aquatic
lands.
(12) $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011 and $100,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account--state
appropriation are provided solely to install up to twenty mooring buoys
in Eagle Harbor and to remove abandoned boats, floats, and other
trespassing structures.
(13) By October 1, 2010, the department shall enter into an
interagency agreement with the department of fish and wildlife for
providing land management services on the department of fish and
wildlife's wildlife conservation and recreation lands. Land management
services may include but are not limited to records management, real
estate services such as surveying, and land acquisition and disposal
services. The interagency agreement shall describe business processes,
service delivery expectations, cost, and timing. A draft agreement
shall be submitted to the office of financial management and the
appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by July 1, 2010.
(14) $41,000 of the forest development account--state
appropriation, $44,000 of the resources management cost account--state
appropriation, and $2,000 of the agricultural college trust management
account--state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation
of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2481 (DNR forest biomass
agreements). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2010, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 309 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 309 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,320,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,219,000))
$15,830,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,947,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $193,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,551,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,724,000
Water Quality Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($57,015,000))
$56,626,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $350,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation
is provided solely for funding to the Pacific county noxious weed
control board to eradicate remaining spartina in Willapa Bay.
(2) $19,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $6,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to implement Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5797 (solid waste handling permits). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(3) The department is authorized to establish or increase the
following fees in the 2009-11 biennium as necessary to meet the actual
costs of conducting business: Christmas tree grower licensing, nursery
dealer licensing, plant pest inspection and testing, and commission
merchant licensing.
(4) $5,420,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011 and $2,782,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6341
(food assistance/department of agriculture). Within amounts
appropriated in this subsection, $65,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 is provided solely for a contract
with a food distribution program for communities in the southwestern
portion of the state and for workers impacted by timber and salmon
fishing closures and reductions. The department may not charge
administrative overhead or expenses to this contract. If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2010, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(5) The department shall, if public or private funds are available,
partner with eligible public and private entities with experience in
food collection and distribution to review funding sources for eight
full-time volunteers in the AmeriCorps VISTA program to conduct
outreach to local growers, agricultural donors, and community
volunteers. Public and private partners shall also be utilized to
coordinate gleaning unharvested tree fruits and fresh produce for
distribution to individuals throughout Washington state.
(6) When reducing laboratory activities and functions, the
department shall not impact any research or analysis pertaining to
bees.

Sec. 310 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 311 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,143,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,864,000))
$2,684,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,214,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $493,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $794,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,508,000))
$14,328,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $305,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for measuring water and habitat quality to
determine watershed health and assist salmon recovery.
(2) $794,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for activities that contribute to
Puget Sound protection and recovery, including provision of independent
advice and assessment of the state's oil spill prevention,
preparedness, and response programs, including review of existing
activities and recommendations for any necessary improvements. The
partnership may carry out this function through an existing committee,
such as the ecosystem coordination board or the leadership council, or
may appoint a special advisory council. Because this is a unique
statewide program, the partnership may invite participation from
outside the Puget Sound region.
(3) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the Puget
Sound partnership shall facilitate an ongoing monitoring consortium to
integrate monitoring efforts for storm water, water quality, watershed
health, and other indicators to enhance monitoring efforts in Puget
Sound.
(4) The Puget Sound partnership shall work with Washington State
University and the environmental protection agency to secure funding
for the beach watchers program.
(5) $839,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $764,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to support public education and
volunteer programs. The partnership is directed to distribute the
majority of funding as grants to local organizations, local
governments, and education, communication, and outreach network
partners. The partnership shall track progress for this activity
through the accountability system of the Puget Sound partnership.
(6) The Puget Sound partnership shall negotiate an agreement with
the recreation and conservation office to consolidate or share certain
administrative functions currently performed by each agency
independently. The agencies shall proportionately share the costs of
such shared functions. Examples of shared functions may include, but
are not limited to, support for personnel, information technology,
grant and contract management, invasive species work, legislative
coordination, and policy and administrative support of various boards
and councils.

(End of part)

PART V
EDUCATION
Sec. 501 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 501 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,415,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,610,000))
$29,696,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $87,081,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($156,106,000))
$152,192,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) A maximum of $23,096,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2010 and (($21,926,000)) $19,570,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2011 is for state
agency operations.
(a) $11,226,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and (($10,367,000)) $9,709,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the
operation and expenses of the office of the superintendent of public
instruction.
(i) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the
superintendent shall recognize the extraordinary accomplishments of
four students who have demonstrated a strong understanding of the
civics essential learning requirements to receive the Daniel J. Evans
civic education award.
(ii) Within amounts appropriated in this subsection (1)(a), the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, consistent with WAC
392-121-182 (alternative learning experience requirements) which
requires documentation of alternative learning experience student
headcount and full-time equivalent (FTE) enrollment claimed for basic
education funding, shall provide, monthly, accurate monthly headcount
and FTE enrollments for students in alternative learning experience
(ALE) programs as well as information about resident and serving
districts.
(iii) Within amounts provided in this subsection (1)(a), the state
superintendent of public instruction shall share best practices with
school districts regarding strategies for increasing efficiencies and
economies of scale in school district noninstructional operations
through shared service arrangements and school district cooperatives,
as well as other practices.
(((c))) (b) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 is provided to the office of the superintendent of
public instruction solely to convene a science, technology,
engineering, and mathematics (STEM) working group to develop a
comprehensive plan with a shared vision, goals, and measurable
objectives to improve policies and practices to ensure that a pathway
is established for elementary schools, middle schools, high schools,
postsecondary degree programs, and careers in the areas of STEM,
including improving practices for recruiting, preparing, hiring,
retraining, and supporting teachers and instructors while creating
pathways to boost student success, close the achievement gap, and
prepare every student to be college and career ready. The working
group shall be composed of the director of STEM at the office of the
superintendent of public instruction who shall be the chair of the
working group, and at least one representative from the state board of
education, professional educator standards board, state board of
community and technical colleges, higher education coordinating board,
workforce training and education coordinating board, the achievement
gap oversight and accountability committee, and others with appropriate
expertise. The working group shall develop a comprehensive plan and a
report with recommendations, including a timeline for specific actions
to be taken, which is due to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2010.
(((d))) (c) $920,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and (($941,000)) $491,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for research and
development activities associated with the development of options for
new school finance systems, including technical staff, reprogramming,
and analysis of alternative student funding formulae. Within this
amount is $150,000 for the state board of education for further
development of accountability systems, and $150,000 for the
professional educator standards board for continued development of
teacher certification and evaluation systems.
(((e))) (d) $965,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and (($946,000)) $887,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the
operation and expenses of the state board of education, including basic
education assistance activities.
(((f))) (e) $5,366,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and (($3,312,000)) $3,103,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to the
professional educator standards board for the following:
(i) $1,070,000 in fiscal year 2010 and (($1,058,000)) $985,000 in
fiscal year 2011 are for the operation and expenses of the Washington
professional educator standards board;
(ii) $4,106,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and (($2,066,000)) $1,936,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are for conditional scholarship
loans and mentor stipends provided through the alternative routes to
certification program administered by the professional educator
standards board, including the pipeline for paraeducators program and
the retooling to teach conditional loan programs. Funding within this
subsection (1)(f)(ii) is also provided for the recruiting Washington
teachers program.
(iii) $102,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided for the implementation of Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5973 (student achievement gap). (($100,000)) $94,000
of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2011 is
provided solely for the ongoing work of the achievement gap oversight
and accountability committee and implementation of the committee's
recommendations.
(((g))) (f) $1,349,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $144,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for replacement of the
apportionment system, which includes the processes that collect school
district budget and expenditure information, staffing characteristics,
and the student enrollments that drive the funding process.
(((h))) (g) $1,140,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $1,227,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the creation
of a statewide data base of longitudinal student information. This
amount is conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements in
section 902 of this act.
(((i))) (h) $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 is provided solely to promote the financial literacy
of students. The effort will be coordinated through the financial
education public-private partnership. It is expected that
nonappropriated funds available to the public-private partnership will
be sufficient to continue financial literacy activities.
(((j))) (i) To the maximum extent possible, in adopting new agency
rules or making any changes to existing rules or policies related to
the fiscal provisions in the administration of part V of this act, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall attempt to
request approval through the normal legislative budget process.
(((k))) (j) $44,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5248 (enacting the interstate compact on
educational opportunity for military children).
(((l))) (k) $700,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $700,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5410 (online learning).
(((m))) (l) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and (($25,000)) $12,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for project
citizen, a program sponsored by the national conference of state
legislatures and the center for civic education to promote
participation in government by middle school students.
(((n))) (m) $2,518,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 is provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 2776 (K-12 education funding). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2010, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(((o) $133,000)) (n) $89,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 is provided solely for the
implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 3026
(state and federal civil rights laws). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2010, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((p))) (o) Beginning in the 2010-11 school year, the
superintendent of public instruction shall require all districts
receiving general apportionment funding for alternative learning
experience (ALE) programs as defined in WAC 392-121-182 to provide
separate financial accounting of expenditures for the ALE programs
offered in district or with a provider, including but not limited to
private companies and multidistrict cooperatives.
(((q))) (p) $55,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 is provided to the office of the superintendent of
public instruction solely to convene a technical working group to
establish standards, guidelines, and definitions for what constitutes
a basic education program for highly capable students and the
appropriate funding structure for such a program, and to submit
recommendations to the legislature for consideration. The working
group may convene advisory subgroups on specific topics as necessary to
assure participation and input from a broad array of diverse
stakeholders. The working group must consult with and seek input from
nationally recognized experts; researchers and academics on the unique
educational, emotional, and social needs of highly capable students and
how to identify such students; representatives of national
organizations and associations for educators of or advocates for highly
capable students; school district representatives who are educators,
counselors, and classified school employees involved with highly
capable programs; parents of students who have been identified as
highly capable; representatives from the federally recognized tribes;
and representatives of cultural, linguistic, and racial minority groups
and the community of persons with disabilities. The working group
shall make recommendations to the quality education council and to
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2010. The
recommendations shall take into consideration that access to the
program for highly capable students is not an individual entitlement
for any particular student. The recommendations shall seek to minimize
underrepresentation of any particular demographic or socioeconomic
group by better identification, not lower standards or quotas, and
shall include the following:
(i) Standardized state-level identification procedures, standards,
criteria, and benchmarks, including a definition or definitions of a
highly capable student. Students who are both highly capable and are
students of color, are poor, or have a disability must be addressed;
(ii) Appropriate programs and services that have been shown by
research and practice to be effective with highly capable students but
maintain options and flexibility for school districts, where possible;
(iii) Program administration, management, and reporting
requirements for school districts;
(iv) Appropriate educator qualifications, certification
requirements, and professional development and support for educators
and other staff who are involved in programs for highly capable
students;
(v) Self-evaluation models to be used by school districts to
determine the effectiveness of the program and services provided by the
school district for highly capable programs;
(vi) An appropriate state-level funding structure; and
(vii) Other topics deemed to be relevant by the working group.
(((r) $1,000,000)) (q) $500,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 is provided solely for contracting
with a college scholarship organization with expertise in conducting
outreach to students concerning eligibility for the Washington college
bound scholarship consistent with chapter 405, Laws of 2007.
(((s))) (r) $24,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 ((and $140,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are)) is provided solely for
implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6759 (requiring a plan for
a voluntary program of early learning as a part of basic education).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2010, the amounts provided in
this subsection (1)(r) shall lapse.
(((t))) (s) $950,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 is provided solely for office of the attorney general
costs related to McCleary v. State of Washington.
(2) $12,320,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, (($11,685,000)) $10,127,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011, and $55,890,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation are for statewide programs.
(a) HEALTH AND SAFETY
(i) $2,541,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and (($2,541,000)) $2,381,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for a corps of
nurses located at educational service districts, as determined by the
superintendent of public instruction, to be dispatched to the most
needy schools to provide direct care to students, health education, and
training for school staff.
(ii) $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and (($100,000)) $94,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for a school
safety training program provided by the criminal justice training
commission. The commission, in collaboration with the school safety
center advisory committee, shall provide the school safety training for
all school administrators and school safety personnel, including school
safety personnel hired after the effective date of this section.
(iii) $9,670,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for safe and drug free schools and communities grants for drug
and violence prevention activities and strategies.
(iv) $96,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and (($96,000)) $90,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the school
safety center in the office of the superintendent of public instruction
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(A) The safety center shall: Disseminate successful models of
school safety plans and cooperative efforts; provide assistance to
schools to establish a comprehensive safe school plan; select models of
cooperative efforts that have been proven successful; act as an
information dissemination and resource center when an incident occurs
in a school district either in Washington or in another state;
coordinate activities relating to school safety; review and approve
manuals and curricula used for school safety models and training; and
develop and maintain a school safety information web site.
(B) The school safety center advisory committee shall develop a
training program, using the best practices in school safety, for all
school safety personnel.
(v) $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for the youth suicide prevention program.
(vi) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and (($50,000)) $47,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for a
nonviolence and leadership training program provided by the institute
for community leadership.
(b) TECHNOLOGY
(i) $1,842,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and (($1,745,000)) $1,635,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for K-20
telecommunications network technical support in the K-12 sector to
prevent system failures and avoid interruptions in school utilization
of the data processing and video-conferencing capabilities of the
network. These funds may be used to purchase engineering and advanced
technical support for the network.
(ii) $1,475,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $1,045,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $435,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for implementing a comprehensive data
system to include financial, student, and educator data. The office of
the superintendent of public instruction will convene a data governance
group to create a comprehensive needs-requirement document, conduct a
gap analysis, and define operating rules and a governance structure for
K-12 data collections.
(c) GRANTS AND ALLOCATIONS
(i) $1,329,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and (($1,329,000)) $664,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the special
services pilot project to include up to seven participating districts.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall allocate
these funds to the district or districts participating in the pilot
program according to the provisions of RCW 28A.630.016.
(ii) $750,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $750,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the Washington state achievers
scholarship program. The funds shall be used to support community
involvement officers that recruit, train, and match community volunteer
mentors with students selected as achievers scholars.
(iii) $25,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for developing and disseminating
curriculum and other materials documenting women's role in World War
II.
(iv) $175,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and (($175,000)) $87,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for incentive
grants for districts and pilot projects to develop preapprenticeship
programs. Incentive grant awards up to $10,000 each shall be used to
support the program's design, school/business/labor agreement
negotiations, and recruiting high school students for preapprenticeship
programs in the building trades and crafts.
(v) $2,898,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and (($3,120,000)) $2,924,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the
dissemination of the navigation 101 curriculum to all districts. The
funding shall support electronic student planning tools and software
for analyzing the impact of navigation 101 on student performance, as
well as grants to a maximum of one hundred school districts each year,
based on progress and need for the implementation of the navigation 101
program. The implementation grants shall be awarded to a cross-section
of school districts reflecting a balance of geographic and demographic
characteristics. Within the amounts provided, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction will create a navigation 101
accountability model to analyze the impact of the program.
(vi) $627,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and (($337,000)) $225,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for
implementation of a statewide program for comprehensive dropout
prevention, intervention, and retrieval.
(vii) $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for program initiatives to address the
educational needs of Latino students and families. Using the full
amounts of the appropriations under this subsection (2)(c)(vii), the
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall contract with
the Seattle community coalition of compana quetzal to provide for three
initiatives: (A) Early childhood education; (B) parent leadership
training; and (C) high school success and college preparation programs.
(viii) $60,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 ((and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are)) is provided solely for a pilot project to
encourage bilingual high school students to pursue public school
teaching as a profession. Using the full amounts of the appropriation
under this subsection, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall contract with the Latino/a educational achievement
project (LEAP) to work with school districts to identify and mentor not
fewer than fifty bilingual students in their junior year of high
school, encouraging them to become bilingual instructors in schools
with high English language learner populations. Students shall be
mentored by bilingual teachers and complete a curriculum developed and
approved by the participating districts.
(ix) $145,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and (($75,000)) $37,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to the office of
the superintendent of public instruction to enhance the reading skills
of students with dyslexia by implementing the findings of the dyslexia
pilot program. Funds shall be used to provide information and training
to classroom teachers and reading specialists, for development of a
dyslexia handbook, and to take other statewide actions to improve the
reading skills of students with dyslexia. The training program shall
be delivered regionally through the educational service districts.
(x) $97,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and (($97,000)) $48,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to support
vocational student leadership organizations.
(xi) (($150,000)) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2011 is provided solely for drop-out prevention
programs at the office of the superintendent of public instruction
including the jobs for America's graduates (JAG) program.

Sec. 502 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 502 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR GENERAL
APPORTIONMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,126,153,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,159,625,000))
$4,912,103,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $208,098,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,285,778,000))
$10,246,354,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such
funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal
year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(b) The appropriations in this section include federal funds
provided through section 101 of Public Law No. 111-226 (education jobs
fund), which shall be used to support general apportionment program
funding. In distributing general apportionment allocations under this
section for the 2010-11 school year, the superintendent shall include
the entire allocation from the federal funds provided through section
101 of Public Law No. 111-226 (education jobs fund) as part of each
district's general apportionment allocation.
(2) Allocations for certificated staff salaries for the 2009-10 and
2010-11 school years shall be determined using formula-generated staff
units calculated pursuant to this subsection. Staff allocations for
small school enrollments in (e) through (g) of this subsection shall be
reduced for vocational full-time equivalent enrollments. Staff
allocations for small school enrollments in grades K-6 shall be the
greater of that generated under (a) of this subsection, or under (d)
and (e) of this subsection. Certificated staffing allocations shall be
as follows:
(a) On the basis of each 1,000 average annual full-time equivalent
enrollments, excluding full-time equivalent enrollment otherwise
recognized for certificated staff unit allocations under (d) through
(g) of this subsection:
(i) Four certificated administrative staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-12;
(ii) For the 2009-10 school year and the portion of the 2010-11
school year from September 1, 2010, through January 31, 2011:
(A)(I) For districts that enroll fewer than 25 percent of their
total full-time equivalent student enrollment in grades K through three
in digital or online learning programs as defined in WAC 392-121-182,
as in effect on November 1, 2009, fifty-three and two-tenths
certificated instructional staff units per thousand full-time
equivalent students in grades K through three.
(II) For all other districts, a minimum of forty-nine certificated
instructional staff units per 1,000 full-time equivalent (FTE) students
in grades K through three, with additional certificated instructional
staff units to equal the documented staffing level in grades K through
three, up to a maximum of fifty-three and two-tenths certificated
instructional staff units per 1,000 FTE students.
(B)(I) For districts that enroll fewer than 25 percent of their
total full-time equivalent student enrollment in grade four in digital
or online learning programs defined in WAC 392-121-182 as in effect on
November 1, 2009: For the 2009-10 school year, fifty-three and two-tenths certificated instructional staff units per thousand full-time
equivalent students in grade four, and for the portion of the 2010-11
school year from September 1, 2010, through January 31, 2011, forty-seven and forty-three one-hundredths certificated instructional staff
units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grade four.
(II) For all other districts:
For the 2009-10 school year, a minimum of forty-six certificated
instructional staff units per 1,000 full-time equivalent (FTE) students
in grade four, and additional certificated instructional staff units to
equal the documented staffing level in grade four, up to a maximum of
fifty-three and two-tenths certificated instructional staff units per
1,000 FTE students.
For the portion of the 2010-11 school year from September 1, 2010,
through January 31, 2011, a minimum of forty-six certificated
instructional staff units per 1,000 full-time equivalent (FTE) students
in grade four, and additional certificated instructional staff units to
equal the documented staffing level in grade four, up to a maximum of
forty-seven and forty-three one-hundredths certificated instructional
staff units per 1,000 FTE students;
(iii) For the portion of the 2010-11 school year beginning February
1, 2010:
(A) Forty-nine certificated instructional staff units per thousand
full-time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through three;
(B) Forty-six certificated instructional staff units per thousand
full-time equivalent students in grade 4;
(iv) All allocations for instructional staff units per thousand
full-time equivalent students above forty-nine in grades kindergarten
through three and forty-six in grade four shall occur in apportionments
in the monthly periods prior to February 1, 2011;
(v) Forty-six certificated instructional staff units per thousand
full-time equivalent students in grades 5-12;
(((iv))) (vi) Certificated staff allocations in this subsection
(2)(a) exceeding the statutory minimums established in RCW 28A.150.260
shall not be considered part of basic education;
(b) For school districts with a minimum enrollment of 250 full-time
equivalent students whose full-time equivalent student enrollment count
in a given month exceeds the first of the month full-time equivalent
enrollment count by 5 percent, an additional state allocation of 110
percent of the share that such increased enrollment would have
generated had such additional full-time equivalent students been
included in the normal enrollment count for that particular month;
(c)(i) On the basis of full-time equivalent enrollment in:
(A) Vocational education programs approved by the superintendent of
public instruction, a maximum of 0.92 certificated instructional staff
units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units for each 19.5
full-time equivalent vocational students;
(B) Middle school vocational STEM programs approved by the
superintendent of public instruction, a maximum of 0.92 certificated
instructional staff units and 0.8 certificated administrative staff
units for each 19.5 full-time equivalent vocational students; and
(C) Skills center programs meeting the standards for skills center
funding established in January 1999 by the superintendent of public
instruction with a waiver allowed for skills centers in current
operation that are not meeting this standard until the 2010-11 school
year, 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated
administrative units for each 16.67 full-time equivalent vocational
students;
(ii) Vocational full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported
on the same monthly basis as the enrollment for students eligible for
basic support, and payments shall be adjusted for reported vocational
enrollments on the same monthly basis as those adjustments for
enrollment for students eligible for basic support; and
(iii) Indirect cost charges by a school district to vocational-secondary programs and vocational middle-school shall not exceed 15
percent of the combined basic education and vocational enhancement
allocations of state funds;
(d) For districts enrolling not more than twenty-five average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small
school plants within any school district which have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the state board of education and enroll not
more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in
grades K-8:
(i) For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76
certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-twentieth of a certificated instructional staff unit
for each additional student enrolled; and
(ii) For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68
certificated instructional staff units and 0.32 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for
each additional student enrolled;
(e) For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than
twenty-five but not more than one hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within
any school district which enroll more than twenty-five average annual
full-time equivalent students in grades K-8 and have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the state board of education:
(i) For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units; and
(ii) For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units;
(f) For districts operating no more than two high schools with
enrollments of less than three hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students, for enrollment in grades 9-12 in each such school,
other than alternative schools:
(i) For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any
grades 9-12 but no more than twenty-five average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one-half certificated
instructional staff units and one-quarter of a certificated
administrative staff unit;
(ii) For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine
certificated instructional staff units and one-half of a certificated
administrative staff unit for the first sixty average annual full time
equivalent students, and additional staff units based on a ratio of
0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated
administrative staff units per each additional forty-three and one-half
average annual full time equivalent students.
Units calculated under (f)(ii) of this subsection shall be reduced
by certificated staff units at the rate of forty-six certificated
instructional staff units and four certificated administrative staff
units per thousand vocational full-time equivalent students;
(g) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than seventy annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades
1-8 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit; and
(h) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades
1-6 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit.
(3) Allocations for classified salaries for the 2009-10 and 2010-11
school years shall be calculated using formula-generated classified
staff units determined as follows:
(a) For enrollments generating certificated staff unit allocations
under subsection (2)(e) through (h) of this section, one classified
staff unit for each 2.94 certificated staff units allocated under such
subsections;
(b) For all other enrollment in grades K-12, including vocational
full-time equivalent enrollments, one classified staff unit for each
58.75 average annual full-time equivalent students; and
(c) For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, an additional one-half of a classified
staff unit.
(4) Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of
14.43 percent in the 2009-10 school year and 14.43 percent in the 2010-11 school year for certificated salary allocations provided under
subsection (2) of this section, and a rate of 16.59 percent in the
2009-10 school year and 16.59 percent in the 2010-11 school year for
classified salary allocations provided under subsection (3) of this
section.
(5) Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the
maintenance rate specified in section 504(2) of this act, based on the
number of benefit units determined as follows:
(a) The number of certificated staff units determined in subsection
(2) of this section; and
(b) The number of classified staff units determined in subsection
(3) of this section multiplied by 1.152. This factor is intended to
adjust allocations so that, for the purposes of distributing insurance
benefits, full-time equivalent classified employees may be calculated
on the basis of 1440 hours of work per year, with no individual
employee counted as more than one full-time equivalent.
(6)(a) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(a), (b), and (d)
through (g) of this section, there shall be provided a maximum of
$10,179 per certificated staff unit in the 2009-10 school year and a
maximum of $10,424 per certificated staff unit in the 2010-11 school
year.
(b) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(A) of this
section, there shall be provided a maximum of $24,999 per certificated
staff unit in the 2009-10 school year and a maximum of $25,399 per
certificated staff unit in the 2010-11 school year.
(c) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(B) of this
section, there shall be provided a maximum of $19,395 per certificated
staff unit in the 2009-10 school year and a maximum of $19,705 per
certificated staff unit in the 2010-11 school year.
(7) Allocations for substitute costs for classroom teachers shall
be distributed at a maintenance rate of $607.44 for the 2009-10 and
2010-11 school years per allocated classroom teachers exclusive of
salary increase amounts provided in section 504 of this act. Solely
for the purposes of this subsection, allocated classroom teachers shall
be equal to the number of certificated instructional staff units
allocated under subsection (2) of this section, multiplied by the ratio
between the number of actual basic education certificated teachers and
the number of actual basic education certificated instructional staff
reported statewide for the prior school year.
(8) Any school district board of directors may petition the
superintendent of public instruction by submission of a resolution
adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any portion of its basic
education allocation for any school year. The superintendent of public
instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if it does not impair
the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be for more
than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on
levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance
pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.
(9) Funding in this section is sufficient to provide additional
service year credits to educational staff associates pursuant to
chapter 403, Laws of 2007.
(10)(a) The superintendent may distribute a maximum of $7,286,000
outside the basic education formula during fiscal years 2010 and 2011
as follows:
(i) For fire protection for school districts located in a fire
protection district as now or hereafter established pursuant to chapter
52.04 RCW, a maximum of $567,000 may be expended in fiscal year 2010
and a maximum of $576,000 may be expended in fiscal year 2011;
(ii) For summer vocational programs at skills centers, a maximum of
$2,385,000 may be expended for the 2010 fiscal year and a maximum of
$2,385,000 for the 2011 fiscal year. 20 percent of each fiscal year
amount may carry over from one year to the next;
(iii) A maximum of $403,000 may be expended for school district
emergencies; and
(iv) A maximum of $485,000 each fiscal year may be expended for
programs providing skills training for secondary students who are
enrolled in extended day school-to-work programs, as approved by the
superintendent of public instruction. The funds shall be allocated at
a rate not to exceed $500 per full-time equivalent student enrolled in
those programs.
(b) Funding in this section is sufficient to fund a maximum of 1.6
FTE enrollment for skills center students pursuant to chapter 463, Laws
of 2007.
(11) For purposes of RCW 84.52.0531, the increase per full-time
equivalent student is 4.0 percent from the 2008-09 school year to the
2009-10 school year and 4.0 percent from the 2009-10 school year to the
2010-11 school year.
(12) If two or more school districts consolidate and each district
was receiving additional basic education formula staff units pursuant
to subsection (2)(b) through (g) of this section, the following shall
apply:
(a) For three school years following consolidation, the number of
basic education formula staff units shall not be less than the number
of basic education formula staff units received by the districts in the
school year prior to the consolidation; and
(b) For the fourth through eighth school years following
consolidation, the difference between the basic education formula staff
units received by the districts for the school year prior to
consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after
consolidation pursuant to subsection (2)(a) through (h) of this section
shall be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.
(13) General apportionment payments to the Steilacoom historical
school district shall reflect changes to operation of the Harriet
Taylor elementary school consistent with the timing of reductions in
correctional facility capacity and staffing.

Sec. 503 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 513 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- EDUCATION REFORM
PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $93,642,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($99,313,000))
$92,643,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($152,626,000))
$154,627,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($102,881,000))
$100,381,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($448,462,000))
$441,293,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $35,804,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, (($34,516,000)) $31,850,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011, $1,350,000 of the education legacy
trust account--state appropriation, and (($15,868,000)) $17,869,000 of
the general fund -- federal appropriation are provided solely for
development and implementation of the Washington state assessment
system, including: (i) Development and implementation of retake
assessments for high school students who are not successful in one or
more content areas; and (ii) development and implementation of
alternative assessments or appeals procedures to implement the
certificate of academic achievement. The superintendent of public
instruction shall report quarterly on the progress on development and
implementation of alternative assessments or appeals procedures.
Within these amounts, the superintendent of public instruction shall
contract for the early return of 10th grade student assessment results,
on or around June 10th of each year.
(2) $3,249,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $3,249,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the design of the state
assessment system and the implementation of end of course assessments
for high school math.
(3) Within amounts provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this
section, the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with
the state board of education, shall develop a statewide high school
end-of-course assessment measuring student achievement of the state
science standards in biology to be implemented statewide in the 2011-12
school year. By December 1, 2010, the superintendent of public
instruction shall recommend whether additional end-of-course
assessments in science should be developed and in which content areas.
Any recommendation for additional assessments must include an
implementation timeline and the projected cost to develop and
administer the assessments.
(4) $1,014,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
is provided solely for allocations to districts for salaries and
benefits for the equivalent of two additional professional development
days for fourth and fifth grade teachers during the 2008-2009 school
year. The allocations shall be made based on the calculations of
certificated instructional staff units for fourth and fifth grade
provided in section 502 of this act and on the calculations of
compensation provided in sections 503 and 504 of this act. Districts
may use the funding to support additional days for professional
development as well as job-embedded forms of professional development.
(5) $3,241,000 of the education legacy trust fund appropriation is
provided solely for allocations to districts for salaries and benefits
for the equivalent of three additional professional development days
for middle and high school math and science teachers during the 2008-2009 school year, as well as specialized training for one math and
science teacher in each middle school and high school during the 2008-2009 school year. Districts may use the funding to support additional
days for professional development as well as job-embedded forms of
professional development.
(6) $3,773,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a math and science instructional
coaches program pursuant to chapter 396, Laws of 2007. Funding shall
be used to provide grants to schools and districts to provide salaries,
benefits, and professional development activities for up to twenty-five
instructional coaches in middle and high school math and twenty-five
instructional coaches in middle and high school science in each year of
the biennium; and up to $300,000 may be used by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to administer and coordinate the
program.
(7) $1,740,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,775,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to allow approved middle and
junior high school career and technical education programs to receive
enhanced vocational funding. The office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall provide allocations to districts for middle
and junior high school students in accordance with the funding formulas
provided in section 502 of this act. If Second Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5676 is enacted the allocations are formula-driven, otherwise the
office of the superintendent shall consider the funding provided in
this subsection as a fixed amount, and shall adjust funding to stay
within the amounts provided in this subsection.
(8) $139,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and (($139,000)) $93,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for (a) staff at
the office of the superintendent of public instruction to coordinate
and promote efforts to develop integrated math, science, technology,
and engineering programs in schools and districts across the state; and
(b) grants of $2,500 to provide twenty middle and high school teachers
each year professional development training for implementing integrated
math, science, technology, and engineering program in their schools.
(9) $1,473,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and (($395,000)) $197,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the
Washington state leadership and assistance for science education reform
(LASER) regional partnership activities coordinated at the Pacific
science center, including instructional material purchases, teacher and
principal professional development, and school and community engagement
events. Funding shall be distributed to the various LASER activities
in a manner proportional to LASER program spending during the 2007-2009
biennium.
(10) $88,981,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants for voluntary full-day
kindergarten at the highest poverty schools, as provided in chapter
400, Laws of 2007. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall provide allocations to districts for recipient
schools in accordance with the funding formulas provided in section 502
of this act. Each kindergarten student who enrolls for the voluntary
full-day program in a recipient school shall count as one-half of one
full-time equivalent student for the purpose of making allocations
under this subsection. Although the allocations are formula-driven,
the office of the superintendent shall consider the funding provided in
this subsection as a fixed amount, and shall limit the number of
recipient schools so as to stay within the amounts appropriated each
fiscal year in this subsection. The funding provided in this
subsection is estimated to provide full-day kindergarten programs for
20 percent of kindergarten enrollment. Funding priority shall be given
to schools with the highest poverty levels, as measured by prior year
free and reduced priced lunch eligibility rates in each school.
Additionally, as a condition of funding, school districts must agree to
provide the full-day program to the children of parents who request it
in each eligible school. For the purposes of calculating a school
district levy base, funding provided in this subsection shall be
considered a state block grant program under RCW 84.52.0531.
(a) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, a maximum of
$272,000 may be used for administrative support of the full-day
kindergarten program within the office of the superintendent of public
instruction.
(b) Student enrollment pursuant to this program shall not be
included in the determination of a school district's overall K-12 FTE
for the allocation of student achievement programs and other funding
formulas unless specifically stated.
(11) $700,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and (($900,000)) $450,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the
development of a leadership academy for school principals and
administrators. The superintendent of public instruction shall
contract with an independent organization to design, field test, and
implement a state-of-the-art education leadership academy that will be
accessible throughout the state. Initial development of the content of
the academy activities shall be supported by private funds.
Semiannually the independent organization shall report on amounts
committed by foundations and others to support the development and
implementation of this program. Leadership academy partners, with
varying roles, shall include the state level organizations for school
administrators and principals, the superintendent of public
instruction, the professional educator standards board, and others as
the independent organization shall identify.
(12) $105,754,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for preparing, training, and recruiting high quality teachers
and principals under Title II of the no child left behind act.
(13) $1,960,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and (($1,523,000)) $761,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to the office of
the superintendent of public instruction for focused assistance. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall conduct
educational audits of low-performing schools and enter into performance
agreements between school districts and the office to implement the
recommendations of the audit and the community. Funding in this
subsection shall be used for focused assistance programs for individual
schools or school districts. The office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall report to the fiscal committees of the
legislature by September 1, 2011, providing an accounting of the uses
of focused assistance funds during the 2009-11 fiscal biennium,
including a list of schools served and the types of services provided.
(14) $1,667,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,667,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to eliminate the lunch co-pay for
students in grades kindergarten through third grade that are eligible
for reduced price lunch.
(15) $5,285,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $5,285,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for: (a) The meals for kids
program under RCW 28A.235.145 through 28A.235.155; (b) to eliminate the
breakfast co-pay for students eligible for reduced price lunch; and (c)
for additional assistance for school districts initiating a summer food
service program.
(16) $1,003,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and (($1,056,000)) $528,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the
Washington reading corps. The superintendent shall allocate reading
corps members to low-performing schools and school districts that are
implementing comprehensive, proven, research-based reading programs.
Two or more schools may combine their Washington reading corps
programs. Grants provided under this section may be used by school
districts for expenditures from September 2009 through August 31, 2011.
(17) $3,269,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $3,594,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for grants to school districts to
provide a continuum of care for children and families to help children
become ready to learn. Grant proposals from school districts shall
contain local plans designed collaboratively with community service
providers. If a continuum of care program exists in the area in which
the school district is located, the local plan shall provide for
coordination with existing programs to the greatest extent possible.
Grant funds shall be allocated pursuant to RCW 70.190.040.
(18) $1,861,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and (($1,959,000)) $1,836,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for improving
technology infrastructure, monitoring and reporting on school district
technology development, promoting standards for school district
technology, promoting statewide coordination and planning for
technology development, and providing regional educational technology
support centers, including state support activities, under chapter
28A.650 RCW.
(19) $225,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and (($225,000)) $150,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the
operation of the center for the improvement of student learning
pursuant to RCW 28A.300.130.
(20) $246,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for costs associated with the office
of the superintendent of public instruction's statewide director of
technology position.
(21)(a) $28,715,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $36,168,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the
following bonuses for teachers who hold valid, unexpired certification
from the national board for professional teaching standards and who are
teaching in a Washington public school, subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(i) For national board certified teachers, a bonus of $5,000 per
teacher beginning in the 2007-08 school year and adjusted for inflation
in each school year thereafter in which Initiative 732 cost of living
adjustments are provided;
(ii) An additional $5,000 annual bonus shall be paid to national
board certified teachers who teach in either: (A) High schools where
at least 50 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for
federal free or reduced price lunch, (B) middle schools where at least
60 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free
or reduced price lunch, or (C) elementary schools where at least 70
percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or
reduced price lunch;
(iii) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to
ensure that national board certified teachers meet the qualifications
for bonuses under (a)(ii) of this subsection for less than one full
school year receive bonuses in a pro-rated manner; and
(iv) During the 2009-10 and 2010-11 school years, and within the
available state and federal appropriations, certificated instructional
staff who have met the eligibility requirements and have applied for
certification from the national board for professional teaching
standards may receive a conditional two thousand dollars or the amount
set by the office of the superintendent of public instruction to
contribute toward the current assessment fee, not including the initial
up-front candidacy payment. The fee shall be an advance on the first
annual bonus under RCW 28A.405.415. The assessment fee for national
certification is provided in addition to compensation received under a
district's salary schedule adopted in accordance with RCW 28A.405.200
and shall not be included in calculations of a district's average
salary and associated salary limitation under RCW 28A.400.200.
Recipients who fail to receive certification after three years are
required to repay the assessment fee, not including the initial up-front candidacy payment, as set by the national board for professional
teaching standards and administered by the office of the superintendent
of public instruction. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall adopt rules to define the terms for initial grant of
the assessment fee and repayment, including applicable fees.
(b) Included in the amounts provided in this subsection are amounts
for mandatory fringe benefits.
(22) $2,475,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and (($912,000)) $456,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for secondary
career and technical education grants pursuant to chapter 170, Laws of
2008. This funding may additionally be used to support FIRST Robotics
programs. In fiscal year 2011, if equally matched by private
donations, $300,000 of the appropriation shall be used to support FIRST
Robotics programs, including FIRST Robotics professional development.
(23) (($150,000)) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2011 is provided solely for the implementation of House
Bill No. 2621 (K-12 school resource programs). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2010, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(24) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for the local farms-healthy kids program
as described in chapter 215, Laws of 2008. The program is suspended in
the 2011 fiscal year, and not eliminated.
(25) $2,348,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and (($2,000,000)) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for a beginning
educator support program. School districts and/or regional consortia
may apply for grant funding beginning in the 2009-10 school year. The
superintendent shall implement this program in 5 to 15 school districts
and/or regional consortia. The program provided by a district and/or
regional consortia shall include: A paid orientation; assignment of a
qualified mentor; development of a professional growth plan for each
beginning teacher aligned with professional certification; release time
for mentors and new teachers to work together, and teacher observation
time with accomplished peers. $250,000 may be used to provide state-wide professional development opportunities for mentors and beginning
educators. The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules
to establish and operate a research-based beginning educator support
program no later than August 31, 2009. OSPI must evaluate the
program's progress and may contract for this work. A report to the
legislature about the beginning educator support program is due
November 1, 2010.
(26) (($4,290,000)) $1,790,000 of the education legacy trust
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the development and
implementation of diagnostic assessments, consistent with the
recommendations of the Washington assessment of student learning work
group.
(27) Funding within this section is provided for implementation of
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5414 (statewide assessments and
curricula).
(28) $530,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and (($530,000)) $265,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the
leadership internship program for superintendents, principals, and
program administrators.
(29) Funding for the community learning center program, established
in RCW 28A.215.060, and providing grant funding for the 21st century
after-school program, is suspended and not eliminated.
(30) $2,357,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6696 (education reform). Of the amount
provided, $142,000 is provided to the professional educators' standards
board and $120,000 is provided to the system of the educational service
districts, to fulfill their respective duties under the bill.

(End of part)

PART VI
HIGHER EDUCATION
Sec. 601 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 603 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $631,804,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($629,745,000))
$603,296,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,171,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $95,035,000
Opportunity Express Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,556,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,392,311,000))
$1,365,862,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $28,761,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $28,761,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $17,556,000 of the opportunity express account--state appropriation are provided solely as special funds for training
and related support services, including financial aid, as specified in
RCW 28C.04.390. Funding is provided to support at least 6,200 full-time equivalent students in fiscal year 2010 and at least 9,984 full-time equivalent students in fiscal year 2011.
(2) $2,725,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $2,725,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for administration and customized
training contracts through the job skills program. The state board
shall make an annual report by January 1st of each year to the governor
and to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature
regarding implementation of this section, listing the scope of grant
awards, the distribution of funds by educational sector and region of
the state, and the results of the partnerships supported by these
funds.
(3) Of the amounts appropriated in this section, $3,500,000 is
provided solely for the student achievement initiative.
(4) When implementing the appropriations in this section, the state
board and the trustees of the individual community and technical
colleges shall minimize impact on academic programs, maximize
reductions in administration, and shall at least maintain, and endeavor
to increase, enrollment opportunities and degree and certificate
production in high employer-demand fields of study at their academic
year 2008-09 levels.
(5) Within the board's 2009-11 biennial budget allocation to
Bellevue College, and pursuant to RCW 28B.50.810, the college may
implement, on a tuition and fee basis, an additional applied
baccalaureate degree in interior design. This program is intended to
provide students with additional opportunities to earn baccalaureate
degrees and to respond to emerging job and economic growth
opportunities. The program reviews and approval decisions required by
RCW 28B.50.810 (3) and (4) shall be completed by July 31, 2009, so that
the degree may be offered during the 2009-10 academic year.
(6) In accordance with the recommendations of the higher education
coordinating board's 2008 Kitsap region higher education center study,
the state board shall facilitate development of university centers by
allocating thirty 2-year and 4-year partnership full-time enrollment
equivalencies to Olympic College and ten 2-year and 4-year partnership
full-time enrollment equivalencies to Peninsula College. The colleges
shall use the allocations to establish a partnership with a
baccalaureate university or universities for delivery of upper division
degree programs in the Kitsap region. The Olympic and Peninsula
Community College districts shall additionally work together to ensure
coordinated development of these and other future baccalaureate
opportunities through coordinated needs assessment, planning, and
scheduling.
(7) By September 1, 2009, the state board for community and
technical colleges, the higher education coordinating board, and the
office of financial management shall review and to the extent necessary
revise current 2009-11 performance measures and targets based on the
level of state, tuition, and other resources appropriated or authorized
in this act and in the omnibus 2009-11 omnibus capital budget act. The
boards and the office of financial management shall additionally
develop new performance targets for the 2011-13 and the 2013-15 biennia
that will guide and measure the community and technical college
system's contributions to achievement of the state's higher education
master plan goals.
(8) $2,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $2,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the hospital employee
education and training program under which labor, management, and
college partnerships develop or expand and evaluate training programs
for incumbent hospital workers that lead to careers in nursing and
other high-demand health care occupations. The board shall report
student progress, outcomes, and costs to the relevant fiscal and policy
committees of the legislature by November 2009 and November 2010.
(9) Community and technical colleges are not required to send mass
mailings of course catalogs to residents of their districts. Community
and technical colleges shall consider lower cost alternatives, such as
mailing postcards or brochures that direct individuals to online
information and other ways of acquiring print catalogs.
(10) $1,112,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,113,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the state board to enhance
online distance learning and open courseware technology. Funds shall
be used to support open courseware, open textbooks, open licenses to
increase access, affordability and quality of courses in higher
education. The state board for community and technical colleges shall
select the most appropriate courses to support open courseware based
solely upon criteria of maximizing the value of instruction and
reducing costs of textbooks and other instructional materials for the
greatest number of students in higher education, regardless of the type
of institution those students attend.
(11) $158,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011 is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 2694 (B.S. in
nursing/university center). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2010, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12)(a) The labor education and research center is transferred from
The Evergreen State College to south Seattle community college and
shall begin operations on July 1, 2010.
(b) At least $164,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 shall be expended on the labor education and research
center to provide outreach programs and direct educational and research
services to labor unions and worker-centered organizations.
(13) $1,000,000 of the opportunity express account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the opportunity grant program as
specified in RCW 28B.50.271.
(14) $1,750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011 is provided solely for the state board for community and
technical colleges to contract with the aerospace training and research
center on Paine field in Everett, Washington to support industry-identified training in the aerospace sector.
(15) Sufficient amounts are provided in this section to implement
the food stamp employment and training program under Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2782 (security lifeline act).

Sec. 602 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 604 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $269,571,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($271,092,000))
$259,706,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,971,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,534,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,750,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,540,000
Biotoxin Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $449,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($652,907,000))
$641,521,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In implementing the appropriations in this section, the
president and regents shall seek to minimize impacts on student
services and instructional programs by maximizing reductions in
administration and other non-instructional activities.
(2) Because higher education is an essential driver of economic
recovery and development, the university shall maintain, and endeavor
to increase, enrollment and degree production levels at or beyond their
academic year 2008-09 levels in the following high-demand fields:
Biological and biomedical sciences; computer and information sciences;
education with specializations in special education, math, or science;
engineering and engineering technology; health professions and related
clinical sciences; and mathematics and statistics.
(3) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for forestry research by the
Olympic natural resources center.
(4) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for the William D. Ruckelshaus center for
facilitation, support, and analysis to support the nurse staffing
steering committee in its work to apply best practices related to
patient safety and nurse staffing.
(5) $54,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $54,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the University of Washington
geriatric education center to provide a voluntary adult family home
certification program. In addition to the minimum qualifications
required under RCW 70.128.120, individuals participating in the
voluntary adult family home certification program shall complete fifty-two hours of class requirements as established by the University of
Washington geriatric education center. Individuals completing the
requirements of RCW 70.128.120 and the voluntary adult family home
certification program shall be issued a certified adult family home
license by the department of social and health services. The
department of social and health services shall adopt rules implementing
the provisions of this subsection.
(6) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $52,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the center for international
trade in forest products in the college of forest resources.
(((8))) (7) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 is provided solely for joint planning to increase the
number of residency positions and programs in eastern Washington and
Spokane within the existing Washington, Wyoming, Alaska, Montana, Idaho
(WWAMI) regional medical education program partnership between the
University of Washington school of medicine, Washington State
University, and area physicians and hospitals. The joint planning
efforts are to include preparation of applications for new residency
programs in family medicine, internal medicine, obstetrics, psychiatry
and general surgery; business plans for those new programs; and for
increasing the number of positions in existing programs among regional
academic and hospital partners and networks. The results of the joint
planning efforts, including the status of the application preparation
and business plan, must be reported to the house of representatives
committee on higher education and the senate committee on higher
education and workforce development by December 1, 2010.
(((9))) (8) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 164,
Laws of 2010 (local government infrastructure). The University of
Washington shall use a qualified researcher to report the percentage
probability that the application's assumptions and estimates of jobs
created and increased tax receipts will be achieved by the projects.
In making this report, the qualified researcher shall work with the
department of revenue and the applicants to develop a series of factors
that are based on available economic metrics and sound principles.

Sec. 603 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 605 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $169,462,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($178,283,000))
$170,699,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,772,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,435,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($397,952,000))
$390,368,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In implementing the appropriations in this section, the
president and regents shall seek to minimize impacts on student
services and instructional programs by maximizing reductions in
administration and other non-instructional activities.
(2) Because higher education is an essential driver of economic
recovery and development, the university shall maintain, and endeavor
to increase, enrollment and degree production levels at or beyond their
academic year 2008-09 levels in the following high-demand fields:
Biological and biomedical sciences; computer and information sciences;
education with specializations in special education, math, or science;
engineering and engineering technology; health professions and related
clinical sciences; and mathematics and statistics.
(3) When implementing reductions for fiscal year 2010 and fiscal
year 2011, Washington State University shall minimize reductions to
extension services and agriculture extension services. Agriculture
extension includes:
(a) Faculty with extension appointments working within the
following departments in the college of agricultural, human, and
natural resource sciences with extension appointments: Animal
sciences, crop and soil sciences, entomology, horticulture, and plant
pathology;
(b) The portion of county extension educators' appointments
assigned to the "agricultural programs" area;
(c) Staff with extension appointments and extension operating
allocations located at the irrigated agriculture research and extension
center (Prosser), northwest Washington research and extension center
(Mt. Vernon), and tree fruit research and extension center (Wenatchee);
and
(d) Extension contributions to the center for precision
agricultural systems, center for sustaining agriculture and natural
resources, and the agriculture weather network.
(4) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for research related to honeybee
colony collapse disease.

Sec. 604 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 606 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,689,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,666,000))
$35,126,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,522,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,041,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($92,918,000))
$91,378,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In implementing the appropriations in this section, the
president and governing board shall seek to minimize impacts on student
services and instructional programs by maximizing reductions in
administration and other non-instructional activities.
(2) Because higher education is an essential driver of economic
recovery and development, the university shall maintain, and endeavor
to increase, enrollment and degree production levels at or beyond their
academic year 2008-09 levels in the following high-demand fields:
Biological and biomedical sciences; computer and information sciences;
education with specializations in special education, math, or science;
engineering and engineering technology; health professions and related
clinical sciences; and mathematics and statistics.
(3) At least $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and at least $200,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 shall be expended on the northwest
autism center.

Sec. 605 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 607 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,289,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,803,000))
$32,383,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,975,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,012,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($90,079,000))
$88,659,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In implementing the appropriations in this section, the
president and governing board shall seek to minimize impacts on student
services and instructional programs by maximizing reductions in
administration and other non-instructional activities.
(2) Because higher education is an essential driver of economic
recovery and development, the university shall maintain, and endeavor
to increase, enrollment and degree production levels at or beyond their
academic year 2008-09 levels in the following high-demand fields:
Biological and biomedical sciences; computer and information sciences;
education with specializations in special education, math, or science;
engineering and engineering technology; health professions and related
clinical sciences; and mathematics and statistics.

Sec. 606 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 608 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,514,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,505,000))
$17,728,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,366,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,417,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($46,802,000))
$46,025,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In implementing the appropriations in this section, the
president and governing board shall seek to minimize impacts on student
services and instructional programs by maximizing reductions in
administration and other non-instructional activities.
(2) Because higher education is an essential driver of economic
recovery and development, the college shall maintain, and endeavor to
increase, enrollment and degree production levels at or beyond their
academic year 2008-09 levels in the following high-demand fields:
Biological and biomedical sciences; computer and information sciences;
education with specializations in special education, math, or science;
engineering and engineering technology; health professions and related
clinical sciences; and mathematics and statistics.
(3)(a) At least $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2010 shall be expended on the labor education and
research center.
(b) In fiscal year 2011 the labor education and research center
shall be transferred from The Evergreen State College to south Seattle
community college.
(4) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the Washington state institute
for public policy to report to the legislature regarding efficient and
effective programs and policies. The report shall calculate the return
on investment to taxpayers from evidence-based prevention and
intervention programs and policies that influence crime, K-12 education
outcomes, child maltreatment, substance abuse, mental health, public
health, public assistance, employment, and housing. The institute for
public policy shall provide the legislature with a comprehensive list
of programs and policies that improve these outcomes for children and
adults in Washington and result in more cost-efficient use of public
resources. The institute shall submit interim reports by December 15,
2009, and October 1, 2010, and a final report by June 30, 2011. The
institute may receive additional funds from a private organization for
the purpose of conducting this study.
(5) To the extent federal or private funding is available for this
purpose, the Washington state institute for public policy and the
center for reinventing public education at the University of Washington
shall examine the relationship between participation in pension systems
and teacher quality and mobility patterns in the state. The department
of retirement systems shall facilitate researchers' access to necessary
individual-level data necessary to effectively conduct the study. The
researchers shall ensure that no individually identifiable information
will be disclosed at any time. An interim report on project findings
shall be completed by November 15, 2010, and a final report shall be
submitted to the governor and to the relevant committees of the
legislature by October 15, 2011.
(6) At least $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and at least $200,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 shall be expended on the Washington
center for undergraduate education.
(7) $15,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for the Washington state institute for
public policy to examine the need for and methods to increase the
availability of nonfood items, such as personal hygiene supplies,
soaps, paper products, and other items, to needy persons in the state.
The study shall examine existing private and public programs that
provide such products, and develop recommendations for the most cost-effective incentives for private and public agencies to increase local
distribution outlets and local and regional networks of supplies. A
final report shall be delivered to the legislature and the governor by
December 1, 2009.
(8) $17,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $42,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided to the Washington state institute for
public policy to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 2106 (child
welfare outcomes). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(9) $54,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $23,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to implement Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5882 (racial disproportionality). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for the Washington state institute of
public policy to evaluate the adequacy of and access to financial aid
and independent living programs for youth in foster care. The
examination shall include opportunities to improve efficiencies within
these programs. The institute shall report its findings by December 1,
2009.
(11) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for the Washington state institute for
public policy to conduct an assessment of the general assistance
unemployable program and other similar programs. The assessment shall
include a review of programs in other states that provide similar
services and will include recommendations on promising approaches that
both improve client outcomes and reduce state costs. A report is due
by December 1, 2009.
(12) To the extent funds are available, the Washington state
institute for public policy is encouraged to continue the longitudinal
analysis of long-term mental health outcomes directed in chapter 334,
Laws of 2001 (mental health performance audit), to build upon the
evaluation of the impacts of chapter 214, Laws of 1999 (mentally ill
offenders); and to assess program outcomes and cost effectiveness of
the children's mental health pilot projects as required by chapter 372,
Laws of 2006.
(13) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011 is provided solely for the institute for public policy to
provide research support to the council on quality education.
(14) At least $119,207 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 shall be expended on the longhouse center.
(15) At least $103,146 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 shall be expended on the Northwest Indian applied
research institute.

Sec. 607 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 609 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,146,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($48,391,000))
$46,359,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,885,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,917,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($113,339,000))
$111,307,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In implementing the appropriations in this section, the
president and governing board shall seek to minimize impacts on student
services and instructional programs by maximizing reductions in
administration and other non-instructional activities.
(2) Because higher education is an essential driver of economic
recovery and development, the university shall maintain, and endeavor
to increase, enrollment and degree production levels at or beyond their
academic year 2008-09 levels in the following high-demand fields:
Biological and biomedical sciences; computer and information sciences;
education with specializations in special education, math, or science;
engineering and engineering technology; health professions and related
clinical sciences; and mathematics and statistics.

(End of part)

PART VIII
OTHER TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 801 2010 sp.s. c 37 s 803 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS
State Treasurer's Service Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $16,400,000 for fiscal
year 2010 and (($16,400,000)) $26,400,000 for
fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,800,000))
$42,800,000
Waste Reduction, Recycling and Litter Control Account:
For transfer to the state general fund, $3,000,000
for fiscal year 2010 and $3,000,000 for fiscal year
2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
State Toxics Control Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $15,340,000 for fiscal year
2010 and (($17,780,000)) $37,780,000 for fiscal
year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,120,000))
$53,120,000
Local Toxics Control Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $37,060,000 for fiscal year
2010 and $48,759,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $85,819,000
Education Construction Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $105,228,000 for fiscal year
2010 and $106,451,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $211,679,000
Aquatics Lands Enhancement Account: For transfer to
the state general fund, $8,520,000 for fiscal
year 2010 and $5,050,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,570,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account: For transfer to
the drinking water assistance repayment account . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,600,000
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account: For
transfer to the state general fund, $2,500,000 for
fiscal year 2010 and $2,500,000 for fiscal year
2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, in an amount not to exceed by more
than $26,000,000 the actual amount of the annual
payment to the tobacco settlement account . . . . . . . . . . . . $204,098,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the life
sciences discovery fund, in an amount not to exceed
$26,000,000 less than the actual amount of the
strategic contribution supplemental payment to
the tobacco settlement account . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,170,000
General Fund: For transfer to the streamline sales and
use tax account, $24,274,000 for fiscal year 2010
and $24,182,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,456,000
State Convention and Trade Center Account: For
transfer to the state convention and trade center
operations account, $1,000,000 for fiscal year
2010 and $3,100,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,100,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account: For transfer
to the state general fund, $1,961,000 for fiscal
year 2010 and $3,000,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,961,000))
$4,961,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account: For transfer to the
disaster response account for fiscal year 2010 . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Judicial Information Systems Account: For transfer
to the state general fund, $3,250,000 for fiscal
year 2010 and $3,250,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,500,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account: For
transfer to the state general fund, $1,000,000 for
fiscal year 2010 and $1,500,000 for fiscal year
2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
State Emergency Water Projects Account: For transfer
to the state general fund, $390,000 for fiscal
year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $390,000
The Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, $5,550,000 for fiscal year 2010 and
$5,550,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,100,000
Energy Freedom Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, $4,038,000 for fiscal year 2010 and
$2,978,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,016,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account: For
transfer to the state general fund, $8,604,000
for fiscal year 2010 and $5,538,000 for fiscal
year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,142,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $279,640,000 for fiscal year
2010 and $229,560,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $509,200,000
Budget Stabilization Account: For transfer to the
state general fund for fiscal year 2010 . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,130,000
Liquor Revolving Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, $31,000,000 for fiscal year 2010 and
$31,000,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,000,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to the
city-county assistance account, $5,000,000 on
July 1, 2009, and $5,000,000 on July 1, 2010 . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to the
drinking water assistance account, $6,930,000
for fiscal year 2010 and $4,000,000 for fiscal
year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,930,000
Shared Game Lottery Account: For transfer to the
education legacy trust account, $3,600,000 for
fiscal year 2010 and $2,400,000 for fiscal year
2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
State Lottery Account: For transfer to the education
legacy trust account, $9,500,000 for fiscal year
2010 and $9,500,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,000,000
College Faculty Awards Trust Fund: For transfer
to the state general fund for fiscal year 2010,
an amount not to exceed the actual cash balance
of the fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Washington Distinguished Professorship Trust Fund:
For transfer to the state general fund for fiscal
year 2010, an amount not to exceed the actual cash
balance of the fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
Washington Graduate Fellowship Trust Account:
For transfer to the state general fund for fiscal
year 2010, an amount not to exceed the actual cash
balance of the fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
GET Ready for Math and Science Scholarship Account:
For transfer to the state general fund for
fiscal year 2010, an amount not to exceed
the actual cash balance not comprised of or
needed to match private contributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000
Financial Services Regulation Account: For transfer
to the state general fund, $2,000,000 for fiscal
year 2010 and (($2,000,000)) $7,000,000 for fiscal
year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,000,000))
$9,000,000
Data Processing Revolving Fund: For transfer to
the state general fund, $5,632,000 for fiscal
year 2010 . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,632,000
Public Service Revolving Account: For transfer to
the state general fund, $8,000,000 for fiscal
year 2010 and $7,000,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000
Water Quality Capital Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $278,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $278,000
Performance Audits of Government Account: For
transfer to the state general fund, $10,000,000
for fiscal year 2010 and $5,000,000 for fiscal
year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000
Job Development Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $20,930,000 for fiscal
year 2010 . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,930,000
Savings Incentive Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $10,117,000 for fiscal
year 2010 . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,117,000
Education Savings Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $100,767,000 for fiscal
year 2010 . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,767,000
Cleanup Settlement Account: For transfer to the
state efficiency and restructuring account for
fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,480,000
Disaster Response Account: For transfer to the
state drought preparedness account, $4,000,000
for fiscal year 2010 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Washington State Convention and Trade Center Account:
For transfer to the state general fund, $10,000,000
for fiscal year 2011. The transfer in this section
shall occur on June 30, 2011, only if by that date
the Washington state convention and trade center is
not transferred to a public facilities district
pursuant to Substitute Senate Bill No. 6889
(convention and trade center) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Institutional Welfare/Betterment Account: For transfer
to the state general fund, $2,000,000 for fiscal
year 2010 and $2,000,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Future Teacher Conditional Scholarship Account: For
transfer to the state general fund, $2,150,000
for fiscal year 2010 and $2,150,000 for fiscal
year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,300,000
Fingerprint Identification Account: For transfer
to the state general fund, $800,000 for fiscal
year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000
Prevent or Reduce Owner-Occupied Foreclosure
Program Account: For transfer to the financial
education public-private partnership account for
fiscal year 2010, an amount not to exceed the actual
cash balance of the fund as of June 30, 2010 . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account: For transfer to the
state general fund for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Disaster Response Account: For transfer to the state
general fund for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

(End of part)

PART IX
MISCELLANEOUS
Sec. 901 RCW 38.52.105 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 919 are each
amended to read as follows:
The disaster response account is created in the state treasury.
Moneys may be placed in the account from legislative appropriations and
transfers, federal appropriations, or any other lawful source. Moneys
in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures
from the account may be used only for support of state agency and local
government disaster response and recovery efforts and to reimburse the
workers' compensation funds and self-insured employers under RCW
51.16.220. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the disaster response account to the state drought
preparedness account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of
the account to support expenditures related to a state drought
declaration. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the disaster response account to the state general fund
such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 902 RCW 38.52.106 and 2009 c 564 s 922 are each amended to
read as follows:
The Nisqually earthquake account is created in the state treasury.
Moneys may be placed in the account from tax revenues, budget transfers
or appropriations, federal appropriations, gifts, or any other lawful
source. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Moneys in the account shall be used only to support state and local
government disaster response and recovery efforts associated with the
Nisqually earthquake. During the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer moneys from the Nisqually earthquake account
to the disaster response account for fire suppression and mobilization
costs. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account may
also be used to support disaster response and recovery efforts
associated with flood and storm damage. During the 2009-2011 fiscal
biennium, the legislature may transfer moneys from the Nisqually
earthquake account to the disaster response account for disaster
response and recovery efforts associated with flood and storm damage.
During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from
the Nisqually earthquake account to the state general fund such amounts
as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 903 RCW 41.26.030 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 32 s 6 are each
amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly
required by the context:
(1) "Accumulated contributions" means the employee's contributions
made by a member, including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2),
plus accrued interest credited thereon.
(2) "Actuarial reserve" means a method of financing a pension or
retirement plan wherein reserves are accumulated as the liabilities for
benefit payments are incurred in order that sufficient funds will be
available on the date of retirement of each member to pay the member's
future benefits during the period of retirement.
(3) "Actuarial valuation" means a mathematical determination of the
financial condition of a retirement plan. It includes the computation
of the present monetary value of benefits payable to present members,
and the present monetary value of future employer and employee
contributions, giving effect to mortality among active and retired
members and also to the rates of disability, retirement, withdrawal
from service, salary and interest earned on investments.
(4)(a) "Basic salary" for plan 1 members, means the basic monthly
rate of salary or wages, including longevity pay but not including
overtime earnings or special salary or wages, upon which pension or
retirement benefits will be computed and upon which employer
contributions and salary deductions will be based.
(b) "Basic salary" for plan 2 members, means salaries or wages
earned by a member during a payroll period for personal services,
including overtime payments, and shall include wages and salaries
deferred under provisions established pursuant to sections 403(b),
414(h), and 457 of the United States Internal Revenue Code, but shall
exclude lump sum payments for deferred annual sick leave, unused
accumulated vacation, unused accumulated annual leave, or any form of
severance pay. In any year in which a member serves in the legislature
the member shall have the option of having such member's basic salary
be the greater of:
(i) The basic salary the member would have received had such member
not served in the legislature; or
(ii) Such member's actual basic salary received for nonlegislative
public employment and legislative service combined. Any additional
contributions to the retirement system required because basic salary
under (b)(i) of this subsection is greater than basic salary under
(b)(ii) of this subsection shall be paid by the member for both member
and employer contributions.
(5)(a) "Beneficiary" for plan 1 members, means any person in
receipt of a retirement allowance, disability allowance, death benefit,
or any other benefit described herein.
(b) "Beneficiary" for plan 2 members, means any person in receipt
of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter
resulting from service rendered to an employer by another person.
(6)(a) "Child" or "children" means an unmarried person who is under
the age of eighteen or mentally or physically disabled as determined by
the department, except a person who is disabled and in the full time
care of a state institution, who is:
(i) A natural born child;
(ii) A stepchild where that relationship was in existence prior to
the date benefits are payable under this chapter;
(iii) A posthumous child;
(iv) A child legally adopted or made a legal ward of a member prior
to the date benefits are payable under this chapter; or
(v) An illegitimate child legitimized prior to the date any
benefits are payable under this chapter.
(b) A person shall also be deemed to be a child up to and including
the age of twenty years and eleven months while attending any high
school, college, or vocational or other educational institution
accredited, licensed, or approved by the state, in which it is located,
including the summer vacation months and all other normal and regular
vacation periods at the particular educational institution after which
the child returns to school.
(7) "Department" means the department of retirement systems created
in chapter 41.50 RCW.
(8) "Director" means the director of the department.
(9) "Disability board" for plan 1 members means either the county
disability board or the city disability board established in RCW
41.26.110.
(10) "Disability leave" means the period of six months or any
portion thereof during which a member is on leave at an allowance equal
to the member's full salary prior to the commencement of disability
retirement. The definition contained in this subsection shall apply
only to plan 1 members.
(11) "Disability retirement" for plan 1 members, means the period
following termination of a member's disability leave, during which the
member is in receipt of a disability retirement allowance.
(12) "Domestic partners" means two adults who have registered as
domestic partners under RCW 26.60.020.
(13) "Employee" means any law enforcement officer or firefighter as
defined in subsections (16) and (18) of this section.
(14)(a) "Employer" for plan 1 members, means the legislative
authority of any city, town, county, or district or the elected
officials of any municipal corporation that employs any law enforcement
officer and/or firefighter, any authorized association of such
municipalities, and, except for the purposes of RCW 41.26.150, any
labor guild, association, or organization, which represents the
firefighters or law enforcement officers of at least seven cities of
over 20,000 population and the membership of each local lodge or
division of which is composed of at least sixty percent law enforcement
officers or firefighters as defined in this chapter.
(b) "Employer" for plan 2 members, means the following entities to
the extent that the entity employs any law enforcement officer and/or
firefighter:
(i) The legislative authority of any city, town, county, or
district;
(ii) The elected officials of any municipal corporation;
(iii) The governing body of any other general authority law
enforcement agency; or
(iv) A four-year institution of higher education having a fully
operational fire department as of January 1, 1996.
(15)(a) "Final average salary" for plan 1 members, means (i) for a
member holding the same position or rank for a minimum of twelve months
preceding the date of retirement, the basic salary attached to such
same position or rank at time of retirement; (ii) for any other member,
including a civil service member who has not served a minimum of twelve
months in the same position or rank preceding the date of retirement,
the average of the greatest basic salaries payable to such member
during any consecutive twenty-four month period within such member's
last ten years of service for which service credit is allowed, computed
by dividing the total basic salaries payable to such member during the
selected twenty-four month period by twenty-four; (iii) in the case of
disability of any member, the basic salary payable to such member at
the time of disability retirement; (iv) in the case of a member who
hereafter vests pursuant to RCW 41.26.090, the basic salary payable to
such member at the time of vesting.
(b) "Final average salary" for plan 2 members, means the monthly
average of the member's basic salary for the highest consecutive sixty
service credit months of service prior to such member's retirement,
termination, or death. Periods constituting authorized unpaid leaves
of absence may not be used in the calculation of final average salary.
(c) In calculating final average salary under (a) or (b) of this
subsection, the department of retirement systems shall include any
compensation forgone by a member employed by a state agency or
institution during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium as a result of reduced
work hours, mandatory or voluntary leave without pay, temporary
reduction in pay implemented prior to the effective date of this
section, or temporary layoffs if the reduced compensation is an
integral part of the employer's expenditure reduction efforts, as
certified by the employer.
(16) "Firefighter" means:
(a) Any person who is serving on a full time, fully compensated
basis as a member of a fire department of an employer and who is
serving in a position which requires passing a civil service
examination for firefighter, and who is actively employed as such;
(b) Anyone who is actively employed as a full time firefighter
where the fire department does not have a civil service examination;
(c) Supervisory firefighter personnel;
(d) Any full time executive secretary of an association of fire
protection districts authorized under RCW 52.12.031. The provisions of
this subsection (16)(d) shall not apply to plan 2 members;
(e) The executive secretary of a labor guild, association or
organization (which is an employer under subsection (14) of this
section), if such individual has five years previous membership in a
retirement system established in chapter 41.16 or 41.18 RCW. The
provisions of this subsection (16)(e) shall not apply to plan 2
members;
(f) Any person who is serving on a full time, fully compensated
basis for an employer, as a fire dispatcher, in a department in which,
on March 1, 1970, a dispatcher was required to have passed a civil
service examination for firefighter;
(g) Any person who on March 1, 1970, was employed on a full time,
fully compensated basis by an employer, and who on May 21, 1971, was
making retirement contributions under the provisions of chapter 41.16
or 41.18 RCW; and
(h) Any person who is employed on a full-time, fully compensated
basis by an employer as an emergency medical technician.
(17) "General authority law enforcement agency" means any agency,
department, or division of a municipal corporation, political
subdivision, or other unit of local government of this state, and any
agency, department, or division of state government, having as its
primary function the detection and apprehension of persons committing
infractions or violating the traffic or criminal laws in general, but
not including the Washington state patrol. Such an agency, department,
or division is distinguished from a limited authority law enforcement
agency having as one of its functions the apprehension or detection of
persons committing infractions or violating the traffic or criminal
laws relating to limited subject areas, including but not limited to,
the state departments of natural resources and social and health
services, the state gambling commission, the state lottery commission,
the state parks and recreation commission, the state utilities and
transportation commission, the state liquor control board, and the
state department of corrections.
(18) "Law enforcement officer" beginning January 1, 1994, means any
person who is commissioned and employed by an employer on a full time,
fully compensated basis to enforce the criminal laws of the state of
Washington generally, with the following qualifications:
(a) No person who is serving in a position that is basically
clerical or secretarial in nature, and who is not commissioned shall be
considered a law enforcement officer;
(b) Only those deputy sheriffs, including those serving under a
different title pursuant to county charter, who have successfully
completed a civil service examination for deputy sheriff or the
equivalent position, where a different title is used, and those persons
serving in unclassified positions authorized by RCW 41.14.070 except a
private secretary will be considered law enforcement officers;
(c) Only such full time commissioned law enforcement personnel as
have been appointed to offices, positions, or ranks in the police
department which have been specifically created or otherwise expressly
provided for and designated by city charter provision or by ordinance
enacted by the legislative body of the city shall be considered city
police officers;
(d) The term "law enforcement officer" also includes the executive
secretary of a labor guild, association or organization (which is an
employer under subsection (14) of this section) if that individual has
five years previous membership in the retirement system established in
chapter 41.20 RCW. The provisions of this subsection (18)(d) shall not
apply to plan 2 members; and
(e) The term "law enforcement officer" also includes a person
employed on or after January 1, 1993, as a public safety officer or
director of public safety, so long as the job duties substantially
involve only either police or fire duties, or both, and no other duties
in a city or town with a population of less than ten thousand. The
provisions of this subsection (18)(e) shall not apply to any public
safety officer or director of public safety who is receiving a
retirement allowance under this chapter as of May 12, 1993.
(19) "Medical services" for plan 1 members, shall include the
following as minimum services to be provided. Reasonable charges for
these services shall be paid in accordance with RCW 41.26.150.
(a) Hospital expenses: These are the charges made by a hospital,
in its own behalf, for
(i) Board and room not to exceed semiprivate room rate unless
private room is required by the attending physician due to the
condition of the patient.
(ii) Necessary hospital services, other than board and room,
furnished by the hospital.
(b) Other medical expenses: The following charges are considered
"other medical expenses", provided that they have not been considered
as "hospital expenses".
(i) The fees of the following:
(A) A physician or surgeon licensed under the provisions of chapter
18.71 RCW;
(B) An osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under the
provisions of chapter 18.57 RCW;
(C) A chiropractor licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.25
RCW.
(ii) The charges of a registered graduate nurse other than a nurse
who ordinarily resides in the member's home, or is a member of the
family of either the member or the member's spouse.
(iii) The charges for the following medical services and supplies:
(A) Drugs and medicines upon a physician's prescription;
(B) Diagnostic X-ray and laboratory examinations;
(C) X-ray, radium, and radioactive isotopes therapy;
(D) Anesthesia and oxygen;
(E) Rental of iron lung and other durable medical and surgical
equipment;
(F) Artificial limbs and eyes, and casts, splints, and trusses;
(G) Professional ambulance service when used to transport the
member to or from a hospital when injured by an accident or stricken by
a disease;
(H) Dental charges incurred by a member who sustains an accidental
injury to his or her teeth and who commences treatment by a legally
licensed dentist within ninety days after the accident;
(I) Nursing home confinement or hospital extended care facility;
(J) Physical therapy by a registered physical therapist;
(K) Blood transfusions, including the cost of blood and blood
plasma not replaced by voluntary donors;
(L) An optometrist licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.53
RCW.
(20) "Member" means any firefighter, law enforcement officer, or
other person as would apply under subsections (16) or (18) of this
section whose membership is transferred to the Washington law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system on or after
March 1, 1970, and every law enforcement officer and firefighter who is
employed in that capacity on or after such date.
(21) "Plan 1" means the law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
retirement system, plan 1 providing the benefits and funding provisions
covering persons who first became members of the system prior to
October 1, 1977.
(22) "Plan 2" means the law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
retirement system, plan 2 providing the benefits and funding provisions
covering persons who first became members of the system on and after
October 1, 1977.
(23) "Position" means the employment held at any particular time,
which may or may not be the same as civil service rank.
(24) "Regular interest" means such rate as the director may
determine.
(25) "Retiree" for persons who establish membership in the
retirement system on or after October 1, 1977, means any member in
receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this
chapter resulting from service rendered to an employer by such member.
(26) "Retirement fund" means the "Washington law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system fund" as provided for
herein.
(27) "Retirement system" means the "Washington law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system" provided herein.
(28)(a) "Service" for plan 1 members, means all periods of
employment for an employer as a firefighter or law enforcement officer,
for which compensation is paid, together with periods of suspension not
exceeding thirty days in duration. For the purposes of this chapter
service shall also include service in the armed forces of the United
States as provided in RCW 41.26.190. Credit shall be allowed for all
service credit months of service rendered by a member from and after
the member's initial commencement of employment as a firefighter or law
enforcement officer, during which the member worked for seventy or more
hours, or was on disability leave or disability retirement. Only
service credit months of service shall be counted in the computation of
any retirement allowance or other benefit provided for in this chapter.
(i) For members retiring after May 21, 1971 who were employed under
the coverage of a prior pension act before March 1, 1970, "service"
shall also include (A) such military service not exceeding five years
as was creditable to the member as of March 1, 1970, under the member's
particular prior pension act, and (B) such other periods of service as
were then creditable to a particular member under the provisions of RCW
41.18.165, 41.20.160, or 41.20.170. However, in no event shall credit
be allowed for any service rendered prior to March 1, 1970, where the
member at the time of rendition of such service was employed in a
position covered by a prior pension act, unless such service, at the
time credit is claimed therefor, is also creditable under the
provisions of such prior act.
(ii) A member who is employed by two employers at the same time
shall only be credited with service to one such employer for any month
during which the member rendered such dual service.
(b) "Service" for plan 2 members, means periods of employment by a
member for one or more employers for which basic salary is earned for
ninety or more hours per calendar month which shall constitute a
service credit month. Periods of employment by a member for one or
more employers for which basic salary is earned for at least seventy
hours but less than ninety hours per calendar month shall constitute
one-half service credit month. Periods of employment by a member for
one or more employers for which basic salary is earned for less than
seventy hours shall constitute a one-quarter service credit month.
Members of the retirement system who are elected or appointed to a
state elective position may elect to continue to be members of this
retirement system.
Service credit years of service shall be determined by dividing the
total number of service credit months of service by twelve. Any
fraction of a service credit year of service as so determined shall be
taken into account in the computation of such retirement allowance or
benefits.
If a member receives basic salary from two or more employers during
any calendar month, the individual shall receive one service credit
month's service credit during any calendar month in which multiple
service for ninety or more hours is rendered; or one-half service
credit month's service credit during any calendar month in which
multiple service for at least seventy hours but less than ninety hours
is rendered; or one-quarter service credit month during any calendar
month in which multiple service for less than seventy hours is
rendered.
(29) "Service credit month" means a full service credit month or an
accumulation of partial service credit months that are equal to one.
(30) "Service credit year" means an accumulation of months of
service credit which is equal to one when divided by twelve.
(31) "State actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed
pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).
(32) "State elective position" means any position held by any
person elected or appointed to statewide office or elected or appointed
as a member of the legislature.
(33) "Surviving spouse" means the surviving widow or widower of a
member. "Surviving spouse" shall not include the divorced spouse of a
member except as provided in RCW 41.26.162.

Sec. 904 RCW 41.32.010 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 32 s 7 are each
amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly
required by the context:
(1)(a) "Accumulated contributions" for plan 1 members, means the
sum of all regular annuity contributions and, except for the purpose of
withdrawal at the time of retirement, any amount paid under RCW
41.50.165(2) with regular interest thereon.
(b) "Accumulated contributions" for plan 2 members, means the sum
of all contributions standing to the credit of a member in the member's
individual account, including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2),
together with the regular interest thereon.
(2) "Actuarial equivalent" means a benefit of equal value when
computed upon the basis of such mortality tables and regulations as
shall be adopted by the director and regular interest.
(3) "Adjustment ratio" means the value of index A divided by index
B.
(4) "Annual increase" means, initially, fifty-nine cents per month
per year of service which amount shall be increased each July 1st by
three percent, rounded to the nearest cent.
(5) "Annuity" means the moneys payable per year during life by
reason of accumulated contributions of a member.
(6) "Average final compensation" for plan 2 and plan 3 members,
means the member's average earnable compensation of the highest
consecutive sixty service credit months prior to such member's
retirement, termination, or death. Periods constituting authorized
leaves of absence may not be used in the calculation of average final
compensation except under RCW 41.32.810(2).
(7)(a) "Beneficiary" for plan 1 members, means any person in
receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this
chapter.
(b) "Beneficiary" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means any person
in receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this
chapter resulting from service rendered to an employer by another
person.
(8) "Contract" means any agreement for service and compensation
between a member and an employer.
(9) "Creditable service" means membership service plus prior
service for which credit is allowable. This subsection shall apply
only to plan 1 members.
(10) "Department" means the department of retirement systems
created in chapter 41.50 RCW.
(11) "Dependent" means receiving one-half or more of support from
a member.
(12) "Director" means the director of the department.
(13) "Disability allowance" means monthly payments during
disability. This subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.
(14)(a) "Earnable compensation" for plan 1 members, means:
(i) All salaries and wages paid by an employer to an employee
member of the retirement system for personal services rendered during
a fiscal year. In all cases where compensation includes maintenance
the employer shall fix the value of that part of the compensation not
paid in money.
(ii) For an employee member of the retirement system teaching in an
extended school year program, two consecutive extended school years, as
defined by the employer school district, may be used as the annual
period for determining earnable compensation in lieu of the two fiscal
years.
(iii) "Earnable compensation" for plan 1 members also includes the
following actual or imputed payments, which are not paid for personal
services:
(A) Retroactive payments to an individual by an employer on
reinstatement of the employee in a position, or payments by an employer
to an individual in lieu of reinstatement in a position which are
awarded or granted as the equivalent of the salary or wages which the
individual would have earned during a payroll period shall be
considered earnable compensation and the individual shall receive the
equivalent service credit.
(B) If a leave of absence, without pay, is taken by a member for
the purpose of serving as a member of the state legislature, and such
member has served in the legislature five or more years, the salary
which would have been received for the position from which the leave of
absence was taken shall be considered as compensation earnable if the
employee's contribution thereon is paid by the employee. In addition,
where a member has been a member of the state legislature for five or
more years, earnable compensation for the member's two highest
compensated consecutive years of service shall include a sum not to
exceed thirty-six hundred dollars for each of such two consecutive
years, regardless of whether or not legislative service was rendered
during those two years.
(iv) For members employed less than full time under written
contract with a school district, or community college district, in an
instructional position, for which the member receives service credit of
less than one year in all of the years used to determine the earnable
compensation used for computing benefits due under RCW 41.32.497,
41.32.498, and 41.32.520, the member may elect to have earnable
compensation defined as provided in RCW 41.32.345. For the purposes of
this subsection, the term "instructional position" means a position in
which more than seventy-five percent of the member's time is spent as
a classroom instructor (including office hours), a librarian, a
psychologist, a social worker, a nurse, a physical therapist, an
occupational therapist, a speech language pathologist or audiologist,
or a counselor. Earnable compensation shall be so defined only for the
purpose of the calculation of retirement benefits and only as necessary
to insure that members who receive fractional service credit under RCW
41.32.270 receive benefits proportional to those received by members
who have received full-time service credit.
(v) "Earnable compensation" does not include:
(A) Remuneration for unused sick leave authorized under RCW
41.04.340, 28A.400.210, or 28A.310.490;
(B) Remuneration for unused annual leave in excess of thirty days
as authorized by RCW 43.01.044 and 43.01.041.
(b) "Earnable compensation" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means
salaries or wages earned by a member during a payroll period for
personal services, including overtime payments, and shall include wages
and salaries deferred under provisions established pursuant to sections
403(b), 414(h), and 457 of the United States Internal Revenue Code, but
shall exclude lump sum payments for deferred annual sick leave, unused
accumulated vacation, unused accumulated annual leave, or any form of
severance pay.
"Earnable compensation" for plan 2 and plan 3 members also includes
the following actual or imputed payments which, except in the case of
(b)(ii)(B) of this subsection, are not paid for personal services:
(i) Retroactive payments to an individual by an employer on
reinstatement of the employee in a position or payments by an employer
to an individual in lieu of reinstatement in a position which are
awarded or granted as the equivalent of the salary or wages which the
individual would have earned during a payroll period shall be
considered earnable compensation, to the extent provided above, and the
individual shall receive the equivalent service credit.
(ii) In any year in which a member serves in the legislature the
member shall have the option of having such member's earnable
compensation be the greater of:
(A) The earnable compensation the member would have received had
such member not served in the legislature; or
(B) Such member's actual earnable compensation received for
teaching and legislative service combined. Any additional
contributions to the retirement system required because compensation
earnable under (b)(ii)(A) of this subsection is greater than
compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection shall be paid
by the member for both member and employer contributions.
(c) In calculating earnable compensation under (a) or (b) of this
subsection, the department of retirement systems shall include any
compensation forgone by a member employed by a state agency or
institution during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium as a result of reduced
work hours, mandatory or voluntary leave without pay, temporary
reduction in pay implemented prior to the effective date of this
section, or temporary layoffs if the reduced compensation is an
integral part of the employer's expenditure reduction efforts, as
certified by the employer.
(15)(a) "Eligible position" for plan 2 members from June 7, 1990,
through September 1, 1991, means a position which normally requires two
or more uninterrupted months of creditable service during September
through August of the following year.
(b) "Eligible position" for plan 2 and plan 3 on and after
September 1, 1991, means a position that, as defined by the employer,
normally requires five or more months of at least seventy hours of
earnable compensation during September through August of the following
year.
(c) For purposes of this chapter an employer shall not define
"position" in such a manner that an employee's monthly work for that
employer is divided into more than one position.
(d) The elected position of the superintendent of public
instruction is an eligible position.
(16) "Employed" or "employee" means a person who is providing
services for compensation to an employer, unless the person is free
from the employer's direction and control over the performance of work.
The department shall adopt rules and interpret this subsection
consistent with common law.
(17) "Employer" means the state of Washington, the school district,
or any agency of the state of Washington by which the member is paid.
(18) "Fiscal year" means a year which begins July 1st and ends June
30th of the following year.
(19) "Former state fund" means the state retirement fund in
operation for teachers under chapter 187, Laws of 1923, as amended.
(20) "Index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual
average consumer price index, Seattle, Washington area, for urban wage
earners and clerical workers, all items compiled by the bureau of labor
statistics, United States department of labor.
(21) "Index A" means the index for the year prior to the
determination of a postretirement adjustment.
(22) "Index B" means the index for the year prior to index A.
(23) "Index year" means the earliest calendar year in which the
index is more than sixty percent of index A.
(24) "Local fund" means any of the local retirement funds for
teachers operated in any school district in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 163, Laws of 1917 as amended.
(25) "Member" means any teacher included in the membership of the
retirement system who has not been removed from membership under RCW
41.32.878 or 41.32.768. Also, any other employee of the public schools
who, on July 1, 1947, had not elected to be exempt from membership and
who, prior to that date, had by an authorized payroll deduction,
contributed to the member reserve.
(26) "Member account" or "member's account" for purposes of plan 3
means the sum of the contributions and earnings on behalf of the member
in the defined contribution portion of plan 3.
(27) "Member reserve" means the fund in which all of the
accumulated contributions of members are held.
(28) "Membership service" means service rendered subsequent to the
first day of eligibility of a person to membership in the retirement
system: PROVIDED, That where a member is employed by two or more
employers the individual shall receive no more than one service credit
month during any calendar month in which multiple service is rendered.
The provisions of this subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.
(29) "Pension" means the moneys payable per year during life from
the pension reserve.
(30) "Pension reserve" is a fund in which shall be accumulated an
actuarial reserve adequate to meet present and future pension
liabilities of the system and from which all pension obligations are to
be paid.
(31) "Plan 1" means the teachers' retirement system, plan 1
providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who
first became members of the system prior to October 1, 1977.
(32) "Plan 2" means the teachers' retirement system, plan 2
providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who
first became members of the system on and after October 1, 1977, and
prior to July 1, 1996.
(33) "Plan 3" means the teachers' retirement system, plan 3
providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who
first become members of the system on and after July 1, 1996, or who
transfer under RCW 41.32.817.
(34) "Prior service" means service rendered prior to the first date
of eligibility to membership in the retirement system for which credit
is allowable. The provisions of this subsection shall apply only to
plan 1 members.
(35) "Prior service contributions" means contributions made by a
member to secure credit for prior service. The provisions of this
subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.
(36) "Public school" means any institution or activity operated by
the state of Washington or any instrumentality or political subdivision
thereof employing teachers, except the University of Washington and
Washington State University.
(37) "Regular contributions" means the amounts required to be
deducted from the compensation of a member and credited to the member's
individual account in the member reserve. This subsection shall apply
only to plan 1 members.
(38) "Regular interest" means such rate as the director may
determine.
(39) "Retiree" means any person who has begun accruing a retirement
allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from
service rendered to an employer while a member.
(40)(a) "Retirement allowance" for plan 1 members, means monthly
payments based on the sum of annuity and pension, or any optional
benefits payable in lieu thereof.
(b) "Retirement allowance" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means
monthly payments to a retiree or beneficiary as provided in this
chapter.
(41) "Retirement system" means the Washington state teachers'
retirement system.
(42) "Separation from service or employment" occurs when a person
has terminated all employment with an employer. Separation from
service or employment does not occur, and if claimed by an employer or
employee may be a violation of RCW 41.32.055, when an employee and
employer have a written or oral agreement to resume employment with the
same employer following termination. Mere expressions or inquiries
about postretirement employment by an employer or employee that do not
constitute a commitment to reemploy the employee after retirement are
not an agreement under this section.
(43)(a) "Service" for plan 1 members means the time during which a
member has been employed by an employer for compensation.
(i) If a member is employed by two or more employers the individual
shall receive no more than one service credit month during any calendar
month in which multiple service is rendered.
(ii) As authorized by RCW 28A.400.300, up to forty-five days of
sick leave may be creditable as service solely for the purpose of
determining eligibility to retire under RCW 41.32.470.
(iii) As authorized in RCW 41.32.065, service earned in an out-of-state retirement system that covers teachers in public schools may be
applied solely for the purpose of determining eligibility to retire
under RCW 41.32.470.
(b) "Service" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means periods of
employment by a member for one or more employers for which earnable
compensation is earned subject to the following conditions:
(i) A member employed in an eligible position or as a substitute
shall receive one service credit month for each month of September
through August of the following year if he or she earns earnable
compensation for eight hundred ten or more hours during that period and
is employed during nine of those months, except that a member may not
receive credit for any period prior to the member's employment in an
eligible position except as provided in RCW 41.32.812 and 41.50.132.
(ii) Any other member employed in an eligible position or as a
substitute who earns earnable compensation during the period from
September through August shall receive service credit according to one
of the following methods, whichever provides the most service credit to
the member:
(A) If a member is employed either in an eligible position or as a
substitute teacher for nine months of the twelve month period between
September through August of the following year but earns earnable
compensation for less than eight hundred ten hours but for at least six
hundred thirty hours, he or she will receive one-half of a service
credit month for each month of the twelve month period;
(B) If a member is employed in an eligible position or as a
substitute teacher for at least five months of a six-month period
between September through August of the following year and earns
earnable compensation for six hundred thirty or more hours within the
six-month period, he or she will receive a maximum of six service
credit months for the school year, which shall be recorded as one
service credit month for each month of the six-month period;
(C) All other members employed in an eligible position or as a
substitute teacher shall receive service credit as follows:
(I) A service credit month is earned in those calendar months where
earnable compensation is earned for ninety or more hours;
(II) A half-service credit month is earned in those calendar months
where earnable compensation is earned for at least seventy hours but
less than ninety hours; and
(III) A quarter-service credit month is earned in those calendar
months where earnable compensation is earned for less than seventy
hours.
(iii) Any person who is a member of the teachers' retirement system
and who is elected or appointed to a state elective position may
continue to be a member of the retirement system and continue to
receive a service credit month for each of the months in a state
elective position by making the required member contributions.
(iv) When an individual is employed by two or more employers the
individual shall only receive one month's service credit during any
calendar month in which multiple service for ninety or more hours is
rendered.
(v) As authorized by RCW 28A.400.300, up to forty-five days of sick
leave may be creditable as service solely for the purpose of
determining eligibility to retire under RCW 41.32.470. For purposes of
plan 2 and plan 3 "forty-five days" as used in RCW 28A.400.300 is equal
to two service credit months. Use of less than forty-five days of sick
leave is creditable as allowed under this subsection as follows:
(A) Less than eleven days equals one-quarter service credit month;
(B) Eleven or more days but less than twenty-two days equals one-half service credit month;
(C) Twenty-two days equals one service credit month;
(D) More than twenty-two days but less than thirty-three days
equals one and one-quarter service credit month;
(E) Thirty-three or more days but less than forty-five days equals
one and one-half service credit month.
(vi) As authorized in RCW 41.32.065, service earned in an out-of-state retirement system that covers teachers in public schools may be
applied solely for the purpose of determining eligibility to retire
under RCW 41.32.470.
(vii) The department shall adopt rules implementing this
subsection.
(44) "Service credit month" means a full service credit month or an
accumulation of partial service credit months that are equal to one.
(45) "Service credit year" means an accumulation of months of
service credit which is equal to one when divided by twelve.
(46) "State actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed
pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).
(47) "State elective position" means any position held by any
person elected or appointed to statewide office or elected or appointed
as a member of the legislature.
(48) "Substitute teacher" means:
(a) A teacher who is hired by an employer to work as a temporary
teacher, except for teachers who are annual contract employees of an
employer and are guaranteed a minimum number of hours; or
(b) Teachers who either (i) work in ineligible positions for more
than one employer or (ii) work in an ineligible position or positions
together with an eligible position.
(49) "Teacher" means any person qualified to teach who is engaged
by a public school in an instructional, administrative, or supervisory
capacity. The term includes state, educational service district, and
school district superintendents and their assistants and all employees
certificated by the superintendent of public instruction; and in
addition thereto any full time school doctor who is employed by a
public school and renders service of an instructional or educational
nature.

Sec. 905 RCW 41.37.010 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 32 s 8 are each
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Accumulated contributions" means the sum of all contributions
standing to the credit of a member in the member's individual account,
including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), together with the
regular interest thereon.
(2) "Actuarial equivalent" means a benefit of equal value when
computed upon the basis of such mortality and other tables as may be
adopted by the director.
(3) "Adjustment ratio" means the value of index A divided by index
B.
(4) "Annuity" means payments for life derived from accumulated
contributions of a member. All annuities shall be paid in monthly
installments.
(5)(a) "Average final compensation" means the member's average
compensation earnable of the highest consecutive sixty months of
service credit months prior to such member's retirement, termination,
or death. Periods constituting authorized leaves of absence may not be
used in the calculation of average final compensation except under RCW
41.37.290.
(b) In calculating average final compensation under (a) of this
subsection, the department of retirement systems shall include any
compensation forgone by a member employed by a state agency or
institution during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium as a result of reduced
work hours, mandatory or voluntary leave without pay, temporary
reduction in pay implemented prior to the effective date of this
section, or temporary layoffs if the reduced compensation is an
integral part of the employer's expenditure reduction efforts, as
certified by the employer.
(6) "Beneficiary" means any person in receipt of a retirement
allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from
service rendered to an employer by another person.
(7)(a) "Compensation earnable" for members, means salaries or wages
earned by a member during a payroll period for personal services,
including overtime payments, and shall include wages and salaries
deferred under provisions established pursuant to sections 403(b),
414(h), and 457 of the United States internal revenue code, but shall
exclude nonmoney maintenance compensation and lump sum or other
payments for deferred annual sick leave, unused accumulated vacation,
unused accumulated annual leave, or any form of severance pay.
(b) "Compensation earnable" for members also includes the following
actual or imputed payments, which are not paid for personal services:
(i) Retroactive payments to an individual by an employer on
reinstatement of the employee in a position, or payments by an employer
to an individual in lieu of reinstatement, which are awarded or granted
as the equivalent of the salary or wage which the individual would have
earned during a payroll period shall be considered compensation
earnable to the extent provided in this subsection, and the individual
shall receive the equivalent service credit;
(ii) In any year in which a member serves in the legislature, the
member shall have the option of having such member's compensation
earnable be the greater of:
(A) The compensation earnable the member would have received had
such member not served in the legislature; or
(B) Such member's actual compensation earnable received for
nonlegislative public employment and legislative service combined. Any
additional contributions to the retirement system required because
compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(A) of this subsection is greater
than compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection shall be
paid by the member for both member and employer contributions;
(iii) Assault pay only as authorized by RCW 27.04.100, 72.01.045,
and 72.09.240;
(iv) Compensation that a member would have received but for a
disability occurring in the line of duty only as authorized by RCW
41.37.060;
(v) Compensation that a member receives due to participation in the
leave sharing program only as authorized by RCW 41.04.650 through
41.04.670; and
(vi) Compensation that a member receives for being in standby
status. For the purposes of this section, a member is in standby
status when not being paid for time actually worked and the employer
requires the member to be prepared to report immediately for work, if
the need arises, although the need may not arise.
(8) "Department" means the department of retirement systems created
in chapter 41.50 RCW.
(9) "Director" means the director of the department.
(10) "Eligible position" means any permanent, full-time position
included in subsection (19) of this section.
(11) "Employee" or "employed" means a person who is providing
services for compensation to an employer, unless the person is free
from the employer's direction and control over the performance of work.
The department shall adopt rules and interpret this subsection
consistent with common law.
(12) "Employer" means the Washington state department of
corrections, the Washington state parks and recreation commission, the
Washington state gambling commission, the Washington state patrol, the
Washington state department of natural resources, and the Washington
state liquor control board; any county corrections department; or any
city corrections department not covered under chapter 41.28 RCW.
(13) "Final compensation" means the annual rate of compensation
earnable by a member at the time of termination of employment.
(14) "Index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual
average consumer price index, Seattle, Washington area, for urban wage
earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of
labor statistics, United States department of labor.
(15) "Index A" means the index for the year prior to the
determination of a postretirement adjustment.
(16) "Index B" means the index for the year prior to index A.
(17) "Ineligible position" means any position which does not
conform with the requirements set forth in subsection (10) of this
section.
(18) "Leave of absence" means the period of time a member is
authorized by the employer to be absent from service without being
separated from membership.
(19) "Member" means any employee employed by an employer on a full-time basis:
(a) Who is in a position that requires completion of a certified
criminal justice training course and is authorized by their employer to
arrest, conduct criminal investigations, enforce the criminal laws of
the state of Washington, and carry a firearm as part of the job;
(b) Whose primary responsibility is to ensure the custody and
security of incarcerated or probationary individuals as a corrections
officer, probation officer, or jailer;
(c) Who is a limited authority Washington peace officer, as defined
in RCW 10.93.020, for an employer; or
(d) Whose primary responsibility is to supervise members eligible
under this subsection.
(20) "Membership service" means all service rendered as a member.
(21) "Pension" means payments for life derived from contributions
made by the employer. All pensions shall be paid in monthly
installments.
(22) "Plan" means the Washington public safety employees'
retirement system plan 2.
(23) "Regular interest" means such rate as the director may
determine.
(24) "Retiree" means any person who has begun accruing a retirement
allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from
service rendered to an employer while a member.
(25) "Retirement" means withdrawal from active service with a
retirement allowance as provided by this chapter.
(26) "Retirement allowance" means monthly payments to a retiree or
beneficiary as provided in this chapter.
(27) "Retirement system" means the Washington public safety
employees' retirement system provided for in this chapter.
(28) "Separation from service" occurs when a person has terminated
all employment with an employer.
(29) "Service" means periods of employment by a member on or after
July 1, 2006, for one or more employers for which compensation earnable
is paid. Compensation earnable earned for ninety or more hours in any
calendar month shall constitute one service credit month. Compensation
earnable earned for at least seventy hours but less than ninety hours
in any calendar month shall constitute one-half service credit month of
service. Compensation earnable earned for less than seventy hours in
any calendar month shall constitute one-quarter service credit month of
service. Time spent in standby status, whether compensated or not, is
not service.
Any fraction of a year of service shall be taken into account in
the computation of such retirement allowance or benefits.
(a) Service in any state elective position shall be deemed to be
full-time service.
(b) A member shall receive a total of not more than twelve service
credit months of service for such calendar year. If an individual is
employed in an eligible position by one or more employers the
individual shall receive no more than one service credit month during
any calendar month in which multiple service for ninety or more hours
is rendered.
(30) "Service credit month" means a month or an accumulation of
months of service credit which is equal to one.
(31) "Service credit year" means an accumulation of months of
service credit which is equal to one when divided by twelve.
(32) "State actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed
pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).
(33) "State elective position" means any position held by any
person elected or appointed to statewide office or elected or appointed
as a member of the legislature.
(34) "State treasurer" means the treasurer of the state of
Washington.

Sec. 906 RCW 41.40.010 and 2009 c 430 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly
required by the context:
(1) "Accumulated contributions" means the sum of all contributions
standing to the credit of a member in the member's individual account,
including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), together with the
regular interest thereon.
(2) "Actuarial equivalent" means a benefit of equal value when
computed upon the basis of such mortality and other tables as may be
adopted by the director.
(3) "Adjustment ratio" means the value of index A divided by index
B.
(4) "Annual increase" means, initially, fifty-nine cents per month
per year of service which amount shall be increased each July 1st by
three percent, rounded to the nearest cent.
(5) "Annuity" means payments for life derived from accumulated
contributions of a member. All annuities shall be paid in monthly
installments.
(6)(a) "Average final compensation" for plan 1 members, means the
annual average of the greatest compensation earnable by a member during
any consecutive two year period of service credit months for which
service credit is allowed; or if the member has less than two years of
service credit months then the annual average compensation earnable
during the total years of service for which service credit is allowed.
(b) "Average final compensation" for plan 2 and plan 3 members,
means the member's average compensation earnable of the highest
consecutive sixty months of service credit months prior to such
member's retirement, termination, or death. Periods constituting
authorized leaves of absence may not be used in the calculation of
average final compensation except under RCW 41.40.710(2) or (c) of this
subsection.
(c) In calculating average final compensation under this subsection
for a member of plan 1, 2, or 3, the department of retirement systems
shall include any compensation forgone by the member during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium as a result of reduced work hours, voluntary leave
without pay, temporary reduction in pay implemented prior to the
effective date of this section, or temporary furloughs if the reduced
compensation is an integral part of the employer's expenditure
reduction efforts, as certified by the employer.
(7)(a) "Beneficiary" for plan 1 members, means any person in
receipt of a retirement allowance, pension or other benefit provided by
this chapter.
(b) "Beneficiary" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means any person
in receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this
chapter resulting from service rendered to an employer by another
person.
(8)(a) "Compensation earnable" for plan 1 members, means salaries
or wages earned during a payroll period for personal services and where
the compensation is not all paid in money, maintenance compensation
shall be included upon the basis of the schedules established by the
member's employer.
(i) "Compensation earnable" for plan 1 members also includes the
following actual or imputed payments, which are not paid for personal
services:
(A) Retroactive payments to an individual by an employer on
reinstatement of the employee in a position, or payments by an employer
to an individual in lieu of reinstatement in a position which are
awarded or granted as the equivalent of the salary or wage which the
individual would have earned during a payroll period shall be
considered compensation earnable and the individual shall receive the
equivalent service credit;
(B) If a leave of absence is taken by an individual for the purpose
of serving in the state legislature, the salary which would have been
received for the position from which the leave of absence was taken,
shall be considered as compensation earnable if the employee's
contribution is paid by the employee and the employer's contribution is
paid by the employer or employee;
(C) Assault pay only as authorized by RCW 27.04.100, 72.01.045, and
72.09.240;
(D) Compensation that a member would have received but for a
disability occurring in the line of duty only as authorized by RCW
41.40.038;
(E) Compensation that a member receives due to participation in the
leave sharing program only as authorized by RCW 41.04.650 through
41.04.670; and
(F) Compensation that a member receives for being in standby
status. For the purposes of this section, a member is in standby
status when not being paid for time actually worked and the employer
requires the member to be prepared to report immediately for work, if
the need arises, although the need may not arise.
(ii) "Compensation earnable" does not include:
(A) Remuneration for unused sick leave authorized under RCW
41.04.340, 28A.400.210, or 28A.310.490;
(B) Remuneration for unused annual leave in excess of thirty days
as authorized by RCW 43.01.044 and 43.01.041.
(b) "Compensation earnable" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means
salaries or wages earned by a member during a payroll period for
personal services, including overtime payments, and shall include wages
and salaries deferred under provisions established pursuant to sections
403(b), 414(h), and 457 of the United States Internal Revenue Code, but
shall exclude nonmoney maintenance compensation and lump sum or other
payments for deferred annual sick leave, unused accumulated vacation,
unused accumulated annual leave, or any form of severance pay.
"Compensation earnable" for plan 2 and plan 3 members also includes
the following actual or imputed payments, which are not paid for
personal services:
(i) Retroactive payments to an individual by an employer on
reinstatement of the employee in a position, or payments by an employer
to an individual in lieu of reinstatement in a position which are
awarded or granted as the equivalent of the salary or wage which the
individual would have earned during a payroll period shall be
considered compensation earnable to the extent provided above, and the
individual shall receive the equivalent service credit;
(ii) In any year in which a member serves in the legislature, the
member shall have the option of having such member's compensation
earnable be the greater of:
(A) The compensation earnable the member would have received had
such member not served in the legislature; or
(B) Such member's actual compensation earnable received for
nonlegislative public employment and legislative service combined. Any
additional contributions to the retirement system required because
compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(A) of this subsection is greater
than compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection shall be
paid by the member for both member and employer contributions;
(iii) Assault pay only as authorized by RCW 27.04.100, 72.01.045,
and 72.09.240;
(iv) Compensation that a member would have received but for a
disability occurring in the line of duty only as authorized by RCW
41.40.038;
(v) Compensation that a member receives due to participation in the
leave sharing program only as authorized by RCW 41.04.650 through
41.04.670; and
(vi) Compensation that a member receives for being in standby
status. For the purposes of this section, a member is in standby
status when not being paid for time actually worked and the employer
requires the member to be prepared to report immediately for work, if
the need arises, although the need may not arise.
(9) "Department" means the department of retirement systems created
in chapter 41.50 RCW.
(10) "Director" means the director of the department.
(11) "Eligible position" means:
(a) Any position that, as defined by the employer, normally
requires five or more months of service a year for which regular
compensation for at least seventy hours is earned by the occupant
thereof. For purposes of this chapter an employer shall not define
"position" in such a manner that an employee's monthly work for that
employer is divided into more than one position;
(b) Any position occupied by an elected official or person
appointed directly by the governor, or appointed by the chief justice
of the supreme court under RCW 2.04.240(2) or 2.06.150(2), for which
compensation is paid.
(12) "Employee" or "employed" means a person who is providing
services for compensation to an employer, unless the person is free
from the employer's direction and control over the performance of work.
The department shall adopt rules and interpret this subsection
consistent with common law.
(13)(a) "Employer" for plan 1 members, means every branch,
department, agency, commission, board, and office of the state, any
political subdivision or association of political subdivisions of the
state admitted into the retirement system, and legal entities
authorized by RCW 35.63.070 and 36.70.060 or chapter 39.34 RCW; and the
term shall also include any labor guild, association, or organization
the membership of a local lodge or division of which is comprised of at
least forty percent employees of an employer (other than such labor
guild, association, or organization) within this chapter. The term may
also include any city of the first class that has its own retirement
system.
(b) "Employer" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means every branch,
department, agency, commission, board, and office of the state, and any
political subdivision and municipal corporation of the state admitted
into the retirement system, including public agencies created pursuant
to RCW 35.63.070, 36.70.060, and 39.34.030; except that after August
31, 2000, school districts and educational service districts will no
longer be employers for the public employees' retirement system plan 2.
(14) "Final compensation" means the annual rate of compensation
earnable by a member at the time of termination of employment.
(15) "Index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual
average consumer price index, Seattle, Washington area, for urban wage
earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of
labor statistics, United States department of labor.
(16) "Index A" means the index for the year prior to the
determination of a postretirement adjustment.
(17) "Index B" means the index for the year prior to index A.
(18) "Index year" means the earliest calendar year in which the
index is more than sixty percent of index A.
(19) "Ineligible position" means any position which does not
conform with the requirements set forth in subsection (11) of this
section.
(20) "Leave of absence" means the period of time a member is
authorized by the employer to be absent from service without being
separated from membership.
(21) "Member" means any employee included in the membership of the
retirement system, as provided for in RCW 41.40.023. RCW 41.26.045
does not prohibit a person otherwise eligible for membership in the
retirement system from establishing such membership effective when he
or she first entered an eligible position.
(22) "Member account" or "member's account" for purposes of plan 3
means the sum of the contributions and earnings on behalf of the member
in the defined contribution portion of plan 3.
(23) "Membership service" means:
(a) All service rendered, as a member, after October 1, 1947;
(b) All service after October 1, 1947, to any employer prior to the
time of its admission into the retirement system for which member and
employer contributions, plus interest as required by RCW 41.50.125,
have been paid under RCW 41.40.056 or 41.40.057;
(c) Service not to exceed six consecutive months of probationary
service rendered after April 1, 1949, and prior to becoming a member,
in the case of any member, upon payment in full by such member of the
total amount of the employer's contribution to the retirement fund
which would have been required under the law in effect when such
probationary service was rendered if the member had been a member
during such period, except that the amount of the employer's
contribution shall be calculated by the director based on the first
month's compensation earnable as a member;
(d) Service not to exceed six consecutive months of probationary
service, rendered after October 1, 1947, and before April 1, 1949, and
prior to becoming a member, in the case of any member, upon payment in
full by such member of five percent of such member's salary during said
period of probationary service, except that the amount of the
employer's contribution shall be calculated by the director based on
the first month's compensation earnable as a member.
(24) "New member" means a person who becomes a member on or after
April 1, 1949, except as otherwise provided in this section.
(25) "Original member" of this retirement system means:
(a) Any person who became a member of the system prior to April 1,
1949;
(b) Any person who becomes a member through the admission of an
employer into the retirement system on and after April 1, 1949, and
prior to April 1, 1951;
(c) Any person who first becomes a member by securing employment
with an employer prior to April 1, 1951, provided the member has
rendered at least one or more years of service to any employer prior to
October 1, 1947;
(d) Any person who first becomes a member through the admission of
an employer into the retirement system on or after April 1, 1951,
provided, such person has been in the regular employ of the employer
for at least six months of the twelve-month period preceding the said
admission date;
(e) Any member who has restored all contributions that may have
been withdrawn as provided by RCW 41.40.150 and who on the effective
date of the individual's retirement becomes entitled to be credited
with ten years or more of membership service except that the provisions
relating to the minimum amount of retirement allowance for the member
upon retirement at age seventy as found in RCW 41.40.190(4) shall not
apply to the member;
(f) Any member who has been a contributor under the system for two
or more years and who has restored all contributions that may have been
withdrawn as provided by RCW 41.40.150 and who on the effective date of
the individual's retirement has rendered five or more years of service
for the state or any political subdivision prior to the time of the
admission of the employer into the system; except that the provisions
relating to the minimum amount of retirement allowance for the member
upon retirement at age seventy as found in RCW 41.40.190(4) shall not
apply to the member.
(26) "Pension" means payments for life derived from contributions
made by the employer. All pensions shall be paid in monthly
installments.
(27) "Plan 1" means the public employees' retirement system, plan
1 providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who
first became members of the system prior to October 1, 1977.
(28) "Plan 2" means the public employees' retirement system, plan
2 providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who
first became members of the system on and after October 1, 1977, and
are not included in plan 3.
(29) "Plan 3" means the public employees' retirement system, plan
3 providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who:
(a) First become a member on or after:
(i) March 1, 2002, and are employed by a state agency or institute
of higher education and who did not choose to enter plan 2; or
(ii) September 1, 2002, and are employed by other than a state
agency or institute of higher education and who did not choose to enter
plan 2; or
(b) Transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.40.795.
(30) "Prior service" means all service of an original member
rendered to any employer prior to October 1, 1947.
(31) "Regular interest" means such rate as the director may
determine.
(32) "Retiree" means any person who has begun accruing a retirement
allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from
service rendered to an employer while a member.
(33) "Retirement" means withdrawal from active service with a
retirement allowance as provided by this chapter.
(34) "Retirement allowance" means the sum of the annuity and the
pension.
(35) "Retirement system" means the public employees' retirement
system provided for in this chapter.
(36) "Separation from service" occurs when a person has terminated
all employment with an employer. Separation from service or employment
does not occur, and if claimed by an employer or employee may be a
violation of RCW 41.40.055, when an employee and employer have a
written or oral agreement to resume employment with the same employer
following termination. Mere expressions or inquiries about
postretirement employment by an employer or employee that do not
constitute a commitment to reemploy the employee after retirement are
not an agreement under this subsection.
(37)(a) "Service" for plan 1 members, except as provided in RCW
41.40.088, means periods of employment in an eligible position or
positions for one or more employers rendered to any employer for which
compensation is paid, and includes time spent in office as an elected
or appointed official of an employer. Compensation earnable earned in
full time work for seventy hours or more in any given calendar month
shall constitute one service credit month except as provided in RCW
41.40.088. Compensation earnable earned for less than seventy hours in
any calendar month shall constitute one-quarter service credit month of
service except as provided in RCW 41.40.088. Only service credit
months and one-quarter service credit months shall be counted in the
computation of any retirement allowance or other benefit provided for
in this chapter. Any fraction of a year of service shall be taken into
account in the computation of such retirement allowance or benefits.
Time spent in standby status, whether compensated or not, is not
service.
(i) Service by a state employee officially assigned by the state on
a temporary basis to assist another public agency, shall be considered
as service as a state employee: PROVIDED, That service to any other
public agency shall not be considered service as a state employee if
such service has been used to establish benefits in any other public
retirement system.
(ii) An individual shall receive no more than a total of twelve
service credit months of service during any calendar year. If an
individual is employed in an eligible position by one or more employers
the individual shall receive no more than one service credit month
during any calendar month in which multiple service for seventy or more
hours is rendered.
(iii) A school district employee may count up to forty-five days of
sick leave as creditable service solely for the purpose of determining
eligibility to retire under RCW 41.40.180 as authorized by RCW
28A.400.300. For purposes of plan 1 "forty-five days" as used in RCW
28A.400.300 is equal to two service credit months. Use of less than
forty-five days of sick leave is creditable as allowed under this
subsection as follows:
(A) Less than twenty-two days equals one-quarter service credit
month;
(B) Twenty-two days equals one service credit month;
(C) More than twenty-two days but less than forty-five days equals
one and one-quarter service credit month.
(b) "Service" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means periods of
employment by a member in an eligible position or positions for one or
more employers for which compensation earnable is paid. Compensation
earnable earned for ninety or more hours in any calendar month shall
constitute one service credit month except as provided in RCW
41.40.088. Compensation earnable earned for at least seventy hours but
less than ninety hours in any calendar month shall constitute one-half
service credit month of service. Compensation earnable earned for less
than seventy hours in any calendar month shall constitute one-quarter
service credit month of service. Time spent in standby status, whether
compensated or not, is not service.
Any fraction of a year of service shall be taken into account in
the computation of such retirement allowance or benefits.
(i) Service in any state elective position shall be deemed to be
full time service, except that persons serving in state elective
positions who are members of the Washington school employees'
retirement system, teachers' retirement system, public safety
employees' retirement system, or law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' retirement system at the time of election or appointment
to such position may elect to continue membership in the Washington
school employees' retirement system, teachers' retirement system,
public safety employees' retirement system, or law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system.
(ii) A member shall receive a total of not more than twelve service
credit months of service for such calendar year. If an individual is
employed in an eligible position by one or more employers the
individual shall receive no more than one service credit month during
any calendar month in which multiple service for ninety or more hours
is rendered.
(iii) Up to forty-five days of sick leave may be creditable as
service solely for the purpose of determining eligibility to retire
under RCW 41.40.180 as authorized by RCW 28A.400.300. For purposes of
plan 2 and plan 3 "forty-five days" as used in RCW 28A.400.300 is equal
to two service credit months. Use of less than forty-five days of sick
leave is creditable as allowed under this subsection as follows:
(A) Less than eleven days equals one-quarter service credit month;
(B) Eleven or more days but less than twenty-two days equals one-half service credit month;
(C) Twenty-two days equals one service credit month;
(D) More than twenty-two days but less than thirty-three days
equals one and one-quarter service credit month;
(E) Thirty-three or more days but less than forty-five days equals
one and one-half service credit month.
(38) "Service credit month" means a month or an accumulation of
months of service credit which is equal to one.
(39) "Service credit year" means an accumulation of months of
service credit which is equal to one when divided by twelve.
(40) "State actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed
pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).
(41) "State elective position" means any position held by any
person elected or appointed to statewide office or elected or appointed
as a member of the legislature.
(42) "State treasurer" means the treasurer of the state of
Washington.
(43) "Totally incapacitated for duty" means total inability to
perform the duties of a member's employment or office or any other work
for which the member is qualified by training or experience.

Sec. 907 RCW 43.43.120 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 32 s 9 are each
amended to read as follows:
As used in this section and RCW 43.43.130 through 43.43.320, unless
a different meaning is plainly required by the context:
(1) "Actuarial equivalent" shall mean a benefit of equal value when
computed upon the basis of such mortality table as may be adopted and
such interest rate as may be determined by the director.
(2) "Annual increase" means as of July 1, 1999, seventy-seven cents
per month per year of service which amount shall be increased each
subsequent July 1st by three percent, rounded to the nearest cent.
(3)(a) "Average final salary," for members commissioned prior to
January 1, 2003, shall mean the average monthly salary received by a
member during the member's last two years of service or any consecutive
two-year period of service, whichever is the greater, as an employee of
the Washington state patrol; or if the member has less than two years
of service, then the average monthly salary received by the member
during the member's total years of service.
(b) "Average final salary," for members commissioned on or after
January 1, 2003, shall mean the average monthly salary received by a
member for the highest consecutive sixty service credit months; or if
the member has less than sixty months of service, then the average
monthly salary received by the member during the member's total months
of service.
(c) In calculating average final salary under (a) or (b) of this
subsection, the department of retirement systems shall include any
compensation forgone by the member during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium
as a result of reduced work hours, mandatory or voluntary leave without
pay, temporary reduction in pay implemented prior to the effective date
of this section, or temporary layoffs if the reduced compensation is an
integral part of the employer's expenditure reduction efforts, as
certified by the chief.
(4) "Beneficiary" means any person in receipt of retirement
allowance or any other benefit allowed by this chapter.
(5)(a) "Cadet," for a person who became a member of the retirement
system after June 12, 1980, is a person who has passed the Washington
state patrol's entry-level oral, written, physical performance, and
background examinations and is, thereby, appointed by the chief as a
candidate to be a commissioned officer of the Washington state patrol.
(b) "Cadet," for a person who became a member of the retirement
system before June 12, 1980, is a trooper cadet, patrol cadet, or
employee of like classification, employed for the express purpose of
receiving the on-the-job training required for attendance at the state
patrol academy and for becoming a commissioned trooper. "Like
classification" includes: Radio operators or dispatchers; persons
providing security for the governor or legislature; patrol officers;
drivers' license examiners; weighmasters; vehicle safety inspectors;
central wireless operators; and warehouse workers.
(6) "Contributions" means the deduction from the compensation of
each member in accordance with the contribution rates established under
chapter 41.45 RCW.
(7) "Current service" shall mean all service as a member rendered
on or after August 1, 1947.
(8) "Department" means the department of retirement systems created
in chapter 41.50 RCW.
(9) "Director" means the director of the department of retirement
systems.
(10) "Domestic partners" means two adults who have registered as
domestic partners under RCW 26.60.040.
(11) "Employee" means any commissioned employee of the Washington
state patrol.
(12) "Insurance commissioner" means the insurance commissioner of
the state of Washington.
(13) "Lieutenant governor" means the lieutenant governor of the
state of Washington.
(14) "Member" means any person included in the membership of the
retirement fund.
(15) "Plan 2" means the Washington state patrol retirement system
plan 2, providing the benefits and funding provisions covering
commissioned employees who first become members of the system on or
after January 1, 2003.
(16) "Prior service" shall mean all services rendered by a member
to the state of Washington, or any of its political subdivisions prior
to August 1, 1947, unless such service has been credited in another
public retirement or pension system operating in the state of
Washington.
(17) "Regular interest" means interest compounded annually at such
rates as may be determined by the director.
(18) "Retirement board" means the board provided for in this
chapter.
(19) "Retirement fund" means the Washington state patrol retirement
fund.
(20) "Retirement system" means the Washington state patrol
retirement system.
(21)(a) "Salary," for members commissioned prior to July 1, 2001,
shall exclude any overtime earnings related to RCW 47.46.040, or any
voluntary overtime, earned on or after July 1, 2001.
(b) "Salary," for members commissioned on or after July 1, 2001,
shall exclude any overtime earnings related to RCW 47.46.040 or any
voluntary overtime, lump sum payments for deferred annual sick leave,
unused accumulated vacation, unused accumulated annual leave, holiday
pay, or any form of severance pay.
(22) "Service" shall mean services rendered to the state of
Washington or any political subdivisions thereof for which compensation
has been paid. Full time employment for seventy or more hours in any
given calendar month shall constitute one month of service. An
employee who is reinstated in accordance with RCW 43.43.110 shall
suffer no loss of service for the period reinstated subject to the
contribution requirements of this chapter. Only months of service
shall be counted in the computation of any retirement allowance or
other benefit provided for herein. Years of service shall be
determined by dividing the total number of months of service by twelve.
Any fraction of a year of service as so determined shall be taken into
account in the computation of such retirement allowance or benefit.
(23) "State actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed
pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).
(24) "State treasurer" means the treasurer of the state of
Washington.
Unless the context expressly indicates otherwise, words importing
the masculine gender shall be extended to include the feminine gender
and words importing the feminine gender shall be extended to include
the masculine gender.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 908 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 909 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of part)

INDEX PAGE #

ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
ATTORNEY GENERAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 139
COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 83
CONSERVATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 92
COURT OF APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE . . . . . . . . . . . . 101
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 78
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 83
DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 93
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 72
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 98
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE . . . . . . . . . . . . 16
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 69
AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 44
ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 57
CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 19
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 39
ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 52
JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 27
MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 58
MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 32
SPECIAL COMMITMENT PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 68
VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 68
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 138
ENVIRONMENTAL HEARINGS OFFICE . . . . . . . . . . . . 92
GROWTH MANAGEMENT HEARINGS BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES . . . . . . . . . . . . 1
LAW LIBRARY . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
OFFICE OF CIVIL LEGAL AID . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
OFFICE OF THE STATE ACTUARY . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP . . . . . . . . . . . . 103
RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 91
REDISTRICTING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
SECRETARY OF STATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
SENATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES . . . . . . . . . . . . 132
STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 70
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 90
STATE TREASURER
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 144
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 105
EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 122
GENERAL APPORTIONMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 114
SUPREME COURT . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE . . . . . . . . . . . . 140
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 135
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 137
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 143
--- END ---