BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.30.080 and 1971 ex.s. c 250 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
A special meeting may be called at any time by the presiding
officer of the governing body of a public agency or by a majority of
the members of the governing body by delivering written notice
personally ((or)), by mail ((written notice)), by fax, or by electronic
mail to each member of the governing body; and to each local newspaper
of general circulation and to each local radio or television station
which has on file with the governing body a written request to be
notified of such special meeting or of all special meetings. Such
notice must be delivered personally ((or)), by mail, by fax, or by
electronic mail at least twenty-four hours before the time of such
meeting as specified in the notice. The call and notice shall specify
the time and place of the special meeting and the business to be
transacted. Final disposition shall not be taken on any other matter
at such meetings by the governing body. A subscriber to such
notifications must be allowed by the sender to specify which approved
method or methods of communication he or she prefers for the receipt of
notices of a special meeting. The sender is required to use the
subscriber's preferred method of communication. If electronic mail is
used, a return receipt must be requested. If a fax is used, a reply
fax must be requested. If the electronic mail return receipt or reply
fax is not received in a timely manner, the sender shall verify receipt
by telephone. Such written notice may be dispensed with as to any
member who at or prior to the time the meeting convenes files with the
clerk or secretary of the governing body a written waiver of notice.
Such waiver may be given by telegram, by fax, or electronic mail. Such
written notice may also be dispensed with as to any member who is
actually present at the meeting at the time it convenes. The notices
provided in this section may be dispensed with in the event a special
meeting is called to deal with an emergency involving injury or damage
to persons or property or the likelihood of such injury or damage, when
time requirements of such notice would make notice impractical and
increase the likelihood of such injury or damage.

--- END ---