BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.24.181 and 2004 c 271 s 166 are each amended to
read as follows:
Filings for a nonpartisan office (other than judge of the supreme
court or superintendent of public instruction) shall be reopened for a
period of three normal business days, such three-day period to be fixed
by the election officer with whom such declarations of candidacy are
filed and notice thereof given by notifying press, radio, and
television in the county and by such other means as may now or
hereafter be provided by law, when:
(1) A void in candidacy for such nonpartisan office occurs on or
after the sixth Tuesday prior to a primary but prior to the sixth
Tuesday before an election; or
(2) ((A nominee for judge of the superior court eligible after a
contested primary for a certificate of election by Article 4, section
29, Amendment 41 of the state Constitution, dies or is disqualified
within the ten-day period immediately following the last day allotted
for a candidate to withdraw; or
(3))) A vacancy occurs in any nonpartisan office on or after the
sixth Tuesday prior to a primary but prior to the sixth Tuesday before
an election leaving an unexpired term to be filled by an election for
which filings have not been held.
The candidate receiving a plurality of the votes cast for that
office in the general election shall be deemed elected.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.24.191 and 2004 c 271 s 167 are each amended to
read as follows:
A scheduled election shall be lapsed, the office deemed stricken
from the ballot, no purported write-in votes counted, and no candidate
certified as elected, when:
(1) In an election for judge of the supreme court or superintendent
of public instruction, a void in candidacy occurs on or after the sixth
Tuesday prior to a primary, public filings and the primary being an
indispensable phase of the election process for such offices;
(2) ((Except as otherwise specified in RCW 29A.24.181, a nominee
for judge of the superior court entitled to a certificate of election
pursuant to Article 4, section 29, Amendment 41 of the state
Constitution dies or is disqualified on or after the sixth Tuesday
prior to a primary;
(3))) In other elections for nonpartisan office a void in candidacy
occurs or a vacancy occurs involving an unexpired term to be filled on
or after the sixth Tuesday prior to an election.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.36.171 and 2004 c 271 s 170 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1))) Except as provided in RCW 29A.36.180 ((and in subsection
(2) of this section)), on the ballot at the general election for a
nonpartisan office for which a primary was held, only the names of the
candidate who received the greatest number of votes and the candidate
who received the next greatest number of votes for that office shall
appear under the title of that office, and the names shall appear in
that order. If a primary was conducted, no candidate's name may be
printed on the subsequent general election ballot unless he or she
receives at least one percent of the total votes cast for that office
at the preceding primary. On the ballot at the general election for
any other nonpartisan office for which no primary was held, the names
of the candidates shall be listed in the order determined under RCW
29A.36.131.
(((2) On the ballot at the general election for the office of
justice of the supreme court, judge of the court of appeals, judge of
the superior court, judge of the district court, or state
superintendent of public instruction, if a candidate in a contested
primary receives a majority of all the votes cast for that office or
position, only the name of that candidate may be printed under the
title of the office for that position.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect January 1, 2006, if
the proposed amendment to Article IV, section 29 of the state
Constitution (HJR ....) is validly submitted to and is approved and
ratified by the voters at a general election held in November 2005. If
the proposed amendment is not approved and ratified, this act is void
in its entirety.

--- END ---