BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.37 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This section applies to all motor vehicles with a declared
gross weight in excess of 10,000 pounds operated on public roads and
equipped with engine compression brake devices. An engine compression
brake device is any device that uses the engine and transmission to
impede the forward motion of the motor vehicle by compression of the
engine.
(2) The driver of a motor vehicle equipped with a device that uses
the compression of the motor vehicle engine shall not use the device
unless:
(a) The motor vehicle is equipped with an operational muffler and
exhaust system to prevent excess noise. The muffler and exhaust system
must maintain the noise level at eighty-three decibels or less for
motor vehicles manufactured after January 1, 1979, and eighty decibels
or less for motor vehicles manufactured after January 1, 1988; or
(b) The driver reasonably believes that an emergency exists which
requires the use of the device to: (i) Protect against an immediate
threat to the physical safety of the driver or others; (ii) protect
against immediate threat of damage to property; or (iii) effectively
reduce the speed of the motor vehicle using the manufacturer's motor
vehicle braking system when declining from an elevated roadway.
(3) The monetary penalty for violating subsection (2) of this
section is: (a) Two hundred fifty dollars for the first violation; (b)
five hundred dollars for the second violation; and (c) seven hundred
fifty dollars for each violation thereafter.
(4) The Washington state patrol must establish rules for Washington
state law enforcement agencies to enforce subsection (2) of this
section.
(5) All medium and heavy trucks must comply with federal code 205 -transportation equipment noise emission controls, subpart B.
(6) Nothing in this section prohibits a local jurisdiction from
implementing an ordinance that is more restrictive than the state law
and Washington state patrol rules regarding the use of compression
brakes.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.63.110 and 2003 c 380 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be
assessed a monetary penalty. No penalty may exceed two hundred and
fifty dollars for each offense unless authorized by this chapter or
title.
(2) The monetary penalty for a violation of RCW 46.55.105(2) is two
hundred fifty dollars for each offense. No penalty assessed under this
subsection (2) may be reduced.
(3) The supreme court shall prescribe by rule a schedule of
monetary penalties for designated traffic infractions. This rule shall
also specify the conditions under which local courts may exercise
discretion in assessing fines and penalties for traffic infractions.
The legislature respectfully requests the supreme court to adjust this
schedule every two years for inflation.
(4) There shall be a penalty of twenty-five dollars for failure to
respond to a notice of traffic infraction except where the infraction
relates to parking as defined by local law, ordinance, regulation, or
resolution or failure to pay a monetary penalty imposed pursuant to
this chapter. A local legislative body may set a monetary penalty not
to exceed twenty-five dollars for failure to respond to a notice of
traffic infraction relating to parking as defined by local law,
ordinance, regulation, or resolution. The local court, whether a
municipal, police, or district court, shall impose the monetary penalty
set by the local legislative body.
(5) Monetary penalties provided for in chapter 46.70 RCW which are
civil in nature and penalties which may be assessed for violations of
chapter 46.44 RCW relating to size, weight, and load of motor vehicles
are not subject to the limitation on the amount of monetary penalties
which may be imposed pursuant to this chapter.
(6) Whenever a monetary penalty is imposed by a court under this
chapter it is immediately payable. If the person is unable to pay at
that time the court may, in its discretion, grant an extension of the
period in which the penalty may be paid. If the penalty is not paid on
or before the time established for payment the court shall notify the
department of the failure to pay the penalty, and the department shall
suspend the person's driver's license or driving privilege until the
penalty has been paid and the penalty provided in subsection (4) of
this section has been paid.
(7) In addition to any other penalties imposed under this section
and not subject to the limitation of subsection (1) of this section, a
person found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be assessed
a fee of five dollars per infraction. Under no circumstances shall
this fee be reduced or waived. Revenue from this fee shall be
forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the emergency medical
services and trauma care system trust account under RCW 70.168.040.
(8)(a) In addition to any other penalties imposed under this
section and not subject to the limitation of subsection (1) of this
section, a person found to have committed a traffic infraction other
than of RCW 46.61.527 shall be assessed an additional penalty of twenty
dollars. The court may not reduce, waive, or suspend the additional
penalty unless the court finds the offender to be indigent. If a
community restitution program for offenders is available in the
jurisdiction, the court shall allow offenders to offset all or a part
of the penalty due under this subsection (8) by participation in the
community restitution program.
(b) Eight dollars and fifty cents of the additional penalty under
(a) of this subsection shall be remitted to the state treasurer. The
remaining revenue from the additional penalty must be remitted under
chapters 2.08, 3.46, 3.50, 3.62, 10.82, and 35.20 RCW. Money remitted
under this subsection to the state treasurer must be deposited as
provided in RCW 43.08.250. The balance of the revenue received by the
county or city treasurer under this subsection must be deposited into
the county or city current expense fund. Moneys retained by the city
or county under this subsection shall constitute reimbursement for any
liabilities under RCW 43.135.060.
(9) The monetary penalty for violating section 1 of this act is:
(a) Two hundred fifty dollars for the first violation; (b) five hundred
dollars for the second violation; and (c) seven hundred fifty dollars
for each violation thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---