BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that off-road
recreational vehicles (ORVs) provide opportunities for a wide variety
of outdoor recreation activities. The legislature further finds that
the limited amount of ORV recreation areas presents a challenge for ORV
recreational users, natural resource land managers, and private
landowners. The legislature further finds that many nonhighway roads
provide opportunities for ORV use and that these opportunities may
reduce conflicts between users and facilitate responsible ORV
recreation. However, restrictions intended for motor vehicles may
prevent ORV use on certain roads, including forest service roads.
Therefore, the legislature finds that local, state, and federal
jurisdictions should be given the flexibility to allow ORV use on
nonhighway roads they own and manage or for which they are authorized
to allow public ORV use under an easement granted by the owner.
Nothing in this act authorizes trespass on private property.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.09.010 and 1972 ex.s. c 153 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall apply to all lands in this
state. Nothing in this chapter ((43.09 RCW)), RCW ((67.32.050,
67.32.080, 67.32.100, 67.32.130 or 67.32.140)) 79A.35.040, 79A.35.070,
79A.35.090, 79A.35.110, and 79A.35.120 shall be deemed to grant to any
person the right or authority to enter upon private property without
permission of the property owner.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.09.120 and 2003 c 377 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is a traffic infraction for any person to operate any
nonhighway vehicle:
(a) In such a manner as to endanger the property of another;
(b) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle without a lighted headlight and taillight between the hours of
dusk and dawn, or when otherwise required for the safety of others
regardless of ownership;
(c) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle without an adequate braking device or when otherwise required
for the safety of others regardless of ownership;
(d) Without a spark arrester approved by the department of natural
resources;
(e) Without an adequate, and operating, muffling device which
effectively limits vehicle noise to no more than eighty-six decibels on
the "A" scale at fifty feet as measured by the Society of Automotive
Engineers (SAE) test procedure J 331a, except that a maximum noise
level of one hundred and five decibels on the "A" scale at a distance
of twenty inches from the exhaust outlet shall be an acceptable
substitute in lieu of the Society of Automotive Engineers test
procedure J 331a when measured:
(i) At a forty-five degree angle at a distance of twenty inches
from the exhaust outlet;
(ii) With the vehicle stationary and the engine running at a steady
speed equal to one-half of the manufacturer's maximum allowable ("red
line") engine speed or where the manufacturer's maximum allowable
engine speed is not known the test speed in revolutions per minute
calculated as sixty percent of the speed at which maximum horsepower is
developed; and
(iii) With the microphone placed ten inches from the side of the
vehicle, one-half way between the lowest part of the vehicle body and
the ground plane, and in the same lateral plane as the rearmost exhaust
outlet where the outlet of the exhaust pipe is under the vehicle;
(f) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle upon the shoulder or inside bank or slope of any nonhighway
road or highway, or upon the median of any divided highway;
(g) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle in any area or in such a manner so as to unreasonably expose
the underlying soil, or to create an erosion condition, or to injure,
damage, or destroy trees, growing crops, or other vegetation;
(h) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle or on any nonhighway road or trail, when these are restricted
to pedestrian or animal travel; ((and))
(i) On any public lands in violation of rules and regulations of
the agency administering such lands; and
(j) On a private nonhighway road in violation of section 3 of this
act.
(2) It is a misdemeanor for any person to operate any nonhighway
vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a
controlled substance.
(3)(a) Except for an off-road vehicle equipped with seat belts and
roll bars or an enclosed passenger compartment, it is a traffic
infraction for any person to operate or ride an off-road vehicle on a
nonhighway road without wearing upon his or her head a motorcycle
helmet fastened securely while in motion. For purposes of this
section, "motorcycle helmet" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
46.37.530.
(b) Subsection (3)(a) of this section does not apply to an off-road
vehicle operator operating on his or her own land.
(c) Subsection (3)(a) of this section does not apply to an off-road
vehicle operator operating on agricultural lands owned or leased by the
off-road vehicle operator or the operator's employer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 46.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, it is lawful to
operate an off-road vehicle upon a nonhighway road and in parking areas
serving designated off-road vehicle areas if the state, federal, local,
or private authority responsible for the management of the nonhighway
road authorizes the use of off-road vehicles.
(2) Operations of an off-road vehicle on a nonhighway road under
this section is exempt from licensing requirements of RCW 46.16.010 and
vehicle lighting and equipment requirements of chapter 46.37 RCW.
(3) It is unlawful to operate an off-road vehicle upon a private
nonhighway road if the road owner has not authorized the use of off-road vehicles.
(4) Nothing in this section authorizes trespass on private
property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 46.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as specified in subsection (2) of this section, no
person under thirteen years of age may operate an off-road vehicle on
or across a highway or nonhighway road in this state.
(2) Persons under thirteen years of age may operate an off-road
vehicle on a nonhighway road designated for off-road vehicle use under
the direct supervision of a person eighteen years of age or older
possessing a valid license to operate a motor vehicle under chapter
46.20 RCW.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.16.010 and 2003 c 353 s 8 and 2003 c 53 s 238 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for a person to operate any vehicle over and
along a public highway of this state without first having obtained and
having in full force and effect a current and proper vehicle license
and display vehicle license number plates therefor as by this chapter
provided.
(2) Failure to make initial registration before operation on the
highways of this state is a misdemeanor, and any person convicted
thereof must be punished by a fine of no less than three hundred thirty
dollars, no part of which may be suspended or deferred.
(3) Failure to renew an expired registration before operation on
the highways of this state is a traffic infraction.
(4) The licensing of a vehicle in another state by a resident of
this state, as defined in RCW 46.16.028, evading the payment of any tax
or license fee imposed in connection with registration, is a gross
misdemeanor punishable as follows:
(a) For a first offense, up to one year in the county jail and a
fine equal to twice the amount of delinquent taxes and fees, no part of
which may be suspended or deferred;
(b) For a second or subsequent offense, up to one year in the
county jail and a fine equal to four times the amount of delinquent
taxes and fees, no part of which may be suspended or deferred;
(c) For fines levied under (b) of this subsection, an amount equal
to the avoided taxes and fees owed will be deposited in the vehicle
licensing fraud account created in the state treasury;
(d) The avoided taxes and fees shall be deposited and distributed
in the same manner as if the taxes and fees were properly paid in a
timely fashion.
(5) These provisions shall not apply to the following vehicles:
(a) Motorized foot scooters;
(b) Electric-assisted bicycles;
(c) Off-road vehicles operating on nonhighway roads under section
4 of this act;
(d) Farm vehicles if operated within a radius of fifteen miles of
the farm where principally used or garaged, farm tractors and farm
implements including trailers designed as cook or bunk houses used
exclusively for animal herding temporarily operating or drawn upon the
public highways, and trailers used exclusively to transport farm
implements from one farm to another during the daylight hours or at
night when such equipment has lights that comply with the law;
(((d))) (e) Spray or fertilizer applicator rigs designed and used
exclusively for spraying or fertilization in the conduct of
agricultural operations and not primarily for the purpose of
transportation, and nurse rigs or equipment auxiliary to the use of and
designed or modified for the fueling, repairing, or loading of spray
and fertilizer applicator rigs and not used, designed, or modified
primarily for the purpose of transportation;
(((e))) (f) Fork lifts operated during daylight hours on public
highways adjacent to and within five hundred feet of the warehouses
which they serve: PROVIDED FURTHER, That these provisions shall not
apply to vehicles used by the state parks and recreation commission
exclusively for park maintenance and operations upon public highways
within state parks;
(((f))) (g) "Special highway construction equipment" defined as
follows: Any vehicle which is designed and used primarily for grading
of highways, paving of highways, earth moving, and other construction
work on highways and which is not designed or used primarily for the
transportation of persons or property on a public highway and which is
only incidentally operated or moved over the highway. It includes, but
is not limited to, road construction and maintenance machinery so
designed and used such as portable air compressors, air drills, asphalt
spreaders, bituminous mixers, bucket loaders, track laying tractors,
ditchers, leveling graders, finishing machines, motor graders, paving
mixers, road rollers, scarifiers, earth moving scrapers and carryalls,
lighting plants, welders, pumps, power shovels and draglines, self-propelled and tractor-drawn earth moving equipment and machinery,
including dump trucks and tractor-dump trailer combinations which
either (i) are in excess of the legal width, or (ii) which, because of
their length, height, or unladen weight, may not be moved on a public
highway without the permit specified in RCW 46.44.090 and which are not
operated laden except within the boundaries of the project limits as
defined by the contract, and other similar types of construction
equipment, or (iii) which are driven or moved upon a public highway
only for the purpose of crossing such highway from one property to
another, provided such movement does not exceed five hundred feet and
the vehicle is equipped with wheels or pads which will not damage the
roadway surface.
Exclusions:
"Special highway construction equipment" does not include any of
the following:
Dump trucks originally designed to comply with the legal size and
weight provisions of this code notwithstanding any subsequent
modification which would require a permit, as specified in RCW
46.44.090, to operate such vehicles on a public highway, including
trailers, truck-mounted transit mixers, cranes and shovels, or other
vehicles designed for the transportation of persons or property to
which machinery has been attached.
(6) The following vehicles, whether operated solo or in
combination, are exempt from license registration and displaying
license plates as required by this chapter:
(a) A converter gear used to convert a semitrailer into a trailer
or a two-axle truck or tractor into a three or more axle truck or
tractor or used in any other manner to increase the number of axles of
a vehicle. Converter gear includes an auxiliary axle, booster axle,
dolly, and jeep axle.
(b) A tow dolly that is used for towing a motor vehicle behind
another motor vehicle. The front or rear wheels of the towed vehicle
are secured to and rest on the tow dolly that is attached to the towing
vehicle by a tow bar.

Sec. 7 RCW 46.37.010 and 1997 c 241 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is a traffic infraction for any person to drive or move or
for the owner to cause or knowingly permit to be driven or moved on any
highway any vehicle or combination of vehicles which is in such unsafe
condition as to endanger any person, or which does not contain those
parts or is not at all times equipped with such lamps and other
equipment in proper condition and adjustment as required in this
chapter or in regulations issued by the chief of the Washington state
patrol, or which is equipped in any manner in violation of this chapter
or the state patrol's regulations, or for any person to do any act
forbidden or fail to perform any act required under this chapter or the
state patrol's regulations.
(2) Nothing contained in this chapter or the state patrol's
regulations shall be construed to prohibit the use of additional parts
and accessories on any vehicle not inconsistent with the provisions of
this chapter or the state patrol's regulations.
(3) The provisions of the chapter and the state patrol's
regulations with respect to equipment on vehicles shall not apply to
implements of husbandry, road machinery, road rollers, or farm tractors
except as herein made applicable.
(4) No owner or operator of a farm tractor, self-propelled unit of
farm equipment, or implement of husbandry shall be guilty of a crime or
subject to penalty for violation of RCW 46.37.160 as now or hereafter
amended unless such violation occurs on a public highway.
(5) It is a traffic infraction for any person to sell or offer for
sale vehicle equipment which is required to be approved by the state
patrol as prescribed in RCW 46.37.005 unless it has been approved by
the state patrol.
(6) The provisions of this chapter with respect to equipment
required on vehicles shall not apply to motorcycles or motor-driven
cycles except as herein made applicable.
(7) This chapter does not apply to off-road vehicles used on
nonhighway roads.
(8) This chapter does not apply to vehicles used by the state parks
and recreation commission exclusively for park maintenance and
operations upon public highways within state parks.
(((8))) (9) Notices of traffic infraction issued to commercial
drivers under the provisions of this chapter with respect to equipment
required on commercial motor vehicles shall not be considered for
driver improvement purposes under chapter 46.20 RCW.
(((9))) (10) Whenever a traffic infraction is chargeable to the
owner or lessee of a vehicle under subsection (1) of this section, the
driver shall not be arrested or issued a notice of traffic infraction
unless the vehicle is registered in a jurisdiction other than
Washington state, or unless the infraction is for an offense that is
clearly within the responsibility of the driver.
(((10))) (11) Whenever the owner or lessee is issued a notice of
traffic infraction under this section the court may, on the request of
the owner or lessee, take appropriate steps to make the driver of the
vehicle, or any other person who directs the loading, maintenance, or
operation of the vehicle, a codefendant. If the codefendant is held
solely responsible and is found to have committed the traffic
infraction, the court may dismiss the notice against the owner or
lessee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---