BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.80.010 and 2004 c 10 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following definitions apply throughout this chapter, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Alternate" means an individual: (a) Who is appointed by the
county legislative authority or authorities under RCW 90.80.050(3); (b)
who is trained under the requirements of RCW 90.80.040; and (c) who,
while serving as a replacement for an absent or recused commissioner:
(i) May serve and vote as a commissioner; (ii) is subject to any
requirement applicable to a commissioner; and (iii) counts toward a
quorum.
(2) "Board" means a water conservancy board created under this
chapter.
(3) "Commissioner" means an individual who is appointed by the
county legislative authority or authorities as a member of a water
conservancy board under RCW 90.80.050(1), or an alternate appointed
under RCW 90.80.050(3) while serving as a replacement for an absent or
recused commissioner.
(4) (("Department" means the department of ecology.
(5) "Director" means the director of the department of ecology.
(6) "Record of)) "Decision" means the ((conclusion reached by))
decision of a water conservancy board ((regarding)) to approve, deny,
or approve with conditions an application for a transfer filed with the
board.
(((7))) (5) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(6) "Transfer" means a transfer, change, amendment, or other
alteration of a part or all of a water right authorized under RCW
90.03.380, 90.03.390, or 90.44.100.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.80.020 and 1997 c 441 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The county legislative authority of a county may create a water
conservancy board((, subject to approval by the director,)) for the
purpose of expediting voluntary water transfers within the county.
(2) A water conservancy board may be initiated by((: (a))) a
resolution of the county legislative authority((; (b) a resolution
presented to)). The county legislative authority ((calling for the
creation of a board)) may also be petitioned to create a water
conservancy board by: (a) The legislative authority of an irrigation
district, public utility district that operates a public water system,
a reclamation district, a city operating a public water system, or a
water-sewer district that operates a public water system; (((c) a
resolution by)) (b) the governing body of a cooperative or mutual
corporation that operates a public water system serving one hundred or
more accounts; (((d))) (c) a petition signed by five or more water
rights holders, including their addresses, who divert water for use
within the county; or (((e))) (d) any combination of (a) through
(((d))) (c) of this subsection. The ((resolution or)) petition must
state the need for the board, include proposed bylaws or rules and
procedures that will govern the operation of the board, identify the
geographic boundaries where there is an initial interest in transacting
water sales or transfers, and describe the proposed method for funding
the operation of the board.
(3) After receiving a ((resolution or)) petition to create a board,
a county legislative authority shall determine its sufficiency. If the
county legislative authority finds that the ((resolution or)) petition
is sufficient, or if the county is initiating the creation of a board
upon its own motion, it shall hold at least one public hearing on the
proposed creation of the board. Notice of the hearing shall be
published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the
county not less than ten days nor more than thirty days before the date
of the hearing. The notice shall describe the time, date, place, and
purpose of the hearing, as well as the purpose of the board. Following
the hearing, the county legislative authority may adopt a resolution
approving the creation of the board if it finds that the board's
creation is in the public interest. The resolution must identify the
boundaries of the area that is within the jurisdiction of the board.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.80.030 and 1997 c 441 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) If it adopts a resolution creating a board, the county
legislative authority shall ((forward a copy of the resolution or
petition calling for the creation of the board,)) inform the department
of the board's creation by forwarding a copy of the resolution
((approving the creation of the board, and a summary of the public
testimony presented at the public hearing to the director following the
adoption of the resolution calling for the board's creation)) to the
department.
(((2) The director shall approve or deny the creation of a board
within forty-five days after the county legislative authority has
submitted all information required under subsection (1) of this
section. The director must determine whether the creation of the board
would further the purposes of this chapter and is in the public
interest. The director shall include a description of the necessary
training requirements for commissioners in the notice of approval sent
to the county legislative authority.))

Sec. 4 RCW 90.80.035 and 2004 c 10 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a county is the only county having lands comprising a water
resource inventory area as defined in chapter 173-500 WAC, the county
may elect to establish a water conservancy board for the water resource
inventory area, rather than for the entire county.
(2) Counties having lands within a water resource inventory area
may jointly ((petition the department for establishment of)) establish
a water conservancy board for the water resource inventory area.
Counties may jointly ((petition the department to)) establish boards
serving multiple counties or one or more water resource inventory
areas. For any of these multicounty options, the counties must reach
their joint determination on the decision to ((file the petition))
create the board, on the proposed bylaws, and on other matters relating
to the establishment and operation of the board in accordance with the
provisions of this chapter and chapter 39.34 RCW, the interlocal
cooperation act. Each county must meet the requirements of RCW
90.80.020(2). The counties must jointly determine the sufficiency of
a petition under RCW 90.80.020(3) and each county legislative authority
must hold a hearing in its county.
(3) If ((establishment of)) a multicounty water conservancy board
is created under any of the options provided in subsection (2) of this
section ((is approved by the department)), the counties must jointly
appoint the board commissioners and jointly appoint members to fill
vacancies as they occur, and may jointly appoint alternates in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter and chapter 39.34 RCW.
(4) A board established for more than one county or for one or more
water resource inventory areas has the same powers as other boards
established under this chapter. The board has no jurisdiction outside
the boundaries of the water resource inventory area or areas or the
county or counties, as applicable, for which it has been established,
except as provided in this chapter.
(5) The counties establishing a board for a multiple county area
must designate a lead county for purposes of providing a single point
of contact for communications with the department. The lead county
shall forward the ((information)) resolutions creating the board as
required in RCW 90.80.030(1) for each county.

Sec. 5 RCW 90.80.040 and 1997 c 441 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director of the department may, as deemed necessary by the
director, adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW ((necessary
to carry out this chapter, including)) establishing minimum
requirements for the training and continuing education of
commissioners. Training courses for commissioners shall include an
overview of state water law and hydrology. Prior to commissioners
taking action on proposed water right transfers, the commissioners
shall comply with training requirements that include state water law
and hydrology.

Sec. 6 RCW 90.80.055 and 2001 c 237 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a board
shall operate on a countywide basis or on an areawide basis in the case
of a board with jurisdiction in more than one county or water resource
inventory area, and have the following powers, in addition to any other
powers granted in this chapter:
(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a board
may act upon applications for the same kinds of transfers that the
department itself is authorized to act upon, including an application
to establish a trust water right under chapter 90.38 or 90.42 RCW. A
board may not act upon an application for the type of transfer within
an irrigation district as described in RCW 90.03.380(3). If a board
receives an application for a transfer between two irrigation districts
as described in RCW 90.03.380(2), the board must, before publication of
notice of the application, receive the concurrence specified in that
section.
(b) A board may act upon an application to transfer a water right
claim filed under chapter 90.14 RCW. In acting upon such an
application, the board must make a tentative determination as to the
validity and extent of the right, if any, embodied in the claim and may
only issue a record of decision regarding a transfer of such a claim to
the extent it is tentatively determined to be valid. ((Neither)) The
board's tentative determination((, nor the director's acceptance of
such a tentative determination,)) does not constitute((s)) an
adjudication of the right under RCW 90.03.110 through 90.03.240 or
90.44.220, and such a determination does not preclude or prejudice a
subsequent challenge to the validity, priority, or quantity of the
right in a general adjudication under those sections.
(c) A board may establish a water right transfer information
exchange through which all or part of a water right may be listed for
sale or lease. The board may also accept and post notices in the
exchange from persons interested in acquiring or leasing water rights
from willing sellers.
(d) The director shall assign a representative of the department to
provide technical assistance to each board. If requested by the board,
the representative shall work with the board as it reviews applications
for formal acceptance, prepares draft records of decision, and
considers other technical or legal factors affecting the board's
development of ((a final record of)) its decision. A board may request
and accept additional technical assistance from the department. A
board may also request and accept assistance and support from the
county government or governments of the county or counties in which it
operates.
(2) The jurisdiction of a board shall not apply within the
boundaries of a federal Indian reservation or to lands held in trust
for an Indian band, tribe, or nation by the federal government.

Sec. 7 RCW 90.80.065 and 2001 c 237 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
A water conservancy board may be formally dissolved by the county
or jointly by the counties as applicable in which it operates by
adoption of a resolution of the county legislative authority or
authorities. Notice of the dissolution must be provided to the
director of the department. ((The department may petition the county
legislative authority of the county or the lead county for a board to
request that the board be dissolved for repeated statutory violations
or demonstrated inability to perform the functions for which the board
was created.))

Sec. 8 RCW 90.80.070 and 2004 c 10 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person proposing a transfer of a water right may elect to
file an application with a water conservancy board, if a board has been
established for the geographic area where the water is or would be
diverted, withdrawn, or used. If the person has already filed an
application with the department, the person may request that the
department convey the application to the conservancy board with
jurisdiction and the department must promptly forward the application.
A board is not required to process an application filed with the board.
If a board decides that it will not process an application, it must
return the application to the applicant and must inform the applicant
that the application may be filed with the department. An application
to the board for a transfer shall be made on a form provided by the
department. A board may require an applicant to submit within a
reasonable time additional information as may be required by the board
in order to review and act upon the application. At a minimum, the
application shall include information sufficient to establish to the
board's satisfaction that a right to the quantity of water being
transferred exists, and a description of any applicable limitations on
the right to use water, including the point of diversion or withdrawal,
place of use, source of supply, purpose of use, quantity of use
permitted, time of use, period of use, and the place of storage.
(2)(a) The applicant for any proposed water right transfer may
apply to a board for a ((record of)) decision on a transfer and the
board may render a decision on the application if the water proposed to
be transferred is currently diverted, withdrawn, or used within the
geographic area in which the board has jurisdiction((, or would be
diverted, withdrawn, or used within the geographic area in which the
board has jurisdiction if the transfer is approved)). However: A
board may approve a transfer that includes a change in the point of
diversion or withdrawal of water under a water right only if the
geographic area within the jurisdiction of the board includes both the
current and proposed point of diversion or withdrawal; and a board may
approve a transfer that includes a change in the place of use of the
water under a water right only if the geographic area within the
jurisdiction of the board includes both the current and proposed place
of use.
(b) In the case of a proposed water right transfer in which the
water is currently diverted or withdrawn or would be diverted or
withdrawn outside the geographic boundaries of the county or the water
resource inventory area where the use is proposed to be made, the board
shall hold a public hearing in the county of the diversion or
withdrawal or proposed diversion or withdrawal. The board shall
provide for prominent publication of notice of the hearing in a
newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the
hearing is to be held for the purpose of affording an opportunity for
interested persons to comment upon the application. If an application
is for a transfer of water out of the water resource inventory area
that is the source of the water, the board shall consult with the
department regarding the application.
(3) After an application for a transfer is filed with the board,
the board shall publish notice of the application and send notice to
state agencies in accordance with the requirements of RCW 90.03.280.
In addition, the board shall send notice of the application to any
Indian tribe with reservation lands that would be, but for RCW
90.80.055(2), within the area in which the board has jurisdiction. The
board shall also provide notice of the application to any Indian tribe
that has requested that it be notified of applications. Any person may
submit comments and other information to the board regarding the
application. The comments and information may be submitted in writing
or verbally at any public meeting of the board to discuss or decide on
the application. The comments must be considered by the board in
making its record of decision.
(4) If a majority of the board determines that the application is
complete, and that the transfer is in accordance with RCW 90.03.380,
90.03.390, or 90.44.100, the board must issue a ((record of)) decision
approving the transfer((, subject to review by the director)). In
making its ((record of)) decision, the board must consider among other
things whether the proposed transfer can be made without detriment or
injury to existing water rights, including rights established for
instream flows. The board must include in its ((record of)) decision
any conditions that are deemed necessary for the transfer to qualify
for approval under the applicable laws of the state. The basis for the
((record of)) decision of the board must be documented in a report of
examination. ((The board's proposed approval must clearly state that
the applicant is not permitted to proceed to effect the proposed
transfer until a final decision is made by the director.)) In making
its ((record of)) decision, the board must consider among other things
whether the proposed transfer can be made without detriment or injury
to existing water rights, including rights established for instream
flows.
(5) If a majority of the board determines that the application
cannot be approved under the applicable laws of the state of
Washington, the board must make a ((record of)) decision denying the
application together with its report of examination documenting its
((record of)) decision. ((The board's record of decision is subject to
review by the director under RCW 90.80.080.)) In such a case, however,
if a majority of the board determines that the application could be
approved under the applicable laws of the state if certain conditions
were added to the approval, the board may approve the application with
those conditions.
(6) When alternates appointed under the provisions of RCW
90.80.050(3) are serving as commissioners on a board, a majority vote
of the board must include at least one commissioner appointed under the
provisions of RCW 90.80.050(1).
(7) An alternate when serving as a commissioner in the review of an
application before the board shall:
(a) Review the written record before the board and any exhibits
provided for the review or provided at the hearing if a hearing was
held;
(b) Review any audio or video recordings made of the proceedings on
the application; and
(c) Conduct a site visit if a site visit by other commissioners
acting on the application has been previously conducted.
(8) An alternate serving as a commissioner shall be guided by the
conflict of interest standards applicable to all commissioners under
RCW 90.80.120. The board shall provide notice of an alternate sitting
as a commissioner to the applicant and other participants in
proceedings before the board in a timely manner to provide sufficient
time for any challenges for conflict of interest to be made prior to
the board's decision on the application.

Sec. 9 RCW 90.80.080 and 2001 c 237 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The board must provide a copy of its record of decision to
the applicant. The board shall submit its record of decision on the
transfer application to the department for review. The board shall
also submit its report of examination to the department summarizing
factual findings on which the board relied in reaching its record of
decision and a copy of the files and records upon which the board's
record of decision is based. The board shall also promptly transmit
notice by mail to any person who objected to the transfer or who
requested notice of the board's record of decision)) After rendering
its decision on an application for a transfer, the board must promptly
forward to the department for recordkeeping its decision, its report of
examination that summarizes the factual findings on which the board
relied in reaching its decision, and a copy of the files and records
upon which the board's decision is based. Upon the conclusion of its
business involving a water right transfer application, a board must
promptly send the original copies of all remaining records relating to
that application to the department for recordkeeping. A board may keep
a copy of the original documents.
(2) Upon receipt of a board's ((record of)) decision, the
department shall promptly post the text of the ((record of)) decision
transmittal form on the department's internet site. ((The director
shall review each record of decision made by a board for compliance
with applicable state water law.
(3) Any party to a transfer, third party who alleges his or her
water right will be impaired by the proposed transfer, or other person
may file a letter of concern or support with the department and the
department may consider the concern or support expressed in the letter.
Such letters must be received by the department within thirty days of
the department's receipt of the board's record of decision.
(4) The director shall review the record of decision of the board
and shall affirm, reverse, or modify the action of the board within
forty-five days of receipt. The forty-five day time period may be
extended for an additional thirty days by the director or at the
request of the board or applicant. If the director fails to act within
the prescribed time period, the board's record of decision becomes the
decision of the department and is appealable as provided by RCW
90.80.090. If the director acts within the prescribed time period, the
director's decision to affirm, modify, or reverse is appealable as
provided by RCW 90.80.090, and the director's decision to remand is
appealable as provided by RCW 90.80.120(2)(b).))

Sec. 10 RCW 90.80.090 and 2001 c 237 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The decision of ((the director to approve or deny an action to
create a board, or to approve, deny, or modify)) a board on an
application for a water right transfer ((either by action or inaction
is appealable in the same manner as other water right decisions made
pursuant to chapters 90.03 and 90.44 RCW)) is subject to review in
superior court. The decision is appealable in the manner provided by
chapter 34.05 RCW for appealing a decision of a state agency to
superior court except that the petition for review must be filed,
except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, in the superior
court of the county in which the point of diversion or withdrawal of
the right is located before the transfer.
(2) For decisions of a board on a transfer of a water right that is
the subject of a general adjudication of water rights that is being
litigated actively under chapter 90.03 or 90.44 RCW, the petition must
be filed with the superior court conducting the adjudication, to be
consolidated by the court with the general adjudication. A party to
the adjudication shall be a party to the appeal under this chapter only
if the party files or is served with a petition for review to the
extent required by chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 11 RCW 90.80.100 and 2001 c 237 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
Neither the county or counties, the department, a conservancy
board, or its employees, nor individual conservancy board commissioners
shall be subject to any cause of action or claim for damages arising
out of ((records of)) decisions on transfers made by a board under this
chapter.

Sec. 12 RCW 90.80.120 and 2004 c 10 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A commissioner of a water conservancy board shall not engage in
any act which is in conflict with the proper discharge of the official
duties of a commissioner. A commissioner is deemed to have a conflict
of interest if he or she:
(a) Has an ownership interest in a water right subject to an
application for approval before the board;
(b) Receives or has a financial interest in an application
submitted to the board or a project, development, or venture related to
the approval of the application; or
(c) Solicits, accepts, or seeks anything of economic value as a
gift, gratuity, or favor from any person, firm, or corporation involved
in the application.
(2) In the event of a recusal of an appointed commissioner, an
alternate may serve as a commissioner on a board and may act upon the
official board business for which the conflict of interest exists.
(3) ((The department shall return a record of decision to a
conservancy board without action where the department determines that
any member of a board has violated subsection (1) of this section.
(a))) If a person seeking to rely on this section to disqualify a
commissioner knows of the basis for disqualification before the time
the board issues a ((record of)) decision, the person must request the
board to have the commissioner recuse himself or herself from further
involvement in processing the application, or be barred from later
raising that challenge.
(((b) If the commissioner does not recuse himself or herself or if
the person becomes aware of the basis for disqualification after the
board issues a record of decision but within the time period under RCW
90.80.080(3) for filing objections with the department, the person must
raise the challenge with the department. If the department determines
that the commissioner should be disqualified under this section, the
director must remand the record of decision to the board for
reconsideration and resubmission of a record of decision. The
disqualified commissioner shall not participate in any further board
review of the application. The department's decision on whether to
remand a record of decision under this section may only be appealed at
the same time and in the same manner as an appeal of the department's
decision to affirm, modify, or reverse the record of decision after
remand.
(c))) If ((the)) a person becomes aware of the basis for
disqualification after the ((time for filing objections with the
department)) board renders its decision, the person may raise the
challenge in an appeal of the ((department's final)) board's decision
under RCW 90.80.090.

Sec. 13 RCW 90.80.135 and 2001 c 237 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A board is subject to the requirements of chapter 42.17 RCW.
Each board must establish and maintain records of its proceedings and
determinations. While in the possession of the board, all such records
must be made available for inspection and copies must be provided to
the public on request under the provisions of chapter 42.17 RCW.
(2) ((Upon the conclusion of its business involving a water right
transfer application, a board must promptly send the original copies of
all records relating to that application to the department for
recordkeeping. A board may keep a copy of the original documents.))
After the board's records regarding an application are transferred to
the department under RCW 90.80.080, the responsibility for making the
records available under chapter 42.17 RCW is transferred to the
department.

Sec. 14 RCW 90.80.150 and 2001 c 237 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall report biennially by December 31st of each
even-numbered year to the appropriate committees of the legislature on
the boards formed ((or sought to be formed)) under the authority of
this chapter, the transfer applications reviewed and other activities
conducted by the boards, and the funding of such boards. Conservancy
boards must provide information regarding their activities to the
department to assist the department in preparing the report.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 The provisions of this act regarding the
decisions of and the review of the decisions of water conservancy
boards on applications for water right transfers apply to decisions
that are rendered after the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 RCW 90.80.901 (Reports to the legislature)
and 2001 c 237 s 32 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---