BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.24.015 and 2001 c 334 s 6 and 2001 c 323 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The legislature finds that the involvement of persons with mental
illness, their family members, and advocates in designing,
implementing, and delivering mental health services reduces unnecessary
hospitalizations and incarceration and promotes the recovery and
employment of persons with mental illness. To improve the quality of
services available and promote the rehabilitation, recovery, and
reintegration of persons with mental illness, consumer and advocate-run
mental health services are an integral part of the community mental
health system and shall be supported.
It is the intent of the legislature to establish a community mental
health program ((which shall)) to help people experiencing mental
illness to retain a respected and productive position in the community.
This will be accomplished through programs which provide for:
(1) Access to mental health services for adults of the state who
are acutely mentally ill, chronically mentally ill, or seriously
disturbed and children of the state who are acutely mentally ill,
severely emotionally disturbed, or seriously disturbed, which services
recognize the special needs of underserved populations, including
minorities, children, the elderly, disabled, and low-income persons.
Access to mental health services shall not be limited by a person's
history of confinement in a state, federal, or local correctional
facility. It is also the purpose of this chapter to promote the early
identification of mentally ill children and to ensure that they receive
the mental health care and treatment which is appropriate to their
developmental level. This care should improve home, school, and
community functioning, maintain children in a safe and nurturing home
environment, and should enable treatment decisions to be made in
response to clinical needs in accordance with sound professional
judgment while also recognizing parents' rights to participate in
treatment decisions for their children;
(2) Accountability of efficient and effective services through
state of the art outcome and performance measures and statewide
standards for monitoring client and system outcomes, performance, and
reporting of client and system outcome information. These processes
shall be designed so as to maximize the use of available resources for
direct care of people with a mental illness;
(3) Minimum service delivery standards;
(4) Priorities for the use of available resources for the care of
the mentally ill consistent with the priorities defined in the statute;
(5) Coordination of services within the department, including those
divisions within the department that provide services to children,
between the department and the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, and among state mental hospitals, county authorities,
community mental health services, and other support services, which
shall to the maximum extent feasible also include the families of the
mentally ill, and other service providers; and
(6) Coordination of services aimed at reducing duplication in
service delivery and promoting complementary services among all
entities that provide mental health services to adults and children.
It is the policy of the state to encourage the provision of a full
range of treatment and rehabilitation services in the state for mental
disorders. The legislature intends to encourage the development of
county-based and county-managed mental health services with adequate
local flexibility to assure eligible people in need of care access to
the least-restrictive treatment alternative appropriate to their needs,
and the availability of treatment components to assure continuity of
care. To this end, counties are encouraged to enter into joint
operating agreements with other counties to form regional systems of
care which integrate planning, administration, and service delivery
duties assigned to counties under chapters 71.05 and 71.24 RCW to
consolidate administration, reduce administrative layering, and reduce
administrative costs.
It is further the intent of the legislature to integrate the
provision of services to provide continuity of care through all phases
of treatment. To this end the legislature intends to promote active
engagement with mentally ill persons and collaboration between families
and service providers.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.24.025 and 2001 c 323 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Acutely mentally ill" means a condition which is limited to a
short-term severe crisis episode of:
(a) A mental disorder as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in the case
of a child, as defined in RCW 71.34.020;
(b) Being gravely disabled as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in the
case of a child, a gravely disabled minor as defined in RCW 71.34.020;
or
(c) Presenting a likelihood of serious harm as defined in RCW
71.05.020 or, in the case of a child, as defined in RCW 71.34.020.
(2) "Advocate" means family members of consumers, members of
consumer controlled organizations, or members of family member
controlled organizations.
(3) "Available resources" means funds appropriated for the purpose
of providing community mental health programs under RCW 71.24.045,
federal funds, except those provided according to Title XIX of the
Social Security Act, and state funds appropriated under this chapter or
chapter 71.05 RCW by the legislature during any biennium for the
purpose of providing residential services, resource management
services, community support services, and other mental health services.
This does not include funds appropriated for the purpose of operating
and administering the state psychiatric hospitals, except as negotiated
according to RCW 71.24.300(1)(e).
(((3))) (4) "Child" means a person under the age of eighteen years.
(((4))) (5) "Chronically mentally ill adult" means an adult who has
a mental disorder and meets at least one of the following criteria:
(a) Has undergone two or more episodes of hospital care for a
mental disorder within the preceding two years; or
(b) Has experienced a continuous psychiatric hospitalization or
residential treatment exceeding six months' duration within the
preceding year; or
(c) Has been unable to engage in any substantial gainful activity
by reason of any mental disorder which has lasted for a continuous
period of not less than twelve months. "Substantial gainful activity"
shall be defined by the department by rule consistent with Public Law
92-603, as amended.
(((5))) (6) "Community mental health program" means all mental
health services, activities, or programs using available resources.
(((6))) (7) "Community mental health service delivery system" means
public or private agencies that provide services specifically to
persons with mental disorders as defined under RCW 71.05.020 and
receive funding from public sources.
(((7))) (8) "Community support services" means services authorized,
planned, and coordinated through resource management services
including, at a minimum, assessment, diagnosis, emergency crisis
intervention available twenty-four hours, seven days a week,
prescreening determinations for mentally ill persons being considered
for placement in nursing homes as required by federal law, screening
for patients being considered for admission to residential services,
diagnosis and treatment for acutely mentally ill and severely
emotionally disturbed children discovered under screening through the
federal Title XIX early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and
treatment program, investigation, legal, and other nonresidential
services under chapter 71.05 RCW, case management services, psychiatric
treatment including medication supervision, counseling, psychotherapy,
assuring transfer of relevant patient information between service
providers, and other services determined by regional support networks.
(((8))) (9) "Consumer" or "mental health consumer" means a person
who has applied for, is eligible for, is receiving, or has received
mental health services. For a child under the age of thirteen, or for
a child age thirteen or older whose parents or legal guardians are
involved in the treatment plan, the definition of consumer includes
parents or legal guardians.
(10) "Consumer-run" or "consumer or advocate-run" means entirely
consumer-directed and operated or directed and operated by a
partnership of consumers or advocates and nonconsumer professionals.
(11) "County authority" means the board of county commissioners,
county council, or county executive having authority to establish a
community mental health program, or two or more of the county
authorities specified in this subsection which have entered into an
agreement to provide a community mental health program.
(((9))) (12) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(((10))) (13) "Licensed service provider" means an entity licensed
according to this chapter or chapter 71.05 RCW or an entity deemed to
meet state minimum standards as a result of accreditation by a
recognized behavioral health accrediting body recognized and having a
current agreement with the department, that meets state minimum
standards or individuals licensed under chapter 18.57, 18.71, 18.83, or
18.79 RCW, as it applies to registered nurses and advanced registered
nurse practitioners.
(((11))) (14) "Mental health services" means all services provided
by regional support networks and other services provided by the state
for the mentally ill.
(((12))) (15) "Mentally ill persons" and "the mentally ill" mean
persons and conditions defined in subsections (1), (((4))) (5),
(((17))) (20), and (((18))) (21) of this section.
(((13))) (16) "Regional support network" means a county authority
or group of county authorities recognized by the secretary that enter
into joint operating agreements to contract with the secretary pursuant
to this chapter.
(((14))) (17) "Residential services" means a complete range of
residences and supports authorized by resource management services and
which may involve a facility, a distinct part thereof, or services
which support community living, for acutely mentally ill persons,
chronically mentally ill adults, severely emotionally disturbed
children, or seriously disturbed adults determined by the regional
support network to be at risk of becoming acutely or chronically
mentally ill. The services shall include at least evaluation and
treatment services as defined in chapter 71.05 RCW, acute crisis
respite care, long-term adaptive and rehabilitative care, and
supervised and supported living services, and shall also include any
residential services developed to service mentally ill persons in
nursing homes. Residential services for children in out-of-home
placements related to their mental disorder shall not include the costs
of food and shelter, except for children's long-term residential
facilities existing prior to January 1, 1991.
(((15))) (18) "Resource management services" mean the planning,
coordination, and authorization of residential services and community
support services administered pursuant to an individual service plan
for: (a) Acutely mentally ill adults and children; (b) chronically
mentally ill adults; (c) severely emotionally disturbed children; or
(d) seriously disturbed adults determined solely by a regional support
network to be at risk of becoming acutely or chronically mentally ill.
Such planning, coordination, and authorization shall include mental
health screening for children eligible under the federal Title XIX
early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment program.
Resource management services include seven day a week, twenty-four hour
a day availability of information regarding mentally ill adults' and
children's enrollment in services and their individual service plan to
county-designated mental health professionals, evaluation and treatment
facilities, and others as determined by the regional support network.
(((16))) (19) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health
services.
(((17))) (20) "Seriously disturbed person" means a person who:
(a) Is gravely disabled or presents a likelihood of serious harm to
himself or herself or others, or to the property of others, as a result
of a mental disorder as defined in chapter 71.05 RCW;
(b) Has been on conditional release status, or under a less
restrictive alternative order, at some time during the preceding two
years from an evaluation and treatment facility or a state mental
health hospital;
(c) Has a mental disorder which causes major impairment in several
areas of daily living;
(d) Exhibits suicidal preoccupation or attempts; or
(e) Is a child diagnosed by a mental health professional, as
defined in chapter 71.34 RCW, as experiencing a mental disorder which
is clearly interfering with the child's functioning in family or school
or with peers or is clearly interfering with the child's personality
development and learning.
(((18))) (21) "Severely emotionally disturbed child" means a child
who has been determined by the regional support network to be
experiencing a mental disorder as defined in chapter 71.34 RCW,
including those mental disorders that result in a behavioral or conduct
disorder, that is clearly interfering with the child's functioning in
family or school or with peers and who meets at least one of the
following criteria:
(a) Has undergone inpatient treatment or placement outside of the
home related to a mental disorder within the last two years;
(b) Has undergone involuntary treatment under chapter 71.34 RCW
within the last two years;
(c) Is currently served by at least one of the following child-serving systems: Juvenile justice, child-protection/welfare, special
education, or developmental disabilities;
(d) Is at risk of escalating maladjustment due to:
(i) Chronic family dysfunction involving a mentally ill or
inadequate caretaker;
(ii) Changes in custodial adult;
(iii) Going to, residing in, or returning from any placement
outside of the home, for example, psychiatric hospital, short-term
inpatient, residential treatment, group or foster home, or a
correctional facility;
(iv) Subject to repeated physical abuse or neglect;
(v) Drug or alcohol abuse; or
(vi) Homelessness.
(((19))) (22) "State minimum standards" means minimum requirements
established by rules adopted by the secretary and necessary to
implement this chapter for: (a) Delivery of mental health services;
(b) licensed service providers for the provision of mental health
services; (c) residential services; and (d) community support services
and resource management services.
(((20))) (23) "Tribal authority," for the purposes of this section
and RCW 71.24.300 only, means: The federally recognized Indian tribes
and the major Indian organizations recognized by the secretary insofar
as these organizations do not have a financial relationship with any
regional support network that would present a conflict of interest.

Sec. 3 RCW 71.24.300 and 2001 c 323 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
A county authority or a group of county authorities whose combined
population is no less than forty thousand may enter into a joint
operating agreement to form a regional support network. Upon the
request of a tribal authority or authorities within a regional support
network the joint operating agreement or the county authority shall
allow for the inclusion of the tribal authority to be represented as a
party to the regional support network. The roles and responsibilities
of the county and tribal authorities shall be determined by the terms
of that agreement including a determination of membership on the
governing board and advisory committees, the number of tribal
representatives to be party to the agreement, and the provisions of law
and shall assure the provision of culturally competent services to the
tribes served. The state mental health authority may not determine the
roles and responsibilities of county authorities as to each other under
regional support networks by rule, except to assure that all duties
required of regional support networks are assigned and that counties
and the regional support network do not duplicate functions and that a
single authority has final responsibility for all available resources
and performance under the regional support network's contract with the
secretary.
(1) Regional support networks shall submit an overall six-year
operating and capital plan, timeline, and budget and submit progress
reports and an updated two-year plan biennially thereafter, to assume
within available resources all of the following duties:
(a) Administer and provide for the availability of all resource
management services, residential services, and community support
services.
(b) Assume the powers and duties of county authorities within its
area as described in RCW 71.24.045 (1) through (7).
(c) Administer and provide for the availability of all
investigation, transportation, court-related, and other services
provided by the state or counties pursuant to chapter 71.05 RCW.
(d) Provide within the boundaries of each regional support network
evaluation and treatment services for at least eighty-five percent of
persons detained or committed for periods up to seventeen days
according to chapter 71.05 RCW. Regional support networks with
populations of less than one hundred fifty thousand may contract to
purchase evaluation and treatment services from other networks.
Insofar as the original intent of serving persons in the community is
maintained, the secretary is authorized to approve exceptions on a
case-by-case basis to the requirement to provide evaluation and
treatment services within the boundaries of each regional support
network. Such exceptions are limited to contracts with neighboring or
contiguous regions.
(e) Administer a portion of funds appropriated by the legislature
to house mentally ill persons in state institutions from counties
within the boundaries of any regional support network, with the
exception of persons currently confined at, or under the supervision
of, a state mental hospital pursuant to chapter 10.77 RCW, and provide
for the care of all persons needing evaluation and treatment services
for periods up to seventeen days according to chapter 71.05 RCW in
appropriate residential services, which may include state institutions.
The regional support networks shall reimburse the state for use of
state institutions at a rate equal to that assumed by the legislature
when appropriating funds for such care at state institutions during the
biennium when reimbursement occurs. The secretary shall submit a
report to the appropriate committees of the senate and house of
representatives on the efforts to implement this section by October 1,
2002. The duty of a state hospital to accept persons for evaluation
and treatment under chapter 71.05 RCW is limited by the
responsibilities assigned to regional support networks under this
section.
(f) Administer and provide for the availability of all other mental
health services, which shall include patient counseling, day treatment,
consultation, education services, employment services as defined in RCW
71.24.035, and mental health services to children as provided in this
chapter designed to achieve the outcomes specified in section 5 of this
act.
(g) Establish standards and procedures for reviewing individual
service plans and determining when that person may be discharged from
resource management services.
(2) Regional support networks shall assume all duties assigned to
county authorities by this chapter and chapter 71.05 RCW. The regional
support networks, or its designee, shall provide consumer or advocate-run services.
(a) The department shall not require a consumer or advocate-run
service to maintain licensure under this chapter if the service is
nonclinical. If a service is clinical, the service shall comply with
the requirements for licensed services in this chapter.
(b) Consumer or advocate-run services may include, but are not
limited to:
(i) Consumer and/or advocate-operated businesses;
(ii) Clubhouses, including but not limited to the Fountain House
model as certified by the International Center for Clubhouse
Development;
(iii) Crisis services;
(iv) Advocacy and referral services;
(v) Vocational and employment services;
(vi) Self-help and peer counseling and support groups;
(vii) Community presence in state hospitals; and
(viii) Mental health advance directive training.
(3) A regional support network may request that any state-owned
land, building, facility, or other capital asset which was ever
purchased, deeded, given, or placed in trust for the care of the
mentally ill and which is within the boundaries of a regional support
network be made available to support the operations of the regional
support network. State agencies managing such capital assets shall
give first priority to requests for their use pursuant to this chapter.
(4) Each regional support network shall appoint a mental health
advisory board which shall review and provide comments on plans and
policies developed under this chapter. The composition of the board
shall be broadly representative of the demographic character of the
region and the mentally ill persons served therein. Length of terms of
board members shall be determined by the regional support network.
(5) Regional support networks shall assume all duties specified in
their plans and joint operating agreements through biennial contractual
agreements with the secretary.
(6) Counties or groups of counties participating in a regional
support network are not subject to RCW 71.24.045(6).
(7) Regional support networks may receive technical assistance from
the housing trust fund and may identify and submit projects for housing
and housing support services to the housing trust fund established
under chapter 43.185 RCW. Projects identified or submitted under this
subsection must be fully integrated with the regional support network
six-year operating and capital plan, timeline, and budget required by
subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The sum of five million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium ending
June 30, 2007, from the general fund to the department of social and
health services for the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---