BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
The department, the Washington state patrol, and Clark College
shall work cooperatively to create and design a special Clark College
license plate. The special Clark College license plate may be used in
lieu of regular or personalized license plates for motor vehicles
required to display two motor vehicle license plates, excluding
vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW, upon terms and conditions
established by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
The Clark College license plate account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from the Clark College license plate fees, less
the administration and collection costs incurred by the department as
provided for under RCW 46.16.313 (12) and (13), must be deposited into
the account. Expenditures from the account should be used primarily
for student scholarships but may also be used for advertising and
promotional activities designed to increase the sale of the Clark
College license plate. All expenditures from this account must be
approved by the Clark College foundation scholarship committee. Moneys
in the account may only be spent after appropriation.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.16.313 and 2004 c 221 s 3, 2004 c 48 s 3, and 2004
c 35 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The department may establish a fee of no more than forty
dollars for each type of special license plates issued under RCW
46.16.301(1) (a), (b), or (c), as existing before amendment by section
5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997, in an amount calculated to offset the
cost of production of the special license plates and the administration
of this program. This fee is in addition to all other fees required to
register and license the vehicle for which the plates have been
requested. All such additional special license plate fees collected by
the department shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to
the motor vehicle fund.
(2) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a
collegiate license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty dollars.
The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars of
each fee collected under this subsection for administration and
collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the
funds to the appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in
RCW 28B.10.890.
(3) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a collegiate
license plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall
deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under
this subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by
it. The remaining proceeds shall be remitted to the custody of the
state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report. The state
treasurer shall credit the funds to the appropriate collegiate license
plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.
(4) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a
special baseball stadium license plate shall pay an initial fee of
forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed
twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds, minus the cost of plate production, shall be distributed to
a county for the purpose of paying the principal and interest payments
on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball stadium, as
defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.
(5) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a special
baseball stadium license plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The
department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee
collected under this subsection for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be distributed
to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and interest
payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball stadium,
as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.
(6) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 2005, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder of a
professional fire fighters and paramedics license plate shall pay an
initial fee of forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount
not to exceed twelve dollars of each fee collected under this
subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by it.
The remaining proceeds must be remitted to the custody of the state
treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report. Under RCW
46.16.755, the state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor
vehicle account until the department determines that the state has been
reimbursed for the cost of implementing the professional fire fighters
and paramedics license plates. Upon the determination by the
department that the state has been reimbursed, the treasurer shall
credit the proceeds to the Washington State Council of Fire Fighters
benevolent fund established under RCW 46.16.30902.
(7) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on January
1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of a professional fire
fighters and paramedics license plate shall, upon application, pay a
fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to
exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds must be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a
proper identifying detailed report. Under RCW 46.16.755, the state
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until
the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the
cost of implementing the professional fire fighters and paramedics
special license plate. Upon the determination by the department that
the state has been reimbursed, the treasurer shall credit the proceeds
to the Washington State Council of Fire Fighters benevolent fund
established under RCW 46.16.30902.
(8) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
November 1, 2004, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder of a
"Helping Kids Speak" license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. Pursuant to RCW 46.16.755, the state
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until
the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the
cost of implementing the "Helping Kids Speak" special license plate.
Upon the determination by the department that the state has been
reimbursed, the treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the "Helping
Kids Speak" account established under RCW 46.16.30904.
(9) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on November
1, 2005, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of a "Helping Kids Speak"
license plate shall, upon application, pay a fee of thirty dollars.
The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each
fee collected under this subsection for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be remitted to
the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed
report. Pursuant to RCW 46.16.755, the state treasurer shall credit
the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until the department
determines that the state has been reimbursed for the cost of
implementing the "Helping Kids Speak" special license plate. Upon the
determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the "Helping Kids Speak" account
established under RCW 46.16.30904.
(10) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 2005, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder of a "law
enforcement memorial" license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall
be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. Pursuant to RCW 46.16.755, the state
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until
the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the
cost of implementing the law enforcement memorial special license
plate. Upon the determination by the department that the state has
been reimbursed, the treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the law
enforcement memorial account established under RCW 46.16.30906.
(11) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on January
1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of a "law enforcement
memorial" license plate shall, upon application, pay a fee of thirty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall
be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. Pursuant to RCW 46.16.755, the state
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until
the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the
cost of implementing the law enforcement memorial special license
plate. Upon the determination by the department that the state has
been reimbursed, the treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the law
enforcement memorial account established under RCW 46.16.30906.
(12) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a special
Clark College license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty-five
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The department shall remit the
remaining proceeds to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the
funds to the Clark College license plate account under section 2 of
this act.
(13) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on January
1, 2007, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a special Clark
College license plate shall pay a fee of thirty-five dollars. The
department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee
collected under this subsection for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it. The department shall remit the remaining
proceeds to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the
funds to the Clark College license plate account under section 2 of
this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.16.290 and 2004 c 223 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In any case of a valid sale or transfer of the ownership of any
vehicle, the right to the certificates ((properly transferable
therewith, except as provided in RCW 46.16.280,)) and to the vehicle
license plates, except as provided in RCW 46.16.316, passes to the
purchaser or transferee. It is unlawful for the holder of such
certificates, except as provided in RCW 46.16.280, or vehicle license
plates, except as provided in RCW 46.16.316, to fail, neglect, or
refuse to endorse the certificates and deliver the vehicle license
plates to the purchaser or transferee.
(2)(a) If the sale or transfer is of a vehicle licensed with
current standard issue license plates, the vehicle license plates may
be retained and displayed upon a vehicle obtained in replacement of the
vehicle so sold or transferred. If a person applies for a transfer of
the plate or plates to another eligible vehicle, the plates must be
transferred to a vehicle requiring the same type of plate. A transfer
fee of ten dollars must be charged in addition to all other applicable
fees. The transfer fees must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund.
(b) If the sale or transfer is of a vehicle licensed by the state
or any county, city, town, school district, or other political
subdivision entitled to exemption as provided by law, or, if the
vehicle is licensed with personalized plates, amateur radio operator
plates, medal of honor plates, disabled person plates, disabled veteran
plates, prisoner of war plates, or other special license plates issued
under RCW 46.16.301 or 46.16.313 as now existing or as it existed
before amendment by section 5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997, the vehicle
license plates therefor ((shall)) may be transferred as provided in RCW
46.16.316, in which case they may be retained and ((may be)) displayed
upon a vehicle obtained in replacement of the vehicle so sold or
transferred.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.16.316 and 2004 c 223 s 4, 2004 c 221 s 5, 2004 c
48 s 5, and 2004 c 35 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
Except as provided in RCW 46.16.305:
(1) When a person who has been issued a special license plate or
plates: (a) Under RCW 46.16.30901, 46.16.30903, 46.16.30905, ((or))
46.16.301, or 46.16.313 as now existing or as it existed before
amendment by section 5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997, or under RCW
46.16.305(2) or 46.16.324; or (b) approved by the special license plate
review board under RCW 46.16.715 through 46.16.775 sells, trades, or
otherwise transfers or releases ownership of the vehicle upon which the
special license plate or plates have been displayed, he or she shall
immediately report the transfer of such plate or plates to an acquired
vehicle or vehicle eligible for such plates pursuant to departmental
rule, or he or she shall surrender such plates to the department
immediately if such surrender is required by departmental rule. If a
person applies for a transfer of the plate or plates to another
eligible vehicle, a transfer fee of ten dollars shall be charged in
addition to all other applicable fees. Such transfer fees shall be
deposited in the motor vehicle fund. Failure to surrender the plates
when required is a traffic infraction.
(2) If the special license plate or plates issued by the department
become lost, defaced, damaged, or destroyed, application for a
replacement special license plate or plates shall be made and fees paid
as provided by law for the replacement of regular license plates.

--- END ---