BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By July 1, 2008, a city or town that provides electric, natural
gas, water, or sewer services to retail customers must offer an
electronic payment option that its customers may use for payment of
bills for service provided through the utility. Additional fees or
costs charged to the customer may not exceed the actual cost of
providing an electronic payment option.
(2) The requirement under this section to provide an electronic
payment option by July 1, 2008, does not apply to a city or town that
provides electric, natural gas, water, or sewer services to less than
five thousand retail customer accounts.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "electronic payment option"
means an internet-based method of payment that allows a customer, at
the time of payment, to access an internet web page and transmit text
or data controlling the amount of the payment, the date of payment, and
the account from which the payment will be made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.67 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By July 1, 2008, a city or town that provides sewer services to
retail customers must offer an electronic payment option that its
customers may use for payment of bills for service provided through the
utility. Additional fees or costs charged to the customer may not
exceed the actual cost of providing an electronic payment option.
(2) The requirement under this section to provide an electronic
payment option by July 1, 2008, does not apply to a city or town that
provides sewer services to less than five thousand retail customer
accounts.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "electronic payment option"
means an internet-based method of payment that allows a customer, at
the time of payment, to access an internet web page and transmit text
or data controlling the amount of the payment, the date of payment, and
the account from which the payment will be made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35.92 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By July 1, 2008, a city or town that provides electric, natural
gas, water, or sewer services to retail customers must offer an
electronic payment option that its customers may use for payment of
bills for service provided through the utility. Additional fees or
costs charged to the customer may not exceed the actual cost of
providing an electronic payment option.
(2) The requirement under this section to provide an electronic
payment option by July 1, 2008, does not apply to a city or town that
provides electric, natural gas, water, or sewer services to less than
five thousand retail customer accounts.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "electronic payment option"
means an internet-based method of payment that allows a customer, at
the time of payment, to access an internet web page and transmit text
or data controlling the amount of the payment, the date of payment, and
the account from which the payment will be made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 36.94 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By July 1, 2008, a county that operates a sewerage or water
system must offer an electronic payment option that its retail
customers may use for payment of bills for service provided through the
utility. Additional fees or costs charged to the customer may not
exceed the actual cost of providing an electronic payment option.
(2) The requirement under this section to provide an electronic
payment option by July 1, 2008, does not apply to a county that
operates a sewerage or water system with less than five thousand retail
customer accounts.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "electronic payment option"
means an internet-based method of payment that allows a customer, at
the time of payment, to access an internet web page and transmit text
or data controlling the amount of the payment, the date of payment, and
the account from which the payment will be made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 54.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By July 1, 2008, a public utility district that provides
electric, water, or sewer services to retail customers must offer an
electronic payment option that its customers may use for payment of
bills for service provided through the district. Additional fees or
costs charged to the customer may not exceed the actual cost of
providing an electronic payment option.
(2) The requirement under this section to provide an electronic
payment option by July 1, 2008, does not apply to a public utility
district that provides electric, water, or sewer services to less than
five thousand retail customer accounts.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "electronic payment option"
means an internet-based method of payment that allows a customer, at
the time of payment, to access an internet web page and transmit text
or data controlling the amount of the payment, the date of payment, and
the account from which the payment will be made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 57.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By July 1, 2008, a district that operates a sewer or water
system must offer an electronic payment option that its retail
customers may use for payment of bills for service provided through the
district. Additional fees or costs charged to the customer may not
exceed the actual cost of providing an electronic payment option.
(2) The requirement under this section to provide an electronic
payment option by July 1, 2008, does not apply to a district that
operates a sewer or water system with less than five thousand retail
customer accounts.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "electronic payment option"
means an internet-based method of payment that allows a customer, at
the time of payment, to access an internet web page and transmit text
or data controlling the amount of the payment, the date of payment, and
the account from which the payment will be made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 80.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By July 1, 2008, a gas company, electrical company, or water
company that provides gas, electric, or water services to retail
customers must offer an electronic payment option that its retail
customers may use for payment of bills for service provided through the
company. Additional fees or costs charged to the customer may not
exceed the actual cost of providing an electronic payment option.
(2) The requirement under this section to provide an electronic
payment option by July 1, 2008, does not apply to a gas company,
electrical company, or water company that provides gas, electric, or
water services to less than five thousand retail customer accounts.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "electronic payment option"
means an internet-based method of payment that allows a customer, at
the time of payment, to access an internet web page and transmit text
or data controlling the amount of the payment, the date of payment, and
the account from which the payment will be made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By July 1, 2008, a telecommunications company that provides
telecommunications services to retail customers must offer an
electronic payment option that its retail customers may use for payment
of bills for service provided through the company. Additional fees or
costs charged to the customer may not exceed the actual cost of
providing an electronic payment option.
(2) The requirement under this section to provide an electronic
payment option by July 1, 2008, does not apply to a telecommunications
company that provides telecommunications services to less than five
thousand retail customer accounts.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "electronic payment option"
means an internet-based method of payment that allows a customer, at
the time of payment, to access an internet web page and transmit text
or data controlling the amount of the payment, the date of payment, and
the account from which the payment will be made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---