BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds it is in the public
interest to adopt this chapter to simplify the process of
interconnecting distributed generation facilities that will be used for
net metered customers. This chapter is intended to both identify a
class of distributed generators that, because of their selected point
of common coupling, can be interconnected with ease and expedition as
well as the standard procedures to be used for ordinary
interconnections by all utilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Applicant" means a person who has filed an application to
interconnect a customer-generator facility to an electric delivery
system.
(2) "Area network" means a type of electric delivery system served
by multiple transformers interconnected in an electrical network
circuit generally used in large metropolitan areas that are densely
populated to provide high reliability of service and having the same
definition as the term "secondary grid network" as defined in the
institute of electrical and electronic engineers standards.
(3) "Class I energy" means electrical energy generation. It may
include all types of generation.
(4) "Commission" means the utilities and transportation commission.
(5) "Consumer-owned utility" includes a municipal electric utility
formed under Title 35 RCW, a public utility district formed under Title
54 RCW, an irrigation district formed under chapter 87.03 RCW, a
cooperative formed under chapter 23.86 RCW, a mutual corporation or
association formed under chapter 24.06 RCW, a port district formed
under Title 53 RCW, or a water-sewer district formed under Title 57
RCW, that is engaged in the business of distributing electricity to one
or more retail electric customers in the state.
(6) "Customer-generator" means a residential or commercial customer
that generates electricity, typically on the customer's side of the
meter.
(7) "Customer-generator facility" means the equipment used by a
customer-generator to generate, manage, and monitor electricity. A
customer-generator facility typically includes an electric generator
and/or an equipment package.
(8) "Electric delivery system" means the infrastructure constructed
and maintained by an electric utility to deliver electric service to
end-users.
(9) "Electric utility" means a consumer-owned or investor-owned
utility.
(10) "Equipment package" means a group of components connecting an
electric generator with an electric delivery system, and includes all
interface equipment including switchgear, inverters, or other interface
devices. An equipment package may include an integrated generator or
electric source.
(11) "Fault current" means electrical current that flows through a
circuit and is produced by an electrical fault, such as to ground,
double-phase to ground, three-phase to ground, phase-to-phase, and
three-phase. A fault current is several times larger in magnitude than
the current that normally flows through a circuit.
(12) "Good utility practice" means any of the practices, methods,
and acts engaged in or approved by a significant portion of the
electric industry during the relevant time period, or any of the
practices, methods, and acts that, in the exercise of reasonable
judgment in light of the facts known at the time the decision was made,
could have been expected to accomplish the desired result at a
reasonable cost consistent with good business practices, reliability,
safety, and expedition. "Good utility practice" is not intended to be
limited to the optimum practice, method, or act to the exclusion of all
others, but rather to be acceptable practices, methods, or acts
generally accepted in the region.
(13) "Group" means the interconnection technical advisory work
group established under section 6 of this act.
(14) "Interconnection agreement" means an agreement between a
customer-generator and an electric utility, that governs the connection
of the customer-generator facility to the electric delivery system, as
well as the ongoing operation of the customer-generator facility after
it is connected to the system.
(15) "Investor-owned utility" means a corporation owned by
investors that meets the definition of corporation in RCW 80.04.010 and
is engaged in distributing electricity to more than one retail electric
customer in the state.
(16) "Minor system modifications" include activities such as
changing the fuse in a fuse holder cut-out, changing the settings on a
circuit recloser, and other activities that usually entail less than
four hours of work and one thousand dollars in materials.
(17) "Point of common coupling" means the point in the
interconnection of a customer-generator facility with an electric
delivery system at which the harmonic limits are applied.
(18) "Spot network" means a type of electric delivery system that
uses two or more intertied transformers to supply an electrical network
circuit. A spot network is generally used to supply power to a single
customer or a small group of customers.

Sec. 3 RCW 80.60.010 and 2000 c 158 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.
(1) "Commission" means the utilities and transportation commission.
(2) "Customer-generator" means a user of a net metering system.
(3) "Electrical company" means a company owned by investors that
meets the definition of RCW 80.04.010.
(4) "Electric cooperative" means a cooperative or association
organized under chapter 23.86 or 24.06 RCW.
(5) "Electric utility" means any electrical company, public utility
district, irrigation district, port district, electric cooperative, or
municipal electric utility that is engaged in the business of
distributing electricity to retail electric customers in the state.
(6) "Irrigation district" means an irrigation district under
chapter 87.03 RCW.
(7) "Municipal electric utility" means a city or town that owns or
operates an electric utility authorized by chapter 35.92 RCW.
(8) "Net metering" means measuring the difference between the
electricity supplied by an electric utility and the electricity
generated by a customer-generator that is fed back to the electric
utility over the applicable billing period.
(9) "Net metering system" means a fuel cell or a facility for the
production of electrical energy that:
(a) Uses as its fuel either solar, wind, or hydropower;
(b) Has a generating capacity of not more than ((twenty-five)) one
hundred kilowatts;
(c) Is located on the customer-generator's premises;
(d) Operates in parallel with the electric utility's transmission
and distribution facilities; and
(e) Is intended primarily to offset part or all of the customer-generator's requirements for electricity.
(10) "Port district" means a port district within which an
industrial development district has been established as authorized by
Title 53 RCW.
(11) "Public utility district" means a district authorized by
chapter 54.04 RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 80.60.020 and 2000 c 158 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
An electric utility:
(1) Shall offer to make net metering available to eligible
customers-generators on a first-come, first-served basis until the
cumulative generating capacity of net metering systems equals ((0.1))
one percent of the utility's peak demand during 1996, of which not less
than 0.05 percent shall be attributable to net metering systems that
use as its fuel either solar, wind, or hydropower;
(2) Shall allow net metering systems to be interconnected using a
standard kilowatt-hour meter capable of registering the flow of
electricity in two directions, unless the commission, in the case of an
electrical company, or the appropriate governing body, in the case of
other electric utilities, determines, after appropriate notice and
opportunity for comment:
(a) That the use of additional metering equipment to monitor the
flow of electricity in each direction is necessary and appropriate for
the interconnection of net metering systems, after taking into account
the benefits and costs of purchasing and installing additional metering
equipment; and
(b) How the cost of purchasing and installing an additional meter
is to be allocated between the customer-generator and the utility;
(3) Shall charge the customer-generator a minimum monthly fee that
is the same as other customers of the electric utility in the same rate
class, but shall not charge the customer-generator any additional
standby, capacity, interconnection, or other fee or charge unless the
commission, in the case of an electrical company, or the appropriate
governing body, in the case of other electric utilities, determines,
after appropriate notice and opportunity for comment that:
(a) The electric utility will incur direct costs associated with
interconnecting or administering net metering systems that exceed any
offsetting benefits associated with these systems; and
(b) Public policy is best served by imposing these costs on the
customer-generator rather than allocating these costs among the
utility's entire customer base.

Sec. 5 RCW 80.60.030 and 1998 c 318 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Consistent with the other provisions of this chapter, the net
energy measurement must be calculated in the following manner:
(1) The electric utility shall measure the net electricity produced
or consumed during the billing period, in accordance with normal
metering practices.
(2) If the electricity supplied by the electric utility exceeds the
electricity generated by the customer-generator and fed back to the
electric utility during the billing period, the customer-generator
shall be billed for the net electricity supplied by the electric
utility, in accordance with normal metering practices.
(3) If electricity generated by the customer-generator exceeds the
electricity supplied by the electric utility, the customer-generator:
(a) Shall be billed for the appropriate customer charges for that
billing period, in accordance with RCW 80.60.020; and
(b) Shall be credited for the excess kilowatt-hours generated
during the billing period, with this kilowatt-hour credit appearing on
the bill for the following billing period.
((At the beginning)) On April 30th of each calendar year, any
remaining unused kilowatt-hour credit accumulated during the previous
year shall be granted to the electric utility, without any compensation
to the customer-generator.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) There is hereby created the
interconnection technical advisory group.
(2) Membership of the group shall consist of one representative
from each of the investor-owned utilities in the state, one
representative from a consumer-owned utility in the state, one
representative from an electric cooperative in the state, and one
representative from a municipal utility in the state. The group shall
elect a chair from among its members.
(3) Members of the group shall serve without compensation.
(4) Beginning on the effective date of this act, the group shall
meet to establish majority agreement on standard technical requirements
for interconnection at each level established under section 8 of this
act.
(5) By January 1, 2006, the group shall submit the technical
standards to the commission, to the governing body of each consumer-owned utility, and to the appropriate committees of the legislature.
(6) The commission and the governing body of each consumer-owned
utility shall adopt the technical standards. If the governing body of
each consumer-owned utility does not adopt the technical standards
within sixty days of receiving the technical standards from the group,
the members of the governing body are each subject to a penalty in the
amount of one hundred dollars per day until the governing body adopts
the standards. After January 1, 2006, the group shall continue to meet
every July 15th to update agreement on standard technical requirements
for interconnection at each level established under section 8 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If the group does not, by October 1, 2006,
establish agreement on standard technical requirements for
interconnection at each level established under section 8 of this act,
the commission may adopt rules by January 1, 2007, to establish
standard technical requirements for interconnection at each level
established under section 8 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 There are four interconnection review paths
for interconnection of customer-sited generation.
(1) Simplified. This is for facilities certified under section 9
of this act with a power rating of ten kilowatts or less, where the
primary distribution line configuration is single-phase and for
facilities certified under section 9 of this act with a power rating of
one hundred kilowatts or less, where the primary distribution line
configuration is three-phase.
(2) Expedited. This is for facilities certified under section 9 of
this act that have a power rating between ten kilowatts and one hundred
kilowatts where the primary distribution line configuration is single-phase and for facilities certified under section 9 of this act that
have a power rating between one hundred kilowatts and three hundred
kilowatts where the primary distribution line configuration is three-phase.
(3) Intermediate. This is for facilities certified under section
9 of this act that have a power rating between three hundred kilowatts
and one megawatt where the primary distribution line configuration is
three-phase.
(4) Standard. This is for all generating facilities not qualifying
for simplified, expedited, or intermediate interconnection that have a
power rating of ten megawatts or less.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) To qualify for simplified, expedited, or
intermediate interconnection procedures, generators no larger than one
megawatt must be certified under subsection (2) of this section to
comply with the following codes and standards as applicable:
(a) The institute of electrical and electronic engineers' 1547
standard for interconnecting distributed resources with electric power
systems or 929 standard for inverters less than ten kilowatts in size;
and
(b) UL 1741 inverters, converters, and controllers for use in
independent power systems.
(2) An equipment package is certified for interconnected operation
if it has been submitted by a manufacturer, tested and listed by a
nationally recognized testing and certification laboratory for
continuous interactive operation with a utility grid in compliance with
the applicable codes and standards listed in subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) If the equipment package has been tested and listed as an
integrated package, which includes a generator or other electric
source, it shall not require further design review, testing, or
additional equipment to meet the certification requirements of this
interconnection procedure.
(4)(a) If the equipment package includes only the interface
components such as switchgear, inverters, or other interface devices,
then an interconnection applicant must show that the generator or other
electric source being used with the equipment package is compatible
with the equipment package and consistent with the testing and listing
specified for the package.
(b) If the generator or electric source combined with the equipment
package is consistent with the testing and listing performed by the
nationally recognized testing and certification laboratory, no further
design review, testing, or additional equipment is required to meet the
certification requirements of this interconnection procedure. A
certified equipment package does not include equipment provided by the
utility.
(5) To qualify for simplified, expedited, or intermediate
interconnection, the aggregated generation, including the proposed
generator, will not:
(a) Exceed ten percent of the total circuit annual peak load;
(b) Contribute more than ten percent to the distribution circuit's
maximum fault current at the point on the high voltage primary level
nearest the proposed point of common coupling; and
(c) Compromise the operation of system safety protective devices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Each electric utility shall have a
simplified interconnection procedure for facilities certified under
section 9 of this act that have a power rating of ten kilowatts or
less, where the primary distribution line configuration is single-phase
and for facilities certified under section 9 of this act with a power
rating of one hundred kilowatts or less, where the primary distribution
line configuration is three-phase.
(2) The simplified procedure shall require the following steps:
(a) The customer-generator submits an application filled out
properly and completely;
(b) The electric utility shall acknowledge to the customer-generator receipt of the application within three business days of
receipt of the application;
(c) The electric utility evaluates the application for completeness
and notifies the customer-generator within three business days of
acknowledging receipt of the application that the application is or is
not complete. If incomplete, the application is rejected and returned
to the customer with a list of items needed to make it complete;
(d) If the proposed interconnection meets technical requirements
for simplified interconnection established by the group under section
6 of this act or by the commission under section 7 of this act, within
three business days of notifying the customer-generator that the
application is complete, the electric utility will execute and send a
simplified interconnection agreement to the customer-generator;
(e) The customer-generator shall return the signed agreement within
three business days of receiving the agreement from the electric
utility;
(f) Within sixty business days after returning the signed agreement
to the electric utility, the customer-generator shall install the
approved generating facility and notify the electric utility that the
installation is complete;
(g) Within ten business days of receiving notice of completion of
installation, the electric utility may inspect a generating facility
for compliance with the technical standards established by the group
under section 6 of this act or the commission under section 7 of this
act and may arrange for a witness test;
(h) If the inspection and test are satisfactory, within three
business days of completing the inspection, the electric utility will
notify the customer-generator in writing that interconnection is
allowed and approved;
(i) If the inspection and test are not satisfactory, within three
business days of completing the inspection and test, the electric
utility will notify the customer and the customer-generator shall
correct the technical requirements within sixty business days; and
(j) Customer-generators who do not receive any notice from the
electric utility within fifteen business days of the inspection and
test are deemed approved for interconnection.
(3) The simplified interconnection is provided at a total cost to
the customer-generator not to exceed twenty-five dollars.
(4) Additional protection equipment not included with the certified
generator or interconnection equipment package may be added at the
electric utility's discretion if the performance of the system is not
negatively impacted in any way and the customer-generator is not
charged for equipment in addition to that which is included in the
certified equipment package.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) Each electric utility shall have an
expedited interconnection procedure for facilities certified under
section 9 of this act that have a power rating between ten kilowatts
and one hundred kilowatts where the primary distribution line
configuration is single-phase and for facilities certified under
section 9 of this act that have a power rating between one hundred
kilowatts and three hundred kilowatts where the primary distribution
line configuration is three-phase.
(2) The expedited procedure shall require the following steps:
(a) To assist customers in the interconnection process, the
electric utility will designate an employee or office from which basic
application information can be obtained through an informal process;
(b) Within three business days of a request for an application, the
electric utility will provide the applicant with all relevant forms,
documents, and technical requirements for filing a complete application
for interconnection;
(c) Upon the applicant's request, the electric utility will meet
with the applicant before submission of an application for expedited
interconnection;
(d) The applicant shall submit an application filled out properly
and completely to the electric utility and may, at the same time,
submit an interconnection agreement executed by the applicant;
(e) Within three business days of receipt of the application, the
electric utility shall acknowledge to the applicant receipt of the
application;
(f) The electric utility will notify the applicant within ten
business days of its receipt of the application whether the application
is complete or incomplete. If the application is incomplete, the
electric utility will at the same time provide the applicant with a
written list detailing all information that must be provided to
complete the application;
(g) An applicant will have ten business days to submit the missing
information following receipt of the notice. If the applicant does not
submit the listed information to the electric utility within ten
business days, the application shall be deemed withdrawn;
(h) An application will be complete upon the applicant's submission
of the information identified in the electric utility's written list.
The electric utility shall acknowledge to the customer-generator
receipt of the application within three business days of receiving the
information identified in the electric utility's written list;
(i) Within ten business days after the electric utility notifies
the applicant it has received a complete application, the electric
utility shall perform an initial review of the proposed
interconnection. Initial review shall include the following:
(i) Review using the technical standards established by the group
under section 6 of this act or by the commission under section 7 of
this act;
(ii) Notice to the applicant of the results, including copies of
the analysis and data underlying the electric utility's determinations;
and
(iii) Notice to the applicant of the results of any additional
studies or tests the electric utility deems necessary to evaluate the
proposed interconnection, conducted at the electric utility's own
expense;
(j) If the initial review determines that the proposed
interconnection meets the technical requirements for interconnection
established by the group under section 6 of this act or by the
commission under section 7 of this act, the interconnection application
will be approved and the electric utility will provide the applicant
with an executable interconnection agreement within five business days
after the determination;
(k) If the initial review determines that the proposed
interconnection does not meet the technical requirements for
interconnection established by the group under section 6 of this act or
by the commission under section 7 of this act, but the electric utility
determines through the initial review that the small generator may
nevertheless be interconnected consistent with safety, reliability, and
power quality standards, with or without minor system modifications,
the electric utility will provide the applicant with an executable
interconnection agreement within five business days after the
determination and the generator is responsible for the cost of any
minor system modifications required;
(l) If the initial review determines that the proposed
interconnection does not meet the technical requirements for
interconnection established by the group under section 6 of this act or
by the commission under section 7 of this act, and the electric utility
does not or cannot determine from the initial review that the generator
may nevertheless be interconnected consistent with safety, reliability,
and power quality standards, then the electric utility shall:
(i) Offer to perform an additional review if the electric utility
concludes that an additional review might determine that the proposed
interconnection could qualify for interconnection pursuant to the
expedited technical requirements; and
(ii) Provide a nonbinding, but good faith estimate of the costs of
the additional review when it notifies the applicant that its proposed
interconnection is not approved under initial review;
(m) Within three business days of receiving an executable
interconnection agreement from the electric utility, the applicant
shall return the signed interconnection agreement to the electric
utility;
(n) Within one hundred twenty business days after returning the
signed agreement to the electric utility, the customer shall install
the approved generating facility and notify the electric utility in
writing that the installation is complete;
(o) Within ten business days of receiving written notice of
completion of installation, the electric utility may inspect a
generating facility for compliance with the technical standards
established by the group under section 6 of this act or by the
commission under section 7 of this act and may arrange for a witness
test;
(p) If the inspection and test are satisfactory, within three
business days of completing the inspection, the electric utility will
notify the customer in writing that interconnection is allowed and
approved; and
(q) If the inspection and test are not satisfactory, within three
business days of completing the inspection and test, the electric
utility will notify the customer and, within sixty business days, the
customer-generator shall correct the installation as required under the
technical requirements established by the group under section 6 of this
act or by the commission under section 7 of this act.
(3) Fees for application and processing may be charged consistent
with the following:
(a) An application and processing fee may be imposed on customer-generators proposing interconnection of generators under expedited
interconnection procedures if the total of all fees to complete the
interconnection does not exceed fifty dollars plus one dollar per
kilowatt of the capacity of the proposed generator;
(b) Additional fees may only be charged to customer-generators if
their generator interconnection requires minor system modifications
under subsection (2)(k) of this section or additional review under
subsection (2)(l) of this section; and
(c) Hourly engineering fees for additional review may not exceed
one hundred dollars per hour.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) Each electric utility shall have an
intermediate interconnection procedure for facilities certified under
section 9 of this act that have a power rating between three hundred
kilowatts and one megawatt where the primary distribution line
configuration is three-phase.
(2) The intermediate procedure shall consist of the following
steps:
(a) To assist applicants in the interconnection process, the
electric utility will designate an employee or office from which basic
information on the application can be obtained through an informal
process;
(b) Within three business days of a request for an application, the
electric utility will provide the applicant with all relevant forms,
documents, and technical requirements for filing a complete application
for interconnection;
(c) Upon the applicant's request, the electric utility will meet
with the applicant before submission of an application for
interconnection;
(d) The applicant shall submit an application filled out properly
and completely for expedited interconnection to the electric utility
and may, at the same time, submit an interconnection agreement executed
by the applicant;
(e) Within three business days of receipt of the application, the
electric utility shall acknowledge to the applicant receipt of the
application;
(f) Within ten business days of receiving the application, the
electric utility will notify the applicant of its receipt of the
application and whether it is complete or incomplete. If the
application is incomplete, the electric utility will at the same time
provide the customer-generator a written list detailing all information
that must be provided to complete the application;
(g) The applicant will have ten business days to submit the missing
information following receipt of the notice. If the applicant does not
submit the listed information to the electric utility within the ten
business days, the application shall be deemed withdrawn;
(h) An application will be complete upon the applicant's submission
of the information identified in the electric utility's written list.
The electric utility shall acknowledge to the applicant receipt of the
application within three business days of receiving the information
identified in the electric utility's written list;
(i) Within ten business days after the electric utility notifies
the applicant it received a complete application, the electric utility
shall perform an initial review of the proposed interconnection.
Initial review shall include the following:
(i) Review using the technical requirements established by the
group under section 6 of this act or by the commission under section 7
of this act;
(ii) Notice to the applicant of the results, including copies of
the analysis and data underlying the electric utility's determinations;
and
(iii) Any additional studies or tests the electric utility deems
necessary to evaluate the proposed interconnection, conducted at the
electric utility's own expense;
(j) If the initial review determines that the proposed
interconnection meets the technical requirements for interconnection
established by the group under section 6 of this act or by the
commission under section 7 of this act, the interconnection application
will be approved and the electric utility will provide the applicant an
executable interconnection agreement within five business days after
the determination;
(k) If the initial review determines that the proposed
interconnection does not meet the technical requirements for
interconnection established by the group under section 6 of this act or
by the commission under section 7 of this act, but the electric utility
determines through the initial review that the small generator may
nevertheless be interconnected consistent with safety, reliability, and
power quality standards, with or without minor system modifications,
the electric utility will provide the applicant an executable
interconnection agreement within five business days after the
determination and the generator is responsible for the cost of any
minor system modifications required;
(l) If the initial review determines that the proposed
interconnection does not meet the technical requirements for
interconnection established by the group under section 6 of this act or
by the commission under section 7 of this act, and the electric utility
does not or cannot determine from the initial review that the generator
may nevertheless be interconnected consistent with safety, reliability,
and power quality standards, then the electric utility shall:
(i) Offer to perform an additional review if the electric utility
concludes that an additional review might determine that the generator
could qualify for interconnection pursuant to the expedited procedures;
and
(ii) Provide a nonbinding, but good faith estimate of the costs of
the additional review when it notifies the customer its proposed
interconnection does not meet technical requirements for
interconnection;
(m) Within three business days of receiving an executable
interconnection agreement from the electric utility, the applicant
shall return the signed agreement to the electric utility;
(n) Within one hundred twenty business days after returning the
signed agreement, the customer-generator shall install the approved
generating facility and notify the electric utility that the
installation is complete;
(o) Within ten business days of receiving notice of completion of
installation, the electric utility may inspect a generating facility
for compliance with the technical requirements established by the group
under section 6 of this act or by the commission under section 7 of
this act and may arrange for a witness test;
(p) If the inspection is satisfactory, within three business days
of completing the inspection, the electric utility will notify the
customer in writing that interconnection is allowed and approved; and
(q) If the inspection and test is not satisfactory, within three
business days of completing the inspection, the electric utility will
notify the customer-generator and the customer-generator shall correct
the installation as required under the technical requirements
established by the group under section 6 of this act or by the
commission under section 7 of this act.
(3) Fees for application and processing may be charged consistent
with the following:
(a) An application and processing fee may be imposed on customer-generators proposing interconnection of generators under expedited
interconnection procedures if the total of all fees to complete the
interconnection does not exceed fifty dollars plus one dollar per
kilowatt of the capacity of the proposed generator;
(b) Additional fees may only be charged to customer-generators if
their generator interconnection requires minor system modifications
under subsection (2)(k) of this section or additional review under
subsection (2)(l) of this section;
(c) Costs for minor system modifications or additional review will
be based on quotations for services from the electric utility; and
(d) Hourly engineering fees for additional review may not exceed
one hundred dollars per hour.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Each electric utility shall have a standard
interconnection procedure available for generators not exceeding ten
megawatts in capacity that do not qualify for simplified, expedited, or
intermediate interconnection procedures, which shall consist of the
following:
(1) The applicant submits an application filled out properly and
completely for standard interconnection, or an applicant's
interconnection application is transferred from simplified, expedited,
or intermediate interconnection procedures for failure to meet all of
the requirements of those procedures;
(2) The electric utility shall acknowledge receipt of the
application or the transfer from simplified, expedited, or intermediate
interconnection procedures within three business days;
(3) The electric utility will notify the applicant within the ten
business days of receipt of the application whether the application is
complete or incomplete. If the application is incomplete, the electric
utility will at the same time provide the applicant a written list
detailing all information that must be provided to complete the
application;
(4) The applicant will have ten business days to submit the listed
information following receipt of notice from the electric utility that
the application is incomplete. If the applicant does not submit the
listed information to the electric utility within the ten business
days, the application shall be deemed withdrawn;
(5) Within twenty business days of notifying the customer-generator
that the application is complete, the electric utility will conduct an
initial review. Initial review shall include:
(a) Review using the requirements established by the group under
section 6 of this act or by the commission under section 7 of this act;
(b) A scoping meeting or discussion with the customer-generator to
review the application; and
(c) Review of information such as the available fault current at
the proposed location, the existing peak loading on the lines in the
general vicinity of the proposed generator, and the configuration of
the distribution lines at the proposed point of interconnection;
(6) At the applicant's request, the electric utility will undertake
a feasibility study that includes the following:
(a) A preliminary review of the potential impacts on the
distribution system that will result from the proposed interconnection;
(b) A preliminary review to determine transmission impacts; and
(c) A preliminarily review of short circuit currents including
contribution from the proposed generator as well as coordination of and
potential overloading of distribution circuit protection devices;
(7) After completing the feasibility study, the electric utility
shall provide an impact study agreement, including a cost estimate for
an impact study, consistent with the following:
(a) Where the proposed interconnection may affect electric
transmission or distribution systems other than that of the electric
utility where the interconnection is proposed, the electric utility
shall coordinate, but not be responsible for the timing of any studies
required to determine the impact of the interconnection request on
other potentially affected electric systems. The customer will be
responsible to any other affected systems for all costs of any
additional studies incurred by any other affected system to evaluate
the impact of the proposed generator interconnection;
(b) For generators greater than two megawatts, the impact study may
require analysis of power flows and other impacts on the transmission
system if the utility has a reasonable belief that the interconnection
of the generator will create power flows that reach the transmission
system;
(c) Transmission system impact studies will be governed by separate
procedures that may include submission of an application into a
transmission interconnection queue; and
(d) Each electric utility will identify the circumstances under
which generators larger than two megawatts must submit their
application into a transmission interconnection queue;
(8) The elements of an impact study should include:
(a) Load flow study;
(b) Short-circuit study;
(c) Circuit protection and coordination study;
(d) Impact on system operation;
(e) Stability study and the conditions that would justify including
this element in the impact study; and
(f) Voltage collapse study and the conditions that would justify
including this element in the impact study;
(9) Once the applicant executes the impact study agreement, returns
it to the electric utility, and pays pursuant to the good faith
estimate contained in the agreement, the electric utility will conduct
the impact study;
(10) An electric utility that charges a fee for an impact study
shall provide the applicant with a bill consistent with the following:
(a) The bill shall include a clear explanation of all charges; and
(b) The electric utility shall provide to the applicant, before the
start of the impact study, a good faith estimate of the number of hours
that will be needed to complete the interconnection study, and an
estimate of the total interconnection study fee;
(11) For generators with equipment that is certified pursuant to
section 9 of this act, no review of the generator's protection
equipment is required and an electric utility may review a certified
generator's protection scheme, but it cannot charge for such review;
(12) If the electric utility determines, in accordance with good
utility practices, that any electric utility electric system
modifications required to accommodate the proposed interconnection are
not substantial, the impact study will identify the scope and cost of
the modifications as defined in the study results;
(13) If the electric utility determines, in accordance with good
utility practices, that the system modifications to the electric
utility's electric system are substantial, the results of the impact
study will produce an estimate for the modification costs. The
detailed costs of, and the electric power supplier's modifications
necessary to interconnect the customer's proposed generator will be
identified in a facilities study to be completed by the electric
utility;
(14) If a facilities study is necessary, the electric utility shall
submit a facilities study agreement, with a good faith estimate of the
cost of completing the facilities study to be submitted to the
customer-generator;
(15) Once the applicant executes the facilities study agreement and
pays pursuant to the terms thereof, the electric utility will conduct
the facilities study;
(16) Within three business days of completion of the impact and, if
necessary, the facilities study, the electric utility shall send the
applicant an executable interconnection agreement including a quote for
any required electric utility system modifications;
(17) Within three business days of receiving the interconnection
agreement, the applicant shall return the signed interconnection
agreement to the electric utility;
(18) Within one hundred twenty business days, the customer shall
complete installation of its generator and send notice of completion to
the electric utility and the electric utility shall complete any
electric utility system modifications;
(19) Within ten business days of receiving notice that installation
is complete, the electric utility shall inspect the completed generator
installation and attend any required commissioning tests;
(20) Provided any required commissioning tests are satisfactory,
within five business days of completing the tests, the electric utility
shall notify the customer in writing that interconnection is approved;
and
(21) Fees for application and processing may be charged consistent
with the following:
(a) Fees for standard interconnection review shall include an
application fee not to exceed one hundred dollars plus two dollars per
kilowatt capacity, as well as charges for actual time spent on the
interconnection study;
(b) Costs for the engineering review may not exceed one hundred
dollars per hour; and
(c) Costs for the electric utility's facilities necessary to
accommodate the customer's generator interconnection will be the
responsibility of the customer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 (1) Damages in the amount of ten dollars
per kilowatt capacity of the customer-generator's generating facility
applies to an electric utility's failure to comply with procedures
established under this act.
(2) A customer-generator may bring a civil action in the district
court to recover damages, except for damages which exceed the amount
specified in RCW 3.66.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 (1) Once an interconnection has been
approved under this chapter, the electric utility shall not require a
customer-generator to test its facility except for the following:
(a) An annual test in which the customer-generator's facility is
disconnected from the electric utility's equipment to ensure that the
generator stops delivering power to the grid; and
(b) Any manufacturer-recommended testing.
(2) An electric utility may inspect a customer-generator's facility
both before and after interconnection approval is granted, at
reasonable hours and with reasonable advance notice to the customer-generator.
(3) If the electric utility discovers the customer-generator's
facility is not in compliance with technical requirements established
by the group under section 6 of this act or by the commission under
section 7 of this act and the noncompliance adversely affects the
safety or reliability of the electric system, the electric utility may
require disconnection of the customer-generator's facility until it
complies with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Each customer-generator approved for
interconnection shall affix to their electric revenue meter a warning
sign that notifies utility personnel of the existence of customer sited
parallel generation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A customer-generator approved for
interconnection shall, at its own expense, maintain in force general
liability insurance without any exclusion for liabilities related to
the interconnection. The amount of such insurance shall be sufficient
to insure against all reasonably foreseeable direct liabilities given
the size and nature of the generating equipment being interconnected,
the interconnection itself, and the characteristics of the system to
which the interconnection is made. A customer-generator shall obtain
additional insurance if necessary as a function of owning and operating
a generating facility. An electric utility shall not be liable
directly or indirectly for permitting or continuing to allow an
attachment of a net metering system, or for the acts or omissions of
the customer-generator that cause loss or injury, including death, to
any third party.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 (1) The commission or the governing body of
a consumer-owned utility may from time to time designate a technical
master for the resolution of interconnection disputes. Parties shall
use the technical master to resolve disputes related to interconnection
and such resolution is binding on the parties.
(2) The commission or the governing body of a consumer-owned
utility may designate a department of energy national laboratory;
college or university; or an approved federal energy regulatory
commission regional transmission organization with distribution system
engineering expertise as the technical master. Should the federal
energy regulatory commission identify a national technical dispute
resolution team, the commission may designate the team as its technical
master.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 Sections 1, 2, and 6 through 19 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---