BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Advertisement" means a communication, the primary purpose of
which is the commercial promotion of a commercial product or service,
including a communication on an internet web site that is operated for
a commercial purpose.
(2) "Computer software" means a sequence of instructions written in
any programming language that is executed on a computer. "Computer
software" does not include computer software that is a web page, or are
data components of web pages that are not executable independently of
the web page.
(3) "Damage" means any significant impairment to the integrity or
availability of data, computer software, a system, or information.
(4) "Execute" means the performance of the functions or the
carrying out of the instructions of the computer software.
(5) "Intentionally deceptive" means any of the following:
(a) An intentionally and materially false or fraudulent statement;
(b) A statement or description that intentionally omits or
misrepresents material information in order to deceive an owner or
operator; and
(c) An intentional and material failure to provide any notice to an
owner or operator regarding the installation or execution of computer
software in order to deceive the owner or operator.
(6) "Internet" means the global information system that is
logically linked together by a globally unique address space based on
the internet protocol (IP), or its subsequent extensions, and that is
able to support communications using the transmission control
protocol/internet protocol (TCP/IP) suite, or its subsequent
extensions, or other IP-compatible protocols, and that provides, uses,
or makes accessible, either publicly or privately, high level services
layered on the communications and related infrastructure described in
this subsection.
(7) "Owner or operator" means the owner or lessee of a computer, or
someone using such computer with the owner's or lessee's authorization.
"Owner or operator" does not include any person who owns a computer
before the first retail sale of such computer.
(8) "Person" means any individual, partnership, corporation,
limited liability company, or other organization, or any combination
thereof.
(9) "Personally identifiable information" means any of the
following with respect to an individual who is an owner or operator:
(a) First name or first initial in combination with last name;
(b) A home or other physical address including street name;
(c) An electronic mail address;
(d) A credit or debit card number, bank account number, or a
password or access code associated with a credit or debit card or bank
account;
(e) Social security number, tax identification number, driver's
license number, passport number, or any other government-issued
identification number; and
(f) Any of the following information in a form that personally
identifies an owner or operator:
(i) Account balances;
(ii) Overdraft history; and
(iii) Payment history.
(10) "Transmit" means to transfer, send, or make available computer
software, or any component thereof, via the internet or any other
medium, including local area networks of computers, other nonwire
transmission, and disc or other data storage device. "Transmit" does
not include any action by a person providing:
(a) The internet connection, telephone connection, or other means
of transmission capability such as a compact disk or digital video disk
through which the software was made available;
(b) The storage or hosting of the software program or a web page
through which the software was made available; or
(c) An information location tool, such as a directory, index
reference, pointer, or hypertext link, through which the user of the
computer located the software, unless such person receives a direct
economic benefit from the execution of such software on the computer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 It is unlawful for a person who is not an
owner or operator to transmit computer software to the owner or
operator's computer with actual knowledge or with conscious avoidance
of actual knowledge and to use such software to do any of the
following:
(1) Modify, through intentionally deceptive means, settings that
control any of the following:
(a) The page that appears when an owner or operator launches an
internet browser or similar computer software used to access and
navigate the internet;
(b) The default provider or web proxy the owner or operator uses to
access or search the internet; and
(c) The owner or operator's list of bookmarks used to access web
pages;
(2) Collect, through intentionally deceptive means, personally
identifiable information:
(a) Through the use of a keystroke-logging function that records
all keystrokes made by an owner or operator and transfers that
information from the computer to another person;
(b) In a manner that correlates such information with data
respecting all or substantially all of the web sites visited by an
owner or operator, other than web sites operated by the person
collecting such information; and
(c) Described in section 1(9) (d), (e), or (f)(i) or (ii) of this
act by extracting the information from the owner or operator's hard
drive;
(3) Prevent, through intentionally deceptive means, an owner or
operator's reasonable efforts to block the installation or execution
of, or to disable, computer software by causing the software that the
owner or operator has properly removed or disabled automatically to
reinstall or reactivate on the computer;
(4) Intentionally misrepresent that computer software will be
uninstalled or disabled by an owner or operator's action; and
(5) Through intentionally deceptive means, remove, disable, or
render inoperative security, antispyware, or antivirus computer
software installed on the computer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 It is unlawful for a person who is not an
owner or operator to transmit computer software to the owner or
operator's computer with actual knowledge or with conscious avoidance
of actual knowledge and to use the software to do any of the following:
(1) Take control of the computer by:
(a) Accessing or using the modem or internet service for such
computer to cause damage to the computer or cause an owner or operator
to incur financial charges for a service that is not authorized by the
owner or operator;
(b) Opening multiple, sequential, stand-alone advertisements in the
owner or operator's internet browser without the authorization of an
owner or operator and that a reasonable computer user cannot close
without turning off the computer or closing the internet browser;
(2) Modify any of the following settings related to the computer's
access to, or use of, the internet:
(a) Settings that protect information about the owner or operator
in order to steal the owner or operator's personally identifiable
information; and
(b) Security settings in order to cause damage to a computer; and
(3) Prevent an owner or operator's reasonable efforts to block the
installation of, or to disable, computer software by doing any of the
following:
(a) Presenting the owner or operator with an option to decline
installation of computer software with knowledge that, when the option
is selected, the installation nevertheless proceeds; and
(b) Falsely representing that computer software has been disabled.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 It is unlawful for a person who is not an
owner or operator to do any of the following with regard to the owner
or operator's computer:
(1) Induce an owner or operator to install a computer software
component onto the computer by intentionally misrepresenting the extent
to which installing the software is necessary for security or privacy
reasons or in order to open, view, or play a particular type of
content; and
(2) Deceptively cause the execution on the computer of a computer
software component with the intent of causing the owner or operator to
use the component in a manner that violates any other provision of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 3 or 4 of this act does not apply to
any monitoring of, or interaction with, a subscriber's internet or
other network connection or service, or a computer, by a
telecommunications carrier, cable operator, computer hardware or
software provider, or provider of information service or interactive
computer service for network or computer security purposes,
diagnostics, technical support, maintenance, repair, authorized updates
of software or system firmware, authorized remote system management, or
detection or prevention of the unauthorized use of or fraudulent or
other illegal activities in connection with a network, service, or
computer software, including scanning for and removing software under
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) In addition to any other remedies
provided by this chapter or any other provision of law, the attorney
general, or a provider of computer software or owner of a web site or
trademark who is adversely affected by reason of a violation of this
chapter, may bring an action against a person who violates this chapter
to enjoin further violations and to recover either actual damages or
one hundred thousand dollars per violation, whichever is greater.
(2) In an action under subsection (1) of this section, a court may
increase the damages up to three times the damages allowed under
subsection (1) of this section if the defendant has engaged in a
pattern and practice of violating this chapter. The court may also
award costs and reasonable attorneys' fees to the prevailing party.
(3) The amount of damages determined under subsection (1) or (2) of
this section may not exceed two million dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 It is the intent of the legislature that
this chapter is a matter of statewide concern. This chapter supersedes
and preempts all rules, regulations, codes, ordinances, and other laws
adopted by a city, county, city and county, municipality, or local
agency regarding spyware and notices to consumers from computer
software providers regarding information collection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act does not add to, contract, alter,
or amend any cause of action allowed under chapter 19.86 RCW and does
not affect in any way the application of chapter 19.86 RCW to any
future case or fact pattern.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---