BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.45.032 and 2001 c 282 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Real estate" or "real property" means any interest, estate, or
beneficial interest in land or anything affixed to land, including the
ownership interest or beneficial interest in any entity which itself
owns land or anything affixed to land. The term includes used mobile
homes, used park model trailers, used floating homes, ((and))
improvements constructed upon leased land, and any components of a new
gas turbine electrical generation facility.
(2) "Used mobile home" means a mobile home which has been
previously sold at retail and has been subjected to tax under chapter
82.08 RCW, or which has been previously used and has been subjected to
tax under chapter 82.12 RCW, and which has substantially lost its
identity as a mobile unit at the time of sale by virtue of its being
fixed in location upon land owned or leased by the owner of the mobile
home and placed on a foundation (posts or blocks) with fixed pipe
connections with sewer, water, and other utilities.
(3) "Mobile home" means a mobile home as defined by RCW 46.04.302,
as now or hereafter amended.
(4) "Park model trailer" means a park model trailer as defined in
RCW 46.04.622.
(5) "Used floating home" means a floating home in respect to which
tax has been paid under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW.
(6) "Used park model trailer" means a park model trailer that has
been previously sold at retail and has been subjected to tax under
chapter 82.08 RCW, or that has been previously used and has been
subjected to tax under chapter 82.12 RCW, and that has substantially
lost its identity as a mobile unit by virtue of its being permanently
sited in location and placed on a foundation of either posts or blocks
with connections with sewer, water, or other utilities for the
operation of installed fixtures and appliances.
(7) "Floating home" means a building on a float used in whole or in
part for human habitation as a single-family dwelling, which is not
designed for self propulsion by mechanical means or for propulsion by
means of wind, and which is on the property tax rolls of the county in
which it is located.
(8) "Gas turbine electrical generation facility" means all
buildings, machinery, equipment, and other personal property which is
used primarily for generating electricity, the land upon which the
property is located, or the land that is reasonably necessary in the
generation of the electricity, if the electricity is generated or is to
be generated using a single cycle or combined cycle gas combustion
turbine fueled by natural or manufactured gas.
(9) "New gas turbine electrical generation facility" means a gas
turbine electrical generation facility that received site certification
under chapter 80.50 RCW before July 1, 2005, but has not been placed
into operation for the purpose of producing electricity for
distribution until after December 31, 2005.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.45.060 and 2000 c 103 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is imposed an excise tax upon each sale of real property
at the rate of one and twenty-eight one-hundredths percent of the
selling price. An amount equal to seven and seven-tenths percent of
the proceeds of this tax to the state treasurer shall be deposited in
the public works assistance account created in RCW 43.155.050.
(2) There is imposed an additional excise tax upon each sale of
real property that is a new gas turbine electrical generation facility
or component thereof. The rate of tax imposed under this subsection is
twenty-five one-hundredths percent of the selling price.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect January 1, 2006.

--- END ---