BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that hospitals should
be implementing evidence-based measures to reduce hospital-acquired
infections. The legislature further finds the public should have
access to data on outcome measures regarding hospital-acquired
infections. Data reporting should be consistent with national hospital
reporting standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Health care-associated infection" means a localized or
systemic condition that results from adverse reaction to the presence
of an infectious agent or its toxins and that was not present or
incubating at the time of admission to the hospital.
(b) "Hospital" means a health care facility licensed under chapter
70.41 RCW.
(2) The department shall:
(a) Adopt guidelines and rules for the identification, tracking,
reporting, and release of information related to outcome measures as
related to health care-associated infections acquired in hospitals. In
adopting these guidelines and rules related to health care-associated
infections, the department shall consider the recommendations of the
advisory committee established in (c) of this subsection as well as the
recommendations, definitions, and methodologies, of the United States
centers for disease control and prevention, the centers for health care
research and quality, the centers for medicare and medicaid services,
the joint commission on accreditation of health care organizations, the
national quality forum, the institute for health care improvement, or
other organizations with recognized expertise in infection control or
quality improvement. The guidelines and rules shall establish criteria
for excluding data from reporting where a data set is too small or
possesses other characteristics that make it otherwise unrepresentative
of a hospital's particular ability to achieve a specific outcome
measure. The guidelines and rules shall consider outcome measures, for
an entire hospital or specified units, in the following categories:
(i) Surgical site infections for selected procedures;
(ii) Surgical antimicrobial prophylaxis;
(iii) Outcome measures on ventilator-associated pneumonia;
(iv) Central line-associated, laboratory-confirmed bloodstream
infections in the intensive care unit; and
(v) Other categories for which there are established,
evidence-based measures and the department determines are necessary to
protect public health and safety as provided in subsection (3) of this
section;
(b) Publish an annual report on the department's web site that
compares the hospital-acquired infection outcomes described in (a)(i)
of this subsection at each individual hospital in the state.
Comparisons among hospitals shall be adjusted to consider patient mix
and other relevant risk factors and control for provider peer groups,
when appropriate. The annual report shall disclose data in a format so
that no health information about any individual patient is released.
The department may respond to requests for data and other information,
at the requestor's expense, for special studies and analysis consistent
with requirements for confidentiality of patient records and quality
improvement information;
(c) Establish an advisory committee to make recommendations to the
department in the development of guidelines and rules for the
collection, reporting, and release of information related to
hospital-acquired infections. The advisory committee shall consist of
infection control professionals and epidemiologists. In developing its
recommendations, the department shall consider the definitions,
methodologies, and practices of the United States centers for disease
control, centers for medicare and medicaid services, joint commission
for the accreditation of health care organizations, and the institute
for health care improvement related to health care-associated
infections. The advisory committee shall meet as often as necessary to
complete its duties, but not less than three times per year; and
(d) Report to the legislature in November 2008 regarding the
activities of United States centers for disease control, centers for
medicare and medicaid services, joint commission for the accreditation
of health care organizations, and the institute for health care
improvement related to reporting hospital-acquired infections.
(3) As guidelines for preventing health care-associated infections
and tracking outcomes and performance regarding health care-associated
infections are adopted by the United States centers for disease control
and prevention, the centers for health care research and quality, the
centers for medicare and medicaid services, the joint commission on
accreditation of health care organizations, the national quality forum,
the institute of healthcare improvement, or other organizations with
recognized expertise in infection control or quality improvement, the
department shall include those other procedures or categories of health
care-associated infections, such as catheter-related urinary tract
infections or clostridium difficile infections, in the reporting
program established in subsection (2)(a) of this section. The
department shall include the other procedures or categories of
infections if it determines that the guidelines are evidence-based,
have been demonstrated to reduce health care-associated infections, and
are feasible for hospitals to track.
(4) Each hospital shall:
(a) Collect information regarding health care-associated infection
outcome measures for the categories identified in subsections (2) and
(3) of this section; and
(b) Prepare a report every three months and submit the reports to
the department. The collection and reporting of information shall be
performed in accordance with the guidelines and rules of the
department.
(5) The department shall adopt rules as necessary to effectuate the
purposes of this section.
(6) Neither the reports submitted by hospitals to the department
under this act, nor any of the data contained in them, are subject to
discovery by subpoena or admissible as evidence in a civil proceeding.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.41.200 and 2005 c 291 s 3 and 2005 c 33 s 7 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Every hospital shall maintain a coordinated quality improvement
program for the improvement of the quality of health care services
rendered to patients and the identification and prevention of medical
malpractice. The program shall include at least the following:
(a) The establishment of a quality improvement committee with the
responsibility to review the services rendered in the hospital, both
retrospectively and prospectively, in order to improve the quality of
medical care of patients and to prevent medical malpractice. The
committee shall oversee and coordinate the quality improvement and
medical malpractice prevention program and shall ensure that
information gathered pursuant to the program is used to review and to
revise hospital policies and procedures;
(b) A medical staff privileges sanction procedure through which
credentials, physical and mental capacity, and competence in delivering
health care services are periodically reviewed as part of an evaluation
of staff privileges;
(c) The periodic review of the credentials, physical and mental
capacity, and competence in delivering health care services of all
persons who are employed or associated with the hospital;
(d) A procedure for the prompt resolution of grievances by patients
or their representatives related to accidents, injuries, treatment, and
other events that may result in claims of medical malpractice;
(e) The maintenance and continuous collection of information
concerning the hospital's experience with negative health care outcomes
and incidents injurious to patients including health care-associated
infections, patient grievances, professional liability premiums,
settlements, awards, costs incurred by the hospital for patient injury
prevention, and safety improvement activities;
(f) The maintenance of relevant and appropriate information
gathered pursuant to (a) through (e) of this subsection concerning
individual physicians within the physician's personnel or credential
file maintained by the hospital;
(g) Education programs dealing with quality improvement, patient
safety, medication errors, injury prevention, infection control, staff
responsibility to report professional misconduct, the legal aspects of
patient care, improved communication with patients, and causes of
malpractice claims for staff personnel engaged in patient care
activities; and
(h) Policies to ensure compliance with the reporting requirements
of this section.
(2) Any person who, in substantial good faith, provides information
to further the purposes of the quality improvement and medical
malpractice prevention program or who, in substantial good faith,
participates on the quality improvement committee shall not be subject
to an action for civil damages or other relief as a result of such
activity. Any person or entity participating in a coordinated quality
improvement program that, in substantial good faith, shares information
or documents with one or more other programs, committees, or boards
under subsection (8) of this section is not subject to an action for
civil damages or other relief as a result of the activity. For the
purposes of this section, sharing information is presumed to be in
substantial good faith. However, the presumption may be rebutted upon
a showing of clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that the
information shared was knowingly false or deliberately misleading.
(3) Information and documents, including complaints and incident
reports, created specifically for, and collected and maintained by, a
quality improvement committee are not subject to review or disclosure,
except as provided in this section, or discovery or introduction into
evidence in any civil action, and no person who was in attendance at a
meeting of such committee or who participated in the creation,
collection, or maintenance of information or documents specifically for
the committee shall be permitted or required to testify in any civil
action as to the content of such proceedings or the documents and
information prepared specifically for the committee. This subsection
does not preclude: (a) In any civil action, the discovery of the
identity of persons involved in the medical care that is the basis of
the civil action whose involvement was independent of any quality
improvement activity; (b) in any civil action, the testimony of any
person concerning the facts which form the basis for the institution of
such proceedings of which the person had personal knowledge acquired
independently of such proceedings; (c) in any civil action by a health
care provider regarding the restriction or revocation of that
individual's clinical or staff privileges, introduction into evidence
information collected and maintained by quality improvement committees
regarding such health care provider; (d) in any civil action,
disclosure of the fact that staff privileges were terminated or
restricted, including the specific restrictions imposed, if any and the
reasons for the restrictions; or (e) in any civil action, discovery and
introduction into evidence of the patient's medical records required by
regulation of the department of health to be made regarding the care
and treatment received.
(4) Each quality improvement committee shall, on at least a
semiannual basis, report to the governing board of the hospital in
which the committee is located. The report shall review the quality
improvement activities conducted by the committee, and any actions
taken as a result of those activities.
(5) The department of health shall adopt such rules as are deemed
appropriate to effectuate the purposes of this section.
(6) The medical quality assurance commission or the board of
osteopathic medicine and surgery, as appropriate, may review and audit
the records of committee decisions in which a physician's privileges
are terminated or restricted. Each hospital shall produce and make
accessible to the commission or board the appropriate records and
otherwise facilitate the review and audit. Information so gained shall
not be subject to the discovery process and confidentiality shall be
respected as required by subsection (3) of this section. Failure of a
hospital to comply with this subsection is punishable by a civil
penalty not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars.
(7) The department, the joint commission on accreditation of health
care organizations, and any other accrediting organization may review
and audit the records of a quality improvement committee or peer review
committee in connection with their inspection and review of hospitals.
Information so obtained shall not be subject to the discovery process,
and confidentiality shall be respected as required by subsection (3) of
this section. Each hospital shall produce and make accessible to the
department the appropriate records and otherwise facilitate the review
and audit.
(8) A coordinated quality improvement program may share information
and documents, including complaints and incident reports, created
specifically for, and collected and maintained by, a quality
improvement committee or a peer review committee under RCW 4.24.250
with one or more other coordinated quality improvement programs
maintained in accordance with this section or RCW 43.70.510, a quality
assurance committee maintained in accordance with RCW 18.20.390 or
74.42.640, or a peer review committee under RCW 4.24.250, for the
improvement of the quality of health care services rendered to patients
and the identification and prevention of medical malpractice. The
privacy protections of chapter 70.02 RCW and the federal health
insurance portability and accountability act of 1996 and its
implementing regulations apply to the sharing of individually
identifiable patient information held by a coordinated quality
improvement program. Any rules necessary to implement this section
shall meet the requirements of applicable federal and state privacy
laws. Information and documents disclosed by one coordinated quality
improvement program to another coordinated quality improvement program
or a peer review committee under RCW 4.24.250 and any information and
documents created or maintained as a result of the sharing of
information and documents shall not be subject to the discovery process
and confidentiality shall be respected as required by subsection (3) of
this section, RCW 18.20.390 (6) and (8), 74.42.640 (7) and (9), and
4.24.250.
(9) A hospital that operates a nursing home as defined in RCW
18.51.010 may conduct quality improvement activities for both the
hospital and the nursing home through a quality improvement committee
under this section, and such activities shall be subject to the
provisions of subsections (2) through (8) of this section.
(10) Violation of this section shall not be considered negligence
per se.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
Any information and reports exchanged between hospitals and the
department of health under section 2 of this act are exempt from
disclosure under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect August 1, 2006.

--- END ---