BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.18 RCW
to read as follows:
An insurer licensed to write liability insurance, such as
homeowner's insurance, in this state may not deny an application for a
homeowner's insurance policy, or cancel, refuse to renew, or modify an
existing homeowner's insurance policy, on the basis that the applicant
or insured owns or harbors a specific breed of dog on the real
property, unless the dog is a dangerous dog as defined in RCW
16.08.070. An insurer may require that the insured provide:
(1) Written certification from the insured that the dog provides
little risk based on the dog's nature and history; and
(2) Written certification that the dog provides little risk based
on the dog's nature and history in the form of:
(a) A written statement from a licensed veterinarian who may be
familiar with the dog in question; or
(b) A written statement from a licensed dog trainer from a canine
obedience school; or
(c) A canine good citizen certificate from the American kennel
club.

--- END ---