BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 69.43 RCW
to read as follows:
Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any detectable
quantity of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or
their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, dispensed, sold, or
distributed at retail shall be dispensed, sold, or distributed only by
a licensed pharmacist or a practitioner as defined in RCW 18.64.011.
A pharmacist or practitioner purchasing, receiving, or otherwise
acquiring any compound, mixture, or preparation of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or
salts of isomers must provide adequate identification verifying that
the pharmacist is licensed by the state.

Sec. 2 RCW 69.43.110 and 2004 c 52 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for a ((pharmacy licensed by, or shopkeeper or
itinerant vendor registered with, the department of health)) pharmacist
licensed under chapter 18.64 RCW((, or an employee thereof,)) or a
practitioner as defined in RCW 18.64.011, knowingly to sell, transfer,
or to otherwise furnish, in a single transaction:
(a) More than three packages of one or more products that he or she
knows to contain ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine,
their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers; or
(b) A single package of any product that he or she knows to contain
more than three grams of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine, their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, or a
combination of any of these substances.
(2) It is unlawful for a person who is not a manufacturer,
wholesaler, pharmacy, or practitioner((, shopkeeper, or itinerant
vendor licensed by or registered with the department of health under
chapter 18.64 RCW)) as defined by RCW 18.64.011 to purchase or acquire,
in any twenty-four hour period, more than the quantities of the
substances specified in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) It is unlawful for any person to sell or distribute any of the
substances specified in subsection (1) of this section unless the
person is licensed by ((or registered with)) the department of health
under chapter 18.64 RCW, or is a practitioner as defined in RCW
18.64.011.
(4) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.64.044 and 2004 c 52 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A shopkeeper registered as provided in this section may sell
nonprescription drugs, if such drugs are sold in the original package
of the manufacturer.
(2) Every shopkeeper not a licensed pharmacist, desiring to secure
the benefits and privileges of this section, is hereby required to
register as a shopkeeper through the master license system, and he or
she shall pay the fee determined by the secretary for registration, and
on a date to be determined by the secretary thereafter the fee
determined by the secretary for renewal of the registration; and shall
at all times keep said registration or the current renewal thereof
conspicuously exposed in the location to which it applies. In event
such shopkeeper's registration is not renewed by the master license
expiration date, no renewal or new registration shall be issued except
upon payment of the registration renewal fee and the master license
delinquency fee under chapter 19.02 RCW. This registration fee shall
not authorize the sale of legend drugs or controlled substances.
(3) The registration fees determined by the secretary under
subsection (2) of this section shall not exceed the cost of registering
the shopkeeper.
(4) Any shopkeeper who shall vend or sell, or offer to sell to the
public any such nonprescription drug or preparation without having
registered to do so as provided in this section, shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor and each sale or offer to sell shall constitute a separate
offense.
(((5) A shopkeeper who is not a licensed pharmacy may purchase
ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts,
isomers, or salts of isomers, only from a wholesaler licensed by the
department under RCW 18.64.046 or from a manufacturer licensed by the
department under RCW 18.64.045. The board shall issue a warning to a
shopkeeper who violates this subsection, and may suspend or revoke the
registration of the shopkeeper for a subsequent violation.
(6) A shopkeeper who has purchased ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, in
a suspicious transaction as defined in RCW 69.43.035, is subject to the
following requirements:
(a) The shopkeeper may not sell any quantity of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or
salts of isomers, if the total monthly sales of these products exceed
ten percent of the shopkeeper's total prior monthly sales of
nonprescription drugs in March through October. In November through
February, the shopkeeper may not sell any quantity of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or
salts of isomers, if the total monthly sales of these products exceed
twenty percent of the shopkeeper's total prior monthly sales of
nonprescription drugs. For purposes of this section, "monthly sales"
means total dollars paid by buyers. The board may suspend or revoke
the registration of a shopkeeper who violates this subsection.
(b) The shopkeeper shall maintain inventory records of the receipt
and disposition of nonprescription drugs, utilizing existing inventory
controls if an auditor or investigator can determine compliance with
(a) of this subsection, and otherwise in the form and manner required
by the board. The records must be available for inspection by the
board or any law enforcement agency and must be maintained for two
years. The board may suspend or revoke the registration of a
shopkeeper who violates this subsection. For purposes of this
subsection, "disposition" means the return of product to the wholesaler
or distributor.))

Sec. 4 RCW 18.64.046 and 2004 c 52 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The owner of each place of business which sells legend drugs
and nonprescription drugs, or nonprescription drugs at wholesale shall
pay a license fee to be determined by the secretary, and thereafter, on
or before a date to be determined by the secretary as provided in RCW
43.70.250 and 43.70.280, a like fee to be determined by the secretary,
for which the owner shall receive a license of location from the
department, which shall entitle such owner to either sell legend drugs
and nonprescription drugs or nonprescription drugs at wholesale at the
location specified for the period ending on a date to be determined by
the secretary, and each such owner shall at the time of payment of such
fee file with the department, on a blank therefor provided, a
declaration of ownership and location, which declaration of ownership
and location so filed as aforesaid shall be deemed presumptive evidence
of the ownership of such place of business mentioned therein. It shall
be the duty of the owner to notify immediately the department of any
change of location and ownership and to keep the license of location or
the renewal thereof properly exhibited in such place of business.
(2) Failure to conform with this section is a misdemeanor, and each
day that the failure continues is a separate offense.
(3) In event the license fee remains unpaid on the date due, no
renewal or new license shall be issued except upon compliance with
administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees
determined as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.
(4) No wholesaler may sell any quantity of drug products containing
ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or their salts,
isomers, or salts of isomers, if the total monthly sales of these
products to persons within the state of Washington exceed five percent
of the wholesaler's total prior monthly sales of nonprescription drugs
to persons within the state in March through October. In November
through February, no wholesaler may sell any quantity of drug products
containing ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their
salts, isomers, or salts of isomers if the total monthly sales of these
products to persons within the state of Washington exceed ten percent
of the wholesaler's total prior monthly sales of nonprescription drugs
to persons within the state. For purposes of this section, monthly
sales means total dollars paid by buyers. The board may suspend or
revoke the license of any wholesaler that violates this section.
(5) The board may exempt a wholesaler from the limitations of
subsection (4) of this section if it finds that the wholesaler
distributes nonprescription drugs only through transactions between
divisions, subsidiaries, or related companies when the wholesaler and
the retailer are related by common ownership, and that neither the
wholesaler nor the retailer has a history of suspicious transactions in
precursor drugs as defined in RCW 69.43.035.
(6) The requirements for a license apply to all persons, in
Washington and outside of Washington, who sell both legend drugs and
nonprescription drugs and to those who sell only nonprescription drugs,
at wholesale to pharmacies, practitioners, and shopkeepers in
Washington.
(7) No wholesaler may sell any quantity of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts
of isomers, to any person in Washington other than a pharmacy licensed
under this chapter, ((a shopkeeper or itinerant vendor registered under
this chapter,)) or a practitioner as defined in RCW 18.64.011. A
violation of this subsection is punishable as a class C felony
according to chapter 9A.20 RCW, and each sale in violation of this
subsection constitutes a separate offense.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.64.047 and 2004 c 52 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any itinerant vendor or any peddler of any nonprescription drug
or preparation for the treatment of disease or injury, shall pay a
registration fee determined by the secretary on a date to be determined
by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. The
department may issue a registration to such vendor on an approved
application made to the department.
(2) Any itinerant vendor or peddler who shall vend or sell, or
offer to sell to the public any such nonprescription drug or
preparation without having registered to do so as provided in this
section, is guilty of a misdemeanor and each sale or offer to sell
shall constitute a separate offense.
(3) In event the registration fee remains unpaid on the date due,
no renewal or new registration shall be issued except upon compliance
with administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees
determined as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. This
registration shall not authorize the sale of legend drugs or controlled
substances.
(((4) An itinerant vendor may purchase ephedrine, pseudoephedrine,
or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers
only from a wholesaler licensed by the department under RCW 18.64.046
or from a manufacturer licensed by the department under RCW 18.64.045.
The board shall issue a warning to an itinerant vendor who violates
this subsection, and may suspend or revoke the registration of the
vendor for a subsequent violation.
(5) An itinerant vendor who has purchased ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or
salts of isomers, in a suspicious transaction as defined in RCW
69.43.035, is subject to the following requirements:
(a) The itinerant vendor may not sell any quantity of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or
salts of isomers, if the total monthly sales of these products exceed
ten percent of the vendor's total prior monthly sales of
nonprescription drugs in March through October. In November through
February, the vendor may not sell any quantity of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or
salts of isomers, if the total monthly sales of these products exceed
twenty percent of the vendor's total prior monthly sales of
nonprescription drugs. For purposes of this section, "monthly sales"
means total dollars paid by buyers. The board may suspend or revoke
the registration of an itinerant vendor who violates this subsection.
(b) The itinerant vendor shall maintain inventory records of the
receipt and disposition of nonprescription drugs, utilizing existing
inventory controls if an auditor or investigator can determine
compliance with (a) of this subsection, and otherwise in the form and
manner required by the board. The records must be available for
inspection by the board or any law enforcement agency and must be
maintained for two years. The board may suspend or revoke the
registration of an itinerant vendor who violates this subsection. For
purposes of this subsection, "disposition" means the return of product
to the wholesaler or distributor.))

--- END ---