BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 69.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A pharmacy licensed by, or shopkeeper or itinerant vendor
registered with, the department of health under chapter 18.64 RCW, or
an employee thereof, or a practitioner as defined in RCW 18.64.011, may
not knowingly sell, transfer, or otherwise furnish to any person a
product that he or she knows to contain ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine, their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, without
first obtaining photo identification of the person that shows the date
of birth of the person, and having the person sign a written log or
receipt showing the date of the transaction, name of the person, and
the amount of the product being sold, transferred, or otherwise
furnished.
(2) A person buying or receiving a product containing ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, their salts, isomers, or salts
of isomers, from a pharmacy licensed by, or shopkeeper or itinerant
vendor registered with, the department of health under chapter 18.64
RCW, or an employee thereof, or a practitioner as defined in RCW
18.64.011, must first produce photo identification of the person that
shows the date of birth of the person, and sign a written log or
receipt showing the date of the transaction, name of the person, and
the amount of the product being sold, transferred, or otherwise
furnished.

--- END ---