BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that: (a) Wind
energy is an abundant, renewable, and nonpolluting energy resource; (b)
when converted to electricity, wind energy reduces dependence on
nonrenewable energy resources and reduces air and water pollution that
result from conventional sources; (c) distributed small wind energy
systems also enhance the reliability and power quality of the power
grid, reduce peak power demands, increase in-state electricity
generation, diversify the state's energy supply portfolio, and make the
electricity supply market more competitive by promoting consumer
choice; and (d) small wind energy systems, designed for on-site home,
farm, and small commercial use, are an excellent technology to help
achieve the goals of increased in-state electricity generation, reduced
demand on the state electric grid, increased consumer energy
independence, and nonpolluting electricity generation.
(2) The legislature further finds that the implementation of
consistent statewide standards to achieve the timely and cost-effective
installation of small wind energy systems is a matter of statewide
concern.
(3) It is the intent of the legislature that this chapter apply to
all local agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(2) "Local agency" means any county, city, town, or local entity
in the state of Washington with authority to enact construction or
building ordinances or otherwise conduct construction or building
permitting or zoning
(3) "Small wind energy system" means a wind energy conversion
system consisting of a wind turbine, a tower, and associated control or
conversion electronics.
(4) "Tower height" means the height above grade of the fixed
portion of the tower, excluding the wind turbine.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A local agency may, by ordinance,
provide for the installation of small wind energy systems on parcels of
land of at least one acre in its jurisdiction. The local agency may
establish a process for the issuance of a conditional use permit for
small wind energy systems.
(2) The ordinance may impose conditions on the installation of
small wind energy systems that include, but are not limited to, notice,
tower height, setback, view protection, aesthetics, aviation, and
design safety requirements. However, the ordinance shall not require
conditions on notice, tower height, setbacks, noise level, turbine
approval, tower drawings, engineering analysis, or line drawings that
are more restrictive than the following:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, notice of an
application for installation of a small wind energy system shall be
provided to property owners within three hundred feet of the property
on which the system is to be located.
(b) Tower heights of not more than sixty-five feet shall be allowed
on parcels between one and five acres and tower heights of not more
than eighty feet shall be allowed on parcels of five acres or more,
provided that the application includes evidence that the proposed
height does not exceed the height recommended by the manufacturer or
distributor of the system.
(c) Setback requirements for the system tower shall be no farther
from the property line than the height of the system, provided that it
also complies with any applicable fire setback requirements.
(d) Except during short-term events such as utility outages and
severe windstorms, decibel levels for the system shall not exceed sixty
decibels, as measured at the closest neighboring inhabited dwelling.
(e) The system's turbine must be certified by a national program
recognized and approved by the department.
(f) The application shall include standard drawings and an
engineering analysis of the system's tower, showing compliance with the
state building code, chapter 19.27 RCW, and certification by an
engineer licensed under chapter 18.43 RCW.
(g) The system shall comply with all applicable federal aviation
administration requirements, including 14 C.F.R. 77, Subpart B,
regarding installations close to airports.
(h) The application shall include a line drawing of the electrical
components of the system in sufficient detail to allow for a
determination that the manner of installation conforms to the national
electric code.
(3) The ordinance may require the applicant to provide information
demonstrating that the system will be used primarily to reduce on-site
consumption of electricity. The ordinance may also require the
application to include evidence, unless the applicant does not plan to
connect the system to the electricity grid, that the electric utility
that serves the proposed site has been informed of the applicant's
intent to install an interconnected customer-owned electricity
generator.
(4) In the event a small wind energy system is proposed to be sited
in an agricultural area that may have aircraft operating at low
altitudes, the local agency shall take reasonable steps, concurrent
with other notices issued under this section, to notify pest control
aircraft pilots.
(5) A local agency may, if it deems it necessary due to
circumstances specific to the proposed installation, provide notice by
placing a display advertisement of at least one-eighth page in at least
one newspaper of general circulation within the jurisdiction in which
the installation is proposed.
(6) Nothing in this section alters or affects existing law
regarding the authority of local agencies to review an application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A local agency that does not adopt an
ordinance under section 3 of this act shall approve applications for
small wind energy systems if all of the following conditions are met:
(a) The size of the parcel where the system is located is at least
one acre;
(b) The tower height on parcels that are less than five acres does
not exceed eighty feet;
(c) No part of the system, including guy wire anchors, extends
closer than thirty feet to the property boundary, if it also complies
with any applicable fire setback requirements;
(d) Except during short-term events such as utility outages and
severe windstorms, the system does not exceed sixty decibels, as
measured at the closest neighboring inhabited dwelling;
(e) The system's turbine is certified by a national program
recognized and approved by the department;
(f) The application includes standard drawings and an engineering
analysis of the tower, showing compliance with the state building code,
chapter 19.27 RCW, and certification by a professional engineer
licensed under chapter 18.43 RCW;
(g) The system complies with all applicable federal aviation
administration requirements, including any necessary approvals for
installations close to airports;
(h) The application includes a line drawing of the electrical
components of the system in sufficient detail to allow for a
determination that the manner of installation conforms to the national
electric code;
(i) Unless the applicant does not plan to connect the system to the
electricity grid, the application includes evidence that the electric
utility service provider that serves the proposed site has been
informed of the applicant's intent to install an interconnected
customer-owned electricity generator; and
(j) If a proposed site for a small wind energy system is in an
agricultural area that may have aircraft operating at low altitudes,
the local agency shall take reasonable steps, concurrent with other
notices issued under this chapter, to notify pest control aircraft
pilots.
(2) No other local ordinance, policy, or regulation shall be the
basis for a local agency to deny the siting and operation of a small
wind energy system under this section.
(3) No changes in the general plan are required to implement this
section. A local agency, when amending its zoning ordinance or general
plan to incorporate the policies, procedures, or other provisions
applicable to the approval of small wind energy systems, must do so in
a manner consistent with the requirements of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This chapter does not limit the authority of
local agencies to adopt less restrictive requirements for the siting
and operation of small wind energy systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A local agency shall review an application
for a small wind energy system as expeditiously as possible.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Any requirement of notice to property owners
imposed under section 3 of this act shall ensure that responses to the
notice are filed in a timely manner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---