BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that tsunamis present
a great danger to coastal communities in Washington state. The
legislature further finds that coastal communities lack adequate
tsunami resistant structures to protect human lives. It is therefore
the intent of the legislature to provide incentives to construct
tsunami resistant structures. It is further the intent of the
legislature that these tsunami resistant structures be used for other
purposes when not in use for emergency shelter such as training for
emergency responders.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to amounts received as payment for
the engineering, planning, design, or construction of a tsunami
resistant structure.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Coastal county" means any county that borders the Pacific
ocean.
(b) "Local government" means a coastal county, or a city, town, or
Indian tribe within the county.
(c) "Tsunami resistant structure" means a structure that:
(i)(A) Meets construction and engineering standards, adopted by a
local government pursuant to guidance issued by the national oceanic
and atmospheric administration or the federal emergency management
agency of the department of homeland security under the national
tsunami hazard mitigation program, for the technical design and
construction of structures that allow for vertical evacuation from
tsunami conditions. The standards must address tsunami conditions that
result from an earthquake of magnitude nine or higher and for which the
epicenter is located along the cascadia subduction zone at a point that
represents the shortest distance from the zone to the planned location
of the structure. This subsection (2)(c)(i)(A) applies to any
structure for which construction commences at least three months
following the issuance of final guidance by the administration or
agency as provided in the federal register; or
(B) Is designed and certified by a professionally licensed and
appropriately qualified engineer to withstand the simultaneous forces
of: (I) An earthquake of magnitude nine or higher and for which the
epicenter is located along the cascadia subduction zone at a point that
represents the shortest distance from the zone to the planned location
of the structure; and (II) a tsunami generated by the earthquake. This
subsection (2)(c)(i)(B) applies to any structure for which construction
commences earlier than three months following the issuance of the final
guidance under (c)(i)(A) of this subsection. The requirements of this
subsection (2)(c)(i)(B) are met only upon receipt by the department of
an affidavit signed by the engineer that certifies that the planned
structure is designed to withstand the earthquake and tsunami forces;
(ii) Is designed for the primary purpose of providing emergency
shelter to the residents of the local government in the event of a
tsunami;
(iii) Is not suitable for long-term residential habitation; and
(iv) May be used as a training site for emergency responders.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the
construction of a tsunami resistant structure, including materials,
services, and labor used in the construction of the structure.
(2) The definitions in section 2 of this act apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of materials, services, or labor for the purpose of constructing a
tsunami resistant structure.
(2) The definitions in section 2 of this act apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---