BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.050 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 5 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the definitions provided in RCW 36.70A.030, the
department shall adopt guidelines, under chapter 34.05 RCW, no later
than September 1, 1990, to guide the classification of: (a)
Agricultural lands; (b) forest lands; (c) mineral resource lands; and
(d) critical areas. The department shall consult with the department
of agriculture regarding guidelines for agricultural lands, the
department of natural resources regarding forest lands and mineral
resource lands, and the department of ecology regarding critical areas.
(2) In carrying out its duties under this section, the department
shall consult with interested parties, including but not limited to:
(a) Representatives of cities; (b) representatives of counties; (c)
representatives of developers; (d) representatives of builders; (e)
representatives of owners of agricultural lands, forest lands, and
mining lands; (f) representatives of local economic development
officials; (g) representatives of environmental organizations; (h)
representatives of special districts; (i) representatives of the
governor's office and federal and state agencies; and (j)
representatives of Indian tribes. In addition to the consultation
required under this subsection, the department shall conduct public
hearings in the various regions of the state. The department shall
consider the public input obtained at such public hearings when
adopting the guidelines.
(3) The guidelines under subsection (1) of this section shall be
minimum guidelines that apply to all jurisdictions, but also shall
allow for regional differences that exist in Washington state. The
intent of these guidelines is to assist counties and cities in
designating the classification of agricultural lands, forest lands,
mineral resource lands, and critical areas under RCW 36.70A.170.
(4) The guidelines established by the department under this section
regarding classification of forest lands shall not be inconsistent with
guidelines adopted by the department of natural resources.
(5) The guidelines established by the department under this section
regarding classification of critical areas shall accommodate tsunami
resistant structures built in geologically hazardous areas. For the
purposes of this subsection, "tsunami resistant structure" means a
structure that:
(a) Is included as a hazard mitigation measure in an adopted
comprehensive hazard mitigation plan approved by the department of
ecology or the United States federal emergency management agency;
(b) Meets construction standards adopted by a local government
pursuant to guidelines issued by the national oceanic and atmospheric
administration under the national tsunami hazard mitigation program;
(c) Is designed for the primary purpose of providing emergency
shelter to the residents of the local government in the event of a
tsunami;
(d) Is not suitable for long-term residential habitation; and
(e) May be used as a training site for emergency responders.

--- END ---