BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES--OPERATING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 A new section is added to 2003 c 360
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES. (1) Operating appropriations made in
this act to the department of transportation, department of licensing,
and the Washington state patrol shall initially be allotted as required
by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include
transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly
provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications permit moneys
that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other
than that purpose.
(2) The operating appropriations to the department of
transportation in this act shall be expended for the programs and in
the amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, 2005, unless
specifically prohibited by this act, the department may transfer motor
vehicle account--state appropriations, multimodal transportation
account--state appropriations, or Puget Sound ferry operations
account--state appropriations for fiscal year 2005 among programs after
approval by the director of financial management.
(3) The operating appropriations to the department of licensing in
this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts
specified in this act. However, after May 1, 2005, unless specifically
prohibited by this act, the department may transfer highway safety
account--state appropriations for fiscal year 2005 among programs after
approval by the director of financial management.
(4) The operating appropriations to the Washington state patrol in
this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts
specified in this act. However, after May 1, 2005, unless specifically
prohibited by this act, the department may transfer state patrol
highway account--state appropriations for fiscal year 2005 among
programs after approval by the director of financial management.

Sec. 202 2004 c 229 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($174,438,000))
$175,642,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,957,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $175,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($181,570,000))
$182,774,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Washington state patrol officers engaged in off-duty uniformed
employment providing traffic control services to the department of
transportation or other state agencies are authorized to use state
patrol vehicles for the purposes of that employment, subject to
guidelines adopted by the chief of the Washington state patrol. The
Washington state patrol shall be reimbursed for the use of the vehicle
at the prevailing state employee rate for mileage and hours of usage,
subject to guidelines developed by the chief of the Washington state
patrol. The patrol shall report to the house of representatives and
senate transportation committees by December 31, 2004, on the use of
agency vehicles by officers engaging in the off-duty employment
specified in this subsection. The report shall include an analysis
that compares cost reimbursement and cost-impacts, including increased
vehicle mileage, maintenance costs, and indirect impacts, associated
with the private use of patrol vehicles.
(2) $2,075,000 of the state patrol highway account--state
appropriation in this section is provided solely for the addition of
thirteen troopers to those permanently assigned to vessel and terminal
security. The Washington state patrol shall continue to provide the
enhanced services levels established after September 11, 2001.
(3) In addition to the user fees, the patrol shall transfer into
the state patrol nonappropriated airplane revolving account created
under section 1501 of this act, no more than the amount of appropriated
state patrol highway account and general fund funding necessary to
cover the costs for the patrol's use of the aircraft. The state patrol
highway account and general fund--state funds shall be transferred
proportionately in accordance with a cost allocation that
differentiates between highway traffic enforcement services and general
policing purposes.
(4) The patrol shall not account for or record locally provided DUI
cost reimbursement payments as expenditure credits to the state patrol
highway account. The patrol shall report the amount of expected
locally provided DUI cost reimbursements to the transportation
committees of the senate and house of representatives by December 31 of
each year.
(5) $2,138,000 of the state patrol highway account--state
appropriation is provided solely for additional security personnel and
equipment necessary to comply with the ferry security plan submitted by
the Washington state ferry system to the United States coast guard.
(6) $264,600 of the state patrol highway account--state
appropriation in this subsection is provided solely for two full-time
detectives to work solely to investigate incidents of identity fraud,
drivers' license fraud, and identity theft. The detectives, as part of
their duty to police the public highways, shall work cooperatively with
the department of licensing's driver's special investigation unit.

Sec. 203 2004 c 229 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- SUPPORT SERVICES BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($69,799,000))
$70,658,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,290,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($71,089,000))
$71,948,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Under the direction of the legislative
auditor, the patrol shall update the pursuit vehicle life-cycle cost
model developed in the 1998 Washington state patrol performance audit
(JLARC Report 99-4). The patrol shall utilize the updated model as a
basis for determining maintenance and other cost impacts resulting from
the increase to pursuit vehicle mileage above 110 thousand miles in the
2003-05 biennium. The patrol shall submit a report, that includes
identified cost impacts, to the transportation committees of the senate
and house of representatives by December 31, 2003.

Sec. 204 2004 c 229 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $97,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $84,000
Highway Safety Account--Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,316,000))
$8,318,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,403,000
DOL Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $144,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,053,000))
$13,055,000

Sec. 205 2004 c 229 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- INFORMATION SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $144,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,656,000))
$11,690,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
Highway Safety Account--Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,285,000
DOL Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,220,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,428,000))
$19,462,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department shall submit a report to the transportation
committees of the legislature detailing the progress made in
transitioning off of the Unisys system by December 1, 2003, and each
December 1 thereafter.
(2) $151,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Third Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5412. Within the amount provided, the department of licensing
shall prepare to implement a "one-to-one" biometric matching system
that compares the biometric identifier submitted to the individual
applicant's record. The authority to expend funds provided under this
subsection is subject to compliance with the provisions under section
504 of this act. If Third Substitute Senate Bill No. 5412 is not
enacted by June 30, 2004, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

Sec. 206 2004 c 229 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- DRIVER SERVICES
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,576,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($87,259,000))
$87,123,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $318,000
Highway Safety Account--Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($90,220,000))
$90,084,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $178,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for two temporary collision processing FTEs to
eliminate the backlog of collision reports. The department shall
report, informally, to the house of representatives and senate
transportation committees quarterly, beginning October 1, 2003, on the
progress made in eliminating the backlog.
(2) $369,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5428
or House Bill No. 1681. Within the amount provided in this subsection,
the department is authorized to accept applications for driver's
license and identicard renewals via the mail or internet. If Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5428 or House Bill No. 1681 is not enacted
by June 30, 2004, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) $282,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Third Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5412. Within the amount provided, the department of licensing
shall prepare to implement a "one-to-one" biometric matching system
that compares the biometric identifier submitted to the individual
applicant's record. The authority to expend funds provided under this
subsection is subject to compliance with the provisions under section
504 of this act. If Third Substitute Senate Bill No. 5412 is not
enacted by June 30, 2004, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(4) $354,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
2532. If Substitute House Bill No. 2532 is not enacted by June 30,
2004, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(5) $538,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
2660. If Substitute House Bill No. 2660 is not enacted by June 30,
2004, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec.207 2004 c 229 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY -- PROGRAM
C
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($56,236,000))
$55,363,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,163,000
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,038,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $363,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($68,800,000))
$67,927,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $850,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided for the continued maintenance and support of the
transportation executive information system (TEIS). The TEIS shall be
enhanced during the 2004 interim to shift towards a monitoring and
reporting system capable of tracking and reporting on major project
milestones and measurements. The department shall work with the
legislature to identify and define meaningful milestones and measures
to be used in monitoring the scope, schedule, and cost of projects.
(2)(a) $2,959,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
and $2,963,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of a new revenue collection system,
including the integration of the regional fare coordination system
(smart card), at the Washington state ferries. By December 1st of each
year, an annual update must be provided to the legislative
transportation committee concerning the status of implementing and
completing this project.
(b) $200,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the smart card
program.
(3) The department shall contract with the department of
information services to conduct a survey that identifies possible
opportunities and benefits associated with siting and use of technology
and wireless facilities located on state right of way authorized by RCW
47.60.140. The department shall submit a report regarding the survey
to the appropriate legislative committees by December 1, 2004.

Sec. 208 2004 c 229 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--FACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS
AND CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM D -- OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,981,000))
$30,515,000

Sec. 209 2004 c 229 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND
SUPPORT -- PROGRAM H
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,056,000))
$48,056,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,456,000))
$48,456,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($14,310,000)) $13,985,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the staffing, activities, and
overhead of the department's environmental affairs office. This
funding is provided in lieu of funding provided in sections 305 and 306
of this act.
(2) $3,100,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the staffing and activities of the transportation
permit efficiency and accountability committee. The committee shall
develop a model national environmental policy act (NEPA) tribal
consultation process for federal transportation aid projects related to
the preservation of cultural, historic, and environmental resources.
The process shall ensure that Tribal participation in the NEPA
consultation process is conducted pursuant to treaty rights, federal
law, and state statutes, consistent with their expectations for
protection of such resources.
(3) $300,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided to the department in accordance with RCW 46.68.110(2) and
46.68.120(3) and shall be used by the department solely for the
purposes of providing contract services to the association of
Washington cities and Washington state association of counties to
implement section 2(3)(c), (5), and (6), chapter 8 (ESB 5279), Laws of
2003 for activities of the transportation permit efficiency and
accountability committee.

Sec. 210 2003 c 360 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS--PROGRAM K
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,011,000))
$996,000

Sec. 211 2004 c 229 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q--OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,924,000))
$38,338,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($39,049,000))
$38,463,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) A maximum of $8,800,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation may be expended for the incident response program,
including the service patrols. The department and the Washington state
patrol shall continue to consult and coordinate with private sector
partners, such as towing companies, media, auto, insurance and trucking
associations, and the legislative transportation committees to ensure
that limited state resources are used most effectively. No funds shall
be used to purchase tow trucks.
(2) $4,400,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for low-cost enhancements. The department shall give
priority to low-cost enhancement projects that improve safety or
provide congestion relief. The department shall prioritize low-cost
enhancement projects on a statewide rather than regional basis.
(3) At a frequency determined by the department, the interstate-5
variable message signs shall display a message advising slower traffic
to keep right.
(4) The appropriation authority under this section includes
spending authority to administer the motorist information sign panel
program. The department shall establish the annual fees charged for
these services so that all costs to administer this program are
recovered; in no event, however, shall the department charge more than:
(a) $1,000 per business per location on freeways and expressways
with average daily trips greater than 80,000;
(b) $750 per business per location on freeways and expressways with
average daily trips less than 80,000; and
(c) $400 per business per location on conventional highways.

Sec. 212 2004 c 229 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND
SUPPORT -- PROGRAM S
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,579,000))
$24,079,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $636,000
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,093,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $973,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,281,000))
$26,781,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $627,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
5248. If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5248 is not enacted by June 30,
2003, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. The agency
may transfer between programs funds provided in this subsection.
(2) The department shall transfer at no cost to the Washington
state patrol the title to the Walla Walla colocation facility.

Sec. 213 2004 c 229 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA,
AND RESEARCH -- PROGRAM T
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,494,000))
$24,694,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,814,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,521,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,829,000))
$43,029,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,800,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for a study of regional congestion relief solutions for
Puget Sound (including state route 169), Spokane, and Vancouver. The
study must include proposals to alleviate congestion consistent with
population and land use expectations under the growth management act,
and must include measurement of all modes of transportation.
(2) $2,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for additional assistance to support regional
transportation planning organizations and long-range transportation
planning efforts. As a condition of receiving this support, a regional
transportation planning organization containing any county with a
population in excess of one million shall provide voting membership on
its executive board to any incorporated principal city of a
metropolitan statistical area within the region, as designated by the
United States census bureau.
(3) (($3,000,000)) $1,200,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the costs of the regional
transportation investment district (RTID) election and department of
transportation project oversight. These funds are provided as a loan
to the RTID and shall be repaid to the state motor vehicle account
within one year following the certification of the election results
related to the RTID.
(4) $650,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided to the department in accordance with RCW 46.68.110(2) and
46.68.120(3) and shall be used by the department to support the
processing and analysis of the backlog of city and county collision
reports.
(5) The department shall contribute to the report required in
section 208(1) of this act in the form of an analysis of the cost
impacts incurred by the department as the result of the policy
implemented in section 208(1) of this act. The analysis shall contrast
overtime costs charged by the patrol prior to July 1, 2003, with
contract costs for similar services after July 1, 2003.
(6) $60,000 of the distribution under RCW 46.68.110(2) and
46.68.120(3) is provided solely to the department for the Washington
strategic freight transportation analysis.
(7) $500,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for contracting with the department of
natural resources to develop data systems for state submerged lands
that can be shared with other governmental agencies and that can
support the state vision for ecoregional planning. The data to be
shared shall include, but not limited to, tabular and geospatial data
describing public land ownership, distributions of native plants,
marine and aquatic species and their habitats, physical attributes,
aquatic ecosystems, and specially designated conservation or
environmentally sensitive areas.

Sec. 214 2004 c 229 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM V
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,057,000))
$46,757,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,574,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $155,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,786,000))
$49,486,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $18,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a grant program for special needs
transportation provided by transit agencies and nonprofit providers of
transportation.
(a) $4,000,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is
provided solely for grants to nonprofit providers of special needs
transportation. Grants for nonprofit providers shall be based on need,
including the availability of other providers of service in the area,
efforts to coordinate trips among providers and riders, and the cost
effectiveness of trips provided.
(b) $14,000,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is
provided solely for grants to transit agencies to transport persons
with special transportation needs. To receive a grant, the transit
agency must have a maintenance of effort for special needs
transportation that is no less than the previous year's maintenance of
effort for special needs transportation. Grants for transit agencies
shall be prorated based on the amount expended for demand response
service and route deviated service in calendar year 2001 as reported in
the "Summary of Public Transportation - 2001" published by the
department of transportation. No transit agency may receive more than
thirty percent of these distributions.
(2) $1,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants to implement section 9 of
Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2228.
(3) Funds are provided for the rural mobility grant program as
follows:
(a) $6,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants for those transit systems
serving small cities and rural areas as identified in the Summary of
Public Transportation - 2001 published by the department of
transportation. Noncompetitive grants must be distributed to the
transit systems serving small cities and rural areas in a manner
similar to past disparity equalization programs.
(b) $4,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely to providers of rural mobility service
in areas not served or underserved by transit agencies through a
competitive grant process.
(4) $4,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a vanpool grant program for: (a)
Public transit agencies to add vanpools; and (b) incentives for
employers to increase employee vanpool use. The grant program for
public transit agencies will cover capital costs only; no operating
costs for public transit agencies are eligible for funding under this
grant program. No additional employees may be hired for the vanpool
grant program, and supplanting of transit funds currently funding
vanpools is not allowed. Additional criteria for selecting grants will
include leveraging funds other than state funds. The commute trip
reduction task force shall determine the cost effectiveness of the
grants, including vanpool system coordination, regarding the use of the
funds.
(5) $100,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the commute trip reduction program
for Benton county.
(6) $3,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided to the city of Seattle for the Seattle
streetcar project on South Lake Union.
(7) $500,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely to King county as a state match to
obtain federal funding for a car sharing program.

Sec. 215 2004 c 229 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- MARINE -- PROGRAM X
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($312,490,000))
$309,490,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,120,000))
$16,688,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($317,610,000))
$326,178,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is based on the budgeted expenditure of
(($35,348,000)) $46,676,000 for vessel operating fuel in the 2003-2005
biennium. If the actual cost of fuel is less than this budgeted
amount, the excess amount may not be expended. If the actual cost
exceeds this amount, the department shall request a supplemental
appropriation.
(2) The appropriation provides for the compensation of ferry
employees. The expenditures for compensation paid to ferry employees
during the 2003-2005 biennium may not exceed $208,935,700, plus a
dollar amount, as prescribed by the office of financial management,
that is equal to any insurance benefit increase granted general
government employees in excess of $495.30 a month annualized per
eligible marine employee multiplied by the number of eligible marine
employees for fiscal year 2004 and $567.67 a month annualized per
eligible marine employee multiplied by the number of eligible marine
employees for fiscal year 2005, a dollar amount as prescribed by the
office of financial management for costs associated with pension
amortization charges, and a dollar amount prescribed by the office of
financial management for salary increases during the 2003-2005
biennium. For the purposes of this section, the expenditures for
compensation paid to ferry employees shall be limited to salaries and
wages and employee benefits as defined in the office of financial
management's policies, regulations, and procedures named under objects
of expenditure "A" and "B" (7.2.6.2).
The prescribed salary increase or decrease dollar amount that shall
be allocated from the governor's compensation appropriations is in
addition to the appropriation contained in this section and may be used
to increase or decrease compensation costs, effective July 1, 2003, and
thereafter, as established in the 2003-2005 general fund operating
budget.
(3) $4,234,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation and $800,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations
account--state appropriation are provided solely for operating costs
associated with the Vashon to Seattle passenger-only ferry. The
Washington state ferries will develop a plan to increase passenger-only
farebox recovery to at least forty percent by July 1, 2003, with an
additional goal of eighty percent, through increased fares, lower
operation costs, and other cost-saving measures as appropriate. In
order to implement the plan, ferry system management is authorized to
negotiate changes in work hours (requirements for split shift work),
but only with respect to operating passenger-only ferry service, to be
included in a collective bargaining agreement in effect during the
2003-05 biennium that differs from provisions regarding work hours in
the prior collective bargaining agreement. The department must report
to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1,
2003.
(4) $984,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account--state
appropriation is provided solely for ferry security operations
necessary to comply with the ferry security plan submitted by the
Washington state ferry system to the United States coast guard. The
department shall track security costs and expenditures. Ferry security
operations costs shall not be included as part of the operational costs
that are used to calculate farebox recovery.
(5) $866,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation and $200,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations
account--state appropriation are provided solely for operating costs
associated with the Bremerton to Seattle passenger-only ferry service
for thirteen weeks.
(6) The department shall study the potential for private or public
partners, including but not limited to King county, to provide
passenger-only ferry service from Vashon to Seattle. The department
shall report to the legislative transportation committees by December
31, 2003.
(7) The Washington state ferries shall continue to provide service
to Sidney, British Columbia.
(8) When augmenting the existing ferry fleet, the department of
transportation ferry capital program shall explore cost-effective
options to include the leasing of ferries from private-sector
organizations.
(9) The Washington state ferries shall work with the department of
general administration, office of state procurement to improve the
existing fuel procurement process and solicit, identify, and evaluate,
purchasing alternatives to reduce the overall cost of fuel and mitigate
the impact of market fluctuations and pressure on both short- and long-term fuel costs. Consideration shall include, but not be limited to,
long-term fuel contracts, partnering with other public entities, and
possibilities for fuel storage in evaluating strategies and options.
The department shall report back to the transportation committees of
the legislature by December 1, 2003, on the options, strategies, and
recommendations for managing fuel purchases and costs.
(10) The department must provide a separate accounting of
passenger-only ferry service costs and auto ferry service costs, and
must provide periodic reporting to the legislature on the financial
status of both passenger-only and auto ferry service in Washington
state.
(11) The Washington state ferries must work with the department's
information technology division to implement a new revenue collection
system, including the integration of the regional fare coordination
system (smart card). Each December, annual updates are to be provided
to the transportation committees of the legislature concerning the
status of implementing and completing this project, with updates
concluding the first December after full project implementation.
(12) The Washington state ferries shall evaluate the benefits and
costs of selling the depreciation rights to ferries purchased by the
state in the future through sale and lease-back agreements, as
permitted under RCW 47.60.010. The department is authorized to issue
a request for proposal to solicit proposals from potential buyers. The
department must report to the transportation committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2004, on the options, strategies, and
recommendations for sale/lease-back agreements on existing ferry boats
as well as future ferry boat purchases.

Sec. 216 2004 c 229 s 224 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- OPERATING
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($34,118,000))
$33,488,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($29,961,000)) $29,331,000 of the multimodal transportation
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the Amtrak service
contract and Talgo maintenance contract associated with providing and
maintaining the state-supported passenger rail service.
(2) No Amtrak Cascade runs may be eliminated.
(3) The department is directed to explore scheduling changes that
will reduce the delay in Seattle when traveling from Portland to
Vancouver B.C.
(4) The department is directed to explore opportunities with
British Columbia (B.C.) concerning the possibility of leasing an
existing Talgo trainset to B.C. during the day for a commuter run when
the Talgo is not in use during the Bellingham layover.

Sec. 217 2004 c 229 s 225 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z--OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,067,000))
$6,957,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,569,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,636,000))
$9,526,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Up to $75,000 of the total appropriation is provided in
accordance with RCW 46.68.110(2) and 46.68.120(3) to fund the state's
share of the 2004 Washington marine cargo forecast study. Public port
districts, acting through their association, must provide funding to
cover the remaining cost of the forecast.
(2) $300,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided in accordance with RCW 46.68.110(2) and 46.68.120(3) solely to
fund a study of the threats posed by flooding to the state and other
infrastructure near the Interstate 5 crossing of the Skagit River.
This funding is contingent on the receipt of federal matching funds.

TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONS
Sec. 401 2004 c 229 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND
REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND DEBT
TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE ACCOUNT AND TRANSPORTATION FUND REVENUE
Highway Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($250,000,000))
$180,970,000
Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,131,000
Ferry Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($43,340,000))
$40,800,000
Transportation Improvement Board Bond Retirement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,721,000))
$33,209,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,254,000
Special Category C Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $338,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $358,000
Transportation 2003 Account (nickel account)
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,117,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($342,499,000))
$267,417,000

Sec. 402 2004 c 229 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND
REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL
AGENT CHARGES
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,293,000))
$793,000
Special Category C Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $111,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $119,000
Transportation 2003 Account (nickel account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($700,000))
$400,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,244,000))
$1,444,000

Sec. 403 2004 c 229 s 404 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION
Motor Vehicle Account Appropriation for
motor vehicle fuel tax distributions to
cities and counties . . . . . . . . . . . . (($440,228,000))
$435,138,000
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For license permit and fee distributions to cities
and counties . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,119,000))
$0

Sec. 404 2004 c 229 s 405 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS
(1) State Patrol Highway Account -- State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor
Vehicle Account . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,000,000))
$14,000,000
(2) Motor Vehicle Account -- State
Appropriation: For motor vehicle fuel tax
refunds and transfers . . . . . . . . . . . . (($770,347,000))
$752,823,000
(3) Highway Safety Account -- State
Appropriation: For transfer to the motor
vehicle account -- state . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,000,000))
$13,000,000

The state treasurer shall perform the transfers from the state
patrol highway account and the highway safety account to the motor
vehicle account on a quarterly basis.

Sec. 405 2004 c 229 s 406 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRANSFERS
(1) Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation:
For transfer to Puget Sound Ferry Operations
Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,757,000
(2) RV Account -- State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Motor Vehicle Account -- State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,954,000
(3) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to Puget Sound Capital Construction
Account . . . . . . . . . . . . (($61,287,000))
$60,287,000
(4) Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account--State
Appropriation: For transfer to Puget Sound Capital
Construction Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,000,000
(5) Transportation Equipment Fund--State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor Vehicle
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
(6) Advanced Right-of-Way Revolving Account--
State Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor
Vehicle Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

The transfers identified in this section are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(a) The department of transportation shall only transfer funds in
subsections (2) and (3) of this section up to the level provided, on an
as-needed basis.
(b) The department of transportation shall transfer funds in
subsection (4) of this section up to the amount identified, provided
that a minimum balance of $5,000,000 is retained in the Puget Sound
ferry operations account.
(c) The amount identified in subsection (4) of this section may not
include any revenues collected as passenger fares.

MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

INDEX PAGE #

DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING
DRIVER SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
INFORMATION SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS--PROGRAM K . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
FACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS AND CONSTRUCTION--PROGRAM D . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY--PROGRAM C . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
MARINE -- PROGRAM X . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT--PROGRAM H . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM V . . . . . . . . . . . . 12
RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 17
TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT -- PROGRAM S . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCH -- PROGRAM T . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
FOR TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 1
STATE TREASURER
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST . . . . . . . . . . . . 18, 19
STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 19
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
SUPPORT SERVICES BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
--- END ---