BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
2005-07 BIENNIUM
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The transportation budget of the state
is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth, the several
amounts specified, or as much thereof as may be necessary to accomplish
the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated from the several
accounts and funds named to the designated state agencies and offices
for employee compensation and other expenses, for capital projects, and
for other specified purposes, including the payment of any final
judgments arising out of such activities, for the period ending June
30, 2007.
(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this act.
(a) "Fiscal year 2006" or "FY 2006" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2006.
(b) "Fiscal year 2007" or "FY 2007" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2007.
(c) "FTE" means full-time equivalent.
(d) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an
unappropriated status.
(e) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only
for the specified purpose.
(f) "Reappropriation" means appropriation and, unless the context
clearly provides otherwise, is subject to the relevant conditions and
limitations applicable to appropriations.
(g) "LEAP" means the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee.

GENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIES -- OPERATING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION
COMMISSION
Grade Crossing Protective Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $501,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Per current law, funds will be transferred
from the public service revolving fund's miscellaneous fees and
penalties accounts to the grade crossing protection account--state as
needed to implement the commission's railroad safety program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 FOR THE MARINE EMPLOYEES COMMISSION
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $383,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: To address its growing caseload, the
marine employees commission shall develop a plan for prioritizing cases
to schedule for hearings. The commission shall report back to the
transportation committees of the legislature on its case prioritization
plan by December 15, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $976,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The entire appropriation in this section
is provided solely for road maintenance purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $320,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The entire appropriation is provided
solely for costs associated with the motor fuel quality program.

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES -- OPERATING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 FOR THE WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY
COMMISSION
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,111,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,760,000
Bicycle/Pedestrian Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000
School Zone Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,300,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,211,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD
Rural Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $775,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,905,000
County Arterial Preservation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $728,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,408,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD
Urban Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,520,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,521,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,041,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 FOR THE BOARD OF PILOTAGE COMMISSIONERS
Pilotage Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $409,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 FOR THE JOINT TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $450,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to administer a consultant study of
the long-term viability of the state's transportation financing methods
and sources. The study shall be guided by a twelve-member oversight
committee consisting of: (a) The chair and ranking member of the house
of representatives and senate transportation committees, and one
additional legislator appointed by each; (b) two members of the state
transportation commission, to be appointed by the commission chair; (c)
the chair of the transportation performance audit board; and (d) one
member representing the office of financial management, to be appointed
by the director. The secretary of the department of transportation or
a designee shall serve as an ex officio nonvoting member.
(2) At a minimum, the study must examine the following: (a) The
short and long-term viability of the motor fuel tax (both state and
federal) as a major source of funding for transportation projects and
programs; (b) the desirability and effectiveness of state-distributed
transportation funds for the benefit of local units of government; (c)
the potential for alternative and/or emerging sources of transportation
revenues, with particular emphasis on user-based fees and charges; and
(d) trends and implications of debt financing for transportation
projects. The scope of work for the study may be expanded to include
analysis of other financing issues relevant to the long-term viability
of the state's transportation system.
(3) The findings and recommendations must be submitted to the
fiscal committees of the legislature and the office of financial
management by November 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 FOR THE TRANSPORTATION ACCOUNTABILITY
COMMISSION
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,870,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 FOR THE TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $413,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $414,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $827,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 FOR THE FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC
INVESTMENT BOARD
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $655,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- FIELD
OPERATIONS BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $190,636,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,412,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $169,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $201,217,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The patrol shall not account for or record locally provided DUI
cost reimbursement payments as expenditure credits to the state patrol
highway account. The patrol shall report the amount of expected
locally provided DUI cost reimbursements to the transportation
committees of the senate and house of representatives by December 31 of
each year.
(2) The state patrol highway account--state appropriation for DUI
reimbursements shall only be spent for pursuit vehicle video cameras,
datamaster DUI testing equipment, tire deflator equipment, and taser
guns. The Washington state patrol prior to the issuance of any taser
guns will train the troopers on using the equipment. The agency will
provide a report to the transportation committees of the senate and
house of representatives by December 31st of each year on the
occurrences where the taser guns were utilized along with any issues
that have been identified.
(3) $29,000 of the state patrol highway account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of House Bill
No. 1469. If House Bill No. 1469 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, this
appropriation shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL--TECHNICAL SERVICES BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,277,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,994,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $82,271,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The Washington state patrol is instructed to work with the risk
management division in the office of financial management in compiling
the state patrol data for establishing the agency's risk management
insurance premiums to the tort claims account. The office of financial
management and the Washington state patrol will submit a report to the
transportation committees of the senate and house of representatives by
December 31 of each year on the number of claims, estimated claims to
be paid, method of calculation, and the adjustment in the premium.
(2) The Washington state patrol fuel budget for the 2005-07
biennium is $6,228,000. This funding shall only be used for fuel and
any savings due to decreased usage or fuel prices can not be used for
any other purpose. This funds the Washington state patrol at an
average fuel price of $1.73.
(3) The Washington state patrol pursuit vehicle budget state patrol
highway account--state is $9,017,000 for the 2005-07 biennium and 360
pursuit vehicles to be purchased. This amount was transferred to this
bureau in the 1999-2001 budget and legislative pursuit vehicle funding
increases during the 2001-03 biennium. This funding shall only be used
for the purchase of the pursuit vehicles.
(4) The Washington state patrol vehicle repair budget state patrol
highway account--state is $4,900,000 for the 2005-07 biennium. This
amount was transferred to this bureau in the 1999-2001 budget. This
funding shall only be used for the maintenance of vehicles used for
highway purposes.
(5) The Washington state patrol mission vehicle budget for the
commercial vehicle and traffic investigation sections for the state
patrol highway account--state is $384,000 for the 2005-07 biennium.
This amount was transferred to this bureau in the 2001-03 budget. This
funding shall only be used for the purchase of mission vehicles for the
commercial vehicle enforcement and traffic investigations.
(6) $247,000 of the state patrol highway account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1188. If Second Substitute House Bill No.
1188 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, this appropriation shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING--MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $92,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $79,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,070,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,820,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,000
DOL Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $84,000
Biometric Security Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,231,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $55,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1854. If Substitute House Bill No. 1854 is not enacted by June 30,
2005, this appropriation shall lapse.
(2) $26,000 of the motor vehicle account--local appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute House
Bill No. 2157. If Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2157 is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, this appropriation shall lapse. If a
regional transportation improvement authority is not formed by June 30,
2007, this appropriation shall revert to the motor vehicle account--local appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 212 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING--INFORMATION SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $101,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,766,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,864,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,550,000
DOL Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,967,000
Biometric Security Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,570,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,855,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department shall submit a report to the transportation
committees of the legislature detailing the progress made in
transitioning off of the HP 3000 system. Reports shall be made by the
following dates: December 30, 2005, and each December 30 thereafter
until the project is fully completed.
(2) $357,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of all special license plate
bills introduced during the 2005 legislative session and approved by
the special license plate review board. The amount provided in this
subsection shall be reduced accordingly for any of those bills that are
not enacted by June 30, 2005.
(3) $864,000 of the motor vehicle account--local appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute House
Bill No. 2157. If Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2157 is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, this appropriation shall lapse. If a
regional transportation improvement authority is not formed by June 30,
2007, this appropriation shall revert to the motor vehicle account--local appropriation.
(4) $186,000 of the highway safety account--local appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
5177. If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5177 is not enacted by June 30,
2005, this appropriation shall lapse.
(5) $58,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No.
5423. If Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5423 is not enacted by June 30,
2005, this appropriation shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- VEHICLE
SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $614,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,080,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,364,000
DOL Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,146,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,230,000

(1) $247,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of all special license plate
bills introduced during the 2005 legislative session and approved by
the special license plate review board. The amount provided in this
subsection shall be reduced accordingly for any of those bills that are
not enacted by June 30, 2005.
(2) $375,000 of the motor vehicle account--local appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute House
No. Bill 2157. If Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2157 is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, this appropriation shall lapse. If a
regional transportation improvement authority is not formed by June 30,
2007, this appropriation shall revert to the motor vehicle account--local appropriation.
(3) $117,000 of the motor vehicle account--local appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
5177. If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5177 is not enacted by June 30,
2005, this appropriation shall lapse.
(4) $11,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No.
5423. If Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5423 is not enacted by June 30,
2005, this appropriation shall lapse.
(5) $11,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5513. If Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5513 is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, this appropriation shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 214 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- DRIVER
SERVICES
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,998,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $83,428,000
Biometric Security Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,514,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $87,940,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $847,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the commercial driver license program. The
department shall informally report to the transportation committees of
the legislature on the progress made in addressing federal audit
findings and in implementing the motor carrier safety improvement act.
Reports shall be made by the following dates: November 1, 2005, and
each November 1 thereafter.
(2) $412,000 of the motorcycle safety and education account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the department's motorcycle safety
program. The department shall informally report to the transportation
committees of the legislature detailing the progress made in
implementing national highway traffic safety assessment guidelines.
Reports shall be made by the following dates: November 1, 2005, and
each November 1 thereafter.
(3) The department of licensing, in consultation with the
department of transportation and other stakeholders, shall draft
legislation to bring the state into compliance with any federal
legislation or rules enacted relative to identification necessary for
persons crossing international borders. The department must report to
the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2005,
on the recommended legislation for bringing the state into compliance
with federal requirements.
(4) $97,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation
shall lapse if House Bill No. 1260 is enacted by June 30, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 215 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--TOLL OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM B
Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,543,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 216 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY -- PROGRAM C
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,659,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,964,000
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,371,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $363,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,357,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $350,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided solely for a financial and capital
project systems needs assessment for future automation development and
enhancements. The completed assessment will identify options and shall
be presented to the transportation committees of the senate and the
house of representatives by December 31, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 217 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--FACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS AND CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM D -- OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,630,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 218 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--AVIATION -- PROGRAM F
Aeronautics Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,335,000
Aeronautics Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,150,000
Aircraft Search and Rescue Safety and Education
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $262,000
Multimodal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Multimodal Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,847,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) $190,000 of the aeronautics account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
5414. If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5414 is not enacted by June 30,
2005, this appropriation shall lapse.
(b) $262,000 of the aircraft search and rescue safety and education
account--state appropriation shall lapse if Substitute Senate Bill No.
5414 is enacted by June 30, 2005.
(2) $200,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementing Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5121. If Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5121 is
not enacted by June 30, 2005, or if federal fund funds are not received
for the purpose of implementing Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No.
5121, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5414 is enacted by July 1, 2005,
then the remaining fund balance in the aircraft search and rescue,
safety, and education account shall be deposited in the state
aeronautics account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 219 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--
PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT -- PROGRAM H
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,106,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,606,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,475,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the staffing and activities of the transportation
permit efficiency and accountability committee.
(2) $300,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided to the department in accordance with RCW 46.68.110(2) and
46.68.120(3) and shall be used by the department solely for the
purposes of providing contract services to the association of
Washington cities and Washington state association of counties to
implement section 2(3)(c), (5), and (6), chapter 8 (Engrossed Senate
Bill No. 5279), Laws of 2003 for activities of the transportation
permit efficiency and accountability committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 220 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS -- PROGRAM K
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,025,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 221 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM M
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $290,893,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,426,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,253,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $296,572,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) If portions of the appropriations in this section are required
to fund maintenance work resulting from major disasters not covered by
federal emergency funds such as fire, flooding, and major slides,
supplemental appropriations must be requested to restore state funding
for ongoing maintenance activities.
(2) The department shall request an unanticipated receipt for any
federal moneys received for emergency snow and ice removal and shall
place an equal amount of the motor vehicle account -- state into
unallotted status. This exchange shall not affect the amount of
funding available for snow and ice removal.
(3) The department shall request an unanticipated receipt for any
private or local funds received for reimbursements of third party
damages that are in excess of the motor vehicle account -- private/local
appropriation.
(4) Funding is provided for maintenance on the state system to
allow for a continuation of the level of service targets included in
the 2003-05 biennium. In delivering the program, the department should
concentrate on the following areas:
(a) Meeting or exceeding the target for structural bridge repair on
a statewide basis;
(b) Eliminating the number of activities delivered in the "f" level
of service at the region level;
(c) Reducing the number of activities delivered in the "d" level of
service by increasing the resources directed to those activities on a
statewide and region basis; and
(d) Evaluating, analyzing, and potentially redistributing resources
within and among regions to provide greater consistency in delivering
the program statewide and in achieving overall level of service
targets.
(5) The department shall evaluate the feasibility of growing and
harvesting trees utilizing portions of the right of way of state
highways and interstates in order to generate moneys for transportation
funding. In its evaluation, the department shall address the
requirements and applicability of the Washington forest practices act,
the types of trees best suited for the project, and the risks
associated with it, along with any other relevant considerations. The
department must report to the transportation committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2005, on the options, strategies, and
recommendations for growing and harvesting trees in the right of way of
state highways and interstates.
(6) The department shall develop and implement a plan to improve
work zone safety on a statewide basis. As part of the strategy
included in the plan, the department shall fund equipment purchases
using a portion of the money from the annual OTEF equipment purchasing
and replacement process. The department shall also identify and
evaluate statewide equipment needs (such as work zone safety equipment)
and prioritize any such needs on a statewide basis. Substitute
purchasing at the statewide level, when appropriate, shall be utilized
to meet those identified needs. The department must report to the
transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2005, on
the plan, and by December 1, 2006, on the status of implementing the
plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 222 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q -- OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,234,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,050,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,409,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department shall synchronize all stop lights within one-half mile of each other on state highway 20 between Anacortes and
Burlington at the I-5 interchange, so that a vehicle, starting from a
stop at a red light and traveling at the posted speed limit, can pass
through the other lights without having to stop for an additional red
light.
(2) $4,400,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for low-cost enhancements. The department shall give
priority to low-cost enhancement projects that improve safety or
provide congestion relief. The department shall prioritize low-cost
enhancement projects on a statewide rather than regional basis. Each
quarter, the department shall report to the transportation committees
of the legislature on the projects implemented with this funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 223 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT -- PROGRAM S
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,718,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,321,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $973,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,042,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 224 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCH -- PROGRAM T
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,378,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,450,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,694,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,800,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Transportation 2005 Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,400,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,822,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $600,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation and $5,400,000 of the transportation 2005 account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementing Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 2157. $2,000,000 of this amount is to fund the tolling
feasibility study as provided for in Engrossed Substitute House Bill
No. 2157. This tolling study shall include an analysis of the
feasibility of tolling state route 704 - cross base highway. If
Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2157 is not enacted by June 30,
2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. None of this
appropriation may be used for election expenses for an election held
before January 1, 2006.
(2) The department of transportation shall evaluate the number of
spaces available for long-haul truck parking relative to current and
projected future needs. The department of transportation shall also
explore options for augmenting the number of spaces available,
including, but not limited to, expanding state-owned rest areas or
modifying regulations governing the use of these facilities, utilizing
weigh stations and park and ride lots, and encouraging the expansion of
the private sector's role. Finally, the department shall explore the
utility of coordinating with neighboring states on long-haul truck
parking and evaluate methodologies for alleviating any air quality
issues relative to the issue. The department must report to the
transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2005, on
the options, strategies, and recommendations for long-haul truck
parking.
(3) The department shall develop and implement a plan to educate
drivers about traffic roundabouts, including their purpose and proper
use. The department shall work with the traffic safety commission and
TVW in developing and implementing this plan in order to maximize
public awareness and safety. The department must report to the
transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2005, on
the plan and implementation status of educating drivers about
roundabouts.
(4) $175,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided to the department in accordance with RCW 46.68.110(2) and
46.68.120(3) and shall be used by the department to support the
processing and analysis of the backlog of city and county collision
reports by January, 2006. The amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse if federal funds become available for this purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 225 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES -- PROGRAM U
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,030,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,430,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $31,749,000 of the motor vehicle fund--state appropriation is
provided solely for the liabilities attributable to the department of
transportation. The office of financial management must provide a
detailed accounting of the revenues and expenditures of the self-insurance fund to the transportation committees of the legislature on
December 31st and June 30th of each year.
(2) Payments in this section represent charges from other state
agencies to the department of transportation.
(a) FOR PAYMENT OF OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
DIVISION OF RISK MANAGEMENT FEES . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,667,000
(b) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE OFFICE OF THE STATE
AUDITOR . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,017,000
(c) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION FACILITIES AND SERVICES AND CONSOLIDATED
MAIL SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,049,000
(d) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF
PERSONNEL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,572,000
(e) FOR PAYMENT OF SELF-INSURANCE LIABILITY
PREMIUMS AND ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,749,000
(f) FOR PAYMENT OF THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION CAPITAL PROJECTS SURCHARGE . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,717,000
(g) FOR PAYMENT OF ARCHIVES AND RECORDS MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . $545,000
(h) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE OFFICE OF MINORITIES
AND WOMEN BUSINESS ENTERPRISES . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,114,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 226 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM V
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,060,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,574,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $155,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,789,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $25,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a grant program for special needs
transportation provided by transit agencies and nonprofit providers of
transportation.
(a) $5,500,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is
provided solely for grants to nonprofit providers of special needs
transportation. Grants for nonprofit providers shall be based on need,
including the availability of other providers of service in the area,
efforts to coordinate trips among providers and riders, and the cost
effectiveness of trips provided.
(b) $19,500,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is
provided solely for grants to transit agencies to transport persons
with special transportation needs. To receive a grant, the transit
agency must have a maintenance of effort for special needs
transportation that is no less than the previous year's maintenance of
effort for special needs transportation. Grants for transit agencies
shall be pro-rated based on the amount expended for demand response
service and route deviated service in calendar year 2003 as reported in
the "Summary of Public Transportation - 2003" published by the
department of transportation. No transit agency may receive more than
thirty percent of these distributions. The first $450,000 provided to
King county shall be used as follows:
(i) $320,000 shall be used to provide electric buses, instead of
diesel buses, for service on Capital Hill in Seattle, Washington
through June 30, 2007;
(ii) $130,000 shall be used to provide training for blind
individuals traveling through Rainier Valley and the greater Seattle
area. The training is to include destination training and re-training
due to the expected closure of the downtown bus tunnel and training on
how to use the Sound Transit light rail system.
(2) Funds are provided for the rural mobility grant program as
follows:
(a) $7,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants for those transit systems
serving small cities and rural areas as identified in the Summary of
Public Transportation - 2003 published by the department of
transportation. Noncompetitive grants must be distributed to the
transit systems serving small cities and rural areas in a manner
similar to past disparity equalization programs.
(b) $7,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely to providers of rural mobility service
in areas not served or underserved by transit agencies through a
competitive grant process.
(3) $5,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a vanpool grant program for: (a)
Public transit agencies to add vanpools; and (b) incentives for
employers to increase employee vanpool use. The grant program for
public transit agencies will cover capital costs only; no operating
costs for public transit agencies are eligible for funding under this
grant program. No additional employees may be hired for the vanpool
grant program, and supplanting of transit funds currently funding
vanpools is not allowed. Additional criteria for selecting grants will
include leveraging funds other than state funds.
(4) $3,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided to the city of Seattle for the Seattle
streetcar project on South Lake Union.
(5) $2,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely to King county as a state match to
obtain federal funding for a car sharing program for persons meeting
certain income or employment criteria.
(6) $1,200,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 2124. If Substitute House Bill No. 2124 is not enacted
by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(7) The regional mobility steering committee created in Substitute
House Bill No. 2124 (state role in public transportation) shall
establish a program for granting state funds to transit agencies for
intercounty connections, rush hour service, van pools, and capital
projects, including park and ride lots. The steering committee shall
identify cost-effective projects that enhance the efficiency of
regional corridors, reducing delay for people and goods, and submit a
prioritized list to the legislature for funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 227 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--MARINE -- PROGRAM X
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $346,522,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,660,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,182,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is based on the budgeted expenditure of
$57,928,000 for vessel operating fuel in the 2003-2005 biennium. If
the actual cost of fuel is less than this budgeted amount, the excess
amount may not be expended. If the actual cost exceeds this amount,
the department shall request a supplemental appropriation.
(2) The appropriation provides for the compensation of ferry
employees. The expenditures for compensation paid to ferry employees
during the 2005-2007 biennium may not exceed $216,213,000 plus a dollar
amount, as prescribed by the office of financial management, that is
equal to any insurance benefit increase granted general government
employees in excess of $584.58 a month annualized per eligible marine
employee multiplied by the number of eligible marine employees for
fiscal year 2006 and $584.58 a month annualized per eligible marine
employee multiplied by the number of eligible marine employees for
fiscal year 2007, a dollar amount as prescribed by the office of
financial management for costs associated with pension amortization
charges, and a dollar amount prescribed by the office of financial
management for salary increases during the 2005-2007 biennium. For the
purposes of this section, the expenditures for compensation paid to
ferry employees shall be limited to salaries and wages and employee
benefits as defined in the office of financial management's policies,
regulations, and procedures named under objects of expenditure "A" and
"B" (7.2.6.2).
The prescribed salary increase or decrease dollar amount that shall
be allocated from the governor's compensation appropriations is in
addition to the appropriation contained in this section and may be used
to increase or decrease compensation costs, effective July 1, 2005, and
thereafter, as established in sections 501 and 502 of this act.
(3) $3,660,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely to provide passenger-only ferry
service. The ferry system shall continue passenger-only ferry service
from Vashon Island to Seattle through December 31, 2006. Beginning
September 1, 2005, ferry system management shall implement its
agreement with the Inlandboatmen's Union of the Pacific providing for
part-time passenger-only work schedules. Beginning on January 1, 2007,
Washington state ferries shall begin passenger-only ferry service on
the "Triangle" route, connecting Southworth, Vashon and Seattle.
(4) The Washington state ferries must work with the department's
information technology division to implement a new revenue collection
system, including the integration of the regional fare coordination
system (smart card). Each December and June, updates are to be
provided to the transportation committees of the legislature concerning
the status of implementing and completing this project, with updates
concluding the first December after full project implementation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 228 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- OPERATING
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,309,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $29,091,000 of the multimodal transportation account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for the Amtrak service contract and
Talgo maintenance contract associated with providing and maintaining
the state-supported passenger rail service.
(2) $2,750,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a new round trip rail service
between Seattle and Portland beginning July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 229 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,016,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,544,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,560,000

GENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIES--CAPITAL
NEW SECTION. Sec. 230 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION--CAPITAL PROJECTS
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,300,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is a one-time appropriation and is provided solely for
the SR 14 interchange portion of the Beacon Rock state park entrance
road project. Any of the appropriation not expended by June 30, 2007,
shall revert to the motor vehicle account--state appropriation.

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES--CAPITAL
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,801,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD
Rural Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,933,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $355,000
County Arterial Preservation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,392,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $98,680,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $355,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided for county ferries as set forth in RCW
47.56.725(4).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD
Urban Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $99,425,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $103,601,000
Small City Pavement and Sidewalk
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $205,026,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The transportation improvement account -- state appropriation
includes $14,143,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in
RCW 47.26.500. The transportation improvement board may authorize the
use of current revenues available to the agency in lieu of bond
proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.
(2) $2,000,000 of the small city pavement and sidewalk account--state appropriation is provided to fund the provisions of chapter
. . ., Laws of 2005 (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5775).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS) -- CAPITAL
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,492,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $602,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the statewide administration.
(2) $632,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for regional minor projects.
(3) $224,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for designing the replacement of the existing outdated
maintenance facility in Ephrata.
(4) $219,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the designing of the northwest regional maintenance
complex in Seattle.
(5) $833,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the Olympic region headquarters project.
(a) The department of transportation is authorized to use
certificates of participation for the financing of the Olympic region
project in the amount of $34,874,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW.
(b) The Washington state department of transportation may utilize
the design-build process in accordance with chapter 39.10 RCW for the
Olympic region project. If the design-build process is used, it may be
developed in partnership with the department of general administration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--IMPROVEMENTS -- PROGRAM I
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,012,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $225,513,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,500,000
Special Category C Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,419,000
Tacoma Narrows Bridge Toll
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $272,329,000
Transportation 2005 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $433,816,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,170,576,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,207,165,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The motor vehicle account -- state appropriation includes
$42,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.843. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu
of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.
(2) The transportation 2003 account (nickel account) -- state
appropriation includes $940,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized by RCW 47.10.861. The transportation commission may
authorize the use of current revenues available to the department of
transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state
appropriation.
(3) The Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account--state appropriation
includes $257,016,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by
RCW 47.10.843. The Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account--state
appropriation includes $15,410,000 in unexpended proceeds from the
January 2003 bond sale authorized in RCW 47.10.843 for the Tacoma
Narrows bridge project.
(4) The transportation 2005 account--state appropriation includes
$380,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by House
Bill No. 2311. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu
of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.
(5) The department shall not commence construction on any part of
the SR 520 bridge project until agreements have been reached with the
incorporated towns or cities that represent the communities affected by
the SR 520 project. The agreements must provide reasonable assurance
that no further degradation will occur to the citizens' current use and
enjoyment of their properties as a result of repairs and improvements
made to the SR 520 bridge and its connecting roadways. Such assurances
may be achieved through engineering design choices, mitigation
measures, or a combination of both.
(6) The department shall, on a quarterly basis, provide status
reports to the legislature on the delivery of projects as outlined in
the project lists distributed with this act, and on any additional
projects for which the department has expended funds during the 2005-07
fiscal biennium. The department shall work with the transportation
committees of the legislature to agree on report formatting and
elements. For projects funded by new revenue in the 2003 and 2005
transportation packages, reporting elements shall include, but not be
limited to, project scope, schedule, and costs. Other projects may be
reported on a programmatic basis. The department shall also provide
the information required under this subsection via the transportation
executive information system (TEIS).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--PRESERVATION -- PROGRAM P
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,625,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $404,360,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,656,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,622,000
Puyallup Tribal Settlement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000,000
Transportation 2005 Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $160,059,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $666,322,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
$530,000 in unexpended proceeds from bond sales authorized by RCW
47.10.461 and 47.10.762 for emergency purposes.
(2) The department of transportation shall continue to implement
the lowest life cycle cost planning approach to pavement management
throughout the state to encourage the most effective and efficient use
of pavement preservation funds. Emphasis should be placed on
increasing the number of roads addressed on time and reducing the
number of roads past due.
(3) $11,000,000 of the Puyallup tribal settlement account--state
appropriation is provided solely for mitigation costs associated with
the Murray Morgan/11st Street Bridge demolition. The department may
negotiate with the city of Tacoma for the purpose of transferring
ownership of the Murray Morgan/11th Street Bridge to the city. The
department is allowed to use the Puyallup tribal settlement account
appropriation, as well as any funds appropriated in the current
biennium and planned in future biennia for the demolition and
mitigation for the demolition of the bridge to rehabilitate or replace
the bridge, if agreed to by the city. In no event will the
department's participation exceed $26,500,000 and no funds may be
expended unless the city of Tacoma agrees to take ownership of the
bridge in its entirety and provide that the payment of these funds
extinguishes any real or implied agreements regarding future
expenditures on the bridge.
(4) The department shall, on a quarterly basis, provide status
reports to the legislature on the delivery of projects as outlined in
the project lists distributed with this act, and on any additional
projects for which the department has expended funds during the 2005-07
fiscal biennium. The department shall work with the transportation
committees of the legislature to agree on report formatting and
elements. For projects funded by new revenue in the 2003 and 2005
transportation packages, reporting elements shall include, but not be
limited to, project scope, schedule, and costs. Other projects may be
reported on a programmatic basis. The department shall also provide
the information required under this subsection via the transportation
executive information system (TEIS).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q -- CAPITAL
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,489,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,068,000
Motor Vehicle Account--Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $108,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,665,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The motor vehicle account--state
appropriation includes $11,010,000 for state matching funds for
federally selected competitive grant or congressional earmark projects
other than the commercial vehicle information systems and network.
These moneys shall be placed into reserve status until such time as
federal funds are secured that require a state match.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM W
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $159,339,000
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $59,967,000
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account--Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,249,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,987,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $267,568,000

The appropriations in this section are provided for improving the
Washington state ferry system, including, but not limited to, vessel
construction, major and minor vessel preservation, and terminal
preservation, construction, and improvements. The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(1) The Puget Sound capital construction account -- state
appropriation includes $83,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for vessel and terminal acquisition, major
and minor improvements, and long lead time materials acquisition for
the Washington state ferries. The transportation commission may
authorize the use of current revenues available to the motor vehicle
account in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state
appropriation.
(2) The multimodal transportation account--state appropriation
includes $10,249,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by
RCW 47.10.843. Funding may be transferred from the multimodal
transportation account to the motor vehicle account to cover the debt
service on these bonds. The transportation commission may authorize
the use of current revenues available to the department of
transportation in lieu of bond proceeds from any part of the state
appropriation.
(3) The department shall, on a quarterly basis, provide status
reports to the legislature on the delivery of projects as outlined in
the project lists distributed with this act, and on any additional
projects for which the department has expended funds during the 2005-07
fiscal biennium. The department shall work with the transportation
committees of the legislature to agree on report formatting and
elements. For projects funded by new revenue in the 2003 and 2005
transportation packages, reporting elements shall include, but not be
limited to, project scope, schedule, and costs. Other projects may be
reported on a programmatic basis. The department shall also provide
the information required under this subsection via the transportation
executive information system (TEIS).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- CAPITAL
Essential Rail Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,408,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,966,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,287,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,911,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The multimodal transportation account -- state appropriation
includes $33,435,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds and $830,000 in
unexpended bond proceeds authorized by RCW 47.10.867. The
transportation commission may authorize the use of current revenues
available to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds
for any part of the state appropriation.
(2) If federal block grant funding for freight or passenger rail is
received, the department shall consult with the house of
representatives and senate transportation committees prior to spending
the funds on additional projects.
(3) The department shall, on a quarterly basis, provide status
reports to the legislature on the delivery of projects as outlined in
the project lists distributed with this act, and on any additional
projects for which the department has expended funds during the 2005-07
fiscal biennium. The department shall work with the transportation
committees of the legislature to agree on report formatting and
elements. For projects funded by new revenue in the 2003 and 2005
transportation packages, reporting elements shall include, but not be
limited to, project scope, schedule, and costs. Other projects may be
reported on a programmatic basis. The department shall also provide
the information required under this subsection via the transportation
executive information system (TEIS).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- CAPITAL
Highway Infrastructure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $207,000
Highway Infrastructure Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,602,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,402,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,221,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,463,000
Freight Mobility Investment
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000
Transportation 2005 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $770,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $82,665,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department shall, on a quarterly basis, provide status
reports to the legislature on the delivery of projects as outlined in
the project lists distributed with this act, and on any additional
projects for which the department has expended funds during the 2005-07
fiscal biennium. The department shall work with the transportation
committees of the legislature to agree on report formatting and
elements. For projects funded by new revenue in the 2003 and 2005
transportation packages, reporting elements shall include, but not be
limited to, project scope, schedule, and costs. Other projects may be
reported on a programmatic basis. The department shall also provide
the information required under this subsection via the transportation
executive information system (TEIS).
(2) The multimodal transportation account -- state appropriation
includes $6,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by
RCW 47.10.867. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu
of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.
(3) $3,545,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely to fund the
multiphase cooperative project with the state of Oregon to dredge the
Columbia River. The amount provided in this subsection shall lapse
unless the state of Oregon appropriates a dollar-for-dollar match to
fund its share of the project.
(4) $1,002,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
reappropriated and provided solely for additional traffic and
pedestrian safety improvements near schools. The highways and local
programs division within the department of transportation shall
administer this program. The department shall review all projects
receiving grant awards under this program at least semiannually to
determine whether the projects are making satisfactory progress. Any
project that has been awarded traffic and pedestrian safety improvement
grant funds, but does not report activity on the project within one
year of grant award should be reviewed by the department to determine
whether the grant should be terminated. The department must promptly
close out grants when projects have been completed, and identify where
unused grant funds remain because actual project costs were lower than
estimated in the grant award. The department shall expeditiously
extend new grant awards to qualified projects when funds become
available either because grant awards have been rescinded for lack of
sufficient project activity or because completed projects returned
excess grant funds upon project closeout.
(5) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
$905,000 in unexpended proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by
RCW 47.10.843.
(6) $868,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely to support the safe routes to school
program.
(7) $18,221,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation
and $3,400,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation are
provided solely for the local freight capital projects in progress
identified in this subsection. The specific funding listed is provided
solely for the respective projects: SR 397 Ainsworth Ave. Grade
Crossing, $5,540,000; Colville Alternate Truck Route, $2,000,000; S.
228th Street Extension and Grade Separation, $6,500,000; Duwamish
Intelligent Transportation Systems (ITS), $2,520,000; Bigelow Gulch
Road-Urban Boundary to Argonne Rd., $2,000,000; Granite Falls Alternate
Route, $1,791,000; Port of Kennewick/Piert Road, $520,000; and Pacific
Hwy. E./Port of Tacoma Road to Alexander, $750,000.
(8) $6,000,000 of the multimodal account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the local freight 'D' street grade separation
project.

TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE ACCOUNT AND
TRANSPORTATION FUND REVENUE
Highway Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,713,000
Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,775,000
Ferry Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,010,000
Transportation Improvement Board Bond Retirement
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,899,000
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,562,000
Transportation Improvement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $105,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $303,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,177,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $451,544,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL AGENT CHARGES
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $283,000
Transportation Improvement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $96,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,400,000
Transportation 2005 Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,800,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,592,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
MVFT BONDS AND TRANSFERS
(1) Motor Vehicle Account--State Reappropriation:
For transfer to the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge
account . . . . . . . . . . . . $257,016,000

The department of transportation is authorized to sell up to
$257,016,000 in bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for the Tacoma
Narrows bridge project. Proceeds from the sale of the bonds shall be
deposited into the motor vehicle account. The department of
transportation shall inform the treasurer of the amount to be
deposited.

(2) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Puget Sound capital construction
account . . . . . . . . . . . . $83,000,000

The department of transportation is authorized to sell up to
$83,000,000 in bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for vessel and
terminal acquisition, major and minor improvements, and long lead-time
materials acquisition for the Washington state ferries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES
FOR DISTRIBUTION
Motor Vehicle Account Appropriation for
motor vehicle fuel tax distributions to cities
and counties . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,757,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 405 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS
Motor Vehicle Account--State
Appropriation: For motor vehicle fuel tax
refunds and transfers . . . . . . . . . . . . $820,769,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 406 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--TRANSFERS
(1) RV Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Motor Vehicle Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
(2) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to Puget Sound Capital Construction
Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,000,000
(3) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Transportation 2005 Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,430,000
(4) Highway Safety Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Multimodal Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,170,000
(5) Transportation 2005 Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Small City Pavement and Sidewalk
Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
(6) Transportation 2005 Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Transportation Improvement Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
(7) Transportation 2005 Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Rural Arterial Trust Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
(8) DOL Technology Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Motor Vehicle Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
(9) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the State Patrol Highway Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,855,000
(10) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Nickel Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $990,000

The transfers identified in this section are subject to the
following conditions and limitations: The department of transportation
shall only transfer funds in subsection (2) of this section up to the
level provided, on an as-needed basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 407 STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS. In addition to
the amounts appropriated in sections 101 through 408 of this act for
revenue for distribution, state contributions to the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system, and bond retirement and
interest including ongoing bond registration and transfer charges,
transfers, interest on registered warrants, and certificates of
indebtedness, there is also appropriated such further amounts as may be
required or available for these purposes under any statutory formula or
under any proper bond covenant made under law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 408 The department of transportation is
authorized to undertake federal advance construction projects under the
provisions of 23 U.S.C. Sec. 115 in order to maintain progress in
meeting approved highway construction and preservation objectives. The
legislature recognizes that the use of state funds may be required to
temporarily fund expenditures of the federal appropriations for the
highway construction and preservation programs for federal advance
construction projects prior to conversion to federal funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 409 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS--TRANSFERS
State Patrol Highway Account: For transfer to the
department of retirement systems expense account:
For the administrative expenses of the
Washington state patrol retirement system . . . . . . . . . . . . $280,000

COMPENSATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 EMPLOYEE SALARY COST OF LIVING ADJUSTMENT
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,828,000

The appropriation in this section shall be expended solely for the
purposes designated in this section and is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In addition to the purposes set forth in subsections (2) and
(3) of this section, the appropriation in this section is provided
solely for a 3.2% increase effective July 1, 2005, for all classified
employees and state employees under the personnel system reform act of
2002. Also included are employees in the Washington management
service, and exempt employees under the jurisdiction of the personnel
resources board or the director of personnel, as applicable.
(2) The appropriation is also sufficient to fund a 3.2% salary
increase effective September 1, 2005, for general government,
legislative, and judicial employees exempt from merit system rules
whose maximum salaries are not set by the commission on salaries for
elected officials.
(3) The appropriation in this section is provided for a 1.6% salary
increase effective July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, for all
classified employees and state employees under the personnel system
reform act of 2002. Also included are employees in the Washington
management service, and exempt employees under the jurisdiction of the
personnel resources board or the director of personnel, as applicable.
The appropriation is also sufficient to fund a 1.6% salary increase
effective September 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, for general
government, legislative, and judicial employees exempt from merit
system rules whose maximum salaries are not set by the commission on
salaries for elected officials.
(4)(a) No salary increase may be paid under this section to any
person whose salary has been Y-rated pursuant to rules adopted by the
personnel resources board or the director of personnel, as applicable.
(b) The average salary increases paid under this section to agency
officials whose maximum salaries are established by the committee on
agency official salaries shall not exceed the average increases
provided under subsection (2) of this section.
(5) The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriations schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this
section, as identified by agency and account in LEAP document "2005-07
Transportation Budget-Salary Adjustment Allocation" dated April 11,
2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 COMPENSATION--INSURANCE BENEFITS
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,515,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit
premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the
uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $663.00 per eligible employee
for fiscal year 2006. For fiscal year 2007 the monthly employer
funding rate shall not exceed $744.00 per eligible represented employee
or $618.00 per eligible non-represented employee.
(b) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health
benefits, the public employees' benefits board shall require any or all
of the following: Employee premium co-payments, increases in
point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed
competition, or other changes to benefits consistent with RCW
41.05.065.
(c) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on
behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on
prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any
other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims
payments, into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to
be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not be used for
administrative expenditures.
(2) The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriations schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this
section, as identified by agency and account in LEAP document "2005-07
Transportation Budget-Health Benefit Adjustment Allocation" dated April
11, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . ($11,362,000)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding in this section is provided solely
for funding agency savings in the cost of other compensation items
provided at the pension rates as set forth in House Bill No. 1043 and
House Bill No. 1044. The office of financial management shall update
agency appropriations schedules to reflect the addition of the funding
in this section, as identified by agency and account in OFM document
"2005-07 Transportation Budget-Pension Adjustment Allocation" dated
April 11, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 CLASSIFICATION REVISIONS
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,000

The appropriation in this section, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, shall be expended solely for the purposes designated in this
section and is subject to the following conditions and limitations:
Funding is provided for partial implementation of classification
consolidation and revisions under the personnel system reform act of
2002. Groups 2 and 3 of the department of personnel's initial class
consolidation plan are affected.
The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriations schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this
section, as identified by agency and account in OFM document 2005-07-8Q
dated March 21, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505 SALARY SURVEY
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,340,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided for
implementing the department of personnel's 2002 salary survey for those
classifications identified as being more than 25 percent lower than the
market rate in the department of personnel's 2002 salary survey.

IMPLEMENTING PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 INFORMATION SYSTEMS PROJECTS. Agencies
shall comply with the following requirements regarding information
systems projects when specifically directed to do so by sections 101
through 604 of this act.
(1) Agency planning and decisions concerning information technology
shall be made in the context of its information technology portfolio.
"Information technology portfolio" means a strategic management
approach in which the relationships between agency missions and
information technology investments can be seen and understood, such
that: Technology efforts are linked to agency objectives and business
plans; the impact of new investments on existing infrastructure and
business functions are assessed and understood before implementation;
and agency activities are consistent with the development of an
integrated, nonduplicative statewide infrastructure.
(2) Agencies shall use their information technology portfolios in
making decisions on matters related to the following:
(a) System refurbishment, acquisitions, and development efforts;
(b) Setting goals and objectives for using information technology
in meeting legislatively-mandated missions and business needs;
(c) Assessment of overall information processing performance,
resources, and capabilities;
(d) Ensuring appropriate transfer of technological expertise for
the operation of any new systems developed using external resources;
and
(e) Progress toward enabling electronic access to public
information.
(3) Each project will be planned and designed to take optimal
advantage of Internet technologies and protocols. Agencies shall
ensure that the project is in compliance with the architecture,
infrastructure, principles, policies, and standards of digital
government as maintained by the information services board.
(4) The agency shall produce a feasibility study for information
technology projects at the direction of the information services board
and in accordance with published department of information services
policies and guidelines. At a minimum, such studies shall include a
statement of: (a) The purpose or impetus for change; (b) the business
value to the agency, including an examination and evaluation of
benefits, advantages, and cost; (c) a comprehensive risk assessment
based on the proposed project's impact on both citizens and state
operations, its visibility, and the consequences of doing nothing; (d)
the impact on agency and statewide information infrastructure; and (e)
the impact of the proposed enhancements to an agency's information
technology capabilities on meeting service delivery demands.
(5) The agency shall produce a comprehensive management plan for
each project. The plan or plans shall address all factors critical to
successful completion of each project. The plan(s) shall include, but
is not limited to, the following elements: A description of the
problem or opportunity that the information technology project is
intended to address; a statement of project objectives and assumptions;
a definition and schedule of phases, tasks, and activities to be
accomplished; and the estimated cost of each phase. The planning for
the phased approach shall be such that the business case justification
for a project needs to demonstrate how the project recovers cost or
adds measurable value or positive cost benefit to the agency's business
functions within each development cycle.
(6) The agency shall produce quality assurance plans for
information technology projects. Consistent with the direction of the
information services board and the published policies and guidelines of
the department of information services, the quality assurance plan
shall address all factors critical to successful completion of the
project and successful integration with the agency and state
information technology infrastructure. At a minimum, quality assurance
plans shall provide time and budget benchmarks against which project
progress can be measured, a specification of quality assurance
responsibilities, and a statement of reporting requirements. The
quality assurance plans shall set out the functionality requirements
for each phase of a project.
(7) A copy of each feasibility study, project management plan, and
quality assurance plan shall be provided to the department of
information services, the office of financial management, and
legislative fiscal committees. The plans and studies shall demonstrate
a sound business case that justifies the investment of taxpayer funds
on any new project, an assessment of the impact of the proposed system
on the existing information technology infrastructure, the disciplined
use of preventative measures to mitigate risk, and the leveraging of
private-sector expertise as needed. Authority to expend any funds for
individual information systems projects is conditioned on the approval
of the relevant feasibility study, project management plan, and quality
assurance plan by the department of information services and the office
of financial management.
(8) Quality assurance status reports shall be submitted to the
department of information services, the office of financial management,
and legislative fiscal committees at intervals specified in the
project's quality assurance plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 During the 2005-07 biennium, the director
of general administration, through the office of state procurement,
shall:
(1) In consultation with the state investment board and the state
treasurer's office, explore and implement strategies designed to reduce
the overall cost of fuel and mitigate the impact of market fluctuations
and pressure on both short-term and long-term fuel costs. The
department of general administration shall contract for these services.
These fuel cost mitigation strategies shall be made available to all
state agencies, institutions of higher education, and political
subdivisions that purchase fuel through the office of state
procurement. These strategies may include but are not limited to
futures contracts, swap transactions, option contracts, costless
collars, and long-term storage.
(2) Recommend a mechanism for funding these fuel cost mitigation
strategies that recognizes that the benefit accrues across state and
local governments. To pay for these services, the director may also
explore negotiated incentives with contracted providers.
(3) Report to the fiscal committees of the legislature each
December 15th regarding the types of contracts established to mitigate
fuel costs, the amounts of fuel covered by the contracts, and the cost
mitigation results. The reports shall also include recommendations for
improving or continuing the fuel cost mitigation program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 The department of transportation may
transfer federal funds for state funds within the preservation and
improvement programs if funded projects are eligible to use additional
federal funds and the scope of the project is not increased. The
department shall not transfer funds as authorized under this subsection
without approval of the transportation commission and the director of
financial management. A report of the transfers will be submitted on
October 1st of each fiscal year to the senate and house of
representatives transportation committees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604 The transportation commission may
authorize a transfer of spending allocation within the appropriation
provided and between projects funded with transportation 2003 state
appropriations and transportation 2005 account--state appropriations to
manage project spending and efficiently deliver all projects in the
program under the following conditions and limitations:
(1) Transfers from a project may be made if the funds allocated to
the project are in excess of the amount needed to complete the project;
(2) Transfers from a project may be made if the project is
experiencing unavoidable expenditure delays;
(3) Transfers may be made between fund sources on projects that
contain both transportation 2003 state appropriations, transportation
2005 account appropriations, and other funds;
(4) Each transfer between projects may only occur if the commission
finds that any resulting change will not impact completing the projects
approved by the legislature; and
(5) Transfers may not occur to projects not identified on the list.
(6) A report of the transfers shall be submitted on October 1st of
each fiscal year to the senate and house of representatives
transportation committees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605 The department of transportation, in
conjunction with the office of financial management, must implement the
governmental accounting standards board's (GASB) statement number 34.
The financial reporting value of the state's highway system must be
adjusted for any new additions to the system. The biennial reporting
of the condition of the system must be related to the funding levels of
maintaining the system. The department must maintain a current
inventory of the state's highway system and estimate the actual cost to
maintain and preserve the assets. In addition to the GASB statement
34, the department of transportation with the office of financial
management's assistance must establish an asset replacement value for
the state's highway system. A report must be submitted to the
transportation committees of the senate and the house of
representatives each April. During 2005, the speaker of the house of
representatives and the president of the senate must select one member
from each caucus to work with the office of financial management, the
joint legislative audit and review committee, the department of
transportation, and the department of general administration to
identify areas in state government where the GASB philosophy could be
implemented. The purpose of this effort is to enhance decision-making
that will result in strategic long-term investment decisions in
transportation capital project management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 606 The department of transportation shall not
authorize, certify, or otherwise allow toll credits for any purpose
relating to passenger-only vessels not owned by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 607 The department of transportation shall
eliminate 131 middle management positions by June 30, 2007. The middle
management reduction, however, shall not impact the work force required
to manage and support the delivery of the 2003 nickel package and 2005
transportation partnership package.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 608 If a regional funding plan has not been
implemented and approved by the voters by January 1, 2007, any projects
funded in this act that require matching funds for completion will be
reviewed to determine project viability before reappropriating unused
funds for the 2007-09 biennial budget.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 609 The legislature intends that tolls be
charged to offset or partially offset the costs for the Alaskan Way
Viaduct, State Route 520 Bridge replacement, and widening of Interstate
405.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 610 The following measures are necessary to
implement the provisions contained in this budget, and are not subject
to the cutoff resolution: HB 1541; HB 1865; HB 1879; HB 2085; HB 2124;
HB 2157; SB 5058; SB 5121; SB 5139; SB 5177; SB 5414; SB 5513; SB 5623;
SB 5775.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 611 The department of transportation shall not
authorize, certify, or otherwise allow toll credits for any purpose
relating to the design, construction, or operation of a
federally-funded tunnel in the vicinity of Bremerton. No state funds
may be spent on any phase of design or construction, and no state funds
shall be expended on the maintenance, operation, preservation or repair
of a federally-funded tunnel in the vicinity of Bremerton.

2003-05 BIENNIUMGENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIES--OPERATING
Sec. 700 2004 c 229 s 101 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE MARINE EMPLOYEES COMMISSION
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($365,000))
$375,000

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES--OPERATING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 A new section is added to 2003 c 360
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES. (1) Operating appropriations made in
this act to the department of transportation, department of licensing,
and the Washington state patrol shall initially be allotted as required
by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include
transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly
provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications permit moneys
that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other
than that purpose.
(2) The operating appropriations to the department of
transportation in this act shall be expended for the programs and in
the amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, 2005, unless
specifically prohibited by this act, the department may transfer motor
vehicle account--state appropriations, multimodal transportation
account--state appropriations, or Puget Sound ferry operations
account--state appropriations for fiscal year 2005 among programs after
approval by the director of financial management.
(3) The operating appropriations to the department of licensing in
this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts
specified in this act. However, after May 1, 2005, unless specifically
prohibited by this act, the department may transfer highway safety
account--state appropriations for fiscal year 2005 among programs after
approval by the director of financial management.
(4) The operating appropriations to the Washington state patrol in
this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts
specified in this act. However, after May 1, 2005, unless specifically
prohibited by this act, the department may transfer state patrol
highway account--state appropriations for fiscal year 2005 among
programs after approval by the director of financial management.

Sec. 702 2004 c 229 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- SUPPORT SERVICES BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($69,799,000))
$70,951,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,290,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($71,089,000))
$72,241,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Under the direction of the legislative
auditor, the patrol shall update the pursuit vehicle life-cycle cost
model developed in the 1998 Washington state patrol performance audit
(JLARC Report 99-4). The patrol shall utilize the updated model as a
basis for determining maintenance and other cost impacts resulting from
the increase to pursuit vehicle mileage above 110 thousand miles in the
2003-05 biennium. The patrol shall submit a report, that includes
identified cost impacts, to the transportation committees of the senate
and house of representatives by December 31, 2003.

Sec. 703 2004 c 229 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $97,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $84,000
Highway Safety Account--Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,316,000))
$8,318,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,403,000
DOL Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $144,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,053,000))
$13,055,000

Sec. 704 2004 c 229 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- INFORMATION SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $144,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,656,000))
$11,690,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
Highway Safety Account--Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,285,000
DOL Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,220,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,428,000))
$19,462,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department shall submit a report to the transportation
committees of the legislature detailing the progress made in
transitioning off of the Unisys system by December 1, 2003, and each
December 1 thereafter.
(2) $151,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Third Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5412. Within the amount provided, the department of licensing
shall prepare to implement a "one-to-one" biometric matching system
that compares the biometric identifier submitted to the individual
applicant's record. The authority to expend funds provided under this
subsection is subject to compliance with the provisions under section
504 of this act. If Third Substitute Senate Bill No. 5412 is not
enacted by June 30, 2004, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

Sec. 705 2004 c 229 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- DRIVER SERVICES
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,576,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($87,259,000))
$87,123,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $318,000
Highway Safety Account--Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($90,220,000))
$90,084,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $178,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for two temporary collision processing FTEs to
eliminate the backlog of collision reports. The department shall
report, informally, to the house of representatives and senate
transportation committees quarterly, beginning October 1, 2003, on the
progress made in eliminating the backlog.
(2) $369,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5428
or House Bill No. 1681. Within the amount provided in this subsection,
the department is authorized to accept applications for driver's
license and identicard renewals via the mail or internet. If Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5428 or House Bill No. 1681 is not enacted
by June 30, 2004, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) $282,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Third Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5412. Within the amount provided, the department of licensing
shall prepare to implement a "one-to-one" biometric matching system
that compares the biometric identifier submitted to the individual
applicant's record. The authority to expend funds provided under this
subsection is subject to compliance with the provisions under section
504 of this act. If Third Substitute Senate Bill No. 5412 is not
enacted by June 30, 2004, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(4) $354,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
2532. If Substitute House Bill No. 2532 is not enacted by June 30,
2004, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(5) $538,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
2660. If Substitute House Bill No. 2660 is not enacted by June 30,
2004, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec.706 2004 c 229 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY -- PROGRAM
C
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($56,236,000))
$53,522,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,163,000))
$6,654,000
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,038,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $363,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($68,800,000))
$67,577,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $850,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided for the continued maintenance and support of the
transportation executive information system (TEIS). The TEIS shall be
enhanced during the 2004 interim to shift towards a monitoring and
reporting system capable of tracking and reporting on major project
milestones and measurements. The department shall work with the
legislature to identify and define meaningful milestones and measures
to be used in monitoring the scope, schedule, and cost of projects.
(2)(a) $2,959,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
and $2,963,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of a new revenue collection system,
including the integration of the regional fare coordination system
(smart card), at the Washington state ferries. By December 1st of each
year, an annual update must be provided to the legislative
transportation committee concerning the status of implementing and
completing this project.
(b) $200,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the smart card
program.
(3) The department shall contract with the department of
information services to conduct a survey that identifies possible
opportunities and benefits associated with siting and use of technology
and wireless facilities located on state right of way authorized by RCW
47.60.140. The department shall submit a report regarding the survey
to the appropriate legislative committees by December 1, 2004.

Sec. 707 2004 c 229 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--FACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS
AND CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM D -- OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,981,000))
$30,515,000

Sec. 708 2004 c 229 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND
SUPPORT -- PROGRAM H
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,056,000))
$48,056,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,456,000))
$48,456,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($14,310,000)) $13,985,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the staffing, activities, and
overhead of the department's environmental affairs office. This
funding is provided in lieu of funding provided in sections 305 and 306
of this act.
(2) $3,100,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the staffing and activities of the transportation
permit efficiency and accountability committee. The committee shall
develop a model national environmental policy act (NEPA) tribal
consultation process for federal transportation aid projects related to
the preservation of cultural, historic, and environmental resources.
The process shall ensure that Tribal participation in the NEPA
consultation process is conducted pursuant to treaty rights, federal
law, and state statutes, consistent with their expectations for
protection of such resources.
(3) $300,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided to the department in accordance with RCW 46.68.110(2) and
46.68.120(3) and shall be used by the department solely for the
purposes of providing contract services to the association of
Washington cities and Washington state association of counties to
implement section 2(3)(c), (5), and (6), chapter 8 (ESB 5279), Laws of
2003 for activities of the transportation permit efficiency and
accountability committee.

Sec. 709 2003 c 360 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS--PROGRAM K
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,011,000))
$996,000

Sec. 710 2004 c 229 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q--OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,924,000))
$38,338,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($39,049,000))
$38,463,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) A maximum of $8,800,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation may be expended for the incident response program,
including the service patrols. The department and the Washington state
patrol shall continue to consult and coordinate with private sector
partners, such as towing companies, media, auto, insurance and trucking
associations, and the legislative transportation committees to ensure
that limited state resources are used most effectively. No funds shall
be used to purchase tow trucks.
(2) $4,400,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for low-cost enhancements. The department shall give
priority to low-cost enhancement projects that improve safety or
provide congestion relief. The department shall prioritize low-cost
enhancement projects on a statewide rather than regional basis.
(3) At a frequency determined by the department, the interstate-5
variable message signs shall display a message advising slower traffic
to keep right.
(4) The appropriation authority under this section includes
spending authority to administer the motorist information sign panel
program. The department shall establish the annual fees charged for
these services so that all costs to administer this program are
recovered; in no event, however, shall the department charge more than:
(a) $1,000 per business per location on freeways and expressways
with average daily trips greater than 80,000;
(b) $750 per business per location on freeways and expressways with
average daily trips less than 80,000; and
(c) $400 per business per location on conventional highways.

Sec. 711 2004 c 229 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND
SUPPORT -- PROGRAM S
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,579,000))
$24,079,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $636,000
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,093,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $973,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,281,000))
$26,781,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $627,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
5248. If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5248 is not enacted by June 30,
2003, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. The agency
may transfer between programs funds provided in this subsection.
(2) The department shall transfer at no cost to the Washington
state patrol the title to the Walla Walla colocation facility.

Sec. 712 2004 c 229 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA,
AND RESEARCH -- PROGRAM T
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,494,000))
$24,694,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,814,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,521,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,829,000))
$43,029,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,800,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for a study of regional congestion relief solutions for
Puget Sound (including state route 169), Spokane, and Vancouver. The
study must include proposals to alleviate congestion consistent with
population and land use expectations under the growth management act,
and must include measurement of all modes of transportation.
(2) $2,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for additional assistance to support regional
transportation planning organizations and long-range transportation
planning efforts. As a condition of receiving this support, a regional
transportation planning organization containing any county with a
population in excess of one million shall provide voting membership on
its executive board to any incorporated principal city of a
metropolitan statistical area within the region, as designated by the
United States census bureau.
(3) (($3,000,000)) $1,200,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the costs of the regional
transportation investment district (RTID) election and department of
transportation project oversight. These funds are provided as a loan
to the RTID and shall be repaid to the state motor vehicle account
within one year following the certification of the election results
related to the RTID.
(4) $650,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided to the department in accordance with RCW 46.68.110(2) and
46.68.120(3) and shall be used by the department to support the
processing and analysis of the backlog of city and county collision
reports.
(5) The department shall contribute to the report required in
section 208(1) of this act in the form of an analysis of the cost
impacts incurred by the department as the result of the policy
implemented in section 208(1) of this act. The analysis shall contrast
overtime costs charged by the patrol prior to July 1, 2003, with
contract costs for similar services after July 1, 2003.
(6) $60,000 of the distribution under RCW 46.68.110(2) and
46.68.120(3) is provided solely to the department for the Washington
strategic freight transportation analysis.
(7) $500,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for contracting with the department of
natural resources to develop data systems for state submerged lands
that can be shared with other governmental agencies and that can
support the state vision for ecoregional planning. The data to be
shared shall include, but not limited to, tabular and geospatial data
describing public land ownership, distributions of native plants,
marine and aquatic species and their habitats, physical attributes,
aquatic ecosystems, and specially designated conservation or
environmentally sensitive areas.

Sec. 713 2004 c 229 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM V
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,057,000))
$46,757,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,574,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $155,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,786,000))
$49,486,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $18,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a grant program for special needs
transportation provided by transit agencies and nonprofit providers of
transportation.
(a) $4,000,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is
provided solely for grants to nonprofit providers of special needs
transportation. Grants for nonprofit providers shall be based on need,
including the availability of other providers of service in the area,
efforts to coordinate trips among providers and riders, and the cost
effectiveness of trips provided.
(b) $14,000,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is
provided solely for grants to transit agencies to transport persons
with special transportation needs. To receive a grant, the transit
agency must have a maintenance of effort for special needs
transportation that is no less than the previous year's maintenance of
effort for special needs transportation. Grants for transit agencies
shall be prorated based on the amount expended for demand response
service and route deviated service in calendar year 2001 as reported in
the "Summary of Public Transportation - 2001" published by the
department of transportation. No transit agency may receive more than
thirty percent of these distributions.
(2) $1,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants to implement section 9 of
Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2228.
(3) Funds are provided for the rural mobility grant program as
follows:
(a) $6,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants for those transit systems
serving small cities and rural areas as identified in the Summary of
Public Transportation - 2001 published by the department of
transportation. Noncompetitive grants must be distributed to the
transit systems serving small cities and rural areas in a manner
similar to past disparity equalization programs.
(b) $4,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely to providers of rural mobility service
in areas not served or underserved by transit agencies through a
competitive grant process.
(4) $4,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a vanpool grant program for: (a)
Public transit agencies to add vanpools; and (b) incentives for
employers to increase employee vanpool use. The grant program for
public transit agencies will cover capital costs only; no operating
costs for public transit agencies are eligible for funding under this
grant program. No additional employees may be hired for the vanpool
grant program, and supplanting of transit funds currently funding
vanpools is not allowed. Additional criteria for selecting grants will
include leveraging funds other than state funds. The commute trip
reduction task force shall determine the cost effectiveness of the
grants, including vanpool system coordination, regarding the use of the
funds.
(5) $100,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the commute trip reduction program
for Benton county.
(6) $3,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided to the city of Seattle for the Seattle
streetcar project on South Lake Union.
(7) $500,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely to King county as a state match to
obtain federal funding for a car sharing program.

Sec. 714 2004 c 229 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- MARINE -- PROGRAM X
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($312,490,000))
$324,058,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,120,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($317,610,000))
$329,178,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is based on the budgeted expenditure of
(($35,348,000)) $51,048,000 for vessel operating fuel in the 2003-2005
biennium. If the actual cost of fuel is less than this budgeted
amount, the excess amount may not be expended. If the actual cost
exceeds this amount, the department shall request a supplemental
appropriation.
(2) The appropriation provides for the compensation of ferry
employees. The expenditures for compensation paid to ferry employees
during the 2003-2005 biennium may not exceed $208,935,700, plus a
dollar amount, as prescribed by the office of financial management,
that is equal to any insurance benefit increase granted general
government employees in excess of $495.30 a month annualized per
eligible marine employee multiplied by the number of eligible marine
employees for fiscal year 2004 and $567.67 a month annualized per
eligible marine employee multiplied by the number of eligible marine
employees for fiscal year 2005, a dollar amount as prescribed by the
office of financial management for costs associated with pension
amortization charges, and a dollar amount prescribed by the office of
financial management for salary increases during the 2003-2005
biennium. For the purposes of this section, the expenditures for
compensation paid to ferry employees shall be limited to salaries and
wages and employee benefits as defined in the office of financial
management's policies, regulations, and procedures named under objects
of expenditure "A" and "B" (7.2.6.2).
The prescribed salary increase or decrease dollar amount that shall
be allocated from the governor's compensation appropriations is in
addition to the appropriation contained in this section and may be used
to increase or decrease compensation costs, effective July 1, 2003, and
thereafter, as established in the 2003-2005 general fund operating
budget.
(3) $4,234,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation and $800,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations
account--state appropriation are provided solely for operating costs
associated with the Vashon to Seattle passenger-only ferry. The
Washington state ferries will develop a plan to increase passenger-only
farebox recovery to at least forty percent by July 1, 2003, with an
additional goal of eighty percent, through increased fares, lower
operation costs, and other cost-saving measures as appropriate. In
order to implement the plan, ferry system management is authorized to
negotiate changes in work hours (requirements for split shift work),
but only with respect to operating passenger-only ferry service, to be
included in a collective bargaining agreement in effect during the
2003-05 biennium that differs from provisions regarding work hours in
the prior collective bargaining agreement. The department must report
to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1,
2003.
(4) $984,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account--state
appropriation is provided solely for ferry security operations
necessary to comply with the ferry security plan submitted by the
Washington state ferry system to the United States coast guard. The
department shall track security costs and expenditures. Ferry security
operations costs shall not be included as part of the operational costs
that are used to calculate farebox recovery.
(5) $866,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation and $200,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations
account--state appropriation are provided solely for operating costs
associated with the Bremerton to Seattle passenger-only ferry service
for thirteen weeks.
(6) The department shall study the potential for private or public
partners, including but not limited to King county, to provide
passenger-only ferry service from Vashon to Seattle. The department
shall report to the legislative transportation committees by December
31, 2003.
(7) The Washington state ferries shall continue to provide service
to Sidney, British Columbia.
(8) When augmenting the existing ferry fleet, the department of
transportation ferry capital program shall explore cost-effective
options to include the leasing of ferries from private-sector
organizations.
(9) The Washington state ferries shall work with the department of
general administration, office of state procurement to improve the
existing fuel procurement process and solicit, identify, and evaluate,
purchasing alternatives to reduce the overall cost of fuel and mitigate
the impact of market fluctuations and pressure on both short- and long-term fuel costs. Consideration shall include, but not be limited to,
long-term fuel contracts, partnering with other public entities, and
possibilities for fuel storage in evaluating strategies and options.
The department shall report back to the transportation committees of
the legislature by December 1, 2003, on the options, strategies, and
recommendations for managing fuel purchases and costs.
(10) The department must provide a separate accounting of
passenger-only ferry service costs and auto ferry service costs, and
must provide periodic reporting to the legislature on the financial
status of both passenger-only and auto ferry service in Washington
state.
(11) The Washington state ferries must work with the department's
information technology division to implement a new revenue collection
system, including the integration of the regional fare coordination
system (smart card). Each December, annual updates are to be provided
to the transportation committees of the legislature concerning the
status of implementing and completing this project, with updates
concluding the first December after full project implementation.
(12) The Washington state ferries shall evaluate the benefits and
costs of selling the depreciation rights to ferries purchased by the
state in the future through sale and lease-back agreements, as
permitted under RCW 47.60.010. The department is authorized to issue
a request for proposal to solicit proposals from potential buyers. The
department must report to the transportation committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2004, on the options, strategies, and
recommendations for sale/lease-back agreements on existing ferry boats
as well as future ferry boat purchases.

Sec. 715 2004 c 229 s 224 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- OPERATING
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($34,118,000))
$33,488,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($29,961,000)) $29,331,000 of the multimodal transportation
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the Amtrak service
contract and Talgo maintenance contract associated with providing and
maintaining the state-supported passenger rail service.
(2) No Amtrak Cascade runs may be eliminated.
(3) The department is directed to explore scheduling changes that
will reduce the delay in Seattle when traveling from Portland to
Vancouver B.C.
(4) The department is directed to explore opportunities with
British Columbia (B.C.) concerning the possibility of leasing an
existing Talgo trainset to B.C. during the day for a commuter run when
the Talgo is not in use during the Bellingham layover.

Sec. 716 2004 c 229 s 225 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z--OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,067,000))
$6,957,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,569,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,636,000))
$9,526,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Up to $75,000 of the total appropriation is provided in
accordance with RCW 46.68.110(2) and 46.68.120(3) to fund the state's
share of the 2004 Washington marine cargo forecast study. Public port
districts, acting through their association, must provide funding to
cover the remaining cost of the forecast.
(2) $300,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided in accordance with RCW 46.68.110(2) and 46.68.120(3) solely to
fund a study of the threats posed by flooding to the state and other
infrastructure near the Interstate 5 crossing of the Skagit River.
This funding is contingent on the receipt of federal matching funds.

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES--CAPITAL
NEW SECTION. Sec. 717 A new section is added to 2003 c 360
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--IMPROVEMENTS--PROGRAM I
The project titled "SR 206, SR 206 and Bruce Road Roundabout" will
not include a roundabout but will evaluate and implement other safety
measures.

TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONS
Sec. 801 2004 c 229 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND
REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND DEBT
TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE ACCOUNT AND TRANSPORTATION FUND REVENUE
Highway Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($250,000,000))
$240,833,000
Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,131,000))
$1,440,000
Ferry Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($43,340,000))
$42,084,000
Transportation Improvement Board Bond Retirement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,721,000))
$33,209,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,254,000
Special Category C Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $338,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $358,000
Transportation 2003 Account (nickel account)
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,117,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($342,499,000))
$325,873,000

Sec. 802 2004 c 229 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND
REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL
AGENT CHARGES
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,293,000))
$793,000
Special Category C Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $111,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $119,000
Transportation 2003 Account (nickel account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($700,000))
$400,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,244,000))
$1,444,000

Sec. 803 2004 c 229 s 404 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION
Motor Vehicle Account Appropriation for
motor vehicle fuel tax distributions to
cities and counties . . . . . . . . . . . . (($440,228,000))
$435,265,950
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For license permit and fee distributions to cities
and counties . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,119,000))
$0

Sec. 804 2004 c 229 s 405 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS
(1) State Patrol Highway Account -- State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor
Vehicle Account . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,000,000))
$4,000,000
(2) Motor Vehicle Account -- State
Appropriation: For motor vehicle fuel tax
refunds and transfers . . . . . . . . . . . . (($770,347,000))
$752,823,000
(3) Highway Safety Account -- State
Appropriation: For transfer to the motor
vehicle account -- state . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000

(4) Transfer from the Motor Vehicle Account--
State Appropriation to the Puget Sound ferry
operations account . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

The state treasurer shall perform the transfers from the state
patrol highway account and the highway safety account to the motor
vehicle account on a quarterly basis.

Sec. 805 2004 c 229 s 406 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRANSFERS
(1) Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation:
For transfer to Puget Sound Ferry Operations
Account . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,757,000))
$26,757,000
(2) RV Account -- State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Motor Vehicle Account -- State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,954,000
(3) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to Puget Sound Capital Construction
Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,287,000
(4) Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account--State
Appropriation: For transfer to Puget Sound Capital
Construction Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,000,000
(5) Transportation Equipment Fund--State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor Vehicle
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
(6) Advanced Right-of-Way Revolving Account--
State Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor
Vehicle Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

The transfers identified in this section are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(a) The department of transportation shall only transfer funds in
subsections (2) and (3) of this section up to the level provided, on an
as-needed basis.
(b) The department of transportation shall transfer funds in
subsection (4) of this section up to the amount identified, provided
that a minimum balance of $5,000,000 is retained in the Puget Sound
ferry operations account.
(c) The amount identified in subsection (4) of this section may not
include any revenues collected as passenger fares.

MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

INDEX PAGE #

BOARD OF PILOTAGE COMMISSIONERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
CLASSIFICATION REVISIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 36
COMPENSATION--INSURANCE BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 34
CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 35
COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 3, 21
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING
DRIVER SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 9, 44
INFORMATION SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 7, 44
MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 7, 43
VEHICLE SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 33
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AVIATION -- PROGRAM F . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES -- PROGRAM U . . . . . . . . . . . . 16
ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS--PROGRAM K . . . . . . . . . . . . 48
ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS -- PROGRAM K . . . . . . . . . . . . 12
FACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS AND CONSTRUCTION--PROGRAM D . . . . . . . . . . . . 47
FACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS AND CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM D . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM M . . . . . . . . . . . . 12
IMPROVEMENTS ||PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 57
IMPROVEMENTS -- PROGRAM I . . . . . . . . . . . . 23
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY--PROGRAM C . . . . . . . . . . . . 46
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY -- PROGRAM C . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 28
LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 21, 57
MARINE -- PROGRAM X . . . . . . . . . . . . 19, 53
PRESERVATION -- PROGRAM P . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS) . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT--PROGRAM H . . . . . . . . . . . . 47
PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT -- PROGRAM H . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM V . . . . . . . . . . . . 17, 51
RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 27
RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 20, 56
TOLL OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM B . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q -- CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 26
TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 14, 48
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 32, 60
TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT -- PROGRAM S . . . . . . . . . . . . 14, 49
TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCH -- PROGRAM T . . . . . . . . . . . . 15, 50
WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM W . . . . . . . . . . . . 26
EMPLOYEE SALARY COST OF LIVING ADJUSTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 33
FOR TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 42
FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
INFORMATION SYSTEMS PROJECTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 36
JOINT TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
MARINE EMPLOYEES COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 2, 42
SALARY SURVEY . . . . . . . . . . . . 36
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
STATE TREASURER
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST . . . . . . . . . . . . 30, 31, 58
STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 32, 59
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 32, 59
STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 33
TRANSPORTATION ACCOUNTABILITY COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 3, 22
UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
WASHINGTON STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
CAPITAL PROJECTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 21
WASHINGTON STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 21
FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
SUPPORT SERVICES BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 43
TECHNICAL SERVICES BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
--- END ---