BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.01.040 and 1983 c 3 s 117 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of licensing is vested with all powers, functions,
and duties with respect to and including the following:
(1) The motor vehicle fuel excise tax as provided in chapter 82.36
RCW;
(2) The special fuel tax as provided in chapter 82.38 RCW;
(3) The motor vehicle excise tax as provided in chapter 82.44 RCW;
(4) The house trailer excise tax as provided in chapter 82.50 RCW;
(5) All general powers and duties relating to motor vehicles as
provided in chapter 46.08 RCW;
(6) Certificates of ownership and registration as provided in
chapters 46.12 and 46.16 RCW;
(7) The registration and licensing of motor vehicles as provided in
chapters 46.12 and 46.16 RCW;
(8) Dealers' licenses as provided in chapter 46.70 RCW;
(9) The licensing of motor vehicle transporters as provided in
chapter 46.76 RCW;
(10) The licensing of ((motor)) vehicle wreckers as provided in
chapter 46.80 RCW;
(11) The administration of the laws relating to reciprocal or
proportional registration of motor vehicles as provided in chapter
46.85 RCW;
(12) The licensing of passenger vehicles for hire as provided in
chapter 46.72 RCW;
(13) Operators' licenses as provided in chapter 46.20 RCW;
(14) Commercial driver training schools as provided in chapter
46.82 RCW;
(15) Financial responsibility as provided in chapter 46.29 RCW;
(16) Accident reporting as provided in chapter 46.52 RCW;
(17) Disposition of revenues as provided in chapter 46.68 RCW;
((and))
(18) The administration of all other laws relating to motor
vehicles vested in the director of licenses on June 30, 1965; and
(19) All-terrain vehicle safety education and training program,
safety certificates, and laws relating to all-terrain vehicles as
provided in sections 3 through 6 of this act.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.09.020 and 2004 c 105 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Advisory committee" means the nonhighway and off-road vehicle
activities advisory committee established in RCW 46.09.280.
(2) "All-terrain vehicle" or "ATV" means a motorized off-highway
vehicle designed to travel on three or four low-pressure tires, having
a seat designed to be straddled by the operator and handlebars for
steering control, and intended for use by a single operator with no
passengers unless specifically manufactured to accommodate multiple
riders.
(3) "Committee" means the interagency committee for outdoor
recreation established in RCW 79A.25.110.
(((3))) (4) "Dealer" means a person, partnership, association, or
corporation engaged in the business of selling off-road vehicles at
wholesale or retail in this state.
(((4))) (5) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(((5))) (6) "Highway," for the purpose of this chapter only, means
the entire width between the boundary lines of every roadway publicly
maintained by the state department of transportation or any county or
city with funding from the motor vehicle fund. A highway is generally
capable of travel by a conventional two-wheel drive passenger
automobile during most of the year and in use by such vehicles.
(((6))) (7) "Motorized vehicle" means a vehicle that derives motive
power from an internal combustion engine.
(((7))) (8) "Nonhighway road" means any road owned or managed by a
public agency or any private road for which the owner has granted an
easement for public use for which appropriations from the motor vehicle
fund were not used for (a) original construction or reconstruction in
the last twenty-five years; or (b) maintenance in the last four years.
(((8))) (9) "Nonhighway road recreation facilities" means
recreational facilities that are adjacent to, or accessed by, a
nonhighway road and intended primarily for nonhighway road recreational
users.
(((9))) (10) "Nonhighway road recreational user" means a person
whose purpose for consuming fuel on a nonhighway road or off-road is
primarily for nonhighway road recreational purposes, including, but not
limited to, hunting, fishing, camping, sightseeing, wildlife viewing,
picnicking, driving for pleasure, kayaking/canoeing, and gathering
berries, firewood, mushrooms, and other natural products.
(((10))) (11) "Nonhighway vehicle" means any motorized vehicle
including an ORV when used for recreational purposes on nonhighway
roads, trails, or a variety of other natural terrain.
Nonhighway vehicle does not include:
(a) Any vehicle designed primarily for travel on, over, or in the
water;
(b) Snowmobiles or any military vehicles; or
(c) Any vehicle eligible for a motor vehicle fuel tax exemption or
rebate under chapter 82.36 RCW while an exemption or rebate is claimed.
This exemption includes but is not limited to farm, construction, and
logging vehicles.
(((11))) (12) "Nonmotorized recreational facilities" means
recreational trails and facilities that are adjacent to, or accessed
by, a nonhighway road and intended primarily for nonmotorized
recreational users.
(((12))) (13) "Nonmotorized recreational user" means a person whose
purpose for consuming fuel on a nonhighway road or off-road is
primarily for nonmotorized recreational purposes including, but not
limited to, walking, hiking, backpacking, climbing, cross-country
skiing, snowshoeing, mountain biking, horseback riding, and pack animal
activities.
(((13))) (14) "Off-road vehicle" or "ORV" means any nonstreet
licensed vehicle when used for recreational purposes on nonhighway
roads, trails, or a variety of other natural terrain. Such vehicles
include, but are not limited to, all-terrain vehicles, motorcycles,
four-wheel drive vehicles, and dune buggies.
(((14))) (15) "Operator" means each person who operates, or is in
physical control of, any nonhighway vehicle.
(((15))) (16) "Organized competitive event" means any competition,
advertised in advance through written notice to organized clubs or
published in local newspapers, sponsored by recognized clubs, and
conducted at a predetermined time and place.
(((16))) (17) "ORV recreation facilities" include, but are not
limited to, ORV trails, trailheads, campgrounds, ORV sports parks, and
ORV use areas, designated for ORV use by the managing authority that
are intended primarily for ORV recreational users.
(((17))) (18) "ORV recreational user" means a person whose purpose
for consuming fuel on nonhighway roads or off-road is primarily for ORV
recreational purposes, including but not limited to riding an all-terrain vehicle, motorcycling, or driving a four-wheel drive vehicle or
dune buggy.
(((18))) (19) "ORV ((sport[s])) sports park" means a facility
designed to accommodate competitive ORV recreational uses including,
but not limited to, motocross racing, four-wheel drive competitions,
and flat track racing. Use of ORV sports parks can be competitive or
noncompetitive in nature.
(((19))) (20) "ORV trail" means a multiple-use corridor designated
by the managing authority and maintained for recreational use by
motorized vehicles.
(((20))) (21) "ORV use permit" means a permit issued for operation
of an off-road vehicle under this chapter.
(((21))) (22) "Owner" means the person other than the lienholder,
having an interest in or title to a nonhighway vehicle, and entitled to
the use or possession thereof.
(((22))) (23) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership,
association, or corporation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department shall adopt standards for
and implement a comprehensive all-terrain vehicle safety education and
training program. The program must provide for the hands-on training
of all-terrain vehicle operators, and for the issuance of all-terrain
vehicle safety certificates to operators who successfully complete the
training. Course content must be adopted from a curriculum developed
by a nationally recognized safety organization, such as the All-Terrain
Vehicle Safety Institute, and approved by the director.
(2) The department may authorize persons, clubs, associations,
municipalities, or other political subdivisions of the state to conduct
classes and issue all-terrain vehicle safety certificates in the
director's name. Any authorized person, club, association,
municipality, or political subdivision may charge a reasonable fee,
subject to department approval, for the training course.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of
this section, all operators seeking a safety certificate must have the
training required by section 3 of this act.
(2) Beginning January 1, 2008, to operate an ATV on public land a
person under sixteen years of age must possess a safety certificate
issued by the director or by another state or Canadian province. A
nonresident who does not possess a safety certificate may operate an
ATV on public land for twenty-one days in a calendar year.
(3) The director may issue an "exceptional" safety certificate to
an applicant who is under sixteen years of age upon a satisfactory
showing by the applicant of at least one year of ATV operating
experience.
(4) The director shall collect a fee of ten dollars for issuance of
a safety certificate. The fees collected under this section shall be
distributed to the account created in section 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The director shall by rule establish a
program to certify all-terrain vehicle safety instructors, clubs,
associations, municipalities, or political subdivisions to conduct a
training program and to issue safety certificates in the director's
name.
(2) All-terrain vehicle safety instructors at a minimum shall meet
the following requirements to become certified:
(a) Possess a current all-terrain vehicle safety instructor
certification or license issued by a recognized all-terrain vehicle
safety organization;
(b) Be at least eighteen years of age;
(c) Have no convictions relating to or as a result of the use of
alcohol or drugs during the immediately preceding two years; and
(d) Have no previous felony convictions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Fees collected under section 4 of this act
must be deposited in the ATV safety education and training account
hereby created in the custody of the state treasurer. Expenditures
from the account may only be used to support the ATV safety education
and training program. Only the director of licensing or the director's
designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 No person may:
(1) Cross any interstate or limited access highway with an all-terrain vehicle;
(2) Operate an all-terrain vehicle on public land, if under sixteen
years of age, without continuous adult supervision;
(3) Operate an all-terrain vehicle on public land, if under sixteen
years of age, without eye protection and a safety helmet;
(4) Carry a passenger on an all-terrain vehicle on public land
unless the ATV is specifically manufactured to accommodate multiple
riders.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The director may adopt rules necessary to
carry out and enforce sections 2 through 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 3 through 7 of this act are each
added to chapter 46.09 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act takes effect January 1, 2008.

--- END ---