BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.88 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The ready reserve account is created in the state treasury.
Beginning with fiscal year 2006, at the end of each fiscal year, the
state treasurer shall deposit in the ready reserve account all general
fund-state revenues in excess of the expenditures from general fund-state appropriations for that fiscal year, up to the state expenditure
limit for that fiscal year. The office of financial management shall
determine the amount that is in excess of the expenditures from the
general fund-state appropriation for that fiscal year and shall inform
the state treasurer.
(2) The ready reserve account fund balance shall not exceed five
percent of annual general fund-state revenues. Any balance in excess
of five percent shall be transferred upon notice by the office of
financial management, but no less than once per fiscal year by the
state treasurer, to the emergency reserve fund.
(3) The legislature may appropriate moneys from the ready reserve
account with a simple majority vote of both houses of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.88 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The general fund working capital designation is not available
for expenditures. For fiscal year 2005, the general fund working
capital designation base shall be the amount equal to the state share
of the June 30, 2003, gross receipts tax accruals.
(2) For fiscal year 2005, the general fund working capital
designation shall be equal to the base as calculated in subsection (1)
of this section adjusted for the difference between the general fund
cash and generally accepted accounting principles forecast for fiscal
year 2005 as determined by the economic and revenue forecast council
and the amount of the fair value adjustment to general fund temporary
investments as determined by the office of the state treasurer. For
fiscal year 2006 and thereafter, the general fund working capital
designation shall be the previous fiscal year's general fund working
capital designation adjusted for the difference between general fund
cash and generally accepted accounting principles forecast as
determined by the economic and revenue forecast council and the amount
of the fair value adjustment to general fund temporary investments as
determined by the office of the state treasurer.
(3) In fiscal year 2005, the difference between the general fund
working capital designation as recorded for fiscal year 2004 and the
amount determined as a result of subsection (1) of this section shall
be designated for subsequent transfer to the ready reserve account
established in section 1 of this act. In fiscal year 2006, forty
percent of this difference shall be transferred to the ready reserve
account. In fiscal year 2007, sixty percent of this difference shall
be transferred to the ready reserve account. The office of financial
management shall provide the state treasurer with the amounts to be
transferred. For subsequent fiscal years, the general fund working
capital designation shall not be available for appropriation or other
expenditure authority.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.88.260 and 1987 c 502 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It shall be unlawful for any agency head or disbursing officer
to incur any cash deficiency and any appointive officer or employee
violating the provisions of this section shall be subject to summary
removal.
(2) This section does not apply to:
(a) Temporary cash deficiencies resulting from disbursements under
((a)) an expenditure plan approved under RCW 43.88.110.
(b) Temporary cash deficiencies authorized by the director of
financial management for funds and accounts in the state treasury or in
the custody of the state treasurer. Each authorization under this
subsection (b) shall distinctly specify the fund or account for which
a deficiency is authorized, the maximum amount of cash deficiency which
may be incurred, and the maximum time period during which the cash
deficiency may continue. Each authorization shall expire at the end of
each fiscal biennium unless renewed by the director of financial
management. The director of financial management shall report each
authorization and renewal to the legislative fiscal committees.
(c) Temporary cash deficiencies in funds or accounts which are
neither in the state treasury, nor in the custody of the treasurer, if
the cash deficiency does not continue past the end of the fiscal
biennium.
(3) Nothing in this section permits the expenditure of moneys in
excess of an applicable appropriation.
(4) For purposes of determining whether a cash deficiency exists,
the general fund cash balance shall be the sum of the general fund and
the ready reserve account balances.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.135.035 and 2001 c 3 s 8 and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 2 s
2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) After July 1, 1995, any action or combination of actions by the
legislature that raises state revenue or requires revenue-neutral tax
shifts may be taken only if approved by a two-thirds vote of each
house, and then only if state expenditures in any fiscal year,
including the new revenue, will not exceed the state expenditure limits
established under this chapter.
(2)(a) If the legislative action under subsection (1) of this
section will result in expenditures in excess of the state expenditure
limit, then the action of the legislature shall not take effect until
approved by a vote of the people at a November general election. The
office of financial management shall adjust the state expenditure limit
by the amount of additional revenue approved by the voters under this
section. This adjustment shall not exceed the amount of revenue
generated by the legislative action during the first full fiscal year
in which it is in effect. The state expenditure limit shall be
adjusted downward upon expiration or repeal of the legislative action.
(b) The ballot title for any vote of the people required under this
section shall be substantially as follows:

"Shall taxes be imposed on . . . . . . . in order to allow a
spending increase above last year's authorized spending adjusted for
inflation and population increases?"

(3)(a) The state expenditure limit may be exceeded upon declaration
of an emergency for a period not to exceed twenty-four months by a law
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and
signed by the governor. The law shall set forth the nature of the
emergency, which is limited to natural disasters that require immediate
government action to alleviate human suffering and provide humanitarian
assistance. The state expenditure limit may be exceeded for no more
than twenty-four months following the declaration of the emergency and
only for the purposes contained in the emergency declaration.
(b) Additional taxes required for an emergency under this section
may be imposed only until thirty days following the next general
election, unless an extension is approved at that general election.
The additional taxes shall expire upon expiration of the declaration of
emergency. The legislature shall not impose additional taxes for
emergency purposes under this subsection unless funds in the education
construction fund have been exhausted.
(c) The state or any political subdivision of the state shall not
impose any tax on intangible property listed in RCW 84.36.070 as that
statute exists on January 1, 1993.
(4) If the cost of any state program or function is shifted from
the state general fund on or after January 1, 1993, to another source
of funding, or if moneys are transferred from the state general fund to
another fund or account, the state expenditure limit committee, acting
pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5), shall lower the state expenditure limit
to reflect the shift. For the purposes of this section, a transfer of
money from the state general fund to another fund or account includes
any state legislative action taken after July 1, 2000, that has the
effect of reducing revenues from a particular source, where such
revenues would otherwise be deposited into the state general fund,
while increasing the revenues from that particular source to another
state or local government account. This subsection does not apply to
the dedication or use of lottery revenues under RCW 67.70.240(3) or
property taxes under RCW 84.52.068, in support of education or
education expenditures or to transfers made to the ready reserve
account from the state general fund as provided for in sections 1 and
2 of this act.
(5) If the cost of any state program or function is shifted to the
state general fund on or after January 1, 2000, from another source of
funding, or if moneys are transferred to the state general fund from
another fund or account, the state expenditure limit committee, acting
pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5), shall increase the state expenditure
limit to reflect the shift. This subsection does not apply to
transfers made to the state general fund from the ready reserve account
as provided for in sections 1 and 2 of this act.

--- END ---