BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 71A.20 RCW
to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Closure" means the discontinuation of services to clients by
a residential habilitation center.
(2) "Downsizing" means:
(a) The discontinuation of a category of services at the facility
by relinquishing a federal certification to provide services under
either nursing or intermediate care facility/mentally retarded
regulations;
(b) The closure of one or more residential housing units; or
(c) A planned reduction in the residential capacity of a
residential habilitation center.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.190.020 and 1990 c 33 s 171 are each amended to
read as follows:
The term "residential school" as used in RCW 28A.190.020 through
28A.190.060, 72.01.200, 72.05.010 and 72.05.130, each as now or
hereafter amended, shall mean Green Hill school, Maple Lane school,
Naselle Youth Camp, Cedar Creek Youth Camp, Mission Creek Youth Camp,
Echo Glen, Lakeland Village, Rainier school, Yakima Valley school,
((Interlake school, Fircrest school,)) Francis Haddon Morgan Center,
the Child Study and Treatment Center and Secondary School of Western
State Hospital, and such other schools, camps, and centers as are now
or hereafter established by the department of social and health
services for the diagnosis, confinement and rehabilitation of juveniles
committed by the courts or for the care and treatment of persons who
are exceptional in their needs by reason of mental and/or physical
deficiency: PROVIDED, That the term shall not include the state
schools for the deaf and blind or adult correctional institutions.

Sec. 3 RCW 71A.20.020 and 1994 c 215 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
To the extent funds are provided by the legislature, the following
residential habilitation centers are ((permanently established))
authorized to provide services to persons with developmental
disabilities: Lakeland Village, located at Medical Lake, Spokane
county; Rainier School, located at Buckley, Pierce county; Yakima
Valley School, located at Selah, Yakima county; ((Fircrest School,
located at Seattle, King county;)) and Frances Haddon Morgan Children's
Center, located at Bremerton, Kitsap county.

Sec. 4 RCW 72.05.010 and 1985 c 378 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The purposes of RCW 72.05.010 through 72.05.210 are: To the extent
funds are provided by the legislature, to provide for every child with
behavior problems, mentally and physically handicapped persons, and
hearing and visually impaired children, within the purview of RCW
72.05.010 through 72.05.210, as now or hereafter amended, such care,
guidance and instruction, control and treatment as will best serve the
welfare of the child or person and society; to insure nonpolitical and
qualified operation, supervision, management, and control of the Green
Hill school, the Maple Lane school, the Naselle Youth Camp, the Mission
Creek Youth Camp, Echo Glen, the Cascadia Diagnostic Center, Lakeland
Village, Rainier school, the Yakima Valley school, ((Interlake school,
Fircrest school,)) the Francis Haddon Morgan Center, the Child Study
and Treatment Center and Secondary School of Western State Hospital,
and like residential state schools, camps and centers hereafter
established, and to place them under the department of social and
health services except where specified otherwise; and to provide for
the persons committed or admitted to those schools that type of care,
instruction, and treatment most likely to accomplish their
rehabilitation and restoration to normal citizenship.

Sec. 5 RCW 71A.10.050 and 1989 c 175 s 138 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An applicant or recipient or former recipient of a
developmental disabilities service under this title from the department
of social and health services has the right to appeal the following
department actions:
(a) A denial of an application for eligibility under RCW
71A.16.040;
(b) An unreasonable delay in acting on an application for
eligibility, for a service, or for an alternative service under RCW
71A.18.040;
(c) A denial, reduction, or termination of a service;
(d) A claim that the person owes a debt to the state for an
overpayment;
(e) A disagreement with an action of the secretary under RCW
71A.10.060 or 71A.10.070;
(f) A decision to return a resident of ((an [a])) a residential
habilitation center to the community, unless the transfer involved the
same category of residential services and was based upon a decision by
the legislature to downsize or close a residential habilitation center;
and
(g) A decision to change a person's placement from one category of
residential services to a different category of residential services.
The adjudicative proceeding is governed by the Administrative
Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) This subsection applies only to an adjudicative proceeding in
which the department action appealed is a decision to return a resident
of a habilitation center ((to the community)) as provided in subsection
(1)(f) of this section. The resident or his or her representative may
appeal on the basis of whether the specific placement decision is in
the best interests of the resident. When the resident or his or her
representative files an application for an adjudicative proceeding
under this section the department has the burden of proving that the
specific placement decision is in the best interests of the resident.
(3) When the department takes any action described in subsection
(1) of this section it shall give notice as provided by RCW 71A.10.060.
The notice must include a statement advising the recipient of the right
to an adjudicative proceeding and the time limits for filing an
application for an adjudicative proceeding. Notice of a decision to
return a resident of a habilitation center to the community under RCW
71A.20.080 must also include a statement advising the recipient of the
right to file a petition for judicial review of an adverse adjudicative
order as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 6 RCW 71A.20.080 and 1989 c 175 s 143 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Whenever in the judgment of the secretary, the treatment and
training of any resident of a residential habilitation center has
progressed to the point that it is deemed advisable to return such
resident to the community, the secretary may grant placement on such
terms and conditions as the secretary may deem advisable after
consultation in the manner provided in RCW 71A.10.070. The secretary
shall give written notice of the decision to return a resident to the
community as provided in RCW 71A.10.060. The notice must include a
statement advising the recipient of the right to an adjudicative
proceeding under RCW 71A.10.050 and the time limits for filing an
application for an adjudicative proceeding. The notice must also
include a statement advising the recipient of the right to judicial
review of an adverse adjudicative order as provided in chapter 34.05
RCW.
(2) A placement decision shall not be implemented at any level
during any period during which an appeal can be taken or while an
appeal is pending and undecided, unless authorized by court order so
long as the appeal is being diligently pursued.
(3) The department of social and health services shall periodically
evaluate at reasonable intervals the adjustment of the resident to the
specific placement to determine whether the resident should be
continued in the placement or returned to the institution or given a
different placement.
(4) Subsection (2) of this section does not apply to decisions to
return a resident to the community based upon the legislative
downsizing or closure of a residential habilitation center.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.21C.038 and 1983 c 109 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing in RCW 43.21C.030(2)(c) shall be construed to require the
preparation of an environmental impact statement or the making of a
threshold determination for any decision or any action commenced
subsequent to September 1, 1982, pertaining to a plan, program, or
decision for the closure of a school or schools or for the school
closure portion of any broader policy, plan or program by a school
district board of directors, or pertaining to a decision by the
legislature to close a residential habilitation center.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 RCW 71A.20.030 (Facilities for Interlake
School) and 1988 c 176 s 703 are each repealed.

--- END ---