BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.45.060 and 2003 c 294 s 10 and 2003 c 92 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The state actuary shall provide actuarial valuation results
based on the economic assumptions and asset value smoothing technique
included in RCW 41.45.035 or adopted by the council under RCW 41.45.030
or 41.45.035.
(2) Not later than September 30, 2002, and every two years
thereafter, consistent with the economic assumptions and asset value
smoothing technique included in RCW 41.45.035 or adopted under RCW
41.45.030 or 41.45.035, the council shall adopt and may make changes
to:
(a) A basic state contribution rate for the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1;
(b) Basic employer contribution rates for the public employees'
retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, and the Washington
state patrol retirement system to be used in the ensuing biennial
period; and
(c) A basic employer contribution rate for the school employees'
retirement system for funding both that system and the public
employees' retirement system plan 1.
The contribution rates adopted by the council shall be subject to
revision by the legislature.
(3) The employer and state contribution rates adopted by the
council shall be the level percentages of pay that are needed:
(a) To fully amortize the total costs of the public employees'
retirement system plan 1, the teachers' retirement system plan 1, and
the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan
1 not later than June 30, 2024; and
(b) To also continue to fully fund the public employees' retirement
system plans 2 and 3, the teachers' retirement system plans 2 and 3,
and the school employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3 in accordance
with RCW 41.45.061, 41.45.067, and this section.
(4) The aggregate actuarial cost method shall be used to calculate
a combined plan 2 and 3 employer contribution rate and a Washington
state patrol retirement system contribution rate.
(5) The council shall immediately notify the directors of the
office of financial management and department of retirement systems of
the state and employer contribution rates adopted. The rates shall be
effective for the ensuing biennial period, subject to any legislative
modifications.
(6) The director of the department of retirement systems shall
collect the rates established in RCW 41.45.053 through June 30, 2003.
Thereafter, the director shall collect those rates adopted by the
council. The rates established in ((RCW 41.45.053)) section 6 of this
act, or by the council, shall be subject to revision by the council.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.45.060 and 2004 c 242 s 39 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state actuary shall provide actuarial valuation results
based on the economic assumptions and asset value smoothing technique
included in RCW 41.45.035 or adopted by the council under RCW 41.45.030
or 41.45.035.
(2) Not later than September 30, 2002, and every two years
thereafter, consistent with the economic assumptions and asset value
smoothing technique included in RCW 41.45.035 or adopted under RCW
41.45.030 or 41.45.035, the council shall adopt and may make changes
to:
(a) A basic state contribution rate for the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1;
(b) Basic employer contribution rates for the public employees'
retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, and the Washington
state patrol retirement system to be used in the ensuing biennial
period; and
(c) A basic employer contribution rate for the school employees'
retirement system and the public safety employees' retirement system
for funding both those systems and the public employees' retirement
system plan 1.
The contribution rates adopted by the council shall be subject to
revision by the legislature.
(3) The employer and state contribution rates adopted by the
council shall be the level percentages of pay that are needed:
(a) To fully amortize the total costs of the public employees'
retirement system plan 1, the teachers' retirement system plan 1, and
the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan
1 not later than June 30, 2024; and
(b) To fully fund the public employees' retirement system plans 2
and 3, the teachers' retirement system plans 2 and 3, the public safety
employees' retirement system plan 2, and the school employees'
retirement system plans 2 and 3 in accordance with RCW 41.45.061,
41.45.067, and this section.
(4) The aggregate actuarial cost method shall be used to calculate
a combined plan 2 and 3 employer contribution rate and a Washington
state patrol retirement system contribution rate.
(5) The council shall immediately notify the directors of the
office of financial management and department of retirement systems of
the state and employer contribution rates adopted. The rates shall be
effective for the ensuing biennial period, subject to any legislative
modifications.
(6) The director shall collect those rates adopted by the council.
The rates established in ((RCW 41.45.054)) section 6 of this act, or by
the council, shall be subject to revision by the legislature.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.45.010 and 2002 c 26 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to provide a dependable and
systematic process for funding the benefits provided to members and
retirees of the public employees' retirement system, chapter 41.40 RCW;
the teachers' retirement system, chapter 41.32 RCW; the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement systems, chapter 41.26 RCW; the
school employees' retirement system, chapter 41.35 RCW; and the
Washington state patrol retirement system, chapter 43.43 RCW.
The legislature finds that the funding status of the state
retirement systems has improved dramatically since 1989. Because of
the big reduction in unfunded pension liabilities, it is now prudent to
adjust the long-term economic assumptions that are used in the
actuarial studies conducted by the state actuary. The legislature
finds that it is reasonable to increase the salary growth assumption in
light of Initiative Measure No. 732, to increase the investment return
assumption in light of the asset allocation policies and historical
returns of the state investment board, and to reestablish June 30,
2024, as the target date to achieve full funding of all liabilities in
the public employees' retirement system plan 1, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1, and the law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system plan 1.
The funding process established by this chapter is intended to
achieve the following goals:
(1) To continue to fully fund the public employees' retirement
system plans 2 and 3, the teachers' retirement system plans 2 and 3,
the school employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3, and the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2 as
provided by law;
(2) To fully amortize the total costs of the public employees'
retirement system plan 1, the teachers' retirement system plan 1, and
the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan
1, not later than June 30, 2024;
(3) To establish ((predictable)) long-term employer contribution
rates which will remain a relatively ((constant)) predictable
proportion of the future state budgets; and
(4) To fund, to the extent feasible, benefit increases for plan 1
members and all benefits for plan 2 and 3 members over the working
lives of those members so that the cost of those benefits are paid by
the taxpayers who receive the benefit of those members' service.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.45.010 and 2004 c 242 s 36 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to provide a dependable and
systematic process for funding the benefits provided to members and
retirees of the public employees' retirement system, chapter 41.40 RCW;
the teachers' retirement system, chapter 41.32 RCW; the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement systems, chapter 41.26 RCW; the
school employees' retirement system, chapter 41.35 RCW; the public
safety employees' retirement system, chapter 41.37 RCW; and the
Washington state patrol retirement system, chapter 43.43 RCW.
The legislature finds that the funding status of the state
retirement systems has improved dramatically since 1989. Because of
the big reduction in unfunded pension liabilities, it is now prudent to
adjust the long-term economic assumptions that are used in the
actuarial studies conducted by the state actuary. The legislature
finds that it is reasonable to increase the salary growth assumption in
light of Initiative Measure No. 732, to increase the investment return
assumption in light of the asset allocation policies and historical
returns of the state investment board, and to reestablish June 30,
2024, as the target date to achieve full funding of all liabilities in
the public employees' retirement system plan 1, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1, and the law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system plan 1.
The funding process established by this chapter is intended to
achieve the following goals:
(1) To fully fund the public employees' retirement system plans 2
and 3, the teachers' retirement system plans 2 and 3, the school
employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3, the public safety
employees' retirement system plan 2, and the law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2 as provided by law;
(2) To fully amortize the total costs of the public employees'
retirement system plan 1, the teachers' retirement system plan 1, and
the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan
1, not later than June 30, 2024;
(3) To establish ((predictable)) long-term employer contribution
rates which will remain a relatively ((constant)) predictable
proportion of the future state budgets; and
(4) To fund, to the extent feasible, benefit increases for plan 1
members and all benefits for plan 2 and 3 members over the working
lives of those members so that the cost of those benefits are paid by
the taxpayers who receive the benefit of those members' service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 RCW 41.45.054 is decodified, effective
September 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 41.45 RCW
to read as follows:
The basic employer and state contribution rates and required plan
2 member contribution rates are changed to reflect the 2003 actuarial
valuation and actuarial projections of the 2005 actuarial valuation,
both of which incorporate the 2002 actuarial experience study conducted
by the office of the state actuary for 1995-2000. This contribution
rate schedule departs from the normal biennial process for setting
contribution rates by requiring annual increases in rates during the
2005-2007 biennium, and by requiring annual rates to be adopted by the
pension funding council for the 2007-2009 biennium. The rates are
lower in the 2005-2007 biennium than required by the 2003 actuarial
valuation and will be higher in the 2007-2009 biennium than required by
the projected 2005 actuarial valuation.
Upon completion of the 2005 actuarial valuation, the pension
funding council and the state actuary shall review the appropriateness
of the contribution rates for 2007-2008 and 2008-2009 and by September
30, 2006, the pension funding council shall adopt contribution rates to
complete the four-year phase-in schedule, adjusted for any material
changes in benefits or actuarial assumptions, methods, or experience.
This contribution rate schedule also requires a departure from the
allocation formula for contributions in RCW 41.45.050, suspension of
payments on the unfunded liability in the public employees' retirement
system and the teachers' retirement system during the 2005-2007
biennium, and a delay in the recognition of the cost of future gain-sharing benefits until the 2007-2009 biennium.
(1) Beginning July 1, 2005, the following employer contribution
rate shall be charged: 2.25 percent for the public employees'
retirement system.
(2) Beginning September 1, 2005, the following employer
contribution rates shall be charged:
(a) 2.75 percent for the school employees' retirement system; and
(b) 2.73 percent for the teachers' retirement system.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2005, the following member contribution rate
shall be charged: 2.25 percent for the public employees' retirement
system plan 2.
(4) Beginning September 1, 2005, the following member contribution
rates shall be charged:
(a) 2.75 percent for the school employees' retirement system plan
2; and
(b) 2.48 percent for the teachers' retirement system plan 2.
(5) The contribution rates in subsections (1) through (4) of this
section shall be collected through June 30, 2006, for the public
employees' retirement system, and August 31, 2006, for the school
employees' retirement system and the teachers' retirement system.
(6) Beginning July 1, 2006, the following employer contribution
rate shall be charged: 3.50 percent for the public employees'
retirement system.
(7) Beginning September 1, 2006, the following employer
contribution rates shall be charged:
(a) 3.75 percent for the school employees' retirement system; and
(b) 3.25 percent for the teachers' retirement system.
(8) Beginning July 1, 2006, the following member contribution rate
shall be charged: 3.50 percent for the public employees' retirement
system plan 2.
(9) Beginning September 1, 2006, the following member contribution
rates shall be charged:
(a) 3.75 percent for the school employees' retirement system plan
2; and
(b) 3.00 percent for the teachers' retirement system plan 2.
(10) During the 2005 interim, the select committee on pension
policy shall study the options available to the legislature for
addressing the liability associated with future gain-sharing benefits.
These options may include, but shall not be limited to, repealing,
delaying, or suspending the gain-sharing provisions in law; making
gain-sharing discretionary; or replacing gain-sharing benefits with
other benefits such as plan choice, employer defined contributions,
retirement eligibility enhancements, and postretirement adjustments.
The select committee on pension policy shall report the findings and
recommendations of its study to the legislative fiscal committees by no
later than December 15, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1, 3, and 6 of this act are
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health,
or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect July 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 2 and 4 of this act take effect
July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 and 3 of this act expire July 1,
2006.

--- END ---