BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.46.100 and 2004 c 276 s 903 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is hereby created the gambling ((revolving fund which))
account in the state treasury. The account shall consist of all moneys
receivable for licensing, penalties, forfeitures, and all other moneys,
income, or revenue received by the commission. ((The state treasurer
shall be custodian of the fund.)) All moneys received by the
commission or any employee thereof, except for change funds and an
amount of petty cash as fixed by rule or regulation of the commission,
shall be deposited each day in a depository approved by the state
treasurer and transferred to the state treasurer to be credited to the
gambling ((revolving fund)) account. Disbursements from the
((revolving fund)) account shall be on authorization of the commission
or a duly authorized representative thereof. In order to maintain an
effective expenditure and revenue control the gambling ((revolving
fund)) account shall be subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW
((but no)) and moneys in the account may be spent only after an
appropriation ((shall be required to permit expenditures and payment of
obligations from such fund)). All expenses relative to commission
business, including but not limited to salaries and expenses of the
director and other commission employees shall be paid from the gambling
((revolving fund)) account.
((During the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the gambling revolving fund to the problem gambling
treatment account, contingent on enactment of chapter ..., Laws of 2004
(Second Substitute House Bill No. 2776, problem gambling treatment).
Also during the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium,)) The legislature may
transfer from the gambling ((revolving fund)) account to the state
general fund such amounts as reflect the excess nontribal fund balance
of the ((fund)) account. The commission shall not increase fees
((during the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium)) for the purpose of restoring
the excess fund balance transferred under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---