BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.08.260 and 1997 c 319 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The legislature recognizes the ethical obligation of
attorneys to represent clients without interference by third parties in
the discharge of professional obligations to clients. However, to
ensure the most beneficial use of state resources, the legislature
finds that it is within the authority of the legislature to specify the
categories of legal cases in which qualified legal aid programs may
provide civil representation with state moneys. Accordingly, moneys
appropriated for civil legal representation pursuant to this section
shall not be used for legal representation that is either outside the
scope of this section or prohibited by this section.
(b) Nothing in this section is intended to limit the authority of
existing entities, including but not limited to the Washington state
bar association, the public disclosure commission, the state auditor,
and the federal legal services corporation to resolve issues within
their respective jurisdictions.
(2) Any money appropriated by the legislature ((from the public
safety and education account pursuant to RCW 43.08.250 or from any
other state fund or account)) for civil representation of indigent
persons shall be used solely for the purpose of contracting with
qualified legal aid programs for legal representation of indigent
persons in matters relating to: (a) Domestic relations and family law
matters, (b) public assistance and health care, (c) housing and
utilities, (d) social security, (e) mortgage foreclosures, (f) home
protection bankruptcies, (g) consumer fraud and unfair sales practices,
(h) rights of residents of long-term care facilities, (i) wills,
estates, and living wills, (j) elder abuse, and (k) guardianship.
(3) For purposes of this section, a "qualified legal aid program"
means a not-for-profit corporation incorporated and operating
exclusively in Washington which has received basic field funding for
the provision of civil legal services to indigents from the federal
legal services corporation or that has received funding for civil legal
services for indigents under this section before July 1, 1997.
(4) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall establish a distribution formula based on the distribution by
county of individuals with incomes below the official federal poverty
level guidelines. When entering into a contract with a qualified legal
services provider under this section, the department shall require the
provider to provide legal services in a manner that maximizes
geographic access in accordance with the formula established in this
subsection (4).
(5) Funds distributed to qualified legal aid programs under this
section may not be used directly or indirectly for:
(a) Lobbying.
(i) For purposes of this section, "lobbying" means any personal
service, advertisement, telegram, telephone communication, letter,
printed or written matter, or other device directly or indirectly
intended to influence any member of congress or any other federal,
state, or local nonjudicial official, whether elected or appointed:
(A) In connection with any act, bill, resolution, or similar
legislation by the congress of the United States or by any state or
local legislative body, or any administrative rule, rule-making
activity, standard, rate, or other enactment by any federal, state, or
local administrative agency;
(B) In connection with any referendum, initiative, constitutional
amendment, or any similar procedure of the congress, any state
legislature, any local council, or any similar governing body acting in
a legislative capacity; or
(C) In connection with inclusion of any provision in a legislative
measure appropriating funds to, or defining or limiting the functions
or authority of, the recipient of funds under this section.
(ii) "Lobbying" does not include the response of an employee of a
legal aid program to a written request from a governmental agency, an
elected or appointed official, or committee on a specific matter. This
exception does not authorize communication with anyone other than the
requesting party, or agent or employee of such agency, official, or
committee.
(b) Grass roots lobbying. For purposes of this section, "grass
roots lobbying" means preparation, production, or dissemination of
information the purpose of which is to encourage the public at large,
or any definable segment thereof, to contact legislators or their staff
in support of or in opposition to pending or proposed legislation; or
contribute to or participate in a demonstration, march, rally, lobbying
campaign, or letter writing or telephone campaign for the purpose of
influencing the course of pending or proposed legislation.
(c) Class action lawsuits.
(d) Participating in or identifying the program with prohibited
political activities. For purposes of this section, "prohibited
political activities" means (i) any activity directed toward the
success or failure of a political party, a candidate for partisan or
nonpartisan office, a partisan political group, or a ballot measure;
(ii) advertising or contributing or soliciting financial support for or
against any candidate, political group, or ballot measure; or (iii)
voter registration or transportation activities.
(e) Representation in fee-generating cases. For purposes of this
section, "fee-generating" means a case that might reasonably be
expected to result in a fee for legal services if undertaken by a
private attorney. The charging of a fee pursuant to subsection (6) of
this section does not establish the fee-generating nature of a case.
A fee-generating case may be accepted when: (i) The case has been
rejected by the local lawyer referral services or by two private
attorneys; (ii) neither the referral service nor two private attorneys
will consider the case without payment of a consultation fee; (iii)
after consultation with the appropriate representatives of the private
bar, the program has determined that the type of case is one that
private attorneys do not ordinarily accept, or do not accept without
prepayment of a fee; or (iv) the director of the program or the
director's designee has determined that referral of the case to the
private bar is not possible because documented attempts to refer
similar cases in the past have been futile, or because emergency
circumstances compel immediate action before referral can be made, but
the client is advised that, if appropriate and consistent with
professional responsibility, referral will be attempted at a later
time.
(f) Organizing any association, union, or federation, or
representing a labor union. However, nothing in this subsection (5)(f)
prohibits the provision of legal services to clients as otherwise
permitted by this section.
(g) Representation of undocumented aliens.
(h) Picketing, demonstrations, strikes, or boycotts.
(i) Engaging in inappropriate solicitation. For purposes of this
section, "inappropriate solicitation" means promoting the assertion of
specific legal claims among persons who know of their rights to make a
claim and who decline to do so. Nothing in this subsection precludes
a legal services program or its employees from providing information
regarding legal rights and responsibilities or providing information
regarding the program's services and intake procedures through
community legal education activities, responding to an individual's
specific question about whether the individual should consult with an
attorney or take legal action, or responding to an individual's
specific request for information about the individual's legal rights or
request for assistance in connection with a specific legal problem.
(j) Conducting training programs that: (i) Advocate particular
public policies; (ii) encourage or facilitate political activities,
labor or antilabor activities, boycotts, picketing, strikes, or
demonstrations; or (iii) attempt to influence legislation or rule
making. Nothing in this subsection (5)(j) precludes representation of
clients as otherwise permitted by this section.
(6) The department may establish requirements for client
participation in the provision of civil legal services under this
section, including but not limited to copayments and sliding fee
scales.
(7)(a) Contracts entered into by the department of community,
trade, and economic development with qualified legal services programs
under this section must specify that the program's expenditures of
moneys distributed under this section:
(i) Must be audited annually by an independent outside auditor.
These audit results must be provided to the department of community,
trade, and economic development; and
(ii) Are subject to audit by the state auditor.
(b)(i) Any entity auditing a legal services program under this
section shall have access to all records of the legal services program
to the full extent necessary to determine compliance with this section,
with the exception of confidential information protected by the United
States Constitution, the state Constitution, the attorney-client
privilege, and applicable rules of attorney conduct.
(ii) The legal services program shall have a system allowing for
production of case-specific information, including client eligibility
and case type, to demonstrate compliance with this section, with the
exception of confidential information protected by the United States
Constitution, the state Constitution, the attorney-client privilege,
and applicable rules of attorney conduct. Such information shall be
available to any entity that audits the program.
(8) The department of community, trade, and economic development
must recover or withhold amounts determined by an audit to have been
used in violation of this section.
(9) The department of community, trade, and economic development
may adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 3.46.120 and 2004 c 15 s 7 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) All money received by the clerk of a municipal department
including penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees and costs shall be
paid by the clerk to the city treasurer.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 10.99.080, the city treasurer shall
remit monthly thirty-two percent of the noninterest money received
under this section, other than for parking infractions, and certain
costs to the state treasurer. "Certain costs" as used in this
subsection, means those costs awarded to prevailing parties in civil
actions under RCW 4.84.010 or 36.18.040, or those costs awarded against
convicted defendants in criminal actions under RCW 10.01.160,
10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes if such costs are
specifically designated as costs by the court and are awarded for the
specific reimbursement of costs incurred by the state, county, city, or
town in the prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense
counsel. Money remitted under this subsection to the state treasurer
shall be deposited ((as provided in RCW 43.08.250)) in the state
general fund.
(3) The balance of the noninterest money received under this
section shall be retained by the city and deposited as provided by law.
(4) Penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs may accrue
interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum, upon assignment to a
collection agency. Interest may accrue only while the case is in
collection status.
(5) Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, bail
forfeitures, fees, and costs shall be split twenty-five percent to the
state treasurer for deposit in the ((public safety and education
account as provided in RCW 43.08.250)) state general fund, twenty-five
percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the judicial information
system account as provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to the
city general fund, and twenty-five percent to the city general fund to
fund local courts.

Sec. 3 RCW 3.50.100 and 2004 c 15 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Costs in civil and criminal actions may be imposed as provided
in district court. All fees, costs, fines, forfeitures and other money
imposed by any municipal court for the violation of any municipal or
town ordinances shall be collected by the court clerk and, together
with any other noninterest revenues received by the clerk, shall be
deposited with the city or town treasurer as a part of the general fund
of the city or town, or deposited in such other fund of the city or
town, or deposited in such other funds as may be designated by the laws
of the state of Washington.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 10.99.080, the city treasurer shall
remit monthly thirty-two percent of the noninterest money received
under this section, other than for parking infractions, and certain
costs to the state treasurer. "Certain costs" as used in this
subsection, means those costs awarded to prevailing parties in civil
actions under RCW 4.84.010 or 36.18.040, or those costs awarded against
convicted defendants in criminal actions under RCW 10.01.160,
10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes if such costs are
specifically designated as costs by the court and are awarded for the
specific reimbursement of costs incurred by the state, county, city, or
town in the prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense
counsel. Money remitted under this subsection to the state treasurer
shall be deposited ((as provided in RCW 43.08.250)) in the state
general fund.
(3) The balance of the noninterest money received under this
section shall be retained by the city and deposited as provided by law.
(4) Penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs may accrue
interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum, upon assignment to a
collection agency. Interest may accrue only while the case is in
collection status.
(5) Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, bail
forfeitures, fees, and costs shall be split twenty-five percent to the
state treasurer for deposit in the ((public safety and education
account as provided in RCW 43.08.250)) state general fund, twenty-five
percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the judicial information
system account as provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to the
city general fund, and twenty-five percent to the city general fund to
fund local courts.

Sec. 4 RCW 3.62.020 and 2004 c 15 s 4 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, all
costs, fees, fines, forfeitures and penalties assessed and collected in
whole or in part by district courts, except costs, fines, forfeitures
and penalties assessed and collected, in whole or in part, because of
the violation of city ordinances, shall be remitted by the clerk of the
district court to the county treasurer at least monthly, together with
a financial statement as required by the state auditor, noting the
information necessary for crediting of such funds as required by law.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 10.99.080, the county treasurer shall
remit thirty-two percent of the noninterest money received under
subsection (1) of this section except certain costs to the state
treasurer. "Certain costs" as used in this subsection, means those
costs awarded to prevailing parties in civil actions under RCW 4.84.010
or 36.18.040, or those costs awarded against convicted defendants in
criminal actions under RCW 10.01.160, 10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other
similar statutes if such costs are specifically designated as costs by
the court and are awarded for the specific reimbursement of costs
incurred by the state or county in the prosecution of the case,
including the fees of defense counsel. Money remitted under this
subsection to the state treasurer shall be deposited ((as provided in
RCW 43.08.250)) in the state general fund.
(3) The balance of the noninterest money received by the county
treasurer under subsection (1) of this section shall be deposited in
the county current expense fund.
(4) All money collected for county parking infractions shall be
remitted by the clerk of the district court at least monthly, with the
information required under subsection (1) of this section, to the
county treasurer for deposit in the county current expense fund.
(5) Penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs may accrue
interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum, upon assignment to a
collection agency. Interest may accrue only while the case is in
collection status.
(6) Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, bail
forfeitures, fees, and costs shall be split twenty-five percent to the
state treasurer for deposit in the ((public safety and education
account as provided in RCW 43.08.250)) state general fund, twenty-five
percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the judicial information
system account as provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to the
county current expense fund, and twenty-five percent to the county
current expense fund to fund local courts.

Sec. 5 RCW 3.62.040 and 2004 c 15 s 8 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, all
costs, fines, forfeitures and penalties assessed and collected, in
whole or in part, by district courts because of violations of city
ordinances shall be remitted by the clerk of the district court at
least monthly directly to the treasurer of the city wherein the
violation occurred.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 10.99.080, the city treasurer shall
remit monthly thirty-two percent of the noninterest money received
under this section, other than for parking infractions and certain
costs, to the state treasurer. "Certain costs" as used in this
subsection, means those costs awarded to prevailing parties in civil
actions under RCW 4.84.010 or 36.18.040, or those costs awarded against
convicted defendants in criminal actions under RCW 10.01.160,
10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes if such costs are
specifically designated as costs by the court and are awarded for the
specific reimbursement of costs incurred by the state, county, city, or
town in the prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense
counsel. Money remitted under this subsection to the state treasurer
shall be deposited ((as provided in RCW 43.08.250)) in the state
general fund.
(3) The balance of the noninterest money received under this
section shall be retained by the city and deposited as provided by law.
(4) All money collected for city parking infractions shall be
remitted by the clerk of the district court at least monthly to the
city treasurer for deposit in the city's general fund.
(5) Penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs may accrue
interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum, upon assignment to a
collection agency. Interest may accrue only while the case is in
collection status.
(6) Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, bail
forfeitures, fees, and costs shall be split twenty-five percent to the
state treasurer for deposit in the ((public safety and education
account as provided in RCW 43.08.250)) state general fund, twenty-five
percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the judicial information
system account as provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to the
city general fund, and twenty-five percent to the city general fund to
fund local courts.

Sec. 6 RCW 7.68.030 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 5 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
It shall be the duty of the director to establish and administer a
program of benefits to innocent victims of criminal acts within the
terms and limitations of this chapter. In so doing, the director
shall, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, adopt rules and
regulations necessary to the administration of this chapter, and the
provisions contained in chapter 51.04 RCW, including but not limited to
RCW 51.04.020, 51.04.030, 51.04.040, 51.04.050 and 51.04.100 as now or
hereafter amended, shall apply where appropriate in keeping with the
intent of this chapter. The director may apply for and, subject to
appropriation, expend federal funds under Public Law 98-473 and any
other federal program providing financial assistance to state crime
victim compensation programs. The federal funds shall be deposited in
the ((public safety and education account in the)) general fund and may
be expended only for purposes authorized by applicable federal law.

Sec. 7 RCW 7.68.035 and 2000 c 71 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1)(a) When any person is found guilty in any superior court of
having committed a crime, except as provided in subsection (2) of this
section, there shall be imposed by the court upon such convicted person
a penalty assessment. The assessment shall be in addition to any other
penalty or fine imposed by law and shall be five hundred dollars for
each case or cause of action that includes one or more convictions of
a felony or gross misdemeanor and two hundred fifty dollars for any
case or cause of action that includes convictions of only one or more
misdemeanors.
(b) When any juvenile is adjudicated of any offense in any juvenile
offense disposition under Title 13 RCW, except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section, there shall be imposed upon the
juvenile offender a penalty assessment. The assessment shall be in
addition to any other penalty or fine imposed by law and shall be one
hundred dollars for each case or cause of action that includes one or
more adjudications for a felony or gross misdemeanor and seventy-five
dollars for each case or cause of action that includes adjudications of
only one or more misdemeanors.
(2) The assessment imposed by subsection (1) of this section shall
not apply to motor vehicle crimes defined in Title 46 RCW except those
defined in the following sections: RCW 46.61.520, 46.61.522,
46.61.024, 46.52.090, 46.70.140, 46.61.502, 46.61.504, 46.52.101,
46.20.410, 46.52.020, 46.10.130, 46.09.130, 46.61.5249, 46.61.525,
46.61.685, 46.61.530, 46.61.500, 46.61.015, 46.52.010, 46.44.180,
46.10.090(2), and 46.09.120(2).
(3) When any person accused of having committed a crime posts bail
in superior court pursuant to the provisions of chapter 10.19 RCW and
such bail is forfeited, there shall be deducted from the proceeds of
such forfeited bail a penalty assessment, in addition to any other
penalty or fine imposed by law, equal to the assessment which would be
applicable under subsection (1) of this section if the person had been
convicted of the crime.
(4) Such penalty assessments shall be paid by the clerk of the
superior court to the county treasurer who shall monthly transmit the
money as provided in RCW 10.82.070. Each county shall deposit fifty
percent of the money it receives per case or cause of action under
subsection (1) of this section and retains under RCW 10.82.070, not
less than one and seventy-five one-hundredths percent of the remaining
money it retains under RCW 10.82.070 and the money it retains under
chapter 3.62 RCW, and all money it receives under subsection (7) of
this section into a fund maintained exclusively for the support of
comprehensive programs to encourage and facilitate testimony by the
victims of crimes and witnesses to crimes. A program shall be
considered "comprehensive" only after approval of the department upon
application by the county prosecuting attorney. The department shall
approve as comprehensive only programs which:
(a) Provide comprehensive services to victims and witnesses of all
types of crime with particular emphasis on serious crimes against
persons and property. It is the intent of the legislature to make
funds available only to programs which do not restrict services to
victims or witnesses of a particular type or types of crime and that
such funds supplement, not supplant, existing local funding levels;
(b) Are administered by the county prosecuting attorney either
directly through the prosecuting attorney's office or by contract
between the county and agencies providing services to victims of crime;
(c) Make a reasonable effort to inform the known victim or his
surviving dependents of the existence of this chapter and the procedure
for making application for benefits;
(d) Assist victims in the restitution and adjudication process; and
(e) Assist victims of violent crimes in the preparation and
presentation of their claims to the department of labor and industries
under this chapter.
Before a program in any county west of the Cascade mountains is
submitted to the department for approval, it shall be submitted for
review and comment to each city within the county with a population of
more than one hundred fifty thousand. The department will consider if
the county's proposed comprehensive plan meets the needs of crime
victims in cases adjudicated in municipal, district or superior courts
and of crime victims located within the city and county.
(5) Upon submission to the department of a letter of intent to
adopt a comprehensive program, the prosecuting attorney shall retain
the money deposited by the county under subsection (4) of this section
until such time as the county prosecuting attorney has obtained
approval of a program from the department. Approval of the
comprehensive plan by the department must be obtained within one year
of the date of the letter of intent to adopt a comprehensive program.
The county prosecuting attorney shall not make any expenditures from
the money deposited under subsection (4) of this section until approval
of a comprehensive plan by the department. If a county prosecuting
attorney has failed to obtain approval of a program from the department
under subsection (4) of this section or failed to obtain approval of a
comprehensive program within one year after submission of a letter of
intent under this section, the county treasurer shall monthly transmit
one hundred percent of the money deposited by the county under
subsection (4) of this section to the state treasurer for deposit in
the ((public safety and education account established under RCW
43.08.250)) state general fund.
(6) County prosecuting attorneys are responsible to make every
reasonable effort to insure that the penalty assessments of this
chapter are imposed and collected.
(7) Every city and town shall transmit monthly one and seventy-five
one-hundredths percent of all money, other than money received for
parking infractions, retained under RCW 3.46.120, 3.50.100, and
35.20.220 to the county treasurer for deposit as provided in subsection
(4) of this section.

Sec. 8 RCW 7.68.085 and 1990 c 3 s 504 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director of labor and industries shall institute a cap on
medical benefits of one hundred fifty thousand dollars per injury or
death. Payment for medical services in excess of the cap shall be made
available to any innocent victim under the same conditions as other
medical services and if the medical services are:
(1) Necessary for a previously accepted condition;
(2) Necessary to protect the victim's life or prevent deterioration
of the victim's previously accepted condition; and
(3) Not available from an alternative source.
((The director of financial management and the director of labor
and industries shall monitor expenditures from the public safety and
education account. Once each fiscal quarter, the director of financial
management shall determine if expenditures from the public safety and
education account during the prior fiscal quarter exceeded allotments
by more than ten percent. Within thirty days of a determination that
expenditures exceeded allotments by more than ten percent, the director
of financial management shall develop and implement a plan to reduce
expenditures from the account to a level that does not exceed the
allotments. Such a plan may include across-the-board reductions in
allotments from the account to all nonjudicial agencies except for the
crime victims compensation program. In implementing the plan, the
director of financial management shall seek the cooperation of judicial
agencies in reducing their expenditures from the account. The director
of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees
prior to implementation of the plan.
Development and implementation of the plan is not required if the
director of financial management notifies the legislative fiscal
committees that increases in the official revenue forecast for the
public safety and education account for that fiscal quarter will
eliminate the need to reduce expenditures from the account. The
official revenue forecast for the public safety and education account
shall be prepared by the economic and revenue forecast council pursuant
to RCW 82.33.020 and 82.33.010.))
For the purposes of this section, an individual will not be
required to use his or her assets other than funds recovered as a
result of a civil action or criminal restitution, for medical expenses
or pain and suffering, in order to qualify for an alternative source of
payment.
((The director shall, in cooperation with the department of social
and health services, establish by October 1, 1989, a process to aid
crime victims in identifying and applying for appropriate alternative
benefit programs, if any, administered by the department of social and
health services.))

Sec. 9 RCW 9A.82.110 and 2001 c 222 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Any payments or forfeiture to the state general fund ordered
under RCW 9A.82.100 (4) or (5) shall be deposited in the public safety
and education account.
(2))) In an action brought by the attorney general on behalf of the
state under RCW 9A.82.100(1)(b)(i) in which the state prevails, any
payments ordered in excess of the actual damages sustained shall be
deposited in the ((public safety and education account)) state general
fund.
(((3) It is the intent of the legislature that the money deposited
in the public safety and education account pursuant to this chapter be
appropriated to promote crime victims' compensation.
(4))) (2)(a) The county legislative authority may establish an
antiprofiteering revolving fund to be administered by the county
prosecuting attorney under the conditions and for the purposes provided
by this subsection. Disbursements from the fund shall be on
authorization of the county prosecuting attorney. No appropriation is
required for disbursements.
(b) Any prosecution and investigation costs, including attorney's
fees, recovered for the state by the county prosecuting attorney as a
result of enforcement of civil and criminal statutes pertaining to any
offense included in the definition of criminal profiteering, whether by
final judgment, settlement, or otherwise, shall be deposited, as
directed by a court of competent jurisdiction, in the fund established
by this subsection. In an action brought by a prosecuting attorney on
behalf of the county under RCW 9A.82.100(1)(b)(i) in which the county
prevails, any payments ordered in excess of the actual damages
sustained shall be deposited ((in the public safety and education
account)) in the state general fund.
(c) The county legislative authority may prescribe a maximum level
of moneys in the antiprofiteering revolving fund. Moneys exceeding the
prescribed maximum shall be transferred to the county current expense
fund.
(d) The moneys in the fund shall be used by the county prosecuting
attorney for the investigation and prosecution of any offense, within
the jurisdiction of the county prosecuting attorney, included in the
definition of criminal profiteering, including civil enforcement.
(e) If a county has not established an antiprofiteering revolving
fund, any payments or forfeitures ordered to the county under this
chapter shall be deposited to the county current expense fund.

Sec. 10 RCW 9.68A.120 and 1999 c 143 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following are subject to seizure and forfeiture:
(1) All visual or printed matter that depicts a minor engaged in
sexually explicit conduct.
(2) All raw materials, equipment, and other tangible personal
property of any kind used or intended to be used to manufacture or
process any visual or printed matter that depicts a minor engaged in
sexually explicit conduct, and all conveyances, including aircraft,
vehicles, or vessels that are used or intended for use to transport, or
in any manner to facilitate the transportation of, visual or printed
matter in violation of RCW 9.68A.050 or 9.68A.060, but:
(a) No conveyance used by any person as a common carrier in the
transaction of business as a common carrier is subject to forfeiture
under this section unless it appears that the owner or other person in
charge of the conveyance is a consenting party or privy to a violation
of this chapter;
(b) No property is subject to forfeiture under this section by
reason of any act or omission established by the owner of the property
to have been committed or omitted without the owner's knowledge or
consent;
(c) A forfeiture of property encumbered by a bona fide security
interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if the secured
party neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or omission;
and
(d) When the owner of a conveyance has been arrested under this
chapter the conveyance may not be subject to forfeiture unless it is
seized or process is issued for its seizure within ten days of the
owner's arrest.
(3) All personal property, moneys, negotiable instruments,
securities, or other tangible or intangible property furnished or
intended to be furnished by any person in exchange for visual or
printed matter depicting a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct,
or constituting proceeds traceable to any violation of this chapter.
(4) Property subject to forfeiture under this chapter may be seized
by any law enforcement officer of this state upon process issued by any
superior court having jurisdiction over the property. Seizure without
process may be made if:
(a) The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under a search
warrant or an inspection under an administrative inspection warrant;
(b) The property subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior
judgment in favor of the state in a criminal injunction or forfeiture
proceeding based upon this chapter;
(c) A law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that
the property is directly or indirectly dangerous to health or safety;
or
(d) The law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that
the property was used or is intended to be used in violation of this
chapter.
(5) In the event of seizure under subsection (4) of this section,
proceedings for forfeiture shall be deemed commenced by the seizure.
The law enforcement agency under whose authority the seizure was made
shall cause notice to be served within fifteen days following the
seizure on the owner of the property seized and the person in charge
thereof and any person having any known right or interest therein, of
the seizure and intended forfeiture of the seized property. The notice
may be served by any method authorized by law or court rule including
but not limited to service by certified mail with return receipt
requested. Service by mail shall be deemed complete upon mailing
within the fifteen day period following the seizure.
(6) If no person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in
writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of
seized items within forty-five days of the seizure, the item seized
shall be deemed forfeited.
(7) If any person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in
writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of
seized items within forty-five days of the seizure, the person or
persons shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to be heard as to
the claim or right. The hearing shall be before an administrative law
judge appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW, except that any person
asserting a claim or right may remove the matter to a court of
competent jurisdiction if the aggregate value of the article or
articles involved is more than five hundred dollars. The hearing
before an administrative law judge and any appeal therefrom shall be
under Title 34 RCW. In a court hearing between two or more claimants
to the article or articles involved, the prevailing party shall be
entitled to a judgment for costs and reasonable attorney's fees. The
burden of producing evidence shall be upon the person claiming to be
the lawful owner or the person claiming to have the lawful right to
possession of the seized items. The seizing law enforcement agency
shall promptly return the article or articles to the claimant upon a
determination by the administrative law judge or court that the
claimant is lawfully entitled to possession thereof of the seized
items.
(8) If property is sought to be forfeited on the ground that it
constitutes proceeds traceable to a violation of this chapter, the
seizing law enforcement agency must prove by a preponderance of the
evidence that the property constitutes proceeds traceable to a
violation of this chapter.
(9) When property is forfeited under this chapter the seizing law
enforcement agency may:
(a) Retain it for official use or upon application by any law
enforcement agency of this state release the property to that agency
for the exclusive use of enforcing this chapter;
(b) Sell that which is not required to be destroyed by law and
which is not harmful to the public. The proceeds and all moneys
forfeited under this chapter shall be used for payment of all proper
expenses of the investigation leading to the seizure, including any
money delivered to the subject of the investigation by the law
enforcement agency, and of the proceedings for forfeiture and sale,
including expenses of seizure, maintenance of custody, advertising,
actual costs of the prosecuting or city attorney, and court costs.
Fifty percent of the money remaining after payment of these expenses
shall be deposited in the ((public safety and education account
established under RCW 43.08.250)) state general fund and fifty percent
shall be deposited in the general fund of the state, county, or city of
the seizing law enforcement agency; or
(c) Request the appropriate sheriff or director of public safety to
take custody of the property and remove it for disposition in
accordance with law.

Sec. 11 RCW 10.82.090 and 2004 c 121 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, financial
obligations imposed in a judgment shall bear interest from the date of
the judgment until payment, at the rate applicable to civil judgments.
All nonrestitution interest retained by the court shall be split
twenty-five percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the ((public
safety and education account as provided in RCW 43.08.250)) state
general fund, twenty-five percent to the state treasurer for deposit in
the judicial information system account as provided in RCW 2.68.020,
twenty-five percent to the county current expense fund, and twenty-five
percent to the county current expense fund to fund local courts.
(2) The court may, on motion by the offender, following the
offender's release from total confinement, reduce or waive the interest
on legal financial obligations levied as a result of a criminal
conviction. The court may reduce or waive the interest only as an
incentive for the offender to meet his or her legal financial
obligations. The court may not waive the interest on the restitution
portion of the legal financial obligation and may only reduce the
interest on the restitution portion of the legal financial obligation
if the principal of the restitution has been paid in full. The
offender must show that he or she has personally made a good faith
effort to pay, that the interest accrual is causing a significant
hardship, and that he or she will be unable to pay the principal and
interest in full and that reduction or waiver of the interest will
likely enable the offender to pay the full principal and any remaining
interest thereon. For purposes of this section, "good faith effort"
means that the offender has either (a) paid the principal amount in
full; or (b) made twenty-four consecutive monthly payments, excluding
any payments mandatorily deducted by the department of corrections, on
his or her legal financial obligations under his or her payment
agreement with the court. The court may grant the motion, establish a
payment schedule, and retain jurisdiction over the offender for
purposes of reviewing and revising the reduction or waiver of interest.
This section applies to persons convicted as adults or in juvenile
court.

Sec. 12 RCW 10.105.010 and 1993 c 288 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The following are subject to seizure and forfeiture and no
property right exists in them: All personal property, including, but
not limited to, any item, object, tool, substance, device, weapon,
machine, vehicle of any kind, money, security, or negotiable
instrument, which has been or was actually employed as an
instrumentality in the commission of, or in aiding or abetting in the
commission of any felony, or which was furnished or was intended to be
furnished by any person in the commission of, as a result of, or as
compensation for the commission of, any felony, or which was acquired
in whole or in part with proceeds traceable to the commission of a
felony. No property may be forfeited under this section until after
there has been a superior court conviction of the owner of the property
for the felony in connection with which the property was employed,
furnished, or acquired.
A forfeiture of property encumbered by a bona fide security
interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if at the time
the security interest was created, the secured party neither had
knowledge of nor consented to the commission of the felony.
(2) Personal property subject to forfeiture under this chapter may
be seized by any law enforcement officer of this state upon process
issued by any superior court having jurisdiction over the property.
Seizure of personal property without process may be made if:
(a) The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under a search
warrant;
(b) The property subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior
judgment in favor of the state in a criminal injunction or forfeiture
proceeding;
(c) A law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that
the property is directly dangerous to health or safety; or
(d) The law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that
the property was used or is intended to be used in the commission of a
felony.
(3) In the event of seizure pursuant to this section, proceedings
for forfeiture shall be deemed commenced by the seizure. The law
enforcement agency under whose authority the seizure was made shall
cause notice to be served within fifteen days following the seizure on
the owner of the property seized and the person in charge thereof and
any person having any known right or interest therein, including any
community property interest, of the seizure and intended forfeiture of
the seized property. The notice of seizure may be served by any method
authorized by law or court rule including but not limited to service by
certified mail with return receipt requested. Service by mail shall be
deemed complete upon mailing within the fifteen day period following
the seizure. Notice of seizure in the case of property subject to a
security interest that has been perfected by filing a financing
statement in accordance with chapter ((62A.9)) 62A.9A RCW, or a
certificate of title shall be made by service upon the secured party or
the secured party's assignee at the address shown on the financing
statement or the certificate of title.
(4) If no person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in
writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of
items specified in subsection (1) of this section within forty-five
days of the seizure, the item seized shall be deemed forfeited.
(5) If a person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in
writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of
the seized property within forty-five days of the seizure, the law
enforcement agency shall give the person or persons a reasonable
opportunity to be heard as to the claim or right. The hearing shall be
before the chief law enforcement officer of the seizing agency or the
chief law enforcement officer's designee, except where the seizing
agency is a state agency as defined in RCW 34.12.020(4), the hearing
shall be before the chief law enforcement officer of the seizing agency
or an administrative law judge appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW,
except that any person asserting a claim or right may remove the matter
to a court of competent jurisdiction. Removal may only be accomplished
according to the rules of civil procedure. The person seeking removal
of the matter must serve process against the state, county, political
subdivision, or municipality that operates the seizing agency, and any
other party of interest, in accordance with RCW 4.28.080 or 4.92.020,
within forty-five days after the person seeking removal has notified
the seizing law enforcement agency of the person's claim of ownership
or right to possession. The court to which the matter is to be removed
shall be the district court when the aggregate value of the property is
within the jurisdictional limit set forth in RCW 3.66.020. A hearing
before the seizing agency and any appeal therefrom shall be under Title
34 RCW. In a court hearing between two or more claimants to the
property involved, the prevailing party shall be entitled to a judgment
for costs and reasonable attorney's fees. The burden of producing
evidence shall be upon the person claiming to be the lawful owner or
the person claiming to have the lawful right to possession of the
property. The seizing law enforcement agency shall promptly return the
property to the claimant upon a determination by the administrative law
judge or court that the claimant is the present lawful owner or is
lawfully entitled to possession of the property.
(6) When property is forfeited under this chapter, after satisfying
any court-ordered victim restitution, the seizing law enforcement
agency may:
(a) Retain it for official use or upon application by any law
enforcement agency of this state release such property to such agency
for the exclusive use of enforcing the criminal law;
(b) Sell that which is not required to be destroyed by law and
which is not harmful to the public.
(7) By January 31st of each year, each seizing agency shall remit
to the state treasurer an amount equal to ten percent of the net
proceeds of any property forfeited during the preceding calendar year.
Money remitted shall be deposited in the ((public safety and education
account)) state general fund.
(a) The net proceeds of forfeited property is the value of the
forfeitable interest in the property after deducting the cost of
satisfying any bona fide security interest to which the property is
subject at the time of seizure; and in the case of sold property, after
deducting the cost of sale, including reasonable fees or commissions
paid to independent selling agents.
(b) The value of sold forfeited property is the sale price. The
value of retained forfeited property is the fair market value of the
property at the time of seizure, determined when possible by reference
to an applicable commonly used index, such as the index used by the
department of licensing for valuation of motor vehicles. A seizing
agency may use, but need not use, an independent qualified appraiser to
determine the value of retained property. If an appraiser is used, the
value of the property appraised is net of the cost of the appraisal.
The value of destroyed property and retained firearms or illegal
property is zero.
(c) Retained property and net proceeds not required to be paid to
the state treasurer, or otherwise required to be spent under this
section, shall be retained by the seizing law enforcement agency
exclusively for the expansion and improvement of law enforcement
activity. Money retained under this section may not be used to
supplant preexisting funding sources.

Sec. 13 RCW 35.20.220 and 2004 c 15 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The chief clerk, under the supervision and direction of the
court administrator of the municipal court, shall have the custody and
care of the books, papers, and records of ((said)) the court((; he)).
The chief clerk or a deputy shall be present ((by himself or deputy))
during the session of ((said)) the court((,)) and ((shall have)) has
the power to swear all witnesses and jurors, ((and)) administer oaths
and affidavits, and take acknowledgments. ((He)) The chief clerk shall
keep the records of ((said)) the court((,)) and shall issue all process
under his or her hand and the seal of ((said)) the court((, and)). The
chief clerk shall do and perform all things and have the same powers
pertaining to ((his)) the office as the clerks of the superior courts
have in their office. He or she shall receive all fines, penalties,
and fees of every kind((,)) and keep a full, accurate, and detailed
account of the same((; and)). The chief clerk shall on each day pay
into the city treasury all money received for ((said)) the city during
the day previous, with a detailed account of the same, and taking the
treasurer's receipt therefor.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 10.99.080, the city treasurer shall
remit monthly thirty-two percent of the noninterest money received
under this section, other than for parking infractions and certain
costs to the state treasurer. "Certain costs" as used in this
subsection, means those costs awarded to prevailing parties in civil
actions under RCW 4.84.010 or 36.18.040, or those costs awarded against
convicted defendants in criminal actions under RCW 10.01.160,
10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes if such costs are
specifically designated as costs by the court and are awarded for the
specific reimbursement of costs incurred by the state, county, city, or
town in the prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense
counsel. Money remitted under this subsection to the state treasurer
shall be deposited ((as provided in RCW 43.08.250)) in the state
general fund.
(3) The balance of the noninterest money received under this
section shall be retained by the city and deposited as provided by law.
(4) Penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs may accrue
interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum, upon assignment to a
collection agency. Interest may accrue only while the case is in
collection status.
(5) Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, bail
forfeitures, fees, and costs shall be split twenty-five percent to the
state treasurer for deposit in the ((public safety and education
account as provided in RCW 43.08.250)) state general fund, twenty-five
percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the judicial information
system account as provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to the
city general fund, and twenty-five percent to the city general fund to
fund local courts.

Sec. 14 RCW 36.18.012 and 2001 c 146 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Revenue collected under this section is subject to division
with the state ((for deposit in the public safety and education
account)) under RCW 36.18.025.
(2) The party filing a transcript or abstract of judgment or
verdict from a United States court held in this state, or from the
superior court of another county or from a district court in the county
of issuance, shall pay at the time of filing a fee of fifteen dollars.
(3) The clerk shall collect a fee of twenty dollars for: Filing a
paper not related to or a part of a proceeding, civil or criminal, or
a probate matter, required or permitted to be filed in the clerk's
office for which no other charge is provided by law.
(4) If the defendant serves or files an answer to an unlawful
detainer complaint under chapter 59.18 or 59.20 RCW, the plaintiff
shall pay before proceeding with the unlawful detainer action eighty
dollars.
(5) For a restrictive covenant for filing a petition to strike
discriminatory provisions in real estate under RCW 49.60.227 a fee of
twenty dollars must be charged.
(6) A fee of twenty dollars must be charged for filing a will only,
when no probate of the will is contemplated.
(7) A fee of two dollars must be charged for filing a petition,
written agreement, or written memorandum in a nonjudicial probate
dispute under RCW 11.96A.220.
(8) A fee of thirty-five dollars must be charged for filing a
petition regarding a common law lien under RCW 60.70.060.
(9) For certification of delinquent taxes by a county treasurer
under RCW 84.64.190, a fee of five dollars must be charged.
(10) For the filing of a tax warrant for unpaid taxes or
overpayment of benefits by any agency of the state of Washington, a fee
of five dollars on or after July 22, 2001, and for the filing of such
a tax warrant or overpayment of benefits on or after July 1, 2003, a
fee of twenty dollars, of which forty-six percent of the first five
dollars is directed to the ((public safety and education account
established under RCW 43.08.250)) state general fund.

Sec. 15 RCW 36.18.020 and 2000 c 9 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Revenue collected under this section is subject to division
with the state ((public safety and education account)) under RCW
36.18.025 and with the county or regional law library fund under RCW
27.24.070.
(2) Clerks of superior courts shall collect the following fees for
their official services:
(a) The party filing the first or initial paper in any civil
action, including, but not limited to an action for restitution,
adoption, or change of name, shall pay, at the time the paper is filed,
a fee of one hundred ten dollars except, in an unlawful detainer action
under chapter 59.18 or 59.20 RCW for which the plaintiff shall pay a
case initiating filing fee of thirty dollars, or in proceedings filed
under RCW 28A.225.030 alleging a violation of the compulsory attendance
laws where the petitioner shall not pay a filing fee. The thirty
dollar filing fee under this subsection for an unlawful detainer action
shall not include an order to show cause or any other order or judgment
except a default order or default judgment in an unlawful detainer
action.
(b) Any party, except a defendant in a criminal case, filing the
first or initial paper on an appeal from a court of limited
jurisdiction or any party on any civil appeal, shall pay, when the
paper is filed, a fee of one hundred ten dollars.
(c) For filing of a petition for judicial review as required under
RCW 34.05.514 a filing fee of one hundred ten dollars.
(d) For filing of a petition for unlawful harassment under RCW
10.14.040 a filing fee of forty-one dollars.
(e) For filing the notice of debt due for the compensation of a
crime victim under RCW 7.68.120(2)(a) a fee of one hundred ten dollars.
(f) In probate proceedings, the party instituting such proceedings,
shall pay at the time of filing the first paper therein, a fee of one
hundred ten dollars.
(g) For filing any petition to contest a will admitted to probate
or a petition to admit a will which has been rejected, or a petition
objecting to a written agreement or memorandum as provided in RCW
11.96A.220, there shall be paid a fee of one hundred ten dollars.
(h) Upon conviction or plea of guilty, upon failure to prosecute an
appeal from a court of limited jurisdiction as provided by law, or upon
affirmance of a conviction by a court of limited jurisdiction, a
defendant in a criminal case shall be liable for a fee of one hundred
ten dollars.
(i) With the exception of demands for jury hereafter made and
garnishments hereafter issued, civil actions and probate proceedings
filed prior to midnight, July 1, 1972, shall be completed and governed
by the fee schedule in effect as of January 1, 1972: PROVIDED, That no
fee shall be assessed if an order of dismissal on the clerk's record be
filed as provided by rule of the supreme court.
(3) No fee shall be collected when a petition for relinquishment of
parental rights is filed pursuant to RCW 26.33.080 or for forms and
instructional brochures provided under RCW 26.50.030.

Sec. 16 RCW 36.18.025 and 2001 c 146 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Forty-six percent of the money received from filing fees paid
pursuant to RCW 36.18.020, except those collected for the filing of
warrants for unpaid taxes or overpayments by state agencies as outlined
in RCW 36.18.012(10), shall be transmitted by the county treasurer each
month to the state treasurer for deposit in the ((public safety and
education account established under RCW 43.08.250)) state general fund.

Sec. 17 RCW 43.17.150 and 1986 c 246 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each state agency is authorized to receive property or money
made available by the attorney general of the United States under
section 881(e) of Title 21 of the United States Code and, except as
required to the contrary under subsection (2) of this section, to use
the property or spend the money for such purposes as are permitted
under both federal law and the state law specifying the powers and
duties of the agency.
(2) Unless precluded by federal law, all funds received by a state
agency under section 881(e) of Title 21 of the United States Code shall
be promptly deposited into the ((public safety and education account
established in RCW 43.08.250)) state general fund.

Sec. 18 RCW 46.61.5058 and 1998 c 207 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon the arrest of a person or upon the filing of a complaint,
citation, or information in a court of competent jurisdiction, based
upon probable cause to believe that a person has violated RCW 46.61.502
or 46.61.504 or any similar municipal ordinance, if such person has a
prior offense within seven years as defined in RCW 46.61.5055, and
where the person has been provided written notice that any transfer,
sale, or encumbrance of such person's interest in the vehicle over
which that person was actually driving or had physical control when the
violation occurred, is unlawful pending either acquittal, dismissal,
sixty days after conviction, or other termination of the charge, such
person shall be prohibited from encumbering, selling, or transferring
his or her interest in such vehicle, except as otherwise provided in
(a), (b), and (c) of this subsection, until either acquittal,
dismissal, sixty days after conviction, or other termination of the
charge. The prohibition against transfer of title shall not be stayed
pending the determination of an appeal from the conviction.
(a) A vehicle encumbered by a bona fide security interest may be
transferred to the secured party or to a person designated by the
secured party;
(b) A leased or rented vehicle may be transferred to the lessor,
rental agency, or to a person designated by the lessor or rental
agency; and
(c) A vehicle may be transferred to a third party or a vehicle
dealer who is a bona fide purchaser or may be subject to a bona fide
security interest in the vehicle unless it is established that (i) in
the case of a purchase by a third party or vehicle dealer, such party
or dealer had actual notice that the vehicle was subject to the
prohibition prior to the purchase, or (ii) in the case of a security
interest, the holder of the security interest had actual notice that
the vehicle was subject to the prohibition prior to the encumbrance of
title.
(2) On conviction for a violation of either RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504 or any similar municipal ordinance where the person convicted
has a prior offense within seven years as defined in RCW 46.61.5055,
the motor vehicle the person was driving or over which the person had
actual physical control at the time of the offense, if the person has
a financial interest in the vehicle, is subject to seizure and
forfeiture pursuant to this section.
(3) A vehicle subject to forfeiture under this chapter may be
seized by a law enforcement officer of this state upon process issued
by a court of competent jurisdiction. Seizure of a vehicle may be made
without process if the vehicle subject to seizure has been the subject
of a prior judgment in favor of the state in a forfeiture proceeding
based upon this section.
(4) Seizure under subsection (3) of this section automatically
commences proceedings for forfeiture. The law enforcement agency under
whose authority the seizure was made shall cause notice of the seizure
and intended forfeiture of the seized vehicle to be served within
fifteen days after the seizure on the owner of the vehicle seized, on
the person in charge of the vehicle, and on any person having a known
right or interest in the vehicle, including a community property
interest. The notice of seizure may be served by any method authorized
by law or court rule, including but not limited to service by certified
mail with return receipt requested. Service by mail is complete upon
mailing within the fifteen-day period after the seizure. Notice of
seizure in the case of property subject to a security interest that has
been perfected on a certificate of title shall be made by service upon
the secured party or the secured party's assignee at the address shown
on the financing statement or the certificate of title.
(5) If no person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in
writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of
the seized vehicle within forty-five days of the seizure, the vehicle
is deemed forfeited.
(6) If a person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in
writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of
the seized vehicle within forty-five days of the seizure, the law
enforcement agency shall give the person or persons a reasonable
opportunity to be heard as to the claim or right. The hearing shall be
before the chief law enforcement officer of the seizing agency or the
chief law enforcement officer's designee, except where the seizing
agency is a state agency as defined in RCW 34.12.020, the hearing shall
be before the chief law enforcement officer of the seizing agency or an
administrative law judge appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW, except that
any person asserting a claim or right may remove the matter to a court
of competent jurisdiction. Removal may only be accomplished according
to the rules of civil procedure. The person seeking removal of the
matter must serve process against the state, county, political
subdivision, or municipality that operates the seizing agency, and any
other party of interest, in accordance with RCW 4.28.080 or 4.92.020,
within forty-five days after the person seeking removal has notified
the seizing law enforcement agency of the person's claim of ownership
or right to possession. The court to which the matter is to be removed
shall be the district court when the aggregate value of the vehicle is
within the jurisdictional limit set forth in RCW 3.66.020. A hearing
before the seizing agency and any appeal therefrom shall be under Title
34 RCW. In a court hearing between two or more claimants to the
vehicle involved, the prevailing party shall be entitled to a judgment
for costs and reasonable attorneys' fees. The burden of producing
evidence shall be upon the person claiming to be the legal owner or the
person claiming to have the lawful right to possession of the vehicle.
The seizing law enforcement agency shall promptly return the vehicle to
the claimant upon a determination by the administrative law judge or
court that the claimant is the present legal owner under Title 46 RCW
or is lawfully entitled to possession of the vehicle.
(7) When a vehicle is forfeited under this chapter the seizing law
enforcement agency may sell the vehicle, retain it for official use, or
upon application by a law enforcement agency of this state release the
vehicle to that agency for the exclusive use of enforcing this title;
provided, however, that the agency shall first satisfy any bona fide
security interest to which the vehicle is subject under subsection
(1)(a) or (c) of this section.
(8) When a vehicle is forfeited, the seizing agency shall keep a
record indicating the identity of the prior owner, if known, a
description of the vehicle, the disposition of the vehicle, the value
of the vehicle at the time of seizure, and the amount of proceeds
realized from disposition of the vehicle.
(9) Each seizing agency shall retain records of forfeited vehicles
for at least seven years.
(10) Each seizing agency shall file a report including a copy of
the records of forfeited vehicles with the state treasurer each
calendar quarter.
(11) The quarterly report need not include a record of a forfeited
vehicle that is still being held for use as evidence during the
investigation or prosecution of a case or during the appeal from a
conviction.
(12) By January 31st of each year, each seizing agency shall remit
to the state treasurer an amount equal to ten percent of the net
proceeds of vehicles forfeited during the preceding calendar year.
Money remitted shall be deposited in the ((public safety and education
account)) state general fund.
(13) The net proceeds of a forfeited vehicle is the value of the
forfeitable interest in the vehicle after deducting the cost of
satisfying a bona fide security interest to which the vehicle is
subject at the time of seizure; and in the case of a sold vehicle,
after deducting the cost of sale, including reasonable fees or
commissions paid to independent selling agents.
(14) The value of a sold forfeited vehicle is the sale price. The
value of a retained forfeited vehicle is the fair market value of the
vehicle at the time of seizure, determined when possible by reference
to an applicable commonly used index, such as the index used by the
department of licensing. A seizing agency may, but need not, use an
independent qualified appraiser to determine the value of retained
vehicles. If an appraiser is used, the value of the vehicle appraised
is net of the cost of the appraisal.

Sec. 19 RCW 77.12.201 and 1987 c 506 s 29 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislative authority of a county may elect, by giving written
notice to the director and the treasurer prior to January 1st of any
year, to obtain for the following year an amount in lieu of real
property taxes on game lands as provided in RCW 77.12.203. Upon the
election, the county shall keep a record of all fines, forfeitures,
reimbursements, and costs assessed and collected, in whole or in part,
under this title for violations of law or rules adopted pursuant to
this title and shall monthly remit an amount equal to the amount
collected to the state treasurer for deposit in the ((public safety and
education account established under RCW 43.08.250)) state general fund.
The election shall continue until the department is notified
differently prior to January 1st of any year.

Sec. 20 RCW 77.15.420 and 1998 c 190 s 62 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If a person is convicted of violating RCW 77.15.410 and that
violation results in the death of wildlife listed in this section, the
court shall require payment of the following amounts for each animal
killed or possessed. This shall be a criminal wildlife penalty
assessment that shall be paid to the clerk of the court and distributed
each month to the state treasurer for deposit in the ((public safety
and education account)) state general fund.

(2) No forfeiture of bail may be less than the amount of the bail
established for hunting during closed season plus the amount of the
criminal wildlife penalty assessment in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) For the purpose of this section a "trophy animal" is:
(a) A buck deer with four or more antler points on both sides, not
including eyeguards;
(b) A bull elk with five or more antler points on both sides, not
including eyeguards; or
(c) A mountain sheep with a horn curl of three-quarter curl or
greater.
For purposes of this subsection, "eyeguard" means an antler
protrusion on the main beam of the antler closest to the eye of the
animal.
(4) If two or more persons are convicted of illegally possessing
wildlife in subsection (1) of this section, the criminal wildlife
penalty assessment shall be imposed on them jointly and separately.
(5) The criminal wildlife penalty assessment shall be imposed
regardless of and in addition to any sentence, fines, or costs
otherwise provided for violating any provision of this title. The
criminal wildlife penalty assessment shall be included by the court in
any pronouncement of sentence and may not be suspended, waived,
modified, or deferred in any respect. This section may not be
construed to abridge or alter alternative rights of action or remedies
in equity or under common law or statutory law, criminal or civil.
(6) A defaulted criminal wildlife penalty assessment may be
collected by any means authorized by law for the enforcement of orders
of the court or collection of a fine or costs, including but not
limited to vacation of a deferral of sentencing or vacation of a
suspension of sentence.
(7) A person assessed a criminal wildlife penalty assessment under
this section shall have his or her hunting license revoked and all
hunting privileges suspended until the penalty assessment is paid
through the registry of the court in which the penalty assessment was
assessed.

Sec. 21 RCW 72.09.111 and 2004 c 167 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary shall deduct taxes and legal financial
obligations from the gross wages, gratuities, or workers' compensation
benefits payable directly to the inmate under chapter 51.32 RCW, of
each inmate working in correctional industries work programs, or
otherwise receiving such wages, gratuities, or benefits. The secretary
shall also deduct child support payments from the gratuities of each
inmate working in class II through class IV correctional industries
work programs. The secretary shall develop a formula for the
distribution of offender wages, gratuities, and benefits. The formula
shall not reduce the inmate account below the indigency level, as
defined in RCW 72.09.015.
(a) The formula shall include the following minimum deductions from
class I gross wages and from all others earning at least minimum wage:
(i) Five percent to the ((public safety and education account))
state general fund for the purpose of crime victims' compensation;
(ii) Ten percent to a department personal inmate savings account;
(iii) Twenty percent to the department to contribute to the cost of
incarceration; and
(iv) Twenty percent for payment of legal financial obligations for
all inmates who have legal financial obligations owing in any
Washington state superior court.
(b) The formula shall include the following minimum deductions from
class II gross gratuities:
(i) Five percent to the ((public safety and education account))
state general fund for the purpose of crime victims' compensation;
(ii) Ten percent to a department personal inmate savings account;
(iii) Fifteen percent to the department to contribute to the cost
of incarceration;
(iv) Twenty percent for payment of legal financial obligations for
all inmates who have legal financial obligations owing in any
Washington state superior court; and
(v) Fifteen percent for any child support owed under a support
order.
(c) The formula shall include the following minimum deductions from
any workers' compensation benefits paid pursuant to RCW 51.32.080:
(i) Five percent to the ((public safety and education account))
state general fund for the purpose of crime victims' compensation;
(ii) Ten percent to a department personal inmate savings account;
(iii) Twenty percent to the department to contribute to the cost of
incarceration; and
(iv) An amount equal to any legal financial obligations owed by the
inmate established by an order of any Washington state superior court
up to the total amount of the award.
(d) The formula shall include the following minimum deductions from
class III gratuities:
(i) Five percent for the purpose of crime victims' compensation;
and
(ii) Fifteen percent for any child support owed under a support
order.
(e) The formula shall include the following minimum deduction from
class IV gross gratuities:
(i) Five percent to the department to contribute to the cost of
incarceration; and
(ii) Fifteen percent for any child support owed under a support
order.
(2) Any person sentenced to life imprisonment without possibility
of release or parole under chapter 10.95 RCW or sentenced to death
shall be exempt from the requirement under subsection (1)(a)(ii),
(b)(ii), or (c)(ii).
(3) The department personal inmate savings account, together with
any accrued interest, shall only be available to an inmate at the time
of his or her release from confinement, unless the secretary determines
that an emergency exists for the inmate, at which time the funds can be
made available to the inmate in an amount determined by the secretary.
The management of classes I, II, and IV correctional industries may
establish an incentive payment for offender workers based on
productivity criteria. This incentive shall be paid separately from
the hourly wage/gratuity rate and shall not be subject to the specified
deduction for cost of incarceration.
(4)(a) Subject to availability of funds for the correctional
industries program, the expansion of inmate employment in class I and
class II correctional industries shall be implemented according to the
following schedule:
(i) Not later than June 30, 2005, the secretary shall achieve a net
increase of at least two hundred in the number of inmates employed in
class I or class II correctional industries work programs above the
number so employed on June 30, 2003;
(ii) Not later than June 30, 2006, the secretary shall achieve a
net increase of at least four hundred in the number of inmates employed
in class I or class II correctional industries work programs above the
number so employed on June 30, 2003;
(iii) Not later than June 30, 2007, the secretary shall achieve a
net increase of at least six hundred in the number of inmates employed
in class I or class II correctional industries work programs above the
number so employed on June 30, 2003;
(iv) Not later than June 30, 2008, the secretary shall achieve a
net increase of at least nine hundred in the number of inmates employed
in class I or class II correctional industries work programs above the
number so employed on June 30, 2003;
(v) Not later than June 30, 2009, the secretary shall achieve a net
increase of at least one thousand two hundred in the number of inmates
employed in class I or class II correctional industries work programs
above the number so employed on June 30, 2003;
(vi) Not later than June 30, 2010, the secretary shall achieve a
net increase of at least one thousand five hundred in the number of
inmates employed in class I or class II correctional industries work
programs above the number so employed on June 30, 2003.
(b) Failure to comply with the schedule in this subsection does not
create a private right of action.
(5) In the event that the offender worker's wages, gratuity, or
workers' compensation benefit is subject to garnishment for support
enforcement, the crime victims' compensation, savings, and cost of
incarceration deductions shall be calculated on the net wages after
taxes, legal financial obligations, and garnishment.
(6) The department shall explore other methods of recovering a
portion of the cost of the inmate's incarceration and for encouraging
participation in work programs, including development of incentive
programs that offer inmates benefits and amenities paid for only from
wages earned while working in a correctional industries work program.
(7) The department shall develop the necessary administrative
structure to recover inmates' wages and keep records of the amount
inmates pay for the costs of incarceration and amenities. All funds
deducted from inmate wages under subsection (1) of this section for the
purpose of contributions to the cost of incarceration shall be
deposited in a dedicated fund with the department and shall be used
only for the purpose of enhancing and maintaining correctional
industries work programs.
(8) It shall be in the discretion of the secretary to apportion the
inmates between class I and class II depending on available contracts
and resources.
(9) Nothing in this section shall limit the authority of the
department of social and health services division of child support from
taking collection action against an inmate's moneys, assets, or
property pursuant to chapter 26.23, 74.20, or 74.20A RCW.

Sec. 22 RCW 72.09.480 and 2003 c 271 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this section apply to this section.
(a) "Cost of incarceration" means the cost of providing an inmate
with shelter, food, clothing, transportation, supervision, and other
services and supplies as may be necessary for the maintenance and
support of the inmate while in the custody of the department, based on
the average per inmate costs established by the department and the
office of financial management.
(b) "Minimum term of confinement" means the minimum amount of time
an inmate will be confined in the custody of the department,
considering the sentence imposed and adjusted for the total potential
earned early release time available to the inmate.
(c) "Program" means any series of courses or classes necessary to
achieve a proficiency standard, certificate, or postsecondary degree.
(2) When an inmate, except as provided in subsection (7) of this
section, receives any funds in addition to his or her wages or
gratuities, except settlements or awards resulting from legal action,
the additional funds shall be subject to the following deductions and
the priorities established in chapter 72.11 RCW:
(a) Five percent to the ((public safety and education account))
state general fund for the purpose of crime victims' compensation;
(b) Ten percent to a department personal inmate savings account;
(c) Twenty percent to the department to contribute to the cost of
incarceration;
(d) Twenty percent for payment of legal financial obligations for
all inmates who have legal financial obligations owing in any
Washington state superior court; and
(e) Fifteen percent for any child support owed under a support
order.
(3) When an inmate, except as provided in subsection (7) of this
section, receives any funds from a settlement or award resulting from
a legal action, the additional funds shall be subject to the deductions
in RCW 72.09.111(1)(a) and the priorities established in chapter 72.11
RCW.
(4) The amount deducted from an inmate's funds under subsection (2)
of this section shall not exceed the department's total cost of
incarceration for the inmate incurred during the inmate's minimum or
actual term of confinement, whichever is longer.
(5) The deductions required under subsection (2) of this section
shall not apply to funds received by the department on behalf of an
offender for payment of one fee-based education or vocational program
that is associated with an inmate's work program or a placement
decision made by the department under RCW 72.09.460 to prepare an
inmate for work upon release.
An inmate may, prior to the completion of the fee-based education
or vocational program authorized under this subsection, apply to a
person designated by the secretary for permission to make a change in
his or her program. The secretary, or his or her designee, may approve
the application based solely on the following criteria: (a) The inmate
has been transferred to another institution by the department for
reasons unrelated to education or a change to a higher security
classification and the offender's current program is unavailable in the
offender's new placement; (b) the inmate entered an academic program as
an undeclared major and wishes to declare a major. No inmate may apply
for more than one change to his or her major and receive the exemption
from deductions specified in this subsection; (c) the educational or
vocational institution is terminating the inmate's current program; or
(d) the offender's training or education has demonstrated that the
current program is not the appropriate program to assist the offender
to achieve a placement decision made by the department under RCW
72.09.460 to prepare the inmate for work upon release.
(6) The deductions required under subsection (2) of this section
shall not apply to any money received by the department, on behalf of
an inmate, from family or other outside sources for the payment of
postage expenses. Money received under this subsection may only be
used for the payment of postage expenses and may not be transferred to
any other account or purpose. Money that remains unused in the
inmate's postage fund at the time of release shall be subject to the
deductions outlined in subsection (2) of this section.
(7) When an inmate sentenced to life imprisonment without
possibility of release or parole, or to death under chapter 10.95 RCW,
receives any funds in addition to his or her gratuities, except
settlements or awards resulting from legal action, the additional funds
shall be subject to: Deductions of five percent to the ((public safety
and education account)) state general fund for the purpose of crime
victims' compensation, twenty percent to the department to contribute
to the cost of incarceration, and fifteen percent to child support
payments.
(8) When an inmate sentenced to life imprisonment without
possibility of release or parole, or to death under chapter 10.95 RCW,
receives any funds from a settlement or award resulting from a legal
action in addition to his or her gratuities, the additional funds shall
be subject to: Deductions of five percent to the ((public safety and
education account)) state general fund for the purpose of crime
victims' compensation and twenty percent to the department to
contribute to the cost of incarceration.
(9) The interest earned on an inmate savings account created as a
result of the plan in section 4, chapter 325, Laws of 1999 shall be
exempt from the mandatory deductions under this section and RCW
72.09.111.
(10) Nothing in this section shall limit the authority of the
department of social and health services division of child support from
taking collection action against an inmate's moneys, assets, or
property pursuant to chapter 26.23, 74.20, or 74.20A RCW including, but
not limited to, the collection of moneys received by the inmate from
settlements or awards resulting from legal action.

Sec. 23 RCW 43.99H.040 and 1997 c 456 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Both principal of and interest on the bonds issued for the
purposes of RCW 43.99H.020(16) shall be payable from the nondebt-limit
reimbursable bond retirement account.
The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th of each
year, certify to the state treasurer the amount required to provide for
the payment of principal and interest on such bonds during the ensuing
fiscal year in accordance with the provisions of the bond proceedings.
The state treasurer shall withdraw from any general state revenues
received in the state treasury and deposit in the nondebt-limit
reimbursable bond retirement account such amounts and at such times as
are required by the bond proceedings.
(2) Both principal of and interest on the bonds issued for the
purposes of RCW 43.99H.020(15) shall be payable from the debt-limit
reimbursable bond retirement account and nondebt-limit reimbursable
bond retirement account as set forth under RCW 43.99H.060(2).
The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th of each
year, certify to the state treasurer the amount required to provide for
the payment of principal and interest on such bonds during the ensuing
fiscal year in accordance with the provisions of the bond proceedings.
The state treasurer shall withdraw from any general state revenues
received in the state treasury and deposit in the debt-limit
reimbursable bond retirement account and nondebt-limit reimbursable
bond retirement account as set forth under RCW 43.99H.060(2) such
amounts and at such times as are required by the bond proceedings.
(3) Both principal of and interest on the bonds issued for the
purposes of RCW 43.99H.020(17) shall be payable from the nondebt-limit
proprietary appropriated bond retirement account.
The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th of each
year, certify to the state treasurer the amount required to provide for
the payment of principal and interest on such bonds during the ensuing
fiscal year in accordance with the provisions of the bond proceedings.
The state treasurer shall withdraw from any general state revenues
received in the state treasury and deposit in the nondebt-limit
proprietary appropriated bond retirement account such amounts and at
such times as are required by the bond proceedings.
(4) Both principal of and interest on the bonds issued for the
purposes of RCW 43.99H.020(18) shall be payable from the nondebt-limit
reimbursable bond retirement account.
The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th of each
year, certify to the state treasurer the amount required to provide for
the payment of principal and interest on such bonds during the ensuing
fiscal year in accordance with the provisions of the bond proceedings.
The state treasurer shall withdraw from any general state revenues
received in the state treasury and deposit in the nondebt-limit
reimbursable bond retirement account such amounts and at such times as
are required by the bond proceedings.
(5) Both principal of and interest on the bonds issued for the
purposes of RCW 43.99H.020(20) shall be payable from the ((nondebt-limit reimbursable)) debt-limit general fund bond retirement account.
The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th of each
year, certify to the state treasurer the amount required to provide for
the payment of principal and interest on such bonds during the ensuing
fiscal year in accordance with the provisions of the bond proceedings.
The state treasurer shall withdraw from any general state revenues
received in the state treasury and deposit in the nondebt-limit
reimbursable bond retirement account such amounts and at such times as
are required by the bond proceedings.
(6) Both principal of and interest on the bonds issued for the
purposes of RCW 43.99H.020(4) shall be payable from the nondebt-limit
general fund bond retirement account.
The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th of each
year, certify to the state treasurer the amount required to provide for
the payment of principal and interest on such bonds during the ensuing
fiscal year in accordance with the provisions of the bond proceedings.
The state treasurer shall withdraw from any general state revenues
received in the state treasury and deposit in the nondebt-limit general
fund bond retirement account such amounts and at such times as are
required by the bond proceedings.

Sec. 24 RCW 43.99H.060 and 1991 sp.s. c 31 s 15 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) For bonds issued for the purposes of RCW 43.99H.020(16), on
each date on which any interest or principal and interest payment is
due, the board of regents or the board of trustees of Washington State
University shall cause the amount computed in RCW 43.99H.040(1) to be
paid out of the appropriate building account or capital projects
account to the state treasurer for deposit into the general fund of the
state treasury.
(2) For bonds issued for the purposes of RCW 43.99H.020(15), on
each date on which any interest or principal and interest payment is
due, the state treasurer shall transfer the amount computed in RCW
43.99H.040(2) from the capitol campus reserve account, hereby created
in the state treasury, to the general fund of the state treasury. At
the time of sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of RCW
43.99H.020(15), and on or before June 30th of each succeeding year
while such bonds remain outstanding, the state finance committee shall
determine, based on current balances and estimated receipts and
expenditures from the capitol campus reserve account, that portion of
principal and interest on such RCW 43.99H.020(15) bonds which will, by
virtue of payments from the capitol campus reserve account, be
reimbursed from sources other than "general state revenues" as that
term is defined in Article VIII, section 1 of the state Constitution.
The amount so determined by the state finance committee, as from time
to time adjusted in accordance with this subsection, shall not
constitute indebtedness for purposes of the limitations set forth in
RCW 39.42.060.
(3) For bonds issued for the purposes of RCW 43.99H.020(17), on
each date on which any interest or principal and interest payment is
due, the director of the department of labor and industries shall cause
fifty percent of the amount computed in RCW 43.99H.040(3) to be
transferred from the accident fund created in RCW 51.44.010 and fifty
percent of the amount computed in RCW 43.99H.040(3) to be transferred
from the medical aid fund created in RCW 51.44.020, to the general fund
of the state treasury.
(4) For bonds issued for the purposes of RCW 43.99H.020(18), on
each date on which any interest or principal and interest payment is
due, the board of regents of the University of Washington shall cause
the amount computed in RCW 43.99H.040(4) to be paid out of University
of Washington nonappropriated local funds to the state treasurer for
deposit into the general fund of the state treasury.
(5) ((For bonds issued for the purposes of RCW 43.99H.020(20), on
each date on which any interest or principal and interest payment is
due, the state treasurer shall transfer the amount computed in RCW
43.99H.040(5) from the public safety and education account created in
RCW 43.08.250 to the general fund of the state treasury.
(6))) For bonds issued for the purposes of RCW 43.99H.020(4), on
each date on which any interest or principal and interest payment is
due, the state treasurer shall transfer from property taxes in the
state general fund levied for the support of the common schools under
RCW 84.52.065 to the general fund of the state treasury for
unrestricted use the amount computed in RCW 43.99H.040(6).

Sec. 25 RCW 43.99K.030 and 1997 c 456 s 23 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The debt-limit general fund bond retirement account shall be
used for the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds
authorized in RCW 43.99K.020 (1), (2), and (3).
(b) The debt-limit ((reimbursable)) general fund bond retirement
account shall be used for the payment of the principal of and interest
on the bonds authorized in RCW 43.99K.020(4).
(c) The nondebt-limit reimbursable bond retirement account shall be
used for the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds
authorized in RCW 43.99K.020(5).
(2) The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th of
each year, certify to the state treasurer the amount needed in the
ensuing twelve months to meet the bond retirement and interest
requirements. Not less than thirty days prior to the date on which any
interest or principal and interest payment is due, the state treasurer
shall withdraw from any general state revenues received in the state
treasury and deposit in the debt-limit general fund bond retirement
account, debt-limit reimbursable bond retirement account, nondebt-limit
reimbursable bond retirement account, as necessary, an amount equal to
the amount certified by the state finance committee to be due on the
payment date.
(3) ((On each date on which any interest or principal and interest
payment is due on bonds issued for the purposes of RCW 43.99K.020(4),
the state treasurer shall transfer from the public safety and education
account to the general fund of the state treasury the amount computed
in subsection (2) of this section for the bonds issued for the purposes
of RCW 43.99K.020(4).
(4))) On each date on which any interest or principal and interest
payment is due on bonds issued for the purposes of RCW 43.99K.020(5),
the board of regents of the University of Washington shall cause to be
paid out of University of Washington nonappropriated local funds to the
state treasurer for deposit into the general fund of the state treasury
the amount computed in subsection (2) of this section for bonds issued
for the purposes of RCW 43.99K.020(5).
(((5))) (4) Bonds issued under this section and RCW 43.99K.010 and
43.99K.020 shall state that they are a general obligation of the state
of Washington, shall pledge the full faith and credit of the state to
the payment of the principal thereof and the interest thereon, and
shall contain an unconditional promise to pay the principal and
interest as the same shall become due.
(((6))) (5) The owner and holder of each of the bonds or the
trustee for the owner and holder of any of the bonds may by mandamus or
other appropriate proceeding require the transfer and payment of funds
as directed in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 RCW 43.08.250 (Public safety and education
account -- Use) and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 918 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---