BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.52.020 and 1994 c 81 s 85 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be the duty of the city council or other governing body of
every city, other than a city having a population of three hundred
thousand or more, the board of directors of school districts of the
first class, the superintendent of each educational service district
for each constituent second class school district, commissioners of
port districts, commissioners of metropolitan park districts, and of
all officials or boards of taxing districts within or coextensive with
any county required by law to certify to the county legislative
authority, for the purpose of levying district taxes, budgets or
estimates of the amounts to be raised by taxation on the assessed
valuation of the property in the city or district, through their chair
and clerk, or secretary, to make and file such certified budget or
estimates with the clerk of the county legislative authority on or
before the ((fifteenth)) thirtieth day of November.

--- END ---