BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.02.030 and 2004 c 166 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A patient may authorize a health care provider to disclose the
patient's health care information. A health care provider shall honor
an authorization and, if requested, provide a copy of the recorded
health care information unless the health care provider denies the
patient access to health care information under RCW 70.02.090.
(2) A health care provider may charge a reasonable fee for
providing the health care information and is not required to honor an
authorization until the fee is paid.
(3) To be valid, a disclosure authorization to a health care
provider shall:
(a) Be in writing, dated, and signed by the patient;
(b) Identify the nature of the information to be disclosed;
(c) Identify the name, address, and institutional affiliation of
the person or class of persons to whom the information is to be
disclosed;
(d) Except for third-party payors, identify the provider or class
of providers who ((is)) are to make the disclosure; and
(e) Identify the patient.
(4) Except as provided by this chapter, the signing of an
authorization by a patient is not a waiver of any rights a patient has
under other statutes, the rules of evidence, or common law.
(5) A health care provider shall retain the original or a copy of
each authorization or revocation in conjunction with any health care
information from which disclosures are made. This requirement shall
not apply to disclosures to third-party payors.
(6) ((Except for authorizations given pursuant to an agreement with
a treatment or monitoring program or disciplinary authority under
chapter 18.71 or 18.130 RCW, when the patient is under the supervision
of the department of corrections, or to provide information to third-party payors, an authorization may not permit the release of health
care information relating to future health care that the patient
receives more than ninety days after the authorization was signed.
Patients shall be advised of the period of validity of their
authorization on the disclosure authorization form. If the
authorization does not contain an expiration date and the patient is
not under the supervision of the department of corrections, it expires
ninety days after it is signed.)) An authorization shall automatically
terminate sixty days after the date of the patient's death unless it
expressly provides for a different expiration date, or for its
expiration on the occurrence of an event that relates to the patient or
the purpose of the use or disclosure.
(7) Where the patient is under the supervision of the department of
corrections, an authorization signed pursuant to this section for
health care information related to mental health or drug or alcohol
treatment expires at the end of the term of supervision, unless the
patient is part of a treatment program that requires the continued
exchange of information until the end of the period of treatment.

--- END ---