BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 TITLE. This act may be cited as the Uniform
Mediation Act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:
(1) "Mediation" means a process in which a mediator facilitates
communication and negotiation between parties to assist them in
reaching a voluntary agreement regarding their dispute.
(2) "Mediation communication" means a statement, whether oral or in
a record or verbal or nonverbal, that occurs during a mediation or is
made for purposes of considering, conducting, participating in,
initiating, continuing, or reconvening a mediation or retaining a
mediator.
(3) "Mediator" means an individual who conducts a mediation.
(4) "Nonparty participant" means a person, other than a party or
mediator, that participates in a mediation.
(5) "Mediation party" means a person that participates in a
mediation and whose agreement is necessary to resolve the dispute.
(6) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust,
estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association,
joint venture, government; governmental subdivision, agency, or
instrumentality; or public corporation, or any other legal or
commercial entity.
(7) "Proceeding" means:
(a) A judicial, administrative, arbitral, or other adjudicative
process, including related prehearing and posthearing motions,
conferences, and discovery; or
(b) A legislative hearing or similar process.
(8) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible
medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is
retrievable in perceivable form.
(9) "Sign" means:
(a) To execute or adopt a tangible symbol with the present intent
to authenticate a record; or
(b) To attach or logically associate an electronic symbol, sound,
or process to or with a record with the present intent to authenticate
a record.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 SCOPE. (1) Except as otherwise provided in
subsection (2) or (3) of this section, this chapter applies to a
mediation in which:
(a) The mediation parties are required to mediate by statute or
court or administrative agency rule or referred to mediation by a
court, administrative agency, or arbitrator;
(b) The mediation parties and the mediator agree to mediate in a
record that demonstrates an expectation that mediation communications
will be privileged against disclosure; or
(c) The mediation parties use as a mediator an individual who holds
himself or herself out as a mediator or the mediation is provided by a
person that holds itself out as providing mediation.
(2) This chapter does not apply to a mediation:
(a) Conducted by a judge who might make a ruling on the case; or
(b) Conducted under the auspices of:
(i) A primary or secondary school if all the parties are students;
or
(ii) A correctional institution for youths if all the parties are
residents of that institution.
(3) If the parties agree in advance in a signed record, or a record
of proceeding reflects agreement by the parties, that all or part of a
mediation is not privileged, the privileges under sections 4 through 6
of this act do not apply to the mediation or part agreed upon.
However, sections 4 through 6 of this act apply to a mediation
communication made by a person that has not received actual notice of
the agreement before the communication is made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 PRIVILEGE AGAINST DISCLOSURE; ADMISSIBILITY;
DISCOVERY. (1) Except as otherwise provided in section 6 of this act,
a mediation communication is privileged as provided in subsection (2)
of this section and is not subject to discovery or admissible in
evidence in a proceeding unless waived or precluded as provided by
section 5 of this act.
(2) In a proceeding, the following privileges apply:
(a) A mediation party may refuse to disclose, and may prevent any
other person from disclosing, a mediation communication;
(b) A mediator may refuse to disclose a mediation communication,
and may prevent any other person from disclosing a mediation
communication of the mediator; and
(c) A nonparty participant may refuse to disclose, and may prevent
any other person from disclosing, a mediation communication of the
nonparty participant.
(3) Evidence or information that is otherwise admissible or subject
to discovery does not become inadmissible or protected from discovery
solely by reason of its disclosure or use in a mediation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 WAIVER AND PRECLUSION OF PRIVILEGE. (1) A
privilege under section 4 of this act may be waived in a record or
orally during a proceeding if it is expressly waived by all parties to
the mediation and:
(a) In the case of the privilege of a mediator, it is expressly
waived by the mediator; and
(b) In the case of the privilege of a nonparty participant, it is
expressly waived by the nonparty participant.
(2) A person that discloses or makes a representation about a
mediation communication which prejudices another person in a proceeding
is precluded from asserting a privilege under section 4 of this act,
but only to the extent necessary for the person prejudiced to respond
to the representation or disclosure.
(3) A person that intentionally uses a mediation to plan, attempt
to commit, or commit a crime, or to conceal an ongoing crime or ongoing
criminal activity is precluded from asserting a privilege under section
4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 EXCEPTIONS TO PRIVILEGE. (1) There is no
privilege under section 4 of this act for a mediation communication
that is:
(a) In an agreement evidenced by a record signed by all parties to
the agreement;
(b) Made during a session of a mediation which is open, or is
required by law to be open, to the public;
(c) A threat or statement of a plan to inflict bodily injury or
commit a crime of violence;
(d) Intentionally used to plan a crime, attempt to commit or commit
a crime, or to conceal an ongoing crime or ongoing criminal activity;
(e) Sought or offered to prove or disprove a claim or complaint of
professional misconduct or malpractice filed against a mediator;
(f) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section,
sought or offered to prove or disprove a claim or complaint of
professional misconduct or malpractice filed against a mediation party,
nonparty participant, or representative of a party based on conduct
occurring during a mediation; or
(g) Sought or offered to prove or disprove abuse, neglect,
abandonment, or exploitation in a proceeding in which a child or adult
protective services agency is a party, unless the public agency
participates in the child or adult protection mediation.
(2) There is no privilege under section 4 of this act if a court
finds, after a hearing in camera, that the party seeking discovery or
the proponent of the evidence has shown that the evidence is not
otherwise available, that there is a need for the evidence that
substantially outweighs the interest in protecting confidentiality, and
that the mediation communication is sought or offered in:
(a) A criminal court proceeding involving a felony; or
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section,
a proceeding to prove a claim to rescind or reform or a defense to
avoid liability on a contract arising out of the mediation.
(3) A mediator may not be compelled to provide evidence of a
mediation communication referred to in subsection (1)(f) or (2)(b) of
this section.
(4) If a mediation communication is not privileged under subsection
(1) or (2) of this section, only the portion of the communication
necessary for the application of the exception from nondisclosure may
be admitted. Admission of evidence under subsection (1) or (2) of this
section does not render the evidence, or any other mediation
communication, discoverable or admissible for any other purpose.
(5) Records of mediation communications that are privileged under
this chapter are exempt from the requirements of chapter 42.17 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 PROHIBITED MEDIATOR REPORTS. (1) Except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section, a mediator may not make a
report, assessment, evaluation, recommendation, finding, or other
communication regarding a mediation to a court, administrative agency,
or other authority that may make a ruling on the dispute that is the
subject of the mediation.
(2) A mediator may disclose:
(a) Whether the mediation occurred or has terminated, whether a
settlement was reached, attendance, and efforts to schedule a mediation
ordered by a court, administrative agency, or other authority that may
make a ruling on the dispute;
(b) A mediation communication as permitted under section 6 of this
act; or
(c) A mediation communication evidencing abuse, neglect,
abandonment, or exploitation of an individual to a public agency
responsible for protecting individuals against such mistreatment.
(3) A communication made in violation of subsection (1) of this
section may not be considered by a court, administrative agency, or
arbitrator.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 CONFIDENTIALITY. Unless subject to chapter
42.30 RCW, mediation communications are confidential to the extent
agreed by the parties or provided by other law or rule of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 MEDIATOR'S DISCLOSURE OF CONFLICTS OF
INTEREST; BACKGROUND. (1) Before accepting a mediation, an individual
who is requested to serve as a mediator shall:
(a) Make an inquiry that is reasonable under the circumstances to
determine whether there are any known facts that a reasonable
individual would consider likely to affect the impartiality of the
mediator, including a financial or personal interest in the outcome of
the mediation and an existing or past relationship with a mediation
party or foreseeable participant in the mediation; and
(b) Disclose any such known fact to the mediation parties as soon
as is practical before accepting a mediation.
(2) If a mediator learns any fact described in subsection (1)(a) of
this section after accepting a mediation, the mediator shall disclose
it as soon as is practicable.
(3) At the request of a mediation party, an individual who is
requested to serve as a mediator shall disclose the mediator's
qualifications to mediate a dispute.
(4) A person that violates subsection (1) or (2) of this section is
precluded by the violation from asserting a privilege under section 4
of this act.
(5) Subsections (1) through (3) of this section do not apply to an
individual acting as a judge.
(6) This chapter does not require that a mediator have a special
qualification by background or profession.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 PARTICIPATION IN MEDIATION. An attorney or
other individual designated by a party may accompany the party to and
participate in a mediation, except that if the dispute being mediated
is the subject of pending proceedings under chapter 12.40 RCW, then a
party may not be represented by an attorney in mediation unless the
party may be represented by an attorney in the proceedings under
chapter 12.40 RCW. A waiver of participation given before the
mediation may be rescinded.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 RELATION TO ELECTRONIC SIGNATURES IN GLOBAL
AND NATIONAL COMMERCE ACT. This chapter modifies, limits, or
supersedes the federal electronic signatures in global and national
commerce act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001 et seq.), but this chapter does not
modify, limit, or supersede section 101(c) of that act or authorize
electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b)
of that act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 UNIFORMITY OF APPLICATION AND CONSTRUCTION.
In applying and construing this chapter, consideration should be given
to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its
subject matter among states that enact it.

Sec. 13 RCW 42.17.310 and 2003 c 277 s 3 and 2003 c 124 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The following are exempt from public inspection and copying:
(a) Personal information in any files maintained for students in
public schools, patients or clients of public institutions or public
health agencies, or welfare recipients.
(b) Personal information in files maintained for employees,
appointees, or elected officials of any public agency to the extent
that disclosure would violate their right to privacy.
(c) Information required of any taxpayer in connection with the
assessment or collection of any tax if the disclosure of the
information to other persons would (i) be prohibited to such persons by
RCW 84.08.210, 82.32.330, 84.40.020, or 84.40.340 or (ii) violate the
taxpayer's right to privacy or result in unfair competitive
disadvantage to the taxpayer.
(d) Specific intelligence information and specific investigative
records compiled by investigative, law enforcement, and penology
agencies, and state agencies vested with the responsibility to
discipline members of any profession, the nondisclosure of which is
essential to effective law enforcement or for the protection of any
person's right to privacy.
(e) Information revealing the identity of persons who are witnesses
to or victims of crime or who file complaints with investigative, law
enforcement, or penology agencies, other than the public disclosure
commission, if disclosure would endanger any person's life, physical
safety, or property. If at the time a complaint is filed the
complainant, victim or witness indicates a desire for disclosure or
nondisclosure, such desire shall govern. However, all complaints filed
with the public disclosure commission about any elected official or
candidate for public office must be made in writing and signed by the
complainant under oath.
(f) Test questions, scoring keys, and other examination data used
to administer a license, employment, or academic examination.
(g) Except as provided by chapter 8.26 RCW, the contents of real
estate appraisals, made for or by any agency relative to the
acquisition or sale of property, until the project or prospective sale
is abandoned or until such time as all of the property has been
acquired or the property to which the sale appraisal relates is sold,
but in no event shall disclosure be denied for more than three years
after the appraisal.
(h) Valuable formulae, designs, drawings, computer source code or
object code, and research data obtained by any agency within five years
of the request for disclosure when disclosure would produce private
gain and public loss.
(i) Preliminary drafts, notes, recommendations, and intra-agency
memorandums in which opinions are expressed or policies formulated or
recommended except that a specific record shall not be exempt when
publicly cited by an agency in connection with any agency action.
(j) Records which are relevant to a controversy to which an agency
is a party but which records would not be available to another party
under the rules of pretrial discovery for causes pending in the
superior courts.
(k) Records, maps, or other information identifying the location of
archaeological sites in order to avoid the looting or depredation of
such sites.
(l) Any library record, the primary purpose of which is to maintain
control of library materials, or to gain access to information, which
discloses or could be used to disclose the identity of a library user.
(m) Financial information supplied by or on behalf of a person,
firm, or corporation for the purpose of qualifying to submit a bid or
proposal for (i) a ferry system construction or repair contract as
required by RCW 47.60.680 through 47.60.750 or (ii) highway
construction or improvement as required by RCW 47.28.070.
(n) Railroad company contracts filed prior to July 28, 1991, with
the utilities and transportation commission under RCW 81.34.070, except
that the summaries of the contracts are open to public inspection and
copying as otherwise provided by this chapter.
(o) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
private persons pertaining to export services provided pursuant to
chapter 43.163 RCW and chapter 53.31 RCW, and by persons pertaining to
export projects pursuant to RCW 43.23.035.
(p) Financial disclosures filed by private vocational schools under
chapters 28B.85 and 28C.10 RCW.
(q) Records filed with the utilities and transportation commission
or attorney general under RCW 80.04.095 that a court has determined are
confidential under RCW 80.04.095.
(r) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
businesses or individuals during application for loans or program
services provided by chapters 43.163, 43.160, 43.330, and 43.168 RCW,
or during application for economic development loans or program
services provided by any local agency.
(s) Membership lists or lists of members or owners of interests of
units in timeshare projects, subdivisions, camping resorts,
condominiums, land developments, or common-interest communities
affiliated with such projects, regulated by the department of
licensing, in the files or possession of the department.
(t) All applications for public employment, including the names of
applicants, resumes, and other related materials submitted with respect
to an applicant.
(u) The residential addresses or residential telephone numbers of
employees or volunteers of a public agency which are held by any public
agency in personnel records, public employment related records, or
volunteer rosters, or are included in any mailing list of employees or
volunteers of any public agency.
(v) The residential addresses and residential telephone numbers of
the customers of a public utility contained in the records or lists
held by the public utility of which they are customers, except that
this information may be released to the division of child support or
the agency or firm providing child support enforcement for another
state under Title IV-D of the federal social security act, for the
establishment, enforcement, or modification of a support order.
(w)(i) The federal social security number of individuals governed
under chapter 18.130 RCW maintained in the files of the department of
health, except this exemption does not apply to requests made directly
to the department from federal, state, and local agencies of
government, and national and state licensing, credentialing,
investigatory, disciplinary, and examination organizations; (ii) the
current residential address and current residential telephone number of
a health care provider governed under chapter 18.130 RCW maintained in
the files of the department, if the provider requests that this
information be withheld from public inspection and copying, and
provides to the department an accurate alternate or business address
and business telephone number. On or after January 1, 1995, the
current residential address and residential telephone number of a
health care provider governed under RCW 18.130.040 maintained in the
files of the department shall automatically be withheld from public
inspection and copying unless the provider specifically requests the
information be released, and except as provided for under RCW
42.17.260(9).
(x) Information obtained by the board of pharmacy as provided in
RCW 69.45.090.
(y) Information obtained by the board of pharmacy or the department
of health and its representatives as provided in RCW 69.41.044,
69.41.280, and 18.64.420.
(z) Financial information, business plans, examination reports, and
any information produced or obtained in evaluating or examining a
business and industrial development corporation organized or seeking
certification under chapter 31.24 RCW.
(aa) Financial and commercial information supplied to the state
investment board by any person when the information relates to the
investment of public trust or retirement funds and when disclosure
would result in loss to such funds or in private loss to the providers
of this information.
(bb) Financial and valuable trade information under RCW 51.36.120.
(cc) Client records maintained by an agency that is a domestic
violence program as defined in RCW 70.123.020 or 70.123.075 or a rape
crisis center as defined in RCW 70.125.030.
(dd) Information that identifies a person who, while an agency
employee: (i) Seeks advice, under an informal process established by
the employing agency, in order to ascertain his or her rights in
connection with a possible unfair practice under chapter 49.60 RCW
against the person; and (ii) requests his or her identity or any
identifying information not be disclosed.
(ee) Investigative records compiled by an employing agency
conducting a current investigation of a possible unfair practice under
chapter 49.60 RCW or of a possible violation of other federal, state,
or local laws prohibiting discrimination in employment.
(ff) Business related information protected from public inspection
and copying under RCW 15.86.110.
(gg) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the clean Washington
center in applications for, or delivery of, program services under
chapter 70.95H RCW.
(hh) Information and documents created specifically for, and
collected and maintained by a quality improvement committee pursuant to
RCW 43.70.510 or 70.41.200, or by a peer review committee under RCW
4.24.250, regardless of which agency is in possession of the
information and documents.
(ii) Personal information in files maintained in a data base
created under RCW 43.07.360.
(jj) Financial and commercial information requested by the public
stadium authority from any person or organization that leases or uses
the stadium and exhibition center as defined in RCW 36.102.010.
(kk) Names of individuals residing in emergency or transitional
housing that are furnished to the department of revenue or a county
assessor in order to substantiate a claim for property tax exemption
under RCW 84.36.043.
(ll) The names, residential addresses, residential telephone
numbers, and other individually identifiable records held by an agency
in relation to a vanpool, carpool, or other ride-sharing program or
service. However, these records may be disclosed to other persons who
apply for ride-matching services and who need that information in order
to identify potential riders or drivers with whom to share rides.
(mm) The personally identifying information of current or former
participants or applicants in a paratransit or other transit service
operated for the benefit of persons with disabilities or elderly
persons.
(nn) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
and use transit passes and other fare payment media including, but not
limited to, stored value smart cards and magnetic strip cards, except
that an agency may disclose this information to a person, employer,
educational institution, or other entity that is responsible, in whole
or in part, for payment of the cost of acquiring or using a transit
pass or other fare payment media, or to the news media when reporting
on public transportation or public safety. This information may also
be disclosed at the agency's discretion to governmental agencies or
groups concerned with public transportation or public safety.
(oo) Proprietary financial and commercial information that the
submitting entity, with review by the department of health,
specifically identifies at the time it is submitted and that is
provided to or obtained by the department of health in connection with
an application for, or the supervision of, an antitrust exemption
sought by the submitting entity under RCW 43.72.310. If a request for
such information is received, the submitting entity must be notified of
the request. Within ten business days of receipt of the notice, the
submitting entity shall provide a written statement of the continuing
need for confidentiality, which shall be provided to the requester.
Upon receipt of such notice, the department of health shall continue to
treat information designated under this section as exempt from
disclosure. If the requester initiates an action to compel disclosure
under this chapter, the submitting entity must be joined as a party to
demonstrate the continuing need for confidentiality.
(pp) Records maintained by the board of industrial insurance
appeals that are related to appeals of crime victims' compensation
claims filed with the board under RCW 7.68.110.
(qq) Financial and commercial information supplied by or on behalf
of a person, firm, corporation, or entity under chapter 28B.95 RCW
relating to the purchase or sale of tuition units and contracts for the
purchase of multiple tuition units.
(rr) Any records of investigative reports prepared by any state,
county, municipal, or other law enforcement agency pertaining to sex
offenses contained in chapter 9A.44 RCW or sexually violent offenses as
defined in RCW 71.09.020, which have been transferred to the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs for permanent electronic
retention and retrieval pursuant to RCW 40.14.070(2)(b).
(ss) Credit card numbers, debit card numbers, electronic check
numbers, card expiration dates, or bank or other financial account
numbers, except when disclosure is expressly required by or governed by
other law.
(tt) Financial information, including but not limited to account
numbers and values, and other identification numbers supplied by or on
behalf of a person, firm, corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, or other entity related to an application for a liquor
license, gambling license, or lottery retail license.
(uu) Records maintained by the employment security department and
subject to chapter 50.13 RCW if provided to another individual or
organization for operational, research, or evaluation purposes.
(vv) Individually identifiable information received by the work
force training and education coordinating board for research or
evaluation purposes.
(ww) Those portions of records assembled, prepared, or maintained
to prevent, mitigate, or respond to criminal terrorist acts, which are
acts that significantly disrupt the conduct of government or of the
general civilian population of the state or the United States and that
manifest an extreme indifference to human life, the public disclosure
of which would have a substantial likelihood of threatening public
safety, consisting of:
(i) Specific and unique vulnerability assessments or specific and
unique response or deployment plans, including compiled underlying data
collected in preparation of or essential to the assessments, or to the
response or deployment plans; and
(ii) Records not subject to public disclosure under federal law
that are shared by federal or international agencies, and information
prepared from national security briefings provided to state or local
government officials related to domestic preparedness for acts of
terrorism.
(xx) Commercial fishing catch data from logbooks required to be
provided to the department of fish and wildlife under RCW 77.12.047,
when the data identifies specific catch location, timing, or
methodology and the release of which would result in unfair competitive
disadvantage to the commercial fisher providing the catch data.
However, this information may be released to government agencies
concerned with the management of fish and wildlife resources.
(yy) Sensitive wildlife data obtained by the department of fish and
wildlife. However, sensitive wildlife data may be released to
government agencies concerned with the management of fish and wildlife
resources. Sensitive wildlife data includes:
(i) The nesting sites or specific locations of endangered species
designated under RCW 77.12.020, or threatened or sensitive species
classified by rule of the department of fish and wildlife;
(ii) Radio frequencies used in, or locational data generated by,
telemetry studies; or
(iii) Other location data that could compromise the viability of a
specific fish or wildlife population, and where at least one of the
following criteria are met:
(A) The species has a known commercial or black market value;
(B) There is a history of malicious take of that species; or
(C) There is a known demand to visit, take, or disturb, and the
species behavior or ecology renders it especially vulnerable or the
species has an extremely limited distribution and concentration.
(zz) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
recreational licenses under RCW 77.32.010 or commercial licenses under
chapter 77.65 or 77.70 RCW, except name, address of contact used by the
department, and type of license, endorsement, or tag. However, the
department of fish and wildlife may disclose personally identifying
information to:
(i) Government agencies concerned with the management of fish and
wildlife resources;
(ii) The department of social and health services, child support
division, and to the department of licensing in order to implement RCW
77.32.014 and 46.20.291; and
(iii) Law enforcement agencies for the purpose of firearm
possession enforcement under RCW 9.41.040.
(aaa)(i) Discharge papers of a veteran of the armed forces of the
United States filed at the office of the county auditor before July 1,
2002, that have not been commingled with other recorded documents.
These records will be available only to the veteran, the veteran's next
of kin, a deceased veteran's properly appointed personal representative
or executor, a person holding that veteran's general power of attorney,
or to anyone else designated in writing by that veteran to receive the
records.
(ii) Discharge papers of a veteran of the armed forces of the
United States filed at the office of the county auditor before July 1,
2002, that have been commingled with other records, if the veteran has
recorded a "request for exemption from public disclosure of discharge
papers" with the county auditor. If such a request has been recorded,
these records may be released only to the veteran filing the papers,
the veteran's next of kin, a deceased veteran's properly appointed
personal representative or executor, a person holding the veteran's
general power of attorney, or anyone else designated in writing by the
veteran to receive the records.
(iii) Discharge papers of a veteran filed at the office of the
county auditor after June 30, 2002, are not public records, but will be
available only to the veteran, the veteran's next of kin, a deceased
veteran's properly appointed personal representative or executor, a
person holding the veteran's general power of attorney, or anyone else
designated in writing by the veteran to receive the records.
(iv) For the purposes of this subsection (1)(aaa), next of kin of
deceased veterans have the same rights to full access to the record.
Next of kin are the veteran's widow or widower who has not remarried,
son, daughter, father, mother, brother, and sister.
(bbb) Those portions of records containing specific and unique
vulnerability assessments or specific and unique emergency and escape
response plans at a city, county, or state adult or juvenile
correctional facility, the public disclosure of which would have a
substantial likelihood of threatening the security of a city, county,
or state adult or juvenile correctional facility or any individual's
safety.
(ccc) Information compiled by school districts or schools in the
development of their comprehensive safe school plans pursuant to RCW
28A.320.125, to the extent that they identify specific vulnerabilities
of school districts and each individual school.
(ddd) Information regarding the infrastructure and security of
computer and telecommunications networks, consisting of security
passwords, security access codes and programs, access codes for secure
software applications, security and service recovery plans, security
risk assessments, and security test results to the extent that they
identify specific system vulnerabilities.
(eee) Information obtained and exempted or withheld from public
inspection by the health care authority under RCW 41.05.026, whether
retained by the authority, transferred to another state purchased
health care program by the authority, or transferred by the authority
to a technical review committee created to facilitate the development,
acquisition, or implementation of state purchased health care under
chapter 41.05 RCW.
(fff) Proprietary data, trade secrets, or other information that
relates to: (i) A vendor's unique methods of conducting business; (ii)
data unique to the product or services of the vendor; or (iii)
determining prices or rates to be charged for services, submitted by
any vendor to the department of social and health services for purposes
of the development, acquisition, or implementation of state purchased
health care as defined in RCW 41.05.011.
(ggg) Records of mediation communications that are privileged under
chapter 7.-- RCW (sections 1 through 12 and 20 through 23 of this act).
(2) Except for information described in subsection (1)(c)(i) of
this section and confidential income data exempted from public
inspection pursuant to RCW 84.40.020, the exemptions of this section
are inapplicable to the extent that information, the disclosure of
which would violate personal privacy or vital governmental interests,
can be deleted from the specific records sought. No exemption may be
construed to permit the nondisclosure of statistical information not
descriptive of any readily identifiable person or persons.
(3) Inspection or copying of any specific records exempt under the
provisions of this section may be permitted if the superior court in
the county in which the record is maintained finds, after a hearing
with notice thereof to every person in interest and the agency, that
the exemption of such records is clearly unnecessary to protect any
individual's right of privacy or any vital governmental function.
(4) Agency responses refusing, in whole or in part, inspection of
any public record shall include a statement of the specific exemption
authorizing the withholding of the record (or part) and a brief
explanation of how the exemption applies to the record withheld.

Sec. 14 RCW 5.60.070 and 1993 c 492 s 422 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If there is a court order to mediate, a written agreement
between the parties to mediate, or if mediation is mandated under RCW
7.70.100, then any communication made or materials submitted in, or in
connection with, the mediation proceeding, whether made or submitted to
or by the mediator, a mediation organization, a party, or any person
present, are privileged and confidential and are not subject to
disclosure in any judicial or administrative proceeding except:
(a) When all parties to the mediation agree, in writing, to
disclosure;
(b) When the written materials or tangible evidence are otherwise
subject to discovery, and were not prepared specifically for use in and
actually used in the mediation proceeding;
(c) When a written agreement to mediate permits disclosure;
(d) When disclosure is mandated by statute;
(e) When the written materials consist of a written settlement
agreement or other agreement signed by the parties resulting from a
mediation proceeding;
(f) When those communications or written materials pertain solely
to administrative matters incidental to the mediation proceeding,
including the agreement to mediate; or
(g) In a subsequent action between the mediator and a party to the
mediation arising out of the mediation.
(2) When there is a court order, a written agreement to mediate, or
when mediation is mandated under RCW 7.70.100, as described in
subsection (1) of this section, the mediator or a representative of a
mediation organization shall not testify in any judicial or
administrative proceeding unless:
(a) All parties to the mediation and the mediator agree in writing;
or
(b) In an action described in subsection (1)(g) of this section.
(3) Beginning on January 1, 2006, this section governs only
mediations pursuant to a referral or an agreement made before January
1, 2006. Mediations pursuant to a referral or an agreement made on or
after January 1, 2006, are governed by chapter 7.-- RCW (sections 1
through 12 and 20 through 23 of this act).

Sec. 15 RCW 5.60.072 and 1991 c 321 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 5.60.070 and chapter 7.-- RCW
(sections 1 through 12 and 20 through 23 of this act), when any party
participates in mediation conducted by a state or federal agency under
the provisions of a collective bargaining law or similar statute, the
agency's rules govern questions of privilege and confidentiality.

Sec. 16 RCW 7.75.050 and 1984 c 258 s 505 are each amended to
read as follows:
Regardless of any provision to the contrary in chapter 42.17 RCW,
all memoranda, work notes or products, or case files of centers
established under this chapter are confidential and privileged and are
not subject to disclosure in any judicial or administrative proceeding
unless the court or administrative tribunal determines that the
materials were submitted by a participant to the center for the purpose
of avoiding discovery of the material in a subsequent proceeding.
((Any communication relating to the subject matter of the resolution
made during the resolution process by any participant, mediator, or any
other person is a privileged communication and is not subject to
disclosure in any judicial or administrative proceeding unless all
parties to the communication waive the privilege. The foregoing
privilege and limitation on evidentiary use does not apply to any
communication of a threat that injury or damage may be inflicted on any
person or on the property of a party to the dispute, to the extent the
communication may be relevant evidence in a criminal matter.)) In all
other respects, chapter 7.-- RCW, (sections 1 through 12 and 20 through
23 of this act), shall govern the privilege and confidentiality to be
accorded to communications made in conjunction with a mediation
conducted by a dispute resolution center established under this
chapter.

Sec. 17 RCW 26.09.015 and 1991 c 367 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In any proceeding under this chapter, the matter may be set for
mediation of the contested issues before or concurrent with the setting
of the matter for hearing. The purpose of the mediation proceeding
shall be to reduce acrimony which may exist between the parties and to
develop an agreement assuring the child's close and continuing contact
with both parents after the marriage is dissolved. The mediator shall
use his or her best efforts to effect a settlement of the dispute.
(2) Each superior court may make available a mediator. The
mediator may be a member of the professional staff of a family court or
mental health services agency, or may be any other person or agency
designated by the court. In order to provide mediation services, the
court is not required to institute a family court.
(3)(a) Mediation proceedings under this chapter shall be ((held in
private and shall be confidential. The mediator shall not testify as
to any aspect of the mediation proceedings. This subsection shall not
apply to postdecree mediation required pursuant to a parenting plan))
governed in all respects by chapter 7.-- RCW (sections 1 through 12 and
20 through 23 of this act), except as follows:
(i) Mediation communications in postdecree mediations mandated by
a parenting plan are admissible in subsequent proceedings for the
limited purpose of proving:
(A) Abuse, neglect, abandonment, exploitation, or unlawful
harassment as defined in RCW 9A.46.020(1), of a child;
(B) Abuse or unlawful harassment as defined in RCW 9A.46.020(1), of
a family or household member as defined in RCW 26.50.010(2); or
(C) That a parent used or frustrated the dispute resolution process
without good reason for purposes of RCW 26.09.184(3)(d).
(ii) If a postdecree mediation-arbitration proceeding is required
pursuant to a parenting plan and the same person acts as both mediator
and arbitrator, mediation communications in the mediation phase of such
a proceeding may be admitted during the arbitration phase, and shall be
admissible in the judicial review of such a proceeding under RCW
26.09.184(3)(e) to the extent necessary for such review to be
effective.
(b) None of the exceptions under (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection
shall subject a mediator to compulsory process to testify except by
court order for good cause shown, taking into consideration the need
for the mediator's testimony and the interest in the mediator
maintaining an appearance of impartiality. If a mediation
communication is not privileged under (a)(i) of this subsection or that
portion of (a)(ii) of this subsection pertaining to judicial review,
only the portion of the communication necessary for the application of
the exception may be admitted, and such admission of evidence shall not
render any other mediation communication discoverable or admissible
except as may be provided in chapter 7.-- RCW (sections 1 through 12
and 20 through 23 of this act).
(4) The mediator shall assess the needs and interests of the child
or children involved in the controversy and may interview the child or
children if the mediator deems such interview appropriate or necessary.
(5) Any agreement reached by the parties as a result of mediation
shall be reported to the court and to counsel for the parties by the
mediator on the day set for mediation or any time thereafter designated
by the court.

Sec. 18 RCW 35.63.260 and 1998 c 119 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Prior to filing an appeal of a final decision by a hearing
examiner involving a conditional or special use permit application
requested by a party that is licensed or certified by the department of
social and health services or the department of corrections, the
aggrieved party must, within five days after the final decision,
initiate formal mediation procedures in an attempt to resolve the
parties' differences. If, after initial evaluation of the dispute, the
parties agree to proceed with a mediation, the mediation shall be
conducted by a trained mediator selected by agreement of the parties.
The agreement to mediate shall be in writing and subject to ((RCW
5.60.070)) chapter 7.-- RCW (sections 1 through 12 and 20 through 23 of
this act. If the parties are unable to agree on a mediator, each party
shall nominate a mediator and the mediator shall be selected by lot
from among the nominees. The mediator must be selected within five
days after formal mediation procedures are initiated. The mediation
process must be completed within fourteen days from the time the
mediator is selected except that the mediation process may extend
beyond fourteen days by agreement of the parties. The mediator shall,
within the fourteen-day period or within the extension if an extension
is agreed to, provide the parties with a written summary of the issues
and any agreements reached. If the parties agree, the mediation report
shall be made available to the governing jurisdiction. The cost of the
mediation shall be shared by the parties.
(2) Any time limits for filing of appeals are tolled during the
pendency of the mediation process.
(3) As used in this section, "party" does not include county, city,
or town.

Sec. 19 RCW 48.43.055 and 2002 c 300 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each health carrier as defined under RCW 48.43.005 shall file with
the commissioner its procedures for review and adjudication of
complaints initiated by health care providers. Procedures filed under
this section shall provide a fair review for consideration of
complaints. Every health carrier shall provide reasonable means
allowing any health care provider aggrieved by actions of the health
carrier to be heard after submitting a written request for review. If
the health carrier fails to grant or reject a request within thirty
days after it is made, the complaining health care provider may proceed
as if the complaint had been rejected. A complaint that has been
rejected by the health carrier may be submitted to nonbinding
mediation. Mediation shall be conducted under ((mediation rules
similar to those of the American arbitration association, the center
for public resources, the judicial arbitration and mediation service,
RCW 7.70.100)) chapter 7.-- RCW (sections 1 through 12 and 20 through
23 of this act, or any other rules of mediation agreed to by the
parties. This section is solely for resolution of provider complaints.
Complaints by, or on behalf of, a covered person are subject to the
grievance processes in RCW 48.43.530.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this
act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 SEVERABILITY CLAUSE. If any provision of
this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision
to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 APPLICATION TO EXISTING AGREEMENTS OR
REFERRALS. (1) This chapter governs a mediation pursuant to a referral
or an agreement to mediate made on or after January 1, 2006.
(2) If all parties agree in a signed record or a record of
proceeding reflects such an agreement by all parties, then this
chapter governs a mediation pursuant to a referral or an agreement to
mediate whenever made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 EFFECTIVE DATE. This act takes effect
January 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 Sections 1 through 12 and 20 through 23 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 7 RCW.

--- END ---