BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Washington's utilities have been historical leaders in
developing renewable hydroelectric energy and investing in energy
efficiency. The state economy has greatly benefited from the strong
foundation of low-cost hydroelectric generation as well as forward-looking investments in energy efficiency;
(2) Washington has a long tradition of energy policies that support
energy efficiency and renewable energy development. These policies,
which include financial incentives, have stimulated economic
development, reduced operating costs for businesses, made industries
more competitive, made homes more comfortable and efficient, reduced
the energy burden of low-income households, and protected the
environment;
(3) Washington is blessed with an abundance of local renewable
energy resources;
(4) Washington utility green tariff programs have stimulated
consumer interest and modest investments in renewable energy
development;
(5) Uncertainty in the electric industry about the industry's long-term regulatory construct has shortened utility planning horizons and
reduced the confidence of electric utilities to recover investments in
energy conservation, system reliability, and new generation, including
renewable energy resources;
(6) The 2003 northeast blackouts and western energy crisis of
2000-2001 demonstrated the vulnerability of an energy system reliant on
transmission of electricity distant from load centers, increasingly
strained water resources, and natural gas impacted by volatile market
prices;
(7) Aggregation of utility purchasing power under statewide goals
to acquire additional renewable generation and energy efficiency
resources on behalf of all ratepayers is vital to create high-quality
jobs, promote rural economic development, and stabilize energy supplies
and prices;
(8) Washington electric ratepayers will benefit from resource
planning and acquisition that hedges against future fuel price risk by
assisting utilities in developing a diverse portfolio of resources to
meet customer needs;
(9) Encouraging irrigators to increase the efficiency of their
operations will yield substantial benefits by reducing peak demands of
both electricity and water supplies, improving farm economics, and
maximizing use of water resources; and
(10) Fuel diversity, economic, and environmental benefits from
renewable energy and efficiency resources accrue to the public at
large, and therefore all consumers and utilities should support
consistent development of these resources to meet the state's electric
demand and stabilize electricity prices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Commission" means the Washington state utilities and
transportation commission.
(2) "Conservation" means any reduction in electric power
consumption as a result of increases in the efficiency of energy use,
production, distribution, or transmission.
(3) "Consumer-owned utility" includes a municipal electric utility
formed under Title 35 RCW, a public utility district formed under Title
54 RCW, an irrigation district formed under chapter 87.03 RCW, a
cooperative formed under chapter 23.86 RCW, a mutual corporation or
association formed under chapter 24.06 RCW, a port district formed
under Title 53 RCW, or a water-sewer district formed under Title 57
RCW, that is engaged in the business of distributing electricity to one
or more retail electric customers in the state.
(4) "Cost-effective" has the same meaning as in RCW 80.52.030.
(5) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(6) "Distributed generation" means either an electricity generation
system that uses as its fuel an eligible renewable resource or a fuel
cell as defined in RCW 43.19.651, and: (a) Is available on-site and
not from a commercial source, and (b) has a generating capacity of not
more than twenty-five kilowatts.
(7) "Electric utility" means a consumer-owned or investor-owned
utility.
(8) "Eligible renewable resources" means:
(a) Electricity generation facilities powered by a renewable
resource other than fresh water that commenced operation between April
1, 1999, and April 1, 2002, and that are used to serve Washington
retail electricity customers;
(b) Additions made to electricity generation facilities powered by
a renewable resource other than fresh water, that commenced operation
between April 1, 1999, and April 1, 2002, where electricity generated
from the renewable resource is used to serve Washington retail
electricity customers;
(c) Electricity generation facilities powered by a renewable
resource other than fresh water that are contracted between April 1,
1999, and April 1, 2002, for delivery to Washington retail electricity
customers;
(d) Electricity generation facilities powered by a renewable
resource other than fresh water that commence operation after April 1,
2002, and any subsequent additions to those facilities, that are
located in the Pacific Northwest;
(e) Additional power generation achieved, above original design
specifications, at hydroelectric facilities operating on April 1, 1999,
that are located in the Pacific Northwest, where that additional
generation results from upgrades or improvements completed after
December 31, 2004, and does not result in any new water diversions; or
(f) Additions to hydroelectric generating capacity operating on
April 1, 1999, in irrigation pipes and canals that are located in the
Pacific Northwest, where the additional generation results from
upgrades or improvements completed after December 31, 2004, and does
not result in any new water diversions.
(9) "Governing body" means the board of directors, city council,
commissioners, or board of any consumer-owned utility.
(10) "Integrated resource plan" or "plan" means a plan describing
the mix of generating resources and improvements in the efficient use
of electricity that will meet current and future needs at the lowest
reasonable cost to the utility and its ratepayers.
(11) "Investor-owned utility" means a corporation owned by
investors that meets the definition in RCW 80.04.010 and is engaged in
distributing electricity to more than one retail electric customer in
the state.
(12) "Low income" means a household meeting the income eligibility
guidelines determined by the department.
(13) "Low-income energy efficiency services" include energy-related
repairs, weatherization, health and safety measures, installation of
energy-efficient appliances and fixtures for low-income residences, and
investment in new construction of low-income households that exceed the
state energy code, as well as energy education, for the purpose of
enhancing energy efficiency.
(14) "Pacific Northwest" has the same meaning as defined in section
3 of the Pacific Northwest electric power planning and conservation
act, P.L. 96-501 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 389a; 94 Stat. 2698).
(15) "Renewable energy credit" means a tradable certificate of
proof of one megawatt-hour of electricity generated from a renewable
resource that: (a) Is located in the United States portion of the
western region as defined by the western electricity coordinating
council; (b) commenced construction after December 31, 2004; (c) is not
powered by fresh water; and (d) is verified by the renewable energy
credit trading system selected by the department.
(16) "Renewable resources" means electricity generation facilities
fueled by: (a) Water; (b) wind; (c) solar energy; (d) geothermal
energy; (e) landfill gas; (f) biomass energy based on animal waste or
solid organic fuels from wood, forest, or field residues, or dedicated
energy crops that do not include wood pieces that have been treated
with chemical preservatives such as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or
copper-chrome-arsenic; (g) wave or tidal power; or (h) gas from sewage
treatment facilities.
(17) "Retail load" means the amount of kilowatt-hours of
electricity delivered by an electric utility to its Washington retail
customers.
(18) "Small utility" means a small utility as defined in RCW
19.29A.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Each electric utility must develop an
integrated resource plan consistent with the provisions of this
section. Such a plan shall be prepared on a biennial basis and, at a
minimum, must include:
(a) A range of forecasts of future customer demand using methods
that examine the effect of economic forces on the consumption of
electricity and that address changes in the number, type, and
efficiency of electrical end-uses;
(b) An assessment of technically feasible improvements in the
efficient use of electricity, including load management and fuel
switching, as well as currently employed and new policies and programs
needed to obtain the efficiency improvements;
(c) An assessment of technically feasible generating technologies
including but not limited to renewable resources, cogeneration, power
purchases, and thermal resources;
(d) An evaluation comparing the cost-effectiveness of generating
resources with the cost-effectiveness of improvements in the efficient
use of electricity;
(e) The integration of the demand forecasts and resource
evaluations into a long-range integrated resource plan describing the
mix of resources and efficiency measures that will meet current and
future needs at the lowest reasonable cost to the utility and its
ratepayers;
(f) A short-term plan outlining the specific actions to be taken by
the utility consistent with the long-range integrated resource plan;
and
(g) For all plans subsequent to the initial integrated resource
plan, a progress report that relates the new plan to the previously
filed plan.
(2)(a) Investor-owned utilities shall submit integrated resource
plans to the commission. The commission shall establish by rule the
requirements for preparation and submission of integrated resource
plans.
(b) The commission may adopt additional rules as necessary to
clarify the requirements of subsection (1) of this section as they
apply to investor-owned utilities.
(3)(a) Each consumer-owned utility shall develop and publish a work
plan for the preparation of an integrated resource plan. The work plan
shall set forth the proposed content of the integrated resource plan,
the proposed schedule of preparation, and provisions for public
involvement in the preparation and review of the plan. The governing
body of each utility shall approve an integrated resource plan only
after it has provided public notice and hearing on the proposed plan.
Each consumer-owned utility shall publish a final integrated resource
plan either as part of an annual report or as a separate document
available to the public.
(b) Each consumer-owned utility shall transmit a copy of its
integrated resource plan to the department by July 31, 2007, and
transmit subsequent plans every two years thereafter.
(c) Consumer-owned utilities that are full requirements customers
of the Bonneville power administration are exempted from the
requirements of this section.
(4) Every two years as part of its biennial report required under
RCW 43.21F.045, the department shall review the integrated resource
plans of consumer-owned utilities and prepare a report to the
legislature assessing the utilities' conformance with this section.
The report shall include a statewide summary of utility load forecasts,
load/resource balance, and utility plans for the development of thermal
generation, renewable resources, and efficiency resources. The
commission shall provide the department with data summarizing
activities of investor-owned utilities for use in the department's
statewide summary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The following energy efficiency standard
is established:
(a) Beginning January 1, 2007, and each year thereafter through
December 31, 2010, each electric utility shall on average annually
acquire electricity savings directly attributable to conservation
programs serving its Washington retail customers sufficient to meet an
amount equal to seventy-five one-hundredths of one percent of the
utility's 2006 retail load. By December 31, 2010, the electricity
savings acquired from the conservation programs implemented during the
preceding four-year period must meet at least three percent of the
utility's 2006 retail load.
(b) Beginning January 1, 2011, and each year thereafter through
December 31, 2013, each electric utility shall on average annually
acquire electricity savings directly attributable to conservation
programs serving its Washington retail customers sufficient to meet an
amount equal to eighty-five one-hundredths of one percent of the
utility's 2010 retail load. By December 31, 2013, the electricity
savings acquired from the conservation programs implemented during the
preceding three-year period will meet at least two and fifty-five one-hundredths of one percent of the utility's 2010 retail load.
(c) Each electric utility shall continue to comply with the
standard established in (b) of this subsection for each subsequent
three-year period. The amount of conservation the utility needs to
acquire to meet the standard will be based on that utility's retail
load for the calendar year immediately preceding each three-year
period.
(2) Nothing in this chapter limits electric utilities from
exceeding the energy efficiency standard.
(3) An electric utility shall meet at least five percent of its
annual energy efficiency standard requirement with low-income energy
efficiency services, unless it can demonstrate to the commission in the
case of an investor-owned utility or the department in the case of a
consumer-owned utility that sufficient opportunities at cost do not
exist within its service territory for conserving energy in low-income
households.
(4) In meeting the energy efficiency standard, an electric utility
may count conservation it implements even if it also receives credit or
funding for that conservation from the Bonneville power administration.
(5) An electric utility may acquire up to fifteen percent of the
energy savings to meet the annual energy efficiency standard using
high-efficiency cogeneration. The energy savings resulting from the
use of high-efficiency cogeneration are calculated as the difference in
energy used by the high-efficiency cogeneration unit and the energy
used by equivalent stand-alone thermal and electricity generation
processes.
(6) Each electric utility shall use practices generally accepted in
the Pacific Northwest to measure accrued savings from conservation,
including monitoring and verification of those savings.
(7) Each electric utility shall pursue energy conservation
opportunities in each customer class to achieve savings that are not
independently captured by consumer acquisition. The portfolio of
energy conservation programs used to meet the efficiency standard must
be cost-effective. A conservation program implemented by an investor-owned utility is cost-effective if it passes the total resource cost
test as defined by the commission.
(8) If an electric utility can demonstrate to the commission in the
case of an investor-owned utility or the department in the case of a
consumer-owned utility that it is unable to meet the energy efficiency
standard created in this section due to a lack of sufficient
opportunities for acquiring conservation, that utility can petition to
the commission or department, as appropriate, to meet a lesser
standard.
(9) If an electric utility demonstrates to the commission in the
case of an investor-owned utility or the department in the case of a
consumer-owned utility that it has not experienced any increase in its
average annual retail load growth during the previous five years, that
utility may petition to the commission or the department, as
appropriate, for an exemption from the standard in subsection (1) of
this section.
(10) The provisions of this section do not apply to a small utility
or a full requirements customer. However, nothing in this chapter
prohibits the governing body of a small utility or a full requirements
customer from determining the utility should comply with any or all of
the provisions of this chapter, which governing bodies are encouraged
to do. At any time after this energy efficiency standard is enacted,
if a utility no longer meets the definition of a small utility or a
full requirements customer, that utility will be required to meet the
provisions of this chapter.
(11)(a) In the case of consumer-owned utilities, the department
shall:
(i) Account for the annual electricity savings achieved by a
utility on an annual basis pursuant to subsection (1) of this section;
(ii) Determine whether the utility is meeting at least five percent
of its annual energy efficiency standard with low-income energy
efficiency services as required under subsection (3) of this section;
(iii) Verify the amount of credit a utility may take against the
energy efficiency standard for credits or funding received for
conservation from the Bonneville power administration as provided under
subsection (4) of this section; and
(iv) Determine the amount of credit that may be taken for high-efficiency cogeneration against the energy efficiency standard pursuant
to subsection (5) of this section.
(b) In the case of investor-owned utilities, the commission shall:
(i) Account for the annual electricity savings achieved by a
utility on an annual basis pursuant to subsection (1) of this section;
(ii) Determine whether the utility is meeting at least five percent
of its annual energy efficiency standard with low-income energy
efficiency services as required under subsection (3) of this section;
(iii) Verify the amount of credit a utility may take against the
energy efficiency standard for credits or funding received for
conservation from the Bonneville power administration as provided under
subsection (4) of this section; and
(iv) Determine the amount of credit that may be taken for high-efficiency cogeneration against the energy efficiency standard pursuant
to subsection (5) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The following renewable energy standard
is established:
(a) By January 1, 2011, and each year thereafter through December
31, 2015, each electric utility shall use eligible renewable resources
or acquire equivalent renewable energy credits, or a combination of
both, to serve at least five percent of its annual retail load.
(b) By January 1, 2016, and each year thereafter through December
31, 2023, each electric utility shall use eligible renewable resources
or acquire equivalent renewable energy credits, or a combination of
both, to serve at least ten percent of its annual retail load.
(c) By January 1, 2024, and each year thereafter, each electric
utility shall use eligible renewable resources or acquire equivalent
renewable energy credits, or a combination of both, to serve at least
fifteen percent of its annual retail load.
(2) Nothing in this chapter limits electric utilities from
exceeding this renewable energy standard.
(3) In meeting this renewable energy standard, an electric utility
may count eligible renewable resources even if it also receives credit
or funding from the Bonneville power administration for those
resources.
(4) In meeting this renewable energy standard, a consumer-owned
utility that is a customer of the Bonneville power administration can
count that portion of its load served by eligible renewable resources
that are part of the Bonneville power administration's system mix. A
utility also can receive credit toward meeting this standard for the
portion of environmentally preferred power it purchases from the
Bonneville power administration that meets the definition of an
eligible renewable resource.
(5) An electric utility that offers an optional pricing program
that charges a higher rate for electricity generated from renewable
energy resources shall not include the renewable energy generated under
such a program as eligible renewable energy in its compliance with this
renewable energy standard.
(6) When an electric utility acquires sufficient eligible renewable
resources or renewable energy credits, or a combination of both, to
serve at least five percent of its annual retail load, the utility may
elect after notifying its retail electricity customers to discontinue
meeting the terms and conditions of RCW 19.29A.090. Nothing in this
section prohibits a utility from continuing to offer its retail
electricity customers a voluntary option to purchase qualified
alternative energy resources in accordance with RCW 19.29A.090.
(7)(a) If an electric utility can demonstrate to the commission in
the case of an investor-owned utility or the department in the case of
a consumer-owned utility that it is unable to meet the renewable energy
standard created in this section due to insufficient availability of
eligible renewable resources and renewable energy credits in an amount
equal to or below the cost cap described in (b) of this subsection,
that utility can petition to the commission or department, as
appropriate, to meet a lesser standard.
(b) The renewable energy standard shall not require an electric
utility to incur a cost per megawatt hour greater than forty-five
dollars for any eligible renewable resource or renewable energy credit.
The cost per megawatt hour means the cost of the electricity at the
point of entry onto the electric grid. Beginning in 2007, this cost
cap shall be adjusted annually by the rate of change of the inflation
indicator "gross domestic product-implicit price deflator" as published
by the bureau of economic analysis, United States department of
commerce.
(8)(a) An electric utility may receive additional credit toward
meeting the renewable energy standard if it acquires eligible renewable
resources physically located in Washington state:
(i) Where the eligible renewable resource commenced construction
after December 31, 2004; and
(ii) Where the electric utility purchased or contracted for the
eligible renewable resource by December 31, 2008.
(b) An electric utility that acquires energy from an eligible
renewable resource that meets the criteria under this section may count
that resource above its base value in meeting the renewable energy
standard according to the following benchmarks:
(i) Energy from an eligible renewable resource purchased or
contracted by December 31, 2005, can be counted at one and one-tenth
times its base value;
(ii) Energy from an eligible renewable resource purchased or
contracted by December 31, 2006, can be counted at one and nine-hundredths times its base value;
(iii) Energy from an eligible renewable resource purchased or
contracted by December 31, 2007, can be counted at one and eight-hundredths times its base value; or
(iv) Energy from an eligible renewable resource purchased or
contracted by December 31, 2008, can be counted at one and seven-hundredths times its base value.
(9)(a) An electric utility may receive additional credit toward
meeting the renewable energy standard if it acquires eligible renewable
resources physically located in Washington state or renewable energy
credits from an eligible renewable resource physically located in
Washington state:
(i) Where the eligible renewable resource commenced construction
after December 31, 2004; and
(ii) Where the renewable energy developer used apprenticeship
programs during construction of the eligible renewable resources.
(b) The apprenticeship programs must be approved by the
apprenticeship council under its authority in chapter 49.04 RCW,
according to the following benchmarks:
(i) Minimum levels of apprenticeship programs shall be ten percent
of total labor hours for projects commencing construction after
December 31, 2008;
(ii) Minimum levels of apprenticeship programs shall be twelve and
one-half percent of total labor hours for projects commencing
construction after December 31, 2015; or
(iii) Minimum levels of apprenticeship programs shall be fifteen
percent of total labor hours for projects commencing construction after
December 31, 2022.
(c) The apprenticeship council will determine if construction of an
eligible renewable resource meets one of the benchmarks listed in (b)
of this subsection.
(d) An electric utility that acquires energy or renewable energy
credits from an eligible renewable resource that meets the criteria
under this section may count that resource at one and two-tenths times
its base value in meeting the renewable energy standard.
(10) If an electric utility demonstrates to the commission in the
case of an investor-owned utility or the department in the case of a
consumer-owned utility that it has not experienced any increase in its
average annual retail load growth during the previous five years, that
utility may petition to the commission or the department, as
appropriate, for an exemption from the standard in subsection (1) of
this section.
(11) The provisions of this section do not apply to a small utility
or a full requirements customer. However, nothing in this chapter
prohibits the governing body of a small utility or a full requirements
customer from determining the utility should comply with any of the
provisions of this chapter, which governing bodies are encouraged to
do. At any time after this renewable energy standard is enacted, if
a utility no longer meets the definition of a small utility or a full
requirements customer, that utility will be required to meet the
provisions of this chapter.
(12)(a) In the case of consumer-owned utilities, the department
shall:
(i) Verify the amount of credit taken against the renewable energy
standard for the portion of environmentally preferred power purchased
from the Bonneville power administration that meets the definition of
eligible renewable resources pursuant to subsection (4) of this
section; and
(ii) Determine whether a utility has acquired electricity generated
by a facility where apprenticeship programs were used during the
construction of an eligible renewable resource in order to receive
additional credit against the renewable energy standard pursuant to
subsection (9) of this section.
(b) In the case of investor-owned utilities, the commission shall:
(i) Verify the amount of credit taken against the renewable energy
standard for the portion of environmentally preferred power purchased
from the Bonneville power administration that meets the definition of
eligible renewable resources pursuant to subsection (4) of this
section; and
(ii) Determine whether a utility has acquired electricity generated
by a facility where apprenticeship programs were used during the
construction of an eligible renewable resource in order to receive
additional credit against the renewable energy standard pursuant to
subsection (9) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) An electric utility may count eligible
distributed generation towards meeting both the renewable energy and
energy efficiency standards if the utility: (a) Owns the distributed
generation facility and the renewable energy credits produced by the
facility; or (b) through contract with a retail electric customer has
purchased the renewable energy credits of a distributed generation
facility.
(2) An electric utility may receive credit towards meeting the
energy efficiency or renewable energy standards for resources when the
utility also receives credit or funding for those same resources under
an efficiency or renewable standard established by federal legislation.
However, an electric utility may not receive credit towards meeting the
energy efficiency or renewable energy standards for resources when the
utility also receives credit or funding for those same resources under
an efficiency or renewable standard established by legislation in
another state.
(3) In preparing a least cost plan, integrated resource plan, or
equivalent analysis that describes the mix of generating resources and
improvements in the efficient use of electricity that will meet current
and future needs of the utility and its ratepayers, an electric utility
must include in its modeling and analysis an assumption that the
renewable energy and energy efficiency standards established in this
chapter will be met.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The department must convene a group of
stakeholders, including the commission, to advise it on the following:
(a) Development of criteria for cost-effective conservation that
qualifies toward the energy efficiency standard and program
implementation guidelines, including verification and monitoring of
savings. The department will consider all existing and appropriate
criteria and guidelines where applicable, and may rely on work of
regional power planning committees in determining criteria and
guidelines;
(b) Development of a definition of high-efficiency cogeneration
that accounts for technological improvements over time;
(c) Selection of an existing system of renewable energy credits
that may be used to comply with section 5 of this act. The department
will consider all existing and appropriate systems and organizations
that facilitate renewable energy credit trading westernwide or
nationally; and
(d) Development of an appropriate implementation schedule for the
provisions of this chapter for any utility that no longer meets the
definition of a small utility after the effective date of this section.
(2) By June 30, 2006, the department may adopt rules governing the
issues listed in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) By January 1, 2008, the department must select a system of
renewable energy credits that may be used to comply with section 5 of
this act.
(4) For investor-owned utilities, the commission has the exclusive
authority to approve criteria, program implementation guidelines, and
appropriate financing and accounting mechanisms for expenditures
related to acquisition of eligible renewable resources and
conservation. In determining whether costs associated with procuring
resources in accordance with this chapter are prudently incurred by an
investor-owned utility and should be recovered in rates, the commission
shall apply the same principles it uses in determining prudency and
cost recovery for other electricity resources used to serve customers
in the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) On or before June 1, 2008, each electric
utility must demonstrate progress in meeting the efficiency and
renewable standards in this chapter. Investor-owned utilities will
report to the commission, and consumer-owned utilities will report to
the department.
(2) On or before June 1, 2011, and annually thereafter, each
electric utility must demonstrate compliance with the efficiency and
renewable standards in this chapter, for the annual period ending the
previous December 31st. Each investor-owned utility will demonstrate
compliance to its customers in published form and to the commission
which will share this information with the department. Each consumer-owned utility will demonstrate compliance to its customers in published
form, to its governing body, and to the department.
(3) Each report to the commission or the department must include at
least the following: The amount of electricity generated or acquired
from each eligible renewable resource; the amount of renewable energy
credits acquired, sold, or traded; the annual retail load for an
electric utility; and the amount of conservation annually acquired,
including the amount of low-income energy efficiency services provided,
and the amount of high-efficiency cogeneration used to meet the
standard.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) On or before December 1, 2011, and
biennially thereafter, the department and commission shall submit a
report to the legislature on the accomplishments of the efficiency and
renewable standards created in this chapter, including unachieved cost-effective conservation opportunities, and make recommendations for
revisions to the standards. The commission may initiate rule-making
proceedings based on the results of these reports to modify
requirements imposed on investor-owned utilities.
(2)(a) In the case of consumer-owned utilities, the department
shall determine the amount of unachieved cost-effective conservation
for the purposes of submitting a report to the legislature pursuant to
this section.
(b) In the case of investor-owned utilities, the commission shall
determine the amount of unachieved cost-effective conservation for the
purposes of submitting a report to the legislature pursuant to this
section.
(3) On or before January 1, 2017, the department shall review and
recommend to the legislature continuation or modification of the
efficiency and renewable standards based on assessments of the
effectiveness of the standards, market conditions, and unachieved
opportunities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 10 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 80 RCW.

--- END ---