BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Aquatic rehabilitation zones may be
designated by the legislature for areas whose surrounding marine or
fresh water bodies pose serious environmental or public health
concerns.
(2) Aquatic rehabilitation zone one is established. Aquatic
rehabilitation zone one includes all watersheds that drain to Hood
Canal south of a line projected from Tala Point in Jefferson county to
Foulweather Bluff in Kitsap county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If the provisions of this chapter conflict
with other statutory provisions, the provisions of this chapter shall
govern aquatic rehabilitation zones.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 90 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---