BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Citizens demand and deserve accountability of public programs.
Public programs must continuously improve in quality, efficiency, and
effectiveness in order to increase public trust;
(2) Washington state government and other entities that receive tax
dollars must continuously improve the way they operate and deliver
services so citizens receive maximum value for their tax dollars;
(3) An independent citizen advisory board is necessary to ensure
that government services, customer satisfaction, program efficiency,
and management systems are world class in performance; and
(4) Fair, independent, professional performance audits of state
agencies by the state auditor are essential to improving the efficiency
and effectiveness of government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
For purposes of sections 3 through 6, 8, 9, and 11 of this act:
(1) "Board" means the citizen advisory board created in section 3
of this act.
(2) "Draft work plan" means the work plan for conducting
performance audits of state agencies proposed by the board and state
auditor after the statewide performance review.
(3) "Final performance audit report" means a written document
jointly released by the citizen advisory board and the state auditor
that includes the findings and comments from the preliminary
performance audit report.
(4) "Final work plan" means the work plan for conducting
performance audits of state agencies adopted by the board and state
auditor.
(5) "Performance audit" means an objective and systematic
assessment of a state agency or any of its programs, functions, or
activities by an independent evaluator in order to help public
officials improve efficiency, effectiveness, and accountability.
Performance audits include economy and efficiency audits and program
audits.
(6) "Preliminary performance audit report" means a written document
prepared after the completion of a performance audit to be submitted
for comment before the final performance audit report. The preliminary
performance audit report must contain the audit findings and any
proposed recommendations to improve the efficiency, effectiveness, or
accountability of the state agency being audited.
(7) "State agency" or "agency" means a state agency, department,
office, officer, board, commission, bureau, division, institution, or
institution of higher education. "State agency" includes all offices
of executive branch state government elected officials.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The citizen advisory board is created to improve efficiency,
effectiveness, and accountability in state government.
(2) The board shall consist of ten members as follows:
(a) One member shall be the state auditor, who shall be a nonvoting
member;
(b) One member shall be the legislative auditor, who shall be a
nonvoting member;
(c) One member shall be the director of the office of financial
management, who shall be a nonvoting member;
(d) Four of the members shall be selected by the governor as
follows: Each major caucus of the house of representatives and the
senate shall submit a list of three names. The lists may not include
the names of members of the legislature or employees of the state. The
governor shall select a person from each list provided by each caucus;
and
(e) The governor shall select three citizen members who are not
state employees.
(3) The board shall elect a chair. The legislative auditor, the
state auditor, and the director of the office of financial management
may not serve as chair.
(4) Appointees shall be individuals who have a basic understanding
of state government operations with knowledge and expertise in
performance management, quality management, strategic planning,
performance assessments, or closely related fields.
(5) Members selected under subsection (2)(d) and (e) of this
section shall serve for terms of four years, with the terms expiring on
June 30th on the fourth year of the term. However, in the case of the
initial members, two members shall serve four-year terms, two members
shall serve three-year terms, and one member shall serve a two-year
term, with each of the terms expiring on June 30th of the applicable
year. Appointees may be reappointed to serve more than one term.
(6) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall provide
clerical, technical, and management personnel to the board to serve as
the board's staff.
(7) The board shall meet at least once a quarter and may hold
additional meetings at the call of the chair or by a majority vote of
the members of the board.
(8) The members of the board shall be compensated in accordance
with RCW 43.03.220 and reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance
with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The board shall establish an annual assessment and performance
grading program. The program shall consist of conducting annual
performance assessments and grading state agency performance.
Assessments shall be implemented on a phased-in schedule. Initial
areas to be assessed shall include quality management, productivity and
fiscal efficiency, program effectiveness, contract management and
oversight, internal audit, internal and external customer satisfaction,
statutory and regulatory compliance, and technology systems and on-line
services. As part of this program, the board shall:
(1) Consult with and seek input from elected officials, state
employees including front-line employees, and professionals with a
background in performance management for establishing the grading
standards. In developing the criteria, the board shall consider
already developed best practices and audit criteria used by government
or nongovernment organizations. Before the assessment, the agencies
shall be given the criteria for the assessment and the standards for
grading;
(2) Contract or partner with public or private entities that have
expertise in public sector reviews and/or technical expertise in
individual assessment areas to perform the assessments and grading of
all state agencies. The board may contract or partner with more than
one entity for different assessment areas; and
(3) Submit the results of the assessment and grading program to the
governor, the office of financial management, appropriate legislative
committees, and the public by December 15th of each year. The results
of the annual assessments and performance grading shall be posted on
the internet.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board and the state auditor shall work together regarding
performance audits of state government.
(a) The board shall establish criteria for performance audits.
Agencies shall be audited using criteria that include generally
accepted government auditing standards as well as legislative mandates
and performance objectives established by state agencies and the
legislature. Mandates include, but are not limited to, agency
strategies, timelines, program objectives, and mission and goals as
required in RCW 43.88.090.
(b) Using the criteria developed in (a) of this subsection, the
state auditor shall contract for a statewide performance review to be
completed within one year of contracting as a preliminary to a draft
work plan for conducting performance audits. The board and the state
auditor shall develop a schedule and common methodology for conducting
these reviews.
(c) The board and the state auditor shall develop the draft work
plan for performance audits based on input from citizens, state
employees, including front-line employees, state managers, chairs and
ranking members of appropriate legislative committees, the joint
legislative audit and review committee, public officials, and others.
The draft work plan may include a list of agencies, programs, or
systems to be audited on a timeline decided by the board and the state
auditor based on a number of factors including risk, importance, and
citizen concerns. When putting together the draft work plan, there
should be consideration of all audits and reports already required. On
average, audits shall be designed to be completed within a six-month
period.
(d) Before adopting the final work plan, the board shall consult
with the legislative auditor and other appropriate oversight and audit
entities to coordinate work plans and avoid duplication of effort in
their planned performance audits of state government agencies. The
board shall defer to the joint legislative audit and review committee
work plan if a similar audit is included on both work plans for
auditing. The final work plan must be agreed upon by the board and the
state auditor.
(e) The state auditor shall contract out for performance audits.
In conducting the audits, agency front-line employees and internal
auditors should be involved.
(f) All audits must include consideration of reports prepared by
other government oversight entities.
(g) The audits may include:
(i) Identification of programs and services that can be eliminated,
reduced, consolidated, or enhanced;
(ii) Identification of funding sources to the state agency, to
programs, and to services that can be eliminated, reduced,
consolidated, or enhanced;
(iii) Analysis of gaps and overlaps in programs and services and
recommendations for improving, dropping, blending, or separating
functions to correct gaps or overlaps;
(iv) Analysis and recommendations for pooling information
technology systems used within the state agency, and evaluation of
information processing and telecommunications policy, organization, and
management;
(v) Analysis of the roles and functions of the state agency, its
programs, and its services and their compliance with statutory
authority and recommendations for eliminating or changing those roles
and functions and ensuring compliance with statutory authority;
(vi) Recommendations for eliminating or changing statutes, rules,
and policy directives as may be necessary to ensure that the agency
carry out reasonably and properly those functions vested in the agency
by statute;
(vii) Verification of the reliability and validity of agency
performance data, self-assessments, and performance measurement systems
as required under RCW 43.88.090;
(viii) Identification of potential cost savings in the state
agency, its programs, and its services;
(ix) Identification and recognition of best practices;
(x) Evaluation of planning, budgeting, and program evaluation
policies and practices;
(xi) Evaluation of personnel systems operation and management;
(xii) Evaluation of state purchasing operations and management
policies and practices; and
(xiii) Evaluation of organizational structure and staffing levels,
particularly in terms of the ratio of managers and supervisors to
nonmanagement personnel.
(h) The state auditor must solicit comments on preliminary
performance audit reports from the audited state agency, the office of
the governor, the office of financial management, the board, the chairs
and ranking members of appropriate legislative committees, and the
joint legislative audit and review committee for comment. Comments
must be received within thirty days after receipt of the preliminary
performance audit report unless a different time period is approved by
the state auditor. All comments shall be incorporated into the final
performance audit report. The final performance audit report shall
include the objectives, scope, and methodology; the audit results,
including findings and recommendations; conclusions; and identification
of best practices.
(i) The final performance audit reports shall be submitted to the
board and the governor by the state auditor. The board and the state
auditor shall jointly release final performance audit reports to the
citizens of Washington and the appropriate legislative committees.
Final performance audit reports shall be posted on the internet.
(j) For institutions of higher education, the board shall consider
the reviews and standards of nationally or regionally recognized
accreditation organizations, including accreditations of hospitals
licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW and ambulatory care facilities.
(2) The citizen board created under RCW 44.75.030 shall be
responsible for performance audits for transportation related agencies
as defined under RCW 44.75.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
If the legislative authority of a local jurisdiction requests a
performance audit of programs under its jurisdiction, the state auditor
has the discretion to conduct such a review under separate contract and
funded by local funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.88 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to the authority given the state auditor in RCW
43.88.160(6), the state auditor is authorized to contract for and
oversee performance audits pursuant to section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
By June 30, 2007, and each four years thereafter, the joint
legislative audit and review committee shall contract with a private
entity for a performance audit of the performance audit program
established in section 5 of this act and the board's responsibilities
under the performance audit program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The audited agency is responsible for follow-up and corrective
action on all performance audit findings and recommendations. The
audited agency's plan for addressing each audit finding and
recommendation shall be included in the final audit report. The plan
shall provide the name of the contact person responsible for each
action, the action planned, and the anticipated completion date. If
the audited agency does not agree with the audit findings and
recommendations or believes action is not required, then the action
plan shall include an explanation and specific reasons.
For agencies under the authority of the governor, the governor may
require periodic progress reports from the audited agency until all
resolution has occurred.
For agencies under the authority of an elected official other than
the governor, the auditor and the board may require periodic reports of
the action taken by the audited agency until all resolution has
occurred.
The board may request status reports on specific audits or
findings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 2.56 RCW
to read as follows:
The office of the administrator for the courts is encouraged to
conduct performance audits of courts under the authority of the supreme
court, in conformity with criteria and methods developed by the board
for judicial administration that have been approved by the supreme
court. In developing criteria and methods for conducting performance
audits, the board for judicial administration is encouraged to consider
quality improvement programs, audits, and scoring. The judicial branch
is encouraged to submit the results of these efforts to the chief
justice of the supreme court or his or her designee, and with any other
applicable boards or committees established under the authority of the
supreme court to oversee government accountability.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
Each biennium the legislature shall appropriate an amount equal to
two one-hundredths of one percent of the total general fund state
appropriation in that biennium's omnibus operating appropriations act
for purposes of the performance review, performance audits, and
activities of the board authorized by this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---