BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that the armed forces license plate
collection has been reviewed and approved by the special license plate
review board under RCW 46.16.725, and found to fully comply with all
provisions of RCW 46.16.715 through 46.16.775.
(2) The department shall issue a special license plate collection,
approved by the special license plate review board and the legislature,
recognizing the contribution of veterans, active duty military
personnel, reservists, and members of the Washington national guard.
The collection includes six separate designs, each containing a symbol
representing a different branch of the armed forces to include army,
navy, air force, marine corps, coast guard, and Washington national
guard.
(3) Armed forces special license plates may be used in lieu of
regular or personalized license plates for vehicles required to display
one and two vehicle license plates, excluding vehicles registered under
chapter 46.87 RCW, upon terms and conditions established by the
department.
(4) Upon request, the department must make available to the
purchaser, at no additional cost, a decal indicating the purchaser's
military status. The department must work with the department of
veterans affairs to establish a list of the decals to be made
available. The list of available decals must include, but is not
limited to, "veteran," "disabled veteran," "reservist," "retiree," or
"active duty." The department may specify where the decal may be
placed on the license plate. Decals are required to be made available
only for standard six-inch by twelve-inch license plates.
(5) Armed forces license plates and decals are available only to
veterans as defined in RCW 41.04.007, active duty military personnel,
reservists, members of the Washington national guard, and the spouses
of deceased veterans. Upon initial application, any purchaser
requesting an armed forces license plate and decal will be required to
show proof of eligibility by providing: A DD-214 or discharge papers
if a veteran; a military identification or retired military
identification card; or a declaration of fact attesting to the
purchaser's eligibility as required under this section.
(6) The department of veterans affairs must enter into an agreement
with the department to reimburse the department for the costs
associated with providing military status decals described in
subsection (4) of this section.
(7) Armed forces license plates are not available free of charge to
disabled veterans, former prisoners of war, or spouses of deceased
former prisoners of war under the privileges defined in RCW 73.04.110
and 73.04.115.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) "Armed forces license plate collection" means the collection of
six separate license plate designs issued pursuant to section 1 of this
act. Each license plate design displays a symbol representing one of
the five branches of the armed forces, and one representing the
Washington national guard.
(2) Armed forces license plates are not available free of charge to
disabled veterans, former prisoners of war, or spouses of deceased
former prisoners of war under the privileges defined in RCW 73.04.110
and 73.04.115.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.16.313 and 2004 c 221 s 3, 2004 c 48 s 3, and 2004
c 35 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The department may establish a fee of no more than forty
dollars for each type of special license plates issued under RCW
46.16.301(1) (a), (b), or (c), as existing before amendment by section
5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997, in an amount calculated to offset the
cost of production of the special license plates and the administration
of this program. This fee is in addition to all other fees required to
register and license the vehicle for which the plates have been
requested. All such additional special license plate fees collected by
the department shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to
the motor vehicle fund.
(2) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a
collegiate license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty dollars.
The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars of
each fee collected under this subsection for administration and
collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the
funds to the appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in
RCW 28B.10.890.
(3) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a collegiate
license plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall
deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under
this subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by
it. The remaining proceeds shall be remitted to the custody of the
state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report. The state
treasurer shall credit the funds to the appropriate collegiate license
plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.
(4) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a
special baseball stadium license plate shall pay an initial fee of
forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed
twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds, minus the cost of plate production, shall be distributed to
a county for the purpose of paying the principal and interest payments
on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball stadium, as
defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.
(5) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a special
baseball stadium license plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The
department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee
collected under this subsection for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be distributed
to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and interest
payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball stadium,
as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.
(6) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 2005, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder of a
professional fire fighters and paramedics license plate shall pay an
initial fee of forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount
not to exceed twelve dollars of each fee collected under this
subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by it.
The remaining proceeds must be remitted to the custody of the state
treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report. Under RCW
46.16.755, the state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor
vehicle account until the department determines that the state has been
reimbursed for the cost of implementing the professional fire fighters
and paramedics license plates. Upon the determination by the
department that the state has been reimbursed, the treasurer shall
credit the proceeds to the Washington State Council of Fire Fighters
benevolent fund established under RCW 46.16.30902.
(7) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on January
1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of a professional fire
fighters and paramedics license plate shall, upon application, pay a
fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to
exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds must be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a
proper identifying detailed report. Under RCW 46.16.755, the state
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until
the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the
cost of implementing the professional fire fighters and paramedics
special license plate. Upon the determination by the department that
the state has been reimbursed, the treasurer shall credit the proceeds
to the Washington State Council of Fire Fighters benevolent fund
established under RCW 46.16.30902.
(8) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
November 1, 2004, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder of a
"Helping Kids Speak" license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. Pursuant to RCW 46.16.755, the state
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until
the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the
cost of implementing the "Helping Kids Speak" special license plate.
Upon the determination by the department that the state has been
reimbursed, the treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the "Helping
Kids Speak" account established under RCW 46.16.30904.
(9) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on November
1, 2005, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of a "Helping Kids Speak"
license plate shall, upon application, pay a fee of thirty dollars.
The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each
fee collected under this subsection for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be remitted to
the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed
report. Pursuant to RCW 46.16.755, the state treasurer shall credit
the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until the department
determines that the state has been reimbursed for the cost of
implementing the "Helping Kids Speak" special license plate. Upon the
determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the "Helping Kids Speak" account
established under RCW 46.16.30904.
(10) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 2005, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder of a "law
enforcement memorial" license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall
be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. Pursuant to RCW 46.16.755, the state
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until
the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the
cost of implementing the law enforcement memorial special license
plate. Upon the determination by the department that the state has
been reimbursed, the treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the law
enforcement memorial account established under RCW 46.16.30906.
(11) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on January
1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of a "law enforcement
memorial" license plate shall, upon application, pay a fee of thirty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall
be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. Pursuant to RCW 46.16.755, the state
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until
the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the
cost of implementing the law enforcement memorial special license
plate. Upon the determination by the department that the state has
been reimbursed, the treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the law
enforcement memorial account established under RCW 46.16.30906.
(12) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder of an armed
forces license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty dollars. The
department shall retain an amount not to exceed twelve dollars of each
fee collected under this subsection for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be remitted to
the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying report.
Pursuant to RCW 46.16.755, the state treasurer shall credit the
proceeds to the motor vehicle account until the department determines
that the state has been reimbursed for the cost of implementing the
armed forces special license plate collection. Upon determination by
the department that the state has been reimbursed, the treasurer shall
credit the proceeds to the veterans stewardship account established
under section 5 of this act.
(13) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on or
after January 1, 2007, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be
paid upon renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of an armed
forces license plate shall, upon application, pay a fee of thirty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall
be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying report. Pursuant to RCW 46.16.755, the state treasurer
shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until the
department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the cost
of implementing the armed forces special license plate collection.
Upon the determination by the department that the state has been
reimbursed, the treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the veterans
stewardship account established in section 5 of this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.16.755 and 2004 c 222 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Revenues generated from the sale of special license plates
for those sponsoring organizations who used the application process in
RCW 46.16.745(3) must be deposited into the motor vehicle account until
the department determines that the state's implementation costs have
been fully reimbursed. The department shall apply the application fee
required under RCW 46.16.745(3)(a) towards those costs.
(b) When it is determined that the state has been fully reimbursed
the department must notify the house of representatives and senate
transportation committees, the sponsoring organization, and the
treasurer, and commence the distribution of the revenue as otherwise
provided by law.
(c) For purposes of meeting the reimbursement requirements stated
in this section, an organization sponsoring a license plate collection
that includes two or more license plate designs must inform the
department how the reimbursement requirement is to be met for that
collection. Unless the state's implementation costs have been prepaid,
the sponsoring organization must elect one of the two following
reimbursement options:
(i) The sponsoring organization may elect to dedicate the revenues
from each plate in the collection to meet the reimbursement requirement
for implementation of that individual plate design. If one or more
plate designs within the collection cannot meet the reimbursement
requirement, those specific plates may be placed in probationary status
or discontinued as provided in subsection (2) of this section. Those
plates that meet the reimbursement requirement, however, will continue
to be made available for sale by the department of licensing.
(ii) Alternately, the organization may elect to dedicate the
revenues from all plates to meet a common reimbursement requirement for
the collection in its entirety. Although one or more of the plate
designs within the collection cannot meet the reimbursement
requirements individually, if the total revenues from the sale of all
the plates within the collection are sufficient to meet the entire
collection's reimbursement requirements, the complete collection will
continue to be made available. If revenues are insufficient to meet
the reimbursement requirement for the complete collection, the entire
collection may be placed on probation or discontinued as provided in
subsection (2) of this section.
(d) Selection of either of the alternatives in (c)(i) or (ii) of
this subsection does not preclude an organization from reimbursing the
department at any time from sources other than revenue from the sale of
the special license plates.
(2) If reimbursement does not occur within two years from the date
the plate is first offered for sale to the public, the special license
plate series must be placed in probationary status for a period of one
year from that date. If the state is still not fully reimbursed for
its implementation costs after the one-year probation, the plate series
must be discontinued immediately. Special plates issued before
discontinuation are valid until replaced under RCW 46.16.233.
(3) The special license plate applicant trust account is created in
the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from special license
plate applicants, except the application fee as provided in RCW
46.16.745(3), must be deposited into the account. Only the director of
the department or the director's designee may authorize disbursements
from the account. The account is not subject to the allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, nor is an appropriation required
for disbursements.
(4) The department shall provide the special license plate
applicant with a written receipt for the payment.
(5) The department shall maintain a record of each special license
plate applicant trust account deposit, including, but not limited to,
the name and address of each special license plate applicant whose
funds are being deposited, the amount paid, and the date of the
deposit.
(6) After the department receives written notice that the special
license plate applicant's application has been:
(a) Approved by the legislature the director shall request that the
money be transferred to the motor vehicle account;
(b) Denied by the special license plate review board or the
legislature the director shall provide a refund to the applicant within
thirty days; or
(c) Withdrawn by the special license plate applicant the director
shall provide a refund to the applicant within thirty days.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.60A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The veterans stewardship account is created in the custody of
the state treasurer. Disbursements of funds shall be on the
authorization of the director or the director's designee, and only for
the purposes stated in subsection (4) of this section. In order to
maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control, funds shall be
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required to permit expenditure of the funds.
(2) The department may request and accept nondedicated
contributions, grants, or gifts in cash or otherwise, including funds
generated by the issuance of the armed forces license plate collection
under chapter 46.16 RCW.
(3) All receipts, except as provided in RCW 46.16.313 (12) and
(13), from the sale of armed forces license plates must be deposited
into the veterans stewardship account.
(4) All moneys deposited into the veterans stewardship account must
be used by the department for activities that benefit veterans,
including but not limited to, providing programs and services for
homeless veterans; establishing memorials honoring veterans; and
maintaining a future state veterans' cemetery. Funds from the account
may not be used to supplant existing funds received by the department.

Sec. 6 RCW 73.04.115 and 1990 c 250 s 91 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall issue to the surviving spouse of any
deceased former prisoner of war described in RCW 73.04.110(2), one set
of regular or special license plates for use on a personal passenger
vehicle registered to that person.
(2) The plates shall be issued without the payment of any license
fees or excise tax on the vehicle. Whenever any person who has been
issued license plates under this section applies to the department for
transfer of the plates to a subsequently acquired motor vehicle, a
transfer fee of five dollars shall be charged in addition to all other
appropriate fees. If the surviving spouse remarries, he or she shall
return the special plates to the department within fifteen days and
apply for regular license plates.
(3) For purposes of this section, the term "special license plates"
does not include any plate from the armed forces license plate
collection established in section 1 of this act.

Sec. 7 RCW 73.04.110 and 2004 c 223 s 6 and 2004 c 125 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person who is a veteran as defined in RCW 41.04.007 who
submits to the department of licensing satisfactory proof of a service-connected disability rating from the veterans administration or the
military service from which the veteran was discharged and:
(((1))) (a) Has lost the use of both hands or one foot;
(((2))) (b) Was captured and incarcerated for more than twenty-nine
days by an enemy of the United States during a period of war with the
United States;
(((3))) (c) Has become blind in both eyes as the result of military
service; or
(((4))) (d) Is rated by the veterans administration or the military
service from which the veteran was discharged and is receiving service-connected compensation at the one hundred percent rate that is expected
to exist for more than one year;
is entitled to regular or special license plates issued by the
department of licensing. The special license plates shall bear
distinguishing marks, letters, or numerals indicating that the motor
vehicle is owned by a disabled veteran or former prisoner of war. This
license shall be issued annually for one personal use vehicle without
payment of any license fees or excise tax thereon. Whenever any person
who has been issued license plates under the provisions of this section
applies to the department for transfer of the plates to a subsequently
acquired motor vehicle, a transfer fee of ten dollars shall be charged
in addition to all other appropriate fees. The department may
periodically verify the one hundred percent rate as provided in
subsection (((4))) (1)(d) of this section.
(2) Any person who has been issued free motor vehicle license
plates under this section prior to July 1, 1983, shall continue to be
eligible for the annual free license plates.
(3) For the purposes of this section, (a): "Blind" means the
definition of "blind" used by the state of Washington in determining
eligibility for financial assistance to the blind under Title 74 RCW;
and (b) "special license plates" does not include any plate from the
armed forces license plate collection established in section 1 of this
act.
Any unauthorized use of a special plate is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 8 RCW 41.04.007 and 2002 c 292 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Veteran" includes every person, who at the time he or she seeks
the benefits of section 1 of this act, RCW 72.36.030, 41.04.010,
73.04.090, 73.04.110, 73.08.010, 73.08.060, 73.08.070, or 73.08.080 has
received an honorable discharge or received a discharge for medical
reasons with an honorable record, where applicable, and who has served
in at least one of the following capacities:
(1) As a member in any branch of the armed forces of the United
States, including the national guard and armed forces reserves, and has
fulfilled his or her initial military service obligation;
(2) As a member of the women's air forces service pilots;
(3) As a member of the armed forces reserves, national guard, or
coast guard, and has been called into federal service by a presidential
select reserve call up for at least one hundred eighty cumulative days;
(4) As a civil service crewmember with service aboard a U.S. army
transport service or U.S. naval transportation service vessel in
oceangoing service from December 7, 1941, through December 31, 1946; or
(5) As a member of the Philippine armed forces/scouts during the
period of armed conflict from December 7, 1941, through August 15,
1945.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2004 c 246 s 8 and 2004 c 58 s 10 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the students with dependents grant account, the basic health plan
self-insurance reserve account, the contract harvesting revolving
account, the Washington state combined fund drive account, the
Washington international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the
developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account,
the fair fund, the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the future
teachers conditional scholarship account, the game farm alternative
account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile
accountability incentive account, the law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local tourism promotion
account, the produce railcar pool account, the rural rehabilitation
account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the youth athletic
facility account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide
abatement account, the children's trust fund, the veterans stewardship
account, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred owners'
bonus fund account, the Washington horse racing commission class C
purse fund account, and the Washington horse racing commission
operating account (earnings from the Washington horse racing commission
operating account must be credited to the Washington horse racing
commission class C purse fund account). However, the earnings to be
distributed shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

--- END ---