BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.165.055 and 2004 c 20 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each school district with an approved program is eligible for state
funds provided for the learning assistance program. The funds shall be
appropriated for the learning assistance program in accordance with the
biennial appropriations act. The distribution formula is for school
district allocation purposes only. The distribution formula shall be
based on ((an assessment of students and on)) one or more family income
factors measuring economic need. ((Beginning with the 2005-06 school
year, fifty percent of the distribution formula shall be based on an
assessment of students and fifty percent shall be based on one or more
family income factors measuring economic need.))

--- END ---