BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.230.195 and 1999 c 373 s 603 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If students' scores on the test or assessments under RCW
((28A.230.190, 28A.230.230, and 28A.630.885)) 28A.655.070 indicate that
students need help in identified areas, the school district shall
evaluate its instructional practices and make appropriate adjustments.
(2) Each school district shall notify the parents of each student
of their child's performance on the test and assessments conducted
under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the mandatory norm-referenced
student assessments eliminated under this act provide information that
teachers and parents use to improve student learning. The legislature
intends to permit school districts to offer norm-referenced assessments
at the districts' own expense and make diagnostic tools available that
provide information that is at least as valuable as the information
eliminated under this act.
(2) School districts may, at their own expense, administer norm-referenced assessments to students.
(3) By September 1, 2005, subject to available funds, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall post on its web site for
voluntary use by school districts, a guide of diagnostic assessments.
The assessments in the guide, to the extent possible, shall include the
characteristics listed in subsection (4) (a) through (e) of this
section.
(4) By September 1, 2006, subject to the availability of amounts
appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall make available to school
districts diagnostic assessments that help improve student learning.
To the greatest extent possible, the assessments shall be:
(a) Aligned to the state's grade level expectations;
(b) Individualized to each student's performance level;
(c) Administered efficiently to provide results either immediately
or within two weeks;
(d) Capable of measuring individual student growth over time; and
(e) Cost-effective.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 28A.230.190 (Third grade achievement test) and 1999 c 373
s 201, 1998 c 319 s 202, 1997 c 262 s 5, 1990 c 101 s 6, 1985 c 403 s
1, 1984 c 278 s 8, & 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 98 s 1;
(2) RCW 28A.230.193 (Sixth grade achievement test) and 1999 c 373
s 301;
(3) RCW 28A.230.230 (Annual assessment of ninth grade students -- Inventory for high school and beyond for use by eighth grade students)
and 1999 c 373 s 401 & 1990 c 101 s 2; and
(4) RCW 28A.230.260 (Annual report to the legislature) and 1990 c
101 s 5.

--- END ---