BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.18 RCW
to read as follows:
With respect to any coverage period ending on or after the
effective date of this act, an entity sponsoring a retrospective rating
group may not retain from any refund or dividend paid by the department
to the entity an amount equal to more than ten percent of the refund or
dividend for the coverage period, less any enrollment fees paid by
members of the retrospective rating group to the entity for the
coverage period.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.16.035 and 1999 c 7 s 8 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) The department shall classify all occupations or industries in
accordance with their degree of hazard and fix therefor basic rates of
premium which shall be the lowest necessary to maintain actuarial
solvency of the accident and medical aid funds in accordance with
recognized insurance principles. The department shall formulate and
adopt rules and regulations governing the method of premium calculation
and collection and providing for a rating system consistent with
recognized principles of workers' compensation insurance which shall be
designed to stimulate and encourage accident prevention and to
facilitate collection. The department may annually, or at such other
times as it deems necessary to maintain solvency of the funds, readjust
rates in accordance with the rating system to become effective on such
dates as the department may designate.
(2) In providing a retrospective rating plan under RCW 51.18.010,
the department may consider each individual retrospective rating group
as a single employing entity for purposes of refunds, dividends, or
premium discounts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---