BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The uniform disciplinary act provides a
consistent process for addressing acts of unprofessional conduct
affecting fifty-nine health professions regulated by the state. The
disciplinary authorities include the secretary of health and sixteen
boards and commissions charged with protecting the health and safety of
patients from unprofessional conduct. It is recognized nationally as
a model law and has worked well over time to provide uniformity and
efficiency to the disciplinary process.
The legislature finds that there may be methods for increasing the
efficiency and effectiveness of this model through the redistribution
of duties between the secretary of health and the health profession
boards and commissions. In addition, there is an opportunity to
achieve greater consistency in the sanctions imposed across the health
professions through specifically identified sanctions for specific acts
of unprofessional conduct. A more consistent application of sanctions
across professions protects both the safety of the public and the due
process rights of all health care professionals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The secretary of health shall establish a
work group to review the complaint processing and sanction
determination phases of the health professions disciplinary process.
At the secretary of health's discretion, the work group may include
representatives of different health profession boards and commissions,
professional associations, and other interested parties. The work
group shall submit a report to the legislature by December 1, 2005,
with recommendations for creating:
(1) Greater efficiencies between the health professions boards and
commissions and the secretary of health in processing complaints
against license holders; and
(2) More consistent sanction determinations that balance the
protection of the public's health and the rights of health care
providers among the different health professions, including
recommendations for specific ranges of sanctions for each act of
unprofessional conduct and the effect of any aggravating and mitigating
factors that may apply to each.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.130 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary, with the advice and consultation of the other
disciplining authorities, shall adopt a schedule that defines
appropriate ranges of sanctions that are applicable to a finding after
a hearing that a license holder has committed unprofessional conduct as
defined in this chapter or the chapters specified in RCW 18.130.040(2).
The schedule must identify aggravating and mitigating circumstances
that may enhance or reduce the sanction imposed by the disciplining
authority for each act of unprofessional conduct. The schedule must
apply to all disciplining authorities. In addition, the secretary
shall make provisions for instances in which there are multiple
findings of unprofessional conduct. When establishing the schedule,
the secretary shall consider maintaining consistent sanction
determinations that balance the protection of the public's health and
the rights of health care providers of the different health
professions.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.130.050 and 1995 c 336 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The disciplining authority has the following authority:
(1) To adopt, amend, and rescind such rules as are deemed necessary
to carry out this chapter;
(2) To investigate all complaints or reports of unprofessional
conduct as defined in this chapter and to hold hearings as provided in
this chapter;
(3) To issue subpoenas and administer oaths in connection with any
investigation, hearing, or proceeding held under this chapter;
(4) To take or cause depositions to be taken and use other
discovery procedures as needed in any investigation, hearing, or
proceeding held under this chapter;
(5) To compel attendance of witnesses at hearings;
(6) In the course of investigating a complaint or report of
unprofessional conduct, to conduct practice reviews;
(7) ((To take emergency action ordering summary suspension of a
license, or restriction or limitation of the licensee's practice
pending proceedings by the disciplining authority;
(8))) To use a presiding officer as authorized in RCW 18.130.095(3)
or the office of administrative hearings as authorized in chapter 34.12
RCW to conduct hearings. The disciplining authority shall make the
final decision regarding disposition of the license unless the
disciplining authority elects to delegate in writing the final decision
to the presiding officer;
(((9))) (8) To use individual members of the boards to direct
investigations. However, the member of the board shall not
subsequently participate in the hearing of the case;
(((10))) (9) To enter into contracts for professional services
determined to be necessary for adequate enforcement of this chapter;
(((11))) (10) To contract with licensees or other persons or
organizations to provide services necessary for the monitoring and
supervision of licensees who are placed on probation, whose
professional activities are restricted, or who are for any authorized
purpose subject to monitoring by the disciplining authority;
(((12))) (11) To adopt standards of professional conduct or
practice;
(((13))) (12) To grant or deny license applications, and in the
event of a finding of unprofessional conduct by an applicant or license
holder, to impose any sanction consistent with section 3 of this act
against a license applicant or license holder provided by this chapter;
(((14))) (13) To designate individuals authorized to sign subpoenas
and statements of charges;
(((15))) (14) To establish panels consisting of three or more
members of the board to perform any duty or authority within the
board's jurisdiction under this chapter;
(((16))) (15) To review and audit the records of licensed health
facilities' or services' quality assurance committee decisions in which
a licensee's practice privilege or employment is terminated or
restricted. Each health facility or service shall produce and make
accessible to the disciplining authority the appropriate records and
otherwise facilitate the review and audit. Information so gained shall
not be subject to discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil
action pursuant to RCW 70.41.200(3).

Sec. 5 RCW 18.130.060 and 2001 c 101 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to the authority specified in RCW 18.130.050, the
secretary has the following additional authority:
(1) To employ such investigative, administrative, and clerical
staff as necessary for the enforcement of this chapter;
(2) Upon the request of a board, to appoint pro tem members to
participate as members of a panel of the board in connection with
proceedings specifically identified in the request. Individuals so
appointed must meet the same minimum qualifications as regular members
of the board. Pro tem members appointed for matters under this chapter
are appointed for a term of no more than one year. No pro tem member
may serve more than four one-year terms. While serving as board
members pro tem, persons so appointed have all the powers, duties, and
immunities, and are entitled to the emoluments, including travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, of regular
members of the board. The chairperson of a panel shall be a regular
member of the board appointed by the board chairperson. Panels have
authority to act as directed by the board with respect to all matters
concerning the review, investigation, and adjudication of all
complaints, allegations, charges, and matters subject to the
jurisdiction of the board. The authority to act through panels does
not restrict the authority of the board to act as a single body at any
phase of proceedings within the board's jurisdiction. Board panels may
make interim orders and issue final decisions with respect to matters
and cases delegated to the panel by the board. Final decisions may be
appealed as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative Procedure
Act;
(3) To establish fees to be paid for witnesses, expert witnesses,
and consultants used in any investigation and to establish fees to
witnesses in any agency adjudicative proceeding as authorized by RCW
34.05.446;
(4) To conduct investigations and practice reviews at the direction
of the disciplining authority and to issue subpoenas, administer oaths,
and take depositions in the course of conducting those investigations
and practice reviews at the direction of the disciplining authority;
(5) To take emergency action ordering summary suspension of a
license, or restriction or limitation of the license holder's practice
pending proceedings by the disciplining authority;
(6) To have the health professions regulatory program establish a
system to recruit potential public members, to review the
qualifications of such potential members, and to provide orientation to
those public members appointed pursuant to law by the governor or the
secretary to the boards and commissions specified in RCW
18.130.040(2)(b), and to the advisory committees and councils for
professions specified in RCW 18.130.040(2)(a).

Sec. 6 RCW 18.130.160 and 2001 c 195 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon a finding, after hearing, that a license holder or applicant
has committed unprofessional conduct or is unable to practice with
reasonable skill and safety due to a physical or mental condition, the
disciplining authority may issue an order providing for one or any
combination of the following, in accordance with the schedule adopted
by the secretary in section 3 of this act:
(1) Revocation of the license;
(2) Suspension of the license for a fixed or indefinite term;
(3) Restriction or limitation of the practice;
(4) Requiring the satisfactory completion of a specific program of
remedial education or treatment;
(5) The monitoring of the practice by a supervisor approved by the
disciplining authority;
(6) Censure or reprimand;
(7) Compliance with conditions of probation for a designated period
of time;
(8) Payment of a fine for each violation of this chapter, not to
exceed five thousand dollars per violation. Funds received shall be
placed in the health professions account;
(9) Denial of the license request;
(10) Corrective action;
(11) Refund of fees billed to and collected from the consumer;
(12) A surrender of the practitioner's license in lieu of other
sanctions, which must be reported to the federal data bank.
Any of the actions under this section may be totally or partly
stayed by the disciplining authority. In determining what action is
appropriate, the disciplining authority must consider the schedule
adopted by the secretary in section 3 of this act. Where the schedule
allows flexibility in determining the appropriate sanction, the
disciplining authority must first consider what sanctions are necessary
to protect or compensate the public. Only after such provisions have
been made may the disciplining authority consider and include in the
order requirements designed to rehabilitate the license holder or
applicant. All costs associated with compliance with orders issued
under this section are the obligation of the license holder or
applicant.
The licensee or applicant may enter into a stipulated disposition
of charges that includes one or more of the sanctions of this section,
but only after a statement of charges has been issued and the licensee
has been afforded the opportunity for a hearing and has elected on the
record to forego such a hearing. The stipulation shall either contain
one or more specific findings of unprofessional conduct or inability to
practice, or a statement by the licensee acknowledging that evidence is
sufficient to justify one or more specified findings of unprofessional
conduct or inability to practice. The stipulation entered into
pursuant to this subsection shall be considered formal disciplinary
action for all purposes.

--- END ---