BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.50.401 and 2003 c 53 s 331 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as authorized by this chapter, it is unlawful for any
person to manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to manufacture
or deliver, a controlled substance.
(2) Any person who violates this section with respect to:
(a) A controlled substance classified in Schedule I or II which is
a narcotic drug or flunitrazepam, including its salts, isomers, and
salts of isomers, classified in Schedule IV, is guilty of a class B
felony and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than ten
years, or (i) fined not more than twenty-five thousand dollars if the
crime involved less than two kilograms of the drug, or both such
imprisonment and fine; or (ii) if the crime involved two or more
kilograms of the drug, then fined not more than one hundred thousand
dollars for the first two kilograms and not more than fifty dollars for
each gram in excess of two kilograms, or both such imprisonment and
fine;
(b) Amphetamine, including its salts, isomers, and salts of
isomers, or methamphetamine, including its salts, isomers, and salts of
isomers, is guilty of a class B felony and upon conviction may be
imprisoned for not more than ten years, or (i) fined not more than
twenty-five thousand dollars if the crime involved less than two
kilograms of the drug, or both such imprisonment and fine; or (ii) if
the crime involved two or more kilograms of the drug, then fined not
more than one hundred thousand dollars for the first two kilograms and
not more than fifty dollars for each gram in excess of two kilograms,
or both such imprisonment and fine. Three thousand dollars of the fine
may not be suspended. As collected, the first three thousand dollars
of the fine must be deposited with the law enforcement agency having
responsibility for cleanup of laboratories, sites, or substances used
in the manufacture of the methamphetamine, including its salts,
isomers, and salts of isomers. The fine moneys deposited with that law
enforcement agency must be used for such clean-up cost;
(c) Any other controlled substance classified in Schedule I, II, or
III, is guilty of a class C felony punishable according to chapter
9A.20 RCW;
(d) A substance classified in Schedule IV, except flunitrazepam,
including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, is guilty of a
class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW; or
(e) A substance classified in Schedule V, is guilty of a class C
felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 69.50.406 and 2003 c 53 s 340 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person eighteen years of age or over who violates RCW
69.50.401 by distributing a controlled substance listed in Schedules I
or II which is a narcotic drug or methamphetamine, including its salts,
isomers, and salts of isomers, or flunitrazepam, including its salts,
isomers, and salts of isomers, listed in Schedule IV, to a person under
eighteen years of age is guilty of a class A felony punishable by the
fine authorized by RCW 69.50.401(2) (a) or (b), by a term of
imprisonment of up to twice that authorized by RCW 69.50.401(2) (a) or
(b), or by both.
(2) Any person eighteen years of age or over who violates RCW
69.50.401 by distributing any other controlled substance listed in
Schedules I, II, III, IV, and V to a person under eighteen years of age
who is at least three years his or her junior is guilty of a class B
felony punishable by the fine authorized by RCW 69.50.401(2) (c), (d),
or (e), by a term of imprisonment up to twice that authorized by RCW
69.50.401(2) (c), (d), or (e), or both.

Sec. 3 RCW 69.50.440 and 2003 c 53 s 347 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person to possess ephedrine or any of
its salts or isomers or salts of isomers, pseudoephedrine or any of its
salts or isomers or salts of isomers, pressurized ammonia gas, or
pressurized ammonia gas solution with intent to manufacture
methamphetamine, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers.
(2) Any person who violates this section is guilty of a class B
felony and may be imprisoned for not more than ten years, fined not
more than twenty-five thousand dollars, or both. Three thousand
dollars of the fine may not be suspended. As collected, the first
three thousand dollars of the fine must be deposited with the law
enforcement agency having responsibility for cleanup of laboratories,
sites, or substances used in the manufacture of the methamphetamine,
including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers. The fine moneys
deposited with that law enforcement agency must be used for such clean-up cost.

Sec. 4 RCW 9A.42.100 and 2002 c 229 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person is guilty of the crime of endangerment with a controlled
substance if the person knowingly or intentionally permits a dependent
child or dependent adult to be exposed to, ingest, inhale, or have
contact with methamphetamine or ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
anhydrous ammonia, including their salts, isomers, and salts of
isomers, that are being used in the manufacture of methamphetamine,
including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers. Endangerment with
a controlled substance is a class B felony.

--- END ---