BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.55.020 and 2002 c 133 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of the crime of unlawful storage of ammonia
if the person possesses, transports, or delivers ((pressurized))
ammonia gas or ((pressurized)) ammonia gas solution in a container that
(((1) is not approved by the United States department of transportation
to hold ammonia, or (2) was not constructed to meet state and federal
industrial health and safety standards for holding ammonia)): (a) Is
not conspicuously and legibly marked with the words "ammonia solution"
or "ammonia, anhydrous"; (b) is not conspicuously and legibly marked
with the words "poisonous gas" or "flammable gas"; (c) is not
conspicuously and legibly marked with the proper United Nations
identification number; (d) has fittings that contain brass, copper, or
galvanized steel; or (e) allows ammonia gas to escape from the
container when any valve or other fitting is in the closed, shut, or
off position.
(2) Violation of this section is a class C felony.
(3) This section does not apply to public employees or private
contractors authorized to clean up and dispose of hazardous waste or
toxic substances under chapter 70.105 or 70.105D RCW or to solid waste
haulers and their employees who unknowingly possess, transport, or
deliver pressurized ammonia gas or pressurized ammonia gas solution
during the course of the performance of their duties.

--- END ---