BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Many high school students who wish to earn college credits are
unable to participate in the running start program because they live in
areas that do not have local colleges; and some students who would like
to earn college credits while in high school do not participate in
running start because they do not want to leave their high school
campus in order to do so.
(2) Some high schools are currently working with colleges to offer
dual credit courses on high school campuses to serve those students.
However, there is no established statewide program or funding provided,
so rules governing these programs vary and high school students pay
varying amounts to cover the colleges' costs of working with high
schools to offer the classes.
The legislature intends to authorize the college in the high school
pilot program to study its viability for expanding dual enrollment
options for Washington state high school students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.600
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction, the state board for
community and technical colleges, and the higher education coordinating
board shall, in consultation with the institutions of higher education,
and consistent with national standards, jointly develop and adopt rules
governing the college in the high school pilot program. The rules
shall allow for selection of up to six pilot sites where college in the
high school program courses will be offered for three consecutive
academic years beginning not later than the 2006-07 academic year. At
least four of the pilot sites shall be in rural school districts where
students have limited or no options for participation in the running
start program. In selecting the pilot sites, preference shall be given
to pilots in which math courses will be offered. Rules shall be
written to encourage the maximum use of the program at the pilot sites.
(2) The college in the high school pilot program is authorized as
follows:
(a) Institutions of higher education participating in the pilot
program are authorized to charge two hundred eighty dollars per student
per five-credit program course. For each program course, the
superintendent of public instruction shall distribute to a school
district an amount of one hundred forty dollars per student per course,
except the allocation shall be two hundred eighty dollars per student
per course for students eligible for free or reduced price meals.
School districts shall transfer the program course amount to the
appropriate institution of higher education to offset students'
participation fees.
(b) A school district shall grant high school credit to a student
enrolled in a program course upon successful completion of the course.
If no comparable course is offered by the school district, the school
building administrator shall determine the number of credits to be
awarded for the program course. The determination must be made in
writing before the student enrolls in the program course. Credits
shall be applied toward graduation requirements and subject area
requirements, and evidence of the successful completion of each program
course must be included in the student's secondary school records and
transcript.
(c) Eleventh and twelfth grade students or students who have not
yet received a high school diploma or its equivalent, who are eligible
to be in the eleventh or twelfth grades, and who have met the state
standards on the reading, writing, and mathematics content areas of the
high school Washington assessment of student learning, may participate
in the college in the high school pilot program. Participating school
districts and institutions of higher education may establish standards
for admission to program courses.
(d) Participating school districts shall provide general
information about the college in the high school pilot program to all
students in grades ten, eleven, and twelve and the parents and
guardians of those students.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Institution of higher education" has the definition in RCW
28B.10.016.
(b) "Program course" means a college course offered in a high
school under the college in the high school pilot program.
(4) By December 1, 2009, the superintendent of public instruction,
the state board for community and technical colleges, and the higher
education coordinating board shall report to the legislature regarding
the college in the high school pilot program. The report shall discuss
and compare student academic performance in program courses with
student academic performance in running start courses; the freshman
year college academic performance of students who complete program
courses, with the freshman year college academic performance of
students who complete running start courses, including whether and how
the completion of college-level math courses by junior and senior high
school students impacts the need for remediation once the student
enters college; and the teaching performance of adjunct faculty
instructors of program courses, with the teaching performance of
faculty instructors of the same or similar courses. The report shall
identify the number of students served; the number of college credits
earned, including whether the college credits are easily transferred
and applied toward a student's college degree; the types of college
courses offered; and the costs of the pilot program to school
districts, institutions of higher education, and students. The report
also shall recommend best practices for high school dual enrollment
programs, including whether and how the college in the high school
pilot program should be expanded or continued.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.600
RCW to read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall develop counseling
guidelines that ensure that pupils and parents understand that college
credits earned in high school dual credit programs count toward the
total number of credits allowed for financial aid.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.150.275 and 1995 c 77 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The basic education allocation, including applicable vocational
entitlements and special education program money, generated under this
chapter and under state appropriation acts by school districts for
students enrolled in a technical college program established by an
interlocal agreement under RCW 28B.50.533 shall be allocated in amounts
as determined by the superintendent of public instruction to the
serving college rather than to the school district, unless the college
chooses to continue to receive the allocations through the school
districts. This section does not apply to students enrolled in the
running start program established in RCW 28A.600.310 or the college in
the high school pilot program established in section 2 of this act.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.225.290 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 207 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall prepare and
annually distribute an information booklet outlining parents' and
guardians' enrollment options for their children.
(2) Before the 1991-92 school year, the booklet shall be
distributed to all school districts by the office of the superintendent
of public instruction. School districts shall have a copy of the
information booklet available for public inspection at each school in
the district, at the district office, and in public libraries.
(3) The booklet shall include:
(a) Information about enrollment options and program opportunities,
including but not limited to programs in RCW 28A.225.220, 28A.185.040,
28A.225.200 through 28A.225.215, 28A.225.230 through 28A.225.250,
((28A.175.090)), 28A.340.010 through 28A.340.070 (small high school
cooperative projects), and 28A.335.160.
(b) Information about the running start - community college or
vocational-technical institute choice program under RCW 28A.600.300
through ((28A.600.395)) 28A.600.400 and about the college in the high
school pilot program under section 2 of this act; and
(c) Information about the seventh and eighth grade choice program
under RCW 28A.230.090.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.600.160 and 1998 c 225 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any middle school, junior high school, or high school using
educational pathways shall ensure that all participating students will
continue to have access to the courses and instruction necessary to
meet admission requirements at baccalaureate institutions. Students
shall be allowed to enter the educational pathway of their choice.
Before accepting a student into an educational pathway, the school
shall inform the student's parent of the pathway chosen, the
opportunities available to the student through the pathway, and the
career objectives the student will have exposure to while pursuing the
pathway. Parents and students dissatisfied with the opportunities
available through the selected educational pathway shall be provided
with the opportunity to transfer the student to any other pathway
provided in the school. Schools may not develop educational pathways
that retain students in high school beyond the date they are eligible
to graduate, and may not require students who transfer between pathways
to complete pathway requirements beyond the date the student is
eligible to graduate. Educational pathways may include, but are not
limited to, programs such as work-based learning, school-to-work
transition, tech prep, vocational-technical education, running start,
college in the high school, and preparation for technical college,
community college, or university education.

--- END ---