BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.39A.220 and 2002 c 3 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The people of the state of Washington find as follows:
(1) Thousands of Washington seniors and persons with disabilities
live independently in their own homes, which they prefer and is less
costly than institutional care such as nursing homes.
(2) Many Washington seniors and persons with disabilities currently
receive long-term in-home care services from individual providers hired
directly by them under the medicaid personal care, community options
programs entry system, or chore services program.
(3) Quality long-term in-home care services allow Washington
seniors, persons with disabilities, and their families the choice of
allowing seniors and persons with disabilities to remain in their
homes, rather than forcing them into institutional care such as nursing
homes. Long-term in-home care services are also less costly, saving
Washington taxpayers significant amounts through lower reimbursement
rates.
(4) The quality of long-term in-home care services in Washington
would benefit from improved regulation, higher standards, better
accountability, and improved access to such services. The quality of
long-term in-home care services would further be improved by a well-trained, stable individual provider work force earning reasonable wages
and benefits.
(5) Washington seniors and persons with disabilities would benefit
from the establishment of ((an authority that has the power and duty to
regulate and)) a home care quality council to advise the governor and
the department on ways to improve the quality of long-term in-home care
services.
(6) The ((authority)) home care quality council should promote and
monitor the department's efforts to ensure that the quality of long-term in-home care services provided by individual providers is improved
through better regulation, higher standards, increased accountability,
and the enhanced ability to obtain services. The ((authority)) home
care quality council should also encourage the department's efforts to
promote stability in the individual provider work force through
collective bargaining and by providing training opportunities.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.39A.230 and 2002 c 3 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The home care quality ((authority)) council is established to
advise the governor and the department in its efforts to regulate and
improve the quality of long-term in-home care services by recruiting,
training, and stabilizing the work force of individual providers.
(2) The ((authority)) home care quality council consists of a board
of nine members appointed by the governor. At least five ((board))
home care quality councilmembers shall be current and/or former
consumers of long-term in-home care services provided for functionally
disabled persons, at least one of whom shall be a person with a
developmental disability((;)). Also, of the home care quality
councilmembers, at least one ((board)) member shall be a representative
of the developmental disabilities planning council; at least one
((board)) member shall be a representative of the governor's committee
on disability issues and employment; at least one ((board)) member
shall be a representative of the state council on aging; and at least
one ((board)) member shall be a representative of the Washington state
association of area agencies on aging. The initial appointments to the
home care quality council will be as follows: Three members will be
appointed for a one-year term, three members will be appointed for a
two-year term, and three members will be appointed for a three-year
term. Thereafter, each ((board)) home care quality councilmember
((serves)) will be appointed to serve a term of three years. If a
vacancy occurs, the governor will make an appointment to become
immediately effective for the unexpired term. Each ((board)) home care
quality councilmember is eligible for reappointment and may serve no
more than two consecutive terms. In making appointments, the governor
will take into consideration any nominations or recommendations made by
the groups or agencies represented.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.39A.240 and 2002 c 3 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 74.39A.030 and
((74.39A.095 and)) 74.39A.220 through 74.39A.300, 41.56.026,
((70.127.041,)) and 74.09.740 unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) (("Authority" means the home care quality authority.
(2) "Board" means the board created under RCW 74.39A.230.
(3))) "Consumer" means a person to whom an individual provider
provides any such services.
(((4))) (2) "Home care quality council" means the council created
under RCW 74.39A.230.
(3) "Individual provider" means a person, including a personal
aide, who has contracted with the department to provide personal care
or respite care services to functionally disabled persons under the
medicaid personal care, community options program entry system, chore
services program, or respite care program, or to provide respite care
or residential services and support to persons with developmental
disabilities under chapter 71A.12 RCW, or to provide respite care as
defined in RCW 74.13.270.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.39A.250 and 2002 c 3 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ((authority)) department, with advice and input from the
home care quality council, must carry out the following duties:
(a) Establish qualifications and reasonable standards for
accountability for and investigate the background of individual
providers and prospective individual providers, except in cases where,
after the department has sought approval of any appropriate amendments
or waivers under RCW 74.09.740, federal law or regulation requires that
such qualifications and standards for accountability be established by
another entity in order to preserve eligibility for federal funding.
Qualifications established must include compliance with the minimum
requirements for training and satisfactory criminal background checks
as provided in RCW 74.39A.050 and confirmation that the individual
provider or prospective individual provider is not currently listed on
any long-term care abuse and neglect registry used by the department at
the time of the investigation;
(b) Undertake, to the extent that funds are provided by the
legislature, recruiting activities to identify and recruit individual
providers and prospective individual providers;
(c) Provide training opportunities, either directly or through
contract, for individual providers, prospective individual providers,
consumers, and prospective consumers;
(d) Provide, to the extent that funds are provided by the
legislature, assistance to consumers and prospective consumers in
finding individual providers and prospective individual providers
through the establishment of a referral registry of individual
providers and prospective individual providers. Before placing an
individual provider or prospective individual provider on the referral
registry, the ((authority)) department shall determine that:
(i) The individual provider or prospective individual provider has
met the minimum requirements for training set forth in RCW 74.39A.050;
(ii) The individual provider or prospective individual provider has
satisfactorily undergone a criminal background check conducted within
the prior twelve months; and
(iii) The individual provider or prospective individual provider is
not listed on any long-term care abuse and neglect registry used by the
department;
(e) Remove from the referral registry any individual provider or
prospective individual provider the ((authority)) department determines
not to meet the qualifications set forth in (d) of this subsection or
to have committed misfeasance or malfeasance in the performance of his
or her duties as an individual provider. The individual provider or
prospective individual provider, or the consumer to which the
individual provider is providing services, may request a fair hearing
to contest the removal from the referral registry, as provided in
chapter 34.05 RCW;
(f) Provide routine, emergency, and respite referrals of individual
providers and prospective individual providers to consumers and
prospective consumers who are authorized to receive long-term in-home
care services through an individual provider; and
(g) Give preference in the recruiting, training, referral, and
employment of individual providers and prospective individual providers
to recipients of public assistance or other low-income persons who
would qualify for public assistance in the absence of such
employment((; and
(h) Cooperate with the department, area agencies on aging, and
other federal, state, and local agencies to provide the services
described and set forth in this section. If, in the course of carrying
out its duties, the authority identifies concerns regarding the
services being provided by an individual provider, the authority must
notify the relevant area agency or department case manager regarding
such concerns)).
(2) In determining how best to carry out its duties, the
((authority)) department must identify existing individual provider
recruitment, training, and referral resources made available to
consumers by other state and local public, private, and nonprofit
agencies. The ((authority)) department may coordinate with the
agencies to provide a local presence for ((the authority)) home care
quality services and to provide consumers greater access to individual
provider recruitment, training, and referral resources in a cost-effective manner. Using requests for proposals or similar processes,
the ((authority)) department may contract with the agencies to provide
recruitment, training, and referral services if the ((authority))
department determines the agencies can provide the services according
to reasonable standards of performance determined by the ((authority))
department. The ((authority)) department must provide an opportunity
for consumer participation in the determination of the standards.

Sec. 5 RCW 74.39A.270 and 2004 c 3 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Solely for the purposes of collective bargaining and as
expressly limited under subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the
governor is the public employer, as defined in chapter 41.56 RCW, of
individual providers, who, solely for the purposes of collective
bargaining, are public employees as defined in chapter 41.56 RCW. To
accommodate the role of the state as payor for the community-based
services provided under this chapter and to ensure coordination with
state employee collective bargaining under chapter 41.80 RCW and the
coordination necessary to implement RCW 74.39A.300, the public employer
shall be represented for bargaining purposes by the governor or the
governor's designee appointed under chapter 41.80 RCW. The governor or
governor's designee shall periodically consult with the ((authority))
home care quality council during the collective bargaining process to
allow the ((authority)) home care quality council to communicate issues
relating to the long-term in-home care services received by consumers.
(2) Chapter 41.56 RCW governs the collective bargaining
relationship between the governor and individual providers, except as
otherwise expressly provided in this chapter and except as follows:
(a) The only unit appropriate for the purpose of collective
bargaining under RCW 41.56.060 is a statewide unit of all individual
providers;
(b) The showing of interest required to request an election under
RCW 41.56.060 is ten percent of the unit, and any intervener seeking to
appear on the ballot must make the same showing of interest;
(c) The mediation and interest arbitration provisions of RCW
41.56.430 through 41.56.470 and 41.56.480 apply, except that:
(i) With respect to commencement of negotiations between the
governor and the bargaining representative of individual providers,
negotiations shall be commenced by May 1st of any year prior to the
year in which an existing collective bargaining agreement expires;
(ii) With respect to factors to be taken into consideration by an
interest arbitration panel, the panel shall consider the financial
ability of the state to pay for the compensation and fringe benefit
provisions of a collective bargaining agreement; and
(iii) The decision of the arbitration panel is not binding on the
legislature and, if the legislature does not approve the request for
funds necessary to implement the compensation and fringe benefit
provisions of the arbitrated collective bargaining agreement, is not
binding on the ((authority or the)) state;
(d) Individual providers do not have the right to strike; and
(e) Individual providers who are related to, or family members of,
consumers or prospective consumers are not, for that reason, exempt
from this chapter or chapter 41.56 RCW.
(3) Individual providers who are public employees solely for the
purposes of collective bargaining under subsection (1) of this section
are not, for that reason, employees of the state, its political
subdivisions, or an area agency on aging for any purpose. Chapter
41.56 RCW applies only to the governance of the collective bargaining
relationship between the employer and individual providers as provided
in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(4) Consumers and prospective consumers retain the right to select,
hire, supervise the work of, and terminate any individual provider
providing services to them. Consumers may elect to receive long-term
in-home care services from individual providers who are not referred to
them by the ((authority)) department.
(5) ((In implementing and administering this chapter, neither the
authority nor any of its contractors may reduce or increase the hours
of service for any consumer below or above the amount determined to be
necessary under any assessment prepared by the department or an area
agency on aging.
(6))) Except as expressly limited in this section and RCW
74.39A.300, the wages, hours, and working conditions of individual
providers are determined solely through collective bargaining as
provided in this chapter. No agency or department of the state((,
other than the authority,)) may establish policies or rules governing
the wages or hours of individual providers except as necessary to
implement a collective bargaining agreement. However, this subsection
does not modify:
(a) The department's authority to establish a plan of care for each
consumer and to determine the hours of care that each consumer is
eligible to receive;
(b) The department's authority to terminate its contracts with
individual providers who are not adequately meeting the needs of a
particular consumer, or to deny a contract under RCW 74.39A.095(8);
(c) The consumer's right to assign hours to one or more individual
providers selected by the consumer within the maximum hours determined
by his or her plan of care;
(d) The consumer's right to select, hire, terminate, supervise the
work of, and determine the conditions of employment for each individual
provider providing services to the consumer under this chapter;
(e) The department's obligation to comply with the federal medicaid
statute and regulations and the terms of any community-based waiver
granted by the federal department of health and human services and to
ensure federal financial participation in the provision of the
services; and
(f) The legislature's right to make programmatic modifications to
the delivery of state services under this title, including standards of
eligibility of consumers and individual providers participating in the
programs under this title, and the nature of services provided. The
governor shall not enter into, extend, or renew any agreement under
this chapter that does not expressly reserve the legislative rights
described in this subsection (((6))) (5)(f).
(((7)(a))) (6) The state, the department, ((the authority,)) the
area agencies on aging, or their contractors under this chapter may not
be held vicariously or jointly liable for the action or inaction of any
individual provider or prospective individual provider, whether or not
that individual provider or prospective individual provider was
included on the ((authority's)) department's referral registry or
referred to a consumer or prospective consumer. The existence of a
collective bargaining agreement, the placement of an individual
provider on the referral registry, or the development or approval of a
plan of care for a consumer who chooses to use the services of an
individual provider and the provision of case management services to
that consumer, by the department or an area agency on aging, does not
constitute a special relationship with the consumer.
(((b) The members of the board are immune from any liability
resulting from implementation of this chapter.
(8))) (7) Nothing in this section affects the state's
responsibility with respect to unemployment insurance for individual
providers. However, individual providers are not to be considered, as
a result of the state assuming this responsibility, employees of the
state.

Sec. 6 RCW 74.39A.290 and 2002 c 3 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The joint legislative audit and review committee will conduct
a performance review of the ((authority)) department's progress in
implementing the goals of chapter 3, Laws of 2002 every two years and
submit the review to the legislature and the governor. The first
review will be submitted before December 1, 2006.
(2) The performance review will include an evaluation of the
health, welfare, and satisfaction with services provided of the
consumers receiving long-term in-home care services from individual
providers under chapter 3, Laws of 2002, including the degree to which
all required services have been delivered, the degree to which
consumers receiving services from individual providers have ultimately
required additional or more intensive services, such as home health
care, or have been placed in other residential settings or nursing
homes, the promptness of response to consumer complaints, and any other
issue the committee deems relevant.
(3) The performance review will provide an explanation of the full
cost of individual provider services, including the administrative
costs of the ((authority)) department, unemployment compensation,
social security and medicare payroll taxes paid by the department, and
area agency on aging home care oversight costs.
(4) The performance review will make recommendations to the
legislature and the governor for any amendments to chapter 3, Laws of
2002 that will further ensure the well-being of consumers and
prospective consumers under chapter 3, Laws of 2002, and the most
efficient means of delivering required services. ((In addition, the
first performance review will include findings and recommendations
regarding the appropriateness of the authority's assumption of
responsibility for verification of hours worked by individual
providers, payment of individual providers, and other duties.))

Sec. 7 RCW 41.56.030 and 2004 c 3 s 6 are each amended to read as
follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Public employer" means any officer, board, commission,
council, or other person or body acting on behalf of any public body
governed by this chapter, or any subdivision of such public body. For
the purposes of this section, the public employer of district court or
superior court employees for wage-related matters is the respective
county legislative authority, or person or body acting on behalf of the
legislative authority, and the public employer for nonwage-related
matters is the judge or judge's designee of the respective district
court or superior court.
(2) "Public employee" means any employee of a public employer
except any person (a) elected by popular vote, or (b) appointed to
office pursuant to statute, ordinance or resolution for a specified
term of office as a member of a multimember board, commission, or
committee, whether appointed by the executive head or body of the
public employer, or (c) whose duties as deputy, administrative
assistant or secretary necessarily imply a confidential relationship to
(i) the executive head or body of the applicable bargaining unit, or
(ii) any person elected by popular vote, or (iii) any person appointed
to office pursuant to statute, ordinance or resolution for a specified
term of office as a member of a multimember board, commission, or
committee, whether appointed by the executive head or body of the
public employer, or (d) who is a court commissioner or a court
magistrate of superior court, district court, or a department of a
district court organized under chapter 3.46 RCW, or (e) who is a
personal assistant to a district court judge, superior court judge, or
court commissioner, or (f) excluded from a bargaining unit under RCW
41.56.201(2)(a). For the purpose of (e) of this subsection, no more
than one assistant for each judge or commissioner may be excluded from
a bargaining unit.
(3) "Bargaining representative" means any lawful organization which
has as one of its primary purposes the representation of employees in
their employment relations with employers.
(4) "Collective bargaining" means the performance of the mutual
obligations of the public employer and the exclusive bargaining
representative to meet at reasonable times, to confer and negotiate in
good faith, and to execute a written agreement with respect to
grievance procedures and collective negotiations on personnel matters,
including wages, hours and working conditions, which may be peculiar to
an appropriate bargaining unit of such public employer, except that by
such obligation neither party shall be compelled to agree to a proposal
or be required to make a concession unless otherwise provided in this
chapter.
(5) "Commission" means the public employment relations commission.
(6) "Executive director" means the executive director of the
commission.
(7) "Uniformed personnel" means: (a) Law enforcement officers as
defined in RCW 41.26.030 employed by the governing body of any city or
town with a population of two thousand five hundred or more and law
enforcement officers employed by the governing body of any county with
a population of ten thousand or more; (b) correctional employees who
are uniformed and nonuniformed, commissioned and noncommissioned
security personnel employed in a jail as defined in RCW 70.48.020(5),
by a county with a population of seventy thousand or more, and who are
trained for and charged with the responsibility of controlling and
maintaining custody of inmates in the jail and safeguarding inmates
from other inmates; (c) general authority Washington peace officers as
defined in RCW 10.93.020 employed by a port district in a county with
a population of one million or more; (d) security forces established
under RCW 43.52.520; (e) fire fighters as that term is defined in RCW
41.26.030; (f) employees of a port district in a county with a
population of one million or more whose duties include crash fire
rescue or other fire fighting duties; (g) employees of fire departments
of public employers who dispatch exclusively either fire or emergency
medical services, or both; or (h) employees in the several classes of
advanced life support technicians, as defined in RCW 18.71.200, who are
employed by a public employer.
(8) "Institution of higher education" means the University of
Washington, Washington State University, Central Washington University,
Eastern Washington University, Western Washington University, The
Evergreen State College, and the various state community colleges.
(9) (("Home care quality authority" means the authority under
chapter 74.39A RCW.
(10))) "Individual provider" means an individual provider as
defined in RCW 74.39A.240(((4))) (3) who, solely for the purposes of
collective bargaining, is a public employee as provided in RCW
74.39A.270.

Sec. 8 RCW 74.39A.095 and 2004 c 141 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In carrying out case management responsibilities established
under RCW 74.39A.090 for consumers who are receiving services under the
medicaid personal care, community options programs entry system or
chore services program through an individual provider, each area agency
on aging shall provide oversight of the care being provided to
consumers receiving services under this section to the extent of
available funding. Case management responsibilities incorporate this
oversight, and include, but are not limited to:
(a) Verification that ((any)) the individual provider ((who has not
been referred to a consumer by the authority established under chapter
3, Laws of 2002)) has met any training requirements established by the
department;
(b) Verification of a sample of worker time sheets;
(c) Monitoring the consumer's plan of care to verify that it
adequately meets the needs of the consumer, through activities such as
home visits, telephone contacts, and responses to information received
by the area agency on aging indicating that a consumer may be
experiencing problems relating to his or her home care;
(d) Reassessment and reauthorization of services;
(e) Monitoring of individual provider performance((. If, in the
course of its case management activities, the area agency on aging
identifies concerns regarding the care being provided by an individual
provider who was referred by the authority, the area agency on aging
must notify the authority regarding its concerns)); and
(f) Conducting criminal background checks or verifying that
criminal background checks have been conducted ((for any individual
provider who has not been referred to a consumer by the authority)).
(2) The area agency on aging case manager shall work with each
consumer to develop a plan of care under this section that identifies
and ensures coordination of health and long-term care services that
meet the consumer's needs. In developing the plan, they shall utilize,
and modify as needed, any comprehensive community service plan
developed by the department as provided in RCW 74.39A.040. The plan of
care shall include, at a minimum:
(a) The name and telephone number of the consumer's area agency on
aging case manager, and a statement as to how the case manager can be
contacted about any concerns related to the consumer's well-being or
the adequacy of care provided;
(b) The name and telephone numbers of the consumer's primary health
care provider, and other health or long-term care providers with whom
the consumer has frequent contacts;
(c) A clear description of the roles and responsibilities of the
area agency on aging case manager and the consumer receiving services
under this section;
(d) The duties and tasks to be performed by the area agency on
aging case manager and the consumer receiving services under this
section;
(e) The type of in-home services authorized, and the number of
hours of services to be provided;
(f) The terms of compensation of the individual provider;
(g) A statement by the individual provider that he or she has the
ability and willingness to carry out his or her responsibilities
relative to the plan of care; and
(h)(i) Except as provided in (h)(ii) of this subsection, a clear
statement indicating that a consumer receiving services under this
section has the right to waive any of the case management services
offered by the area agency on aging under this section, and a clear
indication of whether the consumer has, in fact, waived any of these
services.
(ii) The consumer's right to waive case management services does
not include the right to waive reassessment or reauthorization of
services, or verification that services are being provided in
accordance with the plan of care.
(3) Each area agency on aging shall retain a record of each waiver
of services included in a plan of care under this section.
(4) Each consumer has the right to direct and participate in the
development of their plan of care to the maximum practicable extent of
their abilities and desires, and to be provided with the time and
support necessary to facilitate that participation.
(5) A copy of the plan of care must be distributed to the
consumer's primary care provider, individual provider, and other
relevant providers with whom the consumer has frequent contact, as
authorized by the consumer.
(6) The consumer's plan of care shall be an attachment to the
contract between the department, or their designee, and the individual
provider.
(7) If the department or area agency on aging case manager finds
that an individual provider's inadequate performance or inability to
deliver quality care is jeopardizing the health, safety, or well-being
of a consumer receiving service under this section, the department or
the area agency on aging may take action to terminate the contract
between the department and the individual provider. If the department
or the area agency on aging has a reasonable, good faith belief that
the health, safety, or well-being of a consumer is in imminent
jeopardy, the department or area agency on aging may summarily suspend
the contract pending a fair hearing. The consumer may request a fair
hearing to contest the planned action of the case manager, as provided
in chapter 34.05 RCW. ((When the department or area agency on aging
terminates or summarily suspends a contract under this subsection, it
must provide oral and written notice of the action taken to the
authority.)) The department may by rule adopt guidelines for
implementing this subsection.
(8) The department or area agency on aging may reject a request by
a consumer receiving services under this section to have a family
member or other person serve as his or her individual provider if the
case manager has a reasonable, good faith belief that the family member
or other person will be unable to appropriately meet the care needs of
the consumer. The consumer may request a fair hearing to contest the
decision of the case manager, as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW. The
department may by rule adopt guidelines for implementing this
subsection.

Sec. 9 RCW 74.39A.300 and 2004 c 3 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon meeting the requirements of subsection (2) of this
section, the governor must submit, as a part of the proposed biennial
or supplemental operating budget submitted to the legislature under RCW
43.88.030, a request for funds necessary to administer chapter 3, Laws
of 2002 and to implement the compensation and fringe benefits
provisions of a collective bargaining agreement entered into under RCW
74.39A.270 or for legislation necessary to implement such agreement.
(2) A request for funds necessary to implement the compensation and
fringe benefits provisions of a collective bargaining agreement entered
into under RCW 74.39A.270 shall not be submitted by the governor to the
legislature unless such request:
(a) Has been submitted to the director of financial management by
October 1st prior to the legislative session at which the request is to
be considered; and
(b) Has been certified by the director of financial management as
being feasible financially for the state or reflects the binding
decision of an arbitration panel reached under RCW 74.39A.270(2)(c).
(3) The legislature must approve or reject the submission of the
request for funds as a whole. If the legislature rejects or fails to
act on the submission, any such agreement will be reopened solely for
the purpose of renegotiating the funds necessary to implement the
agreement.
(4) When any increase in individual provider wages or benefits is
negotiated or agreed to, no increase in wages or benefits negotiated or
agreed to under this chapter will take effect unless and until, before
its implementation, the department has determined that the increase is
consistent with federal law and federal financial participation in the
provision of services under Title XIX of the federal social security
act.
(5) The governor shall periodically consult with the joint
committee on employment relations established by RCW 41.80.010
regarding appropriations necessary to implement the compensation and
fringe benefits provisions of any collective bargaining agreement and,
upon completion of negotiations, advise the committee on the elements
of the agreement and on any legislation necessary to implement such
agreement.
(6) After the expiration date of any collective bargaining
agreement entered into under RCW 74.39A.270, all of the terms and
conditions specified in any such agreement remain in effect until the
effective date of a subsequent agreement, not to exceed one year from
the expiration date stated in the agreement, except as provided in RCW
74.39A.270(((6))) (5)(f).
(7) If, after the compensation and benefit provisions of an
agreement are approved by the legislature, a significant revenue
shortfall occurs resulting in reduced appropriations, as declared by
proclamation of the governor or by resolution of the legislature, both
parties shall immediately enter into collective bargaining for a
mutually agreed upon modification of the agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 74.39A.260 (Department duties) and 2002 c 3 s 5;
(2) RCW 74.39A.280 (Powers) and 2002 c 3 s 7; and
(3) RCW 70.127.041 (Home care quality authority not subject to
regulation) and 2002 c 3 s 13.

--- END ---