BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) The majority of foster youth fail to thrive in our educational
system and, relative to nonfoster youth, disproportionately few enroll
in college or other postsecondary training programs. As a result,
former foster youth generally have poor employment and life
satisfaction outcomes; and
(b) Low expectations, lack of information, fragmented support
services, and financial hardship are the most frequently cited reasons
for failure of foster youth to pursue postsecondary education or
training. Initiatives have been undertaken at both the state and
community levels in Washington to improve outcomes for foster youth in
transition to independence; however, these initiatives are often not
coordinated to complement one another.
(2) The legislature intends to encourage and support foster youth
to pursue postsecondary education or training opportunities. A
coordination committee that provides statewide planning and oversight
of related efforts will improve the effectiveness of both current and
future initiatives to improve postsecondary educational outcomes for
foster youth. In addition, the state can provide financial support to
former foster youth pursuing higher education or training by setting
aside portions of the state need grant and the state work study
programs specifically for foster youth.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.13.570 and 2003 c 112 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall establish an oversight committee composed
of staff from the children's administration of the department, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, the higher
education coordinating board, foster youth, former foster youth, foster
parents, and advocacy agencies to develop strategies for maintaining
foster children in the schools they were attending at the time they
entered foster care and to promote opportunities for foster youth to
participate in postsecondary education or training.
(2) The duties of the oversight committee shall include, but are
not limited to:
(a) Developing strategies for school-based recruitment of foster
homes;
(b) Monitoring the progress of current pilot projects that assist
foster children to continue attending the schools they were attending
at the time they entered foster care;
(c) Overseeing the expansion of the number of pilot projects;
(d) Promoting the use of best practices, throughout the state,
demonstrated by the pilot projects and other programs relating to
maintaining foster children in the schools they were attending at the
time they entered foster care; ((and))
(e) Informing the legislature of the status of efforts to maintain
foster children in the schools they were attending at the time they
entered foster care;
(f) Assessing the scope and nature of statewide need among current
and former foster youth for assistance to pursue and participate in
postsecondary education or training opportunities;
(g) Identifying available sources of funding available in the state
for services to former foster youth to pursue and participate in
postsecondary education or training opportunities;
(h) Reviewing the effectiveness of activities in the state to
support former foster youth to pursue and participate in postsecondary
education or training opportunities;
(i) Identifying new activities, or existing activities that should
be modified or expanded, to best meet statewide needs; and
(j) Reviewing on an ongoing basis the progress toward improving
educational and vocational outcomes for foster youth.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.92.060 and 2004 c 275 s 37 are each amended to
read as follows:
In awarding need grants, the board shall proceed substantially as
follows: PROVIDED, That nothing contained herein shall be construed to
prevent the board, in the exercise of its sound discretion, from
following another procedure when the best interest of the program so
dictates:
(1) The board shall annually select the financial aid award
recipients from among Washington residents applying for student
financial aid who have been ranked according to:
(a) Financial need as determined by the amount of the family
contribution; and
(b) Other considerations ((brought to the board's attention)), such
as whether the student is a former foster youth.
(2) The financial need of the highest ranked students shall be met
by grants depending upon the evaluation of financial need until the
total allocation has been disbursed. Funds from grants which are
declined, forfeited or otherwise unused shall be reawarded until
((dispersed)) disbursed, except that eligible former foster youth shall
be assured receipt of a grant.
(3) A student shall be eligible to receive a state need grant for
up to five years, or the credit or clock hour equivalent of five years,
or up to one hundred twenty-five percent of the published length of
time of the student's program. A student may not start a new associate
degree program as a state need grant recipient until at least five
years have elapsed since earning an associate degree as a need grant
recipient, except that a student may earn two associate degrees
concurrently. Qualifications for renewal will include maintaining
satisfactory academic progress toward completion of an eligible program
as determined by the board. Should the recipient terminate his or her
enrollment for any reason during the academic year, the unused portion
of the grant shall be returned to the state educational grant fund by
the institution according to the institution's own policy for issuing
refunds, except as provided in RCW 28B.92.070.
(4) In computing financial need, the board shall determine a
maximum student expense budget allowance, not to exceed an amount equal
to the total maximum student expense budget at the public institutions
plus the current average state appropriation per student for operating
expense in the public institutions.
(5) As used in this section, "former foster youth" means a person
who is at least eighteen years of age, but not more than twenty-four
years of age, who was a dependent of the department of social and
health services at the time he or she attained the age of eighteen.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.12.060 and 2002 c 354 s 224 are each amended to
read as follows:
The higher education coordinating board shall adopt rules as may be
necessary or appropriate for effecting the provisions of this chapter,
and not in conflict with this chapter, in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, the state higher education
administrative procedure act. Such rules shall include provisions
designed to make employment under the work-study program reasonably
available, to the extent of available funds, to all eligible students
in eligible post-secondary institutions in need thereof. The rules
shall include:
(1) Providing work under the state work-study program that will not
result in the displacement of employed workers or impair existing
contracts for services;
(2) Furnishing work only to a student who:
(a) Is capable, in the opinion of the eligible institution, of
maintaining good standing in such course of study while employed under
the program covered by the agreement; and
(b) Has been accepted for enrollment as at least a half-time
student at the eligible institution or, in the case of a student
already enrolled in and attending the eligible institution, is in good
standing and in at least half-time attendance there either as an
undergraduate, graduate or professional student; and
(c) Is not pursuing a degree in theology;
(3) Placing priority on providing:
(a) Work opportunities for students who are residents of the state
of Washington as defined in RCW 28B.15.012 and 28B.15.013, particularly
former foster youth as defined in RCW 28B.92.060, except resident
students defined in RCW 28B.15.012(2)(((f))) (g);
(b) Job placements in fields related to each student's academic or
vocational pursuits, with an emphasis on off-campus job placements
whenever appropriate; and
(c) Off-campus community service placements;
(4) Provisions to assure that in the state institutions of higher
education, utilization of this work-study program:
(a) Shall only supplement and not supplant classified positions
under jurisdiction of chapter 41.06 RCW;
(b) That all positions established which are comparable shall be
identified to a job classification under the director of personnel's
classification plan and shall receive equal compensation;
(c) Shall not take place in any manner that would replace
classified positions reduced due to lack of funds or work; and
(d) That work study positions shall only be established at entry
level positions of the classified service unless the overall scope and
responsibilities of the position indicate a higher level; and
(5) Provisions to encourage job placements in occupations that meet
Washington's economic development goals, especially those in
international trade and international relations. The board shall
permit appropriate job placements in other states and other countries.

--- END ---