BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.42.010 and 1997 c 392 s 508 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Basic necessities of life" means food, water, shelter,
clothing, and medically necessary health care, including but not
limited to health-related treatment or activities, hygiene, oxygen, and
medication.
(2)(a) "Bodily injury" means physical pain or injury, illness, or
an impairment of physical condition;
(b) "Substantial bodily harm" means bodily injury which involves a
temporary but substantial disfigurement, or which causes a temporary
but substantial loss or impairment of the function of any bodily part
or organ, or which causes a fracture of any bodily part;
(c) "Great bodily harm" means bodily injury which creates a high
probability of death, or which causes serious permanent disfigurement,
or which causes a permanent or protracted loss or impairment of the
function of any bodily part or organ.
(3) "Child" means a person under eighteen years of age.
(4) "Dependent person" means a person who, because of physical or
mental disability, or because of extreme advanced age, is dependent
upon another person to provide the basic necessities of life. A
resident of a nursing home, as defined in RCW 18.51.010, a resident of
an adult family home, as defined in RCW 70.128.010, and a frail elder
or vulnerable adult, as defined in RCW 74.34.020(((8))) (13), is
presumed to be a dependent person for purposes of this chapter.
(5) "Employed" means hired by a dependent person, another person
acting on behalf of a dependent person, or by an organization or
governmental entity, to provide to a dependent person any of the basic
necessities of life. A person may be "employed" regardless of whether
the person is paid for the services or, if paid, regardless of who pays
for the person's services.
(6) "Parent" has its ordinary meaning and also includes a guardian
and the authorized agent of a parent or guardian.
(7) "Abandons" means leaving a child or other dependent person
without the means or ability to obtain one or more of the basic
necessities of life.
(8) "Good samaritan" means any individual or group of individuals
who: (a) Is not related to the dependent person; (b) voluntarily
provides assistance or services of any type to the dependent person;
(c) is not paid, given gifts, or made a beneficiary of any assets
valued at five hundred dollars or more, for any reason, by the
dependent person, the dependent person's family, or the dependent
person's estate; and (d) does not commit or attempt to commit any other
crime against the dependent person or the dependent person's estate.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.42.020 and 1997 c 392 s 510 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A parent of a child, the person entrusted with the physical
custody of a child or dependent person, a person who has assumed the
responsibility to provide to a dependent person the basic necessities
of life, or a person employed to provide to the child or dependent
person the basic necessities of life is guilty of criminal mistreatment
in the first degree if he or she recklessly, as defined in RCW
9A.08.010, causes great bodily harm to a child or dependent person by
withholding any of the basic necessities of life.
(2) Criminal mistreatment in the first degree is a class B felony.

Sec. 3 RCW 9A.42.030 and 1997 c 392 s 511 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A parent of a child, the person entrusted with the physical
custody of a child or dependent person, a person who has assumed the
responsibility to provide to a dependent person the basic necessities
of life, or a person employed to provide to the child or dependent
person the basic necessities of life is guilty of criminal mistreatment
in the second degree if he or she recklessly, as defined in RCW
9A.08.010, either (a) creates an imminent and substantial risk of death
or great bodily harm, or (b) causes substantial bodily harm by
withholding any of the basic necessities of life.
(2) Criminal mistreatment in the second degree is a class C felony.

Sec. 4 RCW 9A.42.035 and 2000 c 76 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of the crime of criminal mistreatment in the
third degree if the person is the parent of a child, is a person
entrusted with the physical custody of a child or other dependent
person, is a person who has assumed the responsibility to provide to a
dependent person the basic necessities of life, or is a person employed
to provide to the child or dependent person the basic necessities of
life, and either:
(a) With criminal negligence, creates an imminent and substantial
risk of substantial bodily harm to a child or dependent person by
withholding any of the basic necessities of life; or
(b) With criminal negligence, causes substantial bodily harm to a
child or dependent person by withholding any of the basic necessities
of life.
(2) For purposes of this section, "a person who has assumed the
responsibility to provide to a dependent person the basic necessities
of life" means a person other than: (a) A government agency that
regularly provides assistance or services to dependent persons,
including but not limited to the department of social and health
services; or (b) a good samaritan as defined in RCW 9A.42.010.
(3) Criminal mistreatment in the third degree is a gross
misdemeanor.

Sec. 5 RCW 9A.42.037 and 2002 c 219 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of the crime of criminal mistreatment in the
fourth degree if the person is the parent of a child, is a person
entrusted with the physical custody of a child or other dependent
person, is a person who has assumed the responsibility to provide to a
dependent person the basic necessities of life, or is a person employed
to provide to the child or dependent person the basic necessities of
life, and either:
(a) With criminal negligence, creates an imminent and substantial
risk of bodily injury to a child or dependent person by withholding any
of the basic necessities of life; or
(b) With criminal negligence, causes bodily injury or extreme
emotional distress manifested by more than transient physical symptoms
to a child or dependent person by withholding the basic necessities of
life.
(2) For purposes of this section, "a person who has assumed the
responsibility to provide to a dependent person the basic necessities
of life" means a person other than: (a) A government agency that
regularly provides assistance or services to dependent persons,
including but not limited to the department of social and health
services; or (b) a good samaritan as defined in RCW 9A.42.010.
(3) Criminal mistreatment in the fourth degree is a misdemeanor.

Sec. 6 RCW 9A.42.060 and 2002 c 331 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a person
is guilty of the crime of abandonment of a dependent person in the
first degree if:
(a) The person is the parent of a child, a person entrusted with
the physical custody of a child or other dependent person, a person who
has assumed the responsibility to provide to a dependent person the
basic necessities of life, or a person employed to provide to the child
or other dependent person any of the basic necessities of life;
(b) The person recklessly abandons the child or other dependent
person; and
(c) As a result of being abandoned, the child or other dependent
person suffers great bodily harm.
(2) A parent of a newborn who transfers the newborn to a qualified
person at an appropriate location pursuant to RCW 13.34.360 is not
subject to criminal liability under this section.
(3) Abandonment of a dependent person in the first degree is a
class B felony.

Sec. 7 RCW 9A.42.070 and 2002 c 331 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a person
is guilty of the crime of abandonment of a dependent person in the
second degree if:
(a) The person is the parent of a child, a person entrusted with
the physical custody of a child or other dependent person, a person who
has assumed the responsibility to provide to a dependent person the
basic necessities of life, or a person employed to provide to the child
or other dependent person any of the basic necessities of life; and
(b) The person recklessly abandons the child or other dependent
person; and:
(i) As a result of being abandoned, the child or other dependent
person suffers substantial bodily harm; or
(ii) Abandoning the child or other dependent person creates an
imminent and substantial risk that the child or other dependent person
will die or suffer great bodily harm.
(2) A parent of a newborn who transfers the newborn to a qualified
person at an appropriate location pursuant to RCW 13.34.360 is not
subject to criminal liability under this section.
(3) Abandonment of a dependent person in the second degree is a
class C felony.

Sec. 8 RCW 9A.42.080 and 2002 c 331 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a person
is guilty of the crime of abandonment of a dependent person in the
third degree if:
(a) The person is the parent of a child, a person entrusted with
the physical custody of a child or other dependent person, a person who
has assumed the responsibility to provide to a dependent person the
basic necessities of life, or a person employed to provide to the child
or dependent person any of the basic necessities of life; and
(b) The person recklessly abandons the child or other dependent
person; and:
(i) As a result of being abandoned, the child or other dependent
person suffers bodily harm; or
(ii) Abandoning the child or other dependent person creates an
imminent and substantial risk that the child or other person will
suffer substantial bodily harm.
(2) A parent of a newborn who transfers the newborn to a qualified
person at an appropriate location pursuant to RCW 13.34.360 is not
subject to criminal liability under this section.
(3) Abandonment of a dependent person in the third degree is a
gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 9 RCW 9.94A.515 and 2004 c 176 s 2 and 2004 c 94 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN
EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVI Aggravated Murder 1 (RCW
10.95.020)

XV Homicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW
70.74.280(1))

Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIV Murder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

Trafficking 1 (RCW 9A.40.100(1))

XIII Malicious explosion 2 (RCW
70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1
(RCW 70.74.270(1))

XII Assault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

Trafficking 2 (RCW 9A.40.100(2))

XI Manslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

X Child Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Indecent Liberties (with forcible
compulsion) (RCW
9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW
70.74.280(3))

Sexually Violent Predator Escape
(RCW 9A.76.115)

IX Abandonment of Dependent Person 1
(RCW 9A.42.060)

Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW
9A.42.020)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW
70.74.180)

Hit and Run--Death (RCW
46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide by Watercraft, by being
under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW
79A.60.050)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious placement of an explosive 2
(RCW 70.74.270(2))

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular Homicide, by being under
the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.520)

VIII Arson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Homicide by Watercraft, by the
operation of any vessel in a
reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW
9A.88.070)

Theft of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation
of any vehicle in a reckless
manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VII Burglary 1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Civil Disorder Training (RCW
9A.48.120)

Dealing in depictions of minor
engaged in sexually explicit
conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide by Watercraft, by disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
79A.60.050)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible
compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(b) and (c))

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW
9A.76.140)

Malicious placement of an explosive 3
(RCW 70.74.270(3))

Sending, bringing into state depictions
of minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct (RCW
9.68A.060)

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in
the first degree (RCW
9.41.040(1))

Use of a Machine Gun in Commission
of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for
the safety of others (RCW
46.61.520)

VI Bail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW
9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW
9A.72.160)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW
9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful Storage of Ammonia (RCW
69.55.020)

V ((Abandonment of dependent person 1
(RCW 9A.42.060)))

Abandonment of Dependent Person 2
(RCW 9A.42.070)

Advancing money or property for
extortionate extension of credit
(RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail Jumping with class A Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

((Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW
9A.42.020)))

Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW
9A.42.030)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW
9A.44.160)

Domestic Violence Court Order
Violation (RCW 10.99.040,
10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070,
or 74.34.145)

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate Extension of Credit
(RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect
Extensions of Credit (RCW
9A.82.040)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW
9.94.070)

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW
9A.56.310)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1
(RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1
(RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually Violating Human Remains
(RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070)

IV Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault by Watercraft (RCW
79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by
Witness (RCW 9A.72.090,
9A.72.100)

Cheating 1 (RCW 9.46.1961)

Commercial Bribery (RCW
9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))

Endangerment with a Controlled
Substance (RCW 9A.42.100)

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit and Run -- Injury (RCW
46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit and Run with Vessel -- Injury
Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under
Age Fourteen (subsequent sex
offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting
Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Malicious Harassment (RCW
9A.36.080)

Residential Burglary (RCW
9A.52.025)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Trafficking in Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.82.050)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(b))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health care service
contractor (RCW 48.44.016(3))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health maintenance
organization (RCW 48.46.033(3))

Unlawful transaction of insurance
business (RCW 48.15.023(3))

Unlicensed practice as an insurance
professional (RCW 48.17.063(3))

Use of Proceeds of Criminal
Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1)
and (2))

Vehicular Assault, by being under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, or by the operation or
driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from
Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

III ((Abandonment of dependent person 2
(RCW 9A.42.070)))

Assault 3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication with a Minor for
Immoral Purposes (RCW
9.68A.090)

Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW
9A.46.120)

((Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW
9A.42.030)))

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Cyberstalking (subsequent conviction
or threat of death) (RCW
9.61.260(3))

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW
9A.76.180)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW
9A.76.150)

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property
(RCW 81.60.070)

Patronizing a Juvenile Prostitute
(RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW
9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW
9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW
9A.88.080)

Securities Act violation (RCW
21.20.400)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW
9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent
conviction or threat of death)
(RCW 9.61.230(2))

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.083)

Trafficking in Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.82.055)

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW
9A.40.040)

Unlawful possession of firearm in the
second degree (RCW 9.41.040(2))

Vehicular Assault, by the operation or
driving of a vehicle with disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from Work
Release (RCW 72.65.070)

II Computer Trespass 1 (RCW
9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(3))

Escape from Community Custody
(RCW 72.09.310)

Health Care False Claims (RCW
48.80.030)

Identity Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(3))

Improperly Obtaining Financial
Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW
9A.48.070)

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.56.150)

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one
thousand five hundred dollars or
more) (RCW 9A.56.096(5)(a))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW
48.30A.015)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(a))

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW
2.48.180)

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or
Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

I Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police
Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False Verification for Welfare (RCW
74.08.055)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Fraudulent Creation or Revocation of a
Mental Health Advance Directive
(RCW 9A.60.060)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW
9A.48.080)

Mineral Trespass (RCW 78.44.330)

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 2 (RCW 9A.56.075)

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two
hundred fifty dollars or more but
less than one thousand five
hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(5)(b))

Transaction of insurance business
beyond the scope of licensure
(RCW 48.17.063(4))

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts
(RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful Possession of Fictitious
Identification (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Instruments of
Financial Fraud (RCW
9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of a Personal
Identification Device (RCW
9A.56.320)

Unlawful Production of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Trafficking in Food Stamps
(RCW 9.91.142)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW
9.91.144)

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---