BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The code reviser shall recodify, as
necessary, the following sections of chapter 71.34 RCW in the following
order, using the indicated subchapter headings:
General
71.34.010
71.34.020
71.34.140
71.34.032
71.34.250
71.34.280
71.34.260
71.34.240
71.34.230
71.34.210
71.34.200
71.34.225
71.34.220
71.34.160
71.34.190
71.34.170
71.34.290
71.34.056
71.34.800
71.34.805
71.34.810
71.34.015
71.34.027
71.34.130
71.34.270
Minor-Initiated Treatment
71.34.042
71.34.044
71.34.046
71.34.030
Parent-Initiated Treatment
71.34.052
71.34.025
71.34.162
71.34.164
71.34.035
71.34.054
Involuntary Commitment
71.34.040
71.34.050
71.34.060
71.34.070
71.34.080
71.34.090
71.34.100
71.34.120
71.34.110
71.34.150
71.34.180
Technical
71.34.900
71.34.901
(2) The code reviser shall correct all statutory references to
sections recodified by this section.

--- END ---