BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the hydraulic
project approval provides critical protections for fish and fish
habitat and is a key component of the state's approach to salmon
recovery. The legislature also finds that the hydraulic project
approval is the only state permit solely intended to protect fish life.
The legislature further finds that the hydraulic project approval
program needs to be redesigned to provide better customer service,
improved consistency, and enhanced compliance and effectiveness
monitoring. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to clarify
the department of fish and wildlife's authority under chapter 77.55
RCW, streamline the application process to provide consistency and
predictability for permit applicants, and ensure that those hydraulic
projects with the highest potential risk to fish and fish habitat
receive the highest priority.

--- END ---