BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(a) "Carbonated beverage," otherwise known as "soda pop," means any
packaged nonalcoholic liquid intended for human consumption that
contains carbon dioxide and syrup, whether carbonation is obtained by
natural or artificial means. "Packaged" includes cans, bottles, or
other similar containers.
(b) "Handling" or "handle" means having control of the carbonated
beverage within this state and includes both actual and constructive
handling of the beverage. "Actual handling" occurs when the person
with control has physical possession over the beverage. "Constructive
handling" occurs when the person with control does not have physical
possession over the beverage. "Control" means the power to sell
carbonated beverage or to authorize the sale by another.
(c) "Previously taxed carbonated beverage" means a carbonated
beverage in respect to which a tax has been paid under this chapter.
(d) "Retailer" means a person who makes sales at retail.
(e) "Syrup" means the concentrated mixture in either liquid or
powdered form that contains sugar or a sugar substitute and that is an
ingredient used to make carbonated beverages.
(f) "Wholesaler" means a person making sales at wholesale.
(2) The definitions in chapters 82.04, 82.08, and 82.12 RCW apply
to this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A tax is imposed on the privilege of
handling for sale a carbonated beverage in this state. The rate of the
tax shall be equal to forty-two one-hundredths cents per ounce.
Fractional amounts shall be taxed proportionately.
(2) Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the tax imposed in this chapter.
The tax due dates, reporting periods, and return requirements
applicable to chapter 82.04 RCW apply equally to the tax imposed in
this chapter.
(3)(a) It is the intent of the legislature that the tax be imposed
on the privilege of handling for sale carbonated beverages in this
state, to impose such tax on the first handling of the carbonated
beverage in this state, and to impose the tax only once. It is the
legislature's expectation that in most instances the imposition of tax
will be at the wholesale level.
(b) If tax under this chapter has not been paid with respect to a
carbonated beverage, the department may collect the tax from any other
person who handles the carbonated beverage. If tax is paid by any
person other than the person subject to tax under this chapter, the
amount of tax paid constitutes a debt owed by the person subject to tax
to the person who paid the tax.
(c) If the person who first handles for sale a carbonated beverage
is not subject to tax by the state, the tax is imposed on the first
person handling for sale the carbonated beverage who is subject to tax
by the state.
(d) In no instance may the tax be imposed upon a person who buys as
a consumer.
(4)(a) Every person who sells carbonated beverages to persons other
than the ultimate consumer shall provide with each sale an itemized
invoice showing the seller's name and address, the purchaser's name and
address, the date of sale, and shall separately state the amount of tax
paid on any carbonated beverages. The seller shall preserve legible
copies of all such invoices for five years from the date of sale.
(b) Every retailer shall procure itemized invoices of all
carbonated beverages purchased. The invoices shall show the name and
address of the seller, the date of purchase, and shall separately state
the amount of tax paid on any carbonated beverages. The retailer shall
preserve a legible copy of all such invoices for five years from the
date of purchase.
(c) Invoices shall be available for inspection by the department at
the wholesaler's or retailer's place of business.
(d) Notwithstanding (a) and (b) of this subsection, if a person
subject to tax makes both retail and wholesale sales of carbonated
beverages, the department may provide special instructions regarding
invoices for such person and its customers.
(5) Moneys collected under this chapter shall be deposited into the
health services account in accordance with RCW 43.72.900.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The following are exempt from the tax
imposed in this chapter:
(1) Any successive handling of a previously taxed carbonated
beverage;
(2) The handling of any carbonated beverage that is shipped or
transported to a point outside the state for sale outside the state;
and
(3) Any handling of a carbonated beverage where the first handling
in this state occurred before the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Credit shall be allowed against taxes
imposed in this chapter for any carbonated beverage tax paid to another
state with respect to the same carbonated beverage. The amount of the
credit shall not exceed the tax liability arising under this chapter
with respect to the handling of that carbonated beverage.
(2) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Carbonated beverage tax" means a tax:
(i) That is imposed on the privilege of handling for sale
carbonated beverages and that is not generally imposed on other
activities or privileges; and
(ii) That is measured by the volume of the carbonated beverage.
(b) "State" means (i) a state of the United States other than
Washington, or any political subdivision of such other state; (ii) the
District of Columbia; (iii) any foreign country or political
subdivision thereof; and (iv) any federally recognized Indian tribe.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
June 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

--- END ---