BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Doctor of medicine" has the same meaning as "physician."
"Physician" means a person licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW.
(2) "Doctor of osteopathy" has the same meaning as "osteopathic
physician." "Osteopathic physician" means a person licensed under
chapter 18.57 RCW.
(3) "Gross income" means all revenue, without deduction, that is
derived from the performance of physician services and includes gross
proceeds of sales, compensation for the rendition of services, gains
realized from trading in stocks, bonds, or other evidences of
indebtedness, interest, discount, rents, royalties, fees, commissions,
dividends, and other emoluments however designated, all without any
deduction on account of the cost of tangible property sold, the cost of
materials used, labor costs, interest, discount, delivery costs, taxes,
or any other expense whatsoever paid or accrued and without any
deduction on account of losses.
(4) "Physician services" means activities substantially related to
the provision of services by doctors of medicine, doctors of
osteopathy, or persons under the direction or control of doctors of
medicine or osteopathy. "Physician services" includes services
provided through clinics, hospitals, offices, or similar places where
doctors of medicine and doctors of osteopathy provide those services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) In addition to any other tax, a tax is
imposed on persons engaging within this state in the business activity
of providing physician services.
(2) The tax is equal to the gross income multiplied by the rate of
one percent.
(3) A person entitled under RCW 82.04.460(1) to apportion gross
income taxable under chapter 82.04 RCW, where such income is also
taxable under this chapter, must apportion that gross income subject to
tax under this chapter as provided in RCW 82.04.460(1) and in the same
manner as for the tax imposed under chapter 82.04 RCW.
(4) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, there may be
deducted from the measure of tax the amount of bad debts, as that term
is used in 26 U.S.C. Sec. 166, as amended or renumbered as of January
1, 2003, on which tax was previously paid under this chapter.
(5) Moneys collected under this chapter shall be deposited into the
health services account in accordance with RCW 43.72.900.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This chapter does not apply to services
provided by a:
(1) Hospital as defined in RCW 70.41.020;
(2) Health maintenance organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020; or
(3) Person in respect to his or her employment in the capacity of
an employee or servant as distinguished from that of an independent
contractor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the
administration of the tax imposed by this chapter, in addition to any
other provisions of law for the payment and enforcement of the tax
imposed by this chapter.
(2) The tax due dates, reporting periods, and return requirements
applicable to the tax imposed in chapter 82.04 RCW apply to the tax
imposed in this chapter.
(3) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise or the term is
defined in section 1 of this act, the definitions in chapter 82.04 RCW
apply to this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

--- END ---