BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.210 and 2001 c 124 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is hereby imposed upon all wines except cider sold to
wine distributors and the Washington state liquor control board, within
the state a tax at the rate of twenty and one-fourth cents per liter.
There is hereby imposed on all cider sold to wine distributors and the
Washington state liquor control board within the state a tax at the
rate of three and fifty-nine one-hundredths cents per liter: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That wine sold or shipped in bulk from one winery to another
winery shall not be subject to such tax. The tax provided for in this
section shall be collected by direct payments based on wine purchased
by wine distributors. Every person purchasing wine under the
provisions of this section shall on or before the twentieth day of each
month report to the board all purchases during the preceding calendar
month in such manner and upon such forms as may be prescribed by the
board, and with such report shall pay the tax due from the purchases
covered by such report unless the same has previously been paid. Any
such purchaser of wine whose applicable tax payment is not postmarked
by the twentieth day following the month of purchase will be assessed
a penalty at the rate of two percent a month or fraction thereof. The
board may require that every such person shall execute to and file with
the board a bond to be approved by the board, in such amount as the
board may fix, securing the payment of the tax. If any such person
fails to pay the tax when due, the board may forthwith suspend or
cancel the license until all taxes are paid.
(2) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW
82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this
section. All revenues collected during any month from this additional
tax shall be transferred to the state general fund by the twenty-fifth
day of the following month.
(3) An additional tax is imposed on wines subject to tax under
subsection (1) of this section, at the rate of one-fourth of one cent
per liter for wine sold after June 30, 1987. After June 30, 1996, such
additional tax does not apply to cider. An additional tax of five one-hundredths of one cent per liter is imposed on cider sold after June
30, 1996. All revenues collected under this subsection (3) shall be
disbursed quarterly to the Washington wine commission for use in
carrying out the purposes of chapter 15.88 RCW.
(4) An additional tax is imposed on all wine subject to tax under
subsection (1) of this section. The additional tax is equal to twenty-three and forty-four one-hundredths cents per liter on fortified wine
as defined in RCW 66.04.010(((38))) when bottled or packaged by the
manufacturer, one cent per liter on all other wine except cider, and
eighteen one-hundredths of one cent per liter on cider. All revenues
collected during any month from this additional tax shall be deposited
in the violence reduction and drug enforcement account under RCW
69.50.520 by the twenty-fifth day of the following month.
(5)(a) An additional tax is imposed on all cider subject to tax
under subsection (1) of this section. The additional tax is equal to
two and four one-hundredths cents per liter of cider sold after June
30, 1996, and before July 1, 1997, and is equal to four and seven one-hundredths cents per liter of cider sold after June 30, 1997.
(b) All revenues collected from the additional tax imposed under
this subsection (5) shall be deposited in the health services account
under RCW 43.72.900.
(6) An additional tax is imposed on all fortified wine, as defined
in RCW 66.04.010, subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section.
The additional tax is equal to forty-five and thirty-six one-hundredths
cents per liter. All revenues collected during any month from this
additional tax shall be transferred to the health services account in
accordance with RCW 43.72.900 by the twenty-fifth day of the following
month.
(7) An additional tax is imposed upon all wines subject to tax
under subsection (1) of this section, except fortified wine as defined
in RCW 66.04.010 and cider, at the rate of twenty-two and ninety-two
one-hundredths cents per liter. An additional tax is imposed on all
cider sold to wine distributors and the Washington state liquor control
board within the state at the rate of eight and fourteen one-hundredths
cents per liter. All revenues collected during any month from these
additional taxes shall be transferred to the health services account in
accordance with RCW 43.72.900 by the twenty-fifth day of the following
month.
(8) For the purposes of this section, "cider" means table wine that
contains not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol by volume and
not more than seven percent of alcohol by volume and is made from the
normal alcoholic fermentation of the juice of sound, ripe apples or
pears. "Cider" includes, but is not limited to, flavored, sparkling,
or carbonated cider and cider made from condensed apple or pear must.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.24.290 and 2003 c 167 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any microbrewer or domestic brewery or beer distributor
licensed under this title may sell and deliver beer and strong beer to
holders of authorized licenses direct, but to no other person, other
than the board; and every such brewery or beer distributor shall report
all sales to the board monthly, pursuant to the regulations, and shall
pay to the board as an added tax for the privilege of manufacturing and
selling the beer and strong beer within the state a tax of one dollar
and thirty cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons on sales to licensees
within the state and on sales to licensees within the state of bottled
and canned beer, including strong beer, shall pay a tax computed in
gallons at the rate of one dollar and thirty cents per barrel of
thirty-one gallons. Any brewery or beer distributor whose applicable
tax payment is not postmarked by the twentieth day following the month
of sale will be assessed a penalty at the rate of two percent per month
or fraction thereof. Beer and strong beer shall be sold by breweries
and distributors in sealed barrels or packages. The moneys collected
under this subsection shall be distributed as follows: (a) Three-tenths of a percent shall be distributed to border areas under RCW
66.08.195; and (b) of the remaining moneys: (i) Twenty percent shall
be distributed to counties in the same manner as under RCW 66.08.200;
and (ii) eighty percent shall be distributed to incorporated cities and
towns in the same manner as under RCW 66.08.210.
(2) An additional tax is imposed on all beer and strong beer
subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section. The additional
tax is equal to two dollars per barrel of thirty-one gallons. All
revenues collected during any month from this additional tax shall be
deposited in the violence reduction and drug enforcement account under
RCW 69.50.520 by the twenty-fifth day of the following month.
(3)(a) An additional tax is imposed on all beer and strong beer
subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section. The additional
tax is equal to ninety-six cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons
through June 30, 1995, two dollars and thirty-nine cents per barrel of
thirty-one gallons for the period July 1, 1995, through June 30, 1997,
((and)) four dollars and seventy-eight cents per barrel of thirty-one
gallons for the period July 1, 1997, through April 30, 2005, and
thirteen dollars and eighty-seven cents per barrel of thirty-one
gallons thereafter.
(b) The additional tax imposed under this subsection does not apply
to the sale of the first sixty thousand barrels of beer each year by
breweries that are entitled to a reduced rate of tax under 26 U.S.C.
Sec. 5051, as existing on July 1, 1993, or such subsequent date as may
be provided by the board by rule consistent with the purposes of this
exemption.
(c) All revenues collected from the additional tax imposed under
this subsection (3) shall be deposited in the health services account
under RCW 43.72.900.
(4)(a) An additional tax is imposed on all beer and strong beer
that is subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section that is in
the first sixty thousand barrels of beer and strong beer by breweries
that are entitled to a reduced rate of tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 5051,
as existing on July 1, 1993, or such subsequent date as may be provided
by the board by rule consistent with the purposes of the exemption
under subsection (3)(b) of this section. The additional tax is equal
to one dollar and forty-eight and two-tenths cents per barrel of
thirty-one gallons. By the twenty-fifth day of the following month,
three percent of the revenues collected from this additional tax shall
be distributed to border areas under RCW 66.08.195 and the remaining
moneys shall be transferred to the state general fund.
(b) An additional tax is imposed on all beer and strong beer that
is subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section that is in the
first sixty thousand barrels of beer and strong beer by breweries that
are entitled to a reduced rate of tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 5051, as
existing on July 1, 1993, or such subsequent date as may be provided by
the board by rule consistent with the purposes of the exemption under
subsection (3)(b) of this section. The additional tax is equal to five
dollars and thirty-eight and two-tenths cents per barrel of thirty-one
gallons. All revenues collected during any month from this additional
tax shall be transferred to the health services account in accordance
with RCW 43.72.900 by the twenty-fifth day of the following month.
(5)(a) An additional tax is imposed on all beer and strong beer
subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section. The additional
tax is equal to one dollar and fifty cents per barrel of thirty-one
gallons. All revenues collected during any month from this additional
tax shall be deposited in the state general fund by the twenty-fifth
day of the following month. The additional tax imposed under this
subsection (5)(a) does not apply to the sale of the first sixty
thousand barrels of beer each year by breweries that are entitled to a
reduced rate of tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 5051, as existing on July 1,
1993, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the board by rule
consistent with the purposes of this exemption.
(b) An additional tax is imposed on all beer and strong beer that
is subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section that is in the
first sixty thousand barrels of beer and strong beer by breweries that
are entitled to a reduced rate of tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 5051, as
existing on July 1, 1993, or such subsequent date as may be provided by
the board by rule consistent with the purposes of the exemption under
subsection (3)(b) of this section. The additional tax is equal to
eighty-seven and six-tenths cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons.
All revenues collected during any month from this additional tax shall
be deposited in the state general fund by the twenty-fifth day of the
following month.
(6) The board may make refunds for all taxes paid on beer and
strong beer exported from the state for use outside the state.
(((6))) (7) The board may require filing with the board of a bond
to be approved by it, in such amount as the board may fix, securing the
payment of the tax. If any licensee fails to pay the tax when due, the
board may forthwith suspend or cancel his or her license until all
taxes are paid.

Sec. 3 RCW 66.08.196 and 2001 c 8 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
Distribution of funds to border areas under RCW 66.08.190 and
66.24.290 (1)(a) and (4)(a) shall be as follows:
(1) Sixty-five percent of the funds shall be distributed to border
areas ratably based on border area traffic totals;
(2) Twenty-five percent of the funds shall be distributed to border
areas ratably based on border-related crime statistics; and
(3) Ten percent of the funds shall be distributed to border areas
ratably based upon border area per capita law enforcement spending.
Distributions to an unincorporated area shall be made to the county
in which such an area is located and may only be spent on services
provided to that area.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.08.150 and 2003 c 167 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is levied and shall be collected a tax upon each retail
sale of spirits in the original package at the rate of fifteen percent
of the selling price. The tax imposed in this subsection shall apply
to all such sales including sales by the Washington state liquor stores
and agencies, but excluding sales to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
licensees.
(2) There is levied and shall be collected a tax upon each sale of
spirits in the original package at the rate of ten percent of the
selling price on sales by Washington state liquor stores and agencies
to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees.
(3) There is levied and shall be collected an additional tax upon
each retail sale of spirits in the original package at the rate of one
dollar and seventy-two cents per liter. The additional tax imposed in
this subsection shall apply to all such sales including sales by
Washington state liquor stores and agencies, and including sales to
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees.
(4) An additional tax is imposed equal to fourteen percent
multiplied by the taxes payable under subsections (1), (2), and (3) of
this section.
(5) An additional tax is imposed upon each retail sale of spirits
in the original package at the rate of seven cents per liter. The
additional tax imposed in this subsection shall apply to all such sales
including sales by Washington state liquor stores and agencies, and
including sales to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees. All
revenues collected during any month from this additional tax shall be
deposited in the violence reduction and drug enforcement account under
RCW 69.50.520 by the twenty-fifth day of the following month.
(6)(a) An additional tax is imposed upon retail sale of spirits in
the original package at the rate of one and seven-tenths percent of the
selling price through June 30, 1995, two and six-tenths percent of the
selling price for the period July 1, 1995, through June 30, 1997,
((and)) three and four-tenths of the selling price for the period July
1, 1997, through April 30, 2005, and eight and four-tenths percent of
the selling price thereafter. This additional tax applies to all such
sales including sales by Washington state liquor stores and agencies,
but excluding sales to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees.
(b) An additional tax is imposed upon retail sale of spirits in the
original package at the rate of one and one-tenth percent of the
selling price through June 30, 1995, one and seven-tenths percent of
the selling price for the period July 1, 1995, through June 30, 1997,
((and)) two and three-tenths of the selling price for the period July
1, 1997, through April 30, 2005, and seven and three-tenths percent of
the selling price thereafter. This additional tax applies to all such
sales to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees.
(c) An additional tax is imposed upon each retail sale of spirits
in the original package at the rate of twenty cents per liter through
June 30, 1995, thirty cents per liter for the period July 1, 1995,
through June 30, 1997, ((and)) forty-one cents per liter for the period
July 1, 1997, through April 30, 2005, and one dollar and forty-one
cents per liter thereafter. This additional tax applies to all such
sales including sales by Washington state liquor stores and agencies,
and including sales to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees.
(d) All revenues collected during any month from additional taxes
under this subsection shall be deposited in the health services account
created under RCW 43.72.900 by the twenty-fifth day of the following
month.
(7) The tax imposed in RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of
spirits in the original package.
(8) The taxes imposed in this section shall be paid by the buyer to
the seller, and each seller shall collect from the buyer the full
amount of the tax payable in respect to each taxable sale under this
section. The taxes required by this section to be collected by the
seller shall be stated separately from the selling price and for
purposes of determining the tax due from the buyer to the seller, it
shall be conclusively presumed that the selling price quoted in any
price list does not include the taxes imposed by this section.
(9) As used in this section, the terms, "spirits" and "package"
shall have the meaning ascribed to them in chapter 66.04 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
May 1, 2005.

--- END ---