BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
promote the use of icons and pictograms that incorporate the use of
commonly accepted symbols that can be understood and interpreted by a
variety of people from all walks of life and different nations in order
to assist them in the navigation of this state. These signs can be
used on roadways and for other transportation-related facilities such
as transit stations, airports, bus and train stations, and ferry
terminals. Pictograms are signs that depict services, facilities, or
destinations in picture form and are used throughout the world.
Pictograms are useful for traveling within a transit system as well as
for locating transit system stations and stops.
The legislature finds that many signing methods such as icons,
already in use by the Washington state department of transportation and
other agencies, facilitate use of the transportation systems in the
state and connections between modes. The legislature also finds that
the development of pictograms for use within transit systems will
assist system users, complement other signing methods, and increase
transit system ridership through easier way-finding. The pictograms
may reflect the unique characteristics of the facility, and those
characteristics should be considered and are acceptable in icon and
pictogram design. It is the intent of the legislature to have icons
and pictograms in use as new systems are put into service to promote
tourism and be in place by 2010 to assist international visitors coming
to Washington during the Olympic Games in Vancouver, British Columbia,
Canada.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.95A RCW
to read as follows:
Each authority shall incorporate in plans for stations along any
monorail project signing that is easily understood by the traveling
public, including, but not limited to, persons with disabilities, non-English speaking persons, and visitors from other nations. The signage
must employ graphics consistent with international symbols for
transportation facilities and signage that are consistent with
department of transportation guidelines and programs. The signage must
also use distinguishing pictograms as a means to identify stations and
points of interest along the monorail corridor for persons who use
languages that are not Roman-alphabet based. These requirements are
intended to apply to new sign installation and not to existing signs.
The authority may replace existing signs as it chooses; however, it
shall use the new signing designs when existing signs are replaced.
All signage must comply with requirements of applicable federal law and
may include recommendations contained in federal publications providing
directions on way-finding for persons with disabilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 81.112 RCW
to read as follows:
Each authority shall incorporate in plans for stations along any
light-rail facility signing that is easily understood by the traveling
public, including, but not limited to, persons with disabilities, non-English speaking persons, and visitors from other nations. The signage
must employ graphics consistent with international symbols for
transportation facilities and signage that are consistent with
department of transportation guidelines and programs. The signage must
also use distinguishing symbols or pictograms developed by the
authority as a means to identify stations and may identify points of
interest along the corridor for persons who use languages that are not
Roman-alphabet based. These requirements are intended to apply to new
sign installation and not to existing signs, installed before the
effective date of this act. The authority may replace existing signs
as it chooses; however, it shall use the new signing designs when
existing signs are replaced. All signage must comply with requirements
of applicable federal law and may include recommendations contained in
federal publications providing directions on way-finding for persons
with disabilities.

--- END ---