BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The people of the state of Washington hereby
find and declare:
(1) Initiative 601 limits the growth of state expenditures to the
growth rate of inflation and state population, but does not limit the
proliferation of tax expenditures;
(2) When the number of tax expenditures increases, the state faces
a corresponding loss in revenue;
(3) Those who do not benefit directly from tax expenditures either
pay higher taxes to support essential government services or face cuts
to these essential services;
(4) The continuing increases in tax expenditures and the
corresponding shift of the tax burden is contrary to the interest of
the people of the state of Washington;
(5) It is necessary to limit the growth of state tax expenditures
in order to ensure adequate funding of essential services, including
health care and education;
(6) The current budgetary system in the state of Washington lacks
stability. The system encourages overcreation of tax expenditures
during surplus years resulting in crisis budgeting in lean years with
resulting tax increases and cuts in essential services;
(7) Local government tax revenues are adversely impacted by state-adopted tax expenditures which result in reductions of critical local
services, such as police and fire protection;
(8) It is therefore the intent of this act to:
(a) Establish a limit on state tax expenditures that will ensure
that the monetary value of state tax expenditures, as a percent of the
limited general fund budget, does not exceed a reasonable amount;
(b) Protect taxpayers who do not directly benefit from tax
expenditures from paying higher taxes to support essential government
services while retaining tax expenditures that have a clear benefit to
low and middle-income families such as the sales tax exemptions on food
and prescription drugs and property tax exemptions for senior citizens;
(c) Ensure that the growth of state tax expenditures does not
threaten adequate funding of essential services, including health care
and education;
(d) Ensure that local governments are not threatened by runaway
growth in tax expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The value of tax expenditures to the
recipients due to the tax expenditures identified in section 3 of this
act during a fiscal year shall not exceed the state tax expenditure
limit for that fiscal year. The state tax expenditure limit for any
fiscal year shall be the previous year's state tax expenditure limit
increased by a percentage rate that equals the fiscal growth factor.
(2) For the purpose of the limit, the fiscal growth factor is
determined by the state expenditure limit committee under chapter
43.135 RCW. The department of revenue shall calculate the limit as
soon as practical after each projection is issued. The department
shall estimate the value of tax expenditures at the same times as the
limit is calculated and recalculated.
(3) For purposes of computing the state tax expenditure limit for
the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2005, the phrase "the previous fiscal
year's state tax expenditure limit" means the value of the tax
expenditures to the recipients due to the tax expenditures identified
in section 3 of this act for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 1995,
increased by the fiscal growth factors for the fiscal years 1997, 1998,
1999, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, and 2005. For tax expenditures
enacted before July 1, 1995, the department of revenue shall estimate
the value of the tax expenditures to the recipients identified in
section 3 of this act for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 1995. For
tax expenditures enacted after July 1, 1995, the department shall
increase the tax expenditure limit for the fiscal year the tax
expenditure is first in effect by the value of the tax expenditure to
the recipients as estimated by the fiscal note for the enacting
legislation.
(4) If necessary, the department of revenue shall disallow one or
more tax expenditures so that, in the department's judgment, the limit
will not be exceeded for the current fiscal year. The department shall
disallow tax expenditures in the order the tax expenditures are set
forth in section 3 of this act, until sufficient tax expenditures have
been disallowed so that the limit will not be exceeded. The department
shall determine an effective date upon which each disallowance will
begin. The department shall provide notice of the effective date to
affected taxpayers, the legislature, and others as deemed appropriate
by the department. The department shall give at least seventy-five
days' notice of a disallowance that affects sales and use taxes
collected by sellers, and the disallowance shall take effect only on
the first day of January, April, July, or October.
(5) The department shall make its best effort to administer the
limit under this section while providing for an orderly process of
disallowing tax expenditures. The department's estimates of tax
exemption value, determinations of which tax expenditures are to be
disallowed, and timing of the disallowances are final and may not be
challenged in a court of law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The exemptions, exclusions, deductions
from the base of a state tax, credits against state taxes, deferrals of
state taxes, and preferential state tax rates allowed under subsection
(2) of this section are the tax expenditures subject to the limit in
section 2 of this act.
(2)

RCW 82.04.423 Direct sellers

RCW 82.08.010(1) Trade-ins

RCW 82.16.020(1) (d) and (e) Tax rate for urban transportation and
vessels

RCW 82.08.0255(1)(b) Motor vehicle and special fuel

RCW 82.08.02566 Equipment for designing aircraft parts

RCW 82.04.315 International banking facilities

RCW 82.04.260(4) Processors of meat

RCW 82.04.050(8) Conservation and habitat development

RCW 82.04.260(7) Travel agents

RCW 82.16.050(8) Shipments to ports

RCW 82.08.02537 Academic transcripts

RCW 82.08.0289 Local residential and coin-op telephone
service

RCW 82.04.4292 Interest on real estate loans

RCW 82.04.250(1) Retailing

RCW 82.04.260(11) Insurance agents

RCW 82.08.0272 Semen for artificial insemination

RCW 82.04.332 Wholesaling of grain

RCW 82.04.2403 Fish cleaning

RCW 82.08.0294 Fish feed for aquaculture

RCW 82.04.4451 Small business credit

RCW 82.08.0277 Pollen

RCW 82.04.370 Fraternal insurance

RCW 82.04.120 Seed conditioning

RCW 82.12.800 Use of vessels by manufacturers/dealers

RCW 82.08.0311 Packing materials for horticultural
products

RCW 82.62.030 and 82.62.045 New jobs in rural counties and CEZ

RCW 82.04.213 Christmas tree production

RCW 82.08.832 Gun safes

RCW 82.04.120 Processors of seafood

RCW 82.08.0253 Newspapers

RCW 82.08.810 Air pollution control facilities

RCW 82.04.392 Income from trust accounts

RCW 82.04.050(3)(e) Tree trimming under power lines

RCW 82.16.055 Cogeneration facilities and renewable
resources

RCW 82.04.4296 Funeral home reimbursement

RCW 82.04.260(2) Processors of dry peas

RCW 82.04.317 Wholesale auto auctions

RCW 82.04.4281 Investments by nonfinancial firms

RCW 82.04.333 Small timber harvesters

RCW 82.16.053 Electric power, low density customer
base

RCW 82.04.050(3)(e) Horticultural services for farmers

RCW 82.12.0263 Extracted fuel

RCW 82.04.110 Aluminum master alloys

RCW 82.04.260(1)(a) Manufacturers of flour and oil

RCW 82.08.0259 Breeding livestock; cattle and milk
cows

RCW 82.12.0272 Display items for trade shows

RCW 82.08.0267 Poultry used in production

RCW 82.08.0298 Fishing boat fuel

RCW 82.04.335 Agricultural fairs

RCW 82.04.337 Exported processed hops

RCW 82.04.050 Personal and professional services

RCW 82.04.4298 Condominium maintenance fees

RCW 82.04.4295 Manufacturing completed in
Washington

RCW 82.08.02568 Anodes and cathodes for aluminum
production

RCW 82.08.02567 Electric generating equipment;
renewable resources

RCW 82.04.260(1)(c) Processors of fresh fruit and vegetables

RCW 82.04.338 Services for the hop commodity
commission

RCW 82.04.290(1) International investment management

RCW 82.04.050(2)(a) Hospital laundry service

RCW 82.04.434 Testing and safety labs

RCW 82.04.4333 Job training services

RCW 82.04.272 Resellers of prescription drugs

RCW 82.04.050(8) Fertilizer and chemical spray

RCW 82.08.02745 Farm worker housing

RCW 82.04.050(8) Pollination agents

RCW 82.16.050(7) Irrigation water

RCW 82.04.4294 Interest on agricultural loans

RCW 82.12.010(1) Use tax on rental value

RCW 82.04.260(9) Stevedoring

RCW 82.04.44525 International services

RCW 82.04.062 Precious metals and bullion

RCW 82.16.040 Two thousand dollar monthly minimum

RCW 82.04.330 Agricultural producers

RCW 82.04.255 Shared real estate commissions

RCW 82.04.394 Property management, on-site personnel

RCW 82.04.120 Hay cubing

RCW 82.32.045(4) Twenty-eight thousand dollar minimum
for filing a tax return

RCW 82.08.0315 Film and video production equipment

RCW 82.08.0288 Leased irrigation equipment

RCW 82.04.421 Memberships to purchase at discount

RCW 82.08.820 Tax remittance for warehouse expansion

RCW 82.04.4281 Dividends from subsidiaries

RCW 82.12.0265 Bailed tangible personal property for
research and development

RCW 82.04.416 2nd Narrows bridge

RCW 82.04.260(8) Charter and freight brokers

RCW 82.12.0266 Vehicles acquired while in military
service

RCW 82.08.0257 Farm auction sales

RCW 82.04.260 (5) and (6) Nuclear fuel assemblies

RCW 82.04.331 Wholesaling of conditioned seed

RCW 82.04.4287 Processing horticultural products

RCW 82.04.260(1)(b) Manufacturers of seafood

RCW 82.08.811 Coal for thermal generating plants

RCW 82.08.0296 Livestock feed

RCW 82.04.425 Accommodation sales

RCW 82.60.040 Rural county deferral

RCW 82.08.0255(1) Fuel for aircraft research

RCW 82.04.4452 Research and development; high
technology firms

RCW 82.08.0295 Sale/leaseback, equipment used in
processing

RCW 82.08.0276 Wearing apparel for display purposes

RCW 82.04.050(1)(d) Ferrosilicon

RCW 82.08.0274 Form lumber

RCW 82.63.030 High technology deferral

RCW 82.16.0491 Credit for rural electric utility
contributions

RCW 82.04.355 Commuter ride sharing

RCW 82.08.0282 Returnable containers

RCW 82.04.350 Horse racing

RCW 82.12.0251 Nonresidents' personal property

RCW 82.16.050(4) Cash discounts

RCW 82.04.4284 Credit losses

RCW 36.100.090 Baseball stadium deferral

RCW 82.04.4331 Health insurance, medical claims

RCW 82.04.433 Fuel used in commercial vessels

RCW 82.04.4283 Cash discounts

RCW 82.08.0279 Nonresidents' rental cars

RCW 82.16.046 2nd Narrows bridge

RCW 82.16.050(8) Interstate transportation; through freight

RCW 82.08.0262 Interstate transportation equipment

RCW 82.08.026 Natural and manufactured gas

RCW 82.08.0263 Vehicles in interstate commerce

RCW 82.08.0255(2) Special fuel

RCW 82.04.4285 Motor fuel taxes

RCW 82.08.0265 Repaired items delivered to other states

RCW 82.16.050(2) Sales for resale

RCW 82.12.0254 Vehicles used in commerce

RCW 82.34.050(2) Credit for tax paid on pollution control
facilities

RCW 82.04.440 (2) and (3) Multiple activities, instate

RCW 82.32.065 Vehicles under warranty

RCW 82.16.050(3) Joint utility services

RCW 82.04.322 Health maintenance organizations

RCW 82.04.360 Life insurance "statutory" employees

RCW 82.08.0261 Items used in interstate commerce

RCW 82.04.050(8) Feed and seed

RCW 82.04.427 Pollution control facilities

RCW 47.46.060 2nd Narrows bridge

RCW 82.04.310 Public utilities

RCW 82.04.390 Real estate sales

RCW 82.35.050 Cogeneration facilities

RCW 82.04.340 Boxing and wrestling matches

RCW 82.66.040 Horse race track deferral

RCW 82.04.280 Rental of real estate

RCW 82.08.0266 Boats sold to nonresidents

RCW 82.16.050(11) Processing/disposal of sewerage

RCW 82.08.033 Used mobile homes

RCW 82.08.037 Credit for bad debts

RCW 82.08.0268 Farm machinery sold to nonresidents

RCW 82.16.050(6) Interstate transportation; in-state portion

RCW 82.04.405 Credit unions; state-chartered

RCW 82.08.0273 Purchases by nonresidents, no or low
sales taxes

RCW 82.08.0264 Vehicles sold to nonresidents

RCW 82.04.320 Insurance premiums

RCW 82.16.045 Credit for pollution control facilities

RCW 82.08.0269 Purchases by residents of Alaska and
Hawaii

RCW 82.04.280(6) Radio and television broadcasting

RCW 82.04.4329 Health insurance pool fees

RCW 82.16.050(5) Credit losses

RCW 82.08.036 Core deposits and tire fees

RCW 82.32.420 Waiver of delinquency penalties, Y2K

RCW 36.102.070 Football stadium deferral

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 2 and 3 of this act are each added
to chapter 82.32 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act applies to fiscal years beginning
after June 30, 2005.

--- END ---