BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.42.005 and 2003 c 144 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is the policy of the state of Washington to recognize and
preserve water rights in accordance with RCW 90.03.010.
(2) The legislature finds that:
(a) The state of Washington is faced with a shortage of water with
which to meet existing and future needs, particularly during the summer
and fall months and in dry years when the demand is greatest;
(b) Consistent with RCW 90.54.180, issuance of new water rights,
voluntary water transfers, and conservation and water use efficiency
programs, including storage, all are acceptable methods of addressing
water uses because they can relieve current critical water situations,
provide for presently unmet needs, and assist in meeting future water
needs. Presently unmet needs or current needs includes the water
required to increase the frequency of occurrence of base or minimum
flow levels in streams of the state, the water necessary to satisfy
existing water rights, or the water necessary to provide full supplies
to existing water systems with current supply deficiencies;
(c) The interests of the state and its citizens will be served by
developing programs and regional water resource plans, in cooperation
with local governments, federally recognized tribal governments,
appropriate federal agencies, private citizens, and the various water
users and water interests in the state, that increase the overall
ability to manage the state's waters in order to resolve conflicts and
to better satisfy both present and future needs for water; and
(d) Water banking as a function of the trust water (([rights]))
rights program and as authorized by this chapter can provide an
effective means to facilitate the voluntary transfer of water rights
established through conservation, purchase, lease, or donation, to
preserve water rights and provide water for presently unmet and future
needs; and to achieve a variety of water resource management objectives
throughout the state, including drought response, improving streamflows
on a voluntary basis, providing water mitigation, or reserving water
supply for future uses.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.42.010 and 1998 c 245 s 173 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that a need exists to develop and test a
means to facilitate the voluntary transfer of water and water rights,
including conserved water, to provide water for presently unmet needs
and emerging needs. Further, the legislature finds that water
conservation activities have the potential of affecting the quantity of
return flow waters to which existing water right holders have a right
to and rely upon. It is the intent of the legislature that persons
holding rights to water, including return flows, not be adversely
affected in the implementation of the provisions of this chapter.
(2) The legislature finds that:
(a) Under present physical conditions in the Yakima river basin
there is an insufficient supply of water to satisfy the needs of the
basin;
(b) Pursuant to P.L. 96-162, which was urged for enactment by this
state, the United States is now conducting a study of ways to provide
needed waters through improvements of the federal water project
presently existing in the Yakima river basin;
(c) The interests of the state will be served by developing
programs, in cooperation with the United States and the various water
users in the basin, that increase the overall ability to manage basin
waters in order to better satisfy both present and future needs for
water in the Yakima river basin.
(3) It is the purpose of this chapter, consistent with the findings
in subsection (2) of this section, to improve the ability of the state
to work with the United States and various water users of the Yakima
river basin in a program designed to satisfy both existing rights, and
other presently unmet as well as future needs of the basin.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.42.020 and 1991 c 347 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(2) "Net water savings" means the amount of water that is
determined to be conserved and usable within a specified stream reach
or reaches for other purposes without impairment or detriment to water
rights existing at the time that a water conservation project is
undertaken, reducing the ability to deliver water, or reducing the
supply of water that otherwise would have been available to other
existing water uses.
(3) "Trust water right" means any water right acquired by the state
under this chapter for management in the state's trust water rights
program.
(4) "Pilot planning areas" means the geographic areas designated
under RCW 90.54.045(2).
(5) "Water conservation project" means any project or program that
achieves physical or operational improvements that provide for
increased water use efficiency in existing systems of diversion,
conveyance, application, or use of water under existing water rights
((existing on July 28, 1991)).

Sec. 4 RCW 90.42.030 and 1993 c 98 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For purposes of this chapter, the state may enter into
contracts to provide moneys to assist in the financing of water
conservation projects. In consideration for the financial assistance
provided, the state shall obtain public benefits defined in guidelines
developed under RCW 90.42.050.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, if the public
benefits to be obtained require conveyance or modification of a water
right, the recipient of funds shall convey to the state the recipient's
interest in that part of the water right or claim constituting all or
a portion of the resulting net water savings for deposit in the trust
water rights program. The amount to be conveyed shall be finitely
determined by the parties, in accordance with the guidelines developed
under RCW 90.42.050, before the expenditure of state funds. Conveyance
may consist of complete transfer, lease contracts, or other legally
binding agreements. When negotiating for the acquisition of conserved
water or net water savings, or a portion thereof, the state may require
evidence of a valid water right.
(b) For trust water rights created from the waters of the Yakima
river basin, no contract shall be entered into by the department with
a water user under this chapter unless it appears to the department
that, upon the completion of a water conservation project financed with
moneys as provided in this section, a valid water right exists for
conveyance to the department.
(3) As part of the contract, the water right holder and the state
shall specify the process to determine the amount of water the water
right holder would continue to be entitled to once the water
conservation project is in place.
(4) The ((state)) department shall cooperate fully with the United
States in the implementation of this chapter. Trust water rights may
be acquired through expenditure of funds provided by the United States
and shall be treated in the same manner as trust water rights resulting
from the expenditure of state funds.
(5) If water is proposed to be acquired by or conveyed to the
((state)) department as a trust water right by an irrigation district,
evidence of the district's authority to represent the water right
holders shall be submitted to and for the satisfaction of the
department.
(6)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the ((state))
department shall not contract with any person to acquire a water right
served by an irrigation district without the approval of the board of
directors of the irrigation district. Disapproval by a board shall be
factually based on probable adverse effects on the ability of the
district to deliver water to other members or on maintenance of the
financial integrity of the district.
(b) For trust water rights created from waters of the Yakima river
basin, the department shall not acquire an individual's water right
under this chapter that is appurtenant to land lying within an
irrigation district without the approval of the board of directors of
the irrigation district.

Sec. 5 RCW 90.42.040 and 2002 c 329 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All trust water rights acquired by the ((state)) department
shall be placed in the state trust water rights program to be managed
by the department. Trust water rights acquired by the ((state))
department shall be held or authorized for use by the department for
instream flows, irrigation, municipal, or other beneficial uses
consistent with applicable regional plans for pilot planning areas, or
to resolve critical water supply problems. To the extent practicable
and subject to legislative appropriation, trust water rights acquired
in an area with an approved watershed plan developed under chapter
90.82 RCW shall be consistent with that plan if the plan calls for such
acquisition.
(2)(a) Trust water rights may be modified as to purpose or place of
use or point of diversion, including modification from a diversionary
use to a nondiversionary instream use.
(b) The department shall issue a water right certificate in the
name of the state of Washington for each permanent trust water right
conveyed to the state indicating the reach or reaches of the stream,
the quantity, and the use or uses to which it may be applied. A
superseding certificate shall be issued that specifies the amount of
water the water right holder would continue to be entitled to as a
result of the water conservation project. The superseding certificate
shall retain the same priority date as the original right. For
nonpermanent conveyances, the department shall issue certificates or
such other instruments as are necessary to reflect the changes in
purpose or place of use or point of diversion or withdrawal.
(3) A trust water right retains the same priority date as the water
right from which it originated, but as between them the trust right
shall be deemed to be inferior in priority unless otherwise specified
by an agreement between the state and the party holding the original
right.
(4)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, exercise of a
trust water right may be authorized only if the department first
determines that neither water rights existing at the time the trust
water right is established, nor the public interest will be impaired.
If impairment becomes apparent during the time a trust water right is
being exercised, the department shall cease or modify the use of the
trust water right to eliminate the impairment.
(b) For trust water rights created from waters of the Yakima river
basin, no exercise of a trust water right may be authorized unless the
department first determines that no existing water rights, junior or
senior in priority, will be impaired as to their exercise or injured in
any manner whatever by such authorization.
(5)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, before any
trust water right is created or modified, the department shall, at a
minimum, require that a notice be published in a newspaper of general
circulation published in the county or counties in which the storage,
diversion, and use are to be made, and in other newspapers as the
department determines is necessary, once a week for two consecutive
weeks. At the same time the department shall send a notice containing
pertinent information to all appropriate state agencies, potentially
affected local governments and federally recognized tribal governments,
and other interested parties.
(b) For trust water rights created from waters of the Yakima river
basin, before any trust water right is exercised, the department shall
publish notice thereof in a newspaper of general circulation published
in the county or counties in which the storage, diversion, and use are
to be made, and in such other newspapers as the department determines
are necessary, once a week for two consecutive weeks. At the same time
the department may also send notice thereof containing pertinent
information to the director of fish and wildlife.
(6) ((RCW 90.14.140 through 90.14.230 have no applicability to
trust water rights held by the department under this chapter or
exercised under this section.
(7) RCW 90.03.380 has no applicability to trust water rights
acquired by the state through the funding of water conservation
projects.
(8)))(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, subsections
(4) and (5)(a) of this section do not apply to a trust water right
resulting from a donation for instream flows described in RCW
90.42.080(1)(b) or to a trust water right leased under RCW
90.42.080(((8))) (7) if the period of the lease does not exceed five
years. However, the department shall provide the notice described in
subsection (5)(a) of this section the first time the trust water right
resulting from the donation is exercised.
(((9))) (b) For trust water rights created from waters of the
Yakima river basin, section 16 of this act and subsections (4) and
(5)(b) of this section do not apply to a trust water right resulting
from a donation for instream flows described in RCW 90.42.080(1)(b) or
from the lease of a water right under RCW 90.42.080(7) if the period of
the lease does not exceed five years. However, the department shall
provide the notice described in subsection (5)(b) of this section the
first time the trust water right resulting from the donation is
exercised.
(7) Where a portion of an existing water right that is acquired or
donated to the trust water rights program will assist in achieving
established instream flows, the department shall process the change or
amendment of the existing right without conducting a review of the
extent and validity of the portion of the water right that will remain
with the water right holder.

Sec. 6 RCW 90.42.050 and 1991 c 347 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department, in cooperation with federally recognized Indian
tribes, local governments, state agencies, and other interested
parties, shall establish guidelines ((by July 1, 1992,)) governing the
acquisition, administration, and management of trust water rights. The
guidelines shall address at a minimum the following:
(1) Methods for determining the net water savings resulting from
water conservation projects or programs carried out in accordance with
this chapter, and other factors to be considered in determining the
quantity or value of water available for potential designation as a
trust water right;
(2) Criteria for determining the portion of net water savings to be
conveyed to the state under this chapter;
(3) Criteria for prioritizing water conservation projects;
(4) A description of potential public benefits that will affect
consideration for state financial assistance in RCW 90.42.030;
(5) Procedures for providing notification to potentially interested
parties;
(6) Criteria for the assignment of uses of trust water rights
acquired in areas of the state not addressed in a regional water
resource plan or critical area agreement; and
(7) Contracting procedures and other procedures not specifically
addressed in this section.
((These guidelines shall be submitted to the joint select committee
on water resource policy before adoption.))

Sec. 7 RCW 90.42.060 and 1991 c 347 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
The policies and purposes of this chapter shall not be construed
((as replacing or amending)) to replace or amend the policies or the
purposes for which funds available under chapter 43.83B or 43.99E RCW
may be used.

Sec. 8 RCW 90.42.070 and 1991 c 347 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing in this chapter authorizes the ((involuntary)) impairment
of or operates to impair any existing water rights.

Sec. 9 RCW 90.42.080 and 2002 c 329 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The ((state)) department may acquire all or portions of
existing water rights, including storage rights, by purchase, lease,
gift, or other appropriate means other than by condemnation, from any
person or entity or combination of persons or entities. Once acquired,
such rights are trust water rights. A water right acquired by the
state that is expressly conditioned to limit its use to instream
purposes shall be administered as a trust water right in compliance
with that condition.
(b) If the holder of a right to water from a body of water chooses
to donate all or a portion of the person's water right to the trust
water system to assist in providing instream flows on a temporary or
permanent basis, the department shall accept the donation on such terms
as the person may prescribe as long as the donation satisfies the
requirements of subsection (4) of this section and the other applicable
requirements of this chapter and the terms prescribed are relevant and
material to protecting any interest in the water right retained by the
donor. Once accepted, such rights are trust water rights within the
conditions prescribed by the donor.
(2) The department may enter into leases, contracts, or such other
arrangements with other persons or entities as appropriate, to ensure
that trust water rights acquired in accordance with this chapter may be
exercised to the fullest possible extent.
(3) Trust water rights may be acquired by the ((state)) department
on a temporary or permanent basis.
(4) A water right donated under subsection (1)(b) of this section
shall not exceed the extent to which the water right was exercised
during the five years before the donation nor may the total of any
portion of the water right remaining with the donor plus the donated
portion of the water right exceed the extent to which the water right
was exercised during the five years before the donation. A water right
holder who believes his or her water right has been impaired by a trust
water right donated under subsection (1)(b) of this section may request
that the department review the impairment claim. If the department
determines that exercising the trust water right resulting from the
donation or exercising a portion of that trust water right donated
under subsection (1)(b) of this section is impairing existing water
rights in violation of RCW 90.42.070, the trust water right shall be
altered by the department to eliminate the impairment. Any decision of
the department to alter or not to alter a trust water right donated
under subsection (1)(b) of this section is appealable to the pollution
control hearings board under RCW 43.21B.230. A donated water right's
status as a trust water right under this subsection is not evidence of
the validity or quantity of the water right.
(5) ((The provisions of RCW 90.03.380 and 90.03.390 do not apply to
donations for instream flows described in subsection (1)(b) of this
section, but do apply to other transfers of water rights under this
section.
(6))) No funds may be expended for the purchase of water rights by
the state pursuant to this section unless specifically appropriated for
this purpose by the legislature.
(((7))) (6) Any water right conveyed to the trust water right
system as a gift that is expressly conditioned to limit its use to
instream purposes shall be managed by the department for public
purposes to ensure that it qualifies as a gift that is deductible for
federal income taxation purposes for the person or entity conveying the
water right.
(((8))) (7) If the department acquires a trust water right by
lease, the amount of the trust water right shall not exceed the extent
to which the water right was exercised during the five years before the
acquisition was made nor may the total of any portion of the water
right remaining with the original water right holder plus the portion
of the water right leased by the department exceed the extent to which
the water right was exercised during the five years before the
acquisition. A water right holder who believes his or her water right
has been impaired by a trust water right leased under this subsection
may request that the department review the impairment claim. If the
department determines that exercising the trust water right resulting
from the leasing or exercising of a portion of that trust water right
leased under this subsection is impairing existing water rights in
violation of RCW 90.42.070, the trust water right shall be altered by
the department to eliminate the impairment. Any decision of the
department to alter or not to alter a trust water right leased under
this subsection is appealable to the pollution control hearings board
under RCW 43.21B.230. The department's leasing of a trust water right
under this subsection is not evidence of the validity or quantity of
the water right.
(((9))) (8) For a water right donated to or acquired by the trust
water rights program on a temporary basis, the full quantity of water
diverted or withdrawn to exercise the right before the donation or
acquisition shall be placed in the trust water rights program and shall
revert to the donor or person from whom it was acquired when the trust
period ends.

Sec. 10 RCW 90.42.110 and 2003 c 144 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department, with the consent of the water right holder, may
identify trust water rights for administration for water banking
purposes, including trust water rights established before May 7, 2003.
(2) An application to transfer a water right to the trust water
(([rights])) rights program shall be reviewed under RCW 90.03.380 at
the time the water right is transferred to the trust water (([rights]))
rights program for administration for water banking purposes, and
notice of the application shall be published by the applicant as
provided under RCW 90.03.280. The application must indicate the reach
or reaches of the stream where the trust water right will be
established before the transfer of the water right or portion thereof
from the trust water (([rights])) rights program, and identify
reasonably foreseeable future temporary or permanent beneficial uses
for which the water right or portion thereof may be used by a third
party upon transfer from the trust water ((right[s])) rights program.
In the event the future place of use, period of use, or other elements
of the water right are not specifically identified at the time of the
transfer into the trust water (([rights])) rights program, another
review under RCW 90.03.380 will be necessary at the time of a proposed
transfer from the trust water (([rights])) rights program.

Sec. 11 RCW 90.42.120 and 2003 c 144 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall transfer a water right or portion thereof
being administered for water banking purposes from the trust water
(([rights])) rights program to a third party upon occurrence of all of
the following:
(a) The department receives a request for transfer of a water right
or portion thereof currently administered by the department for water
banking purposes;
(b) The request is consistent with any previous review under RCW
90.03.380 of the water right and future temporary or permanent
beneficial uses;
(c) The request is consistent with any condition, limitation, or
agreement affecting the water right, including but not limited to any
trust water right transfer agreement executed at the time the water
right was transferred to the trust water rights program; and
(d) The request is accompanied by and is consistent with an
assignment of interest or portion thereof from a person or entity
retaining an interest in the trust water right or portion thereof to
the party requesting transfer of the water right or portion thereof.
(2) The priority date of the water right or portion thereof
transferred by the department from the trust water (([rights])) rights
program for water banking purposes shall be the priority date of the
underlying water right.
(3) The department shall issue documentation for that water right
or portion thereof to the new water right holder based on the
requirements applicable to the transfer of other water rights from the
trust water rights program. Such documentation shall include a
description of the property to which the water right will be
appurtenant after the water right or portion thereof is transferred
from the trust water (([rights])) rights program to a third party.
(4) The department's decision on the transfer of a water right or
portion thereof from the trust water (([rights])) rights program for
water banking purposes may be appealed to the pollution control
hearings board under RCW 43.21B.230, or to a superior court conducting
a general adjudication under RCW 90.03.210.

Sec. 12 RCW 90.42.130 and 2003 c 144 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall seek input from agricultural
organizations, federal agencies, tribal governments, local governments,
watershed groups, conservation groups, and developers on water banking,
including water banking procedures and identification of areas in
Washington state where water banking could assist in providing water
supplies for instream and out-of-stream uses. The department shall
summarize any comments received on water banking and submit a report,
including any recommendations, to the appropriate committees of the
legislature for their consideration in the subsequent legislative
session.
(2) By December 31st of every even-numbered year, the department
shall submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature
on water banking activities authorized under RCW 90.42.100. The report
shall:
(a) Evaluate the effectiveness of water banking in meeting the
policies and objectives of this chapter;
(b) Describe any statutory, regulatory, or other impediments to
water banking in other areas of the state; and
(c) Identify other basins or regions that may benefit from
authorization for the department to use the trust water (([rights]))
rights program for water banking purposes.

Sec. 13 RCW 90.42.135 and 2003 c 144 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing in ((chapter 144, Laws of 2003)) RCW 90.42.100 through
90.42.130 shall:
(1) Cause detriment or injury to existing rights or to the
operation of the federal Yakima project to provide water for irrigation
purposes, existing water supply contracts, or existing water rights;
(2) Diminish in any way existing rights or the total water supply
available for irrigation and other purposes in the Yakima basin;
(3) Affect or modify the authority of a court conducting a general
adjudication pursuant to RCW 90.03.210; or
(4) Affect or modify the rights of any person or entity under a
water rights adjudication or under any order of the court conducting a
water rights adjudication.

Sec. 14 RCW 90.42.138 and 2003 c 144 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing in ((chapter 144, Laws of 2003)) RCW 90.42.100 through
90.42.130 may be construed to:
(1) Affect or modify any treaty or other federal rights of an
Indian tribe, or the rights of any federal agency or other person or
entity arising under state or federal law;
(2) Affect or modify the rights or jurisdictions of the United
States, the state of Washington, the Yakama Nation, or other person or
entity over waters of any river or stream or over any ground water
resource;
(3) Alter, amend, repeal, interpret, modify, or be in conflict with
any interstate compact made by the states;
(4) Alter, establish, or impair the respective rights of states,
the United States, the Yakama Nation, or any other person or entity
with respect to any water or water-related right;
(5) Alter, diminish, or abridge the rights and obligations of any
federal, state, or local agency, the Yakama Nation, or other person or
entity;
(6) Affect or modify the rights of the Yakama Indian Nation or its
successors in interest to, and management and regulation of, those
water resources arising or used, within the external boundaries of the
Yakama Indian Reservation;
(7) Affect or modify the settlement agreement between the United
States and the state of Washington filed in Yakima county superior
court with regard to federal reserved water rights other than those
rights reserved by the United States for the benefit of the Yakama
Indian Nation and its members; or
(8) Affect or modify the rights of any federal, state, or local
agency, the Yakama Nation, or any other person or entity, public or
private, with respect to any unresolved and unsettled claims in any
water right adjudications, or court decisions, including State v.
Acquavella, or constitute evidence in any such proceeding in which any
water or water-related right is adjudicated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 The department may adopt rules as
appropriate to ensure full implementation of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 For trust water rights created from the
waters of the Yakima river basin, a schedule of the amount of net water
saved as a result of water conservation projects carried out in
accordance with this chapter shall be developed annually to reflect the
predicted hydrologic and water supply conditions, as well as
anticipated water demands, for the upcoming irrigation season. This
schedule shall serve as the basis for the distribution and management
of trust water rights each year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section:
(a) RCW 90.14.140 through 90.14.230 have no applicability to trust
water rights held by the department under this chapter or exercised
under this section;
(b) RCW 90.03.380 has no applicability to trust water rights
acquired by the state through the funding of water conservation
projects; and
(c) The provisions of RCW 90.03.380 and 90.03.390 do not apply to
donations for instream flows described in (b) of this subsection, but
do apply to other transfers of water rights under this section.
(2) For trust water rights created from waters of the Yakima river
basin, RCW 90.03.380 and 90.14.140 through 90.14.910 shall have no
applicability to trust water rights held by the department under this
chapter or exercised under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 It is not the intent of this chapter to
facilitate the transfer of water rights from one irrigation district to
another.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 Sections 15 through 18 of this act are each
added to chapter 90.42 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 90.38.005 (Findings -- Purpose) and 1989 c 429 s 1;
(2) RCW 90.38.010 (Definitions) and 1989 c 429 s 2;
(3) RCW 90.38.020 (Acquisition or donation of trust water rights)
and 2002 c 329 s 7, 2001 c 237 s 28, & 1989 c 429 s 3;
(4) RCW 90.38.030 (Water conservation projects -- Contracts for
financial assistance) and 1989 c 429 s 4;
(5) RCW 90.38.040 (Trust water rights program) and 2001 c 237 s 29,
1994 c 264 s 90, & 1989 c 429 s 5;
(6) RCW 90.38.050 (Rules) and 1989 c 429 s 6;
(7) RCW 90.38.900 (Existing policies not replaced) and 1989 c 429
s 7;
(8) RCW 90.38.901 (Transfer of rights between irrigation districts
not intended) and 1989 c 429 s 8; and
(9) RCW 90.38.902 (Existing rights not impaired) and 1989 c 429 s
9.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---