BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state financial aid account is created in the custody of
the state treasurer. The primary purpose of the account is to ensure
that all appropriations designated for financial aid through statewide
student financial aid programs are made available to eligible students.
The account shall be a nontreasury account.
(2) The higher education coordinating board shall deposit in the
account all money received for the state need grant program established
under RCW 28B.92.010, the state work-study program established under
chapter 28B.12 RCW, the Washington scholars program established under
RCW 28A.600.110, the Washington award for vocational excellence program
established under RCW 28C.04.525, and the educational opportunity grant
program established under chapter 28B.101 RCW. The account shall
consist of funds appropriated by the legislature for the programs
listed in this subsection and private contributions to the programs.
Moneys deposited in the account do not lapse at the close of the fiscal
period for which they were appropriated. Both during and after the
fiscal period in which moneys were deposited in the account, the board
may expend moneys in the account only for the purposes for which they
were appropriated, and the expenditures are subject to any other
conditions or limitations placed on the appropriations.
(3) Expenditures from the account shall be used for scholarships to
students eligible for the programs according to program rules and
policies.
(4) Disbursements from the account are exempt from appropriations
and the allotment provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW.
(5) Only the executive director of the higher education
coordinating board or the executive director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account.

--- END ---