BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.50.140 and 2004 c 275 s 58 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each board of trustees:
(1) Shall operate all existing community and technical colleges in
its district;
(2) Shall create comprehensive programs of community and technical
college education and training and maintain an open-door policy in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 28B.50.090(3). However,
technical colleges, and college districts containing only technical
colleges, shall maintain programs solely for occupational education,
basic skills, and literacy purposes. For as long as a need exists,
technical colleges may continue those programs, activities, and
services they offered during the twelve-month period preceding
September 1, 1991;
(3) Shall employ for a period to be fixed by the board a college
president for each community and technical college and, may appoint a
president for the district, and fix and adjust their duties and
compensation, which may include elements other than salary.
Compensation under this subsection shall not affect but may supplement
retirement, health care, and other benefits that are otherwise
applicable to the presidents as state employees. The board shall also
employ for a period to be fixed by the board members of the faculty and
such other administrative officers and other employees as may be
necessary or appropriate and fix their salaries and duties.
Compensation and salary increases ((under this subsection)) applicable
to faculty, administrative officers, and other employees shall not
exceed the amount or percentage established for those purposes in the
state appropriations act by the legislature as allocated to the board
of trustees by the state board for community and technical colleges.
The state board for community and technical colleges shall adopt rules
defining the permissible elements of compensation under this
subsection;
(4) May establish, under the approval and direction of the college
board, new facilities as community needs and interests demand.
However, the authority of boards of trustees to purchase or lease major
off-campus facilities shall be subject to the approval of the higher
education coordinating board pursuant to RCW 28B.76.230;
(5) May establish or lease, operate, equip and maintain
dormitories, food service facilities, bookstores and other self-supporting facilities connected with the operation of the community and
technical college;
(6) May, with the approval of the college board, borrow money and
issue and sell revenue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness for the
construction, reconstruction, erection, equipping with permanent
fixtures, demolition and major alteration of buildings or other capital
assets, and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements,
improvements or appurtenances, for dormitories, food service
facilities, and other self-supporting facilities connected with the
operation of the community and technical college in accordance with the
provisions of RCW 28B.10.300 through 28B.10.330 where applicable;
(7) May establish fees and charges for the facilities authorized
hereunder, including reasonable rules and regulations for the
government thereof, not inconsistent with the rules and regulations of
the college board; each board of trustees operating a community and
technical college may enter into agreements, subject to rules and
regulations of the college board, with owners of facilities to be used
for housing regarding the management, operation, and government of such
facilities, and any board entering into such an agreement may:
(a) Make rules and regulations for the government, management and
operation of such housing facilities deemed necessary or advisable; and
(b) Employ necessary employees to govern, manage and operate the
same;
(8) May receive such gifts, grants, conveyances, devises and
bequests of real or personal property from private sources, as may be
made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, whenever the terms and
conditions thereof will aid in carrying out the community and technical
college programs as specified by law and the regulations of the state
college board; sell, lease or exchange, invest or expend the same or
the proceeds, rents, profits and income thereof according to the terms
and conditions thereof; and adopt regulations to govern the receipt and
expenditure of the proceeds, rents, profits and income thereof;
(9) May establish and maintain night schools whenever in the
discretion of the board of trustees it is deemed advisable, and
authorize classrooms and other facilities to be used for summer or
night schools, or for public meetings and for any other uses consistent
with the use of such classrooms or facilities for community and
technical college purposes;
(10) May make rules and regulations for pedestrian and vehicular
traffic on property owned, operated, or maintained by the district;
(11) Shall prescribe, with the assistance of the faculty, the
course of study in the various departments of the community and
technical college or colleges under its control, and publish such
catalogues and bulletins as may become necessary;
(12) May grant to every student, upon graduation or completion of
a course of study, a suitable diploma, nonbaccalaureate degree or
certificate. Technical colleges shall offer only nonbaccalaureate
technical degrees under the rules of the state board for community and
technical colleges that are appropriate to their work force education
and training mission. The primary purpose of this degree is to lead
the individual directly to employment in a specific occupation.
Technical colleges may not offer transfer degrees. The board, upon
recommendation of the faculty, may also confer honorary associate of
arts degrees upon persons other than graduates of the community
college, in recognition of their learning or devotion to education,
literature, art, or science. No degree may be conferred in
consideration of the payment of money or the donation of any kind of
property;
(13) Shall enforce the rules and regulations prescribed by the
state board for community and technical colleges for the government of
community and technical colleges, students and teachers, and promulgate
such rules and regulations and perform all other acts not inconsistent
with law or rules and regulations of the state board for community and
technical colleges as the board of trustees may in its discretion deem
necessary or appropriate to the administration of college districts:
PROVIDED, That such rules and regulations shall include, but not be
limited to, rules and regulations relating to housing, scholarships,
conduct at the various community and technical college facilities, and
discipline: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the board of trustees may suspend
or expel from community and technical colleges students who refuse to
obey any of the duly promulgated rules and regulations;
(14) May, by written order filed in its office, delegate to the
president or district president any of the powers and duties vested in
or imposed upon it by this chapter. Such delegated powers and duties
may be exercised in the name of the district board;
(15) May perform such other activities consistent with this chapter
and not in conflict with the directives of the college board;
(16) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, may offer
educational services on a contractual basis other than the tuition and
fee basis set forth in chapter 28B.15 RCW for a special fee to private
or governmental entities, consistent with rules and regulations adopted
by the state board for community and technical colleges: PROVIDED,
That the whole of such special fee shall go to the college district and
be not less than the full instructional costs of such services
including any salary increases authorized by the legislature for
community and technical college employees during the term of the
agreement: PROVIDED FURTHER, That enrollments generated hereunder
shall not be counted toward the official enrollment level of the
college district for state funding purposes;
(17) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, may offer
educational services on a contractual basis, charging tuition and fees
as set forth in chapter 28B.15 RCW, counting such enrollments for state
funding purposes, and may additionally charge a special supplemental
fee when necessary to cover the full instructional costs of such
services: PROVIDED, That such contracts shall be subject to review by
the state board for community and technical colleges and to such rules
as the state board may adopt for that purpose in order to assure that
the sum of the supplemental fee and the normal state funding shall not
exceed the projected total cost of offering the educational service:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That enrollments generated by courses offered on the
basis of contracts requiring payment of a share of the normal costs of
the course will be discounted to the percentage provided by the
college;
(18) Shall be authorized to pay dues to any association of trustees
that may be formed by the various boards of trustees; such association
may expend any or all of such funds to submit biennially, or more often
if necessary, to the governor and to the legislature, the
recommendations of the association regarding changes which would affect
the efficiency of such association;
(19) May participate in higher education centers and consortia that
involve any four-year public or independent college or university:
PROVIDED, That new degree programs or off-campus programs offered by a
four-year public or independent college or university in collaboration
with a community or technical college are subject to approval by the
higher education coordinating board under RCW 28B.76.230; and
(20) Shall perform any other duties and responsibilities imposed by
law or rule and regulation of the state board.

--- END ---