BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 72.72.030 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created, in the state treasury, an
institutional impact account. The secretary of social and health
services may reimburse political subdivisions for criminal justice
costs incurred directly as a result of crimes committed by offenders
residing in an institution as defined herein under the jurisdiction of
the secretary of social and health services or crimes committed by the
staff of such an institution. Such reimbursement shall be made to the
extent funds are available from the institutional impact account.
Reimbursements shall be limited to law enforcement, prosecutorial,
judicial, and jail facilities costs which are documented to be strictly
related to the criminal activities of the offender or staff. The
maximum allowable reimbursement rate for law enforcement costs in a
given criminal investigation must reflect, at a minimum, the actual
hourly wage rate, including fringe benefits, paid to the law
enforcement personnel investigating the crime.
(2) The secretary of corrections may reimburse political
subdivisions for criminal justice costs incurred directly as a result
of crimes committed by offenders residing in an institution as defined
herein under the jurisdiction of the secretary of corrections. Such
reimbursement shall be made to the extent funds are available from the
institutional impact account. Reimbursements shall be limited to law
enforcement, prosecutorial, judicial, and jail facilities costs which
are documented to be strictly related to the criminal activities of the
offender.

--- END ---