BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17.095 and 1995 c 397 s 31 are each amended to read
as follows:
The surplus funds of a candidate, or of a political committee
supporting or opposing a candidate, may only be disposed of in any one
or more of the following ways:
(1) Return the surplus to a contributor in an amount not to exceed
that contributor's original contribution;
(2) Transfer the surplus to the candidate's personal account as
reimbursement for lost earnings incurred as a result of that
candidate's election campaign. Such lost earnings shall be verifiable
as unpaid salary or, when the candidate is not salaried, as an amount
not to exceed income received by the candidate for services rendered
during an appropriate, corresponding time period. All lost earnings
incurred shall be documented and a record thereof shall be maintained
by the candidate or the candidate's political committee. The committee
shall include a copy of such record when its expenditure for such
reimbursement is reported pursuant to RCW 42.17.090;
(3) Transfer the surplus without limit to a political party or to
a caucus political committee;
(4) Donate the surplus to a charitable organization registered in
accordance with chapter 19.09 RCW;
(5) Transmit the surplus to the state treasurer for deposit in the
general fund, the oral history, state library, and archives account
under RCW 43.07.380, or the legislative international trade account
under RCW 44.04.270, as specified by the candidate or political
committee; or
(6) Hold the surplus in the campaign depository or depositories
designated in accordance with RCW 42.17.050 for possible use in a
future election campaign for the same office last sought by the
candidate and report any such disposition in accordance with RCW
42.17.090: PROVIDED, That if the candidate subsequently announces or
publicly files for office, information as appropriate is reported to
the commission in accordance with RCW 42.17.040 through 42.17.090. If
a subsequent office is not sought the surplus held shall be disposed of
in accordance with the requirements of this section.
(7) Hold the surplus campaign funds in a separate account for
nonreimbursed public office-related expenses or as provided in this
section, and report any such disposition in accordance with RCW
42.17.090. The separate account required under this subsection shall
not be used for deposits of campaign funds that are not surplus.
(8) No candidate or authorized committee may transfer funds to any
other candidate or other political committee.
The disposal of surplus funds under this section shall not be
considered a contribution for purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---