BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the preservation
of the integrity of the initiative and referendum process is of utmost
importance to the citizens of Washington. To protect the process from
fraudulent practices, compensation per signature, and the residency and
age of signature gatherers need to be addressed.
The legislature finds that paying workers who gather signatures for
initiatives and referendum petitions on the basis of the number of
signatures the worker secures increases the possibility of fraud in the
signature gathering process. This practice may encourage the signature
gatherer to misrepresent the ballot measure, to apply undue pressure on
a person to sign a petition that the person is not qualified to sign,
to encourage signing even if the person has previously signed, or to
invite forgery.
Article II of the Washington state Constitution reserves to the
people the power of the initiative and referendum. Washington gives
signature gatherers a major role in the electoral process, for they
collect signatures to put before Washington citizens significant issues
that may become law. Existing Washington law requires that a sponsor
who files a proposed initiative or referendum with the Secretary of
State be a registered Washington voter and that those who sign the
petition be registered Washington voters. The legislature finds that
the significant role in enacting state law played by petition signature
gatherers should be undertaken only by residents of Washington at least
eighteen years old.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 29A.72 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person who solicits or collects signatures on a statewide
initiative or referendum petition must be a resident of Washington and
must be at least eighteen years of age. The secretary of state may
make rules to implement this subsection.
(2) A person who pays another for soliciting or collecting
signatures on an initiative or referendum petition must pay wages at an
hourly rate or salary equal to or more than the minimum wage
established under RCW 49.46.020. The department of labor and
industries must enforce this subsection in a manner consistent with
Title 49 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---