BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.155
RCW to read as follows:
The legislature finds an urgent and substantial need to enhance the
development of all infants and toddlers with disabilities in Washington
in order to minimize developmental delays and to maximize individual
potential for learning and functioning.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.155
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By September 1, 2009, each school district shall provide or
contract for early intervention services to all eligible children with
disabilities from birth to three years of age. Eligibility shall be
determined according to Part C of the federal individuals with
disabilities education act and as specified in the Washington
Administrative Code. School districts shall provide or contract for
early intervention services in partnership with local birth-to-three
lead agencies and birth-to-three providers. Services provided under
this section shall not supplant services or funding currently provided
in the state for early intervention services to eligible children with
disabilities from birth to three years of age. The state-designated
birth-to-three lead agency shall be payor of last resort for birth-to-three early intervention services provided under this section.
(2) The services in this section are not part of the state's
program of basic education pursuant to Article IX of the state
Constitution.

--- END ---