BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.110 and 1965 ex.s. c 155 s 17 are each amended
to read as follows:
The following rules shall govern the overtaking and passing of
vehicles proceeding in the same direction, subject to those
limitations, exceptions and special rules hereinafter stated:
(1) The driver of a vehicle overtaking another vehicle proceeding
in the same direction shall pass to the left thereof at a safe distance
and shall not again drive to the right side of the roadway until safely
clear of the overtaken vehicle.
(2) The driver of a vehicle approaching a pedestrian or bicycle
that is on the right-hand shoulder of the roadway shall pass to the
left at a safe distance, taking into consideration the width or
condition of the shoulder or roadway, the apparent age or condition of
the pedestrian or bicyclist, the weather, the time of day, and other
conditions and shall not again drive to the right side of the roadway
until safely clear of the overtaken pedestrian or bicyclist.
(3) Except when overtaking and passing on the right is permitted,
the driver of an overtaken vehicle shall give way to the right in favor
of the overtaking vehicle on audible signal and shall not increase the
speed of his vehicle until completely passed by the overtaking vehicle.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.61.125 and 1972 ex.s. c 33 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No vehicle shall be driven on the left side of the roadway
under the following conditions:
(a) When approaching or upon the crest of a grade or a curve in the
highway where the driver's view is obstructed within such distance as
to create a hazard in the event another vehicle might approach from the
opposite direction;
(b) When approaching within one hundred feet of or traversing any
intersection or railroad grade crossing;
(c) When the view is obstructed upon approaching within one hundred
feet of any bridge, viaduct or tunnel;
(d) When a bicycle or pedestrian is within view of the driver and
is approaching from the opposite direction, or is present, in the
roadway or shoulder within a distance hazardous to the bicyclist or
pedestrian due to the width or condition of the shoulder or roadway,
the apparent age or condition of the bicyclist or pedestrian, the
weather, the time of day, or other conditions.
(2) The foregoing limitations shall not apply upon a one-way
roadway, nor under the conditions described in RCW 46.61.100(1)(b), nor
to the driver of a vehicle turning left into or from an alley, private
road or driveway.

--- END ---