BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 17.21.128 and 2004 c 100 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director may renew any certification or license issued
under authority of this chapter subject to the recertification
standards identified in subsection (2) of this section or an
examination requiring new knowledge that may be required to apply
pesticides.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, all
individuals licensed under this chapter shall meet the recertification
standards identified in (a) or (b) of this subsection, every five
years, in order to qualify for continuing licensure.
(a) Licensed pesticide applicators may qualify for continued
licensure through accumulation of recertification credits.
(i) Private applicators shall accumulate a minimum of twenty
department-approved credits every five years with no more than
((eight)) twelve credits allowed per year;
(ii) Limited private applicators shall accumulate a minimum of
eight department-approved credits every five years. All credits must
be applicable to the control of weeds with at least one-half of the
credits directly related to weed control and the remaining credits in
topic areas indirectly related to weed control, such as the safe and
legal use of pesticides;
(iii) Rancher private applicators shall accumulate a minimum of
twelve department-approved credits every five years;
(iv) All other license types established under this chapter shall
accumulate a minimum of forty department-approved credits every five
years with no more than fifteen credits allowed per year.
(b) Certified pesticide applicators may qualify for continued
licensure through meeting the examination requirements necessary to
become licensed in those areas in which the licensee operates.
(3) At the termination of a licensee's five-year recertification
period, the director may waive the requirements identified in
subsection (2) of this section if the licensee can demonstrate that he
or she is meeting comparable recertification standards through another
state or jurisdiction or through a federal environmental protection
agency approved government agency plan.

--- END ---