BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.55.110 and 2002 c 279 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When an unauthorized vehicle is impounded, the impounding
towing operator shall notify the legal and registered owners of the
impoundment of the unauthorized vehicle and the owners of any other
items of personal property registered or titled with the department.
The notification shall be sent by ((first-class)) certified mail, with
return receipt requested, within twenty-four hours after the
impoundment to the last known registered and legal owners of the
vehicle, and the owners of any other items of personal property
registered or titled with the department, as provided by the law
enforcement agency, and shall inform the owners of the identity of the
person or agency authorizing the impound. The notification shall
include the name of the impounding tow firm, its address, and telephone
number. The notice shall also include the location, time of the
impound, and by whose authority the vehicle was impounded. The notice
shall also include the written notice of the right of redemption and
opportunity for a hearing to contest the validity of the impoundment
pursuant to RCW 46.55.120.
(2) In addition, if a suspended license impound has been ordered,
the notice must state the length of the impound, the requirement of the
posting of a security deposit to ensure payment of the costs of
removal, towing, and storage, notification that if the security deposit
is not posted the vehicle will immediately be processed and sold at
auction as an abandoned vehicle, and the requirements set out in RCW
46.55.120(1)(b) regarding the payment of the costs of removal, towing,
and storage as well as providing proof of satisfaction of any
penalties, fines, or forfeitures before redemption. The notice must
also state that the registered owner is ineligible to purchase the
vehicle at the abandoned vehicle auction, if held.
(3) In the case of an abandoned vehicle, or other item of personal
property registered or titled with the department, within twenty-four
hours after receiving information on the owners from the department
through the abandoned vehicle report, the tow truck operator shall send
by certified mail, with return receipt requested, a notice of custody
and sale to the legal and registered owners and of the penalties for
the traffic infraction littering -- abandoned vehicle.
(4) If the date on which a notice required by subsection (1) or (3)
of this section is to be mailed falls upon a Saturday, Sunday, or a
postal holiday, the notice may be mailed on the next day that is
neither a Saturday, Sunday, nor a postal holiday.
(5) No notices need be sent to the legal or registered owners of an
impounded vehicle or other item of personal property registered or
titled with the department, if the vehicle or personal property has
been redeemed.

--- END ---