BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.32.121 and 2004 c 271 s 168 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the maximum
number of words for statements submitted by candidates is as follows:
State representative, one hundred words; state senator, judge of the
superior court, judge of the court of appeals, justice of the supreme
court, and all state offices voted upon throughout the state, except
that of governor, two hundred words; president and vice president,
United States senator, United States representative, and governor,
three hundred words.
(b) Candidates' statements that appear on the web site of the
secretary of state may contain up to one thousand words. The secretary
of state shall absorb within existing resources any increased costs due
to the maximum number of words in this subsection (1)(b) exceeding the
maximum established in (a) of this subsection.
(2) Arguments written by committees under RCW 29A.32.060 may not
exceed two hundred fifty words in length.
(3) Rebuttal arguments written by committees may not exceed
seventy-five words in length.
(4) The secretary of state shall allocate space in the pamphlet
based on the number of candidates or nominees for each office.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.32.250 and 2003 c 111 s 817 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If the legislative authority of a county or first-class or code
city provides for the inclusion of candidates in the local voters'
pamphlet, the pamphlet shall include the statements from candidates and
may also include those candidates' photographs.
(2) Candidates' statements that appear on the web sites of county
auditors may contain up to one thousand words.

--- END ---