BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.345.020 and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.61.020 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Until December 31, 2005, the membership of the school
directors' association shall comprise the members of the boards of
directors of the school districts of the state. School boards of
directors that intend to resign from the association under subsection
(2) of this section must provide the association with at least five
months' prior written notice of that intent.
(2) Beginning on January 1, 2006, membership in the school
directors' association shall be voluntary for school district boards of
directors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---