BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 72.02.110 and 1988 c 143 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As state, federal or other funds are available, the secretary
of corrections or his designee is authorized, in his discretion, not to
provide the forty dollars subsistence money or the optional sixty
dollars to a person or persons released as described in RCW 72.02.100,
and instead to utilize the authorization and procedure contained in
this section relative to such person or persons.
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any person
designated by the secretary serving a sentence for a term of
confinement in a state correctional facility for convicted felons,
pursuant to court commitment, who is thereafter released upon an order
of parole of the indeterminate ((sentencing)) sentence review board, or
is discharged from custody upon expiration of sentence, or is ordered
discharged from custody by a court of appropriate jurisdiction, shall
receive the sum of fifty-five dollars per week for a period of up to
six weeks. The initial weekly payment shall be made to such person
upon his release or parole by the superintendent of the institution.
Subsequent weekly payments shall be made to such person by the
community corrections officer at the office of such officer. In
addition to the initial six weekly payments provided for in this
section, a community corrections officer and his supervisor may, at
their discretion, continue such payments up to a maximum of twenty
additional weeks when they are satisfied that such person is actively
seeking employment and that such payments are necessary to continue the
efforts of such person to gain employment: PROVIDED, That if, at the
time of release or parole, in the opinion of the superintendent funds
are otherwise available to such person, with the exception of earnings
from labor or employment while in confinement, such weekly sums of
money or part thereof shall not be provided to such person.
When a person receiving such payments provided for in this section
becomes employed, he may continue to receive payments for two weeks
after the date he becomes employed but payments made after he becomes
employed shall be discontinued as of the date he is first paid for such
employment: PROVIDED, That no person shall receive payments for a
period exceeding the twenty-six week maximum as established in this
section.
The secretary of corrections may annually adjust the amount of
weekly payment provided for in this section to reflect changes in the
cost of living and the purchasing power of the sum set for the previous
year.
(2) Prior to the distribution of any funds used to facilitate
housing, including transitional housing funds or stipends, rent
assistance payments, and regional transition funds, for a released sex
offender classified as a risk level II or III, the secretary of
corrections must receive approval from the county or city legislative
authority where the offender intends to reside.

--- END ---