BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.76 RCW
under the subchapter heading "Part III - Education Services
Administration" to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that improving education and services for
children who are deaf or hard of hearing requires a corps of highly
trained teachers, knowledgeable of the most recent research and
pedagogy, and competent to address the full range of communication and
educational options for their students.
(2) The legislature also finds that the preservice training and
professional development necessary to create such a corps of teachers
are not currently available through teacher preparation or in-service
programs in Washington.
(3) Therefore the legislature intends to provide an incentive for
institutions of higher education to develop curricula, design education
and training programs, and use innovative service delivery models for
teachers of the deaf and hard of hearing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.76 RCW
under the subchapter heading "Part III - Education Services
Administration" to read as follows:
(1) Subject to legislative appropriation, the higher education
coordinating board may award, on a competitive basis, grants to public
institutions of higher education or consortia of institutions to
develop education programs for teachers of the deaf and hard of
hearing.
(2) The board shall develop guidelines for grant proposals,
including:
(a) Developing interdisciplinary curricula that cover the full
range of communication options for deaf and hard of hearing children,
including oral communication, American sign language, total
communication, and other communication modes. Program curricula shall
also address the full range of education for deaf and hard of hearing
children, including early intervention services, education in
mainstream classrooms, and education in separate learning environments
with other deaf and hard of hearing students;
(b) Using service delivery models that reach future and current
teachers across the state in a cost-effective manner; and
(c) Incorporating the curricula into both teacher preparation and
in-service programs and addressing the needs of both classroom teachers
and itinerant teachers.
(3) Priority shall be given to proposals from consortia of
institutions working in collaboration and proposals with the greatest
potential to reach a maximum number of teachers across the state.

--- END ---