BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that the
provision of safe drinking water for Washington's school children is of
great importance because young children are especially vulnerable to
drinking water contaminants like lead, which can cause learning
disabilities, decreased growth, hyperactivity, impaired hearing, and
abnormal brain development. The legislature finds that although water
delivered from the community's public water system must meet federal
and state standards for lead and other contaminants, a school building
may still have unacceptable drinking water contamination levels due to
pipes, plumbing materials, and water use patterns within the school
facility. The legislature finds that the best way to ensure that
drinking water is safe in a particular school building is to test
drinking and cooking water outlets such as taps, bubblers, and
fountains, and to promptly correct problems where contaminant
concentrations are found to exceed safe levels.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the state board of health.
(2) "Department" means the department of health.
(3) "School" means common schools under RCW 28A.150.020 and
approved private schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW.
(4) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The board shall adopt, by rule, drinking
water quality standards for lead, copper, cadmium, and corrosion within
school facilities. The board may adopt, by rule, school drinking water
quality standards for other contaminants if the board determines that:
(a) The presence of such contaminants is not due to insufficient
implementation of public water system standards or corrosion treatment
protocols; and (b) setting school drinking water standards for such
contaminants is necessary to protect public health and safety.
(2) In adopting school drinking water standards, the board shall be
guided by, but not limited to, the rules for controlling these
contaminants in drinking water as contained in 40 C.F.R. Sec. 141 and
EPA guidance promulgated thereunder. The standards shall provide
reasonable margins of safety.
(3) The board shall adopt emergency rules establishing interim
maximum contaminant levels and testing protocols by April 1, 2006. The
board shall adopt final maximum contaminant level standards and
protocols by April 1, 2007. The rules must include: (a) Drinking
water testing protocols, which shall be consistent with analytical
techniques and testing protocols specified by 40 C.F.R. Sec. 141, and
EPA guidance promulgated thereunder; (b) deadlines for school districts
to complete water quality testing; (c) requirements and deadlines for
providing test results to the department; (d) requirements and
deadlines for providing notice to students, parents, and school staff
when test results exceed school water quality standards; (e) facility
inspection protocols to ascertain causes of water quality problems; (f)
protocols to guide school districts in planning and implementing
actions to respond to the exceedances; and (g) requirements for
monitoring and reporting to the department following implementation of
corrective actions.
(4) Analysis of drinking water samples must be performed by a state
accredited drinking water laboratory.
(5) The board shall report to the legislature by December 1, 2006,
on the interim maximum contaminant levels and the board's initial
findings on the extent of school drinking water contamination and any
other contaminants in schools that may affect the health of children.
(6) The department shall adopt standards, consistent with
applicable federal standards, for lead plumbing and solders, or other
potential sources of lead contamination of drinking water.
(7) No local government may establish drinking water standards for
schools that are less protective than the standards or methods
established under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) It is the intent of this chapter that
the exclusive responsibility for undertaking corrective actions to
respond to exceedances of drinking water standards in schools remains
with the governing entities of the school institutions, but to ensure
that sufficient testing of drinking water is conducted to identify
where such exceedances are occurring and that test results are widely
accessible to parents, students, staff, and to local and state health
departments. It is further the intent of this chapter that compliance
enforcement by the state is unnecessary where full disclosure is
provided. Therefore, it is the intent of this chapter not to provide
additional corrective action authority to the board or the department,
but to require a report by the department of the status of the testing
and reporting program as required by subsection (2) of this section,
and for the legislature to determine upon consideration of the report
at that time whether the board or department should be granted
additional corrective action enforcement authority.
(2) The department shall post on its web site the results of
testing received under the standards established in section 3 of this
act, as well as corrective action and monitoring reports provided.
Each school or school district that maintains a web site shall also
post such test results and reports.
(3) The department shall examine compliance with adopted standards
and rules and provide a report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature biennially, beginning December 1, 2007. In the report due
December 1, 2011, the department shall report on the status of testing,
disclosure of test results, and corrective actions taken at school
facilities across the state. This report shall include any
recommendations, in bill form, for legislation that would improve
compliance with, or facilitate the enforcement or achievement of,
school safe drinking water standards established under this chapter,
including any needed compliance enforcement authority to be added to
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Within available funds, the department shall
provide technical assistance to school administrators in conducting
water quality testing and corrective actions pursuant to this chapter.
The department and the board shall cooperate with local health
jurisdictions in establishing the standards under section 3 of this act
and in providing the technical assistance under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This chapter is supplemental to and does not
replace or diminish the authority of the board or department granted by
other laws to ensure the provision of safe drinking water within
schools.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This chapter does not apply to schools that
are regulated as nontransient noncommunity systems under chapter 246-290 WAC.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---