BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.36.030 and 2003 c 198 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary of transportation shall have the power and it
shall be its duty to adopt and designate a uniform state standard for
the manufacture, display, erection, and location of all signs, signals,
signboards, guideposts, and other traffic devices erected or to be
erected upon the state highways of the state of Washington for the
purpose of furnishing information to persons traveling upon such state
highways regarding traffic regulations, directions, distances, points
of danger, and conditions requiring caution, and for the purpose of
imposing restrictions upon persons operating vehicles thereon. Such
signs shall conform as nearly as practicable to the manual of
specifications for the manufacture, display, and erection of uniform
traffic control devices for streets and highways and all amendments,
corrections, and additions thereto.
(2) The department of transportation shall prepare plans and
specifications of the uniform state standard of traffic devices so
adopted and designated, showing the materials, colors, and designs
thereof, and shall upon the issuance of any such plans and
specifications or revisions thereof and upon request, furnish to the
boards of county commissioners and the governing body of any
incorporated city or town, a copy thereof. Signs, signals, signboards,
guideposts, and other traffic devices erected on county roads shall
conform in all respects to the specifications of color, design, and
location approved by the secretary. Traffic devices hereafter erected
within incorporated cities and towns shall conform to such uniform
state standard of traffic devices so far as is practicable. The
uniform system must allow local transit authority bus shelters located
within the right of way of the state highway system to display and
maintain commercial advertisements subject to applicable federal
regulations, if any.
(3) The uniform system adopted by the secretary under this section
may allow signs, banners, or decorations over a highway that:
(a) Are in unincorporated areas;
(b) Are at least twenty vertical feet above a highway; and
(c) Do not interfere with or obstruct the view of any traffic
control device.
The department shall adopt rules regulating signs, banners, or
decorations installed under this subsection (3).

Sec. 2 RCW 47.42.020 and 1993 c 430 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Department" means the Washington state department of
transportation.
(2) "Erect" means to construct, build, raise, assemble, place,
affix, attach, create, paint, draw, or in any other way bring into
being or establish.
(3) "Interstate system" means any state highway which is or does
become part of the national system of interstate and defense highways
as described in section 103(d) of title 23, United States Code.
(4) "Maintain" means to allow to exist.
(5) "Person" means this state or any public or private corporation,
firm, partnership, association, as well as any individual or
individuals.
(6) "Primary system" means any state highway which is or does
become part of the federal-aid primary system as described in section
103(b) of title 23, United States Code.
(7) "Scenic system" means (a) any state highway within any public
park, federal forest area, public beach, public recreation area, or
national monument, (b) any state highway or portion thereof outside the
boundaries of any incorporated city or town designated by the
legislature as a part of the scenic system, or (c) any state highway or
portion thereof outside the boundaries of any incorporated city or town
designated by the legislature as a part of the scenic and recreational
highway system except for the sections of highways specifically
excluded in RCW 47.42.025 or located within areas zoned by the
governing county for predominantly commercial and industrial uses, and
having development visible to the highway, as determined by the
department.
(8) "Sign" means any outdoor sign, display, device, figure,
painting, drawing, message, placard, poster, billboard, or other thing
that is designed, intended, or used to advertise or inform, any part of
the advertising or informative contents of which is visible from any
place on the main-traveled way of the interstate system or other state
highway. "Sign" does not include a display authorized under RCW
47.36.030(3) promoting a local agency sponsored event that does not
include advertising.
(9) "Commercial and industrial areas" means any area zoned
commercial or industrial by a county or municipal code, or if unzoned
or zoned for general uses by a county or municipal code, that area
occupied by three or more separate and distinct commercial or
industrial activities, or any combination thereof, within a space of
five hundred feet and the area within five hundred feet of such
activities on both sides of the highway. The area shall be measured
from the outer edges of the regularly used buildings, parking lots, or
storage or processing areas of the commercial or industrial activity
and not from the property lines of the parcels upon which the
activities are located. Measurements shall be along or parallel to the
edge of the main traveled way of the highway. The following shall not
be considered commercial or industrial activities:
(a) Agricultural, forestry, grazing, farming, and related
activities, including, but not limited to, wayside fresh produce
stands;
(b) Transient or temporary activities;
(c) Railroad tracks and minor sidings;
(d) Signs;
(e) Activities more than six hundred and sixty feet from the
nearest edge of the right of way;
(f) Activities conducted in a building principally used as a
residence.
If any commercial or industrial activity that has been used in defining
or delineating an unzoned area ceases to operate for a period of six
continuous months, any signs located within the former unzoned area
become nonconforming and shall not be maintained by any person.
(10) "Roadside area information panel or display" means a panel or
display located so as not to be readable from the main traveled way,
erected in a safety rest area, scenic overlook, or similar roadside
area, for providing motorists with information in the specific interest
of the traveling public.
(11) "Temporary agricultural directional sign" means a sign on
private property adjacent to state highway right of way to provide
directional information to places of business offering for sale
seasonal agricultural products on the property where the sale is taking
place.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---