BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.30.270 and 2003 c 323 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No officer or employee of this state, or of any public agency,
public authority or public corporation except a public corporation or
public authority created pursuant to agreement or compact with another
state, and no person acting or purporting to act on behalf of such
officer or employee, or public agency or public authority or public
corporation, shall, with respect to any public building or construction
contract which is about to be, or which has been competitively bid,
require the bidder to make application to, or to furnish financial data
to, or to obtain or procure, any of the surety bonds or contracts of
insurance specified in connection with such contract, or specified by
any law, general, special or local, from a particular insurer or agent
or broker.
(2) No such officer or employee or any person, acting or purporting
to act on behalf of such officer or employee shall negotiate, make
application for, obtain or procure any of such surety bonds or
contracts of insurance, except contracts of insurance for builder's
risk or owner's protective liability, which can be obtained or procured
by the bidder, contractor or subcontractor.
(3) This section shall not be construed to prevent the exercise by
such officer or employee on behalf of the state or such public agency,
public authority, or public corporation of its right to approve the
form, sufficiency or manner or execution of the surety bonds or
contracts of insurance furnished by the insurer selected by the bidder
to underwrite such bonds, or contracts of insurance.
(4) Any provisions in any invitation for bids, or in any of the
contract documents, in conflict with this section are declared to be
contrary to the public policy of this state.
(5) A violation of this section shall be subject to the penalties
provided by RCW 48.01.080.
(6) This section shall not apply to((:
(a) The public nonprofit corporation authorized under RCW
67.40.020;
(b) Projects in excess of one hundred million dollars for port
districts formed under chapter 53.04 RCW;
(c) A regional transit authority authorized under RCW 81.112.030;
or
(d) Projects in excess of one hundred million dollars for counties
with a population over one million, for projects administered for
public hospitals)) county governments, city governments, public
nonprofit corporations authorized under RCW 67.40.020, port districts
authorized under chapter 53.04 RCW, or regional transit authorities
authorized under RCW 81.112.030, when the actual or estimated aggregate
value of a public construction project exclusive of insurance and
surety costs, exceeds two hundred million dollars.
For purposes of applying the two hundred million dollar threshold
in this subsection, "public construction project" means projects with
phases, segments, or component parts relating to a common geographic
site or public transportation system. "Public construction project"
does not mean the aggregation of unrelated construction projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) 2003 c 323 s 2;
(2) 2003 c 323 s 3 (uncodified);
(3) 2003 c 323 s 4 (uncodified);
(4) RCW 53.08.145 (Insurance -- Determination of risks, hazards,
liabilities -- Acquisition of appropriate insurance) and 2000 c 143 s 1;
and
(5) 2000 c 143 s 3 (uncodified).

--- END ---