BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.15.050 and 1998 c 190 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, as used in this
chapter, "conviction" means a final conviction in a state or municipal
court or an unvacated forfeiture of bail or collateral deposited to
secure the defendant's appearance in court. A plea of guilty, or a
finding of guilt for a violation of this title or rule of the
commission or director constitutes a conviction regardless of whether
the imposition of sentence is deferred or the penalty is suspended.
"Conviction" also means an uncontested notice of infraction, a
determination, judgment, or finding that an infraction has been
committed, or a failure to appear after requesting a hearing to contest
an infraction. The commission may, by rule, designate infractions that
are not included within the definition of "conviction."

--- END ---