BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.72.100 and 2003 c 111 s 1811 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The person proposing the measure shall print blank petitions
upon single sheets of paper of good writing quality (including but not
limited to newsprint) not less than ((eleven)) eight and one-half
inches in width and not less than ((fourteen)) eleven inches in length.
Each petition at the time of circulating, signing, and filing with the
secretary of state must consist of not more than one sheet with
numbered lines for not more than twenty signatures, with the prescribed
warning and title, be in the form required by RCW 29A.72.110,
29A.72.120, or 29A.72.130, and have a readable, full, true, and correct
copy of the proposed measure printed on the reverse side of the
petition.
(2) Nothing in this section prohibits the person proposing the
measure from making the blank petition available in electronic form to
persons intending to print and circulate petitions, as long as the
electronic form is secured so that the blank petition may not be
altered by a person of ordinary skill before printing. The secretary
of state may make the electronic form of the blank petition available
for download from the secretary of state's web site.
(3) The secretary of state shall adopt rules establishing
readability standards, including, but not limited to, the minimum font
size of the text used on petitions.

--- END ---