BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.24.070 and 2003 c 111 s 607 are each amended to
read as follows:
Declarations of candidacy shall be filed with the following filing
officers:
(1) The secretary of state for declarations of candidacy for
statewide offices, United States senate, and United States house of
representatives;
(2) The secretary of state for declarations of candidacy for the
state legislature, the court of appeals, and the superior court when
((voters from)) the candidate is seeking office in a district
((comprising more than one county vote upon the candidates)) comprised
of voters from two or more counties. The secretary of state and the
county auditor may accept declarations of candidacy for candidates for
the state legislature, the court of appeals, and the superior court
when the candidate is seeking office in a district comprised of voters
from one county;
(3) The county auditor for all other offices. For any nonpartisan
office, other than judicial offices and school director in joint
districts, where voters from a district comprising more than one county
vote upon the candidates, a declaration of candidacy shall be filed
with the county auditor of the county in which a majority of the
registered voters of the district reside. For school directors in
joint school districts, the declaration of candidacy shall be filed
with the county auditor of the county designated by the state board of
education as the county to which the joint school district is
considered as belonging under RCW 28A.323.040;
(4) For all other purposes of this title, a declaration of
candidacy for the state legislature, the court of appeals, and the
superior court filed with the secretary of state shall be deemed to
have been filed with the county auditor when the candidate is seeking
office in a district composed of voters from one county.
Each official with whom declarations of candidacy are filed under
this section, within one business day following the closing of the
applicable filing period, shall transmit to the public disclosure
commission the information required in RCW ((29A.24.030)) 29A.24.031
(1) through (4) for each declaration of candidacy filed in his or her
office during such filing period or a list containing the name of each
candidate who files such a declaration in his or her office during such
filing period together with a precise identification of the position
sought by each such candidate and the date on which each such
declaration was filed. Such official, within three days following his
or her receipt of any letter withdrawing a person's name as a
candidate, shall also forward a copy of such withdrawal letter to the
public disclosure commission.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.24.091 and 2004 c 271 s 160 are each amended to
read as follows:
A filing fee of one dollar shall accompany each declaration of
candidacy for precinct committee officer; a filing fee of ten dollars
shall accompany the declaration of candidacy for any office with a
fixed annual salary of one thousand dollars or less; a filing fee equal
to one percent of the annual salary of the office at the time of filing
shall accompany the declaration of candidacy for any office with a
fixed annual salary of more than one thousand dollars per annum. No
filing fee need accompany a declaration of candidacy for any office for
which compensation is on a per diem or per meeting attended basis.
A candidate who lacks sufficient assets or income at the time of
filing to pay the filing fee required by this section shall submit with
his or her declaration of candidacy a nominating petition. The
petition shall contain not less than a number of signatures of
registered voters equal to the number of dollars of the filing fee.
The signatures shall be of voters registered to vote within the
jurisdiction of the office for which the candidate is filing.
When the candidacy is for:
(1) A legislative or judicial office that includes territory from
more than one county, the fee shall be paid to the secretary of state
for equal division between the treasuries of the counties comprising
the district.
(2) A legislative or judicial office that includes territory from
only one county:
(a) The fee shall be paid to the county auditor if the candidate
filed his or her declaration of candidacy with the county auditor;
(b) The fee shall be paid to the secretary of state if the
candidate filed his or her declaration of candidacy with the secretary
of state. The secretary of state shall then promptly transmit the fee
to the county auditor of the county in which the legislative or
judicial office is located.
(3) A city or town office, the fee shall be paid to the county
auditor who shall transmit it to the city or town clerk for deposit in
the city or town treasury.

--- END ---