BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 OFFICE CREATED--PURPOSE. (1) The office of
the open government ombudsman is created within the office of the
attorney general to provide information on public records and open
public meetings to state and local agencies and the public, represent
the public in obtaining public records from state and local agencies,
and maintain a web site to assist the public in obtaining information
and public records under this chapter.
(2) The ombudsman shall report directly to the attorney general.
(3) The ombudsman may hire staff to implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 OMBUDSMAN--APPOINTMENT, TERM OF OFFICE. (1)
The attorney general shall appoint an ombudsman who is a person of
recognized judgment, independence, objectivity, and integrity, a member
of the Washington state bar association, and who is qualified by
training or experience, or both, in issues of public disclosure and
public records.
(2) The person appointed ombudsman shall hold office for a term of
three years and shall continue to hold office until reappointed or
until his or her successor is appointed. The attorney general may
remove the ombudsman only for neglect of duty, misconduct, or inability
to perform duties. Any vacancy shall be filled by similar appointment
for the remainder of the unexpired term.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 DUTIES. The office of the open government
ombudsman shall perform the following duties:
(1) Provide training and legal advice to state and local agencies
and the public on the rights and responsibilities of individuals
requesting public records, on the procedures for obtaining public
records, and on the responsibilities of state and local agencies to
release records;
(2) Upon receipt of a legally sufficient complaint, investigate the
refusal of an agency to disclose public records and provide legal
representation for individuals alleging:
(a) They have a legal claim of access to public records;
(b) The agency has redacted information that should be disclosed;
or
(c) There has been a delay in disclosing records;
(3) Provide training to state and local agencies on agency
responsibilities relating to open public meetings;
(4) Submit annually by November 1st to the attorney general and
appropriate committees of the legislature a report analyzing the work
of the office of the open government ombudsman;
(5) Establish and maintain a public records clearinghouse and
informational web site; and
(6) Adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 COMPLAINTS. The office of the open
government ombudsman shall adopt rules establishing a formal complaint
process to be used by members of the public and the office. A
complaint shall be considered legally sufficient for purposes of
sections 1 through 4 of this act if it states the grounds and factual
basis upon which the complainant believes a complaint should be
conducted and is signed by the complainant.

Sec. 5 RCW 42.17.325 and 1992 c 139 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever a state agency concludes that a public record is exempt
from disclosure and denies a person opportunity to inspect or copy a
public record for that reason, the person may request the ((attorney
general)) open government ombudsman to review the matter. The
((attorney general)) open government ombudsman shall provide the person
with his or her written opinion on whether the record is exempt.
Nothing in this section shall be deemed to establish an attorney-client relationship between the ((attorney general)) open government
ombudsman and a person making a request under this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 42.17.348 and 1992 c 139 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((attorney general's)) office of the open government ombudsman
shall publish, and update ((when appropriate)) annually, a pamphlet,
written in plain language, explaining the provisions of ((the)) public
records ((subdivision of)) disclosure under this chapter and open
public meetings under chapter 42.30 RCW.

Sec. 7 RCW 42.30.210 and 2001 c 216 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((attorney general's office)) open government ombudsman may
provide information, technical assistance, and training on the
provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this act
are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 4 of this act are each
added to chapter 42.17 RCW.

--- END ---