BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.43.735 and 1991 c 3 s 297 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It shall be the duty of the sheriff or director of public
safety of every county, and the chief of police of every city or town,
and of every chief officer of other law enforcement agencies duly
operating within this state, to cause the photographing and
fingerprinting of all adults and juveniles lawfully arrested for the
commission of any criminal offense constituting a felony or gross
misdemeanor. (a) When such juveniles are brought directly to a
juvenile detention facility, the juvenile court administrator is also
authorized, but not required, to cause the photographing,
fingerprinting, and record transmittal to the appropriate law
enforcement agency; and (b) a further exception may be made when the
arrest is for a violation punishable as a gross misdemeanor and the
arrested person is not taken into custody.
(2)(a) Beginning January 1, 2006, it is the duty of the sheriff or
director of public safety of every county, and the chief of police of
every city or town, and of every chief officer of other law enforcement
agencies duly operating within this state, to cause the collection of
biological samples for DNA identification analysis from all adults and
juveniles lawfully arrested for the commission of any criminal offense
constituting a felony, gross misdemeanor, or patronizing a prostitute
under RCW 9A.88.110.
(b) Biological samples collected under this subsection shall be:
(i) Collected using the same technique biological samples are
collected under RCW 43.43.754;
(ii) Forwarded to the forensic laboratory services bureau of the
Washington state patrol for inclusion in the DNA identification system
established under RCW 43.43.752 through 43.43.759; and
(iii) Used solely for the purposes of inclusion in the DNA
identification system established under RCW 43.43.752 through
43.43.759.
(c) This subsection applies to all adults and juveniles who are
arrested on or after January 1, 2006.
(d) This subsection shall not apply unless local law enforcement
agencies are reimbursed for biological sample collection costs as
provided for under RCW 43.43.7532.
(3) It shall be the right, but not the duty, of the sheriff or
director of public safety of every county, and the chief of police of
every city or town, and every chief officer of other law enforcement
agencies operating within this state to photograph and record the
fingerprints of all adults lawfully arrested, all persons who are the
subject of dependency record information, or all persons who are the
subject of protection proceeding record information.
(((3))) (4) Such sheriffs, directors of public safety, chiefs of
police, and other chief law enforcement officers, may record, in
addition to photographs and fingerprints, the palmprints, soleprints,
toeprints, or any other identification data of all persons whose
photograph and fingerprints are required or allowed to be taken under
this section, all persons who are the subject of dependency record
information, or all persons who are the subject of protection
proceeding record information, when in the discretion of such law
enforcement officers it is necessary for proper identification of the
arrested person or the investigation of the crime with which he is
charged.
(((4))) (5) It shall be the duty of the department of health or the
court having jurisdiction over the dependency action and protection
proceedings under chapter 74.34 RCW to cause the fingerprinting of all
persons who are the subject of a disciplinary board final decision,
dependency record information, protection proceeding record
information, or to obtain other necessary identifying information, as
specified by the section in rules adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW to
carry out the provisions of this subsection.
(((5))) (6) The court having jurisdiction over the dependency or
protection proceeding action may obtain and record, in addition to
fingerprints, the photographs, palmprints, soleprints, toeprints, or
any other identification data of all persons who are the subject of
dependency record information or protection proceeding record
information, when in the discretion of the court it is necessary for
proper identification of the person.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.43.754 and 2002 c 289 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every adult or juvenile individual convicted of a felony,
((stalking under RCW 9A.46.110, harassment under RCW 9A.46.020,
communicating with a minor for immoral purposes under RCW 9.68A.090))
gross misdemeanor, or patronizing a prostitute under RCW 9A.88.110, or
adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile offense, must have a
biological sample collected for purposes of DNA identification analysis
unless a biological sample has already been collected from the adult or
juvenile under RCW 43.43.735(2). The biological sample shall be
collected in the following manner:
(a) For persons convicted of such offenses or adjudicated guilty of
an equivalent juvenile offense who do not serve a term of confinement
in a department of corrections facility, and do serve a term of
confinement in a city or county jail facility, the city or county shall
be responsible for obtaining the biological samples either as part of
the intake process into the city or county jail or detention facility
for those persons convicted on or after July 1, 2002, or within a
reasonable time after July 1, 2002, for those persons incarcerated
before July 1, 2002, who have not yet had a biological sample
collected, beginning with those persons who will be released the
soonest.
(b) For persons convicted of such offenses or adjudicated guilty of
an equivalent juvenile offense who do not serve a term of confinement
in a department of corrections facility, and do not serve a term of
confinement in a city or county jail facility, the local police
department or sheriff's office is responsible for obtaining the
biological samples after sentencing on or after July 1, 2002.
(c) For persons convicted of such offenses or adjudicated guilty of
an equivalent juvenile offense, who are serving or who are to serve a
term of confinement in a department of corrections facility or a
department of social and health services facility, the facility holding
the person shall be responsible for obtaining the biological samples
either as part of the intake process into such facility for those
persons convicted on or after July 1, 2002, or within a reasonable time
after July 1, 2002, for those persons incarcerated before July 1, 2002,
who have not yet had a biological sample collected, beginning with
those persons who will be released the soonest.
(2)(a) Any biological sample taken pursuant to RCW 43.43.735 and
sent to the forensic laboratory services bureau shall be analyzed
unless a searchable DNA profile for the offender has previously been
entered in the DNA profile system. The searchable DNA profile shall be
entered into the DNA identification system only after the accused has
been charged for the offense. The original biological sample shall be
retained through the disposition of the underlying criminal case that
caused the biological sample to be taken.
(b) Upon conviction, the biological sample and searchable DNA
profile shall remain in the DNA identification system.
(c) The biological sample shall be destroyed and the DNA profile
shall be removed from the DNA identification system if:
(i) Following arrest, the accused is not charged within the
applicable charging period;
(ii) The accused has been found not guilty or has been acquitted of
any offense that would require a biological sample to be collected
under RCW 43.43.735; or
(iii) The underlying conviction or adjudication serving as the
basis for taking the biological sample has been reversed and the case
dismissed.
(3) The searchable DNA profile shall be sent to the federal bureau
of investigation for a one-time keyboard search but may be entered in
the combined DNA index system only after the accused has been found
guilty and all right of appeal has lapsed, been waived, or been
exhausted.
(4) Any biological sample taken pursuant to RCW 43.43.752 through
43.43.758 ((may be retained by the forensic laboratory services bureau,
and shall be used solely for the purpose of providing DNA or other
tests for identification analysis and prosecution of a criminal offense
or for the identification of human remains or missing persons. Nothing
in this section prohibits the submission of results derived from the
biological samples to the federal bureau of investigation combined DNA
index system.
(3))) and sent to the forensic laboratory services bureau shall be
analyzed and the searchable DNA profile shall be entered into the DNA
identification system unless a searchable DNA profile for the offender
has previously been entered in the DNA profile system.
(5) Any biological sample taken pursuant to RCW 43.43.735 and
43.43.752 through 43.43.758 shall be used solely for the purpose of
providing DNA or other tests for identification analysis and
prosecution of a criminal offense or for the identification of human
remains or missing persons. Nothing in this section prohibits the
submission of results derived from the biological samples to the
federal bureau of investigation combined DNA index system.
(6) The director of the forensic laboratory services bureau of the
Washington state patrol shall perform testing on all biological samples
collected under subsection (1) of this section, to the extent allowed
by funding available for this purpose. The director shall give
priority to testing on samples collected from those adults or juveniles
convicted of a felony or adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile
offense that is defined as a sex offense or a violent offense in RCW
9.94A.030.
(((4))) (7) This section applies to all adults who are convicted of
a sex or violent offense after July 1, 1990; and to all adults who were
convicted of a sex or violent offense on or prior to July 1, 1990, and
who are still incarcerated on or after July 25, 1999. This section
applies to all juveniles who are adjudicated guilty of a sex or violent
offense after July 1, 1994; and to all juveniles who were adjudicated
guilty of a sex or violent offense on or prior to July 1, 1994, and who
are still incarcerated on or after July 25, 1999. This section applies
to all adults and juveniles who are convicted of a felony other than a
sex or violent offense, stalking under RCW 9A.46.110, harassment under
RCW 9A.46.020, or communicating with a minor for immoral purposes under
RCW 9.68A.090, or adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile offense,
on or after July 1, 2002; and to all adults and juveniles who were
convicted or adjudicated guilty of such an offense before July 1, 2002,
and are still incarcerated on or after July 1, 2002. This section
applies to all adults and juveniles who are convicted of a felony,
gross misdemeanor, or patronizing a prostitute on or after the
effective date of this act; and to all adults and juveniles who were
convicted or adjudicated guilty of such an offense before the effective
date of this act, and are still incarcerated on or after the effective
date of this act.
(((5))) (8) This section creates no rights in a third person. No
cause of action may be brought based upon the noncollection or
nonanalysis or the delayed collection or analysis of a biological
sample authorized to be taken under RCW 43.43.752 through 43.43.758.
(((6))) (9) The detention, arrest, or conviction of a person based
upon a data base match or data base information is not invalidated if
it is determined that the sample was obtained or placed in the data
base by mistake, or if the conviction or juvenile adjudication that
resulted in the collection of the biological sample was subsequently
vacated or otherwise altered in any future proceeding including but not
limited to posttrial or postfact-finding motions, appeals, or
collateral attacks.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.43.7532 and 2002 c 289 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state DNA data base account is created in the custody of
the state treasurer. All receipts under RCW 43.43.7541, 46.63.110(9),
and section 6 of this act must be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for:
(a) Creation, operation, and maintenance of the DNA data base under
RCW 43.43.754;
(b) Biological sample analysis for samples taken under RCW
43.43.735 and 43.43.754;
(c) Biological sample collection costs, which include reimbursing
local law enforcement for collecting biological samples under RCW
43.43.735 and 43.43.754. These costs shall include expenditures for
DNA collection kits, postage, training, and the extra time necessary to
collect the biological sample;
(d) Costs related to identifying and destroying biological samples
as required under RCW 43.43.754(2);
(e) Costs related to developing and implementing a system that can
identify which individuals already have DNA profiles on the data base;
and
(f) Costs relating to testing crime scene DNA evidence.
(2) Only the chief of the Washington state patrol or the chief's
designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures. The chief shall make
reimbursing local law enforcement for their biological sample
collection costs under subsection (1)(c) of this section a priority
expenditure for the funds received in the account.
(3) Beginning in 2010, the chief of the Washington state patrol is
authorized to proportionately redistribute account surpluses back to
the local governments that contributed to the account. The local
governments shall only use the surplus funds for forensic DNA related
programs, such as training, DNA collection, and other programs that
encourage the utilization of DNA to solve and prevent crimes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any biological sample taken pursuant to RCW 43.43.735 or
43.43.752 through 43.43.758 shall be used solely for the purpose of
providing DNA or other tests for identification analysis and
prosecution of a criminal offense, or for the identification of human
remains or missing persons.
(2) Any person who prevails in a court action seeking damages for
misuse or unauthorized retention of a biological sample or DNA profile
under this section or for violation of RCW 43.43.754(2) (b) or (c)
shall be awarded all costs, including reasonable attorney fees,
incurred in connection with the action. In addition, the court shall
award not less than one thousand dollars total or ten dollars for each
day of the violation, whichever is greater.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.63.110 and 2003 c 380 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be
assessed a monetary penalty. No penalty may exceed two hundred and
fifty dollars for each offense unless authorized by this chapter or
title.
(2) The monetary penalty for a violation of RCW 46.55.105(2) is two
hundred fifty dollars for each offense. No penalty assessed under this
subsection (2) may be reduced.
(3) The supreme court shall prescribe by rule a schedule of
monetary penalties for designated traffic infractions. This rule shall
also specify the conditions under which local courts may exercise
discretion in assessing fines and penalties for traffic infractions.
The legislature respectfully requests the supreme court to adjust this
schedule every two years for inflation.
(4) There shall be a penalty of twenty-five dollars for failure to
respond to a notice of traffic infraction except where the infraction
relates to parking as defined by local law, ordinance, regulation, or
resolution or failure to pay a monetary penalty imposed pursuant to
this chapter. A local legislative body may set a monetary penalty not
to exceed twenty-five dollars for failure to respond to a notice of
traffic infraction relating to parking as defined by local law,
ordinance, regulation, or resolution. The local court, whether a
municipal, police, or district court, shall impose the monetary penalty
set by the local legislative body.
(5) Monetary penalties provided for in chapter 46.70 RCW which are
civil in nature and penalties which may be assessed for violations of
chapter 46.44 RCW relating to size, weight, and load of motor vehicles
are not subject to the limitation on the amount of monetary penalties
which may be imposed pursuant to this chapter.
(6) Whenever a monetary penalty is imposed by a court under this
chapter it is immediately payable. If the person is unable to pay at
that time the court may, in its discretion, grant an extension of the
period in which the penalty may be paid. If the penalty is not paid on
or before the time established for payment the court shall notify the
department of the failure to pay the penalty, and the department shall
suspend the person's driver's license or driving privilege until the
penalty has been paid and the penalty provided in subsection (4) of
this section has been paid.
(7) In addition to any other penalties imposed under this section
and not subject to the limitation of subsection (1) of this section, a
person found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be assessed
a fee of five dollars per infraction. Under no circumstances shall
this fee be reduced or waived. Revenue from this fee shall be
forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the emergency medical
services and trauma care system trust account under RCW 70.168.040.
(8)(a) In addition to any other penalties imposed under this
section and not subject to the limitation of subsection (1) of this
section, a person found to have committed a traffic infraction other
than of RCW 46.61.527 shall be assessed an additional penalty of twenty
dollars. The court may not reduce, waive, or suspend the additional
penalty unless the court finds the offender to be indigent. If a
community restitution program for offenders is available in the
jurisdiction, the court shall allow offenders to offset all or a part
of the penalty due under this subsection (8) by participation in the
community restitution program.
(b) Eight dollars and fifty cents of the additional penalty under
(a) of this subsection shall be remitted to the state treasurer. The
remaining revenue from the additional penalty must be remitted under
chapters 2.08, 3.46, 3.50, 3.62, 10.82, and 35.20 RCW. Money remitted
under this subsection to the state treasurer must be deposited as
provided in RCW 43.08.250. The balance of the revenue received by the
county or city treasurer under this subsection must be deposited into
the county or city current expense fund. Moneys retained by the city
or county under this subsection shall constitute reimbursement for any
liabilities under RCW 43.135.060.
(9) In addition to any other penalties imposed under this section
and not subject to the limitation of subsection (1) of this section, a
person found to have committed a traffic infraction other than a
parking offense shall be assessed a penalty assessment equal to five
percent of the monetary penalty prescribed in the schedule adopted
under subsection (3) of this section per infraction. Under no
circumstances shall this assessment be reduced or waived. Revenue from
this assessment shall be forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit
in the DNA data base account under RCW 43.43.7532.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
When any person is found guilty in any superior court of having
committed a crime, there shall be imposed by the court upon such
convicted person a penalty assessment. The assessment shall be in
addition to any other penalty or fine imposed by law and shall be equal
to ten percent of the penalty or fine imposed for each conviction of a
crime. Revenue from this assessment shall be forwarded to the state
treasurer for deposit in the DNA data base account under RCW
43.43.7532.

--- END ---