BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature believes that electronic
monitoring, as an alternative to incarceration, is a proper and cost-effective method of punishment and supervision for many criminal
offenders. The legislature further finds that advancements in
electronic monitoring technology have made the technology more common
and acceptable to criminal justice system personnel, policymakers, and
the general public.
In an effort to reduce prison and jail populations, many states
are increasing their utilization of electronic monitoring. However,
Washington state's use of electronic monitoring has been relatively
stagnate.
The intent of this act is to determine what electronic monitoring
policies and programs have been implemented in the other forty-nine
states, in order that Washington state can learn from the other states'
experiences.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The Washington association of sheriffs
and police chiefs shall conduct a comprehensive study on electronic
monitoring in every state. The study shall review and analyze each
state's activity regarding electronic monitoring. Specifically, the
study shall include:
(a) How often electronic monitoring is used;
(b) A description of laws and circumstances of when an offender is
placed on electronic monitoring;
(c) The discovery and analysis of specific programs used to promote
electronic monitoring and how they are operated;
(d) The type of electronic monitoring technology used;
(e) Evaluation of offender pay programs and the amount of money
recovered from these programs;
(f) Overall perceptions of electronic monitoring from the criminal
justice community, and any real or perceived problems or concerns with
electronic monitoring;
(g) Estimates on savings realized by utilizing electronic
monitoring.
(2) The findings and any recommendations from the study shall be
placed into a final report and presented to the legislature no later
than December 31, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires December 31, 2005.

--- END ---