BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The owner of an automated teller machine
may charge an access fee or surcharge to a customer conducting a
transaction using an account from a financial institution that is
located outside of the United States.
(2) "Automated teller machine" means the same as defined in RCW
19.174.020.
(3) "Financial institution" means the same as defined in RCW
30.22.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act constitutes a new
chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---