BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that qualified
and experienced attorneys who have expertise as guardians ad litem or
as judicial officers should be permitted to use their expertise to
serve the judicial system. However, potential conflicts of interests
may arise when an attorney seeks to act as a guardian ad litem, judge
pro tempore, or commissioner pro tempore. The legislature finds that
it is reasonable to prevent conflicts of interests to protect the
integrity of the judicial system and the interests of the children
involved in these cases.

Sec. 2 RCW 2.08.185 and 1996 c 249 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
An attorney may not serve as a ((superior court)) judge pro tempore
or a ((superior court)) commissioner pro tempore on a case in a
judicial district ((while appointed to or serving on a case in that
judicial district as a guardian ad litem for compensation under Title
11, 13, or 26 RCW, if that judicial district)) that is contained within
division one or two of the court of appeals and has a population of
more than one hundred thousand if the attorney has ever served as an
attorney or guardian ad litem for any party, or guardian ad litem for
the child of any party, in the case. An attorney may not serve as a
guardian ad litem in a case in a judicial district that is contained
within division one or two of the court of appeals and has a population
of more than one hundred thousand if the attorney has ever served as a
judge pro tempore or a court commissioner pro tempore on a case
involving any of the parties.

--- END ---