BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.85.520 and 1999 c 192 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A fee of ten dollars is created and shall be assessed on each
real estate broker, associate broker, and salesperson originally
licensed after October 1, 1999, and upon each renewal of a license with
an expiration date after October 1, 1999, including renewals of
inactive licenses.
(2) This section expires September 30, ((2005)) 2010.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.85.530 and 1999 c 192 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington real estate research account is created in the
state treasury. All receipts from the fee under RCW 18.85.520 shall be
deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only
for the purposes of RCW 18.85.540.
(2) This section expires September 30, ((2005)) 2010.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.85.540 and 2002 c 294 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The purpose of a real estate research center in Washington
state is to provide credible research, value-added information,
education services, and project-oriented research to real estate
licensees, real estate consumers, real estate service providers,
institutional customers, public agencies, and communities in Washington
state and the Pacific Northwest region. The center may:
(a) Conduct studies and research on affordable housing and
strategies to meet the affordable housing needs of the state;
(b) Conduct studies in all areas directly or indirectly related to
real estate and urban or rural economics and economically isolated
communities;
(c) Disseminate findings and results of real estate research
conducted at or by the center or elsewhere, using a variety of
dissemination media;
(d) Supply research results and educational expertise to the
Washington state real estate commission to support its regulatory
functions, as requested;
(e) Prepare information of interest to real estate consumers and
make the information available to the general public, universities, or
colleges, and appropriate state agencies;
(f) Encourage economic growth and development within the state of
Washington;
(g) Support the professional development and continuing education
of real estate licensees in Washington;
(h) Study and recommend changes in state statutes relating to real
estate; and
(i) Develop a vacancy rate standard for low-income housing in the
state.
(2) The director shall establish a memorandum of understanding with
an institution of higher learning that establishes a real estate
research center for the purposes under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) This section expires September 30, ((2005)) 2010.

--- END ---