BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW
to read as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to increase the authority of
the public disclosure commission to more effectively foster compliance
with our state's requirements regarding campaign finance and
contribution limits, lobbying, political advertising, and reporting of
public officials' financial affairs. It is the intent of the
legislature to make the agency's penalty authority for violations of
the campaign, lobbying, political advertising, and public officials'
financial affairs provisions in RCW 42.17.010 through 42.17.245 and
42.17.350 through 42.17.790 more consistent with other agencies that
enforce state ethics laws and more commensurate with the level of
political spending in the state of Washington.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.17.390 and 1993 c 2 s 28 are each amended to read
as follows:
One or more of the following civil remedies and sanctions may be
imposed by court order in addition to any other remedies provided by
law:
(1) If the court finds that the violation of any provision of this
chapter by any candidate or political committee probably affected the
outcome of any election, the result of said election may be held void
and a special election held within sixty days of such finding. Any
action to void an election shall be commenced within one year of the
date of the election in question. It is intended that this remedy be
imposed freely in all appropriate cases to protect the right of the
electorate to an informed and knowledgeable vote.
(2) If any lobbyist or sponsor of any grass roots lobbying campaign
violates any of the provisions of this chapter, his or her registration
may be revoked or suspended and he or she may be enjoined from
receiving compensation or making expenditures for lobbying: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That imposition of such sanction shall not excuse said
lobbyist from filing statements and reports required by this chapter.
(3) Any person who violates any of the provisions of ((this
chapter)) RCW 42.17.010 through 42.17.245 and 42.17.350 through
42.17.790 may be subject to a civil penalty of not more than ten
thousand dollars for each such violation. However, a person or entity
who violates RCW 42.17.640 may be subject to a civil penalty of ten
thousand dollars or three times the amount of the contribution
illegally made or accepted, whichever is greater.
(4) Any person who fails to file a properly completed statement or
report within the time required by this chapter may be subject to a
civil penalty of ten dollars per day for each day each such delinquency
continues.
(5) Any person who fails to report a contribution or expenditure as
required by this chapter may be subject to a civil penalty equivalent
to the amount ((he failed to report)) not reported as required.
(6) The court may enjoin any person to prevent the doing of any act
herein prohibited, or to compel the performance of any act required
herein.

Sec. 3 RCW 42.17.395 and 1989 c 175 s 91 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission may (a) determine whether an actual violation of
((this chapter)) RCW 42.17.010 through 42.17.245 or 42.17.350 through
42.17.790 has occurred; and (b) issue and enforce an appropriate order
following such determination.
(2) The commission, in cases where it chooses to determine whether
an actual violation ((of this chapter)) has occurred, shall hold a
hearing pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05
RCW, to make such determination. Any order that the commission issues
under this section shall be pursuant to such hearing.
(3) In lieu of holding a hearing or issuing an order under this
section, the commission may refer the matter to the attorney general or
other enforcement agency as provided in RCW 42.17.360.
(4) The person against whom an order is directed under this section
shall be designated as the respondent. The order may require the
respondent to cease and desist from the activity that constitutes a
violation and in addition, or alternatively, may impose one or more of
the remedies provided in RCW 42.17.390(((1) (b), (c), (d), or (e))) (2)
through (5): PROVIDED, That no individual penalty assessed by the
commission may exceed ((one)) four thousand dollars, and in any case
where multiple violations are involved in a single complaint or
hearing, the maximum aggregate penalty may not exceed ((two)) ten
thousand ((five hundred)) dollars.
(5) An order issued by the commission under this section shall be
subject to judicial review under the Administrative Procedure Act,
chapter 34.05 RCW. If the commission's order is not satisfied and no
petition for review is filed within thirty days as provided in RCW
34.05.542, the commission may petition a court of competent
jurisdiction of any county in which a petition for review could be
filed under that section, for an order of enforcement. Proceedings in
connection with the commission's petition shall be in accordance with
RCW 42.17.397.

Sec. 4 RCW 42.17.400 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 294 s 27 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The attorney general and the prosecuting authorities of
political subdivisions of this state may bring civil actions in the
name of the state for any appropriate civil remedy, including but not
limited to the special remedies provided in RCW 42.17.390.
(2) The attorney general and the prosecuting authorities of
political subdivisions of this state may investigate or cause to be
investigated the activities of any person who there is reason to
believe is or has been acting in violation of this chapter, and may
require any such person or any other person reasonably believed to have
information concerning the activities of such person to appear at a
time and place designated in the county in which such person resides or
is found, to give such information under oath and to produce all
accounts, bills, receipts, books, paper and documents which may be
relevant or material to any investigation authorized under this
chapter.
(3) When the attorney general or the prosecuting authority of any
political subdivision of this state requires the attendance of any
person to obtain such information or the production of the accounts,
bills, receipts, books, papers, and documents which may be relevant or
material to any investigation authorized under this chapter, he shall
issue an order setting forth the time when and the place where
attendance is required and shall cause the same to be delivered to or
sent by registered mail to the person at least fourteen days before the
date fixed for attendance. Such order shall have the same force and
effect as a subpoena, shall be effective statewide, and, upon
application of the attorney general or said prosecuting authority,
obedience to the order may be enforced by any superior court judge in
the county where the person receiving it resides or is found, in the
same manner as though the order were a subpoena. The court, after
hearing, for good cause, and upon application of any person aggrieved
by the order, shall have the right to alter, amend, revise, suspend, or
postpone all or any part of its provisions. In any case where the
order is not enforced by the court according to its terms, the reasons
for the court's actions shall be clearly stated in writing, and such
action shall be subject to review by the appellate courts by certiorari
or other appropriate proceeding.
(4) Any person who has notified the attorney general and the
prosecuting attorney in the county in which the violation occurred in
writing that there is reason to believe that some provision of this
chapter is being or has been violated may himself bring in the name of
the state any of the actions (hereinafter referred to as a citizen's
action) authorized under this chapter. This citizen action may be
brought only if the attorney general and the prosecuting attorney have
failed to commence an action hereunder within ((forty-five)) sixty
business days after such notice and such person has thereafter further
notified the attorney general and prosecuting attorney that ((said))
the person will commence a citizen's action within ten business days
upon their failure so to do, and the attorney general and the
prosecuting attorney have in fact failed to bring such action within
ten business days of receipt of ((said)) the second notice. If the
person who brings the citizen's action prevails, the judgment awarded
shall escheat to the state, but he shall be entitled to be reimbursed
by the state of Washington for costs and attorney's fees he has
incurred: PROVIDED, That in the case of a citizen's action which is
dismissed and which the court also finds was brought without reasonable
cause, the court may order the person commencing the action to pay all
costs of trial and reasonable attorney's fees incurred by the
defendant.
(5) In any action brought under this section, the court may award
to the state all costs of investigation and trial, including a
reasonable attorney's fee to be fixed by the court. If the violation
is found to have been intentional, the amount of the judgment, which
shall for this purpose include the costs, may be trebled as punitive
damages. If damages or trebled damages are awarded in such an action
brought against a lobbyist, the judgment may be awarded against the
lobbyist, and the lobbyist's employer or employers joined as
defendants, jointly, severally, or both. If the defendant prevails, he
shall be awarded all costs of trial, and may be awarded a reasonable
attorney's fee to be fixed by the court to be paid by the state of
Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---