BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 63.32.050 and 1987 c 182 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to any other method of disposition of unclaimed
property provided under this chapter, the police authorities of a city
or town may donate unclaimed ((bicycles, tricycles, and toys)) personal
property to nonprofit charitable organizations ((for use by)). A
nonprofit charitable organization receiving personal property donated
under this section must use the property, or its proceeds, to benefit
needy persons.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 63.35 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to any other method of disposition of unclaimed
property provided under this chapter, the state patrol may donate
unclaimed personal property to nonprofit charitable organizations. A
nonprofit charitable organization receiving personal property donated
under this section must use the property, or its proceeds, to benefit
needy persons.

Sec. 3 RCW 63.40.060 and 1987 c 182 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to any other method of disposition of unclaimed
property provided under this chapter, the county sheriff may donate
unclaimed ((bicycles, tricycles, and toys)) personal property to
nonprofit charitable organizations ((for use by)). A nonprofit
charitable organization receiving personal property donated under this
section must use the property, or its proceeds, to benefit needy
persons.

--- END ---