BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.44.062 and 1985 c 166 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All meetings, proceedings, and deliberations of the board of
commissioners, its staff or agents, concerning the granting, denial,
revocation, restriction, or other consideration of the status of the
clinical or staff privileges of a physician or other health care
provider as that term is defined in RCW 7.70.020, if such other
providers at the discretion of the district's commissioners are
considered for such privileges, shall be confidential and may be
conducted in executive session: PROVIDED, That the final action of the
board as to the denial, revocation, or restriction of clinical or staff
privileges of a physician or other health care provider as defined in
RCW 7.70.020 shall be done in public session.
(2) All meetings, proceedings, and deliberations of a quality
improvement committee established under RCW 4.24.250, 43.70.510, or
70.41.200 and all meetings, proceedings, and deliberations of the board
of commissioners, its staff or agents, to review the report or the
activities of a quality improvement committee established under RCW
4.24.250, 43.70.510, or 70.41.200 may, at the discretion of the quality
improvement committee or the board of commissioners, be confidential
and may be conducted in executive session. Any review conducted by the
board of commissioners, its staff or agents, shall be subject to the
same protections, limitations, and exemptions that apply to quality
improvement committee activities under RCW 4.24.240, 4.24.250,
43.70.510, and 70.41.200. However, any final action of the board of
commissioners on the report of the quality improvement committee shall
be done in public session.

--- END ---