BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that, in many of the
most populous areas of the state, it is in the best interests of the
residents to provide municipal services by encouraging annexation of
those areas into existing adjacent cities. However, even where the
residents desire to become annexed, cities are unable to undertake the
proposed annexations because of the unfair tax burdens that would be
placed on their existing residents to pay for services to the newly
annexed areas.
The legislature finds that a voter-approved temporary annexation
surtax on utility services would provide the revenues needed to provide
vital municipal services paid for by the residents of the annexation
area. Because utility taxes are paid by property owners and renters
alike, the legislature believes that a temporary surtax will spread the
burden upon all residents in annexation areas. Furthermore, because it
is temporary, it will provide revenue during a transition period
necessary to establish those municipal services needed in the newly
annexed area.
Therefore, it is the intent of this act to provide an additional
tool to enable cities to annex unincorporated areas that lie within
designated urban growth areas when the residents of those annexation
areas vote to approve the annexation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to and without limiting any other powers, any city
with a population greater than thirty thousand that imposes a utility
tax and that is located in a county with a population greater than
seven hundred thousand may also impose and collect a temporary
annexation surtax on the business activity of providing a utility
service to customers within an annexation area if:
(a) The city legislative authority has adopted a resolution
initiating annexation under chapter 35.13 or 35A.14 RCW, or has annexed
an area within the preceding twelve months; and
(b) The city legislative authority determines by resolution or
ordinance that the projected cost to provide municipal services to the
annexation area exceeds the projected general revenue that the city
would otherwise receive from the annexation area on an annual basis;
and
(c) A ballot proposition, as described in subsection (5) of this
section, is submitted to the voters living within the annexation area
and approved by a majority of those voting on the proposition at a
general or special election. A ballot proposition under this section
may be submitted simultaneously with any ballot proposition or
propositions regarding annexation under chapter 35.13 or 35A.14 RCW.
Costs of conducting the election shall be paid by the city.
(2) The following definitions apply throughout this section unless
the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Annexation area" means an area that: (i) Has been annexed to
a city within the preceding twelve months; or (ii) is the subject of a
resolution regarding annexation under RCW 35.13.015, 35.13.020,
35A.14.015, or 35A.14.020. "Annexation area" includes all territory
described in the city resolution.
(b) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(c) "Municipal services" means those services customarily provided
to the public by city government.
(d) "Utility tax" means any tax on the privilege of conducting a
utility business, including those business activities traditionally
taxed as utilities as that term is used in RCW 35.102.020. For the
purposes of this section, a utility business does not include a
telephone business as defined in RCW 82.04.065.
(3) A temporary annexation surtax shall be measured by the gross
receipts or gross income received from the business of providing
utility services to the annexation area. This surtax may be imposed
beginning no earlier than the date on which the area is annexed to the
city and for not longer than ten years from its date of first
collection, and shall be subject to the following limitations:
(a) Each year during which the surtax is authorized, the city
council shall hold a public hearing and adopt an ordinance setting the
surtax at a rate not to exceed that which the city deems necessary to
generate revenue equal to the difference between the city's cost to
provide, maintain, and operate municipal services for the annexation
area and the general revenues that the city would otherwise expect to
receive from the annexation area during that year. However, in no
event shall the rate of the surtax exceed the rate approved by the
voters in the ballot proposition described under subsection (5) of this
section.
(b) All revenue collected under this section shall be used solely
to provide, maintain, and operate municipal services for the annexation
area.
(c) The maximum rate of the surtax authorized by this section shall
not exceed ten percent.
(d) The surtax authorized by this section shall not be imposed on
the privilege of conducting a business that is subject to the payment
of franchise fees under 47 U.S.C. Sec. 542.
(4) A temporary annexation surtax imposed under this section shall
be collected in the same manner as the utility tax on that utility
service. The surtax is separate from and in addition to other utility
taxes and is not subject to the limitations of RCW 35.21.870.
(5) A ballot proposition under this section shall be prepared by
the city attorney for the annexing city in conformance with the
requirements for local ballot measures under RCW 29A.36.071 and the
following requirements:
(a) The ballot proposition shall state: (i) The commencement date
for collection, which may be no earlier than the date on which the area
is annexed to the city; (ii) the maximum rate of the surtax, which may
not exceed ten percent; (iii) the utility services to which the surtax
may be applied; and (iv) the final year in which a surtax may be
imposed, which shall be no later than the tenth year after the surtax
is first collected. When used in the ballot proposition, the phrase
"temporary annexation surtax," or other combination of those words,
shall count as one word.
(b) The ballot proposition shall require the voters to cast ballots
that contain the words "For temporary annexation surtax" and "Against
temporary annexation surtax" or equivalent words.
(6) Nothing in this section limits the discretion of a city
legislative body to determine whether or not to proceed with an
annexation under chapter 35.13 or 35A.14 RCW. Notwithstanding the
requirements of RCW 35.21.706 or any local charter provision, a
temporary annexation surtax shall not be the subject of a local
initiative or be subject to local referendum.
(7) A city that imposes a temporary annexation surtax must notify
the department of the boundaries of the annexation area, the rate of
the surtax and any subsequent change in such rate, and the effective
date of the surtax and the effective date of any subsequent change in
the rate of such surtax. A temporary annexation surtax and any
subsequent change in the rate of such surtax may take effect (a) no
sooner than seventy-five days after the department receives notice of
the surtax or change in the rate of such surtax and (b) only on the
first day of January, April, July, or October. The department must
develop and provide technology by which a utility can determine
customers subject to a temporary annexation surtax and the rate of such
surtax. A person who collects and remits a temporary annexation surtax
to a city or town and who calculates the tax using technology developed
and provided by the department shall be held harmless and is not liable
for the difference in amount due nor subject to penalties or interest
in regards to rate calculation errors resulting from the proper use of
such technology.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---