BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.29 RCW
to read as follows:
Dental hygienists licensed under this chapter with two years'
practical clinical experience with a licensed dentist within the
preceding five years may perform all dental operations and services
authorized under RCW 18.29.050 without dental supervision. However,
the administration of local anesthetic and nitrous oxide may only be
performed under the close supervision of a licensed dentist or
physician.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.29 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board of dental hygiene is created. The board consists of
six members who must be appointed by the governor. Of the initial
appointments, two members must be appointed for a term of two years,
three members for a term of three years, and one member for a term of
four years. Thereafter, all appointments shall be for terms of four
years.
(2) Five members of the board must: (a) Be dental hygienists
licensed under this chapter and residing in this state; (b) have at
least five years' experience in the practice of dental hygiene; (c) be
actively engaged in the practice of dental hygiene within two years of
appointment; and (d) not be connected with any dental hygiene school.
The sixth member must be appointed from the public at large, have an
interest in the rights of consumers of dental services, and not be or
have been a member of any other licensing board, a licensee of any
dental-related board, an employee of any dental services facility, not
be connected with any dental hygiene program, or engaged in any
practice or business related to dental hygiene or derive his or her
primary livelihood from the provision of dental services at any level
of responsibility.
(3) In the event that a member of the board of dental hygiene
cannot complete his or her term of office, the governor must appoint
another member in accordance with the procedures stated in this section
to fill the remainder of the term. No member may serve for more than
two consecutive four-year terms.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.29 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to other duties specified in this chapter, the board of
dental hygiene has the following powers and duties:
(1) To develop and administer, or approve, or both, examinations to
applicants for licensure under this chapter;
(2) To establish the qualifications of persons applying for
licensure as a dental hygienist under this chapter and to certify to
the secretary duly qualified applicants;
(3) To adopt rules not inconsistent with the laws of this state as
may be deemed necessary or proper to carry out the purposes of this
chapter;
(4) To establish and administer requirements for continuing
competency, which shall be a prerequisite to renewing a license under
this chapter;
(5) To keep an official record of all board of dental hygiene
proceedings. The record is evidence of all proceedings of the board of
dental hygiene that are set forth in the official record;
(6) When appropriate, to adopt rules not inconsistent with the laws
of this state in response to questions put to it by professional
dental-related associations, dental hygienists, and consumers in this
state concerning the authority of dental hygienists to perform certain
acts; and
(7) When appropriate, to consult with the dental quality assurance
commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 18.29 RCW
to read as follows:
The board of dental hygiene shall elect from its members a chair
and vice-chair who must serve for one year or until their successors
are elected. The board of dental hygiene must meet at least once a
year and upon the call of the chair at such times and places as the
chair designates. Four members constitute a quorum of any business.
Meetings of the board of dental hygiene are open and public, except the
board may hold executive sessions to the extent permitted by chapter
42.30 RCW. Members of the board of dental hygiene must be compensated
in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and be reimbursed for travel expenses
in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The secretary shall
furnish secretarial, clerical, and other assistance as the board may
require.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.29.021 and 1996 c 191 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall issue a license to any applicant who, as
determined by the secretary:
(a) Has successfully completed an educational program approved by
the ((secretary)) board of dental hygiene. This educational program
shall include course work encompassing the subject areas within the
scope of the license to practice dental hygiene in the state of
Washington;
(b) Has successfully completed an examination administered or
approved by the board of dental hygiene ((examining committee)); and
(c) Has not engaged in unprofessional conduct or is not unable to
practice with reasonable skill and safety as a result of a physical or
mental impairment.
(2) Applications for licensure must comply with administrative
procedures, administrative requirements, and fees established according
to RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.29.045 and 1991 c 3 s 47 are each amended to read
as follows:
An applicant holding a valid license and currently engaged in
practice in another state may be granted a license without examination
required by this chapter, on the payment of any required fees, if the
secretary in consultation with the ((advisory committee)) board of
dental hygiene determines that the other state's licensing standards
are substantively equivalent to the standards in this state: PROVIDED,
That the secretary in consultation with the ((advisory committee))
board of dental hygiene may require the applicant to: (1) File with
the secretary documentation certifying the applicant is licensed to
practice in another state; and (2) provide information as the secretary
deems necessary pertaining to the conditions and criteria of the
uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW and to demonstrate to the
secretary a knowledge of Washington law pertaining to the practice of
dental hygiene.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.29.050 and 2003 c 257 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person licensed as a dental hygienist in this state may
remove deposits and stains from the surfaces of the teeth, may apply
topical preventive or prophylactic agents, may polish and smooth
restorations, may perform root planing and soft-tissue curettage, and
may perform other dental operations and services delegated to them by
a licensed dentist: PROVIDED HOWEVER, That licensed dental hygienists
shall in no event perform the following dental operations or services:
(((1))) (a) Any surgical removal of tissue of the oral cavity;
(((2))) (b) Any prescription of drugs or medications requiring the
written order or prescription of a licensed dentist or physician,
except that a hygienist may place antimicrobials pursuant to the order
of a licensed dentist and under the dentist's required supervision;
(((3))) (c) Any diagnosis for treatment or treatment planning; or
(((4))) (d) The taking of any impression of the teeth or jaw, or
the relationships of the teeth or jaws, for the purpose of fabricating
any intra-oral restoration, appliance, or prosthesis.
(2) Such licensed dental hygienists may perform dental operations
and services only under the supervision of a licensed dentist, and
under such supervision may be employed by hospitals, boards of
education of public or private schools, county boards, boards of
health, or public or charitable institutions, or in dental offices.
(3) For the purpose of this section, a licensed dental hygienist
may delegate certain functions to a dental assistant as established by
the board of dental hygiene by rule. The dental assistant may only
perform the delegated function under the close supervision of a
licensed dental hygienist.

Sec. 8 RCW 18.29.120 and 1995 c 198 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((secretary in consultation with the Washington)) board of
dental hygiene ((examining committee)) shall:
(1) Adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to
prepare and conduct examinations for dental hygiene licensure;
(2) Require an applicant for licensure to pass an examination
consisting of written and practical tests upon such subjects and of
such scope as the ((committee)) board of dental hygiene determines;
(3) Set the standards for passage of the examination;
(4) Administer at least two examinations each calendar year.
Additional examinations may be given as necessary; and
(5) Establish by rule the procedures for an appeal of an
examination failure.

Sec. 9 RCW 18.29.140 and 1991 c 3 s 54 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((secretary)) board of dental hygiene shall establish by rule
the standards and procedures for approval of educational programs and
may contract with individuals or organizations having expertise in the
profession or in education to report to the ((secretary)) board of
dental hygiene information necessary for the secretary to evaluate the
educational programs. The ((secretary)) board of dental hygiene may
establish a fee for educational program evaluation. The fee shall be
set to defray the administrative costs for evaluating the educational
program, including, but not limited to, costs for site evaluation.

Sec. 10 RCW 18.29.150 and 1991 c 3 s 55 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ((secretary)) board of dental hygiene shall establish the
date and location of the examination. Applicants who meet the
education requirements for licensure shall be scheduled for the next
examination following the filing of the application. The ((secretary))
board of dental hygiene shall establish by rule the examination
application deadline.
(2) The examination shall contain subjects appropriate to the scope
of practice and on laws in the state of Washington regulating dental
hygiene practice.
(3) The ((committee)) board of dental hygiene shall establish by
rule the requirements for a reexamination if the applicant has failed
the examination.
(4) The ((committee)) board of dental hygiene may approve an
examination prepared or administered by a private testing agency or
association of licensing authorities.

Sec. 11 RCW 18.29.160 and 1991 c 3 s 56 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary, members of the ((committee)) board of dental
hygiene, and individuals acting on their behalf are immune from suit in
any action, civil or criminal, based on any acts performed in the
course of their duties.

Sec. 12 RCW 18.29.210 and 1993 c 323 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((secretary in consultation with the)) board of dental hygiene
((examining committee)) shall develop rules and definitions to
implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The legislature finds that the health and
well-being of the people of this state are of paramount importance.
The legislature also finds that dental care has become more
complex, while at the same time scientific knowledge has evolved,
allowing for a better understanding of the relationship between oral
health and overall physical health.
The legislature declares that the registration of dental assistants
is in the interest of the public health, safety, and welfare.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Commission" means the dental quality assurance commission.
(2) "Dental assistant" means a person who is registered by the
secretary to provide supportive services to a licensed dentist or
licensed dental hygienist to the extent provided in this chapter under
the close supervision of the dentist or dental hygienist.
(3) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 (1) The commission shall adopt rules
relating to dental services that may be performed by registered dental
assistants. All dental services performed by registered dental
assistants must be performed under the close supervision of a licensed
dentist or dental hygienist.
(2) In addition to any other limitations established by the
commission, registered dental assistants may not perform the following
procedures:
(a) Any scaling procedure;
(b) Any oral prophylaxis, except coronal polishing;
(c) Administration of any general or local anesthetic;
(d) Any removal of or addition to the hard or soft tissue of the
oral cavity;
(e) Any diagnosis of or prescription for treatment of disease,
pain, deformity, deficiency, injury, physical condition of the human
teeth, jaw, or adjacent structures; and
(f) The taking of impressions of the teeth or jaw or the
relationships of the teeth or jaws, for the purpose of fabricating any
intra-oral restoration, appliance, or prosthesis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 The secretary shall issue a dental
assistant registration to an applicant who pays the applicable fees and
submits, on forms provided by the secretary, the applicant's name,
address, and other information as determined by the commission,
provided that there are no grounds for denial of registration or
issuance of a conditional registration under this chapter or chapter
18.130 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Sections 13 through 16 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 18.29.110 (Dental hygiene examining committee -- Generally)
and 1991 c 3 s 51 & 1989 c 202 s 3;
(2) RCW 18.29.130 (Secretary's authority -- Generally -- Continuing
education) and 1991 c 3 s 53 & 1989 c 202 s 5; and
(3) RCW 18.29.170 (Committee meetings -- Quorum -- Effect of vacancy)
and 1989 c 202 s 9.

--- END ---