BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
A person who sells at retail, supplies, handles, or transports
liquefied petroleum gas is not liable for civil damages for injury,
wrongful death, or loss of property caused by the use of liquefied
petroleum gas equipment or a liquefied petroleum gas appliance when:
(1) The equipment or appliance was being used in a manner or for a
purpose other than its intended use or in a manner or for a purpose
that was not foreseeable and could not have been expected; and (2) the
use was without the person's actual or constructive knowledge.

--- END ---