BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 72.23 RCW
to read as follows:
By September 1st of each year, the department shall report to the
house committee on commerce and labor and the senate committee on
commerce and trade, or successor committees, on the department's
efforts to reduce violence in the state hospitals.

--- END ---