BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislative body of a county or city planning under this
chapter, before adopting or amending a development regulation that
designates or protects a critical area with an area of greater than one
hundred acres, shall publish notice of the development regulation at
least once a week for two weeks in one or more newspapers of general
circulation within the county or city.
(2) Following adoption of a critical area development regulation
with an area of greater than one hundred acres, the legislative body
shall cause notice of the proposed effective date of the development
regulation, together with a description of the critical area and the
effect of the development regulation, to be published at least once
each week for two weeks subsequent to passage of the development
regulation, in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the
county or city. Any development regulation adopted under this section
shall take effect upon the date fixed in the development regulation,
which date may not be fewer than forty-five days after adoption of the
development regulation.
(3) The critical area development regulation provided for in this
section is subject to referendum for forty-five days after passage.
Upon the filing of a timely and sufficient referendum petition with the
legislative body of the county or city that adopted the development
regulation, signed by registered voters in number equal to not less
than fifteen percent of the votes cast in the last general state
election in the county or city, the question of adoption of the
critical area development regulation shall be submitted to the voters
of the area in a general election if one is to be held within ninety
days or at a special election called for that purpose not less than
forty-five days nor more than ninety days after the filing of the
referendum petition. Notice of the election shall be given and the
election shall be conducted as provided in the general election law.
The development regulation shall be deemed approved by the voters
unless a majority of the votes cast on the proposition are in
opposition thereto.
After the expiration of the forty-fifth day from but excluding the
date of passage of the development regulation, if no timely and
sufficient referendum petition has been filed, the development
regulation shall take effect upon the date fixed in the development
regulation.
(4) Costs for an election required under subsection (3) of this
section shall be borne by the county or city adopting the development
regulation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act applies to critical
area development regulations adopted or amended on or after January 1,
2000, involving critical areas of greater than one hundred acres.

--- END ---