BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.020 and 2002 c 154 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following goals are adopted to guide the development and
adoption of comprehensive plans and development regulations of those
counties and cities that are required or choose to plan under RCW
36.70A.040. The following goals are not listed in order of priority
and shall be used exclusively for the purpose of guiding the
development of comprehensive plans and development regulations:
(1) Urban growth. Encourage development in urban areas where
adequate public facilities and services exist or can be provided in an
efficient manner.
(2) Reduce sprawl. Reduce the inappropriate conversion of
undeveloped land into sprawling, low-density development.
(3) Transportation. Encourage efficient multimodal transportation
systems that are based on regional priorities and coordinated with
county and city comprehensive plans.
(4) Housing. Encourage the availability of affordable housing to
all economic segments of the population of this state, promote a
variety of residential densities and housing types, and encourage
preservation of existing housing stock.
(5) Economic development. Encourage economic development
throughout the state that is consistent with adopted comprehensive
plans, promote economic opportunity for all citizens of this state,
especially for unemployed and for disadvantaged persons, promote the
retention and expansion of existing businesses and recruitment of new
businesses, recognize regional differences impacting economic
development opportunities, and encourage growth in areas experiencing
insufficient economic growth, all within the capacities of the state's
natural resources, public services, and public facilities.
(6) Property rights. Private property shall not be taken for
public use without just compensation having been made. The property
rights of landowners shall be protected from arbitrary and
discriminatory actions.
(7) Permits. Applications for both state and local government
permits should be processed in a timely and fair manner to ensure
predictability.
(8) Natural resource industries. Maintain and enhance natural
resource-based industries, including productive timber, agricultural,
and fisheries industries. Encourage the conservation of productive
forest lands and productive agricultural lands, and discourage
incompatible uses.
(9) Open space and recreation. Retain open space, enhance
recreational opportunities, conserve fish and wildlife habitat,
increase access to natural resource lands and water, and develop parks
and recreation facilities.
(10) Environment. Protect the environment and enhance the state's
high quality of life, including air and water quality, and the
availability of water.
(11) Citizen participation and coordination. Encourage the
involvement of citizens in the planning process and ensure coordination
between communities and jurisdictions to reconcile conflicts.
(12) Public facilities and services. Ensure that those public
facilities and services necessary to support development shall be
adequate to serve the development at the time the development is
available for occupancy and use without decreasing current service
levels below locally established minimum standards.
(13) Historic preservation. Identify and encourage the
preservation of lands, sites, and structures, that have historical or
archaeological significance.
(14) Accessible family planning. Ensure that all who choose to use
reproductive health care services have access to these services.

--- END ---