BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that as consumers'
prescription drug costs continue to rise, people across the state of
Washington are exercising the option to purchase prescription drugs
from Canada for their personal use. The state has a strong interest in
the safety of drugs purchased through this mechanism. To address this
interest, the legislature intends to authorize the state board of
pharmacy to regulate nonresident Canadian pharmacies.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.64.350 and 1991 c 87 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds and declares that the practice of
pharmacy is a dynamic, patient-oriented health service that applies a
scientific body of knowledge to improve and promote patient health by
means of appropriate drug use and drug-related therapy.
(2) The legislature recognizes that with the proliferation of
alternate methods of health delivery, there has arisen among third-
party payors and insurance companies the desire to control the cost and
utilization of pharmacy services through a variety of mechanisms,
including the use of mail-order pharmacies located outside the state of
Washington.
(3) As a result, the legislature finds and declares that to
continue to protect the Washington consumer-patient, all out-of-state
pharmacies, including those located in Canada, that provide services to
Washington residents shall be licensed by the department of health,
disclose specific information about their services, and provide
pharmacy services at a high level of protection and competence.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.64.360 and 1996 c 109 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this chapter any pharmacy located outside
this state that ships, mails, or delivers, in any manner, except when
delivered in person to an individual, controlled substances, legend
drugs, or devices into this state is a nonresident pharmacy, and shall
be licensed by the department of health, and shall disclose to the
department the following:
(a) The location, names, and titles of all owners including
corporate officers and all pharmacists employed by the pharmacy who are
dispensing controlled substances, legend drugs, or devices to residents
of this state. A report containing this information shall be made on
an annual basis and within ninety days after a change of location,
corporate officer, or pharmacist;
(b) Proof of compliance with all lawful directions and requests for
information from the regulatory or licensing agency of the state or
Canadian province in which it is licensed as well as with all requests
for information made by the department of health under this section.
The nonresident pharmacy shall maintain, at all times, a valid
unexpired license, permit, or registration to operate the pharmacy in
compliance with the laws of the state or Canadian province in which it
is located. As a prerequisite to be licensed by the department of
health, the nonresident pharmacy shall submit a copy of the most recent
inspection report issued by the regulatory licensing agency of the
state or Canadian province in which it is located;
(c) Proof that it maintains its records of controlled substances,
legend drugs, or devices dispensed to patients in this state so that
the records are readily retrievable from the records of other drugs
dispensed.
(2) Any pharmacy subject to this section shall, during its regular
hours of operation, provide a toll-free telephone service to facilitate
communication between patients in this state and a pharmacist at the
pharmacy who has access to the patient's records. This toll-free
number shall be disclosed on the label affixed to each container of
drugs dispensed to patients in this state.
(3) A pharmacy subject to this section shall comply with board
rules regarding the maintenance and use of patient medication record
systems.
(4) A pharmacy subject to this section shall comply with board of
pharmacy rules regarding the provision of drug information to the
patient. Drug information may be contained in written form setting
forth directions for use and any additional information necessary to
assure the proper utilization of the medication prescribed. A label
bearing the expiration date of the prescription must be affixed to each
box, bottle, jar, tube, or other container of a prescription that is
dispensed in this state by a pharmacy subject to this section.
(5) A pharmacy subject to this section shall not dispense
medication in a quantity greater than authorized by the prescriber.
(6) The license fee specified by the secretary, in accordance with
the provisions of RCW 43.70.250, shall not exceed the fee charged to a
pharmacy located in this state.
(7) The license requirements of this section apply to nonresident
pharmacies that ship, mail, or deliver controlled substances, legend
drugs, and devices into this state only under a prescription. The
board of pharmacy may grant an exemption from licensing under this
section upon application by an out-of-state pharmacy that restricts its
dispensing activity in Washington to isolated transactions.
(8) Each nonresident pharmacy that ships, mails, or delivers legend
drugs or devices into this state shall designate a resident agent in
Washington for service of process. The designation of such an agent
does not indicate that the nonresident pharmacy is a resident of
Washington for tax purposes.
(9) The board shall attempt to develop a reciprocal licensing
agreement for licensure of nonresident pharmacies with Health Canada or
an applicable Canadian province. If the board is unable to develop
such an agreement, the board shall develop a process to license
participating Canadian nonresident pharmacies through on-site
inspection and certification.

--- END ---