BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 68.50.160 and 1993 c 297 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person has the right to control the disposition of his or her
own remains without the predeath or postdeath consent of another
person. A valid written document expressing the decedent's wishes
regarding the place or method of disposition of his or her remains,
signed by the decedent in the presence of a witness, is sufficient
legal authorization for the procedures to be accomplished.
(2) Prearrangements that are prepaid, or filed with a licensed
funeral establishment or cemetery authority, under RCW 18.39.280
through 18.39.345 and chapter 68.46 RCW are not subject to cancellation
or substantial revision by survivors. Absent actual knowledge of
contrary legal authorization under this section, a licensed funeral
establishment or cemetery authority shall not be held criminally nor
civilly liable for acting upon such prearrangements.
(3) If the decedent has not made a prearrangement as set forth in
subsection (2) of this section or the costs of executing the decedent's
wishes regarding the disposition of the decedent's remains exceeds a
reasonable amount or directions have not been given by the decedent,
the right to control the disposition of the remains of a deceased
person vests in, and the duty of disposition and the liability for the
reasonable cost of preparation, care, and disposition of such remains
devolves upon the following in the order named:
(a) The surviving spouse.
(b) The surviving adult children of the decedent.
(c) The surviving parents of the decedent.
(d) The surviving siblings of the decedent.
(e) A person acting as a representative of the decedent under the
signed authorization of the decedent.
(4) If any person to whom the right of control has vested pursuant
to subsection (3) of this section has been charged with first or second
degree murder or first degree manslaughter in connection with the
decedent's death, the right of control is relinquished and passed on in
accordance with subsection (3) of this section.
(5) The liability for the reasonable cost of preparation, care, and
disposition devolves jointly and severally upon all kin of the decedent
in the same degree of kindred, in the order listed in subsection (3) of
this section, and upon the estate of the decedent.

--- END ---