BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.608 and 1975 c 62 s 46 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All motorcycles are entitled to full use of a lane and no motor
vehicle shall be driven in such a manner as to deprive any motorcycle
of the full use of a lane. This subsection shall not apply to
motorcycles operated two abreast in a single lane.
(2) The operator of a motorcycle shall not overtake and pass in the
same lane occupied by the vehicle being overtaken.
(3) Except during periods of traffic congestion, no person shall
operate a motorcycle between lanes of traffic or between adjacent lines
or rows of vehicles.
(4) Motorcycles shall not be operated more than two abreast in a
single lane.
(5) Subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall not apply to
police officers in the performance of their official duties.

--- END ---