BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that permits and licensing programs have
been legislatively established to protect the health, welfare, economy,
and environment of Washington's citizens and to provide a fair,
competitive opportunity for business innovation and consumer
confidence. The legislature also finds that uncertainty in government
processes to permit or license an activity by a citizen of Washington
state is undesirable and erodes confidence in government. The
legislature further finds that information about the permitting and
licensing process is critical for an applicant's planning and financial
assessment of the proposed project. The legislature also finds that
applicants have a responsibility to provide complete and accurate
information.
(2) Citizens of the state of Washington have the right to know the
following information when applying for a permit, license, or
authorization to engage in a lawful activity:
(a) Right to know the minimum and maximum time required by an
agency for a decision on a permit or license, including public comment
requirements;
(b) Right to know the minimum and maximum amount of information
required for an agency to make a decision on a permit or license;
(c) Right to know when an agency considers an application complete
for processing;
(d) Right to know the minimum and maximum costs in agency fees that
will be incurred by the permit or license applicant; and
(e) Right to know the reasons for a denial of a permit or license
in writing.
(3) In providing this information to applicants, an agency shall
base estimates on the best information available about the permitting
or licensing program and prior applications for similar permits, and
shall also base these estimates on the information provided by the
applicant. New information provided by the applicant subsequent to the
agency estimates may change the information provided in subsection (2)
of this section. Project modifications may result in more time, more
information, or more costs being required for permit or license
processing. Cost information provided by agencies is not required to
include costs for work performed by the private sector on behalf of the
applicant.
(4) This section does not create an independent cause of action,
affect any existing cause of action, or establish time limits for
purposes of RCW 64.40.020.
(5) State permitting and licensing agencies shall track the
progress in meeting the information requirements established under
subsection (2) of this section. Beginning on or before December 31,
2006, each state permitting and licensing agency shall prepare an
annual report of its performance for the preceding fiscal year. The
report shall be posted on its web site and provided to the appropriate
standing committees of the senate and house of representatives. In
addition to general information regarding the performance of the agency
for the preceding fiscal year, the report shall include:
(a) Information regarding the minimum and maximum time required by
an agency for a decision on a permit, license, or authorization;
(b) The minimum and maximum amount of agency fees incurred by
applicants by permit type; and
(c) A summation of the reasons for denial for each type of permit,
license, or authorization.
(6) These rights apply to state permits, licenses, or other legal
authorizations. This section does not apply to those licenses in which
the only requirement of the applicant is to submit a fee and the
license is received.

--- END ---