BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that parents have the
right and the responsibility to protect the welfare and health of their
minor children and that a parent therefore should not be criminally
liable for intercepting or recording any phone conversation of his or
her minor child.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.73.080 and 2000 c 195 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, any person, other
than a parent or legal guardian who is monitoring his or her own minor
child's telephone conversations, who violates RCW 9.73.030 is guilty of
a gross misdemeanor.
(2) Any person who knowingly alters, erases, or wrongfully
discloses any recording in violation of RCW 9.73.090(1)(c) is guilty of
a gross misdemeanor.

--- END ---