BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.44.010 and 1997 c 63 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The total outside width of any vehicle or load thereon ((shall))
must not exceed eight and one-half feet((: PROVIDED, That no)); except
that an externally mounted rear vision mirror may extend ((more than
five inches)) beyond the ((extreme)) width limits of the vehicle
body((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)) to a point that allows the driver a
view to the rear of the vehicle along both sides in conformance with
Federal National Safety Standard 111 (49 C.F.R. 571.111), and RCW
46.37.400. Excluded from this calculation of width are ((safety
appliances such as clearance lights, rub rails, flexible fender
extensions, mud flaps, and splash and spray suppressant devices, and
appurtenances such as door handles, door hinges, and turning signal
brackets and such other safety appliances and appurtenances as the
department may determine are necessary for the safe and efficient
operation of motor vehicles: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That no appliances
or appurtenances may)) certain devices that provide added safety,
energy conservation, or are otherwise necessary, and are not designed
or used to carry cargo. The width-exclusive devices must be identified
in rules adopted by the department of transportation under section 3 of
this act. A width-exclusive device must not extend more than three
inches beyond the ((extreme)) width limit((s)) of the vehicle body.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.44.030 and 2000 c 102 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is unlawful for any person to operate upon the public highways
of this state any vehicle having an overall length, with or without
load, in excess of forty feet. This restriction does not apply to (1)
a municipal transit vehicle, (2) auto stage, private carrier bus,
school bus, or motor home with an overall length not to exceed forty-six feet, or (3) an articulated auto stage with an overall length not
to exceed sixty-one feet.
It is unlawful for any person to operate upon the public highways
of this state any combination consisting of a tractor and semitrailer
that has a semitrailer length in excess of fifty-three feet or a
combination consisting of a tractor and two trailers in which the
combined length of the trailers exceeds sixty-one feet, with or without
load.
It is unlawful for any person to operate on the highways of this
state any combination consisting of a truck and trailer, or log truck
and stinger-steered pole trailer, with an overall length, with or
without load, in excess of seventy-five feet. ((However, a combination
of vehicles transporting automobiles or boats may have a front overhang
of three feet and a rear overhang of four feet beyond this allowed
length.)) "Stinger-steered," as used in this section, means the
coupling device is located behind the tread of the tires of the last
axle of the towing vehicle.
These length limitations do not apply to vehicles transporting
poles, pipe, machinery, or other objects of a structural nature that
cannot be dismembered and operated by a public utility when required
for emergency repair of public service facilities or properties, but in
respect to night transportation every such vehicle and load thereon
shall be equipped with a sufficient number of clearance lamps on both
sides and marker lamps upon the extreme ends of any projecting load to
clearly mark the dimensions of the load.
((The length limitations described in this section are exclusive of
safety and energy conservation devices, such as mud flaps and splash
and spray suppressant devices, refrigeration units or air compressors,
and other devices that the department determines to be necessary for
safe and efficient operation of commercial vehicles. No device
excluded under this paragraph from the limitations of this section may
have, by its design or use, the capability to carry cargo.)) Excluded
from the calculation of length are certain devices that provide added
safety, energy conservation, or are otherwise necessary, and are not
designed or used to carry cargo. The length-exclusive devices must be
identified in rules adopted by the department of transportation under
section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.44 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of transportation may, within the provisions set
forth in this chapter, adopt rules for size and weight criteria
relating to vehicles considered to be specialized equipment by the
federal highway administration for interstate travel or as determined
by the department for intrastate travel.

--- END ---