BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of transportation, with respect to state
highways maintained within port district property, may, at the request
of a port commission, make and enter into agreements with port
districts and adjacent jurisdictions or agencies of the districts, for
the purpose of identifying, managing, and maintaining short heavy haul
industrial corridors within port district property for the movement of
overweight sealed containers used in international trade.
(2) The department may issue special permits to vehicles operating
in the heavy haul industrial corridor to carry weight in excess of
weight limits established in RCW 46.44.041. However, the excess weight
on a single axle, tandem axle, or any axle group must not exceed that
allowed by RCW 46.44.091 (1) and (2), weight per tire must not exceed
six hundred pounds per inch width of tire, and gross vehicle weight
must not exceed one hundred five thousand five hundred pounds.
(3) The entity operating or hiring vehicles moving overweight
sealed containers used in international trade must pay a fee for each
special permit of one hundred dollars per month or one thousand dollars
annually, beginning from the date of issue, for all movements under the
special permit made on state highways within the heavy haul industrial
corridor. Under no circumstances are the for hire carriers or rail
customers responsible for the purchase or cost of the permits. All
funds collected, except the amount retained by authorized agents of the
department under RCW 46.44.096, must be forwarded to the state
treasurer and deposited in the motor vehicle fund.
(4) For purposes of this section, an overweight sealed container
used in international trade, including its contents, is considered
nondivisible when transported within a heavy haul industrial corridor
defined by the department.
(5) Any agreement entered into by the department as authorized
under this section with a port district adjacent to Puget Sound and
located within a county that has a population of more than one hundred
eighty thousand, but less than four hundred thousand, must limit the
applicability of any established heavy haul corridor to that portion of
state route no. 509 beginning at milepost 0.25 in the vicinity of East
'D' Street and ending at milepost 3.88 in the vicinity of Taylor Way.
(6) The department of transportation may adopt reasonable rules to
implement this section.

--- END ---