BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.32.160 and 1995 c 257 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is hereby created a commission advisory to the supreme court
regarding the publication of the decisions of the supreme court and
court of appeals of this state in both the form of advance sheets for
temporary use and in permanent form, to be known as the ((commission on
supreme)) Washington court reports commission, and to include the
reporter of decisions, the state law librarian, and such other members,
including a judge of the court of appeals and a member in good standing
of the Washington state bar association, as determined by the chief
justice of the supreme court, who shall be chairman of the commission.
Members of the commission shall serve as such without additional or any
compensation: PROVIDED, That members shall be compensated in
accordance with RCW 43.03.240.

--- END ---