BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.14.170 and 2001 c 260 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any respondent age eighteen years or over who willfully
disobeys any civil antiharassment protection order issued pursuant to
this chapter shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(2) A violation of a protection order issued under this chapter is
a class C felony if the offender has at least two previous convictions
for violating the provisions of an order issued under this chapter.
The previous convictions may involve the same victim or other victims
specifically protected by the orders the offender violated.

--- END ---