BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that emerging
research on brain development indicates that adolescent brains, and
thus adolescent intellectual and emotional capabilities, differ
significantly from those of mature adults. It is appropriate to take
these differences into consideration when sentencing juveniles tried as
adults. The legislature further finds that applying mandatory minimum
sentences for juveniles tried as adults prevents trial court judges
from taking these differences into consideration in appropriate
circumstances.
(2) The legislature intends to eliminate the application of
mandatory minimum sentences under RCW 9.94A.540 to juveniles tried as
adults, and to continue to apply all other adult sentencing provisions
to juveniles tried as adults.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.540 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 315 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Except to the extent provided in subsection (3) of this
section, the following minimum terms of total confinement are mandatory
and shall not be varied or modified under RCW 9.94A.535:
(a) An offender convicted of the crime of murder in the first
degree shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement not less than
twenty years.
(b) An offender convicted of the crime of assault in the first
degree or assault of a child in the first degree where the offender
used force or means likely to result in death or intended to kill the
victim shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement not less than
five years.
(c) An offender convicted of the crime of rape in the first degree
shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement not less than five
years.
(d) An offender convicted of the crime of sexually violent predator
escape shall be sentenced to a minimum term of total confinement not
less than sixty months.
(2) During such minimum terms of total confinement, no offender
subject to the provisions of this section is eligible for community
custody, earned release time, furlough, home detention, partial
confinement, work crew, work release, or any other form of early
release authorized under RCW 9.94A.728, or any other form of authorized
leave of absence from the correctional facility while not in the direct
custody of a corrections officer. The provisions of this subsection
shall not apply: (a) In the case of an offender in need of emergency
medical treatment; (b) for the purpose of commitment to an inpatient
treatment facility in the case of an offender convicted of the crime of
rape in the first degree; or (c) for an extraordinary medical placement
when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(4).
(3)(a) Subsection (1) of this section shall not be applied in
sentencing of juveniles tried as adults pursuant to RCW 13.04.030(1)(e)
(i) and (v).
(b) This section applies only to crimes committed on or after the
effective date of this act.

--- END ---