BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to a new business during the first
twelve months of operation of the business.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "New business" means a business that obtains or is required to
obtain a registration certificate under RCW 82.32.030 for the first
time. "New business" also includes a branch location or other facility
established after the effective date of this section by an entity doing
business in this state;
(b) "New business" does not include:
(i) A business that has been restructured, reorganized, or
transferred, if the activities to be conducted after restructuring,
reorganization, or transferral are substantially similar to the
activities previously conducted; or
(ii) A business that is substantially similar to a business
currently operated, or operated within the past five years, by the same
principals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect October 1, 2005.

--- END ---