BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.14.050 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 29 s 9 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Each agency administering a state purchased health care program
as defined in RCW 41.05.011(2) shall, in cooperation with other
agencies, take any necessary actions to control costs without reducing
the quality of care when reimbursing for or purchasing drugs. To
accomplish this purpose, participating agencies may establish an
evidence-based prescription drug program.
(2) In developing the evidence-based prescription drug program
authorized by this section, agencies:
(a) Shall prohibit reimbursement for drugs that are determined to
be ineffective by the United States food and drug administration;
(b) Shall adopt rules in order to ensure that less expensive
generic drugs will be substituted for brand name drugs in those
instances where the quality of care is not diminished;
(c) Where possible, may authorize reimbursement for drugs only in
economical quantities;
(d) May limit the prices paid for drugs by such means as negotiated
discounts from pharmaceutical manufacturers, central purchasing, volume
contracting, purchasing drugs from approved pharmacies or wholesalers
in Canada as provided in section 2 of this act, or setting maximum
prices to be paid;
(e) Shall consider the approval of drugs with lower abuse potential
in substitution for drugs with significant abuse potential;
(f) May take other necessary measures to control costs of drugs
without reducing the quality of care; and
(g) Shall adopt rules governing practitioner endorsement and use of
any list developed as part of the program authorized by this section.
(3) Agencies shall provide for reasonable exceptions, consistent
with RCW 69.41.190, to any list developed as part of the program
authorized by this section.
(4) Agencies shall establish an independent pharmacy and
therapeutics committee to evaluate the effectiveness of prescription
drugs in the development of the program authorized by this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.14 RCW
to read as follows:
Each agency administering a state purchased health care program as
defined in RCW 41.05.011(2) shall, in cooperation with other agencies,
take any actions needed to:
(1) Undertake bulk purchasing of drugs approved by the federal food
and drug administration from Canadian pharmacies and wholesalers, upon
approval of a waiver by the federal food and drug administration or
upon passage of federal legislation authorizing bulk reimportation of
prescription drugs;
(2) Facilitate personal importation of drugs approved by the food
and drug administration from Canadian pharmacies for individuals
participating in state purchased health care programs. Personal
importation shall be done in a manner consistent with the following
conditions:
(a) Prescription drugs purchased through personal importation shall
be limited to drugs other than:
(i) Injectable drugs;
(ii) Biological products;
(iii) Drugs inhaled during surgery;
(iv) Drugs that have specific postmarketing monitoring programs;
(v) Drugs that must be refrigerated or kept frozen;
(vi) Narcotics; and
(vii) Drugs that are highly susceptible to counterfeiting on the
global market;
(b) Prescription drugs purchased through personal importation shall
be limited to those drugs that agencies administering state purchased
health care programs determine will result in cost savings to their
programs;
(c) Any Canadian pharmacy participating in personal importation of
drugs for individuals participating in state purchased health care
programs shall meet retail pharmacy licensing standards established by
the Washington state board of pharmacy;
(d) The health care authority shall offer financial incentives to
uniform medical plan enrollees for personal importation of prescription
drugs that meet the standards established in (a) and (b) of this
subsection.
The health care authority shall develop an internet web site and
use the pharmacy connection program established under RCW 41.05.520 to
provide information to Washington residents regarding opportunities to
purchase prescription drugs from Canada and the best means to ensure
that any prescription drugs they purchase have been safely
manufactured, distributed, and stored. The attorney general shall
review the web site and the information provided through the pharmacy
connection program and certify that they do not violate any applicable
state or federal law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

--- END ---