BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 58.17.033 and 1987 c 104 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A proposed division of land, as defined in RCW 58.17.020, shall
be considered under the subdivision or short subdivision ordinance, and
zoning or other land use control ordinances, in effect on the land at
the time a fully completed application for preliminary plat approval of
the subdivision, or short plat approval of the short subdivision, has
been submitted to the appropriate county, city, or town official.
(2) The requirements for a fully completed application shall be
defined by local ordinance.
(3) The limitations imposed by this section shall not restrict
conditions imposed under chapter 43.21C RCW.
(4) A short subdivision shall be governed by the terms of approval
of the short subdivision under RCW 58.17.060. Except as provided under
subsection (5) of this section, for a period of five years after short
subdivision approval according to RCW 58.17.060, the statutes,
ordinances, and regulations in effect at the time of short subdivision
approval shall govern the short subdivision unless the legislative body
finds that a change in conditions creates a serious threat to the
public health or safety in the short subdivision.
(5) Those short subdivisions that obtain short plat approval on or
before the effective date of this act, and which are zoned for single
family homes, are not subject to the five-year limitation set forth in
subsection (4) of this section, or any other time limitation, with
respect to the application of the statutes, ordinances, and regulations
in effect at the time of short plat approval. However, a legislative
body may act to amend the statutes, ordinances, and regulations
applicable to such short subdivisions if it finds that a change in
conditions creates a serious threat to the public health or safety in
the short subdivision.

--- END ---