BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.44.130 and 2003 c 215 s 1 and 2003 c 53 s 68 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Any adult or juvenile residing whether or not the person has a
fixed residence, or who is a student, is employed, or carries on a
vocation in this state who has been found to have committed or has been
convicted of any sex offense or kidnapping offense, or who has been
found not guilty by reason of insanity under chapter 10.77 RCW of
committing any sex offense or kidnapping offense, shall register with
the county sheriff for the county of the person's residence, or if the
person is not a resident of Washington, the county of the person's
school, or place of employment or vocation, or as otherwise specified
in this section. Where a person required to register under this
section is in custody of the state department of corrections, the state
department of social and health services, a local division of youth
services, or a local jail or juvenile detention facility as a result of
a sex offense or kidnapping offense, the person shall also register at
the time of release from custody with an official designated by the
agency that has jurisdiction over the person. In addition, any such
adult or juvenile: (a) Who is admitted to a public or private
institution of higher education shall, within ten days of enrolling or
by the first business day after arriving at the institution, whichever
is earlier, notify the sheriff for the county of the person's residence
of the person's intent to attend the institution; (b) who gains
employment at a public or private institution of higher education
shall, within ten days of accepting employment or by the first business
day after commencing work at the institution, whichever is earlier,
notify the sheriff for the county of the person's residence of the
person's employment by the institution; or (c) whose enrollment or
employment at a public or private institution of higher education is
terminated shall, within ten days of such termination, notify the
sheriff for the county of the person's residence of the person's
termination of enrollment or employment at the institution. Persons
required to register under this section who are enrolled in a public or
private institution of higher education on June 11, 1998, must notify
the county sheriff immediately. The sheriff shall notify the
institution's department of public safety and shall provide that
department with the same information provided to a county sheriff under
subsection (3) of this section.
(2) This section may not be construed to confer any powers pursuant
to RCW ((4.24.500)) 4.24.550 upon the public safety department of any
public or private institution of higher education.
(3)(a) The person shall provide the following information when
registering: (i) Name; (ii) address; (iii) date and place of birth;
(iv) place of employment; (v) crime for which convicted; (vi) date and
place of conviction; (vii) aliases used; (viii) social security number;
(ix) photograph; and (x) fingerprints.
(b) Any person who lacks a fixed residence shall provide the
following information when registering: (i) Name; (ii) date and place
of birth; (iii) place of employment; (iv) crime for which convicted;
(v) date and place of conviction; (vi) aliases used; (vii) Social
Security number; (viii) photograph; (ix) fingerprints; and (x) where he
or she plans to stay.
(c) Any person who is attending, or is planning to attend, a public
or private school regulated under Title 28A RCW shall provide the name
and address of his or her school when registering.
(4)(a) Offenders shall register with the county sheriff within the
following deadlines. For purposes of this section the term
"conviction" refers to adult convictions and juvenile adjudications for
sex offenses or kidnapping offenses:
(i) OFFENDERS IN CUSTODY. (A) Sex offenders who committed a sex
offense on, before, or after February 28, 1990, and who, on or after
July 28, 1991, are in custody, as a result of that offense, of the
state department of corrections, the state department of social and
health services, a local division of youth services, or a local jail or
juvenile detention facility, and (B) kidnapping offenders who on or
after July 27, 1997, are in custody of the state department of
corrections, the state department of social and health services, a
local division of youth services, or a local jail or juvenile detention
facility, must register at the time of release from custody with an
official designated by the agency that has jurisdiction over the
offender. The agency shall within three days forward the registration
information to the county sheriff for the county of the offender's
anticipated residence. The offender must also register within twenty-four hours from the time of release with the county sheriff for the
county of the person's residence, or if the person is not a resident of
Washington, the county of the person's school, or place of employment
or vocation. The agency that has jurisdiction over the offender shall
provide notice to the offender of the duty to register. Failure to
register at the time of release and within twenty-four hours of release
constitutes a violation of this section and is punishable as provided
in subsection (((10))) (11) of this section.
When the agency with jurisdiction intends to release an offender
with a duty to register under this section, and the agency has
knowledge that the offender is eligible for developmental disability
services from the department of social and health services, the agency
shall notify the division of developmental disabilities of the release.
Notice shall occur not more than thirty days before the offender is to
be released. The agency and the division shall assist the offender in
meeting the initial registration requirement under this section.
Failure to provide such assistance shall not constitute a defense for
any violation of this section.
(ii) OFFENDERS NOT IN CUSTODY BUT UNDER STATE OR LOCAL
JURISDICTION. Sex offenders who, on July 28, 1991, are not in custody
but are under the jurisdiction of the indeterminate sentence review
board or under the department of correction's active supervision, as
defined by the department of corrections, the state department of
social and health services, or a local division of youth services, for
sex offenses committed before, on, or after February 28, 1990, must
register within ten days of July 28, 1991. Kidnapping offenders who,
on July 27, 1997, are not in custody but are under the jurisdiction of
the indeterminate sentence review board or under the department of
correction's active supervision, as defined by the department of
corrections, the state department of social and health services, or a
local division of youth services, for kidnapping offenses committed
before, on, or after July 27, 1997, must register within ten days of
July 27, 1997. A change in supervision status of a sex offender who
was required to register under this subsection (4)(a)(ii) as of July
28, 1991, or a kidnapping offender required to register as of July 27,
1997, shall not relieve the offender of the duty to register or to
reregister following a change in residence. The obligation to register
shall only cease pursuant to RCW 9A.44.140.
(iii) OFFENDERS UNDER FEDERAL JURISDICTION. Sex offenders who, on
or after July 23, 1995, and kidnapping offenders who, on or after July
27, 1997, as a result of that offense are in the custody of the United
States bureau of prisons or other federal or military correctional
agency for sex offenses committed before, on, or after February 28,
1990, or kidnapping offenses committed on, before, or after July 27,
1997, must register within twenty-four hours from the time of release
with the county sheriff for the county of the person's residence, or if
the person is not a resident of Washington, the county of the person's
school, or place of employment or vocation. Sex offenders who, on July
23, 1995, are not in custody but are under the jurisdiction of the
United States bureau of prisons, United States courts, United States
parole commission, or military parole board for sex offenses committed
before, on, or after February 28, 1990, must register within ten days
of July 23, 1995. Kidnapping offenders who, on July 27, 1997, are not
in custody but are under the jurisdiction of the United States bureau
of prisons, United States courts, United States parole commission, or
military parole board for kidnapping offenses committed before, on, or
after July 27, 1997, must register within ten days of July 27, 1997.
A change in supervision status of a sex offender who was required to
register under this subsection (4)(a)(iii) as of July 23, 1995, or a
kidnapping offender required to register as of July 27, 1997 shall not
relieve the offender of the duty to register or to reregister following
a change in residence, or if the person is not a resident of
Washington, the county of the person's school, or place of employment
or vocation. The obligation to register shall only cease pursuant to
RCW 9A.44.140.
(iv) OFFENDERS WHO ARE CONVICTED BUT NOT CONFINED. Sex offenders
who are convicted of a sex offense on or after July 28, 1991, for a sex
offense that was committed on or after February 28, 1990, and
kidnapping offenders who are convicted on or after July 27, 1997, for
a kidnapping offense that was committed on or after July 27, 1997, but
who are not sentenced to serve a term of confinement immediately upon
sentencing, shall report to the county sheriff to register immediately
upon completion of being sentenced.
(v) OFFENDERS WHO ARE NEW RESIDENTS OR RETURNING WASHINGTON
RESIDENTS. Sex offenders and kidnapping offenders who move to
Washington state from another state or a foreign country that are not
under the jurisdiction of the state department of corrections, the
indeterminate sentence review board, or the state department of social
and health services at the time of moving to Washington, must register
within thirty days of establishing residence or reestablishing
residence if the person is a former Washington resident. The duty to
register under this subsection applies to sex offenders convicted under
the laws of another state or a foreign country, federal or military
statutes, or Washington state for offenses committed on or after
February 28, 1990, and to kidnapping offenders convicted under the laws
of another state or a foreign country, federal or military statutes, or
Washington state for offenses committed on or after July 27, 1997. Sex
offenders and kidnapping offenders from other states or a foreign
country who, when they move to Washington, are under the jurisdiction
of the department of corrections, the indeterminate sentence review
board, or the department of social and health services must register
within twenty-four hours of moving to Washington. The agency that has
jurisdiction over the offender shall notify the offender of the
registration requirements before the offender moves to Washington.
(vi) OFFENDERS FOUND NOT GUILTY BY REASON OF INSANITY. Any adult
or juvenile who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity under
chapter 10.77 RCW of (A) committing a sex offense on, before, or after
February 28, 1990, and who, on or after July 23, 1995, is in custody,
as a result of that finding, of the state department of social and
health services, or (B) committing a kidnapping offense on, before, or
after July 27, 1997, and who on or after July 27, 1997, is in custody,
as a result of that finding, of the state department of social and
health services, must register within twenty-four hours from the time
of release with the county sheriff for the county of the person's
residence. The state department of social and health services shall
provide notice to the adult or juvenile in its custody of the duty to
register. Any adult or juvenile who has been found not guilty by
reason of insanity of committing a sex offense on, before, or after
February 28, 1990, but who was released before July 23, 1995, or any
adult or juvenile who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity
of committing a kidnapping offense but who was released before July 27,
1997, shall be required to register within twenty-four hours of
receiving notice of this registration requirement. The state
department of social and health services shall make reasonable attempts
within available resources to notify sex offenders who were released
before July 23, 1995, and kidnapping offenders who were released before
July 27, 1997. Failure to register within twenty-four hours of
release, or of receiving notice, constitutes a violation of this
section and is punishable as provided in subsection (((10))) (11) of
this section.
(vii) OFFENDERS WHO LACK A FIXED RESIDENCE. Any person who lacks
a fixed residence and leaves the county in which he or she is
registered and enters and remains within a new county for twenty-four
hours is required to register with the county sheriff not more than
twenty-four hours after entering the county and provide the information
required in subsection (3)(b) of this section.
(viii) OFFENDERS WHO LACK A FIXED RESIDENCE AND WHO ARE UNDER
SUPERVISION. Offenders who lack a fixed residence and who are under
the supervision of the department shall register in the county of their
supervision.
(ix) OFFENDERS WHO MOVE TO, WORK, CARRY ON A VOCATION, OR ATTEND
SCHOOL IN ANOTHER STATE. Offenders required to register in Washington,
who move to another state, or who work, carry on a vocation, or attend
school in another state shall register a new address, fingerprints, and
photograph with the new state within ten days after establishing
residence, or after beginning to work, carry on a vocation, or attend
school in the new state. The person must also send written notice
within ten days of moving to the new state or to a foreign country to
the county sheriff with whom the person last registered in Washington
state. The county sheriff shall promptly forward this information to
the Washington state patrol.
(b) Failure to register within the time required under this section
constitutes a per se violation of this section and is punishable as
provided in subsection (((10))) (11) of this section. The county
sheriff shall not be required to determine whether the person is living
within the county.
(c) An arrest on charges of failure to register, service of an
information, or a complaint for a violation of this section, or
arraignment on charges for a violation of this section, constitutes
actual notice of the duty to register. Any person charged with the
crime of failure to register under this section who asserts as a
defense the lack of notice of the duty to register shall register
immediately following actual notice of the duty through arrest,
service, or arraignment. Failure to register as required under this
subsection (4)(c) constitutes grounds for filing another charge of
failing to register. Registering following arrest, service, or
arraignment on charges shall not relieve the offender from criminal
liability for failure to register prior to the filing of the original
charge.
(d) The deadlines for the duty to register under this section do
not relieve any sex offender of the duty to register under this section
as it existed prior to July 28, 1991.
(5)(a) If any person required to register pursuant to this section
changes his or her residence address within the same county, the person
must send written notice of the change of address to the county sheriff
within seventy-two hours of moving. If any person required to register
pursuant to this section moves to a new county, the person must send
written notice of the change of address at least fourteen days before
moving to the county sheriff in the new county of residence and must
register with that county sheriff within twenty-four hours of moving.
The person must also send written notice within ten days of the change
of address in the new county to the county sheriff with whom the person
last registered. The county sheriff with whom the person last
registered shall promptly forward the information concerning the change
of address to the county sheriff for the county of the person's new
residence. Upon receipt of notice of change of address to a new state,
the county sheriff shall promptly forward the information regarding the
change of address to the agency designated by the new state as the
state's offender registration agency.
(b) It is an affirmative defense to a charge that the person failed
to send a notice at least fourteen days in advance of moving as
required under (a) of this subsection that the person did not know the
location of his or her new residence at least fourteen days before
moving. The defendant must establish the defense by a preponderance of
the evidence and, to prevail on the defense, must also prove by a
preponderance that the defendant sent the required notice within
twenty-four hours of determining the new address.
(6)(a) Any person required to register under this section who lacks
a fixed residence shall provide written notice to the sheriff of the
county where he or she last registered within forty-eight hours
excluding weekends and holidays after ceasing to have a fixed
residence. The notice shall include the information required by
subsection (3)(b) of this section, except the photograph and
fingerprints. The county sheriff may, for reasonable cause, require
the offender to provide a photograph and fingerprints. The sheriff
shall forward this information to the sheriff of the county in which
the person intends to reside, if the person intends to reside in
another county.
(b) A person who lacks a fixed residence must report weekly, in
person, to the sheriff of the county where he or she is registered.
The weekly report shall be on a day specified by the county sheriff's
office, and shall occur during normal business hours. The county
sheriff's office may require the person to list the locations where the
person has stayed during the last seven days. The lack of a fixed
residence is a factor that may be considered in determining an
offender's risk level and shall make the offender subject to disclosure
of information to the public at large pursuant to RCW 4.24.550.
(c) If any person required to register pursuant to this section
does not have a fixed residence, it is an affirmative defense to the
charge of failure to register, that he or she provided written notice
to the sheriff of the county where he or she last registered within
forty-eight hours excluding weekends and holidays after ceasing to have
a fixed residence and has subsequently complied with the requirements
of subsections (4)(a)(vii) or (viii) and (6) of this section. To
prevail, the person must prove the defense by a preponderance of the
evidence.
(7) A sex offender subject to registration requirements under this
section who applies to change his or her name under RCW 4.24.130 or any
other law shall submit a copy of the application to the county sheriff
of the county of the person's residence and to the state patrol not
fewer than five days before the entry of an order granting the name
change. No sex offender under the requirement to register under this
section at the time of application shall be granted an order changing
his or her name if the court finds that doing so will interfere with
legitimate law enforcement interests, except that no order shall be
denied when the name change is requested for religious or legitimate
cultural reasons or in recognition of marriage or dissolution of
marriage. A sex offender under the requirement to register under this
section who receives an order changing his or her name shall submit a
copy of the order to the county sheriff of the county of the person's
residence and to the state patrol within five days of the entry of the
order.
(8)(a) If a person required to register under this section enrolls
in a new public or private school regulated under Title 28A RCW within
the same county in which he or she is registered, graduates from high
school, or ceases to attend school, the person must send written notice
of the new enrollment, graduation, or cessation of schooling to the
county sheriff within seventy-two hours of the enrollment, graduation,
or cessation. If a person required to register under this section
enrolls in a new public or private school regulated under Title 28A RCW
in a different county than the county in which he or she is registered,
the person must send notice of the new enrollment to the county sheriff
in the new county within fourteen days of the enrollment, unless the
person is already required to register in the new county under
subsection (5) of this section. The person must also send written
notice within ten days of the new enrollment in the new county to the
county sheriff with whom the person last registered. The county
sheriff with whom the person last registered shall promptly forward the
information concerning the new enrollment to the county sheriff for the
county of the person's new enrollment.
(b) It is an affirmative defense to a charge that the person failed
to send a notice at least fourteen days in advance of a new enrollment
under (a) of this subsection that the person did not know the location
of his or her new school at least fourteen days in advance. The
defendant must establish the defense by a preponderance of the evidence
and, to prevail on the defense, must also prove by a preponderance that
the defendant sent the required notice within twenty-four hours of
determining the new address.
(9) The county sheriff shall obtain a photograph of the individual
and shall obtain a copy of the individual's fingerprints.
(((9))) (10) For the purpose of RCW 9A.44.130, 10.01.200,
43.43.540, 70.48.470, and 72.09.330:
(a) "Sex offense" means:
(i) Any offense defined as a sex offense by RCW 9.94A.030;
(ii) Any violation under RCW 9A.44.096 (sexual misconduct with a
minor in the second degree);
(iii) Any violation under RCW 9.68A.090 (communication with a minor
for immoral purposes);
(iv) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be classified as a sex offense under
this subsection; and
(v) Any gross misdemeanor that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a
criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to
commit an offense that is classified as a sex offense under RCW
9.94A.030 or this subsection.
(b) "Kidnapping offense" means: (i) The crimes of kidnapping in
the first degree, kidnapping in the second degree, and unlawful
imprisonment, as defined in chapter 9A.40 RCW, where the victim is a
minor and the offender is not the minor's parent; (ii) any offense that
is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt, criminal solicitation,
or criminal conspiracy to commit an offense that is classified as a
kidnapping offense under this subsection (((9))) (10)(b); and (iii) any
federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws
of this state would be classified as a kidnapping offense under this
subsection (((9))) (10)(b).
(c) "Employed" or "carries on a vocation" means employment that is
full-time or part-time for a period of time exceeding fourteen days, or
for an aggregate period of time exceeding thirty days during any
calendar year. A person is employed or carries on a vocation whether
the person's employment is financially compensated, volunteered, or for
the purpose of government or educational benefit.
(d) "Student" means a person who is enrolled, on a full-time or
part-time basis, in any public or private educational institution. An
educational institution includes any secondary school, trade or
professional institution, or institution of higher education.
(((10))) (11)(a) A person who knowingly fails to register with the
county sheriff or notify the county sheriff, or who changes his or her
name without notifying the county sheriff and the state patrol, as
required by this section is guilty of a class C felony if the crime for
which the individual was convicted was a felony sex offense as defined
in subsection (((9))) (10)(a) of this section or a federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony sex offense as defined in subsection (((9))) (10)(a) of
this section.
(b) If the crime for which the individual was convicted was other
than a felony or a federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense
that under the laws of this state would be other than a felony,
violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.
(((11))) (12)(a) A person who knowingly fails to register ((or)),
who moves within the state without notifying the county sheriff, or who
enrolls in a new public or private school regulated under Title 28A RCW
within the state without notifying the county sheriff as required by
this section is guilty of a class C felony if the crime for which the
individual was convicted was a felony kidnapping offense as defined in
subsection (((9))) (10)(b) of this section or a federal or out-of-state
conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a
felony kidnapping offense as defined in subsection (((9))) (10)(b) of
this section.
(b) If the crime for which the individual was convicted was other
than a felony or a federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense
that under the laws of this state would be other than a felony,
violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 2 RCW 4.24.550 and 2003 c 217 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the disclosure under subsections (5) and (6) of
this section, public agencies are authorized to release information to
the public regarding sex offenders and kidnapping offenders when the
agency determines that disclosure of the information is relevant and
necessary to protect the public and counteract the danger created by
the particular offender. This authorization applies to information
regarding: (a) Any person adjudicated or convicted of a sex offense as
defined in RCW 9A.44.130 or a kidnapping offense as defined by RCW
9A.44.130; (b) any person under the jurisdiction of the indeterminate
sentence review board as the result of a sex offense or kidnapping
offense; (c) any person committed as a sexually violent predator under
chapter 71.09 RCW or as a sexual psychopath under chapter 71.06 RCW;
(d) any person found not guilty of a sex offense or kidnapping offense
by reason of insanity under chapter 10.77 RCW; and (e) any person found
incompetent to stand trial for a sex offense or kidnapping offense and
subsequently committed under chapter 71.05 or 71.34 RCW.
(2) Except for the information specifically required under
subsections (5) and (6) of this section, the extent of the public
disclosure of relevant and necessary information shall be rationally
related to: (a) The level of risk posed by the offender to the
community; (b) the locations where the offender resides, expects to
reside, or is regularly found; and (c) the needs of the affected
community members for information to enhance their individual and
collective safety.
(3) Except for the information specifically required under
subsections (5) and (6) of this section, local law enforcement agencies
shall consider the following guidelines in determining the extent of a
public disclosure made under this section: (a) For offenders
classified as risk level I, the agency shall share information with
other appropriate law enforcement agencies and may disclose, upon
request, relevant, necessary, and accurate information to any victim or
witness to the offense and to any individual community member who lives
near the residence where the offender resides, expects to reside, or is
regularly found; (b) for offenders classified as risk level II, the
agency may also disclose relevant, necessary, and accurate information
to public and private schools, child day care centers, family day care
providers, businesses and organizations that serve primarily children,
women, or vulnerable adults, and neighbors and community groups near
the residence where the offender resides, expects to reside, or is
regularly found; (c) for offenders classified as risk level III, the
agency may also disclose relevant, necessary, and accurate information
to the public at large; and (d) because more localized notification is
not feasible and homeless and transient offenders may present unique
risks to the community, the agency may also disclose relevant,
necessary, and accurate information to the public at large for
offenders registered as homeless or transient.
(4) The county sheriff with whom an offender classified as risk
level III is registered shall cause to be published by legal notice,
advertising, or news release a sex offender community notification that
conforms to the guidelines established under RCW 4.24.5501 in at least
one legal newspaper with general circulation in the area of the sex
offender's registered address or location. The county sheriff shall
also cause to be published consistent with this subsection a current
list of level III registered sex offenders, twice yearly. Unless the
information is posted on the web site described in subsection (5) of
this section, this list shall be maintained by the county sheriff on a
publicly accessible web site and shall be updated at least once per
month.
(5)(a) When funded by federal grants or other sources, the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall create and
maintain a statewide registered sex offender web site, which shall be
available to the public. The web site shall post all level III and
level II registered sex offenders in the state of Washington.
(i) For level III offenders, the web site shall contain, but is not
limited to, the registered sex offender's name, relevant criminal
convictions, address by hundred block, physical description, and
photograph. The web site shall provide mapping capabilities that
display the sex offender's address by hundred block on a map. The web
site shall allow citizens to search for registered sex offenders within
the state of Washington by county, city, zip code, last name, type of
conviction, and address by hundred block.
(ii) For level II offenders, the web site shall contain, but is not
limited to, the same information and functionality as described in
(a)(i) of this subsection, provided that it is permissible under state
and federal law. If it is not permissible, the web site shall be
limited to the information and functionality that is permissible under
state and federal law.
(b) Until the implementation of (a) of this subsection, the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall create a web
site available to the public that provides electronic links to county-operated web sites that offer sex offender registration information.
(6) The county sheriff shall maintain a list of public and private
schools regulated under Title 28A RCW where registered sex offenders
are enrolled in the county. The list must contain the names of the
registered sex offenders in each school organized by school. The
county sheriff shall update the list at least once per month. The
county sheriff shall provide the list to persons who request it, but
may not otherwise publish or disseminate the list.
(7) Local law enforcement agencies that disseminate information
pursuant to this section shall: (a) Review available risk level
classifications made by the department of corrections, the department
of social and health services, and the indeterminate sentence review
board; (b) assign risk level classifications to all offenders about
whom information will be disseminated; and (c) make a good faith effort
to notify the public and residents at least fourteen days before the
offender is released from confinement or, where an offender moves from
another jurisdiction, as soon as possible after the agency learns of
the offender's move, except that in no case may this notification
provision be construed to require an extension of an offender's release
date. The juvenile court shall provide local law enforcement officials
with all relevant information on offenders allowed to remain in the
community in a timely manner.
(((7))) (8) An appointed or elected public official, public
employee, or public agency as defined in RCW 4.24.470, or units of
local government and its employees, as provided in RCW 36.28A.010, are
immune from civil liability for damages for any discretionary risk
level classification decisions or release of relevant and necessary
information, unless it is shown that the official, employee, or agency
acted with gross negligence or in bad faith. The immunity in this
section applies to risk level classification decisions and the release
of relevant and necessary information regarding any individual for whom
disclosure is authorized. The decision of a local law enforcement
agency or official to classify an offender to a risk level other than
the one assigned by the department of corrections, the department of
social and health services, or the indeterminate sentence review board,
or the release of any relevant and necessary information based on that
different classification shall not, by itself, be considered gross
negligence or bad faith. The immunity provided under this section
applies to the release of relevant and necessary information to other
public officials, public employees, or public agencies, and to the
general public.
(((8))) (9) Except as may otherwise be provided by law, nothing in
this section shall impose any liability upon a public official, public
employee, or public agency for failing to release information
authorized under this section.
(((9))) (10) Nothing in this section implies that information
regarding persons designated in subsection (1) of this section is
confidential except as may otherwise be provided by law.
(((10))) (11) When a local law enforcement agency or official
classifies an offender differently than the offender is classified by
the end of sentence review committee or the department of social and
health services at the time of the offender's release from confinement,
the law enforcement agency or official shall notify the end of sentence
review committee or the department of social and health services and
submit its reasons supporting the change in classification. Upon
implementation of subsection (5)(a) of this section, notification of
the change shall also be sent to the Washington association of sheriffs
and police chiefs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

--- END ---