BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 9.58.110 (Slander of woman) and 1909 c 249 s 181;
(2) RCW 9.58.120 (Testimony necessary to convict) and 1927 c 90 s
1 & 1909 c 249 s 182;
(3) RCW 49.44.100 (Bringing in out-of-state persons to replace
employees involved in labor dispute -- Penalty) and 2003 c 53 s 277 &
1961 c 180 s 1;
(4) RCW 67.14.020 (Sale or other disposition of liquor -- County
license -- Penalty) and 1873 p 437 s 2;
(5) RCW 67.14.040 (Retail liquor license) and 1973 1st ex.s. c 154
s 100, 1875 p 124 s 1, & 1873 p 438 s 4;
(6) RCW 67.14.050 (Wholesale liquor license -- Billiard table,
bowling alley licenses) and 1873 p 438 s 5;
(7) RCW 67.14.060 (Liquor sales, keeping games, without license--Penalty) and 1873 p 439 s 6;
(8) RCW 67.14.070 (Purchase of license -- Bond) and 1873 p 439 s 7;
(9) RCW 67.14.080 (Duration of license) and 1873 p 439 s 8;
(10) RCW 67.14.090 (Issuance of license) and 1873 p 439 s 9;
(11) RCW 67.14.100 (When contrivance deemed kept for hire) and 1873
p 440 s 10;
(12) RCW 67.14.110 (Druggists excepted) and 1873 p 440 s 11;
(13) RCW 67.14.120 (Disposition of fees, fines, and forfeitures)
and 1987 c 202 s 226, 1969 ex.s. c 199 s 29, & 1873 p 440 s 12;
(14) RCW 70.54.060 (Ambulances and drivers) and 1945 c 65 s 1; and
(15) RCW 70.54.065 (Ambulances and drivers -- Penalty) and 1945 c 65
s 2.

--- END ---