BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 5.60.060 and 2001 c 286 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A husband shall not be examined for or against his wife,
without ((the)) his consent ((of the wife)), nor a wife for or against
her husband without ((the)) her consent ((of the husband)); nor can
either during marriage or afterward, be without the consent of the
other, examined as to any communication made by one to the other during
marriage. But this exception shall not apply to a civil action or
proceeding by one against the other, nor to a criminal action or
proceeding for a crime committed by one against the other, nor to a
criminal action or proceeding against a spouse if the marriage occurred
subsequent to the filing of formal charges against the defendant, nor
to a criminal action or proceeding for a crime committed by said
husband or wife against any child of whom said husband or wife is the
parent or guardian, nor to a proceeding under chapter 70.96A, 71.05, or
71.09 RCW: PROVIDED, That the spouse of a person sought to be detained
under chapter 70.96A, 71.05, or 71.09 RCW may not be compelled to
testify and shall be so informed by the court prior to being called as
a witness. The privilege contained in this subsection shall not apply
to felony criminal proceedings involving both spouses in an allegation
of criminal conspiracy or joint criminal activity with each other.
(2)(a) An attorney or counselor shall not, without the consent of
his or her client, be examined as to any communication made by the
client to him or her, or his or her advice given thereon in the course
of professional employment.
(b) A parent or guardian of a minor child arrested on a criminal
charge may not be examined as to a communication between the child and
his or her attorney if the communication was made in the presence of
the parent or guardian. This privilege does not extend to
communications made prior to the arrest.
(3) A member of the clergy or a priest shall not, without the
consent of a person making the confession, be examined as to any
confession made to him or her in his or her professional character, in
the course of discipline enjoined by the church to which he or she
belongs.
(4) Subject to the limitations under RCW 70.96A.140 or 71.05.250,
a physician or surgeon or osteopathic physician or surgeon or podiatric
physician or surgeon shall not, without the consent of his or her
patient, be examined in a civil action as to any information acquired
in attending such patient, which was necessary to enable him or her to
prescribe or act for the patient, except as follows:
(a) In any judicial proceedings regarding a child's injury,
neglect, or sexual abuse or the cause thereof; and
(b) Ninety days after filing an action for personal injuries or
wrongful death, the claimant shall be deemed to waive the physician-patient privilege. Waiver of the physician-patient privilege for any
one physician or condition constitutes a waiver of the privilege as to
all physicians or conditions, subject to such limitations as a court
may impose pursuant to court rules.
(5) A public officer shall not be examined as a witness as to
communications made to him or her in official confidence, when the
public interest would suffer by the disclosure.
(6)(a) A peer support group counselor shall not, without consent of
the law enforcement officer making the communication, be compelled to
testify about any communication made to the counselor by the officer
while receiving counseling. The counselor must be designated as such
by the sheriff, police chief, or chief of the Washington state patrol,
prior to the incident that results in counseling. The privilege only
applies when the communication was made to the counselor while acting
in his or her capacity as a peer support group counselor. The
privilege does not apply if the counselor was an initial responding
officer, a witness, or a party to the incident which prompted the
delivery of peer support group counseling services to the law
enforcement officer.
(b) For purposes of this section, "peer support group counselor"
means a:
(i) Law enforcement officer, or civilian employee of a law
enforcement agency, who has received training to provide emotional and
moral support and counseling to an officer who needs those services as
a result of an incident in which the officer was involved while acting
in his or her official capacity; or
(ii) Nonemployee counselor who has been designated by the sheriff,
police chief, or chief of the Washington state patrol to provide
emotional and moral support and counseling to an officer who needs
those services as a result of an incident in which the officer was
involved while acting in his or her official capacity.
(7) A sexual assault advocate may not, without the consent of the
victim, be examined as to any communication made by the victim to the
sexual assault advocate.
(a) For purposes of this section, "sexual assault advocate" means
the employee or volunteer from a rape crisis center, victim assistance
unit, program, or association, that provides information, medical or
legal advocacy, counseling, or support to victims of sexual assault,
who is designated by the victim to accompany the victim to the hospital
or other health care facility and to proceedings concerning the alleged
assault, including police and prosecution interviews and court
proceedings.
(b) A sexual assault advocate may disclose a confidential
communication without the consent of the victim if failure to disclose
is likely to result in a clear, imminent risk of serious physical
injury or death of the victim or another person. Any sexual assault
advocate participating in good faith in the disclosing of records and
communications under this section shall have immunity from any
liability, civil, criminal, or otherwise, that might result from the
action. In any proceeding, civil or criminal, arising out of a
disclosure under this section, the good faith of the sexual assault
advocate who disclosed the confidential communication shall be
presumed.

--- END ---