BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.32.070 and 2004 c 248 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission may by rule require reporting of harvest effort,
and may assess an administrative penalty of no more than fifty dollars
against any one person for failure to report harvest effort. The
administrative penalty must be paid prior to obtaining a current
license.
(2) Applicants for a license, permit, tag, or stamp shall furnish
the information required by the director. However, the director may
not require the purchaser of a razor clam license under RCW 77.32.520
to provide any personal information except for proof of residency. The
commission may adopt rules requiring licensees or permittees to keep
records and make reports concerning the taking of fish, shellfish, and
wildlife.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The department of fish and wildlife shall
prepare a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature one
year after the implementation of the provisions authorized in this act
that summarizes any increases or decreases in the rate of compliance
with required wildlife harvest reports.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.15.280 and 1998 c 190 s 47 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of violating rules requiring reporting of
fish or wildlife harvest if the person:
(a) Fails to make a harvest log report of a commercial fish or
shellfish catch in violation of any rule of the commission or the
director;
(b) Fails to maintain a trapper's report or taxidermist ledger in
violation of any rule of the commission or the director;
(c) Fails to submit any portion of a big game animal for a required
inspection required by rule of the commission or the director; or
(d) Fails to return a catch record card or wildlife harvest report
to the department as required by rule of the commission or director.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 77.32.070(1), violating rules
requiring reporting of fish or wildlife harvest is a misdemeanor.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.12.170 and 2004 c 248 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is established in the state treasury the state wildlife
fund which consists of moneys received from:
(a) Rentals or concessions of the department;
(b) The sale of real or personal property held for department
purposes;
(c) The sale of licenses, permits, tags, and stamps required by
chapter 77.32 RCW and RCW 77.65.490, except annual resident adult
saltwater and all annual razor clam and shellfish licenses, which shall
be deposited into the state general fund;
(d) Fees for informational materials published by the department;
(e) Fees for personalized vehicle license plates as provided in
chapter 46.16 RCW;
(f) Articles or wildlife sold by the director under this title;
(g) Compensation for damage to department property or wildlife
losses or contributions, gifts, or grants received under RCW 77.12.320;
(h) Excise tax on anadromous game fish collected under chapter
82.27 RCW;
(i) The sale of personal property seized by the department for
fish, shellfish, or wildlife violations;
(j) The department's share of revenues from auctions and raffles
authorized by the commission; ((and))
(k) The sale of watchable wildlife decals under RCW 77.32.560; and
(j) Administrative penalties collected under RCW 77.32.070.
(2) State and county officers receiving any moneys listed in
subsection (1) of this section shall deposit them in the state treasury
to be credited to the state wildlife fund.

--- END ---