BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.41.042 and 2003 c 53 s 27 are each amended to read
as follows:
RCW 9.41.040(2)(a)(iii) shall not apply to any person under the age
of eighteen years who is:
(1) In attendance at a ((hunter's safety)) hunter education course
or a firearms safety course;
(2) Engaging in practice in the use of a firearm or target shooting
at an established range authorized by the governing body of the
jurisdiction in which such range is located or any other area where the
discharge of a firearm is not prohibited;
(3) Engaging in an organized competition involving the use of a
firearm, or participating in or practicing for a performance by an
organized group that uses firearms as a part of the performance;
(4) Hunting or trapping under a valid license issued to the person
under Title 77 RCW, and if the person is under fourteen years of age
the person must be under the immediate supervision of a parent,
guardian, or other adult approved for the purpose by the parent or
guardian. "Immediate supervision" means within unassisted hearing
distance;
(5) In an area where the discharge of a firearm is permitted, is
not trespassing, and the person either: (a) Is at least fourteen years
of age, has been issued a hunter ((safety)) education certificate, and
is using a lawful firearm other than a pistol; or (b) is under the
supervision of a parent, guardian, or other adult approved for the
purpose by the parent or guardian;
(6) Traveling with any unloaded firearm in the person's possession
to or from any activity described in subsection (1), (2), (3), (4), or
(5) of this section;
(7) On real property under the control of his or her parent, other
relative, or legal guardian and who has the permission of the parent or
legal guardian to possess a firearm;
(8) At his or her residence and who, with the permission of his or
her parent or legal guardian, possesses a firearm for the purpose of
exercising the rights specified in RCW 9A.16.020(3); or
(9) Is a member of the armed forces of the United States, national
guard, or organized reserves, when on duty.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.32.155 and 1998 c 191 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) When purchasing any hunting license, persons under the age
of eighteen shall present certification of completion of a hunter
education course of instruction of at least ten hours in the safe
handling of firearms, safety, conservation, and sportsmanship.
Beginning January 1, 1995, all persons purchasing any hunting license
for the first time, if born after January 1, 1972, shall present such
certification.
(b) The director shall prescribe the type of instruction and the
qualifications of the instructors.
(c) Enrollment priority in a hunter education course must be given
to participants above ten years of age.
(2) The director may establish a program for training persons in
the safe handling of firearms, conservation, and sportsmanship and may
cooperate with the National Rifle Association, organized sportsmen's
groups, or other public or private organizations.
((The director shall prescribe the type of instruction and the
qualifications of the instructors.))
(3)(a) Upon successful completion of the hunter education course,
a trainee shall receive a hunter education certificate signed by an
authorized instructor. The certificate is evidence of compliance with
this section.
(b) The director may accept certificates from other states that
persons have successfully completed ((firearm safety,)) a hunter
education course, or similar courses as evidence of compliance with
this section.

--- END ---