BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The administrator of the state health care authority shall,
directly or by contract, adopt policies necessary for establishment of
a prescription drug purchasing consortium. The consortium's purchasing
activities shall be based upon the evidence-based prescription drug
program established under RCW 70.14.050. State purchased health care
programs, as defined in RCW 41.05.011(2), shall purchase prescription
drugs through the consortium for those prescription drugs that are
purchased directly by the state and those that are purchased through
reimbursement of pharmacies, unless exempted under this section. The
administrator shall not require that any supplemental rebate offered by
a pharmaceutical manufacturer for prescription drugs purchased for
medical assistance program clients under chapter 74.09 RCW be extended
to state purchased health care programs other than medical assistance,
or to individuals or entities participating in the consortium. The
administrator shall explore joint purchasing opportunities with other
states.
(2) Participation in the purchasing consortium shall be offered as
an option beginning January 1, 2006. Participation in the consortium
is purely voluntary for units of local government, private entities,
labor organizations, and for individuals who lack or are underinsured
for prescription drug coverage. The provisions of RCW 69.41.190 shall
apply to prescriptions filled for all voluntary participants in the
purchasing consortium. The administrator may set reasonable fees,
including enrollment fees, to cover administrative costs attributable
to participation in the prescription drug consortium.
(3) The prescription drug consortium advisory committee is created
within the authority. The function of the prescription drug advisory
committee is to advise the administrator of the state health care
authority on the implementation of the prescription drug purchasing
consortium.
(4) The prescription drug consortium advisory committee shall be
composed of eleven members selected as provided in this subsection.
(a) The administrator shall select one member of the prescription
drug consortium advisory committee from each list of three nominees
submitted by statewide organizations representing the following:
(i) One representative of state employees, who represents an
employee union certified as exclusive representative of at least one
bargaining unit of classified employees;
(ii) One member who is a licensed physician;
(iii) One member who is a licensed pharmacist;
(iv) One member who is a licensed advanced registered nurse
practitioner;
(v) One member representing a health carrier licensed under Title
48 RCW; and
(vi) One member representing unions that represent private sector
employees;
(b) The administrator shall select two members of the advisory
committee from a list of nominees submitted by statewide organizations
representing consumers. One of the consumer members shall have
knowledge or experience regarding senior citizen prescription drug cost
and utilization issues;
(c) The administrator shall select two members of the advisory
committee from a list of nominees submitted by statewide organizations
representing business, one of whom shall represent small businesses who
employ fifty or fewer employees and one of whom shall represent large
businesses; and
(d) The administrator shall select one member who is versed in
biologic medicine through research or academia from the University of
Washington or Washington State University.
(5) The administrator shall consult with the advisory committee on
at least a quarterly basis on significant policy decisions related to
implementation of the purchasing consortium.
(6) State purchased health care services that are purchased from or
through health carriers as defined in RCW 48.43.005, or group model
health maintenance organizations that are accredited by the national
committee for quality assurance are exempt from the requirements of
this section.
(7) State purchased health care programs are exempt from the
requirements of this section if they can demonstrate to the
administrator that, as a result of the availability of federal programs
or other purchasing arrangements, their current purchasing mechanisms
will result in greater discounts and aggregate cost savings than would
be realized through participation in the consortium.
(8) The state health care authority is authorized to adopt rules
implementing this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.14 RCW
to read as follows:
The prescription drug consortium account is created in the custody
of the state treasurer. All receipts from activities related to
administration of the consortium on behalf of participants other than
state purchased health care programs, including but not limited to
rebates from manufacturers and fees established under section 1(2) of
this act must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the
account may be used only for the purposes of section 1 of this act.
Only the administrator of the state health care authority or the
administrator's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW,
but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

--- END ---