BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Affiliate" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.31B.005(1).
(b) "Claim" means a demand for monetary damages by a claimant.
(c) "Claimant" means a person, including a decedent's estate, who
is seeking or has sought monetary damages for injury or death caused by
medical malpractice.
(d) "Tier" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.18.545(1)(h).
(e) "Underwrite" or "underwriting" means the process of selecting,
rejecting, or pricing a risk, and includes each of these activities:
(i) Evaluation, selection, and classification of risk, including
placing a risk with an affiliate insurer that has higher rates and/or
rating plan components that will result in higher premiums;
(ii) Application of classification plans, rates, rating rules, and
rating tiers to an insured risk; and
(iii) Determining eligibility for:
(A) Insurance coverage provisions;
(B) Higher policy limits; or
(C) Premium payment plans.
(2) During each underwriting process, an insurer may consider the
following factors only in combination with other substantive
underwriting factors:
(a) An insured has inquired about the nature or scope of coverage
under a medical malpractice insurance policy;
(b) An insured has notified their insurer about an incident that
may be covered under the terms of their medical malpractice insurance
policy, and that incident does not result in a claim; or
(c) A claim made against an insured was closed by the insurer
without payment. An insurer may consider the effect of multiple claims
if they have a significant effect on the insured's risk profile.
(3) If any underwriting activity related to the insured's risk
profile results in higher premiums as described under subsection
(1)(e)(i) and (ii) of this section or reduced coverage as described
under subsection (1)(e)(iii) of this section, the insurer must provide
written notice to the insured, in clear and simple language, that
describes the significant risk factors which led to the underwriting
action. The commissioner must adopt rules that define the components
of a risk profile that require notice under this subsection.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.18.290 and 1997 c 85 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Cancellation by the insurer of any policy which by its terms is
cancellable at the option of the insurer, or of any binder based on
such policy which does not contain a clearly stated expiration date,
may be effected as to any interest only upon compliance with the
following:
(a) ((Written notice of such cancellation, accompanied by the
actual reason therefor, must be actually delivered or mailed to the
named insured not less than forty-five days prior to the effective date
of the cancellation except for cancellation of insurance policies for
nonpayment of premiums, which notice shall be not less than ten days
prior to such date and except for cancellation of fire insurance
policies under chapter 48.53 RCW, which notice shall not be less than
five days prior to such date;
(b))) For all insurance policies other than medical malpractice
insurance policies or fire insurance policies canceled under RCW
48.53.040:
(i) The insurer must deliver or mail written notice of cancellation
to the named insured at least forty-five days before the effective date
of the cancellation; and
(ii) The cancellation notice must include the insurer's actual
reason for canceling the policy.
(b) For medical malpractice insurance policies:
(i) The insurer must deliver or mail written notice of the
cancellation to the named insured at least ninety days before the
effective date of the cancellation; and
(ii) The cancellation notice must include the insurer's actual
reason for canceling the policy and describe the significant risk
factors that led to the insurer's underwriting action, as defined under
section 1(1)(e) of this act.
(c) If an insurer cancels a policy described under (a) or (b) of
this subsection for nonpayment of premium, the insurer must deliver or
mail the cancellation notice to the named insured at least ten days
before the effective date of the cancellation.
(d) If an insurer cancels a fire insurance policy under RCW
48.53.040, the insurer must deliver or mail the cancellation notice to
the named insured at least five days before the effective date of the
cancellation.
(e) Like notice must also be so delivered or mailed to each
mortgagee, pledgee, or other person shown by the policy to have an
interest in any loss which may occur thereunder. For purposes of this
subsection (1)(((b))) (e), "delivered" includes electronic transmittal,
facsimile, or personal delivery.
(2) The mailing of any such notice shall be effected by depositing
it in a sealed envelope, directed to the addressee at his or her last
address as known to the insurer or as shown by the insurer's records,
with proper prepaid postage affixed, in a letter depository of the
United States post office. The insurer shall retain in its records any
such item so mailed, together with its envelope, which was returned by
the post office upon failure to find, or deliver the mailing to, the
addressee.
(3) The affidavit of the individual making or supervising such a
mailing, shall constitute prima facie evidence of such facts of the
mailing as are therein affirmed.
(4) The portion of any premium paid to the insurer on account of
the policy, unearned because of the cancellation and in amount as
computed on the pro rata basis, must be actually paid to the insured or
other person entitled thereto as shown by the policy or by any
endorsement thereon, or be mailed to the insured or such person as soon
as possible, and no later than forty-five days after the date of notice
of cancellation to the insured for homeowners', dwelling fire, and
private passenger auto. Any such payment may be made by cash, or by
check, bank draft, or money order.
(5) This section shall not apply to contracts of life or disability
insurance without provision for cancellation prior to the date to which
premiums have been paid, or to contracts of insurance procured under
the provisions of chapter 48.15 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.18.2901 and 2002 c 347 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each insurer ((shall be required to)) must renew any ((contract
of)) insurance policy subject to RCW 48.18.290 unless one of the
following situations exists:
(a) ((The insurer gives the named insured at least forty-five days'
notice in writing as provided for in RCW 48.18.290, that it proposes to
refuse to renew the insurance contract upon its expiration date; and
sets forth in that writing the actual reason for refusing to renew;))
(i) For all insurance policies subject to RCW 48.18.290(1)(a):
(A) The insurer must deliver or mail written notice of nonrenewal
to the named insured at least forty-five days before the expiration
date of the policy; and
(B) The notice must include the insurer's actual reason for
refusing to renew the policy.
(ii) For medical malpractice insurance policies subject to RCW
48.18.290(1)(b):
(A) The insurer must deliver or mail written notice of the
nonrenewal to the named insured at least ninety days before the
expiration date of the policy; and
(B) The notice must include the insurer's actual reason for
refusing to renew the policy and describe the significant risk factors
that led to the insurer's underwriting action, as defined under section
1(1)(e) of this act;
(b) At least twenty days prior to its expiration date, the insurer
has communicated, either directly or through its agent, its willingness
to renew in writing to the named insured and has included in that
writing a statement of the amount of the premium or portion thereof
required to be paid by the insured to renew the policy, and the insured
fails to discharge when due his or her obligation in connection with
the payment of such premium or portion thereof;
(c) The insured has procured equivalent coverage prior to the
expiration of the policy period;
(d) The contract is evidenced by a written binder containing a
clearly stated expiration date which has expired according to its
terms; or
(e) The contract clearly states that it is not renewable, and is
for a specific line, subclassification, or type of coverage that is not
offered on a renewable basis. This subsection (1)(e) does not restrict
the authority of the insurance commissioner under this code.
(2) Any insurer failing to include in the notice required by
subsection (1)(b) of this section the amount of any increased premium
resulting from a change of rates and an explanation of any change in
the contract provisions shall renew the policy if so required by that
subsection according to the rates and contract provisions applicable to
the expiring policy. However, renewal based on the rates and contract
provisions applicable to the expiring policy shall not prevent the
insurer from making changes in the rates and/or contract provisions of
the policy once during the term of its renewal after at least twenty
days' advance notice of such change has been given to the named
insured.
(3) Renewal of a policy shall not constitute a waiver or estoppel
with respect to grounds for cancellation which existed before the
effective date of such renewal, or with respect to cancellation of fire
policies under chapter 48.53 RCW.
(4) "Renewal" or "to renew" means the issuance and delivery by an
insurer of a contract of insurance replacing at the end of the contract
period a contract of insurance previously issued and delivered by the
same insurer, or the issuance and delivery of a certificate or notice
extending the term of a contract beyond its policy period or term.
However, (a) any contract of insurance with a policy period or term of
six months or less whether or not made continuous for successive terms
upon the payment of additional premiums shall for the purpose of RCW
48.18.290 and 48.18.293 through 48.18.295 be considered as if written
for a policy period or term of six months; and (b) any policy written
for a term longer than one year or any policy with no fixed expiration
date, shall, for the purpose of RCW 48.18.290 and 48.18.293 through
48.18.295, be considered as if written for successive policy periods or
terms of one year.
(5) A midterm blanket reduction in rate, approved by the
commissioner, for medical malpractice insurance shall not be considered
a renewal for purposes of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act applies to insurance policies
issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2007.

--- END ---