BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In an action against a health care provider under this chapter,
an expert may not provide testimony at trial unless the expert meets
the following criteria:
(a) Has expertise in the medical condition at issue in the action;
and
(b) At the time of the occurrence of the incident at issue in the
action, or at the time of retirement in the case of an expert who
retired no sooner than five years prior to the time the action is
commenced, was either:
(i) Engaged in active practice in the same or similar area of
practice or specialty as the defendant; or
(ii) Teaching at an accredited medical school or an accredited or
affiliated academic or clinical training program in the same or similar
area of practice or specialty as the defendant, including instruction
regarding the particular condition at issue.
(2) Upon motion of a party, the court may waive the requirements of
subsection (1) of this section and allow an expert who does not meet
those requirements to testify at trial if the court finds that:
(a) Extensive efforts were made by the party to locate an expert
who meets the criteria under subsection (1) of this section, but none
was willing and available to testify; and
(b) The proposed expert is qualified to be an expert witness by
virtue of the person's training, experience, and knowledge.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
An expert opinion provided in the course of an action against a
health care provider under this chapter must be corroborated by
admissible evidence, such as, but not limited to, treatment or practice
protocols or guidelines developed by medical specialty organizations,
objective academic research, clinical trials or studies, or widely
accepted clinical practices.

--- END ---