BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17.640 and 2005 c 445 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The contribution limits in this section apply to:
(a) Candidates for state legislative office;
(b) Candidates for state office other than state legislative
office;
(c) Candidates for county office in a county that has over two
hundred thousand registered voters;
(d) Candidates for special purpose district office if that district
is authorized to provide freight and passenger transfer and terminal
facilities and that district has over two hundred thousand registered
voters;
(e) Persons holding an office in (a) through (d) of this subsection
against whom recall charges have been filed or to a political committee
having the expectation of making expenditures in support of the recall
of a person holding the office;
(f) Caucus political committees;
(g) Bona fide political parties.
(2) No person, other than a bona fide political party or a caucus
political committee, may make contributions to a candidate for a state
legislative office or county office that in the aggregate exceed seven
hundred dollars or to a candidate for a public office in a special
purpose district or a state office other than a state legislative
office that in the aggregate exceed one thousand four hundred dollars
for each election in which the candidate is on the ballot or appears as
a write-in candidate. Contributions to candidates subject to the
limits in this section made with respect to a primary may not be made
after the date of the primary. However, contributions to a candidate
or a candidate's authorized committee may be made with respect to a
primary until thirty days after the primary, subject to the following
limitations: (a) The candidate lost the primary; (b) the candidate's
authorized committee has insufficient funds to pay debts outstanding as
of the date of the primary; and (c) the contributions may only be
raised and spent to satisfy the outstanding debt. Contributions to
candidates subject to the limits in this section made with respect to
a general election may not be made after the final day of the
applicable election cycle.
(((2))) (3) No person, other than a bona fide political party or a
caucus political committee, may make contributions to a state official,
a county official, or a public official in a special purpose district
against whom recall charges have been filed, or to a political
committee having the expectation of making expenditures in support of
the recall of the state official, county official, or public official
in a special purpose district during a recall campaign that in the
aggregate exceed seven hundred dollars if for a state legislative
office or county office or one thousand four hundred dollars if for a
special purpose district office or a state office other than a state
legislative office.
(((3))) (4)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (((1))) (2) of this
section, no bona fide political party or caucus political committee may
make contributions to a candidate during an election cycle that in the
aggregate exceed (i) seventy cents multiplied by the number of eligible
registered voters in the jurisdiction from which the candidate is
elected if the contributor is a caucus political committee or the
governing body of a state organization, or (ii) thirty-five cents
multiplied by the number of registered voters in the jurisdiction from
which the candidate is elected if the contributor is a county central
committee or a legislative district committee.
(b) No candidate may accept contributions from a county central
committee or a legislative district committee during an election cycle
that when combined with contributions from other county central
committees or legislative district committees would in the aggregate
exceed thirty-five cents times the number of registered voters in the
jurisdiction from which the candidate is elected.
(((4))) (5)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (((2))) (3) of this
section, no bona fide political party or caucus political committee may
make contributions to a state official, county official, or a public
official in a special purpose district against whom recall charges have
been filed, or to a political committee having the expectation of
making expenditures in support of the state official, county official,
or a public official in a special purpose district during a recall
campaign that in the aggregate exceed (i) seventy cents multiplied by
the number of eligible registered voters in the jurisdiction entitled
to recall the state official if the contributor is a caucus political
committee or the governing body of a state organization, or (ii)
thirty-five cents multiplied by the number of registered voters in the
jurisdiction from which the candidate is elected if the contributor is
a county central committee or a legislative district committee.
(b) No ((state)) official holding an office specified in subsection
(1) of this section against whom recall charges have been filed, no
authorized committee of the official, and no political committee having
the expectation of making expenditures in support of the recall of ((a
state)) the official may accept contributions from a county central
committee or a legislative district committee during an election cycle
that when combined with contributions from other county central
committees or legislative district committees would in the aggregate
exceed thirty-five cents multiplied by the number of registered voters
in the jurisdiction from which the candidate is elected.
(((5))) (6) For purposes of determining contribution limits under
subsections (((3) and)) (4) and (5) of this section, the number of
eligible registered voters in a jurisdiction is the number at the time
of the most recent general election in the jurisdiction.
(((6))) (7) Notwithstanding subsections (((1))) (2) through (((4)))
(5) of this section, no person other than an individual, bona fide
political party, or caucus political committee may make contributions
reportable under this chapter to a caucus political committee that in
the aggregate exceed seven hundred dollars in a calendar year or to a
bona fide political party that in the aggregate exceed three thousand
five hundred dollars in a calendar year. This subsection does not
apply to loans made in the ordinary course of business.
(((7))) (8) For the purposes of RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790, a
contribution to the authorized political committee of a candidate((,))
or of ((a state)) an official specified in subsection (1) of this
section against whom recall charges have been filed((,)) is considered
to be a contribution to the candidate or ((state)) official.
(((8))) (9) A contribution received within the twelve-month period
after a recall election concerning ((a state)) an office specified in
subsection (1) of this section is considered to be a contribution
during that recall campaign if the contribution is used to pay a debt
or obligation incurred to influence the outcome of that recall
campaign.
(((9))) (10) The contributions allowed by subsection (((2))) (3) of
this section are in addition to those allowed by subsection (((1))) (2)
of this section, and the contributions allowed by subsection (((4)))
(5) of this section are in addition to those allowed by subsection
(((3))) (4) of this section.
(((10))) (11) RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790 apply to a special
election conducted to fill a vacancy in ((a state)) an office specified
in subsection (1) of this section. However, the contributions made to
a candidate or received by a candidate for a primary or special
election conducted to fill such a vacancy shall not be counted toward
any of the limitations that apply to the candidate or to contributions
made to the candidate for any other primary or election.
(((11))) (12) Notwithstanding the other subsections of this
section, no corporation or business entity not doing business in
Washington state, no labor union with fewer than ten members who reside
in Washington state, and no political committee that has not received
contributions of ten dollars or more from at least ten persons
registered to vote in Washington state during the preceding one hundred
eighty days may make contributions reportable under this chapter to a
candidate, to a state official against whom recall charges have been
filed, or to a political committee having the expectation of making
expenditures in support of the recall of the official. This subsection
does not apply to loans made in the ordinary course of business.
(((12))) (13) Notwithstanding the other subsections of this
section, no county central committee or legislative district committee
may make contributions reportable under this chapter to a candidate((,
state official)) specified in subsection (1) of this section, or an
official specified in subsection (1) of this section against whom
recall charges have been filed, or political committee having the
expectation of making expenditures in support of the recall of ((a
state)) an official specified in subsection (1) of this section if the
county central committee or legislative district committee is outside
of the jurisdiction entitled to elect the candidate or recall the
((state)) official.
(((13))) (14) No person may accept contributions that exceed the
contribution limitations provided in this section.
(((14))) (15) The following contributions are exempt from the
contribution limits of this section:
(a) An expenditure or contribution earmarked for voter
registration, for absentee ballot information, for precinct caucuses,
for get-out-the-vote campaigns, for precinct judges or inspectors, for
sample ballots, or for ballot counting, all without promotion of or
political advertising for individual candidates; or
(b) An expenditure by a political committee for its own internal
organization or fund raising without direct association with individual
candidates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No person may make contributions to a candidate for the state
supreme court or court of appeals that in the aggregate exceed one
thousand four hundred dollars for each election in which the candidate
is on the ballot or appears as a write-in candidate. Contributions
made with respect to a primary may not be made after the date of the
primary. However, contributions to a candidate or a candidate's
authorized committee may be made with respect to a primary until thirty
days after the primary, subject to the following limitations: (a) The
candidate lost the primary; (b) the candidate's authorized committee
has insufficient funds to pay debts outstanding as of the date of the
primary; and (c) the contributions may only be raised and spent to
satisfy the outstanding debt. Contributions made with respect to a
general election may not be made after the final day of the applicable
election cycle.
(2) This section through RCW 42.17.790 apply to a special election
conducted to fill a vacancy in an office. However, the contributions
made to a candidate or received by a candidate for a primary or special
election conducted to fill such a vacancy will not be counted toward
any of the limitations that apply to the candidate or to contributions
made to the candidate for any other primary or election.
(3) No person may accept contributions that exceed the contribution
limitations provided in this section.
(4) The dollar limits in this section must be adjusted according to
RCW 42.17.690.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW
to read as follows:
The commission shall adopt rules to carry out the policies of this
act and is not subject to the time restrictions of RCW 42.17.370(1).

Sec. 4 RCW 42.17.700 and 1993 c 2 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Contributions to candidates for state office made and received
before December 3, 1992, are considered to be contributions under RCW
42.17.640 through 42.17.790. Monetary contributions that exceed the
contribution limitations and that have not been spent by the recipient
of the contribution by December 3, 1992, must be disposed of in
accordance with RCW 42.17.095.
(2) Contributions to other candidates subject to the contribution
limits of this chapter made and received before the effective date of
this act are considered to be contributions under RCW 42.17.640 through
42.17.790. Contributions that exceed the contribution limitations and
that have not been spent by the recipient of the contribution by the
effective date of this act must be disposed of in accordance with RCW
42.17.095 except for subsections (6) and (7) of that section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---