BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
Cities shall, in the predesign phase of construction projects
involving relocation of sewer and/or water facilities, consult with
public utilities operating water/sewer systems in order to coordinate
design.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.55.060 and 1963 c 4 s 36.55.060 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any person constructing or operating any utility on or along a
county road shall be liable to the county for all necessary expense
incurred in restoring the county road to a suitable condition for
travel.
(2) No franchise shall be granted for a period of longer than fifty
years.
(3) No exclusive franchise or privilege shall be granted.
(4) The facilities of the holder of any such franchise shall be
removed at the expense of the holder thereof, to some other location on
such county road in the event it is to be constructed, altered, or
improved or becomes a primary state highway and such removal is
reasonably necessary for the construction, alteration, or improvement
thereof.
(5) Counties shall, in the predesign phase of construction projects
involving relocation of sewer and/or water facilities, consult with
public utilities operating water/sewer systems in order to coordinate
design.

--- END ---