BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 57.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If a district acquires either water facilities or sewer
facilities, or both from a city, and the district and the city within
which the facilities are located enter into an agreement stating that
the district will seek annexation of territory within that city, the
district commissioners may initiate a process for the annexation of
such territory.
(2) The annexation process shall commence upon the adoption of a
resolution by the commissioners calling for the question of annexation
to be submitted to the voters of the territory proposed for annexation
and setting forth the boundaries thereof. The resolution must be filed
with the county legislative authority of each county in which the
territory proposed for annexation is located.
(3) Upon receipt of the resolution, the county legislative
authority shall cause a hearing to be held as provided in section 2 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 57.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If a resolution calling for an annexation election as provided
in section 1 of this act is presented for hearing, the legislative
authority of each county in which the territory proposed for annexation
is located shall hear the resolution or may adjourn and reconvene the
hearing as deemed necessary for its purposes. The hearing, however,
may not exceed four weeks in duration. Any person, firm, or
corporation may appear before the legislative authority or authorities
and make objections to the proposed boundary lines or to annexation of
the territory described in the resolution.
(2) Upon a final hearing, each county legislative authority may
make changes to the proposed boundary lines within the county as it
deems proper and shall formally establish and define the boundaries.
Each legislative authority also shall find whether the proposed
annexation will be conducive to the public health, welfare, and
convenience and whether it will be of special benefit to the land
included within the boundaries of the proposed annexation. No lands
that will not, in the judgment of the legislative authority, benefit by
inclusion therein, may be included within the boundaries of the
territory as established and defined. The legislative authority may
not include within the territory proposed for annexation any territory
outside of the boundary lines described in the resolution adopted by
the district under section 1(2) of this act.
(3) Upon the entry of the findings of the final hearing, each
county legislative authority, if it finds the proposed annexation
satisfies the requirements of subsection (2) of this section, shall
give notice of a special election to be held within the boundaries of
the territory proposed for annexation for the purpose of determining
whether the same shall be annexed to the district. The notice shall:
(a) Describe the boundaries established by the legislative
authority;
(b) State the name of the district to which the territory is
proposed to be annexed;
(c) Be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the
territory proposed for annexation at least once a week for a minimum of
two successive weeks prior to the election;
(d) Be posted for the same period in at least four public places
within the boundaries of the territory proposed for annexation; and
(e) Designate the places within the territory proposed for
annexation where the election shall be held.
(4) The proposition to the voters shall be expressed on ballots
containing the words:

For Annexation to District
or
Against Annexation to District

The county legislative authority shall name the persons to act as
judges at that election.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 57.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The annexation election shall be held on the date designated in
the notice and shall be conducted in accordance with the general
election laws of the state. Qualified voters residing within the
territory proposed for annexation shall be permitted to vote at the
election.
(2) If the majority of the votes cast upon the question of such
election are for annexation, the territory concerned shall immediately
be deemed annexed to the district and the same shall then forthwith be
a part of the district, the same as though originally included in that
district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 57.24 RCW
to read as follows:
The method of annexation provided for in sections 1 through 3 of
this act is an alternative method and is additional to other methods
provided for in this chapter.

--- END ---