BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.43.112 and 1997 c 375 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Washington state patrol officers may engage in private law
enforcement off-duty employment, in uniform or in plainclothes for
private benefit, subject to guidelines adopted by the chief of the
Washington state patrol. These guidelines must ensure that the
integrity and professionalism of the Washington state patrol is
preserved. Use of Washington state patrol officer's uniforms shall be
considered de minimis use of state property.

--- END ---