BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.44.130 and 2003 c 215 s 1 and 2003 c 53 s 68 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Any adult or juvenile residing whether or not the person has a
fixed residence, or who is a student, is employed, or carries on a
vocation in this state who has been found to have committed or has been
convicted of any sex offense ((or)), kidnapping offense, or luring
offense, or who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity under
chapter 10.77 RCW of committing any sex offense ((or)), kidnapping
offense, or luring offense, shall register with the county sheriff for
the county of the person's residence, or if the person is not a
resident of Washington, the county of the person's school, or place of
employment or vocation, or as otherwise specified in this section.
Where a person required to register under this section is in custody of
the state department of corrections, the state department of social and
health services, a local division of youth services, or a local jail or
juvenile detention facility as a result of a sex offense ((or)),
kidnapping offense, or luring offense, the person shall also register
at the time of release from custody with an official designated by the
agency that has jurisdiction over the person. In addition, any such
adult or juvenile: (a) Who is admitted to a public or private
institution of higher education shall, within ten days of enrolling or
by the first business day after arriving at the institution, whichever
is earlier, notify the sheriff for the county of the person's residence
of the person's intent to attend the institution; (b) who gains
employment at a public or private institution of higher education
shall, within ten days of accepting employment or by the first business
day after commencing work at the institution, whichever is earlier,
notify the sheriff for the county of the person's residence of the
person's employment by the institution; or (c) whose enrollment or
employment at a public or private institution of higher education is
terminated shall, within ten days of such termination, notify the
sheriff for the county of the person's residence of the person's
termination of enrollment or employment at the institution. Persons
required to register under this section who are enrolled in a public or
private institution of higher education on June 11, 1998, must notify
the county sheriff immediately. The sheriff shall notify the
institution's department of public safety and shall provide that
department with the same information provided to a county sheriff under
subsection (3) of this section.
(2) This section may not be construed to confer any powers pursuant
to RCW ((4.24.500)) 4.24.550 upon the public safety department of any
public or private institution of higher education.
(3)(a) The person shall provide the following information when
registering: (i) Name; (ii) address; (iii) date and place of birth;
(iv) place of employment; (v) crime for which convicted; (vi) date and
place of conviction; (vii) aliases used; (viii) social security number;
(ix) photograph; and (x) fingerprints.
(b) Any person who lacks a fixed residence shall provide the
following information when registering: (i) Name; (ii) date and place
of birth; (iii) place of employment; (iv) crime for which convicted;
(v) date and place of conviction; (vi) aliases used; (vii) social
security number; (viii) photograph; (ix) fingerprints; and (x) where he
or she plans to stay.
(4)(a) Offenders shall register with the county sheriff within the
following deadlines. For purposes of this section the term
"conviction" refers to adult convictions and juvenile adjudications for
sex offenses or kidnapping offenses:
(i) OFFENDERS IN CUSTODY. (A) Sex offenders who committed a sex
offense on, before, or after February 28, 1990, and who, on or after
July 28, 1991, are in custody, as a result of that offense, of the
state department of corrections, the state department of social and
health services, a local division of youth services, or a local jail or
juvenile detention facility, ((and)) (B) kidnapping offenders who on or
after July 27, 1997, are in custody of the state department of
corrections, the state department of social and health services, a
local division of youth services, or a local jail or juvenile detention
facility, and (C) luring offenders who on or after August 1, 2005, are
in custody of the state department of corrections, the state department
of social and health services, a local division of youth services, or
a local jail or juvenile detention facility, must register at the time
of release from custody with an official designated by the agency that
has jurisdiction over the offender. The agency shall within three days
forward the registration information to the county sheriff for the
county of the offender's anticipated residence. The offender must also
register within twenty-four hours from the time of release with the
county sheriff for the county of the person's residence, or if the
person is not a resident of Washington, the county of the person's
school, or place of employment or vocation. The agency that has
jurisdiction over the offender shall provide notice to the offender of
the duty to register. Failure to register at the time of release and
within twenty-four hours of release constitutes a violation of this
section and is punishable as provided in subsection (10) of this
section.
When the agency with jurisdiction intends to release an offender
with a duty to register under this section, and the agency has
knowledge that the offender is eligible for developmental disability
services from the department of social and health services, the agency
shall notify the division of developmental disabilities of the release.
Notice shall occur not more than thirty days before the offender is to
be released. The agency and the division shall assist the offender in
meeting the initial registration requirement under this section.
Failure to provide such assistance shall not constitute a defense for
any violation of this section.
(ii) OFFENDERS NOT IN CUSTODY BUT UNDER STATE OR LOCAL
JURISDICTION. Sex offenders who, on July 28, 1991, are not in custody
but are under the jurisdiction of the indeterminate sentence review
board or under the department of corrections' active supervision, as
defined by the department of corrections, the state department of
social and health services, or a local division of youth services, for
sex offenses committed before, on, or after February 28, 1990, must
register within ten days of July 28, 1991. Kidnapping offenders who,
on July 27, 1997, are not in custody but are under the jurisdiction of
the indeterminate sentence review board or under the department of
corrections' active supervision, as defined by the department of
corrections, the state department of social and health services, or a
local division of youth services, for kidnapping offenses committed
before, on, or after July 27, 1997, must register within ten days of
July 27, 1997. Luring offenders who, on August 1, 2005, are not in
custody but are under the jurisdiction of the indeterminate sentence
review board or under the department of corrections' active
supervision, as defined by the department of corrections, the state
department of social and health services, or a local division of youth
services, for luring offenses committed before, on, or after August 1,
2005, must register within ten days of August 1, 2005. A change in
supervision status of a sex offender who was required to register under
this subsection (4)(a)(ii) as of July 28, 1991, ((or)) a kidnapping
offender required to register as of July 27, 1997, or a luring offender
required to register as of August 1, 2005, shall not relieve the
offender of the duty to register or to reregister following a change in
residence. The obligation to register shall only cease pursuant to RCW
9A.44.140.
(iii) OFFENDERS UNDER FEDERAL JURISDICTION. Sex offenders who, on
or after July 23, 1995, ((and)) kidnapping offenders who, on or after
July 27, 1997, and luring offenders who, on or after August 1, 2005, as
a result of that offense are in the custody of the United States bureau
of prisons or other federal or military correctional agency for sex
offenses committed before, on, or after February 28, 1990, ((or))
kidnapping offenses committed on, before, or after July 27, 1997, or
luring offenses committed on, before, or after August 1, 2005, must
register within twenty-four hours from the time of release with the
county sheriff for the county of the person's residence, or if the
person is not a resident of Washington, the county of the person's
school, or place of employment or vocation. Sex offenders who, on July
23, 1995, are not in custody but are under the jurisdiction of the
United States bureau of prisons, United States courts, United States
parole commission, or military parole board for sex offenses committed
before, on, or after February 28, 1990, must register within ten days
of July 23, 1995. Kidnapping offenders who, on July 27, 1997, are not
in custody but are under the jurisdiction of the United States bureau
of prisons, United States courts, United States parole commission, or
military parole board for kidnapping offenses committed before, on, or
after July 27, 1997, must register within ten days of July 27, 1997.
Luring offenders who, on August 1, 2005, are not in custody but are
under the jurisdiction of the United States bureau of prisons, United
States courts, United States parole commission, or military parole
board for luring offenses committed before, on, or after August 1,
2005, must register within ten days of August 1, 2005. A change in
supervision status of a sex offender who was required to register under
this subsection (4)(a)(iii) as of July 23, 1995, ((or)) a kidnapping
offender required to register as of July 27, 1997, or a luring offender
required to register as of August 1, 2005, shall not relieve the
offender of the duty to register or to reregister following a change in
residence, or if the person is not a resident of Washington, the county
of the person's school, or place of employment or vocation. The
obligation to register shall only cease pursuant to RCW 9A.44.140.
(iv) OFFENDERS WHO ARE CONVICTED BUT NOT CONFINED. Sex offenders
who are convicted of a sex offense on or after July 28, 1991, for a sex
offense that was committed on or after February 28, 1990, ((and))
kidnapping offenders who are convicted on or after July 27, 1997, for
a kidnapping offense that was committed on or after July 27, 1997, and
luring offenders who are convicted on or after August 1, 2005, for a
luring offense that was committed on or after August 1, 2005, but who
are not sentenced to serve a term of confinement immediately upon
sentencing, shall report to the county sheriff to register immediately
upon completion of being sentenced.
(v) OFFENDERS WHO ARE NEW RESIDENTS OR RETURNING WASHINGTON
RESIDENTS. Sex offenders ((and)), kidnapping offenders, and luring
offenders who move to Washington state from another state or a foreign
country that are not under the jurisdiction of the state department of
corrections, the indeterminate sentence review board, or the state
department of social and health services at the time of moving to
Washington, must register within thirty days of establishing residence
or reestablishing residence if the person is a former Washington
resident. The duty to register under this subsection applies to sex
offenders convicted under the laws of another state or a foreign
country, federal or military statutes, or Washington state for offenses
committed on or after February 28, 1990, ((and)) to kidnapping
offenders convicted under the laws of another state or a foreign
country, federal or military statutes, or Washington state for offenses
committed on or after July 27, 1997, and to luring offenders convicted
under the laws of another state or a foreign country, federal or
military statutes, or Washington state for offenses committed on or
after August 1, 2005. Sex offenders ((and)), kidnapping offenders, and
luring offenders from other states or a foreign country who, when they
move to Washington, are under the jurisdiction of the department of
corrections, the indeterminate sentence review board, or the department
of social and health services must register within twenty-four hours of
moving to Washington. The agency that has jurisdiction over the
offender shall notify the offender of the registration requirements
before the offender moves to Washington.
(vi) OFFENDERS FOUND NOT GUILTY BY REASON OF INSANITY. Any adult
or juvenile who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity under
chapter 10.77 RCW of (A) committing a sex offense on, before, or after
February 28, 1990, and who, on or after July 23, 1995, is in custody,
as a result of that finding, of the state department of social and
health services, ((or)) (B) committing a kidnapping offense on, before,
or after July 27, 1997, and who on or after July 27, 1997, is in
custody, as a result of that finding, of the state department of social
and health services, or (C) committing a luring offense on, before, or
after August 1, 2005, and who on or after August 1, 2005, is in
custody, as a result of that finding, of the state department of social
and health services, must register within twenty-four hours from the
time of release with the county sheriff for the county of the person's
residence. The state department of social and health services shall
provide notice to the adult or juvenile in its custody of the duty to
register. Any adult or juvenile who has been found not guilty by
reason of insanity of committing a sex offense on, before, or after
February 28, 1990, but who was released before July 23, 1995, ((or))
any adult or juvenile who has been found not guilty by reason of
insanity of committing a kidnapping offense but who was released before
July 27, 1997, or any adult or juvenile who has been found not guilty
by reason of insanity of committing a luring offense but who was
released before August 1, 2005, shall be required to register within
twenty-four hours of receiving notice of this registration requirement.
The state department of social and health services shall make
reasonable attempts within available resources to notify sex offenders
who were released before July 23, 1995, ((and)) kidnapping offenders
who were released before July 27, 1997, and luring offenders who were
released before August 1, 2005. Failure to register within twenty-four
hours of release, or of receiving notice, constitutes a violation of
this section and is punishable as provided in subsection (10) of this
section.
(vii) OFFENDERS WHO LACK A FIXED RESIDENCE. Any person who lacks
a fixed residence and leaves the county in which he or she is
registered and enters and remains within a new county for twenty-four
hours is required to register with the county sheriff not more than
twenty-four hours after entering the county and provide the information
required in subsection (3)(b) of this section.
(viii) OFFENDERS WHO LACK A FIXED RESIDENCE AND WHO ARE UNDER
SUPERVISION. Offenders who lack a fixed residence and who are under
the supervision of the department shall register in the county of their
supervision.
(ix) OFFENDERS WHO MOVE TO, WORK, CARRY ON A VOCATION, OR ATTEND
SCHOOL IN ANOTHER STATE. Offenders required to register in Washington,
who move to another state, or who work, carry on a vocation, or attend
school in another state shall register a new address, fingerprints, and
photograph with the new state within ten days after establishing
residence, or after beginning to work, carry on a vocation, or attend
school in the new state. The person must also send written notice
within ten days of moving to the new state or to a foreign country to
the county sheriff with whom the person last registered in Washington
state. The county sheriff shall promptly forward this information to
the Washington state patrol.
(b) Failure to register within the time required under this section
constitutes a per se violation of this section and is punishable as
provided in subsection (10) of this section. The county sheriff shall
not be required to determine whether the person is living within the
county.
(c) An arrest on charges of failure to register, service of an
information, or a complaint for a violation of this section, or
arraignment on charges for a violation of this section, constitutes
actual notice of the duty to register. Any person charged with the
crime of failure to register under this section who asserts as a
defense the lack of notice of the duty to register shall register
immediately following actual notice of the duty through arrest,
service, or arraignment. Failure to register as required under this
subsection (4)(c) constitutes grounds for filing another charge of
failing to register. Registering following arrest, service, or
arraignment on charges shall not relieve the offender from criminal
liability for failure to register prior to the filing of the original
charge.
(d) The deadlines for the duty to register under this section do
not relieve any sex offender of the duty to register under this section
as it existed prior to July 28, 1991.
(5)(a) If any person required to register pursuant to this section
changes his or her residence address within the same county, the person
must send written notice of the change of address to the county sheriff
within seventy-two hours of moving. If any person required to register
pursuant to this section moves to a new county, the person must send
written notice of the change of address at least fourteen days before
moving to the county sheriff in the new county of residence and must
register with that county sheriff within twenty-four hours of moving.
The person must also send written notice within ten days of the change
of address in the new county to the county sheriff with whom the person
last registered. The county sheriff with whom the person last
registered shall promptly forward the information concerning the change
of address to the county sheriff for the county of the person's new
residence. Upon receipt of notice of change of address to a new state,
the county sheriff shall promptly forward the information regarding the
change of address to the agency designated by the new state as the
state's offender registration agency.
(b) It is an affirmative defense to a charge that the person failed
to send a notice at least fourteen days in advance of moving as
required under (a) of this subsection that the person did not know the
location of his or her new residence at least fourteen days before
moving. The defendant must establish the defense by a preponderance of
the evidence and, to prevail on the defense, must also prove by a
preponderance that the defendant sent the required notice within
twenty-four hours of determining the new address.
(6)(a) Any person required to register under this section who lacks
a fixed residence shall provide written notice to the sheriff of the
county where he or she last registered within forty-eight hours
excluding weekends and holidays after ceasing to have a fixed
residence. The notice shall include the information required by
subsection (3)(b) of this section, except the photograph and
fingerprints. The county sheriff may, for reasonable cause, require
the offender to provide a photograph and fingerprints. The sheriff
shall forward this information to the sheriff of the county in which
the person intends to reside, if the person intends to reside in
another county.
(b) A person who lacks a fixed residence must report weekly, in
person, to the sheriff of the county where he or she is registered.
The weekly report shall be on a day specified by the county sheriff's
office, and shall occur during normal business hours. The county
sheriff's office may require the person to list the locations where the
person has stayed during the last seven days. The lack of a fixed
residence is a factor that may be considered in determining an
offender's risk level and shall make the offender subject to disclosure
of information to the public at large pursuant to RCW 4.24.550.
(c) If any person required to register pursuant to this section
does not have a fixed residence, it is an affirmative defense to the
charge of failure to register, that he or she provided written notice
to the sheriff of the county where he or she last registered within
forty-eight hours excluding weekends and holidays after ceasing to have
a fixed residence and has subsequently complied with the requirements
of subsections (4)(a)(vii) or (viii) and (6) of this section. To
prevail, the person must prove the defense by a preponderance of the
evidence.
(7) A sex offender subject to registration requirements under this
section who applies to change his or her name under RCW 4.24.130 or any
other law shall submit a copy of the application to the county sheriff
of the county of the person's residence and to the state patrol not
fewer than five days before the entry of an order granting the name
change. No sex offender under the requirement to register under this
section at the time of application shall be granted an order changing
his or her name if the court finds that doing so will interfere with
legitimate law enforcement interests, except that no order shall be
denied when the name change is requested for religious or legitimate
cultural reasons or in recognition of marriage or dissolution of
marriage. A sex offender under the requirement to register under this
section who receives an order changing his or her name shall submit a
copy of the order to the county sheriff of the county of the person's
residence and to the state patrol within five days of the entry of the
order.
(8) The county sheriff shall obtain a photograph of the individual
and shall obtain a copy of the individual's fingerprints.
(9) For the purpose of RCW 9A.44.130, 10.01.200, 43.43.540,
70.48.470, and 72.09.330:
(a) "Sex offense" means:
(i) Any offense defined as a sex offense by RCW 9.94A.030;
(ii) Any violation under RCW 9A.44.096 (sexual misconduct with a
minor in the second degree);
(iii) Any violation under RCW 9.68A.090 (communication with a minor
for immoral purposes);
(iv) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be classified as a sex offense under
this subsection; and
(v) Any gross misdemeanor that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a
criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to
commit an offense that is classified as a sex offense under RCW
9.94A.030 or this subsection.
(b) "Kidnapping offense" means: (i) The crimes of kidnapping in
the first degree, kidnapping in the second degree, and unlawful
imprisonment, as defined in chapter 9A.40 RCW, where the victim is a
minor and the offender is not the minor's parent; (ii) any offense that
is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt, criminal solicitation,
or criminal conspiracy to commit an offense that is classified as a
kidnapping offense under this subsection (9)(b); and (iii) any federal
or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this
state would be classified as a kidnapping offense under this subsection
(9)(b).
(c) "Employed" or "carries on a vocation" means employment that is
full-time or part-time for a period of time exceeding fourteen days, or
for an aggregate period of time exceeding thirty days during any
calendar year. A person is employed or carries on a vocation whether
the person's employment is financially compensated, volunteered, or for
the purpose of government or educational benefit.
(d) "Student" means a person who is enrolled, on a full-time or
part-time basis, in any public or private educational institution. An
educational institution includes any secondary school, trade or
professional institution, or institution of higher education.
(e) "Luring" means any offense as defined under RCW 9A.40.090.
(10)(a) A person who knowingly fails to register with the county
sheriff or notify the county sheriff, or who changes his or her name
without notifying the county sheriff and the state patrol, as required
by this section is guilty of a class C felony if the crime for which
the individual was convicted was a felony sex offense as defined in
subsection (9)(a) of this section or a federal or out-of-state
conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a
felony sex offense as defined in subsection (9)(a) of this section.
(b) If the crime for which the individual was convicted was other
than a felony or a federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense
that under the laws of this state would be other than a felony,
violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.
(11)(a) A person who knowingly fails to register or who moves
within the state without notifying the county sheriff as required by
this section is guilty of a class C felony if the crime for which the
individual was convicted was a felony kidnapping offense as defined in
subsection (9)(b) of this section or a federal or out-of-state
conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a
felony kidnapping offense as defined in subsection (9)(b) of this
section.
(b) If the crime for which the individual was convicted was other
than a felony or a federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense
that under the laws of this state would be other than a felony,
violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.
(12)(a) A person who knowingly fails to register or who moves
within the state without notifying the county sheriff as required by
this section is guilty of a class C felony if the crime for which the
individual was convicted was a felony luring offense as defined in
subsection (9)(e) of this section or a federal or out-of-state
conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a
felony luring offense as defined in subsection (9)(e) of this section.
(b) If the crime for which the individual was convicted was other
than a felony or a federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense
that under the laws of this state would be other than a felony,
violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.44.135 and 2000 c 91 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When an offender registers with the county sheriff pursuant to
RCW 9A.44.130, the county sheriff shall notify the police chief or town
marshal of the jurisdiction in which the offender has registered to
live. If the offender registers to live in an unincorporated area of
the county, the sheriff shall make reasonable attempts to verify that
the offender is residing at the registered address. If the offender
registers to live in an incorporated city or town, the police chief or
town marshal shall make reasonable attempts to verify that the offender
is residing at the registered address. Reasonable attempts at
verifying an address shall include at a minimum:
(a) For offenders who have not been previously designated sexually
violent predators under chapter 71.09 RCW or an equivalent procedure in
another jurisdiction, each year the chief law enforcement officer of
the jurisdiction where the offender is registered to live shall send by
certified mail, with return receipt requested, a nonforwardable
verification form to the offender at the offender's last registered
address.
(b) For offenders who have been previously designated sexually
violent predators under chapter 71.09 RCW or the equivalent procedure
in another jurisdiction, even if the designation has subsequently been
removed, every ninety days the county sheriff shall send by certified
mail, with return receipt requested, a nonforwardable verification form
to the offender at the offender's last registered address.
(c) The offender must sign the verification form, state on the form
whether he or she still resides at the last registered address, and
return the form to the chief law enforcement officer of the
jurisdiction where the offender is registered to live within ten days
after receipt of the form.
(2) The chief law enforcement officer of the jurisdiction where the
offender has registered to live shall make reasonable attempts to
locate any ((sex)) offender who fails to return the verification form
or who cannot be located at the registered address. If the offender
fails to return the verification form or the offender is not at the
last registered address, the chief law enforcement officer of the
jurisdiction where the offender has registered to live shall promptly
forward this information to the county sheriff and to the Washington
state patrol for inclusion in the central registry of sex offenders.
(3) When an offender notifies the county sheriff of a change to his
or her residence address pursuant to RCW 9A.44.130, and the new address
is in a different law enforcement jurisdiction, the county sheriff
shall notify the police chief or town marshal of the jurisdiction from
which the offender has moved.

Sec. 3 RCW 9A.44.140 and 2002 c 25 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130 shall end:
(a) For a person convicted of a class A felony or an offense listed
in subsection (5) of this section, or a person convicted of any sex
offense ((or)), kidnapping offense, or luring offense who has one or
more prior convictions for a sex offense ((or)), kidnapping offense, or
luring offense: Such person may only be relieved of the duty to
register under subsection (3) or (4) of this section.
(b) For a person convicted of a class B felony, and the person does
not have one or more prior convictions for a sex offense ((or)),
kidnapping offense, or luring offense and the person's current offense
is not listed in subsection (5) of this section: Fifteen years after
the last date of release from confinement, if any, (including full-time
residential treatment) pursuant to the conviction, or entry of the
judgment and sentence, if the person has spent fifteen consecutive
years in the community without being convicted of any new offenses.
(c) For a person convicted of a class C felony, a violation of RCW
9.68A.090 or 9A.44.096, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
commit a class C felony, and the person does not have one or more prior
convictions for a sex offense ((or)), kidnapping offense, or luring
offense and the person's current offense is not listed in subsection
(5) of this section: Ten years after the last date of release from
confinement, if any, (including full-time residential treatment)
pursuant to the conviction, or entry of the judgment and sentence, if
the person has spent ten consecutive years in the community without
being convicted of any new offenses.
(2) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall apply
equally to a person who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity
under chapter 10.77 RCW of a sex offense ((or)), kidnapping offense, or
luring offense.
(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, any person
having a duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130 may petition the superior
court to be relieved of that duty, if the person has spent ten
consecutive years in the community without being convicted of any new
offenses. The petition shall be made to the court in which the
petitioner was convicted of the offense that subjects him or her to the
duty to register, or, in the case of convictions in other states, a
foreign country, or a federal or military court, to the court in
Thurston county. The prosecuting attorney of the county shall be named
and served as the respondent in any such petition. The court shall
consider the nature of the registrable offense committed, and the
criminal and relevant noncriminal behavior of the petitioner both
before and after conviction, and may consider other factors. Except as
provided in subsection (4) of this section, the court may relieve the
petitioner of the duty to register only if the petitioner shows, with
clear and convincing evidence, that future registration of the
petitioner will not serve the purposes of RCW 9A.44.130, 10.01.200,
43.43.540, 46.20.187, 70.48.470, and 72.09.330.
(b)(i) The court may not relieve a person of the duty to register
if the person has been determined to be a sexually violent predator as
defined in RCW 71.09.020, or has been convicted of a sex offense or
kidnapping offense that is a class A felony and that was committed with
forcible compulsion on or after June 8, 2000.
(ii) The court may not relieve a person of the duty to register if
the person has been convicted of one aggravated offense or more than
one sexually violent offense, as defined in subsection (5) of this
section, and the offense or offenses were committed on or after March
12, 2002.
(c) Any person subject to (b) of this subsection or subsection (5)
of this section may petition the court to be exempted from any
community notification requirements that the person may be subject to
fifteen years after the later of the entry of the judgment and sentence
or the last date of release from confinement, including full-time
residential treatment, pursuant to the conviction, if the person has
spent the time in the community without being convicted of any new
offense.
(4) An offender having a duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130 for
a sex offense or kidnapping offense committed when the offender was a
juvenile may petition the superior court to be relieved of that duty.
The court shall consider the nature of the registrable offense
committed, and the criminal and relevant noncriminal behavior of the
petitioner both before and after adjudication, and may consider other
factors.
(a) The court may relieve the petitioner of the duty to register
for a sex offense or kidnapping offense that was committed while the
petitioner was fifteen years of age or older only if the petitioner
shows, with clear and convincing evidence, that future registration of
the petitioner will not serve the purposes of RCW 9A.44.130, 10.01.200,
43.43.540, 46.20.187, 70.48.470, and 72.09.330.
(b) The court may relieve the petitioner of the duty to register
for a sex offense ((or)), kidnapping offense, or luring offense that
was committed while the petitioner was under the age of fifteen if the
petitioner (i) has not been adjudicated of any additional sex
offense((s or)), kidnapping offense((s)), or luring offense during the
twenty-four months following the adjudication for the offense giving
rise to the duty to register, and (ii) proves by a preponderance of the
evidence that future registration of the petitioner will not serve the
purposes of RCW 9A.44.130, 10.01.200, 43.43.540, 46.20.187, 70.48.470,
and 72.09.330.
This subsection shall not apply to juveniles prosecuted as adults.
(5)(a) A person who has been convicted of an aggravated offense, or
has been convicted of one or more prior sexually violent offenses or
criminal offenses against a victim who is a minor, as defined in (b) of
this subsection may only be relieved of the duty to register under
subsection (3)(b) of this section. This provision shall apply to
convictions for crimes committed on or after July 22, 2001.
(b) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the following
definitions apply only to the federal lifetime registration
requirements under this subsection:
(i) "Aggravated offense" means an adult conviction that meets the
definition of 18 U.S.C. Sec. 2241, which is limited to the following:
(A) Any sex offense involving sexual intercourse or sexual contact
where the victim is under twelve years of age;
(B) RCW 9A.44.040 (rape in the first degree), RCW 9A.44.073 (rape
of a child in the first degree), or RCW 9A.44.083 (child molestation in
the first degree);
(C) Any of the following offenses when committed by forcible
compulsion or by the offender administering, by threat or force or
without the knowledge or permission of that person, a drug, intoxicant,
or other similar substance that substantially impairs the ability of
that person to appraise or control conduct: RCW 9A.44.050 (rape in the
second degree), RCW 9A.44.100 (indecent liberties), RCW 9A.44.160
(custodial sexual misconduct in the first degree), RCW 9A.64.020
(incest), or RCW 9.68A.040 (sexual exploitation of a minor);
(D) Any of the following offenses when committed by forcible
compulsion or by the offender administering, by threat or force or
without the knowledge or permission of that person, a drug, intoxicant,
or other similar substance that substantially impairs the ability of
that person to appraise or control conduct, if the victim is twelve
years of age or over but under sixteen years of age and the offender is
eighteen years of age or over and is more than forty-eight months older
than the victim: RCW 9A.44.076 (rape of a child in the second degree),
RCW 9A.44.079 (rape of a child in the third degree), RCW 9A.44.086
(child molestation in the second degree), or RCW 9A.44.089 (child
molestation in the third degree);
(E) A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW
9.94A.835 where the victim is under twelve years of age or that is
committed by forcible compulsion or by the offender administering, by
threat or force or without the knowledge or permission of that person,
a drug, intoxicant, or other similar substance that substantially
impairs the ability of that person to appraise or control conduct;
(F) An offense that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, an attempt or
solicitation to commit such an offense; or
(G) An offense defined by federal law or the laws of another state
that is equivalent to the offenses listed in (b)(i)(A) through (F) of
this subsection.
(ii) "Sexually violent offense" means an adult conviction that
meets the definition of 42 U.S.C. Sec. 14071(a)(1)(A), which is limited
to the following:
(A) An aggravated offense;
(B) An offense that is not an aggravated offense but meets the
definition of 18 U.S.C. Sec. 2242, which is limited to RCW 9A.44.050(1)
(b) through (f) (rape in the second degree) and RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b)
through (f) (indecent liberties);
(C) A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW
9.94A.835 where the victim is incapable of appraising the nature of the
conduct or physically incapable of declining participation in, or
communicating unwillingness to engage in, the conduct;
(D) An offense that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, an attempt or
solicitation to commit such an offense; or
(E) An offense defined by federal law or the laws of another state
that is equivalent to the offenses listed in (b)(ii)(A) through (D) of
this subsection.
(iii) "Criminal offense against a victim who is a minor" means, in
addition to any aggravated offense or sexually violent offense where
the victim was under eighteen years of age, an adult conviction for the
following offenses where the victim is under eighteen years of age:
(A) RCW 9A.44.060 (rape in the third degree), RCW 9A.44.076 (rape
of a child in the second degree), RCW 9A.44.079 (rape of a child in the
third degree), RCW 9A.44.086 (child molestation in the second degree),
RCW 9A.44.089 (child molestation in the third degree), RCW 9A.44.093
(sexual misconduct with a minor in the first degree), RCW 9A.44.096
(sexual misconduct with a minor in the second degree), RCW 9A.44.160
(custodial sexual misconduct in the first degree), RCW 9A.64.020
(incest), RCW 9.68A.040 (sexual exploitation of a minor), RCW 9.68A.090
(communication with a minor for immoral purposes), or RCW 9.68A.100
(patronizing a juvenile prostitute);
(B) RCW 9A.40.020 (kidnapping in the first degree), RCW 9A.40.030
(kidnapping in the second degree), or RCW 9A.40.040 (unlawful
imprisonment), where the victim is a minor and the offender is not the
minor's parent;
(C) A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW
9.94A.835 where the victim is a minor;
(D) An offense that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, an attempt or
solicitation to commit such an offense; or
(E) An offense defined by federal law or the laws of another state
that is equivalent to the offenses listed in (b)(iii)(A) through (D) of
this subsection.
(6) Unless relieved of the duty to register pursuant to this
section, a violation of RCW 9A.44.130 is an ongoing offense for
purposes of the statute of limitations under RCW 9A.04.080.
(7) Nothing in RCW 9.94A.637 relating to discharge of an offender
shall be construed as operating to relieve the offender of his or her
duty to register pursuant to RCW 9A.44.130.
(8) For purposes of determining whether a person has been convicted
of more than one sex offense, failure to register as a sex offender
((or)), kidnapping offender, or luring offender is not a sex ((or))
offense, kidnapping offense, or luring offense.

Sec. 4 RCW 9A.44.145 and 1998 c 139 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state patrol shall notify registered sex ((and)) offenders,
kidnapping offenders, and luring offenders of any change to the
registration requirements.

Sec. 5 RCW 4.24.550 and 2003 c 217 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the disclosure under subsection (5) of this
section, public agencies are authorized to release information to the
public regarding sex offenders ((and)), kidnapping offenders, and
luring offenders when the agency determines that disclosure of the
information is relevant and necessary to protect the public and
counteract the danger created by the particular offender. This
authorization applies to information regarding: (a) Any person
adjudicated or convicted of a sex offense ((as defined in RCW 9A.44.130
or a)), kidnapping offense, or luring offense, as defined by RCW
9A.44.130; (b) any person under the jurisdiction of the indeterminate
sentence review board as the result of a sex offense ((or)), kidnapping
offense, or luring offense; (c) any person committed as a sexually
violent predator under chapter 71.09 RCW or as a sexual psychopath
under chapter 71.06 RCW; (d) any person found not guilty of a sex
offense ((or)), kidnapping offense, or luring offense by reason of
insanity under chapter 10.77 RCW; and (e) any person found incompetent
to stand trial for a sex offense ((or)), kidnapping offense, or luring
offense and subsequently committed under chapter 71.05 or 71.34 RCW.
(2) Except for the information specifically required under
subsection (5) of this section, the extent of the public disclosure of
relevant and necessary information shall be rationally related to: (a)
The level of risk posed by the offender to the community; (b) the
locations where the offender resides, expects to reside, or is
regularly found; and (c) the needs of the affected community members
for information to enhance their individual and collective safety.
(3) Except for the information specifically required under
subsection (5) of this section, local law enforcement agencies shall
consider the following guidelines in determining the extent of a public
disclosure made under this section: (a) For offenders classified as
risk level I, the agency shall share information with other appropriate
law enforcement agencies and may disclose, upon request, relevant,
necessary, and accurate information to any victim or witness to the
offense and to any individual community member who lives near the
residence where the offender resides, expects to reside, or is
regularly found; (b) for offenders classified as risk level II, the
agency may also disclose relevant, necessary, and accurate information
to public and private schools, child day care centers, family day care
providers, businesses and organizations that serve primarily children,
women, or vulnerable adults, and neighbors and community groups near
the residence where the offender resides, expects to reside, or is
regularly found; (c) for offenders classified as risk level III, the
agency may also disclose relevant, necessary, and accurate information
to the public at large; and (d) because more localized notification is
not feasible and homeless and transient offenders may present unique
risks to the community, the agency may also disclose relevant,
necessary, and accurate information to the public at large for
offenders registered as homeless or transient.
(4) The county sheriff with whom an offender classified as risk
level III is registered shall cause to be published by legal notice,
advertising, or news release a sex offender community notification that
conforms to the guidelines established under RCW 4.24.5501 in at least
one legal newspaper with general circulation in the area of the sex
offender's registered address or location. The county sheriff shall
also cause to be published consistent with this subsection a current
list of level III registered sex offenders, twice yearly. Unless the
information is posted on the web site described in subsection (5) of
this section, this list shall be maintained by the county sheriff on a
publicly accessible web site and shall be updated at least once per
month.
(5)(a) When funded by federal grants or other sources, the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall create and
maintain a statewide registered sex offender web site, which shall be
available to the public. The web site shall post all level III and
level II registered sex offenders in the state of Washington.
(i) For level III offenders, the web site shall contain, but is not
limited to, the registered sex offender's name, relevant criminal
convictions, address by hundred block, physical description, and
photograph. The web site shall provide mapping capabilities that
display the sex offender's address by hundred block on a map. The web
site shall allow citizens to search for registered sex offenders within
the state of Washington by county, city, zip code, last name, type of
conviction, and address by hundred block.
(ii) For level II offenders, the web site shall contain, but is not
limited to, the same information and functionality as described in
(a)(i) of this subsection, provided that it is permissible under state
and federal law. If it is not permissible, the web site shall be
limited to the information and functionality that is permissible under
state and federal law.
(b) Until the implementation of (a) of this subsection, the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall create a web
site available to the public that provides electronic links to county-operated web sites that offer sex offender registration information.
(6) Local law enforcement agencies that disseminate information
pursuant to this section shall: (a) Review available risk level
classifications made by the department of corrections, the department
of social and health services, and the indeterminate sentence review
board; (b) assign risk level classifications to all offenders about
whom information will be disseminated; and (c) make a good faith effort
to notify the public and residents at least fourteen days before the
offender is released from confinement or, where an offender moves from
another jurisdiction, as soon as possible after the agency learns of
the offender's move, except that in no case may this notification
provision be construed to require an extension of an offender's release
date. The juvenile court shall provide local law enforcement officials
with all relevant information on offenders allowed to remain in the
community in a timely manner.
(7) An appointed or elected public official, public employee, or
public agency as defined in RCW 4.24.470, or units of local government
and its employees, as provided in RCW 36.28A.010, are immune from civil
liability for damages for any discretionary risk level classification
decisions or release of relevant and necessary information, unless it
is shown that the official, employee, or agency acted with gross
negligence or in bad faith. The immunity in this section applies to
risk level classification decisions and the release of relevant and
necessary information regarding any individual for whom disclosure is
authorized. The decision of a local law enforcement agency or official
to classify an offender to a risk level other than the one assigned by
the department of corrections, the department of social and health
services, or the indeterminate sentence review board, or the release of
any relevant and necessary information based on that different
classification shall not, by itself, be considered gross negligence or
bad faith. The immunity provided under this section applies to the
release of relevant and necessary information to other public
officials, public employees, or public agencies, and to the general
public.
(8) Except as may otherwise be provided by law, nothing in this
section shall impose any liability upon a public official, public
employee, or public agency for failing to release information
authorized under this section.
(9) Nothing in this section implies that information regarding
persons designated in subsection (1) of this section is confidential
except as may otherwise be provided by law.
(10) When a local law enforcement agency or official classifies an
offender differently than the offender is classified by the end of
sentence review committee or the department of social and health
services at the time of the offender's release from confinement, the
law enforcement agency or official shall notify the end of sentence
review committee or the department of social and health services and
submit its reasons supporting the change in classification. Upon
implementation of subsection (5)(a) of this section, notification of
the change shall also be sent to the Washington association of sheriffs
and police chiefs.

Sec. 6 RCW 10.01.200 and 1997 c 113 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The court shall provide written notification to any defendant
charged with a sex offense ((or)), kidnapping offense, or luring
offense of the registration requirements of RCW 9A.44.130. Such notice
shall be included on any guilty plea forms and judgment and sentence
forms provided to the defendant.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.43.540 and 2002 c 118 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The county sheriff shall (1) forward the information, photographs,
and fingerprints obtained pursuant to RCW 9A.44.130, including any
notice of change of address, to the Washington state patrol within five
working days; and (2) upon implementation of RCW 4.24.550(5)(a),
forward any information obtained pursuant to RCW 9A.44.130 that is
necessary to operate the registered sex offender web site described in
RCW 4.24.550(5)(a) to the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs within five working days of receiving the information, including
any notice of change of address or change in risk level notification.
The state patrol shall maintain a central registry of sex offenders
((and)), kidnapping offenders, and luring offenders required to
register under RCW 9A.44.130 and shall adopt rules consistent with
chapters 10.97, 10.98, and 43.43 RCW as are necessary to carry out the
purposes of RCW 9A.44.130, 9A.44.140, 10.01.200, 43.43.540, 46.20.187,
70.48.470, and 72.09.330. The Washington state patrol shall reimburse
the counties for the costs of processing the offender registration,
including taking the fingerprints and the photographs.

Sec. 8 RCW 70.48.470 and 2000 c 91 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person having charge of a jail shall notify in writing any
confined person who is in the custody of the jail for a conviction of
a sex offense ((as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 or a)), kidnapping offense,
or luring offense, as defined in RCW 9A.44.130, of the registration
requirements of RCW 9A.44.130 at the time of the inmate's release from
confinement, and shall obtain written acknowledgment of such
notification. The person shall also obtain from the inmate the county
of the inmate's residence upon release from jail and, where applicable,
the city.
(2) When a ((sex offender or a)) person convicted of a sex offense,
kidnapping offense, or luring offense, as defined in RCW 9A.44.130,
under local government jurisdiction will reside in a county other than
the county of conviction upon discharge or release, the chief law
enforcement officer of the jail or his or her designee shall give
notice of the inmate's discharge or release to the sheriff of the
county and, where applicable, to the police chief of the city where the
offender will reside.

Sec. 9 RCW 72.09.330 and 1997 c 113 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall provide written notification to an inmate
convicted of a sex offense ((or)), kidnapping offense, or luring
offense of the registration requirements of RCW 9A.44.130 at the time
of the inmate's release from confinement and shall receive and retain
a signed acknowledgement of receipt.
(2) The department shall provide written notification to an
individual convicted of a sex offense ((or)), kidnapping offense, or
luring offense from another state of the registration requirements of
RCW 9A.44.130 at the time the department accepts supervision and has
legal authority of the individual under the terms and conditions of the
interstate compact agreement under RCW 9.95.270.

--- END ---