BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.640 and 1987 c 486 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every offender who has been discharged under RCW 9.94A.637 may
apply to the sentencing court for a vacation of the offender's record
of conviction. If the court finds the offender meets the tests
prescribed in subsection (2) of this section, the court may clear the
record of conviction by: (a) Permitting the offender to withdraw the
offender's plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty; or (b) if
the offender has been convicted after a plea of not guilty, by the
court setting aside the verdict of guilty; and (c) by the court
dismissing the information or indictment against the offender.
(2) An offender may not have the record of conviction cleared if:
(a) There are any criminal charges against the offender pending in any
court of this state or another state, or in any federal court; (b) the
offense was a violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; (c) the
offense was a crime against persons as defined in RCW 43.43.830; (d)
the offense was a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; (e) the
offender has been convicted of a new crime in this state, another
state, or federal court since the date of the offender's discharge
under RCW 9.94A.637; (((e))) (f) the offense is a class B felony and
less than ten years have passed since the date the applicant was
discharged under RCW 9.94A.637; and (((f))) (g) the offense was a class
C felony and less than five years have passed since the date the
applicant was discharged under RCW 9.94A.637.
(3) Once the court vacates a record of conviction under subsection
(1) of this section, the fact that the offender has been convicted of
the offense shall not be included in the offender's criminal history
for purposes of determining a sentence in any subsequent conviction,
and the offender shall be released from all penalties and disabilities
resulting from the offense. For all purposes, including responding to
questions on employment applications, an offender whose conviction has
been vacated may state that the offender has never been convicted of
that crime. Nothing in this section affects or prevents the use of an
offender's prior conviction in a later criminal prosecution.

--- END ---