BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW
to read as follows:
Any county authorizing the siting of a homeless encampment that:
(1) Is fully or partially within a city or town; (2) shares a common
boundary with a city or town; or (3) is within one thousand feet of a
city or town boundary, must consult with the legislative authorities of
such cities or towns at least fifteen days prior to issuing siting
authorization.

--- END ---