BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9A.36 RCW
to read as follows:
A person is guilty of the crime of failing to summon assistance if:
(1)(a) He or she was present when a crime was committed against
another person; or (b) he or she was made aware that a crime was
committed against another person by someone who was present when the
crime was committed against the other person; and
(2) He or she knows that the other person has suffered substantial
bodily harm as a result of the crime committed against the other person
and that the other person is in need of assistance; and
(3) He or she could reasonably summon assistance for the person in
need without danger to himself or herself and without interference with
an important duty owed to a third party; and
(4) He or she fails to summon assistance for the person in need;
and
(5) Another person is not summoning or has not summoned assistance
for the person in need of such assistance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9A.36 RCW
to read as follows:
A violation of section 1 of this act is a misdemeanor.

--- END ---