BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 86.15.060 and 1961 c 153 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
administration of the affairs of zones shall be in the county engineer.
The engineer may appoint such deputies and engage such employees,
specialists, and technicians as may be required by the zone and as are
authorized by the zone's budget. Subject to the approval of the
((board)) supervisors, the engineer may organize, or reorganize as
required, the zone into such departments, divisions, or other
administrative relationships as he deems necessary to its efficient
operation.
(2) In a zone with supervisors elected pursuant to RCW 86.15.050,
the supervisors may provide for administration of the affairs of the
zone by other than the county engineer, pursuant to the authority
established in RCW 86.15.095 to hire employees, staff, and services and
to enter into contracts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 86.15 RCW
to read as follows:
In a zone with supervisors elected pursuant to RCW 86.15.050, the
supervisors may each receive up to seventy dollars for attendance at
official meetings of the supervisors and for each day or major part
thereof for all necessary services actually performed in connection
with their duties as a supervisor. The board of county commissioners
shall fix any such compensation to be paid to the initial supervisors
during their initial terms of office. The supervisors shall fix the
compensation to be paid to the supervisors thereafter. Compensation
for the supervisors shall not exceed six thousand seven hundred twenty
dollars in one calendar year. A supervisor is entitled to
reimbursement for reasonable expenses actually incurred in connection
with performance of the duties of a supervisor, including subsistence
and lodging, while away from the supervisor's place of residence, and
mileage for use of a privately owned vehicle in accordance with chapter
42.24 RCW.
Any supervisor may waive all or any portion of his or her
compensation payable under this section as to any month or months
during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the
supervisors as provided in this section. The waiver, to be effective,
must be filed any time after the member's election and prior to the
date on which the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver
shall specify the month or period of months for which it is made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---