BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) It is the legislature's intent to
provide funding for the development and implementation of an automated
system for the electronic processing of the real estate excise tax.
The legislature finds that due to the numerous users of the real estate
excise tax information, and the many entities involved in its work
flow, county systems must be compatible with the automated system
developed by the state department of revenue.
(2) The legislature finds that under current law an electronic real
estate excise tax affidavit that is signed with a digital signature
under chapter 19.34 RCW is a legally valid document and, pursuant to
RCW 5.46.010, electronic facsimiles, scanned signatures, and digital
and other electronic conversions of written signatures satisfy the
signature component of the affidavit requirement under this act.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.45.180 and 1998 c 106 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) For taxes collected by the county under this chapter, the
county treasurer shall collect a ((two-dollar)) five-dollar fee on all
transactions required by this chapter where the transaction does not
require the payment of tax. A total of ((two)) five dollars shall be
collected in the form of a tax and fee, where the calculated tax
payment is less than ((two)) five dollars. Through June 30, 2010, the
county treasurer shall collect an additional five-dollar fee on all
transactions required by this chapter where the transaction does not
require the payment of a tax, and on all taxable transactions required
by this chapter where the calculated tax payment is less than five
dollars. This additional five-dollar fee shall be deposited in the
county treasurer's real estate excise tax electronic technology
account. Through June 30, 2006, the county treasurer shall place one
percent of the ((proceeds of the tax imposed by)) taxes collected by
the county under this chapter and the treasurer's fee in the county
current expense fund to defray costs of collection ((and)). After June
30, 2006, the county treasurer shall place one and three-tenths percent
of the taxes collected by the county under this chapter and the
treasurer's fee in the county current expense fund to defray costs of
collection. For taxes collected by the county under this chapter
before July 1, 2006, the county treasurer shall pay over to the state
treasurer and account to the department of revenue for the ((remainder
of the)) proceeds at the same time the county treasurer remits funds to
the state under RCW 84.56.280. For taxes collected by the county under
this chapter after June 30, 2006, on a monthly basis the county
treasurer shall pay over to the state treasurer the month's
transmittal. The month's transmittal must be received by the state
treasurer by 5:00 p.m. on the last working day of each month. The
county treasurer shall account to the department for the month's
transmittal by the twentieth day of the month following the month in
which the month's transmittal was paid over to the state treasurer.
The state treasurer shall deposit the proceeds in the general fund for
the support of the common schools.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, the definitions in this
subsection apply.
(i) "Close of business" means the time when the county treasurer
makes his or her daily deposit of proceeds.
(ii) "Month's transmittal" means all proceeds deposited by the
county through the close of business of the day that is two working
days before the last working day of the month. This definition of
"month's transmittal" shall not be construed as requiring any change in
a county's practices regarding the timing of its daily deposits of
proceeds.
(iii) "Proceeds" means moneys collected and receipted by the county
from the taxes imposed by this chapter, less the county's share of the
proceeds used to defray the county's costs of collection allowable in
(a) of this subsection.
(iv) "Working day" means a calendar day, except Saturdays, Sundays,
and all legal holidays as provided in RCW 1.16.050.
(2) For taxes collected by the department of revenue under this
chapter, the department shall remit the tax to the state treasurer who
shall deposit the proceeds of any state tax in the general fund for the
support of the common schools. The state treasurer shall deposit the
proceeds of any local taxes imposed under chapter 82.46 RCW in the
local real estate excise tax account hereby created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the local real estate excise tax account may be
spent only for distribution to counties, cities, and towns imposing a
tax under chapter 82.46 RCW. Except as provided in RCW 43.08.190, all
earnings of investments of balances in the local real estate excise tax
account shall be credited to the local real estate excise tax account
and distributed to the counties, cities, and towns monthly. Monthly
the state treasurer shall make distribution from the local real estate
excise tax account to the counties, cities, and towns the amount of tax
collected on behalf of each taxing authority. The state treasurer
shall make the distribution under this subsection without
appropriation.
(3)(a) The real estate excise tax electronic technology account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. An appropriation is not
required for expenditures and the account is not subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.
(b) Through June 30, 2010, the county treasurer shall collect an
additional five-dollar fee on all taxable transactions required by this
chapter. The county treasurer shall remit this fee to the state
treasurer at the same time the county treasurer remits funds to the
state under subsection (1) of this section. The state treasurer shall
place money from this fee in the real estate excise tax electronic
technology account. By the twentieth day of the subsequent month, the
state treasurer shall distribute to each county treasurer according to
the following formula: Three-quarters of the funds available shall be
equally distributed among the thirty-nine counties; and the balance
shall be ratably distributed among the counties in direct proportion to
their population as it relates to the total state's population based on
most recent statistics by the office of financial management.
(c) When received by the county treasurer, the funds shall be
placed in a special real estate excise tax electronic technology fund
held by the county treasurer to be used exclusively for the
development, implementation, and maintenance of an electronic
processing and reporting system for real estate excise tax affidavits.
Funds may be expended to make the system compatible with the automated
real estate excise tax system developed by the department and
compatible with the processes used in the offices of the county
assessor and county auditor. Any funds held in the account that are
not expended by July 1, 2015, revert to the county capital improvements
fund in accordance with RCW 82.46.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.45 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The real estate excise tax grant account is created in the
state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
grants authorized under section 4 of this act in the manner provided
for in section 4 of this act.
(2) Any funds remaining in the real estate excise tax grant account
on July 1, 2010, shall be deposited in the general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.45 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that funds are appropriated, the department shall
administer a grant program for counties to assist in the development,
implementation, and maintenance of an electronic processing and
reporting system for real estate excise tax affidavits that is
compatible with the automated real estate excise tax system developed
by the department, and to assist in complying with the requirements of
RCW 82.45.180(1).
(2) Subject to the limit in subsection (3) of this section, the
amount of the grant shall be equal to the amount paid by a county to:
(a) Purchase computer hardware or software, or to repair or upgrade
existing computer hardware or software, used for the electronic
processing and reporting of real estate excise tax affidavits and that
is compatible with the automated real estate excise tax system
developed by the department; and
(b) Make changes to existing software that are necessary to comply
with the requirements of RCW 82.45.180(1).
(3) No county is eligible for grants under this section totaling
more than one hundred thousand dollars.
(4) No more than three million nine hundred thousand dollars in
grants may be awarded under this section.
(5) The source of funds for this grant program is the real estate
excise tax grant account created in section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The sum of three million nine hundred
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2006, from the general
fund to the real estate excise tax grant account for the purposes of
section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---