BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.146.265 and 1997 c 106 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A licensed mortgage broker may apply to the director for
authority to establish one or more branch offices under the same or
different name as the main office upon the payment of a fee as
prescribed by the director by rule.
((Provided that the applicant is in good standing with the
department, as defined in rule by the director, the director shall
promptly issue a duplicate license for each of the branch offices
showing the location of the main office and the particular branch.
Each duplicate license shall be prominently displayed in the office for
which it is issued.))
(2) Within five business days of receipt of the request, the
director shall review the department's records of the licensee and
determine whether:
(a) The licensee is delinquent on any assessment, fee, fine, or
other charge;
(b) The license of the licensee is currently suspended, revoked, or
restricted;
(c) There is a pending action to enjoin or enforce a cease and
desist order; or
(d) The department has served a statement of charges upon the
licensee that includes a notice of intention to revoke, suspend, or
restrict the licensee from conducting business as a licensed mortgage
broker.
(3) If a determination under subsection (2) of this section applies
to the licensee, the department shall promptly notify the licensee that
the department will proceed as follows:
(a) For failing to comply with subsection (2)(a) of this section,
the duplicate license will issue upon payment;
(b) For violation of subsection (2)(b) of this section, a duplicate
will not be issued until the suspension, revocation, or restriction is
removed; and
(c) For violation of subsection (2)(c) or (d) of this section,
review of the application shall be suspended until the charges are
resolved.
(4) In the case of a violation of subsection (2)(c) or (d) of this
section, the department shall expedite the investigation and diligently
and expeditiously pursue a resolution.
(5) In the event the licensee is in compliance under subsection (2)
of this section and unless the department has received a consumer
complaint against the licensee, the department shall issue the branch
license.
(6) Each duplicate license shall be prominently displayed in the
office for which it is issued.

--- END ---