BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.37 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All vehicle sound system components, including any supplemental
speaker systems or components, must be securely attached to the vehicle
regardless of where the components are located, so that the components
cannot become dislodged or loose during operation of the vehicle.
(2) Enforcement of this section by law enforcement officers may be
accomplished only as a secondary action when a driver of a vehicle has
been detained for a suspected violation of this title or an equivalent
local ordinance or some other offense.
(3) The Washington state traffic safety commission shall create and
implement a statewide educational program regarding the safety risks of
unsecured vehicle sound system components, including supplemental
speaker systems or components. The educational program shall include
information regarding securely attaching sound system components to the
vehicle, regardless of where the components are located, so that the
components do not become dislodged or loose during the operation of the
vehicle. The commission shall create and implement this program within
the commission's existing budget.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act shall be known as the Courtney
Amisson Act.

--- END ---