BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.80.060 and 1992 c 101 s 31 are each amended to read
as follows:
In order to qualify for state planning funds available to regional
transportation planning organizations, the regional transportation
planning organizations containing any county with a population in
excess of one million shall provide voting membership on its executive
board to the state transportation commission, the state department of
transportation, and the ((three)) four largest public port districts
within the region as determined by gross operating revenues. It shall
further assure that at least fifty percent of the county and city local
elected officials who serve on the executive board also serve on
transit agency boards or on a regional transit authority.

--- END ---