BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This chapter may be known and cited as the
tax refund anticipation loan act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Borrower" means a taxpayer who receives the proceeds of a
refund anticipation loan.
(2) "Department" means the department of financial institutions.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of financial
institutions.
(4) "Facilitator" means a person who receives or accepts for
delivery an application for a refund anticipation loan, delivers a
check in payment of refund anticipation loan proceeds, or in any other
manner acts to allow the making of a refund anticipation loan.
"Facilitator" does not include a bank, thrift, savings association,
industrial bank, or credit union operating under the laws of the United
States or this state, an affiliate that is a servicer for such an
entity, or any person who acts solely as an intermediary and does not
deal with a taxpayer in the making of the refund anticipation loan.
(5) "Lender" means a person who extends credit to a borrower in the
form of a refund anticipation loan.
(6) "Person" means an individual, a firm, a partnership, an
association, a corporation, or other entity.
(7) "Refund anticipation loan" means a loan borrowed by a taxpayer
from a lender based on the taxpayer's anticipated federal income tax
refund.
(8) "Refund anticipation loan fee" means the charges, fees, or
other consideration imposed by the lender for a refund anticipation
loan. This term does not include any charge, fee, or other
consideration usually imposed by the facilitator in the ordinary course
of business for nonloan services, such as fees for tax return
preparation and fees for electronic filing of tax returns.
(9) "Refund anticipation loan fee schedule" means a listing or
table of refund anticipation loan fees charged by the facilitator or
the lender for three or more representative refund anticipation loan
amounts. The schedule shall list separately each fee or charge
imposed, as well as a total of all fees imposed, related to the making
of refund anticipation loans. The schedule shall also include, for
each representative loan amount, the estimated annual percentage rate
calculated under the guidelines established by the federal truth in
lending act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 et seq.
(10) "Taxpayer" means an individual who files a federal income tax
return.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) No person may individually, or in
conjunction or cooperation with another person, solicit the execution
of, process, receive, or accept an application or agreement for, a
refund anticipation loan without first being licensed with the director
as a facilitator.
(2) This section does not apply to a person doing business as a
bank, thrift, industrial bank, savings and loan association, or credit
union, under the laws of the United States or any state.
(3) This chapter shall preempt and be exclusive of all local acts,
statutes, ordinances, and regulations relating to refund anticipation
loans. This subsection shall be given retroactive and prospective
effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) An application to become licensed as a
facilitator must be in writing, under oath, and in a form prescribed by
the director. The application must contain all information prescribed
by the director and must include any licenses that a state or federal
entity has issued to the applicant. Each application for a license
must be accompanied by a two hundred fifty dollar initial licensing fee
for each office where the facilitator intends to facilitate refund
anticipation loans.
(2) Prior to issuing a license, the director must review the
responsibility and general fitness of the applicant. The director may
adopt rules establishing criteria to implement this subsection.
(3) Unless the director denies the application, the director shall
license the applicant upon the filing of a completed application for a
license. The director shall issue and transmit to the applicant a
license. If the director denies the application, the director shall
notify the applicant of the reasons for the denial within forty-five
days of the receipt of the application.
(4) Upon receipt of a license, the applicant is licensed under this
chapter and may engage in the business of facilitating refund
anticipation loans at the offices identified on the application for the
license.
(5) In addition to any requirements for a license set forth by rule
of the director under this chapter, the director shall consider the
facilitator's status as a tax preparer when determining whether to
grant, renew, or revoke a facilitator's license.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Each license for a facilitator of refund
anticipation loans expires on June 30th following the date it was
issued. Before the license expires, the facilitator may renew the
license by filing with the director an application for renewal in the
form and containing all information prescribed by the director. Each
application for renewal of a license must be accompanied by a one
hundred dollar renewal fee for each office where the facilitator
intends to facilitate refund anticipation loans during the succeeding
year.
(2) Upon the filing of an application for renewal of a license, the
director may renew the license. Prior to renewal, the director must
review the fitness and general responsibility of the facilitator. If
the director does not renew the license, the director shall notify the
facilitator, stating the reasons for the denial. The director may
adopt rules establishing criteria to implement this subsection.
(3) The director shall establish rules defining the time frame in
which the application required under this section must be filed, and
the time frame in which the department must process and notify the
applicant of the department's decision regarding the application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) For all refund anticipation loans, a
facilitator must provide a clear disclosure statement to the borrower,
prior to the borrower's completion of the application. The disclosure
statement required under this subsection must be printed in a minimum
of ten-point type. Further, the disclosure statement must contain the
following:
(a) The refund anticipation loan fee schedule; and
(b) A written statement containing the following elements:
(i) That a refund anticipation loan is a loan, and is not the
borrower's actual income tax refund;
(ii) That the taxpayer can file an income tax return electronically
without applying for a refund anticipation loan;
(iii) The average times according to the internal revenue service
within which a taxpayer who does not obtain a refund anticipation loan
can expect to receive a refund if the taxpayer's return is (A) filed
electronically and the refund is directly deposited to the taxpayer's
bank account or mailed to the taxpayer, and (B) mailed to the internal
revenue service and the refund is directly deposited to the taxpayer's
bank account or mailed to the taxpayer;
(iv) That the internal revenue service does not guarantee that it
will pay the full amount of the anticipated refund and it does not
guarantee a specific date that a refund will be deposited into a
taxpayer's financial institution account or mailed to a taxpayer;
(v) That the borrower is responsible for repayment of the loan and
related fees in the event that the tax refund is not paid or paid in
full;
(vi) The estimated time within which the loan proceeds will be paid
to the borrower if the loan is approved; and
(vii) The fee that will be charged, if any, if the borrower's loan
is not approved.
(2) The following additional information must be provided to the
borrower of a refund anticipation loan before consummation of the loan
transaction:
(a) The estimated total fees for obtaining the refund anticipation
loan; and
(b) The estimated annual percentage rate for the borrower's refund
anticipation loan, using the guidelines established under the federal
truth in lending act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 et seq.).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A borrower may rescind a loan, on or before
the close of business on the next day of business at the location where
the loan was originated, by returning the principal in cash or the
original check disbursed by the facilitator to fund the refund
anticipation loan. The facilitator may not charge the borrower for
rescinding the loan and shall return to the borrower any postdated
check taken as security for the loan or any electronic equivalent. The
facilitator shall conspicuously disclose to the borrower this right of
rescission in writing in the disclosure statement required under
section 6(1) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 It is unlawful for a facilitator of a refund
anticipation loan to engage in any of the following activities:
(1) Misrepresent a material factor or condition of a refund
anticipation loan;
(2) Fail to process the application for a refund anticipation loan
promptly after the consumer applies for the loan;
(3) Engage in any dishonest, fraudulent, unfair, unconscionable, or
unethical practice or conduct in connection with a refund anticipation
loan;
(4) Arrange for a creditor to take a security interest in any
property of the consumer other than the proceeds of the consumer's tax
refund to secure payment of the loan;
(5) Impose charges, fees, or other consideration for a refund
anticipation loan. This does not preclude any charge, fee, or other
consideration usually imposed by the facilitator in the ordinary course
of business for nonloan services, such as fees for tax return
preparation and fees for electronic filing of tax returns;
(6) Offer a refund anticipation loan that exceeds the amount of the
anticipated tax refund less fees;
(7) Act as a facilitator unless they are authorized as an
electronic return originator by the internal revenue service at the
time; and
(8) Arrange for a refund anticipation loan unless the facilitator
is a tax preparer or works for a person that engages in the business of
tax preparation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Any person who knowingly and willfully
violates this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined up
to five hundred dollars for each offense.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The legislature finds that the practices
covered by this chapter are matters vitally affecting the public
interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this chapter is not reasonable in
relation to the development and preservation of business and is an
unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of
competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The director may adopt rules to implement
sections 4 and 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 1 through 11 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---