BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that effective
relationship skills are used in parenting, the workplace, schools,
neighborhoods, and other relationships. The state has a compelling
interest in encouraging its citizens in developing the parenting and
communication skills vital for successful and fulfilling family
relationships.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
Each school district board of directors is encouraged to adopt a
family preservation education program curriculum and offer a family
preservation unit in high school. The board of directors may adopt the
model curriculum developed by the superintendent of public instruction
or the board may develop its own curriculum with input from the
community.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
develop a family preservation education program model curriculum that
is available to each of the school district boards of directors. The
model curriculum shall be posted on the superintendent of public
instruction's web site. The model curriculum shall include, but is not
limited to, instruction on developing conflict management skills,
communication skills, financial responsibility, and parenting
responsibility.

--- END ---