BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.160.040 and 1985 c 236 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A smoking area may be designated in a public place by the owner
or, in the case of a leased or rented space, by the lessee or other
person in charge except in:
(a) Elevators; buses, except for private hire; streetcars; taxis,
except those clearly and visibly designated by the owner to permit
smoking; public areas of retail stores and lobbies of financial
institutions; office reception areas and waiting rooms of any building
owned or leased by the state of Washington or by any city, county, or
other municipality in the state of Washington; museums; public meetings
or hearings; classrooms and lecture halls of schools, colleges, and
universities; and the seating areas and aisle ways which are contiguous
to seating areas of concert halls, theaters, auditoriums, exhibition
halls, and indoor sports arenas; and
(b) Hallways of health care facilities, with the exception of
nursing homes, and lobbies of concert halls, theaters, auditoriums,
exhibition halls, and indoor sports arenas, if the area is not
physically separated. Owners or other persons in charge are not
required to incur any expense to make structural or other physical
modifications in providing these areas.
Except as provided in other provisions of this chapter, no public
place, other than a charitable or nonprofit licensed bingo facility,
bar, tavern, bowling alley, card room, tobacco shop, or restaurant, may
be designated as a smoking area in its entirety. If a bar, tobacco
shop, or restaurant is designated as a smoking area in its entirety,
this designation shall be posted conspicuously on all entrances
normally used by the public.
(2) Where smoking areas are designated, ((existing)) physical
barriers and ventilation systems shall be used to minimize the toxic
effect of smoke in adjacent nonsmoking areas. In nonsmoking areas,
nitrogen dioxide and hydrogen cyanide levels shall not exceed twenty
parts per million.
(3) Managers of restaurants who choose to provide smoking areas
shall designate an adequate amount of seating to meet the demands of
restaurant patrons who wish to smoke. Owners of restaurants are not
required to incur any expense to make structural or other physical
modifications in providing these areas. Restaurant patrons shall be
informed that separate smoking and nonsmoking sections are available.
(4) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a facility or
area may be designated in its entirety as a nonsmoking area by the
owner or other person in charge.
(5) A person under the age of eighteen is not allowed in the
designated smoking area of a bar, tavern, bowling alley, or restaurant.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.160.050 and 1985 c 236 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Owners, or in the case of a leased or rented space the lessee
or other person in charge, of a place regulated under this chapter
shall make every reasonable effort to prohibit smoking in public places
by posting signs prohibiting or permitting smoking as appropriate under
this chapter. Signs shall be posted conspicuously at each building
entrance. In the case of retail stores and retail service
establishments, signs shall be posted conspicuously at each entrance
and in prominent locations throughout the place. The boundary between
a nonsmoking area and a smoking permitted area shall be clearly
designated so that persons may differentiate between the two areas.
(2) An employer shall disclose to a prospective employee that all
or a portion of the establishment that the prospective employee would
work at is a designated smoking area.

--- END ---