BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.04.008 and 2004 c 271 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this title:
(1) "Ballot" means, as the context implies, either:
(a) The issues and offices to be voted upon in a jurisdiction or
portion of a jurisdiction at a particular primary, general election, or
special election;
(b) A facsimile of the contents of a particular ballot whether
printed on a paper ballot or ballot card or as part of a voting machine
or voting device;
(c) A physical or electronic record of the choices of an individual
voter in a particular primary, general election, or special election;
or
(d) The physical document on which the voter's choices are to be
recorded;
(2) "Paper ballot" means a piece of paper on which the ballot for
a particular election or primary has been printed, on which a voter may
record his or her choices for any candidate or for or against any
measure, and that is to be tabulated manually;
(3) "Ballot card" means any type of card or piece of paper of any
size on which a voter may record his or her choices for any candidate
and for or against any measure and that is to be tabulated on a vote
tallying system;
(4) "Sample ballot" means a printed facsimile of all the issues and
offices on the ballot in a jurisdiction and is intended to give voters
notice of the issues, offices, and candidates that are to be voted on
at a particular primary, general election, or special election;
(5) (("Provisional ballot" means a ballot issued to a voter at the
polling place on election day by the precinct election board, for one
of the following reasons:
(a) The voter's name does not appear in the poll book;
(b) There is an indication in the poll book that the voter has
requested an absentee ballot, but the voter wishes to vote at the
polling place;
(c) There is a question on the part of the voter concerning the
issues or candidates on which the voter is qualified to vote;
(6))) "Party ballot" means a primary election ballot specific to a
particular major political party that lists all partisan offices to be
voted on at that primary, and the candidates for those offices who
affiliate with that same major political party;
(((7))) (6) "Nonpartisan ballot" means a primary election ballot
that lists all nonpartisan races and ballot measures to be voted on at
that primary.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.04.470 and 2004 c 267 s 203 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The secretary of state shall create an advisory committee and
adopt rules governing project eligibility, evaluation, awarding of
grants, and other criteria for administering the local government grant
program, which may include a preference for grants that include a match
of local funds.
(2) The advisory committee shall review grant proposals and
establish a prioritized list of projects to be considered for funding
by the third Tuesday in May of each year beginning in 2004 and
continuing as long as funds in the election account established by
((chapter 48, Laws of 2003 [RCW 29A.04.440])) RCW 29A.04.440 are
available. The grant award may have an effective date other than the
date the project is placed on the prioritized list, including money
spent previously by the county that would qualify for reimbursement
under the Help America Vote Act (P.L. 107-252).
(3) Examples of projects that would be eligible for local
government grant funding include, but are not limited to the following:
(a) Replacement or upgrade of voting equipment, including the
replacement of punchcard voting systems;
(b) Purchase of additional voting equipment, including the purchase
of equipment to meet the disability requirements of the Help America
Vote Act (P.L. 107-252);
(c) Purchase of new election management system hardware and
software capable of integrating with the statewide voter registration
system required by the Help America Vote Act (P.L. 107-252);
(d) Development and production of poll worker recruitment and
training materials;
(e) Voter education programs;
(f) Publication of a local voters' pamphlet; and
(g) ((Toll-free access system to provide notice of the outcome of
provisional ballots; and
(h))) Training for local election officials.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.08.625 and 2003 c 111 s 240 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1))) A voter whose registration has been made inactive under
this chapter and who offers to vote at an ensuing election before two
federal elections have been held must be allowed to vote a regular
ballot and the voter's registration restored to active status.
(((2) A voter whose registration has been properly canceled under
this chapter shall vote a provisional ballot. The voter shall mark the
provisional ballot in secrecy, the ballot placed in a security
envelope, the security envelope placed in a provisional ballot
envelope, and the reasons for the use of the provisional ballot noted.
(3) Upon receipt of such a voted provisional ballot the auditor
shall investigate the circumstances surrounding the original
cancellation. If he or she determines that the cancellation was in
error, the voter's registration must be immediately reinstated, and the
voter's provisional ballot must be counted. If the original
cancellation was not in error, the voter must be afforded the
opportunity to reregister at his or her correct address, and the
voter's provisional ballot must not be counted.))

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.44.090 and 2003 c 111 s 1109 are each amended to
read as follows:
A registered voter shall not be allowed to vote in the precinct in
which he or she is registered at any election or primary for which that
voter has cast an absentee ballot. ((A registered voter who has
requested an absentee ballot for a primary or special or general
election but chooses to vote at the voter's precinct polling place in
that primary or election shall cast a provisional ballot. The
canvassing board shall not count the ballot if it finds that the voter
has also voted by absentee ballot in that primary or election.))

Sec. 5 RCW 29A.60.140 and 2003 c 111 s 1514 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Members of the county canvassing board are the county auditor,
who is the chair, the county prosecuting attorney, and the chair of the
county legislative body. If a member of the board is not available to
carry out the duties of the board, then the auditor may designate a
deputy auditor, the prosecutor may designate a deputy prosecuting
attorney, and the chair of the county legislative body may designate
another member of the county legislative body. Any such designation
may be made on an election-by-election basis or may be on a permanent
basis until revoked by the designating authority. Any such designation
must be in writing, and if for a specific election, must be filed with
the county auditor not later than the day before the first day duties
are to be undertaken by the canvassing board. If the designation is
permanent until revoked by the designating authority, then the
designation must be on file in the county auditor's office no later
than the day before the first day the designee is to undertake the
duties of the canvassing board.
(2) The county canvassing board may adopt rules that delegate in
writing to the county auditor or the county auditor's staff the
performance of any task assigned by law to the canvassing board.
(3) The county canvassing board may not delegate the responsibility
of certifying the returns of a primary or election((,)) or of
determining the validity of challenged ballots((, or of determining the
validity of provisional ballots)) referred to the board by the county
auditor.
(4) The county canvassing board shall adopt administrative rules to
facilitate and govern the canvassing process in that jurisdiction.
(5) Meetings of the county canvassing board are public meetings
under chapter 42.30 RCW. All rules adopted by the county canvassing
board must be adopted in a public meeting under chapter 42.30 RCW, and
once adopted must be available to the public to review and copy under
chapter 42.17 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 RCW 29A.44.265 (Provisional ballot after
polls close) and 2004 c 267 s 501 are each repealed.

--- END ---