BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.94.531 and 1997 c 250 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Not more than six months after the adoption of the commute trip
reduction plan by a jurisdiction, each major employer in that
jurisdiction shall develop a commute trip reduction program and shall
submit a description of that program to the jurisdiction for review.
The program shall be implemented not more than six months after
submission to the jurisdiction.
(2) A commute trip reduction program shall consist of, at a minimum
(a) designation of a transportation coordinator and the display of the
name, location, and telephone number of the coordinator in a prominent
manner at each affected worksite; (b) regular distribution of
information to employees regarding alternatives to single-occupant
vehicle commuting; (c) an annual review of employee commuting and
reporting of progress toward meeting the single-occupant vehicle
reduction goals to the county, city, or town consistent with the method
established in the commute trip reduction plan; and (d) implementation
of a set of measures designed to achieve the applicable commute trip
reduction goals adopted by the jurisdiction. Such measures may include
but are not limited to:
(i) Provision of preferential parking or reduced parking charges,
or both, for high-occupancy vehicles, including motorcycles;
(ii) Instituting or increasing parking charges for single-occupant
vehicles;
(iii) Provision of commuter ride matching services to facilitate
employee ridesharing for commute trips;
(iv) Provision of subsidies for transit fares;
(v) Provision of vans for van pools;
(vi) Provision of subsidies for car pooling or van pooling;
(vii) Permitting the use of the employer's vehicles for car pooling
or van pooling;
(viii) Permitting flexible work schedules to facilitate employees'
use of transit, car pools, or van pools;
(ix) Cooperation with transportation providers to provide
additional regular or express service to the worksite;
(x) Construction of special loading and unloading facilities for
transit, car pool, and van pool users;
(xi) Provision of bicycle parking facilities, lockers, changing
areas, and showers for employees who bicycle or walk to work;
(xii) Provision of a program of parking incentives such as a rebate
for employees who do not use the parking facility;
(xiii) Establishment of a program to permit employees to work part
or full time at home or at an alternative worksite closer to their
homes;
(xiv) Establishment of a program of alternative work schedules such
as compressed work week schedules which reduce commuting; and
(xv) Implementation of other measures designed to facilitate the
use of high-occupancy vehicles such as on-site day care facilities and
emergency taxi services.
(3) Employers or owners of worksites may form or utilize existing
transportation management associations to assist members in developing
and implementing commute trip reduction programs.
(4) Employers shall make a good faith effort towards achievement of
the goals identified in RCW 70.94.527(4)(g).

--- END ---