BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the importance of
global markets to our state and national economy. As a leader among
states in international commerce, Washington houses many multinational
corporations. Competition among states for foreign businesses and
personnel is fierce and it is necessary to Washington's future economic
viability to eliminate a significant regulatory barrier to efficient
personnel exchange, resulting in a more attractive business climate in
Washington. The legislature recognizes that more than twenty other
states have entered into informal reciprocal agreements with other
nations to waive driver's license testing requirements in order to ease
the transition of personnel to and from those states. By removing an
unnecessary barrier to efficient personnel mobility it is the intent of
the legislature to strengthen and diversify Washington's economy.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.120 and 2004 c 249 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
An applicant for a new or renewed driver's license must
successfully pass a driver licensing examination to qualify for a
driver's license. The department shall give examinations at places and
times reasonably available to the people of this state.
(1) Waiver. The department may waive:
(a) All or any part of the examination of any person applying for
the renewal of a driver's license unless the department determines that
the applicant is not qualified to hold a driver's license under this
title; or
(b) ((The actual demonstration of the ability to operate)) All or
any part of the examination involving operating a motor vehicle if the
applicant:
(i) Surrenders a valid driver's license issued by the person's
previous home state; ((and)) or
(ii) Provides for verification a valid driver's license issued by
a foreign driver licensing jurisdiction with which the department has
an informal agreement under section 3 of this act; and
(iii) Is otherwise qualified to be licensed.
(2) Fee. Each applicant for a new license must pay an examination
fee of ten dollars.
(a) The examination fee is in addition to the fee charged for
issuance of the license.
(b) "New license" means a license issued to a driver:
(i) Who has not been previously licensed in this state; or
(ii) Whose last previous Washington license has been expired for
more than five years.
(3) An application for driver's license renewal may be submitted by
means of:
(a) Personal appearance before the department; or
(b) Mail or electronic commerce, if permitted by rule of the
department and if the applicant did not renew his or her license by
mail or by electronic commerce when it last expired. However, the
department may accept an application for renewal of a driver's license
submitted by means of mail or electronic commerce only if specific
authority and funding is provided for this purpose by June 30, 2004, in
the omnibus transportation appropriations act.
(4) A person whose license expired or will expire while he or she
is living outside the state, may:
(a) Apply to the department to extend the validity of his or her
license for no more than twelve months. If the person establishes to
the department's satisfaction that he or she is unable to return to
Washington before the date his or her license expires, the department
shall extend the person's license. The department may grant
consecutive extensions, but in no event may the cumulative total of
extensions exceed twelve months. An extension granted under this
section does not change the expiration date of the license for purposes
of RCW 46.20.181. The department shall charge a fee of five dollars
for each license extension;
(b) Apply to the department to renew his or her license by mail or,
if permitted by rule of the department, by electronic commerce even if
subsection (3)(b) of this section would not otherwise allow renewal by
that means. If the person establishes to the department's satisfaction
that he or she is unable to return to Washington within twelve months
of the date that his or her license expires, the department shall renew
the person's license by mail or, if permitted by rule of the
department, by electronic commerce.
(5) If a qualified person submits an application for renewal under
subsection (3)(b) or (4)(b) of this section, he or she is not required
to pass an examination nor provide an updated photograph. A license
renewed by mail or by electronic commerce that does not include a
photograph of the licensee must be labeled "not valid for
identification purposes."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may enter into an informal agreement with one or
more other licensing jurisdictions to waive the requirement for the
examination involving operating a motor vehicle by licensed drivers,
age eighteen years or older, from that jurisdiction.
(2) The department may only enter into an agreement with a
jurisdiction if:
(a) The jurisdiction has procedures in place to verify the validity
of the drivers' licenses it issues; and
(b) The jurisdiction has agreed to waive all or any part of the
driver's license examination requirements for Washington licensed
drivers applying for a driver's license in that jurisdiction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The department may make rules to carry out the purposes of sections
2 and 3 of this act.

--- END ---