BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Employee" means an employee of a broadcasting industry
employer other than a sales or management employee.
(b) "Broadcasting industry" means television, radio, cable stations
and networks, and other electronic platforms designed to distribute
electronic signals normally containing news, entertainment, and/or
informational programming.
(c) "Noncompetition clause" means a covenant not to compete,
restrictive covenant, or any agreement in which the applicant,
employee, or independent contractor agrees for a specific period of
time within a specific geographic area to refrain from employment that
competes with the broadcasting industry employer.
(2) Unless permitted in this subsection, no broadcasting industry
employer shall require any applicant, employee, or independent
contractor to enter an employment contract containing a noncompetition
clause. This subsection does not prevent the enforcement of a
noncompetition clause during the term of an employment contract in
existence on the effective date of this act or against an employee who
breaches an employment contract.
(3) A noncompetition clause may not be enforced against an employee
who is terminated without cause by the employer before the expiration
of an employment agreement.
(4) Any person or entity violating subsection (2) of this section
is liable for civil damages and reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.
(5) Nothing in this section restricts the right of an employer to
protect trade secrets or other proprietary information by lawful means
in equity or under applicable law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---