BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the safety of
the highways of this state is materially affected by the degree of
compliance with state laws and local ordinances relating to the
operation of motor vehicles. Drivers who commit traffic violations,
ignore notices from courts, and fail to resolve notices of traffic
infraction and citations all show their disrespect for traffic laws
that exist to ensure safety on the highways. An essential mechanism
for ensuring that drivers comply with the traffic laws of this state is
the swift and certain suspension of the driving privileges of a driver
who fails to respond to a notice of traffic infraction, fails to appear
at a requested hearing, violates a written promise to appear in court,
fails to pay a fine or monetary penalty imposed as the result of a
traffic violation, or otherwise fails to comply with the terms of a
notice of traffic infraction or citation. License suspension ensures
that drivers comply with the traffic laws by deterring violations, and
ensures that the use of the state highways will be afforded only to
those who are willing to comply with the traffic laws.
(2) The legislature further finds that large numbers of drivers who
fail to fulfill their obligations to respond and comply with notices of
traffic infraction and citations, or otherwise fail to fulfill
obligations of similar import, creates a significant threat to public
safety. Therefore, there is a compelling state interest in having a
mechanism to withhold driving privileges which also provides necessary
due process protections as economically and expeditiously as possible.
The legislature finds that this compelling state interest can best be
served by having any necessary administrative review conducted by the
department of licensing in a manner that provides due process, while
maximizing the use of documentary evidence to simplify and expedite
those proceedings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Whenever the department proposes to withhold the driving
privilege of a person or disqualify a person from operating a
commercial motor vehicle and this action is made mandatory by the
provisions of this chapter or other law, the department must give
notice to the person in writing by posting in the United States mail,
appropriately addressed, postage prepaid, or by personal service.
Notice by mail is given upon deposit in the United States mail. Notice
given under this subsection must specify the date upon which the
driving privilege is to be withheld which shall not be less than forty-five days after the original notice is given.
(2) Within fifteen days after notice has been given to a person
under subsection (1) of this section, the person may request in writing
an administrative review before the department. If the request is
mailed, it must be postmarked within fifteen days after the date the
department has given notice.
(a) An administrative review under this subsection shall consist
solely of an internal review of documents and records submitted or
available to the department, unless the person requests an interview
before the department, in which case all or any part of the
administrative review may, at the discretion of the department, be
conducted by telephone or other electronic means.
(b) The only issues to be addressed in the administrative review
are:
(i) Whether the records relied on by the department identify the
correct person; and
(ii) Whether the information transmitted from the court or other
reporting agency or entity regarding the person accurately describes
the action taken by the court or other reporting agency or entity.
(c) For the purposes of this section, the notice received from a
court or other reporting agency or entity, regardless of form or
format, is prima facie evidence that the information from the court or
other reporting agency or entity regarding the person is accurate. A
person requesting administrative review has the burden of showing by a
preponderance of the evidence that the person is not subject to the
withholding of the driving privilege.
(d) The action subject to the notification requirements of
subsection (1) of this section shall be stayed during the
administrative review process.
(e) Judicial review of a department order affirming the action
subject to the notification requirements of subsection (1) of this
section after an administrative review shall be available in the same
manner as provided in RCW 46.20.308(9). The department shall certify
its record to the court within thirty days after service upon the
department of the petition for judicial review. The action subject to
the notification requirements of subsection (1) of this section shall
not automatically be stayed during the judicial review. If judicial
relief is sought for a stay or other temporary remedy from the
department's action, the court shall not grant relief unless the court
finds that the appellant is likely to prevail in the appeal and that
without a stay the appellant will suffer irreparable injury.
(3) The department may adopt rules that are considered necessary or
convenient by the department for purposes of administering this
section, including, but not limited to, rules regarding expedited
procedures for issuing orders and expedited notice procedures.
(4) This section does not apply where an opportunity for an
informal settlement, driver improvement interview, or formal hearing is
otherwise provided by law or rule of the department.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.20.265 and 2003 c 20 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to any other authority to revoke driving privileges
under this chapter, the department shall revoke all driving privileges
of a juvenile when the department receives notice from a court pursuant
to RCW 9.41.040(5), 13.40.265, 66.44.365, 69.41.065, 69.50.420,
69.52.070, or a substantially similar municipal ordinance adopted by a
local legislative authority, or from a diversion unit pursuant to RCW
13.40.265. ((The revocation shall be imposed without hearing.))
(2) The driving privileges of the juvenile revoked under subsection
(1) of this section shall be revoked in the following manner:
(a) Upon receipt of the first notice, the department shall impose
a revocation for one year, or until the juvenile reaches seventeen
years of age, whichever is longer.
(b) Upon receipt of a second or subsequent notice, the department
shall impose a revocation for two years or until the juvenile reaches
eighteen years of age, whichever is longer.
(c) Each offense for which the department receives notice shall
result in a separate period of revocation. All periods of revocation
imposed under this section that could otherwise overlap shall run
consecutively up to the juvenile's twenty-first birthday, and no period
of revocation imposed under this section shall begin before the
expiration of all other periods of revocation imposed under this
section or other law. Periods of revocation imposed consecutively
under this section shall not extend beyond the juvenile's twenty-first
birthday.
(3)(a) If the department receives notice from a court that the
juvenile's privilege to drive should be reinstated, the department
shall immediately reinstate any driving privileges that have been
revoked under this section if the minimum term of revocation as
specified in RCW 13.40.265(1)(c), 66.44.365(3), 69.41.065(3),
69.50.420(3), 69.52.070(3), or similar ordinance has expired, and
subject to subsection (2)(c) of this section.
(b) The juvenile may seek reinstatement of his or her driving
privileges from the department when the juvenile reaches the age of
twenty-one. A notice from the court reinstating the juvenile's driving
privilege shall not be required if reinstatement is pursuant to this
subsection.
(4)(a) If the department receives notice pursuant to RCW
13.40.265(2)(b) from a diversion unit that a juvenile has completed a
diversion agreement for which the juvenile's driving privileges were
revoked, the department shall reinstate any driving privileges revoked
under this section as provided in (b) of this subsection, subject to
subsection (2)(c) of this section.
(b) If the diversion agreement was for the juvenile's first
violation of chapter 66.44, 69.41, 69.50, or 69.52 RCW, the department
shall not reinstate the juvenile's privilege to drive until the later
of ninety days after the date the juvenile turns sixteen or ninety days
after the juvenile entered into a diversion agreement for the offense.
If the diversion agreement was for the juvenile's second or subsequent
violation of chapter 66.44, 69.41, 69.50, or 69.52 RCW, the department
shall not reinstate the juvenile's privilege to drive until the later
of the date the juvenile turns seventeen or one year after the juvenile
entered into the second or subsequent diversion agreement.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.20.270 and 2004 c 231 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever any person is convicted of any offense for which this
title makes mandatory the ((suspension or revocation of the driver's
license)) withholding of the driving privilege of such person by the
department, the ((privilege of the person to operate a vehicle is
suspended until the department takes the action required by this
chapter, and the)) court in which such conviction is had shall
forthwith ((secure the immediate forfeiture of the driver's license of
such convicted person and immediately forward such driver's license to
the department, and on failure of such convicted person to deliver such
driver's license the judge shall cause such person to be confined for
the period of such suspension or revocation or until such driver's
license is delivered to such judge: PROVIDED, That if the convicted
person testifies that he or she does not and at the time of the offense
did not have a current and valid vehicle driver's license, the judge
shall cause such person to be charged with the operation of a motor
vehicle without a current and valid driver's license and on conviction
punished as by law provided, and the department may not issue a
driver's license to such persons during the period of suspension or
revocation: PROVIDED, ALSO, That if the driver's license of such
convicted person has been lost or destroyed and such convicted person
makes an affidavit to that effect, sworn to before the judge, the
convicted person may not be so confined, but the department may not
issue or reissue a driver's license for such convicted person during
the period of such suspension or revocation: PROVIDED, That)) mark the
person's Washington state driver's license or permit to drive, if any,
in a manner authorized by the department. A valid driver's license or
permit to drive marked under this subsection shall remain in effect
until the person's driving privilege is withheld by the department
pursuant to notice given under section 2 of this act, unless the
license or permit expires or otherwise becomes invalid prior to the
effective date of this action. Perfection of notice of appeal shall
stay the execution of sentence including the ((suspension and/or
revocation of the driver's license)) withholding of the driving
privilege.
(2) Every court having jurisdiction over offenses committed under
this chapter, or any other act of this state or municipal ordinance
adopted by a local authority regulating the operation of motor vehicles
on highways, or any federal authority having jurisdiction over offenses
substantially the same as those set forth in Title 46 RCW which occur
on federal installations within this state, shall forward to the
department within ten days of a forfeiture of bail or collateral
deposited to secure the defendant's appearance in court, a payment of
a fine or penalty, a plea of guilty or a finding of guilt, or a finding
that any person has committed a traffic infraction an abstract of the
court record in the form prescribed by rule of the supreme court,
showing the conviction of any person or the finding that any person has
committed a traffic infraction in said court for a violation of any
said laws other than regulations governing standing, stopping, parking,
and pedestrian offenses.
(3) Every state agency or municipality having jurisdiction over
offenses committed under this chapter, or under any other act of this
state or municipal ordinance adopted by a state or local authority
regulating the operation of motor vehicles on highways, may forward to
the department within ten days of failure to respond, failure to pay a
penalty, failure to appear at a hearing to contest the determination
that a violation of any statute, ordinance, or regulation relating to
standing, stopping, parking, or other infraction issued under RCW
46.63.030(1)(d) has been committed, or failure to appear at a hearing
to explain mitigating circumstances, an abstract of the citation record
in the form prescribed by rule of the department, showing the finding
by such municipality that two or more violations of laws governing
standing, stopping, and parking or one or more other infractions issued
under RCW 46.63.030(1)(d) have been committed and indicating the nature
of the defendant's failure to act. Such violations or infractions may
not have occurred while the vehicle is stolen from the registered owner
or is leased or rented under a bona fide commercial vehicle lease or
rental agreement between a lessor engaged in the business of leasing
vehicles and a lessee who is not the vehicle's registered owner. The
department may enter into agreements of reciprocity with the duly
authorized representatives of the states for reporting to each other
violations of laws governing standing, stopping, and parking.
(4) For the purposes of Title 46 RCW the term "conviction" means a
final conviction in a state or municipal court or by any federal
authority having jurisdiction over offenses substantially the same as
those set forth in Title 46 RCW which occur on federal installations in
this state, an unvacated forfeiture of bail or collateral deposited to
secure a defendant's appearance in court, the payment of a fine, a plea
of guilty, or a finding of guilt on a traffic law violation charge,
regardless of whether the imposition of sentence or sanctions are
deferred or the penalty is suspended, but not including entry into a
deferred prosecution agreement under chapter 10.05 RCW.
(5) For the purposes of Title 46 RCW the term "finding that a
traffic infraction has been committed" means a failure to respond to a
notice of infraction or a determination made by a court pursuant to
this chapter. Payment of a monetary penalty made pursuant to RCW
46.63.070(2) is deemed equivalent to such a finding.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.20.285 and 2001 c 64 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall ((forthwith)) revoke the license of any driver
for the period of one calendar year unless otherwise provided in this
section, upon receiving a record of the driver's conviction of any of
the following offenses, when the conviction has become final:
(1) For vehicular homicide the period of revocation shall be two
years. The revocation period shall be tolled during any period of
total confinement for the offense;
(2) Vehicular assault. The revocation period shall be tolled
during any period of total confinement for the offense;
(3) Driving a motor vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or a narcotic drug, or under the influence of any
other drug to a degree which renders the driver incapable of safely
driving a motor vehicle, for the period prescribed in RCW 46.61.5055;
(4) Any felony in the commission of which a motor vehicle is used;
(5) Failure to stop and give information or render aid as required
under the laws of this state in the event of a motor vehicle accident
resulting in the death or personal injury of another or resulting in
damage to a vehicle that is driven or attended by another;
(6) Perjury or the making of a false affidavit or statement under
oath to the department under Title 46 RCW or under any other law
relating to the ownership or operation of motor vehicles;
(7) Reckless driving upon a showing by the department's records
that the conviction is the third such conviction for the driver within
a period of two years.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.20.289 and 2002 c 279 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall suspend all driving privileges of a person
when the department receives notice from a court under RCW
46.63.070(6), 46.63.110(((5))) (6), or 46.64.025 that the person has
failed to respond to a notice of traffic infraction, failed to appear
at a requested hearing, violated a written promise to appear in court,
failed to pay any portion of a fine or monetary penalty, or has
otherwise failed to comply with the terms of a notice of traffic
infraction or citation, other than for a standing, stopping, or parking
violation. A suspension under this section takes effect ((thirty days
after the date the department mails notice of the suspension)) pursuant
to the provisions of section 2 of this act, and remains in effect until
the department has received a certificate from the court showing that
the case has been adjudicated, and until the person meets the
requirements of RCW 46.20.311. In the case of failure to respond to a
traffic infraction issued under RCW 46.55.105, the department shall
suspend all driving privileges until the person provides evidence from
the court that all penalties and restitution have been paid. A
suspension under this section does not take effect if, prior to the
effective date of the suspension, the department receives a certificate
from the court showing that the case has been adjudicated.

Sec. 7 RCW 46.20.291 and 1998 c 165 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department is authorized to suspend the license of a driver
upon a showing by its records or other sufficient evidence that the
licensee:
(1) Has committed an offense for which mandatory revocation or
suspension of license is provided by law;
(2) Has, by reckless or unlawful operation of a motor vehicle,
caused or contributed to an accident resulting in death or injury to
any person or serious property damage;
(3) Has been convicted of offenses against traffic regulations
governing the movement of vehicles, or found to have committed traffic
infractions, with such frequency as to indicate a disrespect for
traffic laws or a disregard for the safety of other persons on the
highways;
(4) Is incompetent to drive a motor vehicle under RCW 46.20.031(3);
(5) Has failed to respond to a notice of traffic infraction, failed
to appear at a requested hearing, violated a written promise to appear
in court, failed to pay any portion of a fine or monetary penalty, or
has otherwise failed to comply with the terms of a notice of traffic
infraction or citation, as provided in RCW 46.20.289;
(6) Is subject to suspension under RCW 46.20.305;
(7) Has committed one of the prohibited practices relating to
drivers' licenses defined in RCW ((46.20.336)) 46.20.0921; or
(8) Has been certified by the department of social and health
services as a person who is not in compliance with a child support
order or a residential or visitation order as provided in RCW
74.20A.320.

Sec. 8 RCW 46.20.324 and 1965 ex.s. c 121 s 31 are each amended
to read as follows:
Unless otherwise provided by law, a person shall not be entitled to
a driver improvement interview or formal hearing ((as hereinafter
provided)) under the provisions of RCW 46.20.322 through 46.20.333 when
the person:
(1) ((When the action by the department is made mandatory by the
provisions of this chapter or other law)) Has been granted the
opportunity for an administrative review, informal settlement, or
formal hearing under section 2 of this act, RCW 46.20.308, 46.25.120,
46.25.125, 46.65.065, 74.20A.320, or by rule of the department; or
(2) ((When the person)) Has refused or neglected to submit to an
examination as required by RCW 46.20.305.

Sec. 9 RCW 46.20.334 and 1972 ex.s. c 29 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless otherwise provided by law, any person denied a license or a
renewal of a license or whose license has been suspended or revoked by
the department ((except where such suspension or revocation is
mandatory under the provisions of this chapter)) shall have the right
within thirty days, after receiving notice of the decision following a
formal hearing to file a notice of appeal in the superior court in the
county of his residence. The hearing on the appeal hereunder shall be
de novo.

Sec. 10 RCW 46.20.342 and 2004 c 95 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person to drive a motor vehicle in this
state while that person is in a suspended or revoked status or when his
or her privilege to drive is suspended or revoked in this or any other
state. Any person who has a valid Washington driver's license is not
guilty of a violation of this section.
(a) A person found to be an habitual offender under chapter 46.65
RCW, who violates this section while an order of revocation issued
under chapter 46.65 RCW prohibiting such operation is in effect, is
guilty of driving while license suspended or revoked in the first
degree, a gross misdemeanor. Upon the first such conviction, the
person shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than ten days.
Upon the second conviction, the person shall be punished by
imprisonment for not less than ninety days. Upon the third or
subsequent conviction, the person shall be punished by imprisonment for
not less than one hundred eighty days. If the person is also convicted
of the offense defined in RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, when both
convictions arise from the same event, the minimum sentence of
confinement shall be not less than ninety days. The minimum sentence
of confinement required shall not be suspended or deferred. A
conviction under this subsection does not prevent a person from
petitioning for reinstatement as provided by RCW 46.65.080.
(b) A person who violates this section while an order of suspension
or revocation prohibiting such operation is in effect and while the
person is not eligible to reinstate his or her driver's license or
driving privilege, other than for a suspension for the reasons
described in (c) of this subsection, is guilty of driving while license
suspended or revoked in the second degree, a gross misdemeanor. This
subsection applies when a person's driver's license or driving
privilege has been suspended or revoked by reason of:
(i) A conviction of a felony in the commission of which a motor
vehicle was used;
(ii) A previous conviction under this section;
(iii) A notice received by the department from a court or diversion
unit as provided by RCW 46.20.265, relating to a minor who has
committed, or who has entered a diversion unit concerning an offense
relating to alcohol, legend drugs, controlled substances, or imitation
controlled substances;
(iv) A conviction of RCW 46.20.410, relating to the violation of
restrictions of an occupational or a temporary restricted driver's
license;
(v) A conviction of RCW 46.20.345, relating to the operation of a
motor vehicle with a suspended or revoked license;
(vi) A conviction of RCW 46.52.020, relating to duty in case of
injury to or death of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;
(vii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.024, relating to attempting to
elude pursuing police vehicles;
(viii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.500, relating to reckless driving;
(ix) A conviction of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, relating to a
person under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;
(x) A conviction of RCW 46.61.520, relating to vehicular homicide;
(xi) A conviction of RCW 46.61.522, relating to vehicular assault;
(xii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.527(4), relating to reckless
endangerment of roadway workers;
(xiii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.530, relating to racing of
vehicles on highways;
(xiv) A conviction of RCW 46.61.685, relating to leaving children
in an unattended vehicle with motor running;
(xv) A conviction of RCW 46.61.740, relating to theft of motor
vehicle fuel;
(xvi) A conviction of RCW 46.64.048, relating to attempting,
aiding, abetting, coercing, and committing crimes;
(xvii) An administrative action taken by the department under
chapter 46.20 RCW; or
(xviii) A conviction of a local law, ordinance, regulation, or
resolution of a political subdivision of this state, the federal
government, or any other state, of an offense substantially similar to
a violation included in this subsection.
(c) A person who violates this section when his or her driver's
license or driving privilege is, at the time of the violation,
suspended or revoked solely because (i) the person must furnish proof
of satisfactory progress in a required alcoholism or drug treatment
program, (ii) the person must furnish proof of financial responsibility
for the future as provided by chapter 46.29 RCW, (iii) the person has
failed to comply with the provisions of chapter 46.29 RCW relating to
uninsured accidents, (iv) the person has failed to respond to a notice
of traffic infraction, failed to appear at a requested hearing,
violated a written promise to appear in court, failed to pay any
portion of a fine or monetary penalty, or has otherwise failed to
comply with the terms of a notice of traffic infraction or citation, as
provided in RCW 46.20.289, (v) the person has committed an offense in
another state that, if committed in this state, would not be grounds
for the suspension or revocation of the person's driver's license, (vi)
the person has been suspended or revoked by reason of one or more of
the items listed in (b) of this subsection, but was eligible to
reinstate his or her driver's license or driving privilege at the time
of the violation, or (vii) the person has received traffic citations or
notices of traffic infraction that have resulted in a suspension under
RCW 46.20.267 relating to intermediate drivers' licenses, or any
combination of (i) through (vii), is guilty of driving while license
suspended or revoked in the third degree, a misdemeanor.
(2) Upon receiving a record of conviction of any person or upon
receiving an order by any juvenile court or any duly authorized court
officer of the conviction of any juvenile under this section, the
department shall:
(a) For a conviction of driving while suspended or revoked in the
first degree, as provided by subsection (1)(a) of this section, extend
the period of administrative revocation imposed under chapter 46.65 RCW
for an additional period of one year from and after the date the person
would otherwise have been entitled to apply for a new license or have
his or her driving privilege restored; or
(b) For a conviction of driving while suspended or revoked in the
second degree, as provided by subsection (1)(b) of this section, not
issue a new license or restore the driving privilege for an additional
period of one year from and after the date the person would otherwise
have been entitled to apply for a new license or have his or her
driving privilege restored; or
(c) Not extend the period of suspension or revocation if the
conviction was under subsection (1)(c) of this section. If the
conviction was under subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section and the
court recommends against the extension and the convicted person has
obtained a valid driver's license, the period of suspension or
revocation shall not be extended.

Sec. 11 RCW 46.64.025 and 1999 c 86 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever any person violates his or her written promise to appear
in court, ((or)) fails to appear for a scheduled court hearing, or
fails to pay any portion of a fine or monetary penalty, the court in
which the defendant failed to appear or failed to pay shall promptly
give notice of such fact to the department of licensing. Whenever
thereafter the case in which the defendant failed to appear or failed
to pay is adjudicated or the fine or monetary penalty is paid, the
court hearing the case shall promptly file with the department a
certificate showing that the case has been adjudicated or the fine or
monetary penalty has been paid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---