BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the University of
Washington Bothell, University of Washington Tacoma, Washington State
University Tri-Cities, and Washington State University Vancouver have
each conducted a thorough review of the campus mission and model of
educational services and made recommendations to the legislature for
the future evolution of the campus. As a result of these reviews, it
is the legislature's intent to authorize each campus to expand its
educational offerings to include lower-division courses.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.45.014 and 2004 c 57 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The primary mission of the higher education branch campuses
created under this chapter remains to expand access to baccalaureate
and master's level graduate education in underserved urban areas of the
state, both in collaboration with community and technical colleges for
transfer students and by offering baccalaureate programs that include
lower-division courses.
(2) Branch campuses shall collaborate with the community and
technical colleges in their region to develop articulation agreements,
dual admissions policies, and other partnerships to ensure that branch
campuses serve as innovative models of a two plus two educational
system. Other possibilities for collaboration include but are not
limited to joint development of curricula and degree programs,
colocation of instruction, and arrangements to share faculty.
(3) In communities where a private postsecondary institution is
located, representatives of the private institution may be invited to
participate in the conversation about meeting the baccalaureate and
master's level graduate needs in underserved urban areas of the state.
(4) However, the legislature recognizes there are alternative
models for achieving this primary mission. Some campuses may have
additional missions in response to regional needs and demands. At
selected branch campuses, an innovative combination of instruction and
research targeted to support regional economic development may be
appropriate to meet the region's needs for both access and economic
viability. Other campuses should focus on becoming models of a two
plus two educational system through continuous improvement of
partnerships and agreements with community and technical colleges.
Still other campuses may be best suited to transition to a four-year
comprehensive university or be removed from designation as a branch
campus entirely.
(5) It is the legislature's intent that each branch campus be
funded commensurate with its unique mission, the degree programs
offered, and the institutional combination of instruction and research,
but at a level less than a research university.
(6) In consultation with the higher education coordinating board,
a branch campus may propose legislation to authorize practice-oriented
or professional doctoral programs if: (a) Unique research facilities
and equipment are located near the campus; or (b) the campus can
clearly demonstrate student and employer demand in the region that is
linked to regional economic development.
(7) It is not the legislature's intent to have each campus chart
its own future path without legislative guidance. Instead, the
legislature intends to consider carefully the mission and model of
education that best suits each campus and best meets the needs of
students, the community, and the region.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.45.020 and 1994 c 217 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The University of Washington is responsible for ensuring the
expansion of ((upper-division)) baccalaureate and graduate educational
programs in the central Puget Sound area under rules or guidelines
adopted by the higher education coordinating board. The University of
Washington shall meet that responsibility through the operation of at
least two branch campuses. One branch campus shall be located in the
Tacoma area. Another branch campus shall be collocated with Cascadia
Community College in the Bothell-Woodinville area.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.45.030 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 7 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
Washington State University is responsible for providing ((upper-division)) baccalaureate and graduate level higher education programs
to the citizens of the Tri-Cities area, under rules or guidelines
adopted by the higher education coordinating board. Washington State
University shall meet that responsibility through the operation of a
branch campus in the Tri-Cities area. The branch campus shall replace
and supersede the Tri-Cities university center. All land, facilities,
equipment, and personnel of the Tri-Cities university center shall be
transferred from the University of Washington to Washington State
University.

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.45.040 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 7 s 5 are each amended
to read as follows:
Washington State University is responsible for providing ((upper-division)) baccalaureate and graduate level higher education programs
to the citizens of the southwest Washington area, under rules or
guidelines adopted by the higher education coordinating board.
Washington State University shall meet that responsibility through the
operation of a branch campus in the southwest Washington area.

--- END ---