BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that:
(1) An estimated one hundred twenty-eight million Americans suffer
from chronic, degenerative, and acute diseases, including diabetes,
Alzheimer's disease, cancer, Huntington's disease, Parkinson's disease,
heart disease, and spinal cord injury. The crippling economic and
psychological burdens of such diseases result in billions of dollars
every year in costs of treatment and lost productivity as well as
extreme human loss and emotional suffering.
(2) Stem cell research offers immense promise for developing new
medical therapies for these debilitating diseases and a critical means
to explore fundamental questions of biology. Stem cell research could
lead to unprecedented treatments and potential cures for diabetes,
Alzheimer's disease, Huntington's disease, Parkinson's disease, heart
disease, spinal cord injury, and other diseases.
(3) Washington state is home to several large medical research
institutions and an expanding biomedical research industry. These
organizations are committed to improving the lives of Americans
suffering from chronic, degenerative, and acute diseases. Encouraging
stem cell research is essential to realizing the promise of stem cell
research and will promote advances in other areas of biomedical
research.
(4) Stem cell therapy was born in Washington state over thirty
years ago, with the pioneering work of nobel laureate, E. Donnall
Thomas, and his colleagues at the Fred Hutchinson cancer research
center. The Fred Hutchinson cancer research center remains the premier
center for adult stem cell transplantation in the world. Support for
stem cell research at this critical juncture represents a commitment to
continue this distinguished legacy.
(5) Several states have supported policies and institutions in
partnership with the biomedical research industry to promote and
advance embryonic stem cell research. Washington state must
demonstrate a similar commitment to these initiatives in order to
reaffirm itself as a leader in this area of biomedical research.
(6) Stem cell research, including the use of embryonic stem cells
for medical research, raises significant ethical concerns that must be
balanced with medical considerations.
(7) While therapeutic cloning stem cell research holds enormous
potential for treating or even curing some diseases, the reproductive
cloning of human beings is morally and ethically unacceptable.
Furthermore, the reproductive cloning of human beings poses grave
health risks to any child who may be produced in this manner. Any
attempt to clone a human being is in direct conflict with the policies
of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Blastocyst" means a preimplantation embryo consisting of
approximately one hundred fifty cells that are organized into an inner
and outer cell layer surrounding a fluid-filled cavity. The cells of
the inner layer, from which embryonic stem cells are derived, consists
of undifferentiated cells that have the potential to become any type of
cell in the human body.
(2) "Department" means the department of health.
(3) "Human somatic cell" means a diploid cell obtained or derived
from a living or deceased human at any stage of development.
(4) "Oocyte" means the unfertilized human ovum.
(5) "Reproductive cloning of a human being" means asexual
reproduction of a human being by transplanting a blastocyst that has
been created by somatic cell nuclear transfer into a uterus or
substitute for a uterus with the purpose of creating a human being.
(6) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.
(7) "Somatic cell nuclear transfer" or "therapeutic cloning" means
a technique in which the nucleus of an oocyte is replaced with the
nucleus of a donated human somatic cell and stimulated to divide until
it reaches the blastocyst stage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The human stem cell research advisory
committee is created and consists of thirteen members appointed by the
governor. Members of the initial committee shall be appointed to
staggered terms of one to two years, and thereafter all terms of
appointment shall be for four years. The governor shall consider such
candidates as may be recommended for appointment by the University of
Washington and the biomedical research community. The committee shall
consist of the following members:
(a) Seven scientists with experience in biomedical research in the
fields of cell differentiation, nuclear reprogramming, tissue formation
and regeneration, stem cell biology, developmental biology,
regenerative medicine, or related fields;
(b) Two medical ethicists;
(c) Two persons with backgrounds in legal issues related to human
embryonic stem cell research, in vitro fertilization, or family law, as
it applies to the donation of blastocysts and oocytes; and
(d) Two members of the public.
(2) The advisory committee shall develop guidelines for research
involving the derivation or use of human embryonic stem cells in
Washington by January 1, 2006. The guidelines shall address the
balance between the state policy of promoting research involving the
derivation of human embryonic stem cells, by any method, including
somatic cell nuclear transfer, and the ethical considerations that
arise with such research. After adoption of the initial guidelines,
the advisory committee may revise the guidelines or issue advisory
opinions, as necessary, to account for developments in research and
medicine as they may affect the research and ethical considerations
associated with the use of human embryonic stem cells.
(3) To develop the guidelines, the committee may consider other
applicable guidelines developed or used in the United States and in
other countries, including the guidelines for research using human
pluripotent stem cells developed by the national institutes of health
published in August 2000, and corrected in November 2000.
(4) The department shall provide administrative support to the
advisory committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A health care provider delivering
fertility treatment must provide his or her patient with timely,
relevant, and appropriate information to allow the patient to make an
informed and voluntary choice about the disposition of any human
blastocysts remaining following the fertility treatment.
(2) Any person to whom information is provided pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section must be presented with the option of
storing any unused blastocysts, donating unused blastocysts to another
individual, discarding unused blastocysts, or donating unused
blastocysts for research. When providing fertility treatment, the
health care provider must provide a form to the male and female
partner, or the person without a partner, as applicable, that sets
forth advanced written directives regarding the disposition of unused
blastocysts. The form must indicate the time limit on storage of the
blastocysts at the clinic or storage facility and provide, at a
minimum, the following choices for disposition of the blastocysts based
on the following circumstances:
(a) Upon written notice of the death of a patient or patient's
partner, the blastocysts must be disposed of by one of the following
actions:
(i) Making the blastocysts available to the living partner, if any;
(ii) Donating the blastocysts for research purposes;
(iii) Thawing the blastocysts without any further action;
(iv) Donating the blastocysts to another person; or
(v) Disposing of the blastocysts in any other clearly stated
method.
(b) Upon written notice of the separation or divorce of the
partners, the blastocysts must be disposed of by any of the following
actions:
(i) Making the blastocysts available to the female partner;
(ii) Making the blastocysts available to the male partner;
(iii) Donating the blastocysts for research purposes;
(iv) Thawing the blastocysts without any further action;
(v) Donating the blastocysts to another person; or
(vi) Disposing of the blastocysts in any other clearly stated
method.
(c) Upon the partners' decision, or the decision of a patient who
is without a partner, to abandon the blastocysts by written request or
a failure to pay storage fees, the blastocysts must be disposed of by
one of the following actions:
(i) Donating the blastocysts for research purposes;
(ii) Thawing the blastocysts without any further action;
(iii) Donating the blastocysts to another person; or
(iv) Disposing of the blastocysts in any other clearly stated
method.
(3) A health care provider delivering fertility treatment must
obtain written consent from any person who elects to donate blastocysts
remaining after fertility treatment for research. To obtain informed
consent, the health care provider must provide the following
information to the person:
(a) That the early human blastocysts will be used to derive human
pluripotent stem cells for research and that the cells may be used, at
some future time, for human transplantation research;
(b) Information that would permit the donor to be individually
identified will be removed before deriving human embryonic stem cell
lines;
(c) That donors will not receive any information about subsequent
testing on the blastocysts or the derived human pluripotent cells;
(d) That derived cells or cell lines may be kept for many years;
(e) That the donor material may have commercial potential, and the
donor will not receive financial or any other benefits from any future
commercial development;
(f) That the human pluripotent stem cell research is not intended
to provide direct medical benefit to the donor; and
(g) That human blastocysts donated for research will not be
transferred to a woman's uterus and will be destroyed during the stem
cell derivation process. Research will be conducted in accordance with
the advisory committee established in section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) No person may knowingly engage or assist
in reproductive cloning of a human being or attempting reproductive
cloning of a human being.
(2) The attorney general may bring an action to enjoin any person
from violating subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section is
subject to a civil penalty not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars
for each violation. Civil penalties authorized by this subsection may
be imposed in any civil action brought by the attorney general.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict areas of
biomedical, agricultural, and scientific research not specifically
prohibited by this section, including somatic cell nuclear transfer or
other cloning technologies to clone molecules, DNA, cells, and tissues.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) A person may donate human embryonic
tissue or human cadaveric fetal tissue for research purposes.
(2) A person may not knowingly, for valuable consideration,
purchase or sell human embryonic tissue or human cadaveric fetal tissue
for research purposes.
(3) Valuable consideration does not include reasonable payment for
the removal, processing, disposal, preservation, quality control,
storage, transportation, or implantation of human embryonic tissue or
human cadaveric tissue.
(4) A person who violates this section is guilty of a class B
felony and upon conviction is subject to a fine not to exceed twenty
thousand dollars or imprisonment not to exceed ten years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 No person may use human eggs or human sperm
that have been donated for purposes of assisted reproduction as defined
in chapter 26.26 RCW, to create human embryonic stem cells for use in
research, without the written consent of the donor to use the eggs or
sperm for research purposes after receiving the information specified
in section 4(3) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---