BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.26.500 and 1998 c 341 s 604 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((No)) Except under subsection (3) of this section, a retiree
under the provisions of plan 2 shall not be eligible to receive such
retiree's monthly retirement allowance if he or she is employed in an
eligible position as defined in RCW 41.40.010, 41.32.010, or 41.35.010,
or as a law enforcement officer or fire fighter as defined in RCW
41.26.030. If a retiree's benefits have been suspended under this
section, his or her benefits shall be reinstated when the retiree
terminates the employment that caused his or her benefits to be
suspended. Upon reinstatement, the retiree's benefits shall be
actuarially recomputed pursuant to the rules adopted by the department.
(2) The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.
(3) A member or retiree who becomes employed in an eligible
position as defined in RCW 41.40.010, 41.32.010, or 41.35.010 shall
have the option to enter into membership in the corresponding
retirement system for that position notwithstanding any provision of
RCW 41.04.270. A retiree who elects to enter into plan membership
shall have his or her benefits suspended as provided in subsection (1)
of this section. A retiree who does not elect to enter into plan
membership shall continue to receive his or her benefits without
interruption.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.26.500 and 2004 c 242 s 54 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((No)) Except under subsection (3) of this section, a retiree
under the provisions of plan 2 shall not be eligible to receive such
retiree's monthly retirement allowance if he or she is employed in an
eligible position as defined in RCW 41.40.010, 41.32.010, 41.37.010, or
41.35.010, or as a law enforcement officer or fire fighter as defined
in RCW 41.26.030. If a retiree's benefits have been suspended under
this section, his or her benefits shall be reinstated when the retiree
terminates the employment that caused his or her benefits to be
suspended. Upon reinstatement, the retiree's benefits shall be
actuarially recomputed pursuant to the rules adopted by the department.
(2) The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.
(3) A member or retiree who becomes employed in an eligible
position as defined in RCW 41.40.010, 41.32.010, 41.35.010, or
41.37.010 shall have the option to enter into membership in the
corresponding retirement system for that position notwithstanding any
provision of RCW 41.04.270. A retiree who elects to enter into plan
membership shall have his or her benefits suspended as provided in
subsection (1) of this section. A retiree who does not elect to enter
into plan membership shall continue to receive his or her benefits
without interruption.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act expires July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 1 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 2 of this act takes effect July 1,
2006.

--- END ---