BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I--LEGISLATIVE INTENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 (1) The legislature finds:
(a) The continued economic vitality of downtown and neighborhood
commercial districts in our state's cities is essential to community
preservation, social cohesion, and economic growth;
(b) In recent years there has been a deterioration of downtown and
neighborhood commercial districts in both rural and urban communities
due to a shifting population base, changes in the marketplace, and
greater competition from suburban shopping malls, discount centers, and
business transacted through the internet;
(c) This decline has eroded the ability of businesses and property
owners to renovate and enhance their commercial and residential
properties; and
(d) Business owners in these districts need to maintain their local
economies in order to provide goods and services to adjacent residents,
to provide employment opportunities, to avoid disinvestment and
economic dislocations, and to develop and sustain downtown and
neighborhood commercial district revitalization programs to address
these problems.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to establish a program to:
(a) Work in partnership with these organizations;
(b) Provide technical assistance and training to local governments,
business organizations, downtown and neighborhood commercial district
organizations, and business and property owners to accomplish community
and economic revitalization and development of business districts; and
(c) Certify a downtown or neighborhood commercial district
organization's use of available tax incentives.

PART II--DOWNTOWN AND NEIGHBORHOOD COMMERCIAL DISTRICT
REVITALIZATION INCENTIVES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax credit under this
chapter.
(2) "Contribution" means cash contributions.
(3) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(4) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.
(5) "Program" means a downtown or neighborhood commercial district
revitalization program located in a rural county as defined in RCW
43.160.020. For the purposes of this section, "downtown or
neighborhood commercial district revitalization program" means a
nonprofit organization under internal revenue code sections 501(c)(3)
or 501(c)(6), with the sole mission of revitalizing a downtown or
neighborhood commercial district area, that is designated by the
department of community, trade, and economic development as described
in sections 301 through 305 of this act.
(6) "Main street trust fund" means the department of community,
trade, and economic development's main street trust fund account under
section 305 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 (1) Application for tax credits under this
chapter must be made to the department before making a contribution to
a program or the main street trust fund. The application shall be made
to the department in a form and manner prescribed by the department.
The application shall contain information regarding the proposed amount
of contribution to a program or the main street trust fund, and other
information required by the department to determine eligibility under
this act. The department shall rule on the application within forty-five days. Applications shall be approved on a first-come basis.
(2) The person must make the contribution described in the approved
application by the end of the calendar year in which the application is
approved to claim a credit allowed under section 203 of this act.
(3) The department shall not accept any applications before
September 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 (1) Subject to the limitations in this
chapter, a credit is allowed against the tax imposed by chapters 82.04
and 82.16 RCW for approved contributions that are made by a person to
a program or the main street trust fund.
(2) The credit allowed under this section is limited to an amount
equal to:
(a) Seventy-five percent of the value of the contribution that is
made directly, by the business, to a downtown or neighborhood
commercial district revitalization program; or
(b) Fifty percent of the value of the contribution that is made
directly, by the business, to the department of community, trade, and
economic development for distribution as financial or technical
assistance under section 302 of this act.
(3) The department shall keep a running total of all credits
approved under this chapter for each calendar year. The department
shall not approve any credits under this section that would cause the
total amount of approved credits statewide to exceed two million
dollars in any calendar year.
(4) The total credits allowed under this chapter for contributions
made to each program cannot exceed one hundred thousand dollars in a
calendar year. The total credits allowed under this chapter for a
person cannot exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars in a calendar
year.
(5) The credit may be claimed against any tax due under chapters
82.04 and 82.16 RCW in the calendar year immediately following the
calendar year in which the credit was approved by the department and
the contribution was made to the program or the main street trust fund.
Credits cannot be carried over to subsequent years. No refunds may be
granted for credits under this chapter.
(6) The total amount of the credit claimed in any calendar year by
a person cannot exceed the lesser amount of the approved credit, or
seventy-five percent of the amount of the contribution that is made by
the person to a program and fifty percent of the amount of the
contribution that is made by the person to the main street trust fund,
in the prior calendar year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 To claim a credit under this chapter, a
person must electronically file with the department all returns, forms,
and other information the department requires in an electronic format
as provided or approved by the department. Any return, form, or
information required to be filed in an electronic format under this
section is not filed until received by the department in an electronic
format. As used in this subsection, "returns" has the same meaning as
"return" in RCW 82.32.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 The department of community, trade, and
economic development shall provide information to the department to
administer this chapter, including a list of designated programs that
shall be updated as necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the
administration of this chapter.

PART III--DOWNTOWN AND NEIGHBORHOOD COMMERCIAL DISTRICT
REVITALIZATION PROGRAM
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Area" means a geographic area within a local government that
is described by a closed perimeter boundary.
(2) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of community,
trade, and economic development.
(4) "Local government" means a city, code city, or town.
(5) "Qualified levels of participation" means a local downtown or
neighborhood commercial district revitalization program that has been
designated by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 The Washington main street program is
created within the department. In order to implement the Washington
main street program, the department shall:
(1) Provide technical assistance to businesses, property owners,
organizations, and local governments undertaking a comprehensive
downtown or neighborhood commercial district revitalization initiative
and management strategy. Technical assistance may include, but is not
limited to, initial site evaluations and assessments, training for
local programs, training for local program staff, site visits and
assessments by technical specialists, local program design assistance
and evaluation, and continued local program on-site assistance;
(2) To the extent funds are made available, provide financial
assistance to local governments or local organizations to assist in
initial downtown or neighborhood commercial district revitalization
program start-up costs, specialized training, specific project
feasibility studies, market studies, and design assistance;
(3) Develop objective criteria for selecting recipients of
assistance under subsections (1) and (2) of this section, which shall
include priority for downtown or neighborhood commercial district
revitalization programs located in a rural county as defined in RCW
43.160.020(12), and provide for designation of local programs under
section 303 of this act;
(4) Operate the Washington main street program in accordance with
the plan developed by the department, in consultation with the
Washington main street advisory committee created under section 304 of
this act; and
(5) Consider other factors the department deems necessary for the
implementation of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 (1) The department shall adopt criteria
for the designation of local downtown or neighborhood commercial
district revitalization programs and official local main street
programs. In establishing the criteria, the department shall consider:
(a) The degree of interest and commitment to comprehensive downtown
or neighborhood commercial district revitalization and, where
applicable, historic preservation by both the public and private
sectors;
(b) The evidence of potential private sector investment in the
downtown or neighborhood commercial district;
(c) Where applicable, a downtown or neighborhood commercial
district with sufficient historic fabric to become a foundation for an
enhanced community image;
(d) The capacity of the organization to undertake a comprehensive
program and the financial commitment to implement a long-term downtown
or neighborhood commercial district revitalization program that
includes a commitment to employ a professional program manager and
maintain a sufficient operating budget;
(e) The department's existing downtown revitalization program's
tier system;
(f) The national main street center's criteria for designating
official main street cities; and
(g) Other factors the department deems necessary for the
designation of a local program.
(2) The department shall designate local downtown or neighborhood
commercial district revitalization programs and official local main
street programs. The programs shall be limited to three categories of
designation, one of which shall be the main street level.
(3) Section 201 of this act does not apply to any local downtown or
neighborhood commercial district revitalization program unless the
boundaries of the program have been identified and approved by the
department. The boundaries of a local downtown or neighborhood
commercial district revitalization program are typically defined using
the pedestrian core of a traditional commercial district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 (1) The Washington main street advisory
committee is created within the department. The members of the
advisory committee are appointed by the director and consist of:
(a) The director, or the director's designee, who shall serve as
chair;
(b) Two representatives from local governments;
(c) Five representatives from existing local main street programs
or downtown and neighborhood commercial district programs including a
combination of staff, property owners, and business owners; and
(d) One representative from the Washington trust for historic
preservation.
(2) The department shall develop a plan for the Washington main
street program, in consultation with the Washington main street
advisory committee. The plan must describe:
(a) The objectives and strategies of the Washington main street
program;
(b) How the Washington main street program will be coordinated with
existing federal, state, local, and private sector business development
and historic preservation efforts;
(c) The means by which private investment will be solicited and
employed;
(d) The methods of selecting and providing assistance to
participating local programs; and
(e) A means to solicit private contributions for state and local
operations of the Washington main street program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 The Washington main street trust fund
account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from private
contributions, federal funds, legislative appropriations, and fees for
services, if levied, must be deposited into the account. Expenditures
from the account may be used only for the operation of the Washington
main street program.

PART IV--TECHNICAL PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 Sections 101 and 301 through 305 of this
act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 Sections 201 through 206 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 Part headings used in this act are not
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 405 This act may be known and cited as the
Washington main street act.

--- END ---