BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
A credit is allowed against tax due under this chapter to employers
for the cost of the provision of mental health services pursuant to the
passage of chapter . . ., Laws of 2005 (House Bill No. 1154) to
employees. The credit is equal to the additional cost to the employer
attributable to the coverage of such services within an employer-offered health benefit plan required by chapter . . ., Laws of 2005
(House Bill No. 1154).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---