BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
providing medical services; as to such persons, the amount of tax is
equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of
0.138 percent.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "medical service" means any
service that requires the person to be licensed under chapter 18.22,
18.25, 18.57, 18.71, 18.79, 18.83, or 18.225 RCW, for the provision of
such service.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.290 and 2004 c 174 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
providing international investment management services, as to such
persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal
to the gross income or gross proceeds of sales of the business
multiplied by a rate of 0.275 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in any business
activity ((other than or in addition to those enumerated in RCW
82.04.230, 82.04.240, 82.04.250, 82.04.255, 82.04.260, 82.04.270,
82.04.298, 82.04.2905, 82.04.280, 82.04.2907, 82.04.272, 82.04.2906,
and 82.04.2908, and)) not otherwise taxable under this chapter or
subsection (1) of this section; as to such persons the amount of tax on
account of such activities shall be equal to the gross income of the
business multiplied by the rate of 1.5 percent.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section includes, among others, and
without limiting the scope hereof (whether or not title to materials
used in the performance of such business passes to another by
accession, confusion or other than by outright sale), persons engaged
in the business of rendering any type of service which does not
constitute a "sale at retail" or a "sale at wholesale." The value of
advertising, demonstration, and promotional supplies and materials
furnished to an agent by his principal or supplier to be used for
informational, educational and promotional purposes shall not be
considered a part of the agent's remuneration or commission and shall
not be subject to taxation under this section.

--- END ---