BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 34.05.360 and 1988 c 288 s 311 are each amended to
read as follows:
The order of adoption by which each rule is adopted by an agency
shall contain all of the following:
(1) The date the agency adopted the rule;
(2) A concise statement of the purpose of the rule;
(3) A reference to all rules repealed, amended, or suspended by the
rule;
(4) A reference to the specific statutory or other authority
authorizing adoption of the rule;
(5) Any findings required by any provision of law as a precondition
to adoption or effectiveness of the rule; ((and))
(6) The signature of the governor, within twenty business days of
receipt by the governor's office of the order of adoption, if the rule
qualifies as a significant legislative rule of an agency whose head or
governing body is appointed by the governor and the rule has received,
during the official comment period, public comments opposing the
substance of the rule from at least fifty affected parties, not
including any form letter or form letter type comments; and
(7) The effective date of the rule if other than that specified in
RCW 34.05.380(2).

--- END ---