BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.32A.200 and 2000 c 123 s 25 are each amended to
read as follows:
All hearings pursuant to this chapter may be conducted at any time
or place within the county of the residence of the parent and such
cases ((shall not)) may be heard in conjunction with the business of
any other division of the superior court. The public shall not be
excluded from ((hearings and only such persons who are found by the
court to have a direct interest in the case or the work of the court
shall be admitted to the proceedings)) a child in need of services
hearing unless the judge finds that excluding the public is in the best
interests of the child. The public shall not be excluded from an at-risk youth hearing. However, the court shall exclude the public if
either parent requests that the public be excluded.

--- END ---