BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Within existing resources, the department shall establish an
oversight committee to monitor, guide, and report on kinship care
recommendations and implementation activities. The committee shall:
(a) Draft a kinship care definition that is restricted to persons
related by blood, marriage, or adoption, including marriages that have
been dissolved, or for a minor defined as an "Indian child" under the
federal Indian child welfare act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.), the
definition of "extended family member" under the federal Indian child
welfare act, and a set of principles. If the committee concludes that
one or more programs or services would be more efficiently and
effectively delivered under a different definition of kin, it shall
state what definition is needed, and identify the program or service in
the report. It shall also provide evidence of how the program or
service will be more efficiently and effectively delivered under the
different definition. The department shall not adopt rules or policies
changing the definition of kin without authorizing legislation;
(b) Monitor and provide consultation on the implementation of
recommendations contained in the 2002 kinship care report, including
but not limited to the recommendations relating to legal and respite
care services and resources;
(c) Partner with nonprofit organizations and private sector
businesses to guide a public education awareness campaign;
(d) Assist with developing future recommendations on kinship care
issues; and
(e) The department shall consult with the oversight committee on
its efforts to better collaborate and coordinate services to benefit
kinship care families.
(2) The oversight committee must consist of a minimum of thirty
percent kinship caregivers, who shall represent a diversity of kinship
families. Statewide representation with geographic, ethnic, and gender
diversity is required. Other members shall include representatives of
the department, representatives of relevant state agencies,
representatives of the private nonprofit and business sectors, child
advocates, representatives of Washington state Indian tribes as defined
under the federal Indian welfare act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.), and
representatives of the legal or judicial field. Birth parents, foster
parents, and others who have an interest in these issues may also be
included.
(3) To the extent funding is available, the department may
reimburse nondepartmental members of the oversight committee for costs
incurred in participating in the meetings of the oversight committee.

--- END ---