BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that it is a public
health priority for young people to acquire the knowledge and skills
necessary to make responsible, fully informed decisions about their
sexual health. The legislature also finds that recent declines in the
rate of pregnancies and some sexually transmitted diseases can be
associated with the success of comprehensive, medically accurate, and
age-appropriate sexual health education. Despite these gains, youth in
Washington are confronted by the realities of high rates of teenage
pregnancy and sexually transmitted diseases, including HIV infection.
These preventable diseases can have lifelong consequences, including
infertility and HPV-associated cancer, and are frequently asymptomatic,
creating a silent epidemic among youth in our state. The state has a
duty to ensure that young people are equipped with the comprehensive,
medically accurate, age-appropriate information that they need to
protect themselves from unintended pregnancy and sexually transmitted
diseases, including HIV infection. The best approach to protecting
youth in this environment is to support the resources that they trust
and to ensure that young people have as much accurate, objective
information about sexual health as possible.
Young people rely upon many educational resources for obtaining
information about sexual health. The cornerstone of this education is
at home with parents and guardians. These responsibilities also extend
to schools, peers, religious organizations, and other community groups.
These entities must work together to equip young people with the sexual
health information that they will need to make responsible decisions
throughout their lives. This information must emphasize the
effectiveness of abstinence from sexual activities as well as the wide
range of other methods for preventing teenage pregnancy and sexually
transmitted diseases, including HIV infection. In addition, sexual
health instruction and materials must be age-appropriate and
appropriate for use with students of all races, genders, sexual
orientations, and ethnic and cultural backgrounds and students with
disabilities.
The standards offered by the January 2005 guidelines for sexual
health information and disease prevention of the department of health
and the office of the superintendent of public instruction are a
fundamental tool when designing sexual health education. These
guidelines will be used to inform teachers, guest speakers, and school
districts to design of evidence-based sexual health education and may
also be helpful to guide health and counseling providers, community
groups, and parents and guardians to better meet the needs of the
communities that they serve.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By September 1, 2006, every school district that offers sexual
health education must assure that sexual health education is consistent
with the January 2005 guidelines for sexual health information and
disease prevention of the department of health and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction. Every school district that
offers sexual health education must emphasize abstinence, as required
by RCW 70.24.210, except that abstinence may not be taught to the
exclusion of other methods of preventing teenage pregnancy and sexually
transmitted diseases, including HIV infection.
(2) Upon adoption of this section, sexual health education must
provide medically accurate instruction and instructional materials.
The department of health shall make available information that can
assist teachers, guest speakers, and school districts in achieving
medical accuracy.
(3) Within available resources, the superintendent of public
instruction and the department of health shall make the January 2005
guidelines for sexual health information and disease prevention and any
related model policies, curricula, or other technical assistance
resources available to teachers, health and counseling providers,
community groups, and parents and guardians.
(4) The department may adopt such rules as are necessary to
establish what constitutes a comprehensive sexual health education
curriculum, including a determination of pertinent medically accurate
information based upon empirical evidence derived from peer-reviewed
research or in reviewed government research reports.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act may be known and cited as the
healthy youth act of 2005.

--- END ---