BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.48.020 and 1981 c 203 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of arson in the first degree if, while
manufacturing or attempting to manufacture a controlled substance in
violation of the uniform controlled substances act under chapter 69.50
RCW or if he or she knowingly and maliciously:
(a) Causes a fire or explosion which is manifestly dangerous to any
human life, including ((firemen)) fire fighters; or
(b) Causes a fire or explosion which damages a dwelling; or
(c) Causes a fire or explosion in any building in which there
((shall be)) is at the time a human being who is not a participant in
the crime; or
(d) Causes a fire or explosion on property valued at ten thousand
dollars or more with intent to collect insurance proceeds.
(2) Arson in the first degree is a class A felony.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.48.030 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.48.030 are
each amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of arson in the second degree if, while
manufacturing or attempting to manufacture a controlled substance in
violation of the uniform controlled substances act under chapter 69.50
RCW or if he or she knowingly and maliciously causes a fire or
explosion which damages a building, or any structure or erection
appurtenant to or joining any building, or any wharf, dock, machine,
engine, automobile, or other motor vehicle, watercraft, aircraft,
bridge, or trestle, or hay, grain, crop, or timber, whether cut or
standing or any range land, or pasture land, or any fence, or any
lumber, shingle, or other timber products, or any property.
(2) Arson in the second degree is a class B felony.

--- END ---