BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.13 RCW
to read as follows:
Proceedings for the annexation of territory pursuant to the method
established by this section and section 2 of this act, which is
alternative to other methods provided in this chapter, must be
commenced as follows:
(1) The legislative body of a city or town planning under RCW
36.70A.040 may by a majority vote resolve to annex unincorporated
territory contiguous to the city or town. No city or town may annex
territory in accordance with the provisions of this section that is
beyond the urban growth area designated under RCW 36.70A.110 the
annexing city or town is within.
(2) The resolution must describe the boundaries of the territory
proposed for annexation and set a date for a public hearing on the
resolution.
(3) Separate public hearings shall be held by the legislative body
of the city or town proposing annexation and the legislative body of
the county that has jurisdiction over the territory proposed for
annexation. Notice of each hearing must be given by the appropriate
legislative body by publication of the resolution at least once a week
for three weeks before the date of the hearing, in one or more
newspapers of general circulation within the city or town and one or
more newspapers of general circulation within the territory to be
annexed. The notice must contain a legal description of the territory
proposed for annexation, specify the time and place of hearing, and
invite interested persons to appear and voice approval or disapproval
of the annexation. The notice must also be posted in three public
places in the territory proposed for annexation.
(4) For purposes of subsection (1) of this section, territory
bounded by a river, lake, or other body of water is contiguous to the
city or town that is also bounded by the same river, lake, or other
body of water.
(5) Following the hearings, the legislative body of the city or
town must determine by ordinance whether the territory proposed for
annexation will be annexed. Subject to RCW 35.02.170, the council may
annex the territory proposed for annexation identified in an interlocal
agreement as provided by section 2 of this act, but may not include any
property not described in the notice. Upon passage of the ordinance,
the annexed territory shall become part of the city or town upon the
date fixed in the ordinance. The annexing city or town must file a
certified copy of the ordinance with the board of county commissioners
of the county in which the annexed territory is located.
(6) Annexations pursuant to this section and section 2 of this act
are not subject to review by a boundary review board established under
chapter 36.93 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Before initiating an annexation as provided by section 1 of
this act, a city or town proposing to annex territory must enter into
an interlocal agreement as provided in chapter 39.34 RCW with the
county that has jurisdiction over the territory proposed for
annexation.
(b) The interlocal agreement must describe the boundaries of the
territory proposed for annexation and must be consistent with the
boundaries identified in the resolution required by section 1 of this
act.
(2)(a) An interlocal agreement providing for a specific annexation
that was entered into between an annexing city or town and a county
before the effective date of this section satisfies the requirements of
this section.
(b) An interlocal agreement providing general annexation terms for
all annexations by a city or town that was entered into between an
annexing city or town and a county before the effective date of this
section satisfies the requirements of this section.
(3) A supplemental interlocal agreement may be negotiated to
address issues for a specific annexation if the issues are not
sufficiently addressed in a general interlocal agreement.
(4) A general interlocal annexation agreement must include the
following:
(a) A statement of the goals of the agreement. Goals may include,
but are not limited to:
(i) Providing for long-term and short-term transition of services
and staff;
(ii) Community involvement;
(iii) Revenue sharing; and
(iv) Debt distribution.
(b) The subject areas and policies and procedures the parties agree
to undertake in annexations. Subject areas may include, but are not
limited to:
(i) Roads and traffic impact mitigation;
(ii) Surface and storm water management;
(iii) Coordination and timing of comprehensive plan and development
regulation updates;
(iv) Parks, trails, recreation, and open space;
(v) Public utilities;
(vi) Outstanding bonds and special or improvement district
assessments;
(vii) Transfer of staff, records, and equipment;
(viii) Annexation procedures;
(ix) Distribution of debt and revenue sharing for annexation
proposals, code enforcement, inspection services;
(x) Financial and administrative services; and
(xi) Consultation with other service providers, including water-sewer districts and fire protection districts, if applicable.
(c) A term of at least five years which may be extended by mutual
agreement of the city or town and the county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35A.14 RCW
to read as follows:
Proceedings for the annexation of territory pursuant to the method
established by this section and section 4 of this act, which is
alternative to other methods provided in this chapter, must be
commenced as follows:
(1) The legislative body of a code city planning under RCW
36.70A.040 may by a majority vote resolve to annex unincorporated
territory contiguous to the city. No city may annex territory in
accordance with the provisions of this section that is beyond the urban
growth area designated under RCW 36.70A.110 the annexing city is
within.
(2) The resolution must describe the boundaries of the territory
proposed for annexation and set a date for a public hearing on the
resolution.
(3) Separate public hearings shall be held by the legislative body
of the city proposing annexation and the legislative body of the county
that has jurisdiction over the territory proposed for annexation.
Notice of each hearing must be given by the appropriate legislative
body by publication of the resolution at least once a week for three
weeks before the date of the hearing, in one or more newspapers of
general circulation within the city and one or more newspapers of
general circulation within the territory to be annexed. The notice
must contain a legal description of the territory proposed for
annexation, specify the time and place of hearing, and invite
interested persons to appear and voice approval or disapproval of the
annexation. The notice must also be posted in three public places in
the territory proposed for annexation.
(4) For purposes of subsection (1) of this section, territory
bounded by a river, lake, or other body of water is contiguous to the
city that is also bounded by the same river, lake, or other body of
water.
(5) Following the hearings, the legislative body of the city must
determine by ordinance whether the territory proposed for annexation
will be annexed. Subject to RCW 35A.14.410, the council may annex the
territory proposed for annexation identified in an interlocal agreement
as provided by section 4 of this act, but may not include any property
not described in the notice. Upon passage of the ordinance, the
annexed territory shall become part of the city upon the date fixed in
the ordinance. The annexing city must file a certified copy of the
ordinance with the board of county commissioners of the county in which
the annexed territory is located.
(6) Annexations pursuant to this section and section 4 of this act
are not subject to review by a boundary review board established under
chapter 36.93 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 35A.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Before initiating an annexation as provided by section 3 of
this act, a code city proposing to annex territory must enter into an
interlocal agreement as provided in chapter 39.34 RCW with the county
that has jurisdiction over the territory proposed for annexation.
(b) The interlocal agreement must describe the boundaries of the
territory proposed for annexation and must be consistent with the
boundaries identified in the resolution required by section 3 of this
act.
(2)(a) An interlocal agreement providing for a specific annexation
that was entered into between an annexing city and a county before the
effective date of this section satisfies the requirements of this
section.
(b) An interlocal agreement providing general annexation terms for
all annexations by a city that was entered into between an annexing
city and a county before the effective date of this section satisfies
the requirements of this section.
(3) A supplemental interlocal agreement may be negotiated to
address issues for a specific annexation if the issues are not
sufficiently addressed in a general interlocal agreement.
(4) A general interlocal annexation agreement must include the
following:
(a) A statement of the goals of the agreement. Goals may include,
but are not limited to:
(i) Providing for long-term and short-term transition of services
and staff;
(ii) Community involvement;
(iii) Revenue sharing; and
(iv) Debt distribution.
(b) The subject areas and policies and procedures the parties agree
to undertake in annexations. Subject areas may include, but are not
limited to:
(i) Roads and traffic impact mitigation;
(ii) Surface and storm water management;
(iii) Coordination and timing of comprehensive plan and development
regulation updates;
(iv) Parks, trails, recreation, and open space;
(v) Public utilities;
(vi) Outstanding bonds and special or improvement district
assessments;
(vii) Transfer of staff, records, and equipment;
(viii) Annexation procedures;
(ix) Distribution of debt and revenue sharing for annexation
proposals, code enforcement, inspection services;
(x) Financial and administrative services; and
(xi) Consultation with other service providers, including water-sewer districts and fire protection districts, if applicable.
(c) A term of at least five years which may be extended by mutual
agreement of the city and the county.

Sec. 5 RCW 35.02.170 and 1989 c 84 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The right of way line of any public street, road or highway, or any
segment thereof, may be used to define a part of a corporate boundary
in an incorporation or annexation proceeding. The boundaries of a
newly incorporated city or town shall not include a portion of the
right of way of any public street, road or highway except where the
boundary runs from one edge of the right of way to the other edge of
the right of way.

--- END ---