BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.210.070 and 1990 c 33 s 191 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in RCW 28A.210.060 through 28A.210.170:
(1) "Chief administrator" shall mean the person with the authority
and responsibility for the immediate supervision of the operation of a
school or day care center as defined in this section or, in the
alternative, such other person as may hereafter be designated in
writing for the purposes of RCW 28A.210.060 through 28A.210.170 by the
statutory or corporate board of directors of the school district,
school, or day care center or, if none, such other persons or person
with the authority and responsibility for the general supervision of
the operation of the school district, school or day care center.
(2) "Full immunization" shall mean immunization against certain
vaccine-preventable diseases in accordance with schedules and with
immunizing agents approved by the state board of health, including the
presentation of proof of immunization against varicella no later than
the time of attendance of middle school or junior high school.
(3) "Local health department" shall mean the city, town, county,
district or combined city-county health department, board of health, or
health officer which provides public health services.
(4) "School" shall mean and include each building, facility, and
location at or within which any or all portions of a preschool,
kindergarten and grades one through twelve program of education and
related activities are conducted for two or more children by or in
behalf of any public school district and by or in behalf of any private
school or private institution subject to approval by the state board of
education pursuant to RCW 28A.305.130(6), 28A.195.010 through
28A.195.050, and 28A.410.120.
(5) "Day care center" shall mean an agency which regularly provides
care for a group of thirteen or more children for periods of less than
twenty-four hours and is licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW.
(6) "Child" shall mean any person, regardless of age, in attendance
at a public or private school or a licensed day care center.

--- END ---