BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.24.015 and 2001 c 334 s 6 and 2001 c 323 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to establish a community mental
health program which shall help people experiencing mental illness to
retain a respected and productive position in the community. This will
be accomplished through ((programs)) resilience and recovery-based
programs, including recognized evidence-based practices, which provide
for:
(1) Access to a package of mental health services that is
consistent across the state for adults of the state who are acutely
mentally ill, chronically mentally ill, or seriously disturbed and
children of the state who are acutely mentally ill, severely
emotionally disturbed, or seriously disturbed, which services recognize
the special needs of underserved populations, including minorities,
children, the elderly, disabled, and low-income persons. Access to
mental health services shall not be limited by a person's history of
confinement in a state, federal, or local correctional facility. It is
also the purpose of this chapter to promote the early identification of
mentally ill children and to ensure that they receive the mental health
care and treatment which is appropriate to their developmental level.
This care should improve home, school, and community functioning,
maintain children in a safe and nurturing home environment, and should
enable treatment decisions to be made in response to clinical needs in
accordance with sound professional judgment while also recognizing
parents' rights to participate in treatment decisions for their
children;
(2) The involvement of persons with mental illness, their family
members, and advocates in designing and implementing mental health
services that reduce unnecessary hospitalization and incarceration and
promote the recovery and employment of persons with mental illness. To
improve the quality of services available and promote the
rehabilitation, recovery, and reintegration of persons with mental
illness, consumer and advocate participation in mental health services
is an integral part of the community mental health system and shall be
supported;
(3) Accountability of efficient and effective services through
state of the art outcome and performance measures and statewide
standards for monitoring client and system outcomes, performance, and
reporting of client and system outcome information. These processes
shall be designed so as to maximize the use of available resources for
direct care of people with a mental illness and to assure uniform data
collection across the state;
(((3))) (4) Minimum service delivery standards;
(((4))) (5) Priorities for the use of available resources for the
care of the mentally ill consistent with the priorities defined in the
statute;
(((5))) (6) Coordination of services within the department,
including those divisions within the department that provide services
to children, between the department and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, and among state mental hospitals,
((county authorities)) regional support networks, community mental
health services, and other support services, which shall to the maximum
extent feasible also include the families of the mentally ill, and
other service providers; and
(((6))) (7) Coordination of services aimed at reducing duplication
in service delivery and promoting complementary services among all
entities that provide mental health services to adults and children.
It is the policy of the state to encourage the provision of a full
range of treatment and rehabilitation services in the state for mental
disorders including services operated by consumers and advocates. The
legislature intends to encourage the development of ((county-based and
county-managed)) regional mental health services with adequate local
flexibility to assure eligible people in need of care access to the
least-restrictive treatment alternative appropriate to their needs, and
the availability of treatment components to assure continuity of care.
To this end, ((counties are encouraged to enter into joint operating
agreements with other counties to form)) regional systems of care
((which)) will integrate planning, administration, and service delivery
duties ((assigned to counties)) under chapters 71.05 and 71.24 RCW to
consolidate administration, reduce administrative layering, and reduce
administrative costs. The legislature hereby finds and declares that
sound fiscal management requires vigilance to ensure that funds
appropriated by the legislature for the provision of needed community
mental health programs and services are ultimately expended solely for
the purpose for which they were appropriated, and not for any other
purpose.
It is further the intent of the legislature to integrate the
provision of services to provide continuity of care through all phases
of treatment. To this end the legislature intends to promote active
engagement with mentally ill persons and collaboration between families
and service providers.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.24.025 and 2001 c 323 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Acutely mentally ill" means a condition which is limited to a
short-term severe crisis episode of:
(a) A mental disorder as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in the case
of a child, as defined in RCW 71.34.020;
(b) Being gravely disabled as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in the
case of a child, a gravely disabled minor as defined in RCW 71.34.020;
or
(c) Presenting a likelihood of serious harm as defined in RCW
71.05.020 or, in the case of a child, as defined in RCW 71.34.020.
(2) "Available resources" means funds appropriated for the purpose
of providing community mental health programs ((under RCW 71.24.045)),
federal funds, except those provided according to Title XIX of the
Social Security Act, and state funds appropriated under this chapter or
chapter 71.05 RCW by the legislature during any biennium for the
purpose of providing residential services, resource management
services, community support services, and other mental health services.
This does not include funds appropriated for the purpose of operating
and administering the state psychiatric hospitals, except as negotiated
according to RCW 71.24.300(1)(((e))) (d).
(3) "Child" means a person under the age of eighteen years.
(4) "Chronically mentally ill adult" means an adult who has a
mental disorder and meets at least one of the following criteria:
(a) Has undergone two or more episodes of hospital care for a
mental disorder within the preceding two years; or
(b) Has experienced a continuous psychiatric hospitalization or
residential treatment exceeding six months' duration within the
preceding year; or
(c) Has been unable to engage in any substantial gainful activity
by reason of any mental disorder which has lasted for a continuous
period of not less than twelve months. "Substantial gainful activity"
shall be defined by the department by rule consistent with Public Law
92-603, as amended.
(5) "Community mental health program" means all mental health
services, activities, or programs using available resources.
(6) "Community mental health service delivery system" means public
or private agencies that provide services specifically to persons with
mental disorders as defined under RCW 71.05.020 and receive funding
from public sources.
(7) "Community support services" means services authorized,
planned, and coordinated through resource management services
including, at a minimum, assessment, diagnosis, emergency crisis
intervention available twenty-four hours, seven days a week,
prescreening determinations for mentally ill persons being considered
for placement in nursing homes as required by federal law, screening
for patients being considered for admission to residential services,
diagnosis and treatment for acutely mentally ill and severely
emotionally disturbed children discovered under screening through the
federal Title XIX early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and
treatment program, investigation, legal, and other nonresidential
services under chapter 71.05 RCW, case management services, psychiatric
treatment including medication supervision, counseling, psychotherapy,
assuring transfer of relevant patient information between service
providers, recovery services, and other services determined by regional
support networks.
(8) "County authority" means the board of county commissioners,
county council, or county executive having authority to establish a
community mental health program, or two or more of the county
authorities specified in this subsection which have entered into an
agreement to provide a community mental health program.
(9) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(10) "Evidence-based practices" means services for people with
severe mental illness that have demonstrated positive outcomes in
multiple research studies.
(11) "Licensed service provider" means an entity licensed according
to this chapter or chapter 71.05 RCW or an entity deemed to meet state
minimum standards as a result of accreditation by a recognized
behavioral health accrediting body recognized and having a current
agreement with the department, that meets state minimum standards or
individuals licensed under chapter 18.57, 18.71, 18.83, or 18.79 RCW,
as it applies to registered nurses and advanced registered nurse
practitioners.
(((11))) (12) "Mental health services" means all services provided
by regional support networks and other services provided by the state
for the mentally ill.
(((12))) (13) "Mentally ill persons" and "the mentally ill" mean
persons and conditions defined in subsections (1), (4), (((17))) (20),
and (((18))) (21) of this section.
(((13))) (14) "Regional support network" means a county authority
or group of county authorities or other entity recognized by the
secretary ((that enter into joint operating agreements to contract with
the secretary pursuant to this chapter)) through a department
procurement process.
(((14))) (15) "Residential services" means a complete range of
residences and supports authorized by resource management services and
which may involve a facility, a distinct part thereof, or services
which support community living, for acutely mentally ill persons,
chronically mentally ill adults, severely emotionally disturbed
children, or seriously disturbed adults determined by the regional
support network to be at risk of becoming acutely or chronically
mentally ill. The services shall include at least evaluation and
treatment services as defined in chapter 71.05 RCW, acute crisis
respite care, long-term adaptive and rehabilitative care, and
supervised and supported living services, and shall also include any
residential services developed to service mentally ill persons in
nursing homes, boarding homes, and adult family homes. Residential
services for children in out-of-home placements related to their mental
disorder shall not include the costs of food and shelter, except for
children's long-term residential facilities existing prior to January
1, 1991.
(((15))) (16) "Recovery" means the process in which people are able
to live, work, learn, and participate fully in their communities.
(17) "Resilience" means the personal and community qualities that
enable individuals to rebound from adversity, trauma, tragedy, threats,
or other stresses, and to live productive lives.
(18) "Resource management services" mean the planning,
coordination, and authorization of residential services and community
support services administered pursuant to an individual service plan
for: (a) Acutely mentally ill adults and children; (b) chronically
mentally ill adults; (c) severely emotionally disturbed children; or
(d) seriously disturbed adults determined solely by a regional support
network to be at risk of becoming acutely or chronically mentally ill.
Such planning, coordination, and authorization shall include mental
health screening for children eligible under the federal Title XIX
early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment program.
Resource management services include seven day a week, twenty-four hour
a day availability of information regarding mentally ill adults' and
children's enrollment in services and their individual service plan to
county-designated mental health professionals, evaluation and treatment
facilities, and others as determined by the regional support network.
(((16))) (19) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health
services.
(((17))) (20) "Seriously disturbed person" means a person who:
(a) Is gravely disabled or presents a likelihood of serious harm to
himself or herself or others, or to the property of others, as a result
of a mental disorder as defined in chapter 71.05 RCW;
(b) Has been on conditional release status, or under a less
restrictive alternative order, at some time during the preceding two
years from an evaluation and treatment facility or a state mental
health hospital;
(c) Has a mental disorder which causes major impairment in several
areas of daily living;
(d) Exhibits suicidal preoccupation or attempts; or
(e) Is a child diagnosed by a mental health professional, as
defined in chapter 71.34 RCW, as experiencing a mental disorder which
is clearly interfering with the child's functioning in family or school
or with peers or is clearly interfering with the child's personality
development and learning.
(((18))) (21) "Severely emotionally disturbed child" means a child
who has been determined by the regional support network to be
experiencing a mental disorder as defined in chapter 71.34 RCW,
including those mental disorders that result in a behavioral or conduct
disorder, that is clearly interfering with the child's functioning in
family or school or with peers and who meets at least one of the
following criteria:
(a) Has undergone inpatient treatment or placement outside of the
home related to a mental disorder within the last two years;
(b) Has undergone involuntary treatment under chapter 71.34 RCW
within the last two years;
(c) Is currently served by at least one of the following child-serving systems: Juvenile justice, child-protection/welfare, special
education, or developmental disabilities;
(d) Is at risk of escalating maladjustment due to:
(i) Chronic family dysfunction involving a mentally ill or
inadequate caretaker;
(ii) Changes in custodial adult;
(iii) Going to, residing in, or returning from any placement
outside of the home, for example, psychiatric hospital, short-term
inpatient, residential treatment, group or foster home, or a
correctional facility;
(iv) Subject to repeated physical abuse or neglect;
(v) Drug or alcohol abuse; or
(vi) Homelessness.
(((19))) (22) "State minimum standards" means minimum requirements
established by rules adopted by the secretary and necessary to
implement this chapter for: (a) Delivery of mental health services;
(b) licensed service providers for the provision of mental health
services; (c) residential services; and (d) community support services
and resource management services.
(((20))) (23) "Tribal authority," for the purposes of this section
and RCW 71.24.300 only, means: The federally recognized Indian tribes
and the major Indian organizations recognized by the secretary insofar
as these organizations do not have a financial relationship with any
regional support network that would present a conflict of interest.

Sec. 3 RCW 71.24.030 and 2001 c 323 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary is authorized to make grants ((to)) and/or purchase
services ((from counties or combinations of counties in the
establishment and operation of)) to establish and operate community
mental health programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 71.24 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of social and health services shall establish no
fewer than eight regional support networks under this chapter. No
entity shall be responsible for more than three regional support
networks under the procurement process established under RCW 71.24.035.

Sec. 5 RCW 71.24.035 and 2001 c 334 s 7 and 2001 c 323 s 10 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The department is designated as the state mental health
authority.
(2) The secretary shall provide for public, client, and licensed
service provider participation in developing the state mental health
program, developing contracts with regional support networks, and any
waiver request to the federal government under medicaid.
(3) The secretary shall provide for participation in developing the
state mental health program for children and other underserved
populations, by including representatives on any committee established
to provide oversight to the state mental health program.
(4) The secretary shall be designated as the ((county authority if
a county fails)) regional support network if the regional support
network fails to meet state minimum standards or refuses to exercise
responsibilities under RCW 71.24.045.
(5) The secretary shall:
(a) Develop a biennial state mental health program that
incorporates ((county)) regional biennial needs assessments and
((county)) regional mental health service plans and state services for
mentally ill adults and children. The secretary ((may)) shall also
develop a six-year state mental health plan;
(b) Assure that any regional ((or county)) community mental health
program provides access to treatment for the ((county's)) region's
residents in the following order of priority: (i) The acutely mentally
ill; (ii) chronically mentally ill adults and severely emotionally
disturbed children; and (iii) the seriously disturbed. Such programs
shall provide:
(A) Outpatient services;
(B) Emergency care services for twenty-four hours per day;
(C) ((Day treatment for mentally ill persons which includes
training in basic living and social skills, supported work, vocational
rehabilitation, and day activities. Such services may include
therapeutic treatment. In the case of a child, day treatment includes
age-appropriate basic living and social skills, educational and
prevocational services, day activities, and therapeutic treatment))
Intensive rehabilitative day support services that provide a range of
integrated and varied life skills training which may include health,
hygiene, nutritional issues, money management, maintaining living
arrangements, and symptom management, to promote improved functioning
or a restoration to a previous higher level of functioning. In the
case of a child, day supports include age-appropriate basic living and
social skills, educational and prevocational services, day activities,
and therapeutic treatment including school-based programming;
(D) Screening for patients being considered for admission to state
mental health facilities to determine the appropriateness of admission;
(E) Employment services, which may include supported employment,
transitional work, placement in competitive employment, and other work-related services, that result in mentally ill persons becoming engaged
in meaningful and gainful full or part-time work((. Other sources of
funding such as the division of vocational rehabilitation may be
utilized by the secretary to maximize federal funding and provide for
integration of services));
(F) Consultation and education services; and
(G) Community support services;
(c) Develop and adopt rules establishing state minimum standards
for the delivery of mental health services pursuant to RCW 71.24.037
including, but not limited to:
(i) Licensed service providers. These rules shall permit a county-operated mental health program to be licensed as a service provider
subject to compliance with applicable statutes and rules. The
secretary shall provide for deeming of compliance with state minimum
standards for those entities accredited by recognized behavioral health
accrediting bodies recognized and having a current agreement with the
department;
(ii) Regional support networks; and
(iii) Inpatient services, evaluation and treatment services and
facilities under chapter 71.05 RCW, resource management services, and
community support services;
(d) Assure that the special needs of minorities, the elderly,
disabled, children, and low-income persons are met within the
priorities established in this section;
(e) Establish a standard contract or contracts, using a standard
procurement process consistent with state minimum standards, which
shall be used in contracting with regional support networks ((or
counties)). The standard contract shall include a maximum fund
balance, which shall ((not exceed ten percent)) be consistent with that
required by federal regulations or waiver stipulations.
(i) The standardized procurement process shall encourage the
preservation of infrastructure previously purchased by the community
mental service delivery system, the maintenance of linkages between
other services and delivery systems, and maximization of the use of
available funds for services versus profits. County, provider, and
consumer/advocate-based organizations should be given the opportunity
to compete. The procurement shall provide that public funds shall not
be used to promote or deter, encourage, or discourage employees from
exercising their rights under section 7 of the federal labor relations
act.
(ii) The secretary shall seek input from stakeholders in the
development of the procurement;
(f) Ensure a regional support network shall not exceed an
administrative cost of ten percent of available funds;
(g) Ensure that contracts between an entity serving as a regional
support network and a subcontractor are subject to approval by the
department;
(h) Establish, to the extent possible, a standardized auditing
procedure which minimizes paperwork requirements of ((county
authorities)) regional support networks and licensed service providers.
The audit procedure shall focus on the outcomes of service and not the
processes for accomplishing them;
(((g))) (i) Develop and maintain an information system to be used
by the state((, counties,)) and regional support networks that includes
a tracking method which allows the department and regional support
networks to identify mental health clients' participation in any mental
health service or public program on an immediate basis. The
information system shall not include individual patient's case history
files. Confidentiality of client information and records shall be
maintained as provided in this chapter and in RCW 71.05.390, 71.05.400,
71.05.410, 71.05.420, 71.05.430, and 71.05.440((. The design of the
system and the data elements to be collected shall be reviewed by the
work group appointed by the secretary under section 5(1) of this act
and representing the department, regional support networks, service
providers, consumers, and advocates. The data elements shall be
designed to provide information that is needed to measure performance
and achieve the service outcomes identified in section 5 of this act));
(((h))) (j) License service providers who meet state minimum
standards;
(((i))) (k) Certify regional support networks that meet state
minimum standards;
(((j))) (l) Periodically monitor the compliance of certified
regional support networks and their network of licensed service
providers for compliance with the contract between the department, the
regional support network, and federal and state rules at reasonable
times and in a reasonable manner;
(((k))) (m) Fix fees to be paid by evaluation and treatment centers
to the secretary for the required inspections;
(((l))) (n) Monitor and audit ((counties,)) regional support
networks((,)) and licensed service providers as needed to assure
compliance with contractual agreements authorized by this chapter;
((and
(m))) (o) Adopt such rules as are necessary to implement the
department's responsibilities under this chapter; and
(p) Assure the availability of an appropriate, as determined by the
legislature in the operating budget by amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose, amount of community-based, geographically distributed
residential services.
(6) The secretary shall use available resources only for ((regional
support networks)) the community mental health service delivery system,
consistent with the priorities for both client populations and the
services to be provided as defined in this chapter.
(7) Each certified regional support network and licensed service
provider shall file with the secretary, on request, such data,
statistics, schedules, and information as the secretary reasonably
requires. A certified regional support network or licensed service
provider which, without good cause, fails to furnish any data,
statistics, schedules, or information as requested, or files fraudulent
reports thereof, may have its certification or license revoked or
suspended.
(8) The secretary may suspend, revoke, limit, or restrict a
certification or license, or refuse to grant a certification or license
for failure to conform to: (a) The law; (b) applicable rules and
regulations; (c) applicable standards; or (d) state minimum standards.
(9) The superior court may restrain any regional support network or
service provider from operating without certification or a license or
any other violation of this section. The court may also review,
pursuant to procedures contained in chapter 34.05 RCW, any denial,
suspension, limitation, restriction, or revocation of certification or
license, and grant other relief required to enforce the provisions of
this chapter.
(10) Upon petition by the secretary, and after hearing held upon
reasonable notice to the facility, the superior court may issue a
warrant to an officer or employee of the secretary authorizing him or
her to enter at reasonable times, and examine the records, books, and
accounts of any regional support network or service provider refusing
to consent to inspection or examination by the authority.
(11) Notwithstanding the existence or pursuit of any other remedy,
the secretary may file an action for an injunction or other process
against any person or governmental unit to restrain or prevent the
establishment, conduct, or operation of a regional support network or
service provider without certification or a license under this chapter.
(12) The standards for certification of evaluation and treatment
facilities shall include standards relating to maintenance of good
physical and mental health and other services to be afforded persons
pursuant to this chapter and chapters 71.05 and 71.34 RCW, and shall
otherwise assure the effectuation of the purposes of these chapters.
(13)(a) The department, in consultation with affected parties,
shall establish a distribution formula that reflects ((county))
regional needs assessments based on the number of persons who are
acutely mentally ill, chronically mentally ill, severely emotionally
disturbed children, and seriously disturbed. The formula shall take
into consideration the impact on ((counties)) regions of demographic
factors ((in counties)) which result in concentrations of priority
populations as set forth in subsection (5)(b) of this section. These
factors shall include the population concentrations resulting from
commitments under chapters 71.05 and 71.34 RCW to state psychiatric
hospitals, as well as concentration in urban areas, at border crossings
at state boundaries, and other significant demographic and workload
factors.
(b) The formula shall also include a projection of the funding
allocations that will result for each ((county)) region, which
specifies allocations according to priority populations, including the
allocation for services to children and other underserved populations.
(c) After July 1, 2003, the department may allocate up to two
percent of total funds to be distributed to the regional support
networks for incentive payments to reward the achievement of superior
outcomes, or significantly improved outcomes, as measured by a
statewide performance measurement system consistent with the framework
recommended in the joint legislative audit and review committee's
performance audit of the mental health system. The department shall
annually report to the legislature on its criteria and allocation of
the incentives provided under this subsection.
(14) The secretary shall assume all duties assigned to ((the
nonparticipating counties)) regional support networks under chapters
71.05, 71.34, and 71.24 RCW((. Such responsibilities shall include
those which would have been assigned to the nonparticipating counties
under)) in regions where there are not participating regional support
networks.
The regional support networks, or the secretary's assumption of all
responsibilities under chapters 71.05, 71.34, and 71.24 RCW, shall be
included in all state and federal plans affecting the state mental
health program including at least those required by this chapter, the
medicaid program, and P.L. 99-660. Nothing in these plans shall be
inconsistent with the intent and requirements of this chapter.
(15) The secretary shall:
(a) Disburse funds for the regional support networks within sixty
days of approval of the biennial contract. The department must either
approve or reject the biennial contract within sixty days of receipt.
(b) Enter into biennial contracts with regional support networks.
The contracts shall be consistent with available resources. No
contract shall be approved that does not include progress toward
meeting the goals of this chapter by taking responsibility for: (i)
Short-term commitments; (ii) residential care; and (iii) emergency
response systems.
(c) ((Allocate one hundred percent of available resources to the
regional support networks in accordance with subsection (13) of this
section. Incentive payments authorized under subsection (13) of this
section may be allocated separately from other available resources.
(d))) Notify regional support networks of their allocation of
available resources at least sixty days prior to the start of a new
biennial contract period.
(((e))) (d) Deny funding allocations to regional support networks
based solely upon formal findings of noncompliance with the terms of
the regional support network's contract with the department. Written
notice and at least thirty days for corrective action must precede any
such action. In such cases, regional support networks shall have full
rights to appeal under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(16) The department, in cooperation with the state congressional
delegation, shall actively seek waivers of federal requirements and
such modifications of federal regulations as are necessary to allow
federal medicaid reimbursement for services provided by free-standing
evaluation and treatment facilities certified under chapter 71.05 RCW.
The department shall periodically report its efforts to the appropriate
committees of the senate and the house of representatives.

Sec. 6 RCW 71.24.045 and 2001 c 323 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((county authority)) regional support network shall:
(1) Contract as needed with licensed service providers. The
((county authority)) regional support network may, in the absence of a
licensed service provider entity, become a licensed service provider
entity pursuant to minimum standards required for licensing by the
department for the purpose of providing services not available from
licensed service providers;
(2) Operate as a licensed service provider if it deems that doing
so is more efficient and cost effective than contracting for services.
When doing so, the ((county authority)) regional support network shall
comply with rules promulgated by the secretary that shall provide
measurements to determine when a ((county)) regional support network
provided service is more efficient and cost effective;
(3) Monitor and perform biennial fiscal audits of licensed service
providers who have contracted with the ((county)) regional support
network to provide services required by this chapter. The monitoring
and audits shall be performed by means of a formal process which
insures that the licensed service providers and professionals
designated in this subsection meet the terms of their contracts;
(4) Assure that the special needs of minorities, the elderly,
disabled, children, and low-income persons are met within the
priorities established in this chapter;
(5) Maintain patient tracking information in a central location as
required for resource management services and the department's
information system;
(6) ((Use not more than two percent of state-appropriated community
mental health funds, which shall not include federal funds, to
administer community mental health programs under RCW 71.24.155:
PROVIDED, That county authorities serving a county or combination of
counties whose population is one hundred twenty-five thousand or more
may be entitled to sufficient state-appropriated community mental
health funds to employ up to one full-time employee or the equivalent
thereof in addition to the two percent limit established in this
subsection when such employee is providing staff services to a county
mental health advisory board;
(7))) Coordinate services for individuals who have received
services through the community mental health system and who become
patients at a state mental hospital.

Sec. 7 RCW 71.24.100 and 1982 c 204 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
A county authority or a group of county authorities may enter into
a joint operating agreement to form a regional support network. Any
agreement between two or more county authorities for the establishment
of a ((community mental health program)) regional support network shall
provide:
(1) That each county shall bear a share of the cost of mental
health services; and
(2) That the treasurer of one participating county shall be the
custodian of funds made available for the purposes of such mental
health services, and that the treasurer may make payments from such
funds upon audit by the appropriate auditing officer of the county for
which he is treasurer.

Sec. 8 RCW 71.24.240 and 1982 c 204 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
In order to establish eligibility for funding under this chapter,
any ((county or counties)) regional support network seeking to obtain
federal funds for the support of any aspect of a community mental
health program as defined in this chapter shall submit program plans to
the secretary for prior review and approval before such plans are
submitted to any federal agency.

Sec. 9 RCW 71.24.300 and 2001 c 323 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
((A county authority or a group of county authorities whose
combined population is no less than forty thousand may enter into a
joint operating agreement to form a regional support network.)) Upon
the request of a tribal authority or authorities within a regional
support network the joint operating agreement or the county authority
shall allow for the inclusion of the tribal authority to be represented
as a party to the regional support network. The roles and
responsibilities of the county and tribal authorities shall be
determined by the terms of that agreement including a determination of
membership on the governing board and advisory committees, the number
of tribal representatives to be party to the agreement, and the
provisions of law and shall assure the provision of culturally
competent services to the tribes served. The state mental health
authority may not determine the roles and responsibilities of county
authorities as to each other under regional support networks by rule,
except to assure that all duties required of regional support networks
are assigned and that counties and the regional support network do not
duplicate functions and that a single authority has final
responsibility for all available resources and performance under the
regional support network's contract with the secretary. If a regional
support network is a private entity, the department shall allow for the
inclusion of the tribal authority to be represented as a party to the
regional support network. The roles and responsibilities of the
private entity and the tribal authorities shall be determined by the
department, through negotiation with the tribal authority.
(1) Regional support networks shall submit an overall six-year
operating and capital plan, timeline, and budget and submit progress
reports and an updated two-year plan biennially thereafter, to assume
within available resources all of the following duties:
(a) Administer and provide for the availability of all resource
management services, residential services, and community support
services.
(b) ((Assume the powers and duties of county authorities within its
area as described in RCW 71.24.045 (1) through (7).
(c))) Administer and provide for the availability of all
investigation, transportation, court-related, and other services
provided by the state or counties pursuant to chapter 71.05 RCW.
(((d))) (c) Provide within the boundaries of each regional support
network evaluation and treatment services for at least eighty-five
percent of persons detained or committed for periods up to seventeen
days according to chapter 71.05 RCW. Regional support networks with
populations of less than one hundred fifty thousand may contract to
purchase evaluation and treatment services from other networks.
Insofar as the original intent of serving persons in the community is
maintained, the secretary is authorized to approve exceptions on a
case-by-case basis to the requirement to provide evaluation and
treatment services within the boundaries of each regional support
network. Such exceptions are limited to contracts with neighboring or
contiguous regions.
(((e))) (d) Administer a portion of funds appropriated by the
legislature to house mentally ill persons in state institutions from
counties within the boundaries of any regional support network, with
the exception of persons currently confined at, or under the
supervision of, a state mental hospital pursuant to chapter 10.77 RCW,
and provide for the care of all persons needing evaluation and
treatment services for periods up to seventeen days according to
chapter 71.05 RCW in appropriate residential services, which may
include state institutions. The regional support networks shall
reimburse the state for use of state institutions at a rate equal to
that assumed by the legislature when appropriating funds for such care
at state institutions during the biennium when reimbursement occurs.
The secretary shall submit a report to the appropriate committees of
the senate and house of representatives on the efforts to implement
this section by October 1, 2002. The duty of a state hospital to
accept persons for evaluation and treatment under chapter 71.05 RCW is
limited by the responsibilities assigned to regional support networks
under this section.
(((f))) (e) Administer and provide for the availability of all
other mental health services, which shall include patient counseling,
((day treatment)) intensive rehabilitative day support, consultation,
education services, employment services as defined in RCW 71.24.035,
and mental health services to children ((as provided in this chapter
designed to achieve the outcomes specified in section 5 of this act)).
(((g))) (f) Establish standards and procedures for reviewing
individual service plans and determining when that person may be
discharged from resource management services.
(2) ((Regional support networks shall assume all duties assigned to
county authorities by this chapter and chapter 71.05 RCW.
(3))) A regional support network may request that any state-owned
land, building, facility, or other capital asset which was ever
purchased, deeded, given, or placed in trust for the care of the
mentally ill and which is within the boundaries of a regional support
network be made available to support the operations of the regional
support network. State agencies managing such capital assets shall
give first priority to requests for their use pursuant to this chapter.
(((4))) (3) Each regional support network shall appoint a mental
health advisory board which shall review and provide comments on plans
and policies developed under this chapter, provide local oversight
regarding the activities of the regional support network, and work with
the regional support network to resolve significant concerns regarding
service delivery and outcomes. The department shall establish
statewide procedures for the operation of regional advisory committees
including mechanisms for advisory board feedback to the department
regarding regional support network performance. The composition of the
board shall be ((broadly representative of the demographic character of
the region and the mentally ill persons served therein. Length of
terms of board members shall be determined by the regional support
network)) established by the department and shall include, but not be
limited to, representatives of consumers and families, county elected
officials, and law enforcement.
(((5))) (4) Regional support networks shall assume all duties
specified in their plans and joint operating agreements through
biennial contractual agreements with the secretary.
(((6) Counties or groups of counties participating in a regional
support network are not subject to RCW 71.24.045(6).
(7))) (5) Regional support networks may receive technical
assistance from the housing trust fund and may identify and submit
projects for housing and housing support services to the housing trust
fund established under chapter 43.185 RCW. Projects identified or
submitted under this subsection must be fully integrated with the
regional support network six-year operating and capital plan, timeline,
and budget required by subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 10 RCW 71.24.420 and 2001 c 323 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall operate the community mental health service
delivery system authorized under this chapter within the following
constraints:
(1) The full amount of federal funds for mental health services,
plus qualifying state expenditures as appropriated in the biennial
operating budget, shall be appropriated to the department each year in
the biennial appropriations act to carry out the provisions of the
community mental health service delivery system authorized in this
chapter.
(2) ((The department may expend funds defined in subsection (1) of
this section in any manner that will effectively accomplish the outcome
measures defined in section 5 of this act.
(3) The department shall implement strategies that accomplish the
outcome measures identified in section 5 of this act that are within
the funding constraints in this section.
(4))) The department shall monitor expenditures against the
appropriation levels provided for in subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 71.24 RCW
to read as follows:
In the event the legislature appropriates funds to serve the
nonmedicaid population, the legislature shall specify in the omnibus
operating appropriations act the amount of state general fund moneys
that shall be used for the priority populations as defined in RCW
71.24.035(5)(b) and the services that shall be available through the
community mental health service delivery system to serve them.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt rules and policies providing that
when persons with a mental disorder, who were enrolled in medical
assistance immediately prior to confinement, are released from
confinement, their medical assistance coverage will be fully reinstated
on the day of their release, subject to any expedited review of their
continued eligibility for medical assistance coverage that is required
under federal or state law.
(2) The department, in collaboration with the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs and regional support
networks, shall establish procedures for coordination between
department field offices and local jails that result in prompt
reinstatement of eligibility and speedy eligibility determinations for
persons who are likely to be eligible for medical assistance or medical
care services while confined or upon release from confinement.
Procedures developed under this subsection must address:
(a) Mechanisms for receiving medical assistance or medical care
services applications on behalf of confined persons in anticipation of
their release from confinement;
(b) Expeditious review of applications filed by or on behalf of
confined persons and, to the extent practicable, completion of the
review before the person is released;
(c) Mechanisms for providing medical assistance or medical care
services identity cards to persons eligible for medical assistance or
medical care services immediately upon their release from confinement;
and
(d) Coordination with the federal social security administration,
through interagency agreements or otherwise, to expedite processing of
applications for federal supplemental security income or social
security disability benefits.
(3) In determining disability or incapacity status for medical
assistance or medical care services eligibility, the department shall
accept disability or incapacity evaluations by a physician or other
health professional permitted under federal or state law that are
completed while the person is still confined.
(4) For purposes of this section, "confined" or "confinement" means
incarcerated in a correctional institution, as defined in RCW 9.94.049,
or admitted to an institute for mental disease, as defined in 42 C.F.R.
part 435, Sec. 1009 on the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) A joint legislative and executive task
force on mental health services delivery and financing is created. The
joint task force shall consist of eight members, as follows: The
secretary of the department of social and health services or his or her
designee; the president of the Washington state association of counties
or his or her designee; a representative from the governor's office;
two members of the senate appointed by the president of the senate, one
of whom shall be a member of the majority caucus and one of whom shall
be a member of the minority caucus; two members of the house of
representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives, one of whom shall be a member of the majority caucus
and one of whom shall be a member of the minority caucus; and the chair
of the joint legislative audit and review committee or his or her
designee. Staff support for the joint task force shall be provided by
the office of financial management, the house of representatives office
of program research, and senate committee services.
(2) The joint task force may create advisory committees to assist
the joint task force in its work.
(3) Joint task force members may be reimbursed for travel expenses
as authorized under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 and chapter 44.04 RCW,
as appropriate. Advisory committee members, if appointed, shall not
receive compensation or reimbursement for travel or expenses.
(4) The joint task force shall oversee and make recommendations
related to:
(a) The reorganization of the mental health administrative
structure within the department of social and health services;
(b) The standard procurement process established by section 4 of
this act, including a preprocurement request for information to
identify organizations qualified to be designated a regional support
network;
(c) The establishment of regional support networks through the
standard procurement process;
(d) Serving the needs of nonmedicaid consumers for the priority
populations under chapter 71.24 RCW; and
(e) The types, numbers, and locations of inpatient psychiatric
hospital and community residential beds needed to serve persons with a
mental illness.
(5) The joint task force shall report its initial findings and
recommendations to the governor and appropriate committees of the
legislature by January 1, 2006, and its final findings and
recommendations by June 30, 2007.
(6) This section expires June 30, 2007.

Sec. 14 RCW 71.05.020 and 2000 c 94 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Admission" or "admit" means a decision by a physician that a
person should be examined or treated as a patient in a hospital;
(2) "Antipsychotic medications" means that class of drugs primarily
used to treat serious manifestations of mental illness associated with
thought disorders, which includes, but is not limited to atypical
antipsychotic medications;
(3) "Attending staff" means any person on the staff of a public or
private agency having responsibility for the care and treatment of a
patient;
(4) "Commitment" means the determination by a court that a person
should be detained for a period of either evaluation or treatment, or
both, in an inpatient or a less restrictive setting;
(5) "Conditional release" means a revocable modification of a
commitment, which may be revoked upon violation of any of its terms;
(6) (("County designated mental health professional" means a mental
health professional appointed by the county to perform the duties
specified in this chapter;
(7))) "Custody" means involuntary detention under the provisions of
this chapter or chapter 10.77 RCW, uninterrupted by any period of
unconditional release from commitment from a facility providing
involuntary care and treatment;
(((8))) (7) "Department" means the department of social and health
services;
(8) "Designated mental health professional" means a mental health
professional certified by the department per rules adopted by the
secretary and employed by or contracted with a regional support network
established under chapter 71.24 RCW;
(9) "Detention" or "detain" means the lawful confinement of a
person, under the provisions of this chapter;
(10) "Developmental disabilities professional" means a person who
has specialized training and three years of experience in directly
treating or working with persons with developmental disabilities and is
a psychiatrist, psychologist, or social worker, and such other
developmental disabilities professionals as may be defined by rules
adopted by the secretary;
(11) "Developmental disability" means that condition defined in RCW
71A.10.020(3);
(12) "Discharge" means the termination of hospital medical
authority. The commitment may remain in place, be terminated, or be
amended by court order;
(13) "Evaluation and treatment facility" means any facility which
can provide directly, or by direct arrangement with other public or
private agencies, emergency evaluation and treatment, outpatient care,
and timely and appropriate inpatient care to persons suffering from a
mental disorder, and which is certified as such by the department. A
physically separate and separately operated portion of a state hospital
may be designated as an evaluation and treatment facility. A facility
which is part of, or operated by, the department or any federal agency
will not require certification. No correctional institution or
facility, or jail, shall be an evaluation and treatment facility within
the meaning of this chapter;
(14) "Gravely disabled" means a condition in which a person, as a
result of a mental disorder: (a) Is in danger of serious physical harm
resulting from a failure to provide for his or her essential human
needs of health or safety; or (b) manifests severe deterioration in
routine functioning evidenced by repeated and escalating loss of
cognitive or volitional control over his or her actions and is not
receiving such care as is essential for his or her health or safety;
(15) "Habilitative services" means those services provided by
program personnel to assist persons in acquiring and maintaining life
skills and in raising their levels of physical, mental, social, and
vocational functioning. Habilitative services include education,
training for employment, and therapy. The habilitative process shall
be undertaken with recognition of the risk to the public safety
presented by the individual being assisted as manifested by prior
charged criminal conduct;
(16) "History of one or more violent acts" refers to the period of
time ten years prior to the filing of a petition under this chapter,
excluding any time spent, but not any violent acts committed, in a
mental health facility or in confinement as a result of a criminal
conviction;
(17) "Individualized service plan" means a plan prepared by a
developmental disabilities professional with other professionals as a
team, for an individual with developmental disabilities, which shall
state:
(a) The nature of the person's specific problems, prior charged
criminal behavior, and habilitation needs;
(b) The conditions and strategies necessary to achieve the purposes
of habilitation;
(c) The intermediate and long-range goals of the habilitation
program, with a projected timetable for the attainment;
(d) The rationale for using this plan of habilitation to achieve
those intermediate and long-range goals;
(e) The staff responsible for carrying out the plan;
(f) Where relevant in light of past criminal behavior and due
consideration for public safety, the criteria for proposed movement to
less-restrictive settings, criteria for proposed eventual discharge or
release, and a projected possible date for discharge or release; and
(g) The type of residence immediately anticipated for the person
and possible future types of residences;
(18) "Judicial commitment" means a commitment by a court pursuant
to the provisions of this chapter;
(19) "Likelihood of serious harm" means:
(a) A substantial risk that: (i) Physical harm will be inflicted
by an individual upon his or her own person, as evidenced by threats or
attempts to commit suicide or inflict physical harm on oneself; (ii)
physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon another, as
evidenced by behavior which has caused such harm or which places
another person or persons in reasonable fear of sustaining such harm;
or (iii) physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon the
property of others, as evidenced by behavior which has caused
substantial loss or damage to the property of others; or
(b) The individual has threatened the physical safety of another
and has a history of one or more violent acts;
(20) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional
impairment which has substantial adverse effects on an individual's
cognitive or volitional functions;
(21) "Mental health professional" means a psychiatrist,
psychologist, psychiatric nurse, or social worker, and such other
mental health professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the
secretary pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;
(22) "Peace officer" means a law enforcement official of a public
agency or governmental unit, and includes persons specifically given
peace officer powers by any state law, local ordinance, or judicial
order of appointment;
(23) "Private agency" means any person, partnership, corporation,
or association that is not a public agency, whether or not financed in
whole or in part by public funds, which constitutes an evaluation and
treatment facility or private institution, hospital, or sanitarium,
which is conducted for, or includes a department or ward conducted for,
the care and treatment of persons who are mentally ill;
(24) "Professional person" means a mental health professional and
shall also mean a physician, registered nurse, and such others as may
be defined by rules adopted by the secretary pursuant to the provisions
of this chapter;
(25) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician
and surgeon in this state who has in addition completed three years of
graduate training in psychiatry in a program approved by the American
medical association or the American osteopathic association and is
certified or eligible to be certified by the American board of
psychiatry and neurology;
(26) "Psychologist" means a person who has been licensed as a
psychologist pursuant to chapter 18.83 RCW;
(27) "Public agency" means any evaluation and treatment facility or
institution, hospital, or sanitarium which is conducted for, or
includes a department or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of
persons who are mentally ill((;[,])), if the agency is operated
directly by, federal, state, county, or municipal government, or a
combination of such governments;
(28) "Release" means legal termination of the commitment under the
provisions of this chapter;
(29) "Resource management services" has the meaning given in
chapter 71.24 RCW;
(30) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social
and health services, or his or her designee;
(31) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or further
advanced degree from an accredited school of social work or a degree
deemed equivalent under rules adopted by the secretary;
(32) "Violent act" means behavior that resulted in homicide,
attempted suicide, nonfatal injuries, or substantial damage to
property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 (1) The department of social and health
services shall enter into an annual contract with regional support
networks for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2006. The department
shall issue a request for proposal to establish new regional support
networks under RCW 71.24.035 to be effective July 1, 2006.
(2) This section expires June 30, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 The code reviser shall replace all
references to "county designated mental health professional" with
"designated mental health professional" in the Revised Code of
Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 This act does not affect any existing right
acquired or liability or obligation incurred under the sections amended
or repealed in this act or under any rule or order adopted under those
sections, nor does it affect any proceeding instituted under those
sections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---