BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
machinery and equipment used directly in generating electricity from
new gas turbine electrical generation facilities, but only if the
purchaser provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form
and manner prescribed by the department. The seller shall retain a
copy of the certificate for the seller's files.
(2) For purposes of this section and section 2 of this act:
(a) "Gas turbine electrical generation facility" and "new gas
turbine electrical generation facility" have the same meanings as
provided in RCW 82.45.032.
(b) "Machinery and equipment" means industrial fixtures, devices,
and support facilities that are integral and necessary to the
generation of electricity.
(c) "Machinery and equipment" does not include: (i) Hand-powered
tools; (ii) property with a useful life of less than one year; (iii)
repair parts required to restore machinery and equipment to normal
working order; (iv) replacement parts that do not increase
productivity, improve efficiency, or extend the useful life of
machinery and equipment; (v) buildings; or (vi) building fixtures that
are not integral and necessary to the generation of electricity that
are permanently affixed to and become a physical part of a building.
(d) Machinery and equipment is "used directly" in generating
electricity if it is part of the process that converts any type of
nonelectrical energy into electricity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of machinery and equipment used directly in generating electricity
from new gas turbine electrical generation facilities.
(2) The definitions in section 1 of this act apply to this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.45.032 and 2001 c 282 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Real estate" or "real property" means any interest, estate, or
beneficial interest in land or anything affixed to land, including the
ownership interest or beneficial interest in any entity which itself
owns land or anything affixed to land. The term includes used mobile
homes, used park model trailers, used floating homes, and improvements
constructed upon leased land.
(2) "Used mobile home" means a mobile home which has been
previously sold at retail and has been subjected to tax under chapter
82.08 RCW, or which has been previously used and has been subjected to
tax under chapter 82.12 RCW, and which has substantially lost its
identity as a mobile unit at the time of sale by virtue of its being
fixed in location upon land owned or leased by the owner of the mobile
home and placed on a foundation (posts or blocks) with fixed pipe
connections with sewer, water, and other utilities.
(3) "Mobile home" means a mobile home as defined by RCW 46.04.302,
as now or hereafter amended.
(4) "Park model trailer" means a park model trailer as defined in
RCW 46.04.622.
(5) "Used floating home" means a floating home in respect to which
tax has been paid under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW.
(6) "Used park model trailer" means a park model trailer that has
been previously sold at retail and has been subjected to tax under
chapter 82.08 RCW, or that has been previously used and has been
subjected to tax under chapter 82.12 RCW, and that has substantially
lost its identity as a mobile unit by virtue of its being permanently
sited in location and placed on a foundation of either posts or blocks
with connections with sewer, water, or other utilities for the
operation of installed fixtures and appliances.
(7) "Floating home" means a building on a float used in whole or in
part for human habitation as a single-family dwelling, which is not
designed for self propulsion by mechanical means or for propulsion by
means of wind, and which is on the property tax rolls of the county in
which it is located.
(8) "Gas turbine electrical generation facility" means all
buildings, machinery, equipment, and other real property which is used
primarily for generating electricity, the land upon which the property
is located, or the land that is reasonably necessary in the generation
of the electricity, if the electricity is generated or is to be
generated using a single cycle or combined cycle gas combustion turbine
fueled by natural or manufactured gas.
(9) "New gas turbine electrical generation facility" means a gas
turbine electrical generation facility that does not exist before the
effective date of this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.45.060 and 2000 c 103 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is imposed an excise tax upon each sale of real property
at the rate of one and twenty-eight one-hundredths percent of the
selling price. An amount equal to seven and seven-tenths percent of
the proceeds of this tax to the state treasurer shall be deposited in
the public works assistance account created in RCW 43.155.050.
(2) There is imposed an additional excise tax upon each sale of
real property that is a new gas turbine electrical generation facility
that received site certification under chapter 80.50 RCW before July 1,
2005. The rate of tax imposed under this subsection is twenty-five
one-hundredths percent of the selling price.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any state or federal court invalidates
any portion of this act, this act is null and void in its entirety.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect January 1, 2006.

--- END ---