BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.14.070 and 1992 c 143 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon receipt of the petition alleging a prima facie case of
harassment, other than a petition alleging a sex offense as defined in
chapter 9A.44 RCW, the court shall order a hearing which shall be held
not later than fourteen days from the date of the order. If the
petition alleges a sex offense as defined in chapter 9A.44 RCW, the
court shall order a hearing which shall be held not later than fourteen
days from the date of the order. Except as provided in RCW 10.14.085,
personal service shall be made upon the respondent not less than five
court days before the hearing. If timely personal service cannot be
made, the court shall set a new hearing date and shall either require
additional attempts at obtaining personal service or permit service by
publication as provided by RCW 10.14.085. If the court permits service
by publication, the court shall set the hearing date not later than
twenty-four days from the date of the order. The court may issue an ex
parte order for protection pending the hearing as provided in RCW
10.14.080 and 10.14.085.

--- END ---