BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.14.150 and 1999 c 170 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The district courts shall have jurisdiction and cognizance of
any civil actions and proceedings brought under this chapter, except
the district court shall transfer such actions and proceedings to the
superior court when it is shown that the respondent to the petition is
under eighteen years of age.
(2) Municipal courts may exercise jurisdiction and cognizance of
any civil actions and proceedings brought under this chapter by
adoption of local court rule, except the municipal court shall transfer
such actions and proceedings to the superior court when it is shown
that the respondent to the petition is under eighteen years of age.
(3) Superior courts shall have concurrent jurisdiction to receive
transfer of antiharassment petitions in cases where a district or
municipal court judge makes findings of fact and conclusions of law
showing that meritorious reasons exist for the transfer. The municipal
and district courts shall have jurisdiction and cognizance of any
criminal actions brought under RCW 10.14.120 and 10.14.170.

Sec. 2 RCW 10.14.160 and 1992 c 127 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter an action may be brought in:
(1) The judicial district of the county in which the alleged acts
of unlawful harassment occurred;
(2) The judicial district of the county where any respondent
resides at the time the petition is filed; ((or))
(3) The judicial district of the county where a respondent may be
served if it is the same county or judicial district where a respondent
resides;
(4) The municipality in which the alleged acts of unlawful
harassment occurred;
(5) The municipality where any respondent resides at the time the
petition is filed; or
(6) The municipality where a respondent may be served if it is the
same county or judicial district where a respondent resides.

--- END ---