BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.34 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislative buildings committee is created. The committee
consists of five members as follows: The governor or the governor's
designee; two members of the house of representatives, one from each
major caucus, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;
and two members of the senate, one from each major caucus, appointed by
the president of the senate.
(2) The committee may appoint ex officio members at its discretion
to assist the committee with historical, accessibility, structural, or
architectural considerations related to interiors of the buildings
under its control, or, subject to funding in the omnibus appropriations
act, the committee may contract for such services. The committee may
also be advised by the state capitol committee, the capitol campus
design advisory committee, and the department of general
administration, and may appoint additional advisory committees as
needed.
(3) Staffing for the committee shall be provided by the house of
representatives office of program research and senate committee
services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.34 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislative buildings committee has sole responsibility
for:
(a) Allocating internal space and establishing policy regarding the
preservation of the historic character of the interior and furnishings
for the Legislative building, the Cherberg building, the O'Brien
building, the Newhouse building, and the Pritchard building. This
responsibility includes but is not limited to offices, committee rooms,
hearing rooms, workrooms, public areas, the provision of office space
for the governor, and the provision of space for other statewide
elected officials and other state agencies as the committee deems
necessary; and
(b) Establishing policy regarding land and parking areas adjacent
to the buildings identified in (a) of this subsection.
(2) The legislative buildings committee shall coordinate with the
state capitol committee in matters relating to the establishment of
policies affecting buildings and land under subsection (1)(a) and (b)
of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.34.080 and 1990 c 93 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The capitol campus design advisory committee is established as
an advisory group to the legislative buildings committee, the state
capitol committee, and the director of general administration to review
programs, planning, design, and landscaping of state capitol facilities
and grounds and to make recommendations that will contribute to the
attainment of architectural, aesthetic, functional, and environmental
excellence in design and maintenance of capitol facilities on campus
and located in neighboring communities.
(2) The advisory committee shall consist of the following persons
who shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the governor:
(a) Two architects;
(b) A landscape architect; and
(c) An urban planner.
The governor shall appoint the chair and vice-chair and shall
instruct the director of general administration to provide the staff
and resources necessary for implementing this section. The advisory
committee shall meet at least once every ninety days and at the call of
the chair.
The members of the committee shall be reimbursed as provided in RCW
43.03.220 and 44.04.120.
(3) The advisory committee shall also consist of the secretary of
state or his or her designee and two members of the house of
representatives, one from each caucus, who shall be appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives, and two members of the senate,
one from each caucus, who shall be appointed by the president of the
senate.
(4) The advisory committee shall review plans and designs affecting
state capitol facilities as they are developed in order to advise the
legislative buildings committee and the state capitol committee. The
advisory committee's review shall include:
(a) The process of solicitation and selection of appropriate
professional design services including design-build proposals;
(b) Compliance with the capitol campus master plan and design
concepts as adopted by the capitol committee;
(c) The design, siting, and grouping of state capitol facilities
relative to the service needs of state government and the impact upon
the local community's economy, environment, traffic patterns, and other
factors;
(d) The relationship of overall state capitol facility planning to
the respective comprehensive plans for long-range urban development of
the cities of Olympia, Lacey, and Tumwater, and Thurston county; and
(e) Landscaping plans and designs, including planting proposals,
street furniture, sculpture, monuments, and access to the capitol
campus and buildings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 27.48 RCW
to read as follows:
The actions of the capitol furnishings preservation committee shall
be consistent with the policies established by the legislative
buildings committee, created in section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 79.24 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of general administration is responsible for
stewardship, preservation, operation, and maintenance of the
Legislative building, the Cherberg building, the O'Brien building, the
Newhouse building, and the Pritchard building, including land and
parking areas adjacent to these buildings, subject to the policy
direction of the legislative buildings committee created in section 1
of this act, and the guidance of the state capitol committee and the
capitol campus design advisory committee, established in RCW 43.34.010
and 43.34.080, respectively.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.19.125 and 1965 c 8 s 43.19.125 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director of general administration, through the division of
capitol ((buildings)) facilities, shall have custody and control of the
capitol buildings and grounds((,)) and shall supervise and direct
proper care, heating, lighting, and repairing thereof, and, except as
provided in section 2 of this act, designate rooms in the capitol
buildings to be occupied by various state officials. The director
shall carry out the director's duties under this act at the direction
of the legislative buildings committee created in section 1 of this
act, and shall carry out other related functions and duties as directed
by the state capitol committee created in RCW 43.34.010.

--- END ---