BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.06 RCW
to read as follows:
When requested by the governor or the director of the department of
personnel, nonconviction criminal history fingerprint record checks
shall be conducted through the Washington state patrol identification
and criminal history section and the federal bureau of investigation on
applicants for agency head positions appointed by the governor.
Information received pursuant to this section shall be confidential and
made available only to the governor or director of the department of
personnel or their employees directly involved in the selection,
hiring, or background investigation of the subject of the record check.
When necessary, applicants may be employed on a conditional basis
pending completion of the criminal history record check. "Agency head"
as used in this section has the same definition as provided in RCW
34.05.010.

--- END ---