BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.14.110 and 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 35 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Every self-insurer shall maintain a record of all payments of
compensation made under this title. The self-insurer shall furnish to
the director all information ((he)) the self-insurer has in ((his)) its
possession as to any disputed claim, upon forms approved by the
director.
(2)(a) The department shall establish an electronic reporting
system for the submission to the department of specified self-insurance
claims data to more effectively monitor the performance of self-insurers and to obtain claims information in an efficient manner.
(b) Claims data reported to the department electronically by
individual self-insurers are confidential in accordance with RCW
51.16.070 and 51.28.070. The department may publish, for statistical
purposes, aggregated claims data that contain no personal identifiers.
(3) The department shall adopt rules to administer this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.14.110 and 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 35 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Every self-insurer shall maintain a record of all payments of
compensation made under this title. The self-insurer shall furnish to
the director all information ((he)) the self-insurer has in ((his)) its
possession as to any disputed claim, upon forms approved by the
director.
(2)(a) The department shall establish an electronic reporting
system for the submission to the department of specified self-insurance
claims data to more effectively monitor the performance of self-insurers and to obtain claims information in an efficient manner.
(b) Self-insurers shall submit claims data electronically in the
format and frequency prescribed by the department.
(c) Electronic submittal to the department of specified claims data
is required to maintain self-insurance certification. The department
shall establish an escalating schedule of penalties for noncompliance
with this requirement, up to and including withdrawal of self-insurance
certification.
(d) Claims data reported to the department electronically by
individual self-insurers are confidential in accordance with RCW
51.16.070 and 51.28.070. The department may publish, for statistical
purposes, aggregated claims data that contain no personal identifiers.
(3) The department shall adopt rules to administer this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 51.14.030 and 1977 ex.s. c 323 s 10 are each amended
to read as follows:
The director may issue a certification that an employer is
qualified as a self-insurer when such employer meets the following
requirements:
(1) He or she has fulfilled the requirements of RCW 51.14.020.
(2) He or she has submitted to the department a payroll report for
the preceding consecutive twelve month period.
(3) He or she has submitted to the department a sworn itemized
statement accompanied by an independent audit of the employer's books
demonstrating to the director's satisfaction that the employer has
sufficient liquid assets to meet his or her estimated liabilities as a
self-insurer.
(4) He or she has demonstrated to the department the existence of
the safety organization maintained by him or her within his or her
establishment that indicates a record of accident prevention.
(5) He or she has submitted to the department a description of the
administrative organization to be maintained by him or her to manage
industrial insurance matters including:
(a) The reporting of injuries;
(b) The authorization of medical care;
(c) The payment of compensation;
(d) The handling of claims for compensation;
(e) The name and location of each business location of the
employer; and
(f) The qualifications of the personnel of the employer to perform
this service.
(6) He or she has demonstrated to the department the ability and
commitment to submit electronically the claims required by RCW
51.14.110.
Such certification shall remain in effect until withdrawn by the
director or surrendered by the employer with the approval of the
director. An employer's qualification as a self-insurer shall become
effective on the date of certification or any date specified in the
certificate after the date of certification.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 1 of this act expires July 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 2 and 3 of this act take effect
July 1, 2008.

--- END ---