BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.79.080 and 1999 c 183 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
This chapter shall not apply to the following boilers, unfired
pressure vessels and domestic hot water tanks:
(1) Boilers and unfired pressure vessels under federal regulation
or operated by any railroad subject to the provisions of the interstate
commerce act;
(2) Unfired pressure vessels meeting the requirements of the
interstate commerce commission for shipment of liquids or gases under
pressure;
(3) Air tanks located on vehicles operating under the rules of
other state authorities and used for carrying passengers, or freight;
(4) Air tanks installed on the right of way of railroads and used
directly in the operation of trains;
(5) Unfired pressure vessels having a volume of five cubic feet or
less when not located in places of public assembly;
(6) Unfired pressure vessels designed for a pressure not exceeding
fifteen pounds per square inch gauge ((when not located in place of
public assembly));
(7) Tanks used in connection with heating water for domestic and/or
residential purposes;
(8) Boilers and unfired pressure vessels in cities having
ordinances which are enforced and which have requirements equal to or
higher than those provided for under this chapter, covering the
installation, operation, maintenance and inspection of boilers and
unfired pressure vessels;
(9) Tanks containing water with no air cushion and no direct source
of energy that operate at a temperature of one hundred thirty degrees
Fahrenheit or less;
(10) Electric boilers:
(a) Having a tank volume of not more than one and one-half cubic
feet;
(b) Having a maximum allowable working pressure of ((eighty)) one
hundred pounds per square inch or less, with a pressure relief system
to prevent excess pressure; and
(c) If constructed after June 10, 1994, constructed to American
society of mechanical engineers code, or approved or otherwise
certified by a nationally recognized or recognized foreign testing
laboratory or construction code, including but not limited to
Underwriters Laboratories, Edison Testing Laboratory, or Instituto
Superiore Per La Prevenzione E La Sicurezza Del Lavoro;
(11) Electrical switchgear and control apparatus that have no
external source of energy to maintain pressure and are located in
restricted access areas under the control of an electric utility;
(12) Regardless of location, unfired pressure vessels and hot water
heaters less than one and one-half cubic feet (11.25 gallons) in volume
with a safety valve setting of one hundred fifty pounds per square inch
gauge (psig) or less, or less than six inches in diameter and less than
five cubic feet (37.5 gallons) in volume with a safety valve set at any
pressure, or less than fifteen psig containing substances other than
steam, lethal substances, or liquids with low flash points.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.79.090 and 1999 c 183 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following boilers and unfired pressure vessels shall be exempt
from the requirements of RCW 70.79.220 and 70.79.240 through 70.79.330:
(1) Boilers or unfired pressure vessels located on farms and used
solely for agricultural purposes;
(2) Unfired pressure vessels that are part of fertilizer applicator
rigs designed and used exclusively for fertilization in the conduct of
agricultural operations;
(3) Steam boilers used exclusively for heating purposes carrying a
pressure of not more than fifteen pounds per square inch gauge and
which are located in private residences or in apartment houses of less
than six families;
(4) Hot water heating boilers carrying a pressure of not more than
thirty pounds per square inch and which are located in private
residences or in apartment houses of less than six families;
(5) Approved pressure vessels (hot water heaters, hot water storage
tanks, hot water supply boilers, and hot water heating boilers listed
by a nationally recognized testing agency), with approved safety
devices including a pressure relief valve, with a nominal water
containing capacity of one hundred twenty gallons or less having a heat
input of two hundred thousand b.t.u.'s per hour or less, used for hot
water supply at pressure of one hundred sixty pounds per square inch or
less, and at temperatures of two hundred ten degrees Fahrenheit or
less: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That such pressure vessels are not installed
in schools, child care centers, public and private hospitals, nursing
and boarding homes, churches, public buildings owned or leased and
maintained by the state or any political subdivision thereof, and
assembly halls;
(6) Unfired pressure vessels containing only water under pressure
for domestic supply purposes, including those containing air, the
compression of which serves only as a cushion or airlift pumping
systems, when located in private residences or in apartment houses of
less than six families, or in public water systems as defined in RCW
70.119.020;
(7) Unfired pressure vessels containing liquified petroleum gases.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.79.160 and 1999 c 183 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each company employing special inspectors shall, within thirty days
following each internal or external boiler or unfired pressure vessel
inspection made by such inspectors, file a report of such inspection
with the chief inspector upon appropriate forms. ((Reports of external
inspections shall not be required except when such inspections disclose
that the boiler or unfired pressure vessel is in dangerous condition.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.79 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity may
install or maintain any standards that violate this chapter. In cases
where the interpretation and application of the installation or
maintenance standards prescribed in this chapter is in dispute, the
board shall determine the methods of installation or maintenance to be
used in the particular case submitted for its decision. To appeal the
board's decision, a person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other
entity shall, in writing, notify the chief boiler inspector. The
notice shall specify the ruling or interpretation desired and the
contention of the person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other
entity as to the proper interpretation or application on the question
on which a decision is desired.
(2) Any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity
wishing to appeal a penalty issued under this chapter may appeal to the
board. The appeal shall be filed within twenty days after service of
the notice of the penalty to the assessed party by filing a written
notice of appeal with the chief boiler inspector. The hearing and
review procedures shall be conducted by the board in accordance with
chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.79.190 and 1951 c 32 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person whose commission has been suspended or revoked shall be
entitled to an appeal as provided in ((RCW 70.79.360)) section 4 of
this act and to be present in person and/or represented by counsel on
the hearing of the appeal.

Sec. 6 RCW 70.79.320 and 1986 c 97 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, or
corporation to operate under pressure in this state a boiler or unfired
pressure vessel, to which this chapter applies, without a valid
inspection certificate as provided for in this chapter.
(2) The department may assess a penalty against a person violating
a provision of this chapter. The penalty shall be not more than five
hundred dollars. Each day that the violation continues is a separate
violation and is subject to a separate penalty.
(3) The department may not assess a penalty until it adopts rules
describing the method it will use to calculate penalties for various
violations.
(4) The department shall notify the violator of its action, and the
reasons for its action, in writing. The department shall send the
notice by certified mail to the violator that a hearing may be
requested under ((RCW 70.79.360)) section 4 of this act. The hearing
shall not stay the effect of the penalty.

Sec. 7 RCW 70.79.170 and 1951 c 32 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
Examinations for ((chief,)) deputy((,)) or special inspectors shall
be in writing and shall be held by the chief and a member of the board,
or by at least two ((members of the board)) national board commissioned
inspectors. Such examinations shall be confined to questions the
answers to which will aid in determining the fitness and competency of
the applicant for the intended service. In case an applicant for an
inspector's appointment or commission fails to pass the examination, he
may appeal to the board for another examination which shall be given by
the ((board)) chief within ninety days. The record of an applicant's
examination shall be accessible to said applicant and his employer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 RCW 70.79.360 (Appeal from orders or acts)
and 1951 c 32 s 36 are each repealed.

--- END ---