BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.05.030 and 1999 c 249 s 302, 1999 c 155 s 1, and
1999 c 59 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The commission shall:
(1) Have the care, charge, control, and supervision of all parks
and parkways acquired or set aside by the state for park or parkway
purposes.
(2) Adopt policies, and adopt, issue, and enforce rules pertaining
to the use, care, and administration of state parks and parkways. The
commission shall cause a copy of the rules to be kept posted in a
conspicuous place in every state park to which they are applicable, but
failure to post or keep any rule posted shall be no defense to any
prosecution for the violation thereof.
(3) Permit the use of state parks and parkways by the public under
such rules as shall be adopted.
(4) Clear, drain, grade, seed, and otherwise improve or beautify
parks and parkways, and erect structures, buildings, fireplaces, and
comfort stations and build and maintain paths, trails, and roadways
through or on parks and parkways.
(5) Grant concessions or leases in state parks and parkways, upon
such rentals, fees, or percentage of income or profits and for such
terms, in no event longer than fifty years, and upon such conditions as
shall be approved by the commission: PROVIDED, That leases exceeding
a twenty-year term shall require a unanimous vote of the commission:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That if, during the term of any concession or lease,
it is the opinion of the commission that it would be in the best
interest of the state, the commission may, with the consent of the
concessionaire or lessee, alter and amend the terms and conditions of
such concession or lease: PROVIDED FURTHER, That television station
leases shall be subject to the provisions of RCW 79A.05.085, only:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That the rates of such concessions or leases shall be
renegotiated at five-year intervals. No concession shall be granted
which will prevent the public from having free access to the scenic
attractions of any park or parkway.
(6) Employ such assistance as it deems necessary. Commission
expenses relating to its use of volunteer assistance shall be limited
to premiums or assessments for the insurance of volunteers by the
department of labor and industries, compensation of staff who assist
volunteers, materials and equipment used in authorized volunteer
projects, training, reimbursement of volunteer travel as provided in
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, and other reasonable expenses relating to
volunteer recognition. The commission, at its discretion, may waive
commission fees otherwise applicable to volunteers. The commission
shall not use volunteers to replace or supplant classified positions.
The use of volunteers may not lead to the elimination of any employees
or permanent positions in the bargaining unit.
(7) By majority vote of its authorized membership select and
purchase or obtain options upon, lease, or otherwise acquire for and in
the name of the state such tracts of land, including shore and tide
lands, for park and parkway purposes as it deems proper. If the
commission cannot acquire any tract at a price it deems reasonable, it
may, by majority vote of its authorized membership, obtain title
thereto, or any part thereof, by condemnation proceedings conducted by
the attorney general as provided for the condemnation of rights of way
for state highways. Option agreements executed under authority of this
subsection shall be valid only if:
(a) The cost of the option agreement does not exceed one dollar;
and
(b) Moneys used for the purchase of the option agreement are from
(i) funds appropriated therefor, or (ii) funds appropriated for
undesignated land acquisitions, or (iii) funds deemed by the commission
to be in excess of the amount necessary for the purposes for which they
were appropriated; and
(c) The maximum amount payable for the property upon exercise of
the option does not exceed the appraised value of the property.
(8) Cooperate with the United States, or any county or city of this
state, in any matter pertaining to the acquisition, development,
redevelopment, renovation, care, control, or supervision of any park or
parkway, and enter into contracts in writing to that end. All parks or
parkways, to which the state contributed or in whose care, control, or
supervision the state participated pursuant to the provisions of this
section, shall be governed by the provisions hereof.
(9) Adopt rules establishing the requirements for a criminal
history record information search for the following: Job applicants,
volunteers, and independent contractors who have unsupervised access to
children or vulnerable adults, or who will be responsible for
collecting or disbursing cash or processing credit/debit card
transactions. These background checks will be done through the
Washington state patrol criminal identification section and may include
a national check from the federal bureau of investigation, which shall
be through the submission of fingerprints. A permanent employee of the
commission, employed as of the effective date of this section, is
exempt from the provisions of this subsection.

--- END ---