BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.18.010 and 2002 c 294 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
County auditors or recording officers shall collect the following
fees for their official services:
(1) For recording instruments, for the first page eight and one-half by fourteen inches or less, five dollars; for each additional page
eight and one-half by fourteen inches or less, one dollar. The fee for
recording multiple transactions contained in one instrument will be
calculated for each transaction requiring separate indexing as required
under RCW 65.04.050 as follows: The fee for each title or transaction
is the same fee as the first page of any additional recorded document;
the fee for additional pages is the same fee as for any additional
pages for any recorded document; the fee for the additional pages may
be collected only once and may not be collected for each title or
transaction;
(2) For preparing and certifying copies, for the first page eight
and one-half by fourteen inches or less, three dollars; for each
additional page eight and one-half by fourteen inches or less, one
dollar;
(3) For preparing noncertified copies, for each page eight and one-half by fourteen inches or less, one dollar;
(4) For administering an oath or taking an affidavit, with or
without seal, two dollars;
(5) For issuing a marriage license, eight dollars, (this fee
includes taking necessary affidavits, filing returns, indexing, and
transmittal of a record of the marriage to the state registrar of vital
statistics), plus ten dollars, eight dollars of which is to be
transmitted monthly to the state treasury for deposit in the domestic
violence prevention account, and the remaining two dollars shall be
retained by the county in which the marriage license fee is collected
for the purpose of supporting community-based services for victims of
domestic violence within the county, except for five percent of the two
dollars, which may be retained by the county for administrative
purposes, plus an additional five-dollar fee for use and support of the
prevention of child abuse and neglect activities to be transmitted
monthly to the state treasurer and deposited in the state general fund
plus an additional ten-dollar fee to be transmitted monthly to the
state treasurer and deposited in the state general fund. The
legislature intends to appropriate an amount at least equal to the
revenue generated by this fee for the purposes of the displaced
homemaker act, chapter 28B.04 RCW;
(6) For searching records per hour, eight dollars;
(7) For recording plats, fifty cents for each lot except cemetery
plats for which the charge shall be twenty-five cents per lot; also one
dollar for each acknowledgment, dedication, and description: PROVIDED,
That there shall be a minimum fee of twenty-five dollars per plat;
(8) For recording of miscellaneous records not listed above, for
the first page eight and one-half by fourteen inches or less, five
dollars; for each additional page eight and one-half by fourteen inches
or less, one dollar;
(9) For modernization and improvement of the recording and indexing
system, a surcharge as provided in RCW 36.22.170((.));
(10) For recording an emergency nonstandard document as provided in
RCW 65.04.047, fifty dollars, in addition to all other applicable
recording fees((.));
(11) For recording instruments, a surcharge as provided in RCW
36.22.178.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.18.016 and 2002 c 338 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Revenue collected under this section is not subject to division
under RCW 36.18.025 or 27.24.070.
(2)(a) For the filing of a petition for modification of a decree of
dissolution or paternity, within the same case as the original action,
a fee of twenty dollars must be paid.
(b) The party filing the first or initial petition for dissolution,
legal separation, or declaration concerning the validity of marriage
shall pay, at the time and in addition to the filing fee required under
RCW 36.18.020, a fee of ten dollars. The clerk of the superior court
shall transmit monthly eight dollars of the ten-dollar fee collected
under this subsection to the state treasury for deposit in the domestic
violence prevention account. The remaining two dollars shall be
retained by the county for the purpose of supporting community-based
services within the county for victims of domestic violence, except for
five percent of the two dollars, which may be retained by the court for
administrative purposes.
(3)(a) The party making a demand for a jury of six in a civil
action shall pay, at the time, a fee of one hundred twenty-five
dollars; if the demand is for a jury of twelve, a fee of two hundred
fifty dollars. If, after the party demands a jury of six and pays the
required fee, any other party to the action requests a jury of twelve,
an additional one hundred twenty-five dollar fee will be required of
the party demanding the increased number of jurors.
(b) Upon conviction in criminal cases a jury demand charge of fifty
dollars for a jury of six, or one hundred dollars for a jury of twelve
may be imposed as costs under RCW 10.46.190.
(4) For preparing, transcribing, or certifying an instrument on
file or of record in the clerk's office, with or without seal, for the
first page or portion of the first page, a fee of two dollars, and for
each additional page or portion of a page, a fee of one dollar must be
charged. For authenticating or exemplifying an instrument, a fee of
one dollar for each additional seal affixed must be charged.
(5) For executing a certificate, with or without a seal, a fee of
two dollars must be charged.
(6) For a garnishee defendant named in an affidavit for garnishment
and for a writ of attachment, a fee of twenty dollars must be charged.
(7) For approving a bond, including justification on the bond, in
other than civil actions and probate proceedings, a fee of two dollars
must be charged.
(8) For the issuance of a certificate of qualification and a
certified copy of letters of administration, letters testamentary, or
letters of guardianship, there must be a fee of two dollars.
(9) For the preparation of a passport application, the clerk may
collect an execution fee as authorized by the federal government.
(10) For clerk's services such as processing ex parte orders,
performing historical searches, compiling statistical reports, and
conducting exceptional record searches, the clerk may collect a fee not
to exceed twenty dollars per hour or portion of an hour.
(11) For duplicated recordings of court's proceedings there must be
a fee of ten dollars for each audio tape and twenty-five dollars for
each video tape.
(12) For the filing of oaths and affirmations under chapter 5.28
RCW, a fee of twenty dollars must be charged.
(13) For filing a disclaimer of interest under RCW 11.86.031(4), a
fee of two dollars must be charged.
(14) For registration of land titles, Torrens Act, under RCW
65.12.780, a fee of five dollars must be charged.
(15) For the issuance of extension of judgment under RCW 6.17.020
and chapter 9.94A RCW, a fee of one hundred ten dollars must be
charged.
(16) A facilitator surcharge of ten dollars must be charged as
authorized under RCW 26.12.240.
(17) For filing a water rights statement under RCW 90.03.180, a fee
of twenty-five dollars must be charged.
(18) A service fee of three dollars for the first page and one
dollar for each additional page must be charged for receiving faxed
documents, pursuant to Washington state rules of court, general rule
17.
(19) For preparation of clerk's papers under RAP 9.7, a fee of
fifty cents per page must be charged.
(20) For copies and reports produced at the local level as
permitted by RCW 2.68.020 and supreme court policy, a variable fee must
be charged.
(21) Investment service charge and earnings under RCW 36.48.090
must be charged.
(22) Costs for nonstatutory services rendered by clerk by authority
of local ordinance or policy must be charged.
(23) For filing a request for mandatory arbitration, a filing fee
may be assessed against the party filing a statement of arbitrability
not to exceed two hundred twenty dollars as established by authority of
local ordinance. This charge shall be used solely to offset the cost
of the mandatory arbitration program.
(24) For filing a request for trial de novo of an arbitration
award, a fee not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars as established by
authority of local ordinance must be charged.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.123 RCW
to read as follows:
The domestic violence prevention account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from fees imposed for deposit in the domestic
violence prevention account under RCW 36.18.016 must be deposited into
the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
funding nonshelter community-based services for victims of domestic
violence.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.123.030 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 235 are each
amended to read as follows:
The department of social and health services, in consultation with
the state department of health, and individuals or groups having
experience and knowledge of the problems of victims of domestic
violence, shall:
(1) Establish minimum standards for shelters applying for grants
from the department under this chapter. Classifications may be made
dependent upon size, geographic location, and population needs;
(2) Receive grant applications for the development and
establishment of shelters for victims of domestic violence;
(3) Distribute funds, within forty-five days after approval, to
those shelters meeting departmental standards;
(4) Evaluate biennially each shelter receiving departmental funds
for compliance with the established minimum standards; ((and))
(5) Review the minimum standards each biennium to ensure
applicability to community and client needs; and
(6) Administer funds available from the domestic violence
prevention account under section 3 of this act and establish minimum
standards for preventive, nonshelter community-based services receiving
funds administered by the department. Preventive, nonshelter
community-based services include services for victims of domestic
violence from communities that have been traditionally underserved or
unserved and services for children who have witnessed domestic
violence.

Sec. 5 RCW 36.18.020 and 2000 c 9 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Revenue collected under this section is subject to division
with the state public safety and education account under RCW 36.18.025
and with the county or regional law library fund under RCW 27.24.070.
(2) Clerks of superior courts shall collect the following fees for
their official services:
(a) In addition to any other fee required by law, the party filing
the first or initial paper in any civil action, including, but not
limited to an action for restitution, adoption, or change of name,
shall pay, at the time the paper is filed, a fee of one hundred ten
dollars except, in an unlawful detainer action under chapter 59.18 or
59.20 RCW for which the plaintiff shall pay a case initiating filing
fee of thirty dollars, or in proceedings filed under RCW 28A.225.030
alleging a violation of the compulsory attendance laws where the
petitioner shall not pay a filing fee. The thirty dollar filing fee
under this subsection for an unlawful detainer action shall not include
an order to show cause or any other order or judgment except a default
order or default judgment in an unlawful detainer action.
(b) Any party, except a defendant in a criminal case, filing the
first or initial paper on an appeal from a court of limited
jurisdiction or any party on any civil appeal, shall pay, when the
paper is filed, a fee of one hundred ten dollars.
(c) For filing of a petition for judicial review as required under
RCW 34.05.514 a filing fee of one hundred ten dollars.
(d) For filing of a petition for unlawful harassment under RCW
10.14.040 a filing fee of forty-one dollars.
(e) For filing the notice of debt due for the compensation of a
crime victim under RCW 7.68.120(2)(a) a fee of one hundred ten dollars.
(f) In probate proceedings, the party instituting such proceedings,
shall pay at the time of filing the first paper therein, a fee of one
hundred ten dollars.
(g) For filing any petition to contest a will admitted to probate
or a petition to admit a will which has been rejected, or a petition
objecting to a written agreement or memorandum as provided in RCW
11.96A.220, there shall be paid a fee of one hundred ten dollars.
(h) Upon conviction or plea of guilty, upon failure to prosecute an
appeal from a court of limited jurisdiction as provided by law, or upon
affirmance of a conviction by a court of limited jurisdiction, a
defendant in a criminal case shall be liable for a fee of one hundred
ten dollars.
(i) With the exception of demands for jury hereafter made and
garnishments hereafter issued, civil actions and probate proceedings
filed prior to midnight, July 1, 1972, shall be completed and governed
by the fee schedule in effect as of January 1, 1972: PROVIDED, That no
fee shall be assessed if an order of dismissal on the clerk's record be
filed as provided by rule of the supreme court.
(3) No fee shall be collected when a petition for relinquishment of
parental rights is filed pursuant to RCW 26.33.080 or for forms and
instructional brochures provided under RCW 26.50.030.

Sec. 6 RCW 36.18.022 and 1995 c 292 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
The court may waive the filing fees provided for under RCW
36.18.016(2)(b) and 36.18.020(2) (a) and (b) upon affidavit by a party
that the party is unable to pay the fee due to financial hardship.

--- END ---