BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.45.0631 and 2001 c 329 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
Beginning July 1, ((2001)) 2005, the required contribution rate for
members of the Washington state patrol retirement system shall be
((two)) seven percent or ((equal to)) one-third of the ((employer))
rate adopted under RCW 41.45.060 and 41.45.070 for the Washington state
patrol retirement system, whichever is ((greater)) less. In no event
shall the member contribution rate be less than two percent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---