BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.32.875 and 2000 c 247 s 903 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member who is at least age sixty-five
and who has:
(a) Completed ten service credit years; or
(b) Completed five service credit years, including twelve service
credit months after attaining age ((fifty-four)) forty-four; or
(c) Completed five service credit years by July 1, 1996, under plan
2 and who transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.32.817;
shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance
computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.840.
(2) EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has attained at least age
fifty-five and has completed at least ten years of service shall be
eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed
according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.840, except that a member
retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement
allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number
of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.
(3) ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at
least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall
be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed
according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.840, except that a member
retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement
allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference
in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of
age sixty-five.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.35.680 and 2000 c 247 s 906 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member who is at least age sixty-five
and who has:
(a) Completed ten service credit years; or
(b) Completed five service credit years, including twelve service
credit months after attaining age ((fifty-four)) forty-four; or
(c) Completed five service credit years by September 1, 2000, under
the public employees' retirement system plan 2 and who transferred to
plan 3 under RCW 41.35.510;
shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance
computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.620.
(2) EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has attained at least age
fifty-five and has completed at least ten years of service shall be
eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed
according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.620, except that a member
retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement
allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number
of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.
(3) ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at
least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall
be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed
according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.620, except that a member
retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement
allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference
in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of
age sixty-five.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.40.820 and 2000 c 247 s 309 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member who is at least age sixty-five
and who has:
(a) Completed ten service credit years; or
(b) Completed five service credit years, including twelve service
credit months after attaining age ((fifty-four)) forty-four; or
(c) Completed five service credit years by the transfer payment
date specified in RCW 41.40.795, under the public employees' retirement
system plan 2 and who transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.40.795;
shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance
computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.790.
(2) EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has attained at least age
fifty-five and has completed at least ten years of service shall be
eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed
according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.790, except that a member
retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement
allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number
of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.
(3) ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at
least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall
be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed
according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.790, except that a member
retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement
allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference
in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of
age sixty-five.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2005, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---