BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.04.276 and 2003 c 295 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The select committee on pension policy is created. The select
committee consists of:
(a) Four members of the senate appointed by the president of the
senate, two of whom are members of the majority party and two of whom
are members of the minority party. At least three of the appointees
shall be members of the senate ways and means committee;
(b) Four members of the house of representatives appointed by the
speaker, two of whom are members of the majority party and two of whom
are members of the minority party. At least three of the appointees
shall be members of the house of representatives appropriations
committee;
(c) Four active members or representatives from organizations of
active members of the state retirement systems appointed by the
governor for staggered three-year terms, with no more than two
appointees representing any one employee retirement system;
(d) Two retired members or representatives of retired members'
organizations of the state retirement systems appointed by the governor
for staggered three-year terms, with no two members from the same
system;
(e) Four employer representatives of members of the state
retirement systems appointed by the governor for staggered three-year
terms; and
(f) The directors of the department of retirement systems and
office of financial management.
(2)(a) The term of office of each member of the house of
representatives or senate serving on the committee runs from the close
of the session in which he or she is appointed until the close of the
next regular session held in an odd-numbered year. If a successor is
not appointed during a session, the member's term continues until the
member is reappointed or a successor is appointed. The term of office
for a committee member who is a member of the house of representatives
or the senate who does not continue as a member of the senate or house
of representatives ceases upon the convening of the next session of the
legislature during the odd-numbered year following the member's
appointment, or upon the member's resignation, whichever is earlier.
All vacancies of positions held by members of the legislature must be
filled from the same political party and from the same house as the
member whose seat was vacated.
(b) Following the terms of members and representatives appointed
under subsection (1)(d) of this section, the retiree positions shall be
rotated to ensure that each system has an opportunity to have a retiree
representative on the committee.
(3) The committee shall elect a chairperson and a vice-chairperson.
The chairperson shall be a member of the senate in even-numbered years
and a member of the house of representatives in odd-numbered years and
the vice-chairperson shall be a member of the house of representatives
in even-numbered years and a member of the senate in odd-numbered
years.
(4) The committee shall establish an executive committee of
((five)) six members, including the chairperson, the vice-chairperson,
one member from subsection (1)(c) of this section, one member from
subsection (1)(d) of this section, one member from subsection (1)(e) of
this section, and ((one member from subsection (1)(f) of this section,
with)) the director((s)) of the department of retirement systems ((and
the office of financial management serving in alternate years)).
(5) Nonlegislative members of the select committee serve without
compensation, but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(6) The office of state actuary under chapter 44.44 RCW shall
provide staff and technical support to the committee.

--- END ---