BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.26.110 and 2003 c 30 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All claims for disability shall be acted upon and either
approved or disapproved by either type of disability board authorized
to be created in this section.
(a) Each city having a population of twenty thousand or more shall
establish a disability board having jurisdiction over all members
employed by those cities and composed of the following five members:
Two members of the city legislative body to be appointed by the mayor;
one active or retired fire fighter employed by or retired from the city
to be elected by the fire fighters employed by or retired from the city
who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board; one active or retired
law enforcement officer employed by or retired from the city to be
elected by the law enforcement officers employed by or retired from the
city who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board; and one member
from the public at large who resides within the city to be appointed by
the other four members designated in this subsection. Only those
active or retired fire fighters and law enforcement officers who are
subject to the jurisdiction of the board have the right to elect under
this section. All fire fighters and law enforcement officers employed
by or retired from the city are eligible for election. Each of the
elected members shall serve a two year term. The members appointed
pursuant to this subsection shall serve for two year terms: PROVIDED,
That cities of the first class only, shall retain existing firemen's
pension boards established pursuant to RCW 41.16.020 and existing
boards of trustees of the relief and pension fund of the police
department as established pursuant to RCW 41.20.010 which such boards
shall have authority to act upon and approve or disapprove claims for
disability by fire fighters or law enforcement officers as provided
under the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system act.
(b) Each county shall establish a disability board having
jurisdiction over all members ((residing in the county)) employed by or
retired from an employer within the county and not employed by a city
in which a disability board is established. The county disability
board so created shall be composed of five members to be chosen as
follows: One member of the legislative body of the county to be
appointed by the county legislative body; one member of a city or town
legislative body located within the county which does not contain a
city disability board established pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this
section to be chosen by a majority of the mayors of such cities and
towns within the county which does not contain a city disability board;
one active fire fighter or retired fire fighter employed by or retired
from an employer within the county to be elected by the fire fighters
employed or retired ((in)) from an employer within the county who are
not employed by or retired from a city in which a disability board is
established and who are subject to the jurisdiction of ((the)) that
board; one law enforcement officer or retired law enforcement officer
employed by or retired from an employer within the county to be elected
by the law enforcement officers employed in or retired from an employer
within the county who are not employed by or retired from a city in
which a disability board is established and who are subject to the
jurisdiction of ((the)) that board; and one member from the public at
large who resides within the county but does not reside within a city
in which a city disability board is established, to be appointed by the
other four members designated in this subsection. However, in counties
with a population less than sixty thousand, the member of the
disability board appointed by a majority of the mayors of the cities
and towns within the county that do not contain a city disability board
must be a resident of one of the cities and towns but need not be a
member of a city or town legislative body. Only those active or
retired fire fighters and law enforcement officers who are subject to
the jurisdiction of the board have the right to elect under this
section. All fire fighters and law enforcement officers employed by or
retired from an employer within the county who are not employed by or
retired from a city in which a disability board is established are
eligible for election. All members appointed or elected pursuant to
this subsection shall serve for two year terms. If there are no fire
fighters under the jurisdiction of the board eligible to vote, a second
eligible employee representative shall be elected by the law
enforcement officers eligible to vote. If there are no law enforcement
officers under the jurisdiction of the board eligible to vote, a second
eligible representative shall be elected by the fire fighters eligible
to vote.
(2) The members of both the county and city disability boards shall
not receive compensation for their service upon the boards but the
members shall be reimbursed by their respective county or city for all
expenses incidental to such service as to the amount authorized by law.
(3) The disability boards authorized for establishment by this
section shall perform all functions, exercise all powers, and make all
such determinations as specified in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---