BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.88.010 and 2003 c 53 s 92 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of indecent exposure if he or she
intentionally makes any open and obscene exposure of his or her person
or the person of another knowing that such conduct is likely to cause
reasonable affront or alarm. The act of breastfeeding or expressing
breast milk is not indecent exposure.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this subsection,
indecent exposure is a misdemeanor.
(b) Indecent exposure is a gross misdemeanor on the first offense
if the person exposes himself or herself to a person under the age of
fourteen years.
(c) Indecent exposure is a class C felony if the person has
previously been convicted ((under)) in this state or elsewhere of
indecent exposure and the elements of the previous offense are
identical to the elements of indecent exposure as defined in this
section or if the person has previously been convicted of a sex offense
as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.

--- END ---