BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the inability to
purchase hearing aids adversely affects hearing-impaired people of all
ages and impacts the employment and educational opportunities of
hearing-impaired children and adults in Washington state by limiting
communication options. To provide these individuals with equal
opportunity and protect the well-being of the population, the
legislature intends to establish insurance coverage provisions for
hearing aids.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
All state-purchased health care that provides coverage for
prostheses shall include coverage for hearing aids. Covered hearing
instruments and related services shall be recommended by the patient's
physician or advanced registered nurse practitioner as authorized by
the nursing care quality assurance commission under chapter 18.79 RCW
or physician assistant under chapter 18.71A or 18.57A RCW.
This section shall not be construed to prevent the application of
standard health plan provisions applicable to prosthesis benefits, such
as deductibles, copayments, medical necessity, quantity limitations, or
preauthorizations. This section does not limit the authority of the
state health care authority to negotiate rates and contract with
specific providers for the delivery of prostheses. The replacement of
hearing aids shall be limited as follows: Every four years for an
adult; every two years for children between the ages of two and
eighteen; and no more than three times a year for infants and toddlers
up to two years of age. This section does not apply to medicare
supplement policies or supplemental contracts covering a specified
disease or other limited benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 48.20 RCW
to read as follows:
An insurer that offers to any individual a health benefit plan that
provides coverage for prostheses shall include coverage for hearing
aids. Covered hearing instruments and related services shall be
recommended by the patient's physician or advanced registered nurse
practitioner as authorized by the nursing care quality assurance
commission under chapter 18.79 RCW or physician assistant under chapter
18.71A or 18.57A RCW.
This section shall not be construed to prevent the application of
standard health plan provisions applicable to prosthesis benefits, such
as deductibles, copayments, medical necessity, quantity limitations, or
preauthorizations. This section does not limit the authority of a
carrier to negotiate rates and contract with specific providers for the
delivery of prostheses. The replacement of hearing aids shall be
limited as follows: Every four years for an adult; every two years for
children between the ages of two and eighteen; and no more than three
times a year for infants and toddlers up to two years of age. This
section does not apply to medicare supplement policies or supplemental
contracts covering a specified disease or other limited benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 48.21 RCW
to read as follows:
A group insurance contract or blanket disability insurance contract
that provides coverage for prostheses shall include coverage for
hearing aids. Covered hearing instruments and related services shall
be recommended by the patient's physician or advanced registered nurse
practitioner as authorized by the nursing care quality assurance
commission under chapter 18.79 RCW or physician assistant under chapter
18.71A or 18.57A RCW.
This section shall not be construed to prevent the application of
standard health plan provisions applicable to prosthesis benefits, such
as deductibles, copayments, medical necessity, quantity limitations, or
preauthorizations. This section does not limit the authority of a
carrier to negotiate rates and contract with specific providers for the
delivery of prostheses. The replacement of hearing aids shall be
limited as follows: Every four years for an adult; every two years for
children between the ages of two and eighteen; and no more than three
times a year for infants and toddlers up to two years of age. This
section does not apply to medicare supplement policies or supplemental
contracts covering a specified disease or other limited benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 48.44 RCW
to read as follows:
A health service contractor that provides coverage for prostheses
shall include coverage for hearing aids. Covered hearing instruments
and related services shall be recommended by the patient's physician or
advanced registered nurse practitioner as authorized by the nursing
care quality assurance commission under chapter 18.79 RCW or physician
assistant under chapter 18.71A or 18.57A RCW.
This section shall not be construed to prevent the application of
standard health plan provisions applicable to prosthesis benefits, such
as deductibles, copayments, medical necessity, quantity limitations, or
preauthorizations. This section does not limit the authority of the
carrier to negotiate rates and contract with specific providers for the
delivery of prostheses. The replacement of hearing aids shall be
limited as follows: Every four years for an adult; every two years for
children between the ages of two and eighteen; and no more than three
times a year for infants and toddlers up to two years of age. This
section does not apply to medicare supplement policies or supplemental
contracts covering a specified disease or other limited benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 48.46 RCW
to read as follows:
A health maintenance organization that provides coverage for
prostheses shall include coverage for hearing aids. Covered hearing
instruments and related services shall be recommended by the patient's
physician or advanced registered nurse practitioner as authorized by
the nursing care quality assurance commission under chapter 18.79 RCW
or physician assistant under chapter 18.71A or 18.57A RCW.
This section shall not be construed to prevent the application of
standard health plan provisions applicable to prosthesis benefits, such
as deductibles, copayments, medical necessity, quantity limitations, or
preauthorizations. This section does not limit the authority of the
carrier to negotiate rates and contract with specific providers for the
delivery of prostheses. The replacement of hearing aids shall be
limited as follows: Every four years for an adult; every two years for
children between the ages of two and eighteen; and no more than three
times a year for infants and toddlers up to two years of age. This
section does not apply to medicare supplement policies or supplemental
contracts covering a specified disease or other limited benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act takes effect January 1, 2006.

--- END ---