BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 40.14.070 and 2003 c 240 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) County, municipal, and other local government agencies may
request authority to destroy noncurrent public records having no
further administrative or legal value by submitting to the division of
archives and records management lists of such records on forms prepared
by the division. The archivist, a representative appointed by the
state auditor, and a representative appointed by the attorney general
shall constitute a committee, known as the local records committee,
which shall review such lists and which may veto the destruction of any
or all items contained therein.
(b) A local government agency, as an alternative to submitting
lists, may elect to establish a records control program based on
recurring disposition schedules recommended by the agency to the local
records committee. The schedules are to be submitted on forms provided
by the division of archives and records management to the local records
committee, which may either veto, approve, or amend the schedule.
Approval of such schedule or amended schedule shall be by unanimous
vote of the local records committee. Upon such approval, the schedule
shall constitute authority for the local government agency to destroy
the records listed thereon, after the required retention period, on a
recurring basis until the schedule is either amended or revised by the
committee.
(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, no public records shall
be destroyed until approved for destruction by the local records
committee. Official public records shall not be destroyed unless:
(i) The records are six or more years old;
(ii) The department of origin of the records has made a
satisfactory showing to the state records committee that the retention
of the records for a minimum of six years is both unnecessary and
uneconomical, particularly where lesser federal retention periods for
records generated by the state under federal programs have been
established; or
(iii) The originals of official public records less than six years
old have been copied or reproduced by any photographic, photostatic,
microfilm, miniature photographic, or other process approved by the
state archivist which accurately reproduces or forms a durable medium
for so reproducing the original.
An automatic reduction of retention periods from seven to six years
for official public records on record retention schedules existing on
June 10, 1982, shall not be made, but the same shall be reviewed
individually by the local records committee for approval or disapproval
of the change to a retention period of six years.
The state archivist may furnish appropriate information,
suggestions, and guidelines to local government agencies for their
assistance in the preparation of lists and schedules or any other
matter relating to the retention, preservation, or destruction of
records under this chapter. The local records committee may adopt
appropriate regulations establishing procedures to be followed in such
matters.
Records of county, municipal, or other local government agencies,
designated by the archivist as of primarily historical interest, may be
transferred to a recognized depository agency.
(b)(i) Records of investigative reports prepared by any state,
county, municipal, or other law enforcement agency pertaining to sex
offenders contained in chapter 9A.44 RCW or sexually violent offenses
as defined in RCW 71.09.020 that are not required in the current
operation of the law enforcement agency or for pending judicial
proceedings shall, following the expiration of the applicable schedule
of the law enforcement agency's retention of the records, be
transferred to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs
for permanent electronic retention and retrieval. Upon electronic
retention of any document, the association shall be permitted to
destroy the paper copy of the document.
(ii) Any sealed record transferred to the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs for permanent electronic retention and
retrieval, including records sealed after transfer, shall be
electronically retained in such a way that the record is clearly marked
as sealed.
(iii) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs
shall be permitted to destroy both the paper copy and electronic record
of any offender verified as deceased.
(c) Any record transferred to the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs pursuant to (b) of this subsection shall be
deemed to no longer constitute a public record pursuant to RCW
42.17.020 and shall be exempt from public disclosure. Such records
shall be disseminated only to criminal justice agencies as defined in
RCW 10.97.030 for the purpose of determining if a sex offender met the
criteria of a sexually violent predator as defined in chapter 71.09 RCW
and the end-of-sentence review committee as defined by RCW 72.09.345
for the purpose of fulfilling its duties under RCW 71.09.025 and
9.95.420.
Electronic records marked as sealed shall only be accessible by
criminal justice agencies as defined in RCW 10.97.030 who would
otherwise have access to a sealed paper copy of the document, the end-of-sentence review committee as defined by RCW 72.09.345 for the
purpose of fulfilling its duties under RCW 71.09.025 and 9.95.420, and
the system administrator for the purposes of system administration and
maintenance.
(3) Except as otherwise provided by law, county, municipal, and
other local government agencies may, as an alternative to destroying
noncurrent public records having no further administrative or legal
value, donate the public records to the state library, local library,
historical society, genealogical society, or similar society or
organization.
Public records may not be donated under this subsection unless:
(a) The records are seventy years old or more;
(b) The local records committee has approved the destruction of the
public records; and
(c) The state archivist has determined that the public records have
no historic interest.

--- END ---