BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.44 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to any other investment authority granted by law,
public hospital districts with annual revenues exceeding one hundred
million dollars, of which less than five percent is derived from
regular property taxes as defined in RCW 84.04.140, are authorized to
invest their funds and money in their custody or possession, eligible
for investment, in appropriate investment vehicles, as reasonably and
prudently determined by the finance or investment committees of such
districts.

--- END ---