BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.17.520 and 1977 ex.s. c 6 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
A state highway to be known as state route number 290 is
established as follows:
Beginning at a junction with state route number ((2)) 90 in
Spokane, thence northeasterly by way of Millwood, Trentwood, and Newman
Lake to the termination of Idaho state highway number 53 at the
Washington-Idaho boundary line((; also
Beginning at a junction with state route number 90 in Spokane,
thence northerly to a junction with state route number 290 in the
vicinity of Hamilton Street)).

--- END ---