BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 38.40 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The military department shall reimburse active duty national
guard members the cost of life insurance premiums for insurance
purchased through the federal service members' group life insurance
program. Reimbursements shall be made for premiums up to four hundred
thousand dollars in coverage and shall be made only when national guard
members are on active duty. Under this section, "active duty" means
deployed outside the United States.
(2) The governor, through the adjutant general, shall adopt rules
necessary to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2006, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---