BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of corrections shall, within available resources,
establish a public list, on the department's web site, of all high-risk
inmates who have escaped from correctional institutions and facilities
operated or contracted by the department.

--- END ---