BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that due in part to
the high cost of attending college, a significant number of students
attend higher education part time. The legislature further finds that
more than one-quarter of students cannot qualify for financial aid due
solely to their part-time status. Therefore, the legislature intends
to expand eligibility for the state need grant to include some students
who are enrolled on less than a half-time basis.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.92.080 and 2004 c 275 s 39 are each amended to
read as follows:
For a student to be eligible for a state need grant a student must:
(1) Be a "needy student" or "disadvantaged student" as determined
by the board in accordance with RCW 28B.92.030 (3) and (4).
(2) Have been domiciled within the state of Washington for at least
one year.
(3) Be enrolled or accepted for enrollment ((on at least a half-time basis)) for at least four credit hours per quarter, or the
semester or clock-hour equivalent as determined by the board, at an
institution of higher education in Washington as defined in RCW
28B.92.030(1).
(4) Have complied with all the rules and regulations adopted by the
board for the administration of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2005, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---