BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART 1
DEFINITIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Bed" means the land below the ordinary high water lines of
state waters. This definition does not include irrigation ditches,
canals, storm water runoff devices, or other artificial watercourses
except where they exist in a natural watercourse that has been altered
by man.
(2) "Board" means the hydraulic appeals board created in RCW
77.55.170 (as recodified by this act).
(3) "Commission" means the state fish and wildlife commission.
(4) "Department" means the department of fish and wildlife.
(5) "Director" means the director of the department of fish and
wildlife.
(6) "Emergency" means an immediate threat to life, the public,
property, or of environmental degradation.
(7) "Hydraulic project" means the construction or performance of
work that will use, divert, obstruct, or change the natural flow or bed
of any of the salt or freshwaters of the state.
(8) "Imminent danger" means a threat by weather, water flow, or
other natural conditions that is likely to occur within sixty days of
a request for a permit application.
(9) "Marina" means a public or private facility providing boat
moorage space, fuel, or commercial services. Commercial services
include but are not limited to overnight or live-aboard boating
accommodations.
(10) "Marine terminal" means a public or private commercial wharf
located in the navigable water of the state and used, or intended to be
used, as a port or facility for the storing, handling, transferring, or
transporting of goods to and from vessels.
(11) "Ordinary high water line" means the mark on the shores of all
water that will be found by examining the bed and banks and
ascertaining where the presence and action of waters are so common and
usual, and so long continued in ordinary years as to mark upon the soil
or vegetation a character distinct from the abutting upland. Provided,
that in any area where the ordinary high water line cannot be found,
the ordinary high water line adjoining saltwater is the line of mean
higher high water and the ordinary high water line adjoining fresh
water is the elevation of the mean annual flood.
(12) "Permit" means a hydraulic project approval permit issued
under this chapter.
(13) "Sandbars" includes, but is not limited to, sand, gravel,
rock, silt, and sediments.
(14) "Small scale prospecting and mining" means the use of only the
following methods: Pans; nonmotorized sluice boxes; concentrators; and
minirocker boxes for the discovery and recovery of minerals.
(15) "Spartina," "purple loosestrife," and "aquatic noxious weeds"
have the same meanings as defined in RCW 17.26.020.
(16) "Streambank stabilization" means those projects that prevent
or limit erosion, slippage, and mass wasting. These projects include,
but are not limited to, bank resloping, log and debris relocation or
removal, planting of woody vegetation, bank protection using rock or
woody material or placement of jetties or groins, gravel removal, or
erosion control.
(17) "Tide gate" means a one-way check valve that prevents the
backflow of tidal water.
(18) "Waters of the state" and "state waters" means all salt and
fresh waters waterward of the ordinary high water line and within the
territorial boundary of the state.

PART 2
DETERMINING HOW TO OBTAIN A HYDRAULIC PROJECT APPROVAL PERMIT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 (1) Except as provided in sections 301 and
303 of this act and RCW 77.55.330 (as recodified by this act), in the
event that any person or government agency desires to undertake a
hydraulic project, the person or government agency shall, before
commencing work thereon, secure the approval of the department in the
form of a permit as to the adequacy of the means proposed for the
protection of fish life.
(2) A complete written application for a permit may be submitted in
person or by registered mail and must contain the following:
(a) General plans for the overall project;
(b) Complete plans and specifications of the proposed construction
or work within the mean higher high water line in saltwater or within
the ordinary high water line in freshwater;
(c) Complete plans and specifications for the proper protection of
fish life; and
(d) Notice of compliance with any applicable requirements of the
state environmental policy act, unless otherwise provided for in this
chapter.
(3)(a) Protection of fish life is the only ground upon which
approval of a permit may be denied or conditioned. Approval of a
permit may not be unreasonably withheld or unreasonably conditioned.
Except as provided in this subsection and subsections (8), (10), and
(11) of this section, the department has forty-five calendar days upon
receipt of a complete application to grant or deny approval of a
permit. The forty-five day requirement is suspended if:
(i) After ten working days of receipt of the application, the
applicant remains unavailable or unable to arrange for a timely field
evaluation of the proposed project;
(ii) The site is physically inaccessible for inspection;
(iii) The applicant requests a delay; or
(iv) The department is issuing a permit for a storm water discharge
and is complying with the requirements of RCW 77.55.340(3)(b) (as
recodified by this act).
(b) Immediately upon determination that the forty-five day period
is suspended, the department shall notify the applicant in writing of
the reasons for the delay.
(c) The period of forty-five calendar days may be extended if the
permit is part of a multiagency permit streamlining effort and all
participating permitting agencies and the permit applicant agree to an
extended timeline longer than forty-five calendar days.
(4) If the department denies approval of a permit, the department
shall provide the applicant a written statement of the specific reasons
why and how the proposed project would adversely affect fish life.
Issuance, denial, conditioning, or modification of a permit shall be
appealable to the department or the board as specified in RCW 77.55.170
(as recodified by this act) within thirty days of the notice of
decision.
(5)(a) The permittee must demonstrate substantial progress on
construction of that portion of the project relating to the permit
within two years of the date of issuance.
(b) Approval of a permit is valid for a period of up to five years
from the date of issuance, except as provided in (c) of this subsection
and in RCW 77.55.220 (as recodified by this act).
(c) A permit remains in effect without need for periodic renewal
for hydraulic projects that divert water for agricultural irrigation or
stock watering purposes and that involve seasonal construction or other
work. A permit for streambank stabilization projects to protect farm
and agricultural land as defined in RCW 84.34.020 remains in effect
without need for periodic renewal if the problem causing the need for
the streambank stabilization occurs on an annual or more frequent
basis. The permittee must notify the appropriate agency before
commencing the construction or other work within the area covered by
the permit.
(6) The department may, after consultation with the permittee,
modify a permit due to changed conditions. The modification becomes
effective unless appealed to the department or the board as specified
in RCW 77.55.170 (as recodified by this act) within thirty days from
the notice of the proposed modification. For hydraulic projects that
divert water for agricultural irrigation or stock watering purposes, or
when the hydraulic project or other work is associated with streambank
stabilization to protect farm and agricultural land as defined in RCW
84.34.020, the burden is on the department to show that changed
conditions warrant the modification in order to protect fish life.
(7) A permittee may request modification of a permit due to changed
conditions. The request must be processed within forty-five calendar
days of receipt of the written request. A decision by the department
may be appealed to the board within thirty days of the notice of the
decision. For hydraulic projects that divert water for agricultural
irrigation or stock watering purposes, or when the hydraulic project or
other work is associated with streambank stabilization to protect farm
and agricultural land as defined in RCW 84.34.020, the burden is on the
permittee to show that changed conditions warrant the requested
modification and that such a modification will not impair fish life.
(8) The department or the county legislative authority may declare
and continue an emergency. The county legislative authority shall
immediately notify the department if it declares an emergency under
this subsection. The department, through its authorized
representatives, shall issue immediately, upon request, oral approval
for a stream crossing, or work to remove any obstructions, repair
existing structures, restore streambanks, protect fish life, or protect
property threatened by the stream or a change in the stream flow
without the necessity of obtaining a written permit prior to commencing
work. Conditions of the emergency oral permit must be established by
the department and reduced to writing within thirty days and complied
with as provided for in this chapter. The department may not require
the provisions of the state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C
RCW, to be met as a condition of issuing a permit under this
subsection.
(9) All state and local agencies with authority under this chapter
to issue permits or other authorizations in connection with emergency
water withdrawals and facilities authorized under RCW 43.83B.410 shall
expedite the processing of such permits or authorizations in keeping
with the emergency nature of such requests and shall provide a decision
to the applicant within fifteen calendar days of the date of
application.
(10) The department or the county legislative authority may
determine an imminent danger exists. The county legislative authority
shall notify the department, in writing, if it determines that an
imminent danger exists. In cases of imminent danger, the department
shall issue an expedited written permit, upon request, for work to
remove any obstructions, repair existing structures, restore banks,
protect fish resources, or protect property. Expedited permit requests
require a complete written application as provided in subsection (2) of
this section and must be issued within fifteen calendar days of the
receipt of a complete written application. Approval of an expedited
permit is valid for up to sixty days from the date of issuance. The
department may not require the provisions of the state environmental
policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, to be met as a condition of issuing a
permit under this subsection.
(11) The department may issue an expedited written permit in those
instances where normal permit processing would result in significant
hardship for the applicant or unacceptable damage to the environment.
Expedited permit requests require a complete written application as
provided in subsection (2) of this section and must be issued within
fifteen calendar days of the receipt of a complete written application.
Approval of an expedited permit is valid for up to sixty days from the
date of issuance. The department may not require the provisions of the
state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, to be met as a
condition of issuing a permit under this subsection.

PART 3
EXEMPTION FROM HYDRAULIC PROJECT APPROVAL
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 The act of driving across an established
ford is exempt from a permit. Driving across streams or on wetted
streambeds at areas other than established fords requires a permit.
Work within the ordinary high water line of state waters to construct
or repair a ford or crossing requires a permit.

Sec. 302 RCW 77.55.330 and 2002 c 20 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The removal of derelict fishing gear does not require ((written
approval)) a permit under this chapter if the gear is removed according
to the guidelines described in RCW 77.12.865.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 (1) An activity conducted solely for the
removal or control of spartina does not require a permit.
(2) An activity conducted solely for the removal or control of
purple loosestrife and which is performed with handheld tools, handheld
equipment, or equipment carried by a person does not require a permit.

PART 4
COMPLIANCE THROUGH GUIDELINES, AGREEMENTS, AND PAMPHLETS
Sec. 401 RCW 77.55.150 and 1995 c 255 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((An activity conducted solely for the removal or control of
spartina shall not require hydraulic project approval.
(2) An activity conducted solely for the removal or control of
purple loosestrife and which is performed with hand-held tools, hand-held equipment, or equipment carried by a person when used shall not
require hydraulic project approval.
(3))) By June 30, 1997, the department ((of fish and wildlife))
shall develop rules for projects conducted solely for the removal or
control of various aquatic noxious weeds other than spartina and purple
loosestrife and for activities or hydraulic projects for controlling
purple loosestrife not covered by ((subsection (2))) section 303(2) of
this ((section, which projects will use, divert, obstruct, or change
the natural flow or bed of any of the salt or fresh waters of the
state)) act. Following the adoption of the rules, the department shall
produce and distribute a pamphlet describing the methods of removing or
controlling the aquatic noxious weeds that are approved under the
rules. The pamphlet serves as the ((hydraulic project approval))
permit for any project that is conducted solely for the removal or
control of such aquatic noxious weeds and that is conducted as
described in the pamphlet((;)). No further ((hydraulic project
approval)) permit is required for such a project.
(2) From time to time as information becomes available, the
department shall adopt similar rules for additional aquatic noxious
weeds or additional activities for removing or controlling aquatic
noxious weeds not governed by ((subsection (1) or (2) of this section))
sections 303 (1) and (2) of this act and shall produce and distribute
one or more pamphlets describing these methods of removal or control.
Such a pamphlet serves as the ((hydraulic project approval)) permit for
any project that is conducted solely for the removal or control of such
aquatic noxious weeds and that is conducted as described in the
pamphlet((;)). No further ((hydraulic project approval)) permit is
required for such a project.
(((4) As used in this section, "spartina," "purple loosestrife,"
and "aquatic noxious weeds" have the meanings prescribed by RCW
17.26.020.
(5))) (3) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the department
((of fish and wildlife)) from requiring a ((hydraulic project
approval)) permit for those parts of hydraulic projects that are not
specifically for the control or removal of spartina, purple
loosestrife, or other aquatic noxious weeds.

Sec. 402 RCW 77.55.270 and 1997 c 415 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Small scale prospecting and mining shall not require ((written
approval)) a permit under this chapter if the prospecting is conducted
in accordance with ((provisions)) rules established by the department.
(2) By December 31, 1998, the department shall adopt rules
applicable to small scale prospecting and mining activities subject to
this section. The department shall develop the rules in cooperation
with the recreational mining community and other interested parties.
(3) Within two months of adoption of the rules, the department
shall distribute an updated gold and fish pamphlet that describes
methods of mineral prospecting that are consistent with the
department's rule. The pamphlet shall be written to clearly indicate
the prospecting methods that require ((written approval)) a permit
under this chapter and the prospecting methods that require compliance
with the pamphlet. To the extent possible, the department shall use
the provisions of the gold and fish pamphlet to minimize the number of
specific provisions of a written ((approval)) permit issued under this
chapter.
(((4) For the purposes of this chapter, "small scale prospecting
and mining" means only the use of the following methods: Pans,
nonmotorized sluice boxes, concentrators, and minirocker boxes for the
discovery and recovery of minerals.))

Sec. 403 RCW 77.55.280 and 2001 c 253 s 54 are each amended to
read as follows:
When a private landowner is applying for ((hydraulic project
approval)) a permit under this chapter and that landowner has entered
into a habitat incentives agreement with the department and the
department of natural resources as provided in RCW 77.55.300 (as
recodified by this act), the department shall comply with the terms of
that agreement when evaluating the request for ((hydraulic project
approval)) a permit.

Sec. 404 RCW 77.55.300 and 2000 c 107 s 229 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning in January 1998, the department ((of fish and
wildlife)) and the department of natural resources shall implement a
habitat incentives program based on the recommendations of federally
recognized Indian tribes, landowners, the regional fisheries
enhancement groups, the timber, fish, and wildlife cooperators, and
other interested parties. The program shall allow a private landowner
to enter into an agreement with the departments to enhance habitat on
the landowner's property for food fish, game fish, or other wildlife
species. In exchange, the landowner shall receive state regulatory
certainty with regard to future applications for ((hydraulic project
approval)) a permit or a forest practices permit on the property
covered by the agreement. The overall goal of the program is to
provide a mechanism that facilitates habitat development on private
property while avoiding an adverse state regulatory impact to the
landowner at some future date. A single agreement between the
departments and a landowner may encompass up to one thousand acres. A
landowner may enter into multiple agreements with the departments,
provided that the total acreage covered by such agreements with a
single landowner does not exceed ten thousand acres. The departments
are not obligated to enter into an agreement unless the departments
find that the agreement is in the best interest of protecting fish or
wildlife species or their habitat.
(2) A habitat incentives agreement shall be in writing and shall
contain at least the following: (a) A description of the property
covered by the agreement((,)); (b) an expiration date((,)); (c) a
description of the condition of the property prior to the
implementation of the agreement((,)); and (d) other information needed
by the landowner and the departments for future reference and
decisions.
(3) As part of the agreement, the department ((of fish and
wildlife)) may stipulate the factors that will be considered when the
department evaluates a landowner's application for ((hydraulic project
approval under RCW 77.55.100 or 77.55.110)) a permit on property
covered by the agreement. The department's identification of these
evaluation factors shall be in concurrence with the department of
natural resources and affected federally recognized Indian tribes. In
general, future decisions related to the issuance, conditioning, or
denial of ((hydraulic project approval shall)) a permit must be based
on the conditions present on the landowner's property at the time of
the agreement, unless all parties agree otherwise.
(4) As part of the agreement, the department of natural resources
may stipulate the factors that will be considered when the department
of natural resources evaluates a landowner's application for a forest
practices permit under chapter 76.09 RCW on property covered by the
agreement. The ((department's)) department of natural resources'
identification of these evaluation factors shall be in concurrence with
the department ((of fish and wildlife)) and affected federally
recognized Indian tribes. In general, future decisions related to the
issuance, conditioning, or denial of forest practices permits shall be
based on the conditions present on the landowner's property at the time
of the agreement, unless all parties agree otherwise.
(5) The agreement is binding on and may be used by only the
landowner who entered into the agreement with the department. The
agreement shall not be appurtenant with the land. However, if a new
landowner chooses to maintain the habitat enhancement efforts on the
property, the new landowner and the ((departments)) department and the
department of natural resources may jointly choose to retain the
agreement on the property.
(6) If the ((departments)) department and the department of natural
resources receive multiple requests for agreements with private
landowners under the habitat incentives program, the departments shall
prioritize these requests and shall enter into as many agreements as
possible within available budgetary resources.

Sec. 405 RCW 77.55.130 and 2000 c 107 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department and the department of ecology will work
cooperatively with the United States army corps of engineers to develop
a memorandum of agreement outlining dike vegetation management
guidelines so that dike owners are eligible for coverage under P.L.
84-99, and state requirements established pursuant to ((RCW 77.55.100
and 77.55.110)) section 201 of this act are met.

Sec. 406 RCW 77.55.010 and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 28 are each amended
to read as follows:
The department ((of fish and wildlife)), the department of ecology,
and the department of natural resources shall jointly develop an
informational brochure that describes when permits and any other
authorizations are required for flood damage prevention and reduction
projects, and recommends ways to best proceed through the various
regulatory permitting processes.

PART 5
SPECIAL PERMITS
Sec. 501 RCW 77.55.200 and 1991 c 279 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In order to protect the property of marine waterfront shoreline
owners it is necessary to facilitate issuance of ((hydraulic)) permits
for bulkheads or rockwalls under certain conditions.
(2) The department shall issue a ((hydraulic)) permit with or
without conditions within forty-five days of receipt of a complete and
accurate application which authorizes commencement of construction,
replacement, or repair of a marine beach front protective bulkhead or
rockwall for single-family type residences or property under the
following conditions:
(a) The waterward face of a new bulkhead or rockwall shall be
located only as far waterward as is necessary to excavate for footings
or place base rock for the structure and under no conditions shall be
located more than six feet waterward of the ordinary high water line;
(b) Any bulkhead or rockwall to replace or repair an existing
bulkhead or rockwall shall be placed along the same alignment as the
bulkhead or rockwall it is replacing((;)). However, the replaced or
repaired bulkhead or rockwall may be placed waterward of and directly
abutting the existing structure only in cases where removal of the
existing bulkhead or rockwall would result in environmental degradation
or removal problems related to geological, engineering, or safety
considerations; and
(c) Construction of a new bulkhead or rockwall, or replacement or
repair of an existing bulkhead or rockwall waterward of the existing
structure shall not result in the permanent loss of critical food fish
or shellfish habitats; and
(d) Timing constraints shall be applied on a case-by-case basis for
the protection of critical habitats, including but not limited to
migration corridors, rearing and feeding areas, and spawning habitats,
for the proper protection of fish life.
(3) Any bulkhead or rockwall construction, replacement, or repair
not meeting the conditions in this section shall be processed under
this chapter in the same manner as any other application.
(4) Any person aggrieved by the approval, denial, conditioning, or
modification of a ((hydraulic)) permit ((approval)) under this section
may formally appeal the decision to the ((hydraulic appeals)) board
pursuant to this chapter.

Sec. 502 RCW 77.55.220 and 2002 c 368 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Marina" means a public or private facility providing boat
moorage space, fuel, or commercial services. Commercial services
include but are not limited to overnight or live-aboard boating
accommodations.
(b) "Marine terminal" means a public or private commercial wharf
located in the navigable water of the state and used, or intended to be
used, as a port or facility for the storing, handling, transferring, or
transporting of goods to and from vessels.
(2))) For a marina or marine terminal in existence on June 6, 1996,
or a marina or marine terminal that has received a ((hydraulic project
approval)) permit for its initial construction, a renewable, five-year
((hydraulic project approval)) permit shall be issued, upon request,
for regular maintenance activities of the marina or marine terminal.
(((3))) (2) Upon construction of a new marina or marine terminal
that has received ((hydraulic project approval)) a permit, a renewable,
five-year ((hydraulic project approval)) permit shall be issued, upon
request, for regular maintenance activities of the marina or marine
terminal.
(((4))) (3) For the purposes of this section, regular maintenance
activities are only those activities necessary to restore the marina or
marine terminal to the conditions approved in the initial ((hydraulic
project approval)) permit. These activities may include, but are not
limited to, dredging, piling replacement, and float replacement.
(((5))) (4) The five-year permit must include a requirement that a
fourteen-day notice be given to the department before regular
maintenance activities begin.

Sec. 503 RCW 77.55.340 and 2002 c 368 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, all
((hydraulic project approvals)) permits related to storm water
discharges must follow the provisions established in this section.
(2) ((Hydraulic project approvals)) Permits issued in locations
covered by a national pollution discharge elimination system municipal
storm water general permit may not be conditioned or denied for water
quality or quantity impacts arising from storm water discharges. A
((hydraulic project approval)) permit is required only for the actual
construction of any storm water outfall or associated structures
pursuant to this chapter.
(3)(a) In locations not covered by a national pollution discharge
elimination system municipal storm water general permit, the department
may issue ((hydraulic project approvals)) permits that contain
provisions that protect fish life from adverse effects, such as
scouring or erosion of the bed of the water body, resulting from the
direct hydraulic impacts of the discharge.
(b) Prior to the issuance of a ((hydraulic project approval))
permit issued under this subsection (3), the department must:
(i) Make a finding that the discharge from the outfall will cause
harmful effects to fish life;
(ii) Transmit the findings to the applicant and to the city or
county where the project is being proposed; and
(iii) Allow the applicant an opportunity to use local ordinances or
other mechanisms to avoid the adverse effects resulting from the direct
hydraulic discharge. The forty-five day requirement for ((hydraulic
project approval)) permit issuance ((pursuant to RCW 77.55.100)) under
section 201 of this act is suspended during the time period the
department is meeting the requirements of this subsection (3)(b).
(c) After following the procedures set forth in (b) of this
subsection, the department may issue a ((hydraulic project approval))
permit that prescribes the discharge rates from an outfall structure
that will prevent adverse effects to the bed or flow of the waterway.
The department may recommend, but not specify, the measures required to
meet these discharge rates. The department may not require changes to
the project design above the mean higher high water mark of marine
waters, or the ordinary high water mark of freshwaters of the state.
Nothing in this section alters any authority the department may have to
regulate other types of projects under this chapter.

Sec. 504 RCW 77.55.210 and 1995 c 378 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
A ((hydraulic project approval)) permit required by the department
for a watershed restoration project as defined in RCW 89.08.460 shall
be processed in compliance with RCW 89.08.450 through 89.08.510.

Sec. 505 RCW 77.55.290 and 2001 c 253 s 55 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In order to receive the permit review and approval process
created in this section, a fish habitat enhancement project must meet
the criteria under (a) and (b) of this subsection:
(a) A fish habitat enhancement project must be a project to
accomplish one or more of the following tasks:
(i) Elimination of human-made fish passage barriers, including
culvert repair and replacement;
(ii) Restoration of an eroded or unstable streambank employing the
principle of bioengineering, including limited use of rock as a
stabilization only at the toe of the bank, and with primary emphasis on
using native vegetation to control the erosive forces of flowing water;
or
(iii) Placement of woody debris or other instream structures that
benefit naturally reproducing fish stocks.
The department shall develop size or scale threshold tests to
determine if projects accomplishing any of these tasks should be
evaluated under the process created in this section or under other
project review and approval processes. A project proposal shall not be
reviewed under the process created in this section if the department
determines that the scale of the project raises concerns regarding
public health and safety; and
(b) A fish habitat enhancement project must be approved in one of
the following ways:
(i) By the department pursuant to chapter 77.95 or 77.100 RCW;
(ii) By the sponsor of a watershed restoration plan as provided in
chapter 89.08 RCW;
(iii) By the department as a department-sponsored fish habitat
enhancement or restoration project;
(iv) Through the review and approval process for the jobs for the
environment program;
(v) Through the review and approval process for conservation
district-sponsored projects, where the project complies with design
standards established by the conservation commission through
interagency agreement with the United States fish and wildlife service
and the natural resource conservation service;
(vi) Through a formal grant program established by the legislature
or the department for fish habitat enhancement or restoration; and
(vii) Through other formal review and approval processes
established by the legislature.
(2) Fish habitat enhancement projects meeting the criteria of
subsection (1) of this section are expected to result in beneficial
impacts to the environment. Decisions pertaining to fish habitat
enhancement projects meeting the criteria of subsection (1) of this
section and being reviewed and approved according to the provisions of
this section are not subject to the requirements of RCW
43.21C.030(2)(c).
(3) ((Hydraulic project approval)) (a) A permit is required for
projects that meet the criteria of subsection (1) of this section and
are being reviewed and approved under this section. An applicant shall
use a joint aquatic resource permit application form developed by the
((department of ecology permit)) office of regulatory assistance
((center)) to apply for approval under this chapter. On the same day,
the applicant shall provide copies of the completed application form to
the department and to each appropriate local government. Local
governments shall accept the application as notice of the proposed
project. The department shall provide a fifteen-day comment period
during which it will receive comments regarding environmental impacts.
((In no more than)) Within forty-five days, the department shall either
issue ((hydraulic project approval)) a permit, with or without
conditions, deny approval, or make a determination that the review and
approval process created by this section is not appropriate for the
proposed project. The department shall base this determination on
identification during the comment period of adverse impacts that cannot
be mitigated by ((hydraulic project approval)) the conditioning of a
permit. If the department determines that the review and approval
process created by this section is not appropriate for the proposed
project, the department shall notify the applicant and the appropriate
local governments of its determination. The applicant may reapply for
approval of the project under other review and approval processes.
(b) Any person aggrieved by the approval, denial, conditioning, or
modification of ((hydraulic project approval)) a permit under this
section may formally appeal the decision to the ((hydraulic appeals))
board pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.
(4) No local government may require permits or charge fees for fish
habitat enhancement projects that meet the criteria of subsection (1)
of this section and that are reviewed and approved according to the
provisions of this section.

Sec. 506 RCW 77.55.160 and 1998 c 190 s 89 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except for the north fork of the Lewis river and the White
Salmon river, all streams and rivers tributary to the Columbia river
downstream from McNary dam are established as an anadromous fish
sanctuary. This sanctuary is created to preserve and develop the food
fish and game fish resources in these streams and rivers and to protect
them against undue industrial encroachment.
(2) Within the sanctuary area:
(a) The department shall not issue ((hydraulic project approval))
a permit to construct a dam greater than twenty-five feet high within
the migration range of anadromous fish as determined by the department.
(b) A person shall not divert water from rivers and streams in
quantities that will reduce the respective stream flow below the annual
average low flow, based upon data published in United States geological
survey reports.
(3) The commission may acquire and abate a dam or other
obstruction, or acquire any water right vested on a sanctuary stream or
river, which is in conflict with the provisions of subsection (2) of
this section.
(4) Subsection (2)(a) of this section does not apply to the
sediment retention structure to be built on the North Fork Toutle river
by the United States army corps of engineers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 507 A landscape management plan approved by
the department and the department of natural resources under RCW
76.09.350(2) shall serve as a permit for the life of the plan if fish
are selected as one of the public resources for coverage under such a
plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 508 The department shall, at the request of a
county, develop five-year maintenance permit agreements, consistent
with comprehensive flood control management plans adopted under the
authority of RCW 86.12.200, or other watershed plan approved by a
county legislative authority, to allow for work on public and private
property for bank stabilization, bridge repair, removal of sandbars and
debris, channel maintenance, and other flood damage repair and
reduction activity under agreed-upon conditions and times without
obtaining permits for specific projects.

PART 6
DENIAL OR CONDITIONING OF PERMIT
Sec. 601 RCW 77.55.350 and 2002 c 368 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Conditions imposed upon ((hydraulic project approvals)) a
permit must be reasonably related to the project. The permit
conditions must ensure that the project provides proper protection for
fish life, but the department may not impose conditions that attempt to
optimize conditions for fish life that are out of proportion to the
impact of the proposed project.
(2) The permit must contain provisions allowing for minor
modifications to the plans and specifications without requiring
reissuance of the permit.

Sec. 602 RCW 77.55.230 and 1996 c 276 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the construction of hydraulic
projects may require mitigation for the protection of fish life, and
that the mitigation may be most cost-effective and provide the most
benefit to the fish resource if the mitigation is allowed to be applied
in locations that are off-site of the hydraulic project location. The
department may approve off-site mitigation plans that are submitted by
((hydraulic project)) permit applicants.
(2) If a ((hydraulic project)) permit applicant proposes off-site
mitigation and the department does not approve the ((hydraulic)) permit
or conditions the permit ((approval)) in such a manner as to render
off-site mitigation unpracticable, the ((hydraulic)) project proponent
must be given the opportunity to submit the ((hydraulic project))
permit application to the ((hydraulic appeals)) board for approval.

Sec. 603 RCW 77.55.090 and 2000 c 107 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
When reviewing a mitigation plan under ((RCW 77.55.100 or
77.55.110)) section 201 of this act, the department shall, at the
request of the project proponent, follow the guidance contained in RCW
90.74.005 through 90.74.030.

Sec. 604 RCW 77.55.120 and 2000 c 107 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever the placement of woody debris is required as a condition
of a ((hydraulic)) permit ((approval)) issued ((pursuant to RCW
77.55.100 or 77.55.110)) under section 201 of this act, the department,
upon request, shall invite comment regarding that placement from the
local governmental authority, affected tribes, affected federal and
state agencies, and the project applicant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605 (1) The department may not require a
fishway on a tide gate, flood gate, or other associated man-made
agricultural drainage facilities as a condition of a permit if such a
fishway was not originally installed as part of an agricultural
drainage system existing on or before May 20, 2003.
(2) Any condition requiring a self-regulating tide gate to achieve
fish passage in an existing permit under this chapter may not be
enforced.

PART 7
PENALTIES
Sec. 701 RCW 77.55.140 and 2000 c 107 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department may levy civil penalties of up to one hundred
dollars per day for violation of any provisions of ((RCW 77.55.100 or
77.55.110)) section 201 of this act. The penalty provided shall be
imposed by notice in writing, either by certified mail or personal
service to the person incurring the penalty, from the director or the
director's designee describing the violation.
(2) Any person incurring any penalty under this chapter may appeal
the same under chapter 34.05 RCW to the director. Appeals shall be
filed within thirty days of receipt of notice imposing any penalty.
(3) The penalty imposed shall become due and payable thirty days
after receipt of a notice imposing the penalty unless an appeal is
filed. Whenever an appeal of any penalty incurred under this chapter
is filed, the penalty shall become due and payable only upon completion
of all review proceedings and the issuance of a final order confirming
the penalty in whole or in part.
(4) If the amount of any penalty is not paid within thirty days
after it becomes due and payable, the attorney general, upon the
request of the director, shall bring an action in the name of the state
of Washington in the superior court of Thurston county or of any county
in which such violator may do business, to recover such penalty. In
all such actions the procedure and rules of evidence shall be the same
as an ordinary civil action. All penalties recovered under this
section shall be paid into the state's general fund.

PART 8
APPEALS
Sec. 801 RCW 77.55.170 and 2003 c 393 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is ((hereby)) created within the environmental hearings
office under RCW 43.21B.005 the hydraulic appeals board of the state of
Washington.
(2) The ((hydraulic appeals)) board ((shall)) consists of three
members: The director of the department of ecology or the director's
designee, the director of the department of agriculture or the
director's designee, and the director or the director's designee of the
department ((whose action is appealed under subsection (6) of this
section)). A decision must be agreed to by at least two members of the
board to be final.
(3) The board may adopt rules necessary for the conduct of its
powers and duties or for transacting other official business.
(4) The board shall make findings of fact and prepare a written
decision in each case decided by it((, and that)). The finding and
decision shall be effective upon being signed by two or more board
members and upon being filed at the ((hydraulic appeals)) board's
principal office, and shall be open to public inspection at all
reasonable times.
(5) The board has exclusive jurisdiction to hear appeals arising
from the approval, denial, conditioning, or modification of a
((hydraulic approval)) permit issued by the department: (a) Under the
authority granted in ((RCW 77.55.110)) section 201 of this act for the
diversion of water for agricultural irrigation or stock watering
purposes or when associated with streambank stabilization to protect
farm and agricultural land as defined in RCW 84.34.020; ((or)) (b)
under the authority granted in RCW 77.55.230 (as recodified by this
act) for off-site mitigation proposals; (c) under the authority granted
in RCW 77.55.200 (as recodified by this act); or (d) under the
authority granted in RCW 77.55.290 (as recodified by this act).
(6)(a) Any person aggrieved by the approval, denial, conditioning,
or modification of a ((hydraulic approval pursuant to RCW 77.55.110))
permit under section 201 of this act may, except as otherwise provided
in chapter 43.21L RCW, seek review from the board by filing a request
for the same within thirty days of notice of the approval, denial,
conditioning, or modification of ((such approval)) the permit.
(b) The review proceedings authorized in (a) of this subsection are
subject to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW pertaining to procedures
in adjudicative proceedings.

Sec. 802 RCW 77.55.180 and 1995 c 382 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In all appeals, the ((hydraulic appeals)) board shall have all
powers relating to administration of oaths, issuance of subpoenas, and
taking of depositions, but such powers shall be exercised in conformity
with chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) In all appeals, the ((hydraulic appeals)) board, and each
member thereof, shall be subject to all duties imposed upon and shall
have all powers granted to, an agency by those provisions of chapter
34.05 RCW relating to adjudicative proceedings.
(3) All proceedings before the ((hydraulic appeals)) board or any
of its members shall be conducted in accordance with such rules of
practice and procedure as the board may prescribe. Such rules shall be
published and distributed.
(4) Judicial review of a decision of the ((hydraulic appeals))
board may be obtained only pursuant to RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598.

PART 9
FISHWAYS, FLOW, AND SCREENING
Sec. 901 RCW 77.55.040 and 1998 c 190 s 85 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A diversion device used for conducting water from a lake,
river, or stream for any purpose shall be equipped with a fish guard
approved by the director to prevent the passage of fish into the
diversion device. The fish guard shall be maintained at all times when
water is taken into the diversion device. The fish guards shall be
installed at places and times prescribed by the director upon thirty
days' notice to the owner of the diversion device.
(2) Each day the diversion device is not equipped with an approved
fish guard is a separate offense. If within thirty days after notice
to equip a diversion device the owner fails to do so, the director may
take possession of the diversion device and close the device until it
is properly equipped. Expenses incurred by the department constitute
the value of a lien upon the diversion device and upon the real and
personal property of the owner. Notice of the lien shall be filed and
recorded in the office of the county auditor of the county in which the
action is taken.

Sec. 902 RCW 77.55.050 and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 29 are each amended
to read as follows:
It is the policy of this state that a flow of water sufficient to
support game fish and food fish populations be maintained at all times
in the streams of this state.
The director of ecology shall give the director notice of each
application for a permit to divert or store water. The director has
thirty days after receiving the notice to state his or her objections
to the application. The permit shall not be issued until the thirty-day period has elapsed.
The director of ecology may refuse to issue a permit if, in the
opinion of the director of ecology, issuing the permit might result in
lowering the flow of water in a stream below the flow necessary to
adequately support food fish and game fish populations in the stream.
The provisions of this section shall in no way affect existing
water rights.

Sec. 903 RCW 77.55.060 and 2003 c 391 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, a dam or other
obstruction across or in a stream shall be provided with a durable and
efficient fishway approved by the director. Plans and specifications
shall be provided to the department prior to the director's approval.
The fishway shall be maintained in an effective condition and
continuously supplied with sufficient water to freely pass fish.
(2)(a) If a person fails to construct and maintain a fishway or to
remove the dam or obstruction in a manner satisfactory to the director,
then within thirty days after written notice to comply has been served
upon the owner, his or her agent, or the person in charge, the director
may construct a fishway or remove the dam or obstruction. Expenses
incurred by the department constitute the value of a lien upon the dam
and upon the personal property of the person owning the dam. Notice of
the lien shall be filed and recorded in the office of the county
auditor of the county in which the dam or obstruction is situated. The
lien may be foreclosed in an action brought in the name of the state.
(b) If, within thirty days after notice to construct a fishway or
remove a dam or obstruction, the owner, his or her agent, or the person
in charge fails to do so, the dam or obstruction is a public nuisance
and the director may take possession of the dam or obstruction and
destroy it. No liability shall attach for the destruction.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "other obstruction" does not
include tide gates, flood gates, and associated man-made agricultural
drainage facilities that were originally installed as part of an
agricultural drainage system on or before May 20, 2003, or the repair,
replacement, or improvement of such tide gates or flood gates.

Sec. 904 RCW 77.55.320 and 2001 c 253 s 48 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person shall not divert water from a lake, river, or stream
containing game fish unless the water diversion device is equipped at
or near its intake with a fish guard or screen to prevent the passage
of game fish into the device and, if necessary, with a means of
returning game fish from immediately in front of the fish guard or
screen to the waters of origin. A person who was, on June 11, 1947,
otherwise lawfully diverting water from a lake, river, or stream shall
not be deemed guilty of a violation of this section.
(2) Plans for the fish guard, screen, and bypass shall be approved
by the director prior to construction. The installation shall be
approved by the director prior to the diversion of water.
(3) The director or the director's designee may close a water
diversion device operated in violation of this section and keep it
closed until it is properly equipped with a fish guard, screen, or
bypass.

PART 10
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001 The following sections are each codified
or recodified in chapter 77.55 RCW in the following order:
Section 101 of this act
Section 201 of this act
Section 301 of this act
RCW 77.55.330
Section 303 of this act
RCW 77.55.030
RCW 77.55.360
RCW 77.55.150
RCW 77.55.270
RCW 77.55.020
RCW 77.55.280
RCW 77.55.300
RCW 77.55.130
RCW 77.55.200
RCW 77.55.220
RCW 77.55.340
RCW 77.55.210
RCW 77.55.290
RCW 77.55.160
Section 507 of this act
RCW 77.55.010
Section 508 of this act
RCW 77.55.350
RCW 77.55.230
RCW 77.55.090
RCW 77.55.120
RCW 77.55.260
Section 605 of this act
RCW 77.55.140
RCW 77.55.170
RCW 77.55.180.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1002 The following sections are each
recodified as a new chapter in Title 77 RCW in the following order:
RCW 77.55.040
RCW 77.55.050
RCW 77.55.060
RCW 77.55.070
RCW 77.55.080
RCW 77.55.310
RCW 77.55.320
RCW 77.55.240.

Sec. 1003 RCW 76.09.050 and 2003 c 314 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall establish by rule which forest practices shall
be included within each of the following classes:
Class I: Minimal or specific forest practices that have no direct
potential for damaging a public resource and that may be conducted
without submitting an application or a notification except that when
the regulating authority is transferred to a local governmental entity,
those Class I forest practices that involve timber harvesting or road
construction within "urban growth areas," designated pursuant to
chapter 36.70A RCW, are processed as Class IV forest practices, but are
not subject to environmental review under chapter 43.21C RCW;
Class II: Forest practices which have a less than ordinary
potential for damaging a public resource that may be conducted without
submitting an application and may begin five calendar days, or such
lesser time as the department may determine, after written notification
by the operator, in the manner, content, and form as prescribed by the
department, is received by the department. However, the work may not
begin until all forest practice fees required under RCW 76.09.065 have
been received by the department. Class II shall not include forest
practices:
(a) On lands platted after January 1, 1960, as provided in chapter
58.17 RCW or on lands that have or are being converted to another use;
(b) Which require approvals under the provisions of the hydraulics
act, ((RCW 77.55.100)) section 201 of this act;
(c) Within "shorelines of the state" as defined in RCW 90.58.030;
(d) Excluded from Class II by the board; or
(e) Including timber harvesting or road construction within "urban
growth areas," designated pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW, which are
Class IV;
Class III: Forest practices other than those contained in Class I,
II, or IV. A Class III application must be approved or disapproved by
the department within thirty calendar days from the date the department
receives the application. However, the applicant may not begin work on
that forest practice until all forest practice fees required under RCW
76.09.065 have been received by the department;
Class IV: Forest practices other than those contained in Class I
or II: (a) On lands platted after January 1, 1960, as provided in
chapter 58.17 RCW, (b) on lands that have or are being converted to
another use, (c) on lands which, pursuant to RCW 76.09.070 as now or
hereafter amended, are not to be reforested because of the likelihood
of future conversion to urban development, (d) involving timber
harvesting or road construction on lands that are contained within
"urban growth areas," designated pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW, except
where the forest landowner provides: (i) A written statement of intent
signed by the forest landowner not to convert to a use other than
commercial forest product operations for ten years, accompanied by
either a written forest management plan acceptable to the department or
documentation that the land is enrolled under the provisions of chapter
84.33 RCW; or (ii) a conversion option harvest plan approved by the
local governmental entity and submitted to the department as part of
the application, and/or (e) which have a potential for a substantial
impact on the environment and therefore require an evaluation by the
department as to whether or not a detailed statement must be prepared
pursuant to the state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW.
Such evaluation shall be made within ten days from the date the
department receives the application: PROVIDED, That nothing herein
shall be construed to prevent any local or regional governmental entity
from determining that a detailed statement must be prepared for an
action pursuant to a Class IV forest practice taken by that
governmental entity concerning the land on which forest practices will
be conducted. A Class IV application must be approved or disapproved
by the department within thirty calendar days from the date the
department receives the application, unless the department determines
that a detailed statement must be made, in which case the application
must be approved or disapproved by the department within sixty calendar
days from the date the department receives the application, unless the
commissioner of public lands, through the promulgation of a formal
order, determines that the process cannot be completed within such
period. However, the applicant may not begin work on that forest
practice until all forest practice fees required under RCW 76.09.065
have been received by the department.
Forest practices under Classes I, II, and III are exempt from the
requirements for preparation of a detailed statement under the state
environmental policy act.
(2) Except for those forest practices being regulated by local
governmental entities as provided elsewhere in this chapter, no Class
II, Class III, or Class IV forest practice shall be commenced or
continued after January 1, 1975, unless the department has received a
notification with regard to a Class II forest practice or approved an
application with regard to a Class III or Class IV forest practice
containing all information required by RCW 76.09.060 as now or
hereafter amended. However, in the event forest practices regulations
necessary for the scheduled implementation of this chapter and RCW
90.48.420 have not been adopted in time to meet such schedules, the
department shall have the authority to regulate forest practices and
approve applications on such terms and conditions consistent with this
chapter and RCW 90.48.420 and the purposes and policies of RCW
76.09.010 until applicable forest practices regulations are in effect.
(3) Except for those forest practices being regulated by local
governmental entities as provided elsewhere in this chapter, if a
notification or application is delivered in person to the department by
the operator or the operator's agent, the department shall immediately
provide a dated receipt thereof. In all other cases, the department
shall immediately mail a dated receipt to the operator.
(4) Except for those forest practices being regulated by local
governmental entities as provided elsewhere in this chapter, forest
practices shall be conducted in accordance with the forest practices
regulations, orders and directives as authorized by this chapter or the
forest practices regulations, and the terms and conditions of any
approved applications.
(5) Except for those forest practices being regulated by local
governmental entities as provided elsewhere in this chapter, the
department of natural resources shall notify the applicant in writing
of either its approval of the application or its disapproval of the
application and the specific manner in which the application fails to
comply with the provisions of this section or with the forest practices
regulations. Except as provided otherwise in this section, if the
department fails to either approve or disapprove an application or any
portion thereof within the applicable time limit, the application shall
be deemed approved and the operation may be commenced: PROVIDED, That
this provision shall not apply to applications which are neither
approved nor disapproved pursuant to the provisions of subsection (7)
of this section: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That if seasonal field conditions
prevent the department from being able to properly evaluate the
application, the department may issue an approval conditional upon
further review within sixty days: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the
department shall have until April 1, 1975, to approve or disapprove an
application involving forest practices allowed to continue to April 1,
1975, under the provisions of subsection (2) of this section. Upon
receipt of any notification or any satisfactorily completed application
the department shall in any event no later than two business days after
such receipt transmit a copy to the departments of ecology and fish and
wildlife, and to the county, city, or town in whose jurisdiction the
forest practice is to be commenced. Any comments by such agencies
shall be directed to the department of natural resources.
(6) For those forest practices regulated by the board and the
department, if the county, city, or town believes that an application
is inconsistent with this chapter, the forest practices regulations, or
any local authority consistent with RCW 76.09.240 as now or hereafter
amended, it may so notify the department and the applicant, specifying
its objections.
(7) For those forest practices regulated by the board and the
department, the department shall not approve portions of applications
to which a county, city, or town objects if:
(a) The department receives written notice from the county, city,
or town of such objections within fourteen business days from the time
of transmittal of the application to the county, city, or town, or one
day before the department acts on the application, whichever is later;
and
(b) The objections relate to lands either:
(i) Platted after January 1, 1960, as provided in chapter 58.17
RCW; or
(ii) On lands that have or are being converted to another use.
The department shall either disapprove those portions of such
application or appeal the county, city, or town objections to the
appeals board. If the objections related to subparagraphs (b)(i) and
(ii) of this subsection are based on local authority consistent with
RCW 76.09.240 as now or hereafter amended, the department shall
disapprove the application until such time as the county, city, or town
consents to its approval or such disapproval is reversed on appeal.
The applicant shall be a party to all department appeals of county,
city, or town objections. Unless the county, city, or town either
consents or has waived its rights under this subsection, the department
shall not approve portions of an application affecting such lands until
the minimum time for county, city, or town objections has expired.
(8) For those forest practices regulated by the board and the
department, in addition to any rights under the above paragraph, the
county, city, or town may appeal any department approval of an
application with respect to any lands within its jurisdiction. The
appeals board may suspend the department's approval in whole or in part
pending such appeal where there exists potential for immediate and
material damage to a public resource.
(9) For those forest practices regulated by the board and the
department, appeals under this section shall be made to the appeals
board in the manner and time provided in RCW 76.09.220(8). In such
appeals there shall be no presumption of correctness of either the
county, city, or town or the department position.
(10) For those forest practices regulated by the board and the
department, the department shall, within four business days notify the
county, city, or town of all notifications, approvals, and disapprovals
of an application affecting lands within the county, city, or town,
except to the extent the county, city, or town has waived its right to
such notice.
(11) For those forest practices regulated by the board and the
department, a county, city, or town may waive in whole or in part its
rights under this section, and may withdraw or modify any such waiver,
at any time by written notice to the department.
(12) Notwithstanding subsections (2) through (5) of this section,
forest practices applications or notifications are not required for
exotic insect and disease control operations conducted in accordance
with RCW 76.09.060(8) where eradication can reasonably be expected.

Sec. 1004 RCW 77.12.865 and 2002 c 20 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) As used in this section and RCW 77.12.870, "derelict fishing
gear" includes lost or abandoned fishing nets, fishing lines, crab
pots, shrimp pots, and other commercial and recreational fishing
equipment. The term does not include lost or abandoned vessels.
(2) The department, in partnership with the Northwest straits
commission, the department of natural resources, and other interested
parties, must publish guidelines for the safe removal and disposal of
derelict fishing gear. The guidelines must be completed by August 31,
2002, and made available to any person interested in derelict fishing
gear removal.
(3) Derelict fishing gear removal conducted in accordance with the
guidelines prepared in subsection (2) of this section is not subject to
permitting under ((RCW 77.55.100)) section 201 of this act.

Sec. 1005 RCW 77.65.250 and 2000 c 107 s 46 are each amended to
read as follows:
A hardshell clam mechanical harvester fishery license is required
to operate a mechanical or hydraulic device for commercially harvesting
clams, other than geoduck clams, unless the requirements of ((RCW
77.55.100)) section 201 of this act are fulfilled for the proposed
activity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1006 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 77.55.100 (Hydraulic projects or other work -- Plans and
specifications -- Permits -- Approval -- Emergencies -- Tide gates) and 2004 c
32 s 2, 2003 c 391 s 2, 2002 c 368 s 2, 2000 c 107 s 16, & 1998 c 190
s 87;
(2) RCW 77.55.110 (Hydraulic projects for irrigation, stock
watering, or streambank stabilization -- Plans and specifications--Approval -- Emergencies) and 2002 c 368 s 3, 1998 c 190 s 88, 1993 sp.s.
c 2 s 32, 1991 c 322 s 31, 1988 c 272 s 2, 1988 c 36 s 34, & 1986 c 173
s 2;
(3) RCW 77.55.190 (Processing of permits or authorizations for
emergency water withdrawal and facilities to be expedited) and 1989 c
171 s 8 & 1987 c 343 s 6;
(4) RCW 77.55.250 (Wetlands filled under RCW 75.20.300 -- Mitigation
not required) and 2000 c 107 s 21 & 1995 c 328 s 1; and
(5) RCW 77.55.370 ("Tide gate" defined) and 2003 c 391 s 6.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1007 Part headings used in this act are not
any part of the law.

--- END ---