BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) If a check as defined in RCW 62A.3-104
is dishonored by nonacceptance or nonpayment and the check is assigned
or written to a collection agency as defined in RCW 19.16.100, the
collection agency may collect a reasonable handling fee for each
instrument. If the collection agency or its agent provides a notice of
dishonor in the form provided in section 2 of this act to the drawer
and the check amount plus the reasonable handling fee are not paid
within thirty-three days after providing the notice of dishonor, then,
unless the instrument otherwise provides, the drawer of the instrument
is liable for payment of interest at the rate of twelve percent per
annum from the date of dishonor, and a cost of collection of forty
dollars or the face amount of the check, whichever is less, payable to
the collection agency. In addition, in the event of court action on
the check and after notice and the expiration of the thirty-three days,
the court shall award reasonable attorneys' fees, and three times the
face amount of the check or three hundred dollars, whichever is less,
as part of the damages payable to the collection agency. This section
does not apply to an instrument that is dishonored by reason of a
justifiable stop payment order.
(2) Subsequent to the commencement of an action on the check under
subsection (1) of this section but prior to the hearing, the defendant
may tender to the plaintiff as satisfaction of the claim, an amount of
money equal to the face amount of the check, a reasonable handling fee,
accrued interest, collection costs equal to the face amount of the
check not to exceed forty dollars, and the incurred court costs,
service costs, and statutory attorneys' fees.
(3) Nothing in this section precludes the right to commence action
in a court under chapter 12.40 RCW for small claims.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) If a check is assigned or written to a
collection agency as defined in RCW 19.16.100 and the collection agency
or its agent provides a notice of dishonor, the notice of dishonor may
be sent by mail to the drawer at the drawer's last known address. The
drawer is conclusively presumed to have received the notice of dishonor
on the third day from the date it is mailed. The collection agency
may, as an alternative to providing a notice in the form described in
RCW 62A.3-520, provide a notice in substantially the following form:

NOTICE OF DISHONOR OF CHECK

A check drawn by you and made payable by you to . . . . . . in the
amount of . . . . . . has not been accepted for payment by . . . . . .,
which is the drawee bank designated on your check. This check is dated
. . . . . ., and it is numbered, No. . . . . . ..
You are CAUTIONED that unless you pay the amount of this check and
a handling fee of . . . . . within thirty-three days after the date
this letter is postmarked or personally delivered, you may very well
have to pay the following additional amounts:
(a) Costs of collecting the amount of the check in the lesser of
the check amount or forty dollars, plus, in the event of legal action,
court costs and attorneys' fees, which will be set by the court;
(b) Interest on the amount of the check which shall accrue at the
rate of twelve percent per annum from the date of dishonor; and
(c) Three hundred dollars or three times the face amount of the
check, whichever is less, by award of the court.
You are also CAUTIONED that law enforcement agencies may be
provided with a copy of this notice of dishonor and the check drawn by
you for the possibility of proceeding with criminal charges if you do
not pay the amount of this check within thirty-three days after the
date this letter is postmarked.
You are advised to make your payment of $. . . . . to . . . . . .
at the following address: . . . . . . . . . .
(2) The cautionary statement regarding law enforcement in
subsection (1) of this section need not be included in a notice of
dishonor sent by a collection agency. However, if included and whether
or not the collection agency regularly refers dishonored checks to law
enforcement, the cautionary statement in subsection (1) of this section
shall not be construed as a threat to take any action not intended to
be taken or that cannot legally be taken; nor shall it be construed to
be harassing, oppressive, or abusive conduct; nor shall it be construed
to be a false, deceptive, or misleading representation; nor shall it be
construed to be unfair or unconscionable; nor shall it otherwise be
construed to violate any law.
(3) In addition to sending a notice of dishonor to the drawer of
the check under this section, the person sending notice shall execute
an affidavit certifying service of the notice by mail. The affidavit
of service by mail must be substantially in the following form:

AFFIDAVIT OF SERVICE BY MAIL

I, . . . . . ., hereby certify that on the . . . . . . day of
. . . . . ., 20. . ., a copy of the foregoing Notice was served on
. . . . . . by mailing via the United States Postal Service, postage
prepaid, at . . . . . ., Washington.
Dated: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
(Signature)

(4) The person enforcing a check under this section may retain the
affidavit or may file the affidavit and check, or a true copy thereof,
with the clerk of the court in which an action on the check is
commenced as permitted by court rule or practice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 No interest, collection costs, and
attorneys' fees, except handling fees, are recoverable on any
dishonored check under the provisions of section 1 of this act where a
collection agency or its agent, employee, or assign has demanded:
(1) Interest or collection costs in excess of that provided by
section 1 of this act; or
(2) Interest or collection costs prior to the expiration of thirty-three days after the serving or mailing of the notice of dishonor, as
provided by section 1 or 2 of this act; or
(3) Attorneys' fees other than statutory attorneys' fees without
having the fees set by the court, or any attorneys' fees prior to
thirty-three days after the serving or mailing of the notice of
dishonor, as provided by section 1 or 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act are each
added to chapter 62A.3 RCW under the subchapter heading "DISHONOR."

--- END ---