BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to restore the law
relating to the release of public records largely to that which existed
before the Washington supreme court decision in Hangartner v. City of
Seattle, 151 Wn.2d 439, 90 P.3d 26 (2004). The intent of this act is
to make clear that: (1) Agencies possessing records must take every
available step to assist and facilitate the identification and
disclosure of requested records to the public and may not simply ignore
or reject requests for disclosure on the basis they are "overly broad,"
and (2) agencies having public records and seeking to exempt disclosure
on the basis of the attorney-client privilege may rely only on the
exemption in RCW 42.17.310(1)(j) and not the testimonial privilege in
RCW 5.60.060(2). Further, the legislature intends to clarify certain
public records provisions to assist agencies in discharging their duty
to maintain open governance and to assist citizens in exercising their
right to request and examine the recorded workings of their government.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.17.260 and 1997 c 409 s 601 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each agency, in accordance with published rules, shall make
available for public inspection and copying all public records, unless
the record falls within the specific exemptions of subsection (((6)))
(7) of this section, RCW 42.17.310, 42.17.315, or other statute which
exempts or prohibits disclosure of specific information or records.
The testimonial privilege of RCW 5.60.060(2) does not apply to this
section, and there is no general attorney-client privilege that exempts
information or records from disclosure beyond what is exempt from
disclosure under RCW 42.17.310(1)(j). To the extent required to
prevent an unreasonable invasion of personal privacy interests
protected by RCW 42.17.310 and 42.17.315, an agency shall delete
identifying details in a manner consistent with RCW 42.17.310 and
42.17.315 when it makes available or publishes any public record;
however, in each case, the justification for the deletion shall be
explained fully in writing.
(2) In complying with the requirements of this section, agencies
may not reject or ignore requests to inspect or copy public records on
the grounds the request is overly broad. Rather, agencies must provide
full assistance to requestors in order to identify and, if reasonable,
narrow the scope and definition of requested records.
(3) For informational purposes, each agency shall publish and
maintain a current list containing every law, other than those listed
in this chapter, that the agency believes exempts or prohibits
disclosure of specific information or records of the agency. An
agency's failure to list an exemption shall not affect the efficacy of
any exemption.
(((3))) (4) Each local agency shall maintain and make available for
public inspection and copying a current index providing identifying
information as to the following records issued, adopted, or promulgated
after January 1, 1973:
(a) Final opinions, including concurring and dissenting opinions,
as well as orders, made in the adjudication of cases;
(b) Those statements of policy and interpretations of policy,
statute, and the Constitution which have been adopted by the agency;
(c) Administrative staff manuals and instructions to staff that
affect a member of the public;
(d) Planning policies and goals, and interim and final planning
decisions;
(e) Factual staff reports and studies, factual consultant's reports
and studies, scientific reports and studies, and any other factual
information derived from tests, studies, reports, or surveys, whether
conducted by public employees or others; and
(f) Correspondence, and materials referred to therein, by and with
the agency relating to any regulatory, supervisory, or enforcement
responsibilities of the agency, whereby the agency determines, or
opines upon, or is asked to determine or opine upon, the rights of the
state, the public, a subdivision of state government, or of any private
party.
(((4))) (5) For records written, created, adopted, or issued before
July 1, 2005, a local agency need not maintain such an index, if to do
so would be unduly burdensome, but it shall in that event:
(a) Issue and publish a formal order specifying the reasons why and
the extent to which compliance would unduly burden or interfere with
agency operations; and
(b) Make available for public inspection and copying all indexes
maintained for agency use.
(((5))) (6) Each state agency shall, by rule, establish and
implement a system of indexing for the identification and location of
the following records:
(a) All records issued before July 1, 1990, for which the agency
has maintained an index;
(b) Final orders entered after June 30, 1990, that are issued in
adjudicative proceedings as defined in RCW 34.05.010 and that contain
an analysis or decision of substantial importance to the agency in
carrying out its duties;
(c) Declaratory orders entered after June 30, 1990, that are issued
pursuant to RCW 34.05.240 and that contain an analysis or decision of
substantial importance to the agency in carrying out its duties;
(d) Interpretive statements as defined in RCW 34.05.010 that were
entered after June 30, 1990; and
(e) Policy statements as defined in RCW 34.05.010 that were entered
after June 30, 1990.
Rules establishing systems of indexing shall include, but not be
limited to, requirements for the form and content of the index, its
location and availability to the public, and the schedule for revising
or updating the index. State agencies that have maintained indexes for
records issued before July 1, 1990, shall continue to make such indexes
available for public inspection and copying. Information in such
indexes may be incorporated into indexes prepared pursuant to this
subsection. State agencies may satisfy the requirements of this
subsection by making available to the public indexes prepared by other
parties but actually used by the agency in its operations. State
agencies shall make indexes available for public inspection and
copying. State agencies may charge a fee to cover the actual costs of
providing individual mailed copies of indexes.
(((6))) (7) A public record may be relied on, used, or cited as
precedent by an agency against a party other than an agency and it may
be invoked by the agency for any other purpose only if(( -- )):
(a) It has been indexed in an index available to the public; or
(b) Parties affected have timely notice (actual or constructive) of
the terms thereof.
(((7))) (8) Each agency shall establish, maintain, and make
available for public inspection and copying a statement of the actual
per page cost or other costs, if any, that it charges for providing
photocopies of public records and a statement of the factors and manner
used to determine the actual per page cost or other costs, if any.
(a) In determining the actual per page cost for providing
photocopies of public records, an agency may include all costs directly
incident to copying such public records including the actual cost of
the paper and the per page cost for use of agency copying equipment.
In determining other actual costs for providing photocopies of public
records, an agency may include all costs directly incident to shipping
such public records, including the cost of postage or delivery charges
and the cost of any container or envelope used.
(b) In determining the actual per page cost or other costs for
providing copies of public records, an agency may not include staff
salaries, benefits, or other general administrative or overhead
charges, unless those costs are directly related to the actual cost of
copying the public records. Staff time to copy and mail the requested
public records may be included in an agency's costs.
(((8))) (9) An agency need not calculate the actual per page cost
or other costs it charges for providing photocopies of public records
if to do so would be unduly burdensome, but in that event: The agency
may not charge in excess of fifteen cents per page for photocopies of
public records or for the use of agency equipment to photocopy public
records and the actual postage or delivery charge and the cost of any
container or envelope used to mail the public records to the requestor.
(((9))) (10) This chapter shall not be construed as giving
authority to any agency, the office of the secretary of the senate, or
the office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives to give,
sell or provide access to lists of individuals requested for commercial
purposes, and agencies, the office of the secretary of the senate, and
the office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives shall not
do so unless specifically authorized or directed by law: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That lists of applicants for professional licenses and of
professional licensees shall be made available to those professional
associations or educational organizations recognized by their
professional licensing or examination board, upon payment of a
reasonable charge therefor: PROVIDED FURTHER, That such recognition
may be refused only for a good cause pursuant to a hearing under the
provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative Procedure Act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW
to read as follows:
Each state and local agency shall separately appoint and maintain
an individual whose responsibility is to serve as a point of contact
for members of the public in requesting disclosure of public records
and to oversee the agency's compliance with the public records
disclosure requirements of this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 42.17.250 and 1973 c 1 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each state agency shall separately state and currently publish
in the Washington Administrative Code and each local agency shall
prominently display and make available for inspection and copying at
the central office of such local agency, for guidance of the public:
(a) Descriptions of its central and field organization and the
established places at which, the employees from whom, and the methods
whereby, the public may obtain information, make submittals or
requests, or obtain copies of agency decisions;
(b) Statements of the general course and method by which its
operations are channeled and determined, including the nature and
requirements of all formal and informal procedures available;
(c) Rules of procedure;
(d) Substantive rules of general applicability adopted as
authorized by law, and statements of general policy or interpretations
of general applicability formulated and adopted by the agency; ((and))
(e) Each amendment or revision to, or repeal of any of the
((foregoing)) documents in this subsection (1); and
(f) The identity of the agency's appointed individual to whom
members of the public may be directed to submit requests for disclosure
or inspection of public records and who is responsible for overseeing
the disclosure or inspection of such records.
(2) Except to the extent that he has actual and timely notice of
the terms thereof, a person may not in any manner be required to resort
to, or be adversely affected by, a matter required to be published or
displayed and not so published or displayed.

Sec. 5 RCW 42.17.330 and 1992 c 139 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The examination of any specific public record may be enjoined
if, upon motion and affidavit by ((an agency or its representative or))
a person who is named in the record or to whom the record specifically
pertains, the superior court for the county in which the movant resides
or in which the record is maintained, finds that the movant has
demonstrated clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that such
examination would clearly not be in the public interest and would
substantially and irreparably damage any person, or would substantially
and irreparably damage vital governmental functions. An agency has the
option of notifying persons named in the record or to whom a record
specifically pertains, that release of a record has been requested.
However, this option does not exist where the agency is required by law
to provide such notice.
(2) An agency may not bring a suit or motion against a person who
requests disclosure of public records in order to enjoin or prohibit
the disclosure of such records, nor may an agency seek a declaratory
judgment regarding the application of alleged exemptions to disclosure.

Sec. 6 RCW 42.17.020 and 2002 c 75 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) "Agency" includes all state agencies and all local agencies.
"State agency" includes every state office, department, division,
bureau, board, commission, or other state agency. "Local agency"
includes every county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or special purpose district, or any office,
department, division, bureau, board, commission, or agency thereof, or
other local public agency.
(2) "Authorized committee" means the political committee authorized
by a candidate, or by the public official against whom recall charges
have been filed, to accept contributions or make expenditures on behalf
of the candidate or public official.
(3) "Ballot proposition" means any "measure" as defined by RCW
((29.01.110)) 29A.04.091, or any initiative, recall, or referendum
proposition proposed to be submitted to the voters of the state or any
municipal corporation, political subdivision, or other voting
constituency from and after the time when the proposition has been
initially filed with the appropriate election officer of that
constituency prior to its circulation for signatures.
(4) "Benefit" means a commercial, proprietary, financial, economic,
or monetary advantage, or the avoidance of a commercial, proprietary,
financial, economic, or monetary disadvantage.
(5) "Bona fide political party" means:
(a) An organization that has filed a valid certificate of
nomination with the secretary of state under chapter ((29.24)) 29A.20
RCW;
(b) The governing body of the state organization of a major
political party, as defined in RCW 29.01.090, that is the body
authorized by the charter or bylaws of the party to exercise authority
on behalf of the state party; or
(c) The county central committee or legislative district committee
of a major political party. There may be only one legislative district
committee for each party in each legislative district.
(6) "Depository" means a bank designated by a candidate or
political committee pursuant to RCW 42.17.050.
(7) "Treasurer" and "deputy treasurer" mean the individuals
appointed by a candidate or political committee, pursuant to RCW
42.17.050, to perform the duties specified in that section.
(8) "Candidate" means any individual who seeks nomination for
election or election to public office. An individual seeks nomination
or election when he or she first:
(a) Receives contributions or makes expenditures or reserves space
or facilities with intent to promote his or her candidacy for office;
(b) Announces publicly or files for office;
(c) Purchases commercial advertising space or broadcast time to
promote his or her candidacy; or
(d) Gives his or her consent to another person to take on behalf of
the individual any of the actions in (a) or (c) of this subsection.
(9) "Caucus political committee" means a political committee
organized and maintained by the members of a major political party in
the state senate or state house of representatives.
(10) "Commercial advertiser" means any person who sells the service
of communicating messages or producing printed material for broadcast
or distribution to the general public or segments of the general public
whether through the use of newspapers, magazines, television and radio
stations, billboard companies, direct mail advertising companies,
printing companies, or otherwise.
(11) "Commission" means the agency established under RCW 42.17.350.
(12) "Compensation" unless the context requires a narrower meaning,
includes payment in any form for real or personal property or services
of any kind: PROVIDED, That for the purpose of compliance with RCW
42.17.241, the term "compensation" shall not include per diem
allowances or other payments made by a governmental entity to reimburse
a public official for expenses incurred while the official is engaged
in the official business of the governmental entity.
(13) "Continuing political committee" means a political committee
that is an organization of continuing existence not established in
anticipation of any particular election campaign.
(14)(a) "Contribution" includes:
(i) A loan, gift, deposit, subscription, forgiveness of
indebtedness, donation, advance, pledge, payment, transfer of funds
between political committees, or anything of value, including personal
and professional services for less than full consideration;
(ii) An expenditure made by a person in cooperation, consultation,
or concert with, or at the request or suggestion of, a candidate, a
political committee, or their agents;
(iii) The financing by a person of the dissemination, distribution,
or republication, in whole or in part, of broadcast, written, graphic,
or other form of political advertising prepared by a candidate, a
political committee, or its authorized agent;
(iv) Sums paid for tickets to fund-raising events such as dinners
and parties, except for the actual cost of the consumables furnished at
the event.
(b) "Contribution" does not include:
(i) Standard interest on money deposited in a political committee's
account;
(ii) Ordinary home hospitality;
(iii) A contribution received by a candidate or political committee
that is returned to the contributor within five business days of the
date on which it is received by the candidate or political committee;
(iv) A news item, feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly
scheduled news medium that is of primary interest to the general
public, that is in a news medium controlled by a person whose business
is that news medium, and that is not controlled by a candidate or a
political committee;
(v) An internal political communication primarily limited to the
members of or contributors to a political party organization or
political committee, or to the officers, management staff, or
stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or to the members
of a labor organization or other membership organization;
(vi) The rendering of personal services of the sort commonly
performed by volunteer campaign workers, or incidental expenses
personally incurred by volunteer campaign workers not in excess of
fifty dollars personally paid for by the worker. "Volunteer services,"
for the purposes of this section, means services or labor for which the
individual is not compensated by any person;
(vii) Messages in the form of reader boards, banners, or yard or
window signs displayed on a person's own property or property occupied
by a person. However, a facility used for such political advertising
for which a rental charge is normally made must be reported as an in-kind contribution and counts towards any applicable contribution limit
of the person providing the facility;
(viii) Legal or accounting services rendered to or on behalf of:
(A) A political party or caucus political committee if the person
paying for the services is the regular employer of the person rendering
such services; or
(B) A candidate or an authorized committee if the person paying for
the services is the regular employer of the individual rendering the
services and if the services are solely for the purpose of ensuring
compliance with state election or public disclosure laws.
(c) Contributions other than money or its equivalent are deemed to
have a monetary value equivalent to the fair market value of the
contribution. Services or property or rights furnished at less than
their fair market value for the purpose of assisting any candidate or
political committee are deemed a contribution. Such a contribution
must be reported as an in-kind contribution at its fair market value
and counts towards any applicable contribution limit of the provider.
(15) "Elected official" means any person elected at a general or
special election to any public office, and any person appointed to fill
a vacancy in any such office.
(16) "Election" includes any primary, general, or special election
for public office and any election in which a ballot proposition is
submitted to the voters: PROVIDED, That an election in which the
qualifications for voting include other than those requirements set
forth in Article VI, section 1 (Amendment 63) of the Constitution of
the state of Washington shall not be considered an election for
purposes of this chapter.
(17) "Election campaign" means any campaign in support of or in
opposition to a candidate for election to public office and any
campaign in support of, or in opposition to, a ballot proposition.
(18) "Election cycle" means the period beginning on the first day
of December after the date of the last previous general election for
the office that the candidate seeks and ending on November 30th after
the next election for the office. In the case of a special election to
fill a vacancy in an office, "election cycle" means the period
beginning on the day the vacancy occurs and ending on November 30th
after the special election.
(19) "Expenditure" includes a payment, contribution, subscription,
distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of money or anything of
value, and includes a contract, promise, or agreement, whether or not
legally enforceable, to make an expenditure. The term "expenditure"
also includes a promise to pay, a payment, or a transfer of anything of
value in exchange for goods, services, property, facilities, or
anything of value for the purpose of assisting, benefiting, or honoring
any public official or candidate, or assisting in furthering or
opposing any election campaign. For the purposes of this chapter,
agreements to make expenditures, contracts, and promises to pay may be
reported as estimated obligations until actual payment is made. The
term "expenditure" shall not include the partial or complete repayment
by a candidate or political committee of the principal of a loan, the
receipt of which loan has been properly reported.
(20) "Final report" means the report described as a final report in
RCW 42.17.080(2).
(21) "General election" for the purposes of RCW 42.17.640 means the
election that results in the election of a person to a state office.
It does not include a primary.
(22) "Gift," is as defined in RCW 42.52.010.
(23) "Immediate family" includes the spouse, dependent children,
and other dependent relatives, if living in the household. For the
purposes of RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790, "immediate family" means
an individual's spouse, and child, stepchild, grandchild, parent,
stepparent, grandparent, brother, half brother, sister, or half sister
of the individual and the spouse of any such person and a child,
stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, brother, half
brother, sister, or half sister of the individual's spouse and the
spouse of any such person.
(24) "Independent expenditure" means an expenditure that has each
of the following elements:
(a) It is made in support of or in opposition to a candidate for
office by a person who is not (i) a candidate for that office, (ii) an
authorized committee of that candidate for that office, (iii) a person
who has received the candidate's encouragement or approval to make the
expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any
other candidate or candidates for that office, or (iv) a person with
whom the candidate has collaborated for the purpose of making the
expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any
other candidate or candidates for that office;
(b) The expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising that either specifically names the candidate supported or
opposed, or clearly and beyond any doubt identifies the candidate
without using the candidate's name; and
(c) The expenditure, alone or in conjunction with another
expenditure or other expenditures of the same person in support of or
opposition to that candidate, has a value of five hundred dollars or
more. A series of expenditures, each of which is under five hundred
dollars, constitutes one independent expenditure if their cumulative
value is five hundred dollars or more.
(25)(a) "Intermediary" means an individual who transmits a
contribution to a candidate or committee from another person unless the
contribution is from the individual's employer, immediate family as
defined for purposes of RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790, or an
association to which the individual belongs.
(b) A treasurer or a candidate is not an intermediary for purposes
of the committee that the treasurer or candidate serves.
(c) A professional fund-raiser is not an intermediary if the fund-raiser is compensated for fund-raising services at the usual and
customary rate.
(d) A volunteer hosting a fund-raising event at the individual's
home is not an intermediary for purposes of that event.
(26) "Legislation" means bills, resolutions, motions, amendments,
nominations, and other matters pending or proposed in either house of
the state legislature, and includes any other matter that may be the
subject of action by either house or any committee of the legislature
and all bills and resolutions that, having passed both houses, are
pending approval by the governor.
(27) "Lobby" and "lobbying" each mean attempting to influence the
passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature of the state of
Washington, or the adoption or rejection of any rule, standard, rate,
or other legislative enactment of any state agency under the state
Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW. Neither "lobby" nor
"lobbying" includes an association's or other organization's act of
communicating with the members of that association or organization.
(28) "Lobbyist" includes any person who lobbies either in his or
her own or another's behalf.
(29) "Lobbyist's employer" means the person or persons by whom a
lobbyist is employed and all persons by whom he or she is compensated
for acting as a lobbyist.
(30) "Person" includes an individual, partnership, joint venture,
public or private corporation, association, federal, state, or local
governmental entity or agency however constituted, candidate,
committee, political committee, political party, executive committee
thereof, or any other organization or group of persons, however
organized.
(31) "Person in interest" means the person who is the subject of a
record or any representative designated by that person, except that if
that person is under a legal disability, the term "person in interest"
means and includes the parent or duly appointed legal representative.
(32) "Political advertising" includes any advertising displays,
newspaper ads, billboards, signs, brochures, articles, tabloids,
flyers, letters, radio or television presentations, or other means of
mass communication, used for the purpose of appealing, directly or
indirectly, for votes or for financial or other support in any election
campaign.
(33) "Political committee" means any person (except a candidate or
an individual dealing with his or her own funds or property) having the
expectation of receiving contributions or making expenditures in
support of, or opposition to, any candidate or any ballot proposition.
(34) "Primary" for the purposes of RCW 42.17.640 means the
procedure for nominating a candidate to state office under chapter
((29.18 or 29.21)) 29A.52 RCW or any other primary for an election that
uses, in large measure, the procedures established in chapter ((29.18
or 29.21)) 29A.52 RCW.
(35) "Public office" means any federal, state, county, city, town,
school district, port district, special district, or other state
political subdivision elective office.
(36) "Public record" includes any writing containing information
relating to the conduct of government or the performance of any
governmental or proprietary function prepared, owned, used, or retained
by any state or local agency regardless of physical form or
characteristics. For the office of the secretary of the senate and the
office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives, public
records means legislative records as defined in RCW 40.14.100 and also
means the following: All budget and financial records; personnel
leave, travel, and payroll records; records of legislative sessions;
reports submitted to the legislature; and any other record designated
a public record by any official action of the senate or the house of
representatives.
(37) "Recall campaign" means the period of time beginning on the
date of the filing of recall charges under RCW ((29.82.015)) 29A.56.120
and ending thirty days after the recall election.
(38) "State legislative office" means the office of a member of the
state house of representatives or the office of a member of the state
senate.
(39) "State office" means state legislative office or the office of
governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, attorney general,
commissioner of public lands, insurance commissioner, superintendent of
public instruction, state auditor, or state treasurer.
(40) "State official" means a person who holds a state office.
(41) "Surplus funds" mean, in the case of a political committee or
candidate, the balance of contributions that remain in the possession
or control of that committee or candidate subsequent to the election
for which the contributions were received, and that are in excess of
the amount necessary to pay remaining debts incurred by the committee
or candidate prior to that election. In the case of a continuing
political committee, "surplus funds" mean those contributions remaining
in the possession or control of the committee that are in excess of the
amount necessary to pay all remaining debts when it makes its final
report under RCW 42.17.065.
(42) "Writing" means handwriting, typewriting, printing,
photostating, photographing, and every other means of recording any
form of communication or representation, including, but not limited to,
letters, words, pictures, sounds, or symbols, or combination thereof,
and all papers, maps, magnetic or paper tapes, photographic films and
prints, motion picture, film and video recordings, magnetic or punched
cards, discs, drums, diskettes, sound recordings, and other documents
including existing data compilations from which information may be
obtained or translated. Writings that are compiled or stored in
electronic formats must be legible or usable to the public regardless
of whether rendering such writings legible or usable requires the
requestor's use of licensed or proprietary software or other means of
data storage, compilation, management, or output.
As used in this chapter, the singular shall take the plural and any
gender, the other, as the context requires.

Sec. 7 RCW 42.17.300 and 1995 c 397 s 14 and 1995 c 341 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
No fee shall be charged for the inspection of public records. No
fee shall be charged for locating public documents and making them
available for copying. A reasonable charge may be imposed for
providing copies of public records and for the use by any person of
agency equipment or equipment of the office of the secretary of the
senate or the office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives
to copy public records, which charges shall not exceed the amount
necessary to reimburse the agency, the office of the secretary of the
senate, or the office of the chief clerk of the house of
representatives for its actual costs directly incident to such copying.
Agency charges for photocopies shall be imposed in accordance with the
actual per page cost or other costs established and published by the
agency. In no event may an agency charge a per page cost greater than
the actual per page cost as established and published by the agency.
To the extent the agency has not determined the actual per page cost
for photocopies of public records, the agency may not charge in excess
of fifteen cents per page. Agency documentation of its actual costs
for copies, including photocopies, shall be subject to audit for
accuracy by the office of the state auditor.

Sec. 8 RCW 42.17.340 and 1992 c 139 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon the motion of any person having been denied an opportunity
to inspect or copy a public record by an agency, the superior court in
the county in which the person resides or in which a record is
maintained may require the responsible agency to show cause why it has
refused to allow inspection or copying of a specific public record or
class of records. When the agency that has refused to allow inspection
or copying of a specific public record is a county, the person may
bring such a motion in the superior court of the county where the
person resides or where the record is maintained, or in the superior
court of either of the two nearest judicial districts as provided in
RCW 36.01.050. The burden of proof shall be on the agency to establish
by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that refusal to permit public
inspection and copying is in accordance with a statute that exempts or
prohibits disclosure in whole or in part of specific information or
records.
(2) Upon the motion of any person who believes that an agency has
not made a reasonable estimate of the time that the agency requires to
respond to a public record request, the superior court in the county in
which the person resides or in which a record is maintained may require
the responsible agency to show that the estimate it provided is
reasonable. When the agency that has estimated the time required to
respond to a public records request is a county, the person may bring
such a motion in the superior court of the county where the person
resides or where the record is maintained, or in the superior court of
either of the two nearest judicial districts as provided in RCW
36.01.050. The burden of proof shall be on the agency to show that the
estimate it provided is reasonable.
(3) Upon the motion of any person who is aggrieved by an agency's
failure to comply with any substantive obligation imposed upon it by
RCW 42.17.250 through 42.17.320, the superior court of the county in
which the person resides or in which the agency is located, may require
the agency to comply with the obligations of these sections. When the
agency alleged to have violated its obligations under RCW 42.17.250
through 42.17.320 is a county, the moving party may seek relief in the
superior court of that county, of the county in which the person
resides, or of either of the two nearest judicial districts as provided
in RCW 36.01.050. The burden of proof is on the agency to show by
clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that it has complied with the
requirements or obligations it is alleged to have violated.
(4) Judicial review of all agency actions taken or challenged under
RCW 42.17.250 through 42.17.320 shall be de novo. Courts shall take
into account the policy of this chapter that free and open examination
of public records is in the public interest, even though such
examination may cause inconvenience or embarrassment to public
officials or others. Courts may examine any record in camera in any
proceeding brought under this section. The court may conduct a hearing
based solely on affidavits.
(((4))) (5) Any person who prevails against an agency in any action
in the courts seeking the right to inspect or copy any public record
((or)), the right to receive a response to a public record request
within a reasonable amount of time, or the right to enforce any of the
requirements of RCW 42.17.250 through 42.17.320 shall be awarded all
costs, including reasonable attorney fees, incurred in connection with
such legal action. In addition, it shall be within the discretion of
the court to award such person an amount not less than five dollars and
not to exceed one hundred dollars for each day that he was denied the
right to inspect or copy said public record.

Sec. 9 RCW 42.17.320 and 1995 c 397 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
Responses to requests for public records shall be made promptly by
agencies, the office of the secretary of the senate, and the office of
the chief clerk of the house of representatives. Within five business
days of receiving a public record request, an agency, the office of the
secretary of the senate, or the office of the chief clerk of the house
of representatives must respond by either (1) providing the record; (2)
acknowledging that the agency, the office of the secretary of the
senate, or the office of the chief clerk of the house of
representatives has received the request and providing a reasonable
estimate of the time the agency, the office of the secretary of the
senate, or the office of the chief clerk of the house of
representatives will require to respond to the request; or (3) denying
the public record request. Additional time required to respond to a
request may be based upon the need to clarify the intent of the
request, to locate and assemble the information requested, to notify
third persons or agencies affected by the request, or to determine
whether any of the information requested is exempt and that a denial
should be made as to all or part of the request, but in no event may an
agency fail to provide requested records subject to disclosure within
thirty days of receiving a public records request. In acknowledging
receipt of a public record request that is unclear, an agency, the
office of the secretary of the senate, or the office of the chief clerk
of the house of representatives may ask the requestor to clarify what
information the requestor is seeking. If the requestor fails to
clarify the request, the agency, the office of the secretary of the
senate, or the office of the chief clerk of the house of
representatives need not respond to it. Denials of requests must be
accompanied by a written statement of the specific reasons therefor.
Agencies, the office of the secretary of the senate, and the office of
the chief clerk of the house of representatives shall establish
mechanisms for the most prompt possible review of decisions denying
inspection, and such review shall be deemed completed at the end of the
second business day following the denial of inspection and shall
constitute final agency action or final action by the office of the
secretary of the senate or the office of the chief clerk of the house
of representatives for the purposes of judicial review.

Sec. 10 RCW 42.17.270 and 1987 c 403 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Public records shall be available for inspection and copying, and
agencies shall, upon request for identifiable public records, make them
promptly available to any person including, if applicable, on a rolling
basis as records that are part of a larger set of requested records
become available and ready for inspection. Agencies shall not
distinguish among persons requesting records, and such persons shall
not be required to provide information as to the purpose for the
request except to establish whether inspection and copying would
violate RCW 42.17.260(((5))) (9) or other statute which exempts or
prohibits disclosure of specific information or records to certain
persons. Agency facilities shall be made available to any person for
the copying of public records except when and to the extent that this
would unreasonably disrupt the operations of the agency. Agencies
shall honor requests received by mail for identifiable public records
unless exempted by provisions of this chapter.

--- END ---