BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, an eligible
person is allowed a credit against the tax due. The credit is equal to
six hundred fifty dollars per year for each qualified employment
position created in Washington after the effective date of this section
and maintained for a period of three consecutive years. The maximum
credit that can be claimed under this section for each qualified
employment position is one thousand nine hundred fifty dollars.
(b) Credit may not be claimed for hiring of persons into employment
positions that exist on the effective date of this section. Credit is
authorized for new employees hired for new qualified employment
positions created on or after the effective date of this section. New
qualified employment positions filled by existing employees are
eligible for the credit under this section only if the employment
position vacated by the existing employee is filled by a new employee.
(c) A credit is earned for the calendar year the person is hired to
fill the position. If a qualified employment position is filled before
July 1st, it qualifies for the full yearly credit for that calendar
year. If it is filled after June 30th, this position qualifies for
half of the credit for that calendar year.
(d) If a vacancy occurs in a qualified employment position, it must
be filled within sixty consecutive days in order to maintain
eligibility for the credit.
(e) Credit may be accrued and carried over until it is used. No
refunds may be granted for credits under this section.
(f) No application is necessary to claim the tax credit.
(2) The employment security department shall provide to the
department of revenue any information needed by the department of
revenue to verify eligibility under this section.
(3) A person claiming credit under chapter 82.62 RCW or RCW
82.04.44525 or 82.04.448 cannot claim a credit under this section.
(4)(a) A person claiming the credit shall file a complete annual
survey in the form prescribed by the department which shall include the
following information for employment in Washington:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) The number of qualified employment positions;
(iii) The amount of the credit claimed;
(iv) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(v) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band;
(vi) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits; and
(vii) Any additional information the department finds necessary to
determine eligibility and to measure the results of the tax credit
program.
(b) The annual survey is due by March 31st following any year in
which a tax credit under this section is claimed. This information
shall be subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330.
(c) If a person fails to file an annual survey as required under
this subsection (4) with the department by the due date, the department
shall declare the amount of taxes against which the credit was claimed
under this section during the calendar year preceding the due date of
the annual survey to be immediately due and payable. The department
shall assess interest, but not penalties, on the credited taxes for
which the person is not eligible. The interest shall be assessed at
the rate provided for the delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32
RCW, shall be assessed retroactively to the date the tax credit was
taken, and shall accrue until the taxes against which a credit has been
claimed are repaid.
(5) If at any time the department finds that a qualified employment
position is not filled for three years or is no longer a qualified
employment position, the amount of taxes for which a credit has been
claimed is immediately due and payable. The department shall assess
interest, but not penalties, on the credited taxes for which the person
is not eligible. The interest shall be assessed at the rate provided
for the delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, shall be
assessed retroactively to the date the tax credit was taken, and shall
accrue until the taxes against which a credit has been claimed are
repaid.
(6) The department shall use the information from subsection (4) of
this section to study the tax credit program authorized under this
section. The department shall report to the appropriate committees of
the legislature on the effectiveness of this tax credit in job
creation, net jobs created for Washington residents, and company growth
by December 1, 2011.
(7) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Eligible person" means a person as defined in RCW 82.04.030:
(i) Who has fifty or fewer employees in the preceding calendar
year; and
(ii) Whose full-time employment positions in Washington are greater
in the calendar year for which the credit is being claimed than the
applicant's full-time employment positions in Washington in the
preceding calendar year.
(b) "Employee" means a full-time, part-time, or temporary employee
covered by Title 50 RCW for whom the eligible person is making
contributions.
(c) "Full-time employee" means an employee who is required to work
at least thirty-five hours a week, four hundred fifty-five hours a
quarter, or one thousand eight hundred twenty hours a year.
(d) "Health care plan" means any "employee welfare benefit plan" as
defined by the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, 29
U.S.C. Sec. 1001 et seq., and any "health plan" or "health benefit
plan" as defined in RCW 48.43.005, for the purpose of providing for its
employees or their beneficiaries, through the purchase of insurance or
otherwise, health care services. For the purposes of this section,
"health care services" means services offered or provided by health
care facilities and health care providers relating to the prevention,
cure, or treatment of illness, injury, or disease.
(e) "Qualified employment position" means a permanent full-time
employee who is paid at least one and one-half times the state minimum
wage and for whom the business offers a health care plan.
(8) This section expires January 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---