BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that floods pose
threats to public health and to public and private property including:
(a) Loss or endangerment of human life;
(b) Loss of public and private property;
(c) Damage to homes, farms, and other structures;
(d) Damage to fisheries and fish habitat;
(e) Damage to public roads, bridges, and other infrastructure;
(f) Destruction or degradation of environmentally sensitive areas;
(g) Erosion of land and stream banks and beds; and
(h) Reduction of water quality.
(2) The legislature further finds that:
(a) The prevention of flood damage to public and private property
is a matter of public concern;
(b) Projects that prevent and minimize flood damage may be planned
and approved in advance of the time that a flood occurs. However,
there are also emergencies requiring immediate project approval; and
(c) Many projects designed to protect public and private property
from flood damage are not approved due to conflicts with existing
permitting and regulatory requirements.
(3) The legislature therefore finds that a pilot program must be
developed for projects in select water resource inventory areas to
demonstrate and evaluate methods for authorizing flood control projects
that protect public and private property, protect or enhance habitat,
and protect fish life.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A flood control and stream bank
restoration pilot program is authorized to demonstrate flood control
projects that protect property, protect or enhance habitat, and protect
fish life.
(a) County legislative authorities within water resource inventory
areas three, four, five, and seven shall administer the pilot program.
The department of fish and wildlife shall delegate authority to approve
hydraulic project approvals to the county legislative authority for
projects selected for the pilot program. In determining permit
approval, the county legislative authority shall give equal
consideration to the protection of human life, public land or private
property, and fish life.
(b) The pilot program must test permit approval processes for flood
control and stream bank restoration projects and the effect of
approving projects designed to protect property, protect or enhance
habitat, and protect fish life. The objectives of the pilot program
include identifying:
(i) Methods for expediting and coordinating permit decision-making
processes for flood control and stream bank restoration projects that
involve multiple jurisdictions and state agencies;
(ii) Impediments during the permitting process for project approval
including conflicts with existing policies, rules, and laws; and
(iii) Differences between projects designed to protect property,
protect or enhance habitat, and protect fish life. The analysis shall
give equal consideration to the protection of human life, public land
or private property, and fish life.
(2) The pilot program must consist of up to ten projects in each
participating county within watershed resource inventory areas three,
four, five, and seven.
(3)(a) The departments of ecology, fish and wildlife, and natural
resources shall participate in the pilot program. The department of
ecology shall act as the lead agency among the state agencies and shall
coordinate among the state agencies as necessary. The department of
fish and wildlife shall provide technical assistance to project
proponents to assist in developing projects that both protect property
and protect or enhance fish life. The department of natural resources
shall provide technical assistance with projects involving aquatic use
permits and removal of sand or gravel from aquatic lands.
(b) The department of ecology shall notify each of the eligible
counties of the pilot program, describe the nature of the pilot
program, and invite county participation. When a county receives an
application for a project that will require permits or authorizations
from multiple jurisdictions, and in the county's judgment the proposed
project offers an appropriate opportunity to test the pilot program's
intent under subsection (1) of this section, the county, with the
approval of the project applicant, may include the project as part of
the pilot program.
(c) In selecting projects for the pilot program, the county shall
provide an opportunity to test and evaluate a variety of projects,
including but not limited to dredging, stream bank stabilization, and
dike construction or repair.
(d) When a project has been selected for inclusion in the pilot
program, the county shall schedule an initial coordination meeting and
contact all appropriate agencies and the project applicant. Other
local jurisdictions, including but not limited to cities, diking
districts, and flood management districts, shall be invited to
participate when a project is selected for inclusion in the pilot
program and those jurisdictions have a role in the permitting process.
The purpose of the coordination meeting is to:
(i) Identify all necessary permit requirements;
(ii) Determine the sequence of permitting decisions and
opportunities where those decisions can be made concurrently;
(iii) Determine a timeline for the decisions and how those
decisions can be expedited; and
(iv) Work with the applicant to make sure that he or she
understands how the process will work, what the applicant is
responsible for, and when those responsibilities must be met in order
to adhere to the overall permitting timeline.
(4) The department of ecology, in cooperation with the
participating counties, other participating local jurisdictions, and
state agencies, shall submit a final report on the pilot program to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2007. The
report shall include an assessment of the degree to which the pilot
program achieved the objectives identified in subsection (1) of this
section.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.55.100 and 2004 c 32 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in section 2 of this act, in the event that
any person or government agency desires to construct any form of
hydraulic project or perform other work that will use, divert,
obstruct, or change the natural flow or bed of any of the salt or fresh
waters of the state, such person or government agency shall, before
commencing construction or work thereon and to ensure the proper
protection of fish life, secure the approval of the department as to
the adequacy of the means proposed for the protection of fish life.
This approval shall not be unreasonably withheld or unreasonably
conditioned.
(2)(a) The department shall grant or deny approval of a standard
permit within forty-five calendar days of the receipt of a complete
application and notice of compliance with any applicable requirements
of the state environmental policy act, made in the manner prescribed in
this section. The period of forty-five calendar days may be extended,
if the permit is part of a multiagency permit streamlining effort and
all participating permitting agencies and the permit applicant agree to
an extended timeline longer than forty-five calendar days. The permit
must contain provisions allowing for minor modifications to the plans
and specifications without requiring reissuance of the permit.
(b) The applicant may document receipt of application by filing in
person or by registered mail. A complete application for approval
shall contain general plans for the overall project, complete plans and
specifications of the proposed construction or work within the mean
higher high water line in salt water or within the ordinary high water
line in fresh water, and complete plans and specifications for the
proper protection of fish life.
(c) The forty-five day requirement shall be suspended if:
(i) After ten working days of receipt of the application, the
applicant remains unavailable or unable to arrange for a timely field
evaluation of the proposed project;
(ii) The site is physically inaccessible for inspection; or
(iii) The applicant requests delay. Immediately upon determination
that the forty-five day period is suspended, the department shall
notify the applicant in writing of the reasons for the delay.
(d) For purposes of this section, "standard permit" means a written
permit issued by the department when the conditions under subsections
(3) and (5)(b) of this section are not met.
(3)(a) The department may issue an expedited written permit in
those instances where normal permit processing would result in
significant hardship for the applicant or unacceptable damage to the
environment. In cases of imminent danger, the department shall issue
an expedited written permit, upon request, for work to repair existing
structures, move obstructions, restore banks, protect property, or
protect fish resources. Expedited permit requests require a complete
written application as provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section
and shall be issued within fifteen calendar days of the receipt of a
complete written application. Approval of an expedited permit is valid
for up to sixty days from the date of issuance.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "imminent danger" means a
threat by weather, water flow, or other natural conditions that is
likely to occur within sixty days of a request for a permit
application.
(c) The department may not require the provisions of the state
environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, to be met as a condition
of issuing a permit under this subsection.
(d) The department or the county legislative authority may
determine if an imminent danger exists. The county legislative
authority shall notify the department, in writing, if it determines
that an imminent danger exists.
(4) Approval of a standard permit is valid for a period of up to
five years from date of issuance. The permittee must demonstrate
substantial progress on construction of that portion of the project
relating to the approval within two years of the date of issuance. If
the department denies approval, the department shall provide the
applicant, in writing, a statement of the specific reasons why and how
the proposed project would adversely affect fish life. Protection of
fish life shall be the only ground upon which approval may be denied or
conditioned. Chapter 34.05 RCW applies to any denial of project
approval, conditional approval, or requirements for project
modification upon which approval may be contingent.
(5)(a) In case of an emergency arising from weather or stream flow
conditions or other natural conditions, the department, through its
authorized representatives, shall issue immediately, upon request, oral
approval for removing any obstructions, repairing existing structures,
restoring stream banks, or to protect property threatened by the stream
or a change in the stream flow without the necessity of obtaining a
written approval prior to commencing work. Conditions of an oral
approval to protect fish life shall be established by the department
and reduced to writing within thirty days and complied with as provided
for in this section. Oral approval shall be granted immediately, upon
request, for a stream crossing during an emergency situation.
(b) For purposes of this section and RCW 77.55.110, "emergency"
means an immediate threat to life, the public, property, or of
environmental degradation.
(c) The department or the county legislative authority may declare
and continue an emergency when one or more of the criteria under (b) of
this subsection are met. The county legislative authority shall
immediately notify the department if it declares an emergency under
this subsection.
(6) The department shall, at the request of a county, develop five-year maintenance approval agreements, consistent with comprehensive
flood control management plans adopted under the authority of RCW
86.12.200, or other watershed plan approved by a county legislative
authority, to allow for work on public and private property for bank
stabilization, bridge repair, removal of sand bars and debris, channel
maintenance, and other flood damage repair and reduction activity under
agreed-upon conditions and times without obtaining permits for specific
projects.
(7) This section shall not apply to the construction of any form of
hydraulic project or other work which diverts water for agricultural
irrigation or stock watering purposes authorized under or recognized as
being valid by the state's water codes, or when such hydraulic project
or other work is associated with streambank stabilization to protect
farm and agricultural land as defined in RCW 84.34.020. These
irrigation or stock watering diversion and streambank stabilization
projects shall be governed by RCW 77.55.110.
A landscape management plan approved by the department and the
department of natural resources under RCW 76.09.350(2), shall serve as
a hydraulic project approval for the life of the plan if fish are
selected as one of the public resources for coverage under such a plan.
(8) For the purposes of this section and RCW 77.55.110, "bed" means
the land below the ordinary high water lines of state waters. This
definition does not include irrigation ditches, canals, storm water
run-off devices, or other artificial watercourses except where they
exist in a natural watercourse that has been altered by man.
(9) The phrase "to construct any form of hydraulic project or
perform other work" does not include the act of driving across an
established ford. Driving across streams or on wetted stream beds at
areas other than established fords requires approval. Work within the
ordinary high water line of state waters to construct or repair a ford
or crossing requires approval.
(10) The department shall not require a fishway on a tide gate,
flood gate, or other associated man-made agricultural drainage
facilities as a condition of a hydraulic project approval if such
fishway was not originally installed as part of an agricultural
drainage system existing on or before May 20, 2003.
(11) Any condition requiring a self-regulating tide gate to achieve
fish passage in an existing hydraulic project approval under this
section may not be enforced.
(12) This section expires June 30, 2008.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.55.110 and 2002 c 368 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in section 2 of this act, in the event that any
person or government agency desires to construct any form of hydraulic
project or other work that diverts water for agricultural irrigation or
stock watering purposes, or when such hydraulic project or other work
is associated with streambank stabilization to protect farm and
agricultural land as defined in RCW 84.34.020, and when such diversion
or streambank stabilization will use, divert, obstruct, or change the
natural flow or bed of any river or stream or will utilize any waters
of the state or materials from the stream beds, the person or
government agency shall, before commencing construction or work thereon
and to ensure the proper protection of fish life, secure a written
approval from the department as to the adequacy of the means proposed
for the protection of fish life. This approval shall not be
unreasonably withheld or unreasonably conditioned. The department
shall grant or deny the approval within forty-five calendar days of the
receipt of a complete application and notice of compliance with any
applicable requirements of the state environmental policy act, made in
the manner prescribed in this section. The permit must contain
provisions allowing for minor modifications to the plans and
specifications without requiring reissuance of the permit. The
applicant may document receipt of application by filing in person or by
registered mail. A complete application for an approval shall contain
general plans for the overall project, complete plans and
specifications of the proposed construction or work within ordinary
high water line, and complete plans and specifications for the proper
protection of fish life. The forty-five day requirement shall be
suspended if (1) after ten working days of receipt of the application,
the applicant remains unavailable or unable to arrange for a timely
field evaluation of the proposed project; (2) the site is physically
inaccessible for inspection; or (3) the applicant requests delay.
Immediately upon determination that the forty-five day period is
suspended, the department shall notify the applicant in writing of the
reasons for the delay.
An approval shall remain in effect without need for periodic
renewal for projects that divert water for agricultural irrigation or
stock watering purposes and that involve seasonal construction or other
work. Approval for streambank stabilization projects shall remain in
effect without need for periodic renewal if the problem causing the
need for the streambank stabilization occurs on an annual or more
frequent basis. The permittee must notify the appropriate agency
before commencing the construction or other work within the area
covered by the approval.
The permittee must demonstrate substantial progress on construction
of that portion of the project relating to the approval within two
years of the date of issuance. If the department denies approval, the
department shall provide the applicant, in writing, a statement of the
specific reasons why and how the proposed project would adversely
affect fish life. Protection of fish life shall be the only ground
upon which approval may be denied or conditioned. Issuance, denial,
conditioning, or modification shall be appealable to the hydraulic
appeals board established in RCW 43.21B.005 within thirty days of the
notice of decision. The burden shall be upon the department to show
that the denial or conditioning of an approval is solely aimed at the
protection of fish life.
The department may, after consultation with the permittee, modify
an approval due to changed conditions. The modifications shall become
effective unless appealed to the hydraulic appeals board within thirty
days from the notice of the proposed modification. The burden is on
the department to show that changed conditions warrant the modification
in order to protect fish life.
A permittee may request modification of an approval due to changed
conditions. The request shall be processed within forty-five calendar
days of receipt of the written request. A decision by the department
may be appealed to the hydraulic appeals board within thirty days of
the notice of the decision. The burden is on the permittee to show
that changed conditions warrant the requested modification and that
such modification will not impair fish life.
In case of an emergency arising from weather or stream flow
conditions or other natural conditions, the department, through its
authorized representatives, shall issue immediately upon request oral
approval for removing any obstructions, repairing existing structures,
restoring stream banks, or to protect property threatened by the stream
or a change in the stream flow without the necessity of obtaining a
written approval prior to commencing work. Conditions of an oral
approval shall be reduced to writing within thirty days and complied
with as provided for in this section.
For purposes of this chapter, "streambank stabilization" shall
include but not be limited to log and debris removal, bank protection
(including riprap, jetties, and groins), gravel removal and erosion
control.
This section expires June 30, 2008.

--- END ---