BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.61.132 and 1989 c 319 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every metropolitan park district may, by ((unanimous decision))
simple majority vote of its board of park commissioners, sell,
exchange, or otherwise dispose of any real or personal property
acquired for park or recreational purposes when such property is
declared surplus for park or other recreational purposes: PROVIDED,
That where the property is acquired by donation or dedication for park
or recreational purposes, the consent of the donor or dedicator, his or
her heirs, successors, or assigns is first obtained if the consent of
the donor is required in the instrument conveying the property to the
metropolitan park district. In the event the donor or dedicator, his
or her heirs, successors, or assigns cannot be located after a
reasonable search, the metropolitan park district may petition the
superior court in the county where the property is located for approval
of the sale. If sold, all sales shall be by public bids and sale made
only to the highest ((and)) or best bidder.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.61.132 and 2005 c ... s 1 (section 1 of this act)
are each amended to read as follows:
Every metropolitan park district may, by ((simple majority vote))
unanimous decision of its board of park commissioners, sell, exchange,
or otherwise dispose of any real or personal property acquired for park
or recreational purposes when such property is declared surplus for
park or other recreational purposes: PROVIDED, That where the property
is acquired by donation or dedication for park or recreational
purposes, the consent of the donor or dedicator, his or her heirs,
successors, or assigns is first obtained if the consent of the donor is
required in the instrument conveying the property to the metropolitan
park district. In the event the donor or dedicator, his or her heirs,
successors, or assigns cannot be located after a reasonable search, the
metropolitan park district may petition the superior court in the
county where the property is located for approval of the sale. If
sold, all sales shall be by public bids and sale made only to the
highest ((or)) and best bidder.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 2 of this act takes effect January
1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 1 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---