BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.150.010 and 1986 c 244 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The long-range health and economic and environmental goals for the
state of Washington require the protection of the state's surface and
underground waters for the health, safety, use, and enjoyment of its
people. It is the purpose of this chapter to provide public bodies an
additional means by which to provide for financing, development, and
operation of water pollution control facilities needed for achievement
of state and federal water pollution control requirements for the
protection of the state's waters and public water supply systems needed
for achievement of state and federal requirements for safe drinking
water for the protection of public health and safety.
It is the intent of the legislature that public bodies be
authorized to provide service from water pollution control facilities
and public water systems by means of service agreements with public or
private parties as provided in this chapter.
It is the further intent of the legislature that nothing in this
chapter be construed as providing public bodies, or public or private
entities, with any basis for claiming new or additional entitlements to
water rights.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.150.020 and 1986 c 244 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Water pollution control facilities" or "facilities" means any
facilities, systems, or subsystems owned or operated by a public body,
or owned or operated by any person or entity for the purpose of
providing service to a public body, for the control, collection,
storage, treatment, disposal, or recycling of wastewater, including but
not limited to sanitary sewage, storm water, residential wastes,
commercial wastes, industrial wastes, and agricultural wastes, that are
causing or threatening the degradation of subterranean or surface
bodies of water due to concentrations of conventional, nonconventional,
or toxic pollutants. ((Water pollution control facilities do not
include dams or water supply systems.))
(2) "Public body" means the state of Washington or any agency,
county, city or town, special purpose district, political subdivision,
municipal corporation, or quasi-municipal corporation.
(3) "Water pollution" means such contamination, or other alteration
of the physical, chemical, or biological properties of any surface or
subterranean waters of the state, including change in temperature,
taste, color, turbidity, or odor of the waters, or such discharge of
any liquid, gaseous, solid, radioactive, or other substance into any
waters of the state as will or is likely to create a nuisance or render
such waters harmful, detrimental, or injurious to the public health,
safety, or welfare, or to domestic, commercial, industrial,
agricultural, recreational, or other legitimate beneficial uses, or to
livestock, wild animals, birds, fish, or other aquatic life.
(4) "Agreement" means any agreement to which a public body and a
service provider are parties by which the service provider agrees to
deliver service to such public body in connection with its design,
financing, construction, ownership, operation, or maintenance of water
pollution control facilities in accordance with this chapter.
(5) "Service provider" means any privately owned or publicly owned
profit or nonprofit corporation, partnership, joint venture,
association, or other person or entity that is legally capable of
contracting for and providing service with respect to the design,
financing, ownership, construction, operation, or maintenance of water
pollution control facilities or public water systems in accordance with
this chapter.
(6) "Public water systems" has the meaning provided in RCW
70.119.020.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.150.040 and 1989 c 175 s 136 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislative authority of a public body may secure services by
means of an agreement with a service provider. Such an agreement may
obligate a service provider to perform one or more of the following
services: Design, finance, construct, own, operate, or maintain water
pollution control facilities or public water systems by which services
are provided to the public body. Service agreements and related
agreements under this chapter shall be entered into in accordance with
the following procedure:
(1) The legislative authority of the public body shall publish
notice that it is seeking to secure certain specified services by means
of entering into an agreement with a service provider. The notice
shall be published in the official newspaper of the public body, or if
there is no official newspaper then in a newspaper in general
circulation within the boundaries of the public body, at least once
each week for two consecutive weeks. The final notice shall appear not
less than ((sixty)) thirty days before the date for submission of
proposals. The notice shall state (a) the nature of the services
needed, (b) the location in the public body's offices where the
requirements and standards for construction, operation, or maintenance
of projects needed as part of the services are available for
inspection, and (c) the final date for the submission of proposals.
The legislative authority may undertake a prequalification process by
the same procedure set forth in this subsection.
(2) The request for proposals shall (a) indicate the time and place
responses are due, (b) include evaluation criteria to be considered in
selecting a service provider, (c) specify minimum requirements or other
limitations applying to selection, (d) insofar as practicable, set
forth terms and provisions to be included in the service agreement, and
(e) require the service provider to demonstrate in its proposal to the
public body's satisfaction that ((a public body's annual costs will be
lower under its proposal than they would be if the public body
financed, constructed, owned, operated, and maintained facilities
required for service)) it is in the public interest to enter into the
service agreement and that the service agreement is financially sound
and advantageous to the public body from the standpoint of quality of
services, experience of the provider, reduction of risk, and other
factors.
(3) The criteria set forth in the request for proposals shall be
those determined to be relevant by the legislative authority of the
public body, which may include but shall not be limited to: The
respondent's prior experience, including design, construction, or
operation of other similar facilities; respondent's management
capability, schedule availability, and financial resources; cost of the
service; nature of facility design proposed by respondents; system
reliability; performance standards required for the facilities;
compatibility with existing service facilities operated by the public
body or other providers of service to the public body; project
performance warranties; penalty and other enforcement provisions;
environmental protection measures to be used; and allocation of project
risks. The legislative authority ((shall)) may designate persons or
entities within or outside the public body (a) to assist it in issuing
the request for proposals to ensure that proposals will be responsive
to its needs, and (b) to assist it in evaluating the proposals
received. ((The designee shall not be a member of the legislative
authority.))
(4) After proposals under subsections (1) through (3) of this
section have been received, the legislative authority(('s)) or its
designee shall determine, on the basis of its review of the proposals,
whether one or more proposals have been received from respondents which
are (a) determined to be qualified to provide the requested services,
and (b) responsive to the notice and evaluation criteria, which shall
include, but not be limited to, cost of services. These chosen
respondents may, at the discretion of the public body, be aggregated
into a short list of qualified respondents, who shall be referred to as
the selected respondents in this section. The legislative authority or
its designee shall conduct a bidder's conference to include all these
selected respondents to assure a full understanding of the proposals.
The bidder's conference shall ((also allow the designee to)) make these
selected respondents aware of any changes in the request for proposal.
Any information related to revisions in the request for proposal shall
be made available to all these selected respondents. Any selected
respondent shall be accorded a reasonable opportunity for revision of
its proposal prior to commencement of the negotiation provided in
subsection (5) of this section, for the purpose of obtaining best and
final proposals.
(5) After such conference is held, the legislative authority or its
designee may negotiate with the selected respondent whose proposal it
determines to be the most advantageous to the public body, considering
the criteria set forth in the request for proposals. If negotiations
are conducted by the designee, the legislative authority shall continue
to oversee the negotiations and provide direction to its designee. If
the negotiation is unsuccessful, the legislative authority may
((authorize the designee to)) commence negotiations with any other
selected respondent. On completion of this process, ((the designee
shall report to)) and after the department of ecology and the
department of health review and comment as provided for in subsection
(9) of this section, and after public hearing as provided for in
subsection (10) of this section, the legislative authority ((on his or
her recommendations and the reasons for them)) may approve a contract
with its chosen respondent.
(6) Any person aggrieved by the legislative authority's approval of
a contract may appeal the determination to an appeals board selected by
the public body, which shall consist of not less than three persons
determined by the legislative authority to be qualified for such
purposes. Such board shall promptly hear and determine whether the
public body entered into the agreement in accordance with this chapter
and other applicable law. ((The hearing shall be conducted in the same
manner as an adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW.)) The
board shall have the power only to affirm or void the agreement.
(7) Notwithstanding the foregoing, where contracting for design
services by the public body is done separately from contracting for
other services permitted under this chapter, the contracting for design
of ((water pollution control facilities)) services shall be done in
accordance with chapter 39.80 RCW.
(8) ((A)) If a public body elects to enter into an agreement
whereby the service provider will own all or a portion of the
facilities it constructs, the service agreement shall include provision
for an option by which a public body may acquire at fair market value
facilities dedicated to such service.
(9)(a) Before any service agreement is entered into by the public
body in connection with water pollution control facilities, it shall be
reviewed ((and approved)) by the department of ecology solely to ensure
that the purposes of chapter 90.48 RCW are implemented.
(b) Before any service agreement is entered into by the public body
in connection with public water systems, it shall be reviewed by the
department of health solely to ensure that the purposes of chapter
70.119 RCW are implemented. The department of ecology or department of
health has thirty days from receipt of the proposed service agreement
to complete its review and provide the public body with comments
indicating the changes necessary to achieve compliance.
(10) Prior to entering into any service agreement under this
chapter, the public body must have made written findings, after holding
a public hearing on the proposal, that it is in the public interest to
enter into the service agreement and that the service agreement is
financially sound and advantageous compared to other methods.
(11) Each service agreement shall include project performance bonds
or other security by the service provider which in the judgment of the
public body is sufficient to secure adequate performance by the service
provider.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.150.070 and 1986 c 244 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
RCW 70.150.030 through 70.150.060 shall be deemed to provide an
additional method for the provision of services from and in connection
with facilities and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to
powers conferred by other state laws and by federal laws. A public
body that is also eligible to enter into agreements with service
providers under the alternative public works contracting procedures in
chapter 39.10 RCW may elect to use either RCW 39.10.051 and 39.10.061
or this chapter as its method of procurement for such services.

Sec. 5 RCW 39.10.020 and 2003 c 352 s 1, 2003 c 301 s 2, and 2003
c 300 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Alternative public works contracting procedure" means the
design-build and the general contractor/construction manager
contracting procedures authorized in RCW 39.10.051 and 39.10.061,
respectively. Public bodies eligible to enter into agreements with
service providers for the furnishing of services in connection with
water pollution control facilities or public water systems under the
authority of chapter 70.150 RCW may elect to use either RCW 39.10.051
and 39.10.061 or this chapter as their method of procurement for such
services.
(2) "Public body" means the state department of general
administration; the University of Washington; Washington State
University; every city with a population greater than seventy thousand
and any public authority chartered by such city under RCW 35.21.730
through 35.21.755 and specifically authorized as provided in RCW
39.10.120(4); every county with a population greater than four hundred
fifty thousand; every port district with total revenues greater than
fifteen million dollars per year; every public hospital district with
total revenues greater than fifteen million dollars per year utilizing
the design-build procedure authorized by RCW 39.10.051 and every public
hospital district, regardless of total revenues, proposing projects
that are considered and approved by the public hospital district
project review board under RCW 39.10.117; every public utility district
with revenues from energy sales greater than twenty-three million
dollars per year; those school districts proposing projects that are
considered and approved by the school district project review board
under RCW 39.10.115; and the state ferry system.
(3) "Public works project" means any work for a public body within
the definition of the term public work in RCW 39.04.010.
(4) "Job order contract" means a contract between a public body or
any school district and a registered or licensed contractor in which
the contractor agrees to a fixed period, indefinite quantity delivery
order contract which provides for the use of negotiated, definitive
work orders for public works as defined in RCW 39.04.010.
(5) "Job order contractor" means a registered or licensed
contractor awarded a job order contract.
(6) "Unit price book" means a book containing specific prices,
based on generally accepted industry standards and information, where
available, for various items of work to be performed by the job order
contractor. The prices may include: All the costs of materials;
labor; equipment; overhead, including bonding costs; and profit for
performing the items of work. The unit prices for labor must be at the
rates in effect at the time the individual work order is issued.
(7) "Work order" means an order issued for a definite scope of work
to be performed pursuant to a job order contract.

Sec. 6 RCW 90.48.285 and 1987 c 109 s 144 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department is authorized to enter into contracts with any
municipal or public corporation or political subdivision within the
state for the purpose of assisting such agencies to finance the design
and construction of water pollution control projects, whether procured
through chapter 39.10 or 70.150 RCW, or otherwise, that are necessary
to prevent the discharge of untreated or inadequately treated sewage or
other waste into the waters of the state, including but not limited to,
systems for the control of storm or surface waters which will provide
for the removal of waste or polluting materials in a manner conforming
to the comprehensive plan of water pollution control and abatement
proposed by the agencies and approved by the department. Any such
contract may provide for:
The payment by the department to a municipal or public corporation
or political subdivision on a monthly, quarterly, or annual basis of
varying amounts of moneys as advances which shall be repayable by said
municipal or public corporation, or political subdivision under
conditions determined by the department.
Contracts made by the department shall be subject to the following
limitations:
(1) No contract shall be made unless the department shall find that
the project cannot be financed at reasonable cost or within statutory
limitations by the borrower without the making of such contract.
(2) No contract shall be made with any public or municipal
corporation or political subdivision to assist in the financing of any
project located within a sewage drainage basin for which the department
shall have previously adopted a comprehensive water pollution control
and abatement plan unless the project is found by the department to
conform with the basin comprehensive plan.
(3) The department shall determine the interest rate, not to exceed
ten percent per annum, which such advances shall bear.
(4) The department shall provide such reasonable terms and
conditions of repayment of advances as it may determine.
(5) The total outstanding amount which the department may at any
time be obligated to pay under all outstanding contracts made pursuant
to this section shall not exceed the moneys available for such payment.
(6) Municipal or public corporations or political subdivisions
shall meet such qualifications and follow such procedures in applying
for contract assistance as shall be established by the department.
In making such contracts the department shall give priority to
projects which will provide relief from actual or potential public
health hazards or water pollution conditions and which provide
substantial capacity beyond present requirements to meet anticipated
future demand.

Sec. 7 RCW 39.10.902 and 2003 c 301 s 8 and 2003 c 300 s 8 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective July 1, 2007:
(1) RCW 39.10.010 and 1994 c 132 s 1;
(2) RCW 39.10.020 and 2005 c ... s 5 (section 5 of this act), 2003
c 352 s 1, 2003 c 301 s 2, 2003 c 300 s 3, 2001 c 328 s 1, 2000 c 209
s 1, 1997 c 376 s 1, & 1994 c 132 s 2;
(3) RCW 39.10.030 and 1997 c 376 s 2 & 1994 c 132 s 3;
(4) RCW 39.10.040 and 1994 c 132 s 4;
(5) RCW 39.10.051 and 2003 c 300 s 4, 2002 c 46 s 1, & 2001 c 328
s 2;
(6) RCW 39.10.061 and 2003 c 300 s 5, 2002 c 46 s 2, & 2001 c 328
s 3;
(7) RCW 39.10.065 and 1997 c 376 s 5;
(8) RCW 39.10.067 and 2003 c 301 s 3, 2002 c 46 s 3, & 2000 c 209
s 3;
(9) RCW 39.10.070 and 1994 c 132 s 7;
(10) RCW 39.10.080 and 1994 c 132 s 8;
(11) RCW 39.10.090 and 1994 c 132 s 9;
(12) RCW 39.10.100 and 1994 c 132 s 10;
(13) RCW 39.10.115 and 2001 c 328 s 4 & 2000 c 209 s 4;
(14) RCW 39.10.900 and 1994 c 132 s 13;
(15) RCW 39.10.901 and 1994 c 132 s 14;
(16) RCW 39.10.068 and 2003 c 300 s 6;
(17) RCW 39.10.117 and 2003 c 300 s 7; and
(18) RCW 39.10.130 and 2003 c 301 s 1.

--- END ---