BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79.02.010 and 2004 c 199 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this title unless
the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Aquatic lands" means all state-owned tidelands, shorelands,
harbor areas, and the beds of navigable waters as defined in chapter
79.90 RCW that are administered by the department.
(2) "Ancestral trees" means a contiguous group of trees of similar
characteristics that:
(a) Is twenty acres or larger in size;
(b) Is composed of mixed conifer species with:
(i) More than eight dominant trees per acre that are greater than
thirty inches in diameter at breast height;
(ii) Four or more conifer snags per acre that are greater than
twenty inches in diameter at breast height and are greater than fifteen
feet tall; and
(iii) Down logs greater than fifteen tons per acre, including four
pieces per acre greater than twenty-four inches at the widest point and
greater than fifty feet long;
(c) Is greater than one hundred sixty years old, as determined by
computing an arithmetic mean from department inventory on plots in the
stand; and
(d) Was not purposefully planted as part of a reforestation effort
following a commercial harvest or natural forest disturbance.
(3) "Board" means the board of natural resources.
(((3))) (4) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of public lands.
(((4))) (5) "Community and technical college forest reserve lands"
means lands managed under RCW 79.02.420.
(((5))) (6) "Department" means the department of natural resources.
(((6))) (7) "Improvements" means anything considered a fixture in
law placed upon or attached to lands administered by the department
that has changed the value of the lands or any changes in the previous
condition of the fixtures that changes the value of the lands.
(((7))) (8) "Land bank lands" means lands acquired under RCW
79.19.020.
(((8))) (9) "Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation,
association, organization, cooperative, public or municipal
corporation, or agency of a federal, state, or local governmental unit,
however designated.
(((9))) (10) "Public lands" means lands of the state of Washington
administered by the department including but not limited to state
lands, state forest lands, and aquatic lands.
(((10))) (11) "State forest lands" means lands acquired under RCW
79.22.010, 79.22.040, and 79.22.020.
(((11))) (12) "State lands" includes:
(a) School lands, that is, lands held in trust for the support of
the common schools;
(b) University lands, that is, lands held in trust for university
purposes;
(c) Agricultural college lands, that is, lands held in trust for
the use and support of agricultural colleges;
(d) Scientific school lands, that is, lands held in trust for the
establishment and maintenance of a scientific school;
(e) Normal school lands, that is, lands held in trust for state
normal schools;
(f) Capitol building lands, that is, lands held in trust for the
purpose of erecting public buildings at the state capital for
legislative, executive, and judicial purposes;
(g) Institutional lands, that is, lands held in trust for state
charitable, educational, penal, and reformatory institutions; and
(h) Land bank, escheat, donations, and all other lands, except
aquatic lands, administered by the department that are not devoted to
or reserved for a particular use by law.
(((12))) (13) "Valuable materials" means any product or material on
the lands, such as forest products, forage or agricultural crops,
stone, gravel, sand, peat, and all other materials of value except
mineral, coal, petroleum, and gas as provided for under chapter 79.14
RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 79.15.010 and 2003 c 334 s 331 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in section 3 of this act, valuable materials
situated upon state lands and state forest lands may be sold separate
from the land, when in the judgment of the department, it is for the
best interest of the state so to sell the same.
(2) Sales of valuable materials from any university lands require:
(a) The consent of the board of regents of the University of
Washington; or
(b) Legislative directive.
(3) When application is made for the purchase of any valuable
materials, the department shall appraise the value of the valuable
materials if the department determines it is in the best interest of
the state to sell. No valuable materials shall be sold for less than
the appraised value thereof.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 79.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Unless specifically authorized by the board prior to sale or
harvest, the department may not offer for sale, sell, or harvest any
ancestral trees located on public lands west of the crest of the
Cascade mountains.
(2) The board may only authorize the sale or harvest of ancestral
trees located on public lands after making a formal finding that some
harvest is necessary to preserve the health and safety of other
ancestral trees in the immediate area, to protect public safety, or to
enhance overall forest health in the stand containing the ancestral
trees.

Sec. 4 RCW 79.15.510 and 2004 c 218 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may establish a contract harvesting program for
directly contracting for the removal of timber, consistent with section
3 of this act, and other valuable materials from state lands and for
conducting silvicultural treatments consistent with RCW 79.15.540.
(2) The contract requirements must be compatible with the office of
financial management's guide to public service contracts.
(3) The department may not use contract harvesting for more than
ten percent of the total annual volume of timber offered for sale.
However, volume removed primarily to address an identified forest
health issue under RCW 79.15.540 may not be included in calculating the
ten percent annual limit of contract harvesting sales.

Sec. 5 RCW 79.15.510 and 2003 c 313 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may establish a contract harvesting program by
directly contracting for the removal of timber, consistent with section
3 of this act, and other valuable materials from state lands.
(2) The contract requirements must be compatible with the office of
financial management's guide to public service contracts.
(3) The department may not use contract harvesting for more than
ten percent of the total annual volume of timber offered for sale.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 4 of this act expires December 31,
2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Section 5 of this act takes effect December
31, 2007.

--- END ---