BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.94.094 and 1969 ex.s. c 168 s 10 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The treasurer of each component city, town, or county shall
create a separate fund into which shall be paid all money collected
from taxes or from any other available sources, levied by or obtained
for the activated authority on property or on any other available
sources in such city, town, or county ((and such)). The collected
money shall be forwarded quarterly by the treasurer of each such city,
town, or county to the treasurer of the county designated by the board
as the ((authority)) treasurer for the authority. The treasurer of the
county ((so)) designated to serve as treasurer of the authority shall
establish and maintain ((such)) funds as ((may be)) authorized by the
board.
(b) The respective county shall be reimbursed by the board for
services rendered by the treasurer of the respective county in
connection with the receipt of funds under this section.
(2)(a) Money shall be disbursed from ((such)) funds collected under
this section upon warrants drawn by either the authority or the auditor
of the county designated by the board as the ((authority)) auditor for
the authority, as authorized by the board.
(b) If an authority chooses to use a county auditor for the
disbursement of funds, the respective county shall be reimbursed by the
board for services rendered by the ((treasurer and)) auditor of the
respective county in connection with the ((receipt and)) disbursement
of ((such)) funds under this section.

--- END ---