BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.51 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall indemnify, defend, and hold harmless any
temporary manager appointed and acting under RCW 18.51.060(7) against
claims made against the temporary manager for any actions by the
temporary manager or its agents that do not amount to intentional torts
or criminal behavior.

--- END ---