BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.09.520 and 2004 c 141 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The term "medical assistance" may include the following care
and services: (a) Inpatient hospital services; (b) outpatient hospital
services; (c) other laboratory and x-ray services; (d) nursing facility
services; (e) physicians' services, which shall include prescribed
medication and instruction on birth control devices; (f) medical care,
or any other type of remedial care as may be established by the
secretary; (g) home health care services; (h) private duty nursing
services; (i) dental services; (j) physical and occupational therapy
and related services; (k) prescribed drugs, dentures, and prosthetic
devices; and eyeglasses prescribed by a physician skilled in diseases
of the eye or by an optometrist, whichever the individual may select;
(l) personal care services, as provided in this section; (m) hospice
services; (n) other diagnostic, screening, preventive, and
rehabilitative services; and (o) like services when furnished to a
child by a school district in a manner consistent with the requirements
of this chapter. For the purposes of this section, the department may
not cut off any prescription medications, oxygen supplies, respiratory
services, or other life-sustaining medical services or supplies.
"Medical assistance," notwithstanding any other provision of law,
shall not include routine foot care, or dental services delivered by
any health care provider, that are not mandated by Title XIX of the
social security act unless there is a specific appropriation for these
services.
(2) The department shall amend the state plan for medical
assistance under Title XIX of the federal social security act to
include personal care services, as defined in 42 C.F.R. 440.170(f), in
the categorically needy program.
(3) The department shall adopt, amend, or rescind such
administrative rules as are necessary to ensure that Title XIX personal
care services are provided to eligible persons in conformance with
federal regulations.
(a) These administrative rules shall include financial eligibility
indexed according to the requirements of the social security act
providing for medicaid eligibility.
(b) The rules shall require clients be assessed as having a medical
condition requiring assistance with personal care tasks. Plans of care
for clients requiring health-related consultation for assessment and
service planning may be reviewed by a nurse.
(c) The department shall determine by rule which clients have a
health-related assessment or service planning need requiring registered
nurse consultation or review. This definition may include clients that
meet indicators or protocols for review, consultation, or visit.
(4) The department shall design and implement a means to assess the
level of functional disability of persons eligible for personal care
services under this section. The personal care services benefit shall
be provided to the extent funding is available according to the
assessed level of functional disability. Any reductions in services
made necessary for funding reasons should be accomplished in a manner
that assures that priority for maintaining services is given to persons
with the greatest need as determined by the assessment of functional
disability.
(5) Effective July 1, 1989, the department shall offer hospice
services in accordance with available funds.
(6) For Title XIX personal care services administered by aging and
disability services administration of the department, the department
shall contract with area agencies on aging:
(a) To provide case management services to individuals receiving
Title XIX personal care services in their own home; and
(b) To reassess and reauthorize Title XIX personal care services or
other home and community services as defined in RCW 74.39A.009 in home
or in other settings for individuals consistent with the intent of this
section:
(i) Who have been initially authorized by the department to receive
Title XIX personal care services or other home and community services
as defined in RCW 74.39A.009; and
(ii) Who, at the time of reassessment and reauthorization, are
receiving such services in their own home.
(7)(a) In the event that an area agency on aging is unwilling to
enter into or satisfactorily fulfill a contract or an individual
consumer's need for case management services will be met through an
alternative delivery system, the department is authorized to:
(((a))) (i) Obtain the services through competitive bid; and
(((b))) (ii) Provide the services directly until a qualified
contractor can be found.
(b) In the event that the department elects to contract with an
alternative delivery system to provide case management services in a
region, the department may by contract limit the role of the area
agency on aging to reassessing and reauthorizing services. An area
agency on aging whose role is limited to reassessing and reauthorizing
services shall not be jointly or severally liable for the acts or
omissions of any other organization with respect to the provision of
services through the alternative delivery system.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.39A.009 and 2004 c 142 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Adult family home" means a home licensed under chapter 70.128
RCW.
(2) "Adult residential care" means services provided by a boarding
home that is licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW and that has a contract
with the department under RCW 74.39A.020 to provide personal care
services.
(3) "Assisted living services" means services provided by a
boarding home that has a contract with the department under RCW
74.39A.010 to provide personal care services, intermittent nursing
services, and medication administration services, and the resident is
housed in a private apartment-like unit.
(4) "Boarding home" means a facility licensed under chapter 18.20
RCW.
(5) "Cost-effective care" means care provided in a setting of an
individual's choice that is necessary to promote the most appropriate
level of physical, mental, and psychosocial well-being consistent with
client choice, in an environment that is appropriate to the care and
safety needs of the individual, and such care cannot be provided at a
lower cost in any other setting. But this in no way precludes an
individual from choosing a different residential setting to achieve his
or her desired quality of life.
(6) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(7) "Enhanced adult residential care" means services provided by a
boarding home that is licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW and that has a
contract with the department under RCW 74.39A.010 to provide personal
care services, intermittent nursing services, and medication
administration services.
(8) "Functionally disabled person" is synonymous with chronic
functionally disabled and means a person who because of a recognized
chronic physical or mental condition or disease, including chemical
dependency, is impaired to the extent of being dependent upon others
for direct care, support, supervision, or monitoring to perform
activities of daily living. "Activities of daily living", in this
context, means self-care abilities related to personal care such as
bathing, eating, using the toilet, dressing, and transfer.
Instrumental activities of daily living may also be used to assess a
person's functional abilities as they are related to the mental
capacity to perform activities in the home and the community such as
cooking, shopping, house cleaning, doing laundry, working, and managing
personal finances.
(9) "Home and community services" means ((adult family homes, in-home services, and other services administered or provided by contract
by the department directly or through contract with area agencies on
aging or similar services provided by facilities and agencies licensed
by the department)) care and services provided in the home, in licensed
residential facilities such as adult family homes and boarding homes,
and in other community settings, and that are administered or provided
by the department directly or through contract with area agencies on
aging, managed care organizations, residential facilities, or other
community agencies or organizations.
(10) "Long-term care" is synonymous with chronic care and means
care and supports delivered indefinitely, intermittently, or over a
sustained time to persons of any age disabled by chronic mental or
physical illness, disease, chemical dependency, or a medical condition
that is permanent, not reversible or curable, or is long-lasting and
severely limits their mental or physical capacity for self-care. The
use of this definition is not intended to expand the scope of services,
care, or assistance by any individuals, groups, residential care
settings, or professions unless otherwise expressed by law.
(11) "Nursing home" means a facility licensed under chapter 18.51
RCW.
(12) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.
(13) "Tribally licensed boarding home" means a boarding home
licensed by a federally recognized Indian tribe which home provides
services similar to boarding homes licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.39A.030 and 2002 c 3 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To the extent of available funding, the department shall expand
cost-effective options for home and community services for consumers
for whom the state participates in the cost of their care.
(2) In expanding home and community services, the department shall:
(a) Take full advantage of federal funding available under Title XVIII
and Title XIX of the federal social security act, including home
health, adult day care, waiver options, and state plan services; and
(b) be authorized to use funds available under its community options
program entry system waiver or medically needy waivers granted under
section 1915(c) of the federal social security act to expand the
availability of in-home, adult residential care, adult family homes,
enhanced adult residential care, ((and)) assisted living services, and
other home and community services. By June 30, 1997, the department
shall undertake to reduce the nursing home medicaid census by at least
one thousand six hundred by assisting individuals who would otherwise
require nursing facility services to obtain services of their choice,
including assisted living services, enhanced adult residential care,
and other home and community services. If a resident, or his or her
legal representative, objects to a discharge decision initiated by the
department, the resident shall not be discharged if the resident has
been assessed and determined to require nursing facility services. In
contracting with nursing homes and boarding homes for enhanced adult
residential care placements, the department shall not require, by
contract or through other means, structural modifications to existing
building construction.
(3)(a) The department shall by rule establish payment rates for
home and community services that support the provision of cost-effective care. In the event of any conflict between any such rule and
a collective bargaining agreement entered into under RCW 74.39A.270 and
74.39A.300, the collective bargaining agreement prevails.
(b) The department may authorize an enhanced adult residential care
rate for nursing homes that temporarily or permanently convert their
bed use for the purpose of providing enhanced adult residential care
under chapter 70.38 RCW, when the department determines that payment of
an enhanced rate is cost-effective and necessary to foster expansion of
contracted enhanced adult residential care services. As an incentive
for nursing homes to permanently convert a portion of its nursing home
bed capacity for the purpose of providing enhanced adult residential
care, the department may authorize a supplemental add-on to the
enhanced adult residential care rate.
(c) The department may authorize a supplemental assisted living
services rate for up to four years for facilities that convert from
nursing home use and do not retain rights to the converted nursing home
beds under chapter 70.38 RCW, if the department determines that payment
of a supplemental rate is cost-effective and necessary to foster
expansion of contracted assisted living services.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.39A.090 and 2004 c 141 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature intends that any staff reassigned by the
department as a result of shifting of the reauthorization
responsibilities by contract outlined in this section shall be
dedicated for discharge planning and assisting with discharge planning
and information on existing discharge planning cases. Discharge
planning, as directed in this section, is intended for residents and
patients identified for discharge to long-term care pursuant to RCW
70.41.320, 74.39A.040, and 74.42.058. The purpose of discharge
planning is to protect residents and patients from the financial
incentives inherent in keeping residents or patients in a more
expensive higher level of care and shall focus on care options that are
in the best interest of the patient or resident.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the
department shall contract with area agencies on aging:
(a) To provide case management services to consumers receiving home
and community services in their own home; and
(b) To reassess and reauthorize home and community services in home
or in other settings for consumers consistent with the intent of this
section:
(i) Who have been initially authorized by the department to receive
home and community services; and
(ii) Who, at the time of reassessment and reauthorization, are
receiving home and community services in their own home.
(3)(a) In the event that an area agency on aging is unwilling to
enter into or satisfactorily fulfill a contract or an individual
consumer's need for case management services will be met through an
alternative delivery system, the department is authorized to:
(((a))) (i) Obtain the services through competitive bid; and
(((b))) (ii) Provide the services directly until a qualified
contractor can be found.
(b) In the event that the department elects to contract with an
alternative delivery system to provide case management services in a
region, the department may by contract limit the role of the area
agency on aging to reassessing and reauthorizing services. An area
agency on aging whose role is limited to reassessing and reauthorizing
services shall not be jointly or severally liable for the acts or
omissions of any other organization with respect to the provision of
services through the alternative delivery system. Prior to
implementing any alternative delivery system, the department will: (a)
Identify costs or assumed savings; (b) determine which case management
functions enumerated in RCW 74.39A.095(1) through (2) will be included
in the alternative delivery system; and (c) consider the input of
stakeholders.
(4) The department shall evaluate the effectiveness and costs of
the alternative delivery systems and compare those of the area agency
on aging operated case management systems.
(5) The department shall include, in its oversight and monitoring
of area agency on aging performance, assessment of case management
roles undertaken by area agencies on aging in this section. The scope
of oversight and monitoring includes, but is not limited to, assessing
the degree and quality of the case management performed by area agency
on aging staff for elderly and disabled persons in the community.
(((5))) (6) Area agencies on aging shall assess the quality of the
in-home care services provided to consumers who are receiving services
under the medicaid personal care, community options programs entry
system or chore services program through an individual provider or home
care agency. Quality indicators may include, but are not limited to,
home care consumers satisfaction surveys, how quickly home care
consumers are linked with home care workers, and whether the plan of
care under RCW 74.39A.095 has been honored by the agency or the
individual provider.
(((6))) (7) The department shall develop model language for the
plan of care established in RCW 74.39A.095. The plan of care shall be
in clear language, and written at a reading level that will ensure the
ability of consumers to understand the rights and responsibilities
expressed in the plan of care.

Sec. 5 RCW 74.39A.095 and 2004 c 141 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In carrying out case management responsibilities established
under RCW 74.39A.090 ((for consumers who are receiving services under
the medicaid personal care, community options programs entry system or
chore services program through an individual provider)), except when
the role of the area agency on aging has been limited as provided under
RCW 74.39A.090(3), each area agency on aging shall, to the extent of
available funding, provide oversight of the care being provided to
consumers receiving services under ((this section to the extent of
available funding)) the medicaid personal care, community options
program entry system, medically needy in-home waiver, or chore services
program through an individual provider. An area agency on aging whose
role is limited to reassessing and reauthorizing services shall not be
subject to this section. Case management responsibilities
((incorporate this oversight, and)) include, but are not limited to:
(a) Verification that any individual provider who has not been
referred to a consumer by the authority established under chapter 3,
Laws of 2002 has met any training requirements established by the
department;
(b) Verification of a sample of worker time sheets;
(c) Monitoring the consumer's plan of care to verify that it
adequately meets the needs of the consumer, through activities such as
home visits, telephone contacts, and responses to information received
by the area agency on aging indicating that a consumer may be
experiencing problems relating to his or her home care;
(d) Reassessment and reauthorization of services;
(e) Monitoring of individual provider performance. If, in the
course of its case management activities, the area agency on aging
identifies concerns regarding the care being provided by an individual
provider who was referred by the authority, the area agency on aging
must notify the authority regarding its concerns; and
(f) Conducting criminal background checks or verifying that
criminal background checks have been conducted for any individual
provider who has not been referred to a consumer by the authority.
(2) The area agency on aging case manager shall work with each
consumer to develop a plan of care under this section that identifies
and ensures coordination of health and long-term care services that
meet the consumer's needs. In developing the plan, they shall utilize,
and modify as needed, any comprehensive community service plan
developed by the department as provided in RCW 74.39A.040. The plan of
care shall include, at a minimum:
(a) The name and telephone number of the consumer's area agency on
aging case manager, and a statement as to how the case manager can be
contacted about any concerns related to the consumer's well-being or
the adequacy of care provided;
(b) The name and telephone numbers of the consumer's primary health
care provider, and other health or long-term care providers with whom
the consumer has frequent contacts;
(c) A clear description of the roles and responsibilities of the
area agency on aging case manager and the consumer receiving services
under this section;
(d) The duties and tasks to be performed by the area agency on
aging case manager and the consumer receiving services under this
section;
(e) The type of in-home services authorized, and the number of
hours of services to be provided;
(f) The terms of compensation of the individual provider;
(g) A statement by the individual provider that he or she has the
ability and willingness to carry out his or her responsibilities
relative to the plan of care; and
(h)(i) Except as provided in (h)(ii) of this subsection, a clear
statement indicating that a consumer receiving services under this
section has the right to waive any of the case management services
offered by the area agency on aging under this section, and a clear
indication of whether the consumer has, in fact, waived any of these
services.
(ii) The consumer's right to waive case management services does
not include the right to waive reassessment or reauthorization of
services, or verification that services are being provided in
accordance with the plan of care.
(3) Each area agency on aging shall retain a record of each waiver
of services included in a plan of care under this section.
(4) Each consumer has the right to direct and participate in the
development of their plan of care to the maximum practicable extent of
their abilities and desires, and to be provided with the time and
support necessary to facilitate that participation.
(5) A copy of the plan of care must be distributed to the
consumer's primary care provider, individual provider, and other
relevant providers with whom the consumer has frequent contact, as
authorized by the consumer.
(6) The consumer's plan of care shall be an attachment to the
contract between the department, or their designee, and the individual
provider.
(7) If the department or area agency on aging case manager finds
that an individual provider's inadequate performance or inability to
deliver quality care is jeopardizing the health, safety, or well-being
of a consumer receiving service under this section, the department or
the area agency on aging may take action to terminate the contract
between the department and the individual provider. If the department
or the area agency on aging has a reasonable, good faith belief that
the health, safety, or well-being of a consumer is in imminent
jeopardy, the department or area agency on aging may summarily suspend
the contract pending a fair hearing. The consumer may request a fair
hearing to contest the planned action of the case manager, as provided
in chapter 34.05 RCW. When the department or area agency on aging
terminates or summarily suspends a contract under this subsection, it
must provide oral and written notice of the action taken to the
authority. The department may by rule adopt guidelines for
implementing this subsection.
(8) The department or area agency on aging may reject a request by
a consumer receiving services under this section to have a family
member or other person serve as his or her individual provider if the
case manager has a reasonable, good faith belief that the family member
or other person will be unable to appropriately meet the care needs of
the consumer. The consumer may request a fair hearing to contest the
decision of the case manager, as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW. The
department may by rule adopt guidelines for implementing this
subsection.

Sec. 6 RCW 74.39A.240 and 2002 c 3 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 74.39A.030 and
74.39A.095 and 74.39A.220 through 74.39A.300, 41.56.026, 70.127.041,
and 74.09.740 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Authority" means the home care quality authority.
(2) "Board" means the board created under RCW 74.39A.230.
(3) "Consumer" means a person to whom an individual provider
provides any such services.
(4) "Individual provider" means a person, including a personal
aide, who has contracted with the department to provide personal care
or respite care services to functionally disabled persons under the
medicaid personal care, community options program entry system,
medically needy in-home waiver, chore services program, or respite care
program, or to provide respite care or residential services and support
to persons with developmental disabilities under chapter 71A.12 RCW, or
to provide respite care as defined in RCW 74.13.270.

--- END ---