BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 19.188 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Video game" means an object or device that stores recorded
data or instructions, receives data or instructions generated by a
person who uses it, and, by processing the data or instructions,
creates an interactive game capable of being played, viewed, or
experienced on or through a computer, gaming system, console, or other
technology.
(b) "Video game retailer" means a person who sells or rents video
games to the public.
(c) "Point of sale" means the location in the retail establishment
at which a transaction occurs resulting in the sale or rental of a
video game.
(2) Every video game retailer shall post signs providing
information to consumers about the existence of a nationally recognized
video game rating system, or notifying consumers that a rating system
is available, to aid in the selection of a game if such a rating system
is in existence.
(3) The signs shall be posted within the retail establishment in
prominent areas near the video game displays and points of sale. The
signs and lettering shall be clearly visible to consumers at these
locations.
(4) A video game retailer shall make available to consumers, upon
request, information that explains the video game rating system.

--- END ---