BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to make
the roadways safe. It is necessary for all drivers of motor vehicles
to be in an alert position to monitor and react timely to changing and
unexpected situations on the roadways. Therefore, this act creates a
presumption of negligent driving in the second degree for persons
driving with excessively reclined driver's seats.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.61.525 and 1997 c 66 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A person is guilty of negligent driving in the second degree
if, under circumstances not constituting negligent driving in the first
degree, he or she operates a motor vehicle in a manner that is both
negligent and endangers or is likely to endanger any person or
property.
(b) It is an affirmative defense to negligent driving in the second
degree that must be proved by the defendant by a preponderance of the
evidence, that the driver was operating the motor vehicle on private
property with the consent of the owner in a manner consistent with the
owner's consent.
(c) Negligent driving in the second degree is a traffic infraction
and is subject to a penalty of two hundred fifty dollars.
(2) A person is presumptively guilty of negligent driving in the
second degree if the driver's seat is reclined to an extent that the
person cannot adequately view the roadway or use the vehicle mirrors.
When issuing a traffic citation under this subsection (2), the traffic
enforcement officer must estimate the angle the driver's seat makes
with the vertical and include this estimate in the citation.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "negligent" means the failure
to exercise ordinary care, and is the doing of some act that a
reasonably careful person would not do under the same or similar
circumstances or the failure to do something that a reasonably careful
person would do under the same or similar circumstances.
(((3))) (4) Any act prohibited by this section that also
constitutes a crime under any other law of this state may be the basis
of prosecution under such other law notwithstanding that it may also be
the basis for prosecution under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---