BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW
to read as follows:
Current health services research continues to demonstrate that
higher numbers of registered nurses available to care for patients in
acute care hospitals lead to better patient outcomes with less
morbidity and mortality and fewer complications. Moreover,
improvements in safety of staff, job satisfaction, and reduction of
workplace injuries have also been directly linked to higher registered
nurse staffing levels. Therefore, to safeguard the public and support
registered nurses, licensed practical nurses, and unlicensed assistive
personnel, the legislature finds, as a matter of public policy, that
development and implementation of staffing plans for nursing services
are essential to ensure that the classifications, skills, experiences,
and numbers of health care professionals providing direct patient care
are sufficient to meet the needs of patients.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout sections 1 through
7 of this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Staffing committee" means a committee established by the
hospital with at least one-half of its members who are registered
nurses currently providing direct patient care. If registered nurses
are represented by a collective bargaining representative, the
registered nurse representatives must be selected by the collective
bargaining representative. Participation in the committee must be
considered a part of the employee's regularly scheduled workweek.
(2) "Patient care unit" means any unit of the hospital that
provides patient care.
(3) "Intensity" means the level of patient needs as determined by
a registered nurse providing direct patient care taking into account at
least the following factors:
(a) Severity and urgency of the patient's admitting condition;
(b) Scheduled procedures;
(c) Patient's ability to meet health care requisites;
(d) Patient's availability of social supports;
(e) Age and functional ability of the patient;
(f) Communications skills of the patient; and
(g) Other needs identified by the patient and by the registered
nurse.
(4) "Skill mix" means the number of registered nurses, licensed
practical nurses, and unlicensed assistive personnel providing direct
patient care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each hospital in the state shall develop and implement a
staffing plan for nursing services. The plan must be reviewed and
updated annually and filed with the department. The written staffing
plan must:
(a) Set the minimum number and skill mix of registered nurses,
licensed practical nurses, and unlicensed assistive personnel required
in each patient care unit in the hospital;
(b) Be based on at least the following criteria on each patient
care unit:
(i) Census, including activity such as patient discharges,
admissions, and transfers;
(ii) Level of intensity of all patients and nature of the care to
be delivered on each shift;
(iii) Skill mix, experience, and specialty certification or
training of those providing the care;
(iv) The need for specialized or intensive equipment; and
(v) The architecture and geography of the patient care unit;
(c) Include appropriate limits on the use of agency and traveling
nurses;
(d) Be consistent with the scopes of practice for registered nurses
and licensed practical nurses and the authorized duties of unlicensed
assistive personnel;
(e) Include adequate staffing to provide for staff time off,
illnesses, meal and break time, and educational, health, and other
leaves;
(f) Include a semiannual process for internal review by the
staffing committee that ensures compliance with the staffing plan,
provides for the review of incidents and staff concerns, and tracks
staffing patterns, number of patients, and their acuity.
(2) The staffing plan must not diminish existing standards in law,
rules, or the terms of an applicable collective bargaining agreement.
(3) Each hospital shall staff each patient care unit in accordance
with its staffing plan. Shift-to-shift adjustments in staffing levels
required by the plan may be made only if based upon assessment by a
registered nurse providing direct patient care on the patient care
unit.
(4) Each hospital shall post the staffing plan for that patient
care unit as required by this section on each patient care unit in the
facility.
(5) Each hospital shall collaborate with its staffing committee in
the development and implementation of its staffing plan.
(6) No hospital shall retaliate against or intimidate any employee
for performing any duties or responsibilities in connection with
participation on the staffing committee.
(7) No hospital shall retaliate against or intimidate any employee
who notifies the staffing committee, the hospital administration, or
the department that any schedule fails to meet with the posted staffing
plan, or that the hospital has failed to develop or implement a
staffing plan consistent with sections 1 through 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Hospitals shall maintain accurate daily records showing:
(a) The number of patients present in each patient care unit at the
end of each standard shift within the facility;
(b) The number of admissions, discharges, transfers, and
observation patients in each patient care unit and each shift; and
(c) The number of registered nurses, licensed practical nurses, and
unlicensed assistive personnel providing direct patient care in each
patient care unit and shift within the facility.
(2) All records required to be kept under this section must be
maintained for a period of seven years.
(3) Hospitals shall maintain and post a list of qualified, on-call
nursing staff and nursing services that may be called to provide
replacement staff in the event of sickness, vacations, vacancies, and
other absences of nursing staff and that provides a sufficient number
of replacement staff for the hospital on a regular basis.
(4) All records required to be kept under this section must be
available upon request to the department and to the staffing committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW
to read as follows:
Semiannually, hospitals shall collect and submit to the department
information regarding nurse staffing. Such information must include
the following nursing-sensitive quality indicators established by the
American nurses association:
(1) The percentage mix of registered nurses, licensed practical
nurses, and unlicensed assistive personnel caring for patients as a
total of all nursing care hours on each unit;
(2) The total nursing care hours provided per patient day on each
unit;
(3) The rates of pressure ulcers relative to the number of
patients;
(4) The rate of patient falls per one thousand patient days; and
(5) Nurse staff satisfaction as determined by scaled responses to
a uniform series of questions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall investigate complaints of violations of
sections 1 through 5 of this act. The department may impose civil
penalties or suspend or revoke a license of a hospital for violation of
any provision of sections 1 through 5 of this act. A civil penalty
imposed under this section may not exceed five thousand dollars. Each
violation of a nursing staff plan must be considered a separate
violation.
(2) The department shall maintain for public inspection records of
any civil penalties, administrative actions, or license suspensions or
revocations imposed on hospitals under this section.
(3) The department shall conduct an annual random audit of not less
than ten percent of all hospitals in this state solely to verify
compliance with the requirements of sections 1 through 5 of this act.
Surveys made by private accrediting organizations may not be used in
lieu of the audit required under this subsection. The department shall
compile and maintain for public inspection an annual report of the
audit conducted under this subsection.
(4) The department shall establish rules as necessary to implement
sections 1 through 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW
to read as follows:
Any costs associated with the administration of sections 1 through
6 of this act must be paid through hospital licensure fees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act may be known and cited as the
Washington state patient safety act.

--- END ---