BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
A city or town may not enact any statute or ordinance that has the
effect, directly or indirectly, of restricting the location of mobile
homes or manufactured homes in mobile home parks or manufactured
housing communities, as defined in RCW 59.20.030, based exclusively on
the age or dimensions of the manufactured home.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW
to read as follows:
A code city may not enact any statute or ordinance that has the
effect, directly or indirectly, of restricting the location of mobile
homes or manufactured homes in mobile home parks or manufactured
housing communities, as defined in RCW 59.20.030, based exclusively on
the age or dimensions of the manufactured home.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW
to read as follows:
A county may not enact any statute or ordinance that has the
effect, directly or indirectly, of restricting the location of mobile
homes or manufactured homes in mobile home parks or manufactured
housing communities, as defined in RCW 59.20.030, based exclusively on
the age or dimensions of the manufactured home.

Sec. 4 RCW 35.21.684 and 2004 c 256 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A city or town may not enact any statute or ordinance that has
the effect, directly or indirectly, of discriminating against
consumers' choices in the placement or use of a home in such a manner
that is not equally applicable to all homes. Homes built to 42 U.S.C.
Sec. 5401-5403 standards (as amended in 2000) must be regulated for the
purposes of siting in the same manner as site built homes, factory
built homes, or homes built to any other state construction or local
design standard. However, except as provided in sections 1 through 3
of this act, any city or town may require that (a) a manufactured home
be a new manufactured home; (b) the manufactured home be set upon a
permanent foundation, as specified by the manufacturer, and that the
space from the bottom of the home to the ground be enclosed by concrete
or an approved concrete product which can be either load bearing or
decorative; (c) the manufactured home comply with all local design
standards applicable to all other homes within the neighborhood in
which the manufactured home is to be located; (d) the home is thermally
equivalent to the state energy code; and (e) the manufactured home
otherwise meets all other requirements for a designated manufactured
home as defined in RCW 35.63.160. A city with a population of one
hundred thirty-five thousand or more may choose to designate its
building official as the person responsible for issuing all permits,
including department of labor and industries permits issued under
chapter 43.22 RCW in accordance with an interlocal agreement under
chapter 39.34 RCW, for alterations, remodeling, or expansion of
manufactured housing located within the city limits under this section.
(2) This section does not override any legally recorded covenants
or deed restrictions of record.
(3) This section does not affect the authority granted under
chapter 43.22 RCW.

Sec. 5 RCW 35A.21.312 and 2004 c 256 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A code city may not enact any statute or ordinance that has the
effect, directly or indirectly, of discriminating against consumers'
choices in the placement or use of a home in such a manner that is not
equally applicable to all homes. Homes built to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 5401-5403 standards (as amended in 2000) must be regulated for the purposes
of siting in the same manner as site built homes, factory built homes,
or homes built to any other state construction or local design
standard. However, except as provided in sections 1 through 3 of this
act, any code city may require that (a) a manufactured home be a new
manufactured home; (b) the manufactured home be set upon a permanent
foundation, as specified by the manufacturer, and that the space from
the bottom of the home to the ground be enclosed by concrete or an
approved concrete product which can be either load bearing or
decorative; (c) the manufactured home comply with all local design
standards applicable to all other homes within the neighborhood in
which the manufactured home is to be located; (d) the home is thermally
equivalent to the state energy code; and (e) the manufactured home
otherwise meets all other requirements for a designated manufactured
home as defined in RCW 35.63.160. A code city with a population of one
hundred thirty-five thousand or more may choose to designate its
building official as the person responsible for issuing all permits,
including department of labor and industries permits issued under
chapter 43.22 RCW in accordance with an interlocal agreement under
chapter 39.34 RCW, for alterations, remodeling, or expansion of
manufactured housing located within the city limits under this section.
(2) This section does not override any legally recorded covenants
or deed restrictions of record.
(3) This section does not affect the authority granted under
chapter 43.22 RCW.

Sec. 6 RCW 36.01.225 and 2004 c 256 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A county may not enact any statute or ordinance that has the
effect, directly or indirectly, of discriminating against consumers'
choices in the placement or use of a home in such a manner that is not
equally applicable to all homes. Homes built to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 5401-5403 standards (as amended in 2000) must be regulated for the purposes
of siting in the same manner as site built homes, factory built homes,
or homes built to any other state construction or local design
standard. However, except as provided in sections 1 through 3 of this
act, any county may require that (a) a manufactured home be a new
manufactured home; (b) the manufactured home be set upon a permanent
foundation, as specified by the manufacturer, and that the space from
the bottom of the home to the ground be enclosed by concrete or an
approved concrete product which can be either load bearing or
decorative; (c) the manufactured home comply with all local design
standards applicable to all other homes within the neighborhood in
which the manufactured home is to be located; (d) the home is thermally
equivalent to the state energy code; and (e) the manufactured home
otherwise meets all other requirements for a designated manufactured
home as defined in RCW 35.63.160.
(2) This section does not override any legally recorded covenants
or deed restrictions of record.
(3) This section does not affect the authority granted under
chapter 43.22 RCW.

--- END ---