BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 66.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The board shall, consistent with, and in addition to, the existing
retail business plan, implement strategies to improve the efficiency of
retail sales operations and maximize revenue-generating opportunities.
Strategies to be implemented shall include, but are not limited to:
(1) Expanding store operations to include Sunday sales in selected
liquor stores. Sunday sales are optional for liquor vendors operating
agency stores;
(2) Implementing a plan of in-store liquor merchandising, including
point-of-sale advertising, and product specific point-of-sale
promotional displays and carousels, including displays designed and
provided by vendors; and
(3) Implementing a plan for in-store liquor merchandising of
brands. The plan may not include provisions for selling liquor-related
items other than those items previously authorized.
(4) For the purposes of this section, the sale of liquor on Sundays
is not permitted before 12:00 p.m.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 66.08 RCW
to read as follows:
By September 1, 2005, the board shall expand operations in at least
twenty state-operated retail stores to include Sundays. The board
shall select the stores that are expected to gross the most revenues on
Sunday by considering factors including, but not limited to, population
density, proximity to shopping centers, and proximity to other
businesses that are open on Sunday. The selected stores shall be open
for retail business no earlier than 12:00 p.m. on Sunday. In
implementing this program, if the board determines it would be
beneficial to retain a consultant to assist the board in determining
appropriate stores for the program and monitoring the results of the
program, the agency is authorized to do so. The board shall track
gross sales and expenses of the selected stores and compare them to
previous years' sales and projected sales and expenses before opening
on Sunday. The board shall also examine the sales of state and
contract liquor stores in proximity to those stores opened on Sundays
to determine whether Sunday openings has reduced the sales of other
state and contract liquor stores that are not open on Sundays. The
board shall present this information to the appropriate policy and
fiscal committees of the legislature by January 31, 2007.

Sec. 3 RCW 66.08.060 and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 43 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall not advertise liquor in any form or through any
medium whatsoever.
(2) In-store liquor merchandising is not advertising for the
purposes of this section.
(3) The board shall have power to adopt any and all reasonable
((regulations)) rules as to the kind, character, and location of
advertising of liquor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 66.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Before the board determines which state liquor stores will be
open on Sundays, it shall give: (a) Due consideration to the location
of the liquor store with respect to the proximity of places of worship,
schools, and public institutions; and (b) written notice by certified
mail of the proposed Sunday opening, including proposed Sunday opening
hours, to places of worship, schools, and public institutions within
five hundred feet of the liquor store proposed to be open on Sunday.
(2) Before permitting an agency vendor liquor store to open for
business on Sunday, the board must meet the due consideration and
written notice requirements established in subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) For the purpose of this section, "place of worship" means a
building erected for and used exclusively for religious worship and
schooling or other related religious activity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 66.16 RCW
to read as follows:
Employees in state liquor stores, including agency vendor liquor
stores, may not be required to work on their Sabbath for the purpose of
selling liquor if doing so would violate their religious beliefs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 RCW 66.16.080 (Sunday closing) and 1988 c
101 s 1 & 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 11 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---