BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Motor vehicles that have aftermarket hydraulic or mechanical
systems that raise or lower the height of the vehicle are prohibited
while the motor vehicle is in motion on a public roadway with a posted
speed limit of twenty-five miles per hour or greater and with the
vehicle speed in excess of fifteen miles per hour. At no time shall
any portion of any tire leave the surface of the roadway or any
component of the hydraulic system cause or emit sparks. An operator
receiving three or more citations for violating this section will be
required to remove all hydraulics from the vehicle.
(2) Nothing in this section prohibits a county or city from
enacting stricter regulations for aftermarket vehicle hydraulics on a
public roadway.

--- END ---