BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.22.170 and 1993 c 37 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A surcharge of ((two)) five dollars per instrument shall be charged
by the county auditor for each document recorded, which will be in
addition to any other charge authorized by law. Fifty percent of the
revenue generated through this surcharge shall be transmitted monthly
to the state treasurer who shall distribute such funds to each county
treasurer within the state in July of each year in accordance with the
formula described in RCW 36.22.190. The county treasurer shall place
the funds received in a special account titled the auditor's centennial
document preservation and modernization account to be used solely for
ongoing preservation of historical documents of all county offices and
departments and shall not be added to the county current expense fund.
Fifty percent of the revenue generated by this surcharge shall be
retained by the county and deposited in the auditor's operation and
maintenance fund for ongoing preservation of historical documents of
all county offices and departments.
The centennial document preservation and modernization account is
hereby created in the custody of the state treasurer and shall be
classified as a treasury trust account. State distributions from the
centennial document preservation and modernization account shall be
made without appropriation.

--- END ---