BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that children are more
vulnerable than adults to the hazardous effects of pesticides. The
intent of this act is to limit, for the protection of students and
staff, the use of high hazard pesticides in and on school facilities.

Sec. 2 RCW 17.21.020 and 2004 c 100 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Agricultural commodity" means any plant or part of a plant, or
animal, or animal product, produced by a person (including farmers,
ranchers, vineyardists, plant propagators, Christmas tree growers,
aquaculturists, floriculturists, orchardists, foresters, or other
comparable persons) primarily for sale, consumption, propagation, or
other use by people or animals.
(2) "Agricultural land" means land on which an agricultural
commodity is produced or land that is in a government-recognized
conservation reserve program. This definition does not apply to
private gardens where agricultural commodities are produced for
personal consumption.
(3) "Antimicrobial pesticide" means a pesticide that is used for
the control of microbial pests, including but not limited to viruses,
bacteria, algae, and protozoa, and is intended for use as a
disinfectant or sanitizer.
(4) "Apparatus" means any type of ground, water, or aerial
equipment, device, or contrivance using motorized, mechanical, or
pressurized power and used to apply any pesticide on land and anything
that may be growing, habitating, or stored on or in such land, but
shall not include any pressurized handsized household device used to
apply any pesticide, or any equipment, device, or contrivance of which
the person who is applying the pesticide is the source of power or
energy in making such pesticide application, or any other small
equipment, device, or contrivance that is transported in a piece of
equipment licensed under this chapter as an apparatus.
(5) "Arthropod" means any invertebrate animal that belongs to the
phylum arthropoda, which in addition to insects, includes allied
classes whose members are wingless and usually have more than six legs;
for example, spiders, mites, ticks, centipedes, and isopod crustaceans.
(6) "Certified applicator" means any individual who is licensed as
a commercial pesticide applicator, commercial pesticide operator,
public operator, private-commercial applicator, demonstration and
research applicator, private applicator, limited private applicator,
rancher private applicator, or any other individual who is certified by
the director to use or supervise the use of any pesticide which is
classified by the EPA or the director as a restricted use pesticide.
(7) "Commercial pesticide applicator" means any person who engages
in the business of applying pesticides to the land of another.
(8) "Commercial pesticide operator" means any employee of a
commercial pesticide applicator who uses or supervises the use of any
pesticide and who is required to be licensed under provisions of this
chapter.
(9) "Defoliant" means any substance or mixture of substances
intended to cause the leaves or foliage to drop from a plant with or
without causing abscission.
(10) "Department" means the Washington state department of
agriculture.
(11) "Desiccant" means any substance or mixture of substances
intended to artificially accelerate the drying of plant tissues.
(12) "Device" means any instrument or contrivance intended to trap,
destroy, control, repel, or mitigate pests, but not including equipment
used for the application of pesticides when sold separately from the
pesticides.
(13) "Direct supervision" by certified private applicators shall
mean that the designated restricted use pesticide shall be applied for
purposes of producing any agricultural commodity on land owned or
rented by the applicator or the applicator's employer, by a competent
person acting under the instructions and control of a certified private
applicator who is available if and when needed, even though such
certified private applicator is not physically present at the time and
place the pesticide is applied. The certified private applicator shall
have direct management responsibility and familiarity of the pesticide,
manner of application, pest, and land to which the pesticide is being
applied. Direct supervision by all other certified applicators means
direct on-the-job supervision and shall require that the certified
applicator be physically present at the application site and that the
person making the application be in voice and visual contact with the
certified applicator at all times during the application. However,
direct supervision for forest application does not require constant
voice and visual contact when general use pesticides are applied using
nonapparatus type equipment, the certified applicator is physically
present and readily available in the immediate application area, and
the certified applicator directly observes pesticide mixing and
batching. Direct supervision of an aerial apparatus means the pilot of
the aircraft must be appropriately certified.
(14) "Director" means the director of the department or a duly
authorized representative.
(15) "Engage in business" means any application of pesticides by
any person upon lands or crops of another.
(16) "EPA" means the United States environmental protection agency.
(17) "EPA restricted use pesticide" means any pesticide classified
for restricted use by the administrator, EPA.
(18) "FIFRA" means the federal insecticide, fungicide and
rodenticide act as amended (61 Stat. 163, 7 U.S.C. Sec. 136 et seq.).
(19) "Forest application" means the application of pesticides to
agricultural land used to grow trees for the commercial production of
wood or wood fiber for products such as dimensional lumber, shakes,
plywood, poles, posts, pilings, particle board, hardboard, oriented
strand board, pulp, paper, cardboard, or other similar products.
(20) "Fumigant" means any pesticide product or combination of
products that is a vapor or gas or forms a vapor or gas on application
and whose method of pesticidal action is through the gaseous state.
(21) "Fungi" means all nonchlorophyll-bearing thallophytes (all
nonchlorophyll-bearing plants of lower order than mosses and
liverworts); for example, rusts, smuts, mildews, molds, and yeasts,
except those on or in a living person or other animals.
(22) "Fungicide" means any substance or mixture of substances
intended to prevent, destroy, repel, or mitigate any fungi.
(23) "Herbicide" means any substance or mixture of substances
intended to prevent, destroy, repel, or mitigate any weed or other
higher plant.
(24) "High hazard pesticide" means a pesticide product on the list
adopted under section 4 of this act.
(25) "Immediate service call" means a landscape application to
satisfy an emergency customer request for service, or a treatment to
control a pest to landscape plants.
(((25))) (26) "Insect" means any small invertebrate animal, in any
life stage, whose adult form is segmented and which generally belongs
to the class insecta, comprised of six-legged, usually winged forms,
as, for example, beetles, bugs, bees, and flies. The term insect shall
also apply to other allied classes of arthropods whose members are
wingless and usually have more than six legs, for example, spiders,
mites, ticks, centipedes, and isopod crustaceans.
(((26))) (27) "Insecticide" means any substance or mixture of
substances intended to prevent, destroy, repel, or mitigate any insect.
(((27))) (28) "Land" means all land and water areas, including
airspace and all plants, animals, structures, buildings, devices, and
contrivances, appurtenant to or situated on, fixed or mobile, including
any used for transportation.
(((28))) (29) "Landscape application" means an application of any
EPA registered pesticide to any exterior landscape area around
residential property, commercial properties such as apartments or
shopping centers, parks, golf courses, schools including nursery
schools and licensed day cares, or cemeteries or similar areas. This
definition shall not apply to: (a) Applications made by private
applicators, limited private applicators, or rancher private
applicators; (b) mosquito abatement, gypsy moth eradication, or similar
wide-area pest control programs sponsored by governmental entities; and
(c) commercial pesticide applicators making structural applications.
(((29))) (30) "Limited private applicator" means a certified
applicator who uses or is in direct supervision, as defined for private
applicators in this section, of the use of any herbicide classified by
the EPA or the director as a restricted use pesticide, for the sole
purpose of controlling weeds on nonproduction agricultural land owned
or rented by the applicator or the applicator's employer. Limited
private applicators may also use restricted use pesticides on timber
areas, excluding aquatic sites, to control weeds designated for
mandatory control under chapters 17.04, 17.06, and 17.10 RCW and state
and local regulations adopted under chapters 17.04, 17.06, and 17.10
RCW. A limited private applicator may apply restricted use herbicides
to the types of land described in this subsection of another person if
applied without compensation other than trading of personal services
between the applicator and the other person. This license is only
valid when making applications in counties of Washington located east
of the crest of the Cascade mountains.
(((30))) (31) "Limited production agricultural land" means land
used to grow hay and grain crops that are consumed by the livestock on
the farm where produced. No more than ten percent of the hay and grain
crops grown on limited production agricultural land may be sold each
crop year. Limited production agricultural land does not include
aquatic sites.
(((31))) (32) "Nematocide" means any substance or mixture of
substances intended to prevent, destroy, repel, or mitigate nematodes.
(((32))) (33) "Nematode" means any invertebrate animal of the
phylum nemathelminthes and class nematoda, that is, unsegmented round
worms with elongated, fusiform, or saclike bodies covered with cuticle,
and inhabiting soil, water, plants or plant parts. Nematodes may also
be called nemas or eelworms.
(((33))) (34) "Nonproduction agricultural land" means pastures,
rangeland, fencerows, and areas around farm buildings but not aquatic
sites.
(((34))) (35) "Person" means any individual, partnership,
association, corporation, or organized group of persons whether or not
incorporated.
(((35))) (36) "Pest" means, but is not limited to, any insect,
rodent, nematode, snail, slug, weed, and any form of plant or animal
life or virus, except virus, bacteria, or other microorganisms on or in
a living person or other animal or in or on processed food or beverages
or pharmaceuticals, which is normally considered to be a pest, or which
the director may declare to be a pest.
(((36))) (37) "Pesticide" means, but is not limited to:
(a) Any substance or mixture of substances intended to prevent,
destroy, control, repel, or mitigate any pest;
(b) Any substance or mixture of substances intended to be used as
a plant regulator, defoliant or desiccant; and
(c) Any spray adjuvant as defined in RCW 15.58.030.
(((37))) (38) "Pesticide advisory board" means the pesticide
advisory board as provided for in this chapter.
(((38))) (39) "Plant regulator" means any substance or mixture of
substances intended through physiological action, to accelerate or
retard the rate of growth or maturation, or to otherwise alter the
behavior of ornamental or crop plants or their produce, but shall not
include substances insofar as they are intended to be used as plant
nutrients, trace elements, nutritional chemicals, plant inoculants, or
soil amendments.
(((39))) (40) "Private applicator" means a certified applicator who
uses or is in direct supervision of the use of any pesticide classified
by the EPA or the director as a restricted use pesticide, for the
purposes of producing any agricultural commodity and for any associated
noncrop application on land owned or rented by the applicator or the
applicator's employer or if applied without compensation other than
trading of personal services between producers of agricultural
commodities on the land of another person.
(((40))) (41) "Private-commercial applicator" means a certified
applicator who uses or supervises the use of any pesticide classified
by the EPA or the director as a restricted use pesticide for purposes
other than the production of any agricultural commodity on lands owned
or rented by the applicator or the applicator's employer.
(((41))) (42) "Rancher private applicator" means a certified
applicator who uses or is in direct supervision, as defined for private
applicators in this section, of the use of any herbicide or any
rodenticide classified by the EPA or the director as a restricted use
pesticide for the purpose of controlling weeds and pest animals on
nonproduction agricultural land and limited production agricultural
land owned or rented by the applicator or the applicator's employer.
Rancher private applicators may also use restricted use pesticides on
timber areas, excluding aquatic sites, to control weeds designated for
mandatory control under chapters 17.04, 17.06, and 17.10 RCW and state
and local regulations adopted under chapters 17.04, 17.06, and 17.10
RCW. A rancher private applicator may apply restricted use herbicides
and rodenticides to the types of land described in this subsection of
another person if applied without compensation other than trading of
personal services between the applicator and the other person. This
license is only valid when making applications in counties of
Washington located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains.
(((42))) (43) "Residential property" includes property less than
one acre in size zoned as residential by a city, town, or county, but
does not include property zoned as agricultural or agricultural
homesites.
(((43))) (44) "Restricted use pesticide" means any pesticide or
device which, when used as directed or in accordance with a widespread
and commonly recognized practice, the director determines, subsequent
to a hearing, requires additional restrictions for that use to prevent
unreasonable adverse effects on the environment including people,
lands, beneficial insects, animals, crops, and wildlife, other than
pests.
(((44))) (45) "Rodenticide" means any substance or mixture of
substances intended to prevent, destroy, repel, or mitigate rodents, or
any other vertebrate animal which the director may declare by rule to
be a pest.
(((45))) (46) "School facility" means any facility used for
licensed day care center purposes or for the purposes of a public
kindergarten or public elementary or secondary school. School facility
includes the buildings or structures, playgrounds, landscape areas,
athletic fields, school vehicles, or any other area of school property.
(((46))) (47) "Single-use waiver" means an approval for a single
application of a pesticide at a single location of a school facility.
It does not mean multiple applications of one chemical or multiple
applications at more than one location.
(48) "Snails or slugs" include all harmful mollusks.
(((47))) (49) "Unreasonable adverse effects on the environment"
means any unreasonable risk to people or the environment taking into
account the economic, social, and environmental costs and benefits of
the use of any pesticide, or as otherwise determined by the director.
(((48))) (50) "Weed" means any plant which grows where it is not
wanted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 17.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) or (3) of this section, no
person may apply a high hazard pesticide at a school facility.
(2) The director of a licensed day care center or the board of
directors of a school district or the superintendent of the district
may authorize for their facility a single-use waiver from the
prohibition provided by subsection (1) of this section. The waiver may
be authorized only if each of the following conditions are met:
(a) The director, board, or superintendent determines that an
immediate human health or safety hazard exists that warrants the use of
a high hazard pesticide;
(b) Nonchemical or least-toxic pest prevention and control measures
have been used unsuccessfully;
(c) The underlying causes of the pest outbreak will also be
addressed by other actions to prevent future outbreaks; and
(d) Students or staff other than those making the application are
not in the area at the time of application or for forty-eight hours
following the application.
(3) This section does not limit the authority of a county health
officer, state agency, mosquito control district, or noxious weed
control board that is responsible for pest management decisions
regarding school facilities to make decisions and take actions
regarding those facilities.
(4) This section does not limit the authority of the director of a
licensed day care center or the officers of a school district to
establish pesticide application policies that are more restrictive than
the policy provided by subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 17.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state board of health shall adopt by rule a list of
products that the board considers to pose a high hazard to the health
of children or staff if applied in or on school facilities. In
developing the list, the board shall include at least products that
fall in each of the following categories. Products that:
(a) Meet the criteria of toxicity category I or toxicity category
II for pesticides as defined by the United States environmental
protection agency in 40 C.F.R. Sec. 156.62 as it exists on the
effective date of this section;
(b) Are classified as known, likely, probable, or possible
carcinogens by the United States environmental protection agency on the
effective date of this section; listed as causing cancer under the
state of California's Proposition 65 on the effective date of this
section; or classified by the international agency for research on
cancer as a known, probable, or possible carcinogen on the effective
date of this section;
(c) Are determined to be known, probable, or suspected endocrine
disruptors by the state of Illinois's environmental protection agency
on the effective date of this section;
(d) Are identified by the United States toxics release inventory on
the effective date of this section as having chronic neurologic effects
or contain N-methyl-carbamate, neuro-toxic organophosphorus compounds,
or pyrethroids;
(e) Are identified on the effective date of this section by the
United States toxics release inventory or listed on the effective date
of this section under the state of California's Proposition 65 as
causing birth defects, reproductive harm, or developmental harm;
(f) Are labeled as part of its state or federal registration as
being toxic to fish, birds, bees, wildlife, or domestic animals; and
(g) Are persistent in soil, as defined by a half-life in soil of
more than sixty days, except for minerals, i.e., nonorganic chemicals.
(2) The state board of health shall review and update the list
developed in subsection (1) of this section at least every five years,
and may amend the rules it adopts under this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 17.21.150 and 1994 c 283 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person who has committed any of the following acts is declared to
be in violation of this chapter:
(1) Made false or fraudulent claims through any media,
misrepresenting the effect of materials or methods to be utilized;
(2) Applied worthless or improper pesticides;
(3) Operated a faulty or unsafe apparatus;
(4) Operated in a faulty, careless, or negligent manner;
(5) Refused or neglected to comply with the provisions of this
chapter, the rules adopted hereunder, or of any lawful order of the
director including a final order of the director directing payment of
a civil penalty. In an adjudicative proceeding arising from the
department's denial of a license for failure to pay a civil penalty the
subject shall be limited to whether the payment was made and the
proceeding may not be used to collaterally attack the final order;
(6) Refused or neglected to keep and maintain the pesticide
application records required by rule, or to make reports when and as
required;
(7) Made false or fraudulent records, invoices, or reports;
(8) Acted as a certified applicator without having provided direct
supervision to an unlicensed person as defined in RCW 17.21.020(((12)))
(13);
(9) Operated an unlicensed apparatus or an apparatus without a
license plate issued for that particular apparatus;
(10) Used fraud or misrepresentation in making an application for
a license or renewal of a license;
(11) Is not qualified to perform the type of pest control under the
conditions and in the locality in which he or she operates or has
operated, regardless of whether or not he or she has previously passed
a pesticide license examination;
(12) Aided or abetted a licensed or an unlicensed person to evade
the provisions of this chapter, combined or conspired with such a
licensed or an unlicensed person to evade the provisions of this
chapter, or allowed one's license to be used by an unlicensed person;
(13) Knowingly made false, misleading or erroneous statements or
reports during or after an inspection concerning any infestation or
infection of pests found on land or in connection with any pesticide
complaint or investigation;
(14) Impersonated any state, county or city inspector or official;
(15) Applied a restricted use pesticide without having a certified
applicator in direct supervision;
(16) Operated a commercial pesticide application business: (a)
Without an individual licensed as a commercial pesticide applicator or
(b) with a licensed commercial pesticide applicator not licensed in the
classification or classifications in which the business operates;
((or))
(17) Operated as a commercial pesticide applicator without meeting
the financial responsibility requirements including not having a
properly executed financial responsibility insurance certificate or
surety bond form on file with the department; or
(18) Applied a pesticide in violation of section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 3 and 4 of this act may be known
and cited as the healthy schools act of 2005.

--- END ---