BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.56.110 and 2003 c 111 s 1407 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever any legal voter of the state or of any political
subdivision thereof, either individually or on behalf of an
organization, desires to demand the recall and discharge of any
elective public officer of the state or of such political subdivision,
as the case may be, under the provisions of sections 33 and 34 of
Article 1 of the Constitution, the voter or organization shall prepare
a typewritten charge, reciting that such officer, naming him or her and
giving the title of the office, has committed an act or acts of
malfeasance, or an act or acts of misfeasance while in office, or has
violated the oath of office, or has violated campaign finance laws in
a manner that probably affected the outcome of the election, or has
been guilty of any two or more of the acts specified in the
Constitution as grounds for recall. The charge shall state the act or
acts complained of in concise language, give a detailed description
including the approximate date, location, and nature of each act
complained of, be signed by the person or persons making the charge,
give their respective post office addresses, and be verified under oath
that the person or persons believe the charge or charges to be true and
have knowledge of the alleged facts upon which the stated grounds for
recall are based.
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Misfeasance" or "malfeasance" in office means any wrongful
conduct that affects, interrupts, or interferes with the performance of
official duty;
(a) Additionally, "misfeasance" in office means the performance of
a duty in an improper manner; and
(b) Additionally, "malfeasance" in office means the commission of
an unlawful act;
(2) "Violation of the oath of office" means the neglect or knowing
failure by an elective public officer to perform faithfully a duty
imposed by law.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.56.160 and 2003 c 111 s 1412 are each amended to
read as follows:
Recall petitions must be printed on single sheets of paper of good
writing quality (including but not limited to newsprint) not less than
eleven inches in width and not less than fourteen inches in length. No
petition may be circulated or signed prior to the first day of the one
hundred eighty or two hundred seventy day period established by RCW
29A.56.150 for that recall petition. The petitions must be
substantially in the following form:

The warning prescribed by RCW 29A.72.140; followed by:
Petition for the recall of (here insert the name of the office and
of the person whose recall is petitioned for) to the Honorable (here
insert the name and title of the officer with whom the charge is
filed).
We, the undersigned citizens and legal voters of (the state of
Washington or the political subdivision in which the recall is to be
held), respectfully direct that a special election be called to
determine whether or not (here insert the name of the person charged
and the office which he or she holds) be recalled and discharged from
his or her office, for and on account of (his or her having committed
the act or acts of malfeasance or misfeasance while in office, or
having violated his or her oath of office, or having violated campaign
finance laws in a manner that probably affected the outcome of the
election, as the case may be), in the following particulars: (here
insert the synopsis of the charge); and each of us for himself or
herself says: I have personally signed this petition; I am a legal
voter of the State of Washington in the precinct and city (or town) and
county written after my name, and my residence address is correctly
stated, and to my knowledge, have signed this petition only once.
The petition must include a place for each petitioner to sign and
print his or her name, and the address, city, and county at which he or
she is registered to vote.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect January 1, 2006, if
the proposed amendment to Article I, section 33 of the state
Constitution (HJR ....) is validly submitted to and is approved and
ratified by the voters at a general election held in November 2005. If
the proposed amendment is not approved and ratified, this act is void
in its entirety.

--- END ---