BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that airports are
critical to the statewide transportation infrastructure. The 2000
Washington Blue Ribbon Commission on Transportation reported that the
state has no plans in place today that, if implemented, would yield
results that would meet the long-term transportation needs of the
state. The long-standing lack of consensus on how to solve
Washington's transportation problems should be resolved through a
reasonable process. The legislature intends the airport siting council
to site airports that will ensure the long-term air transportation
needs of Washington state are met and are in compliance with applicable
public health, environmental, and land use laws.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) If the transportation commission
declares an impasse under section 3 or 4 of this act, the governor
shall appoint an airport siting council. The council will consist of
the following members: (a) The director of the department of
community, trade, and economic development, or a designee; (b) a member
of the transportation commission appointed by the governor, who shall
be the chair of the council; (c) two members of the general public with
special knowledge or background in airport issues, appointed by the
governor; and (d) a member of a growth management hearings board,
selected by the governor.
The member of a growth management hearings board must be a member
of the growth management hearings board that hears appeals from actions
taken under the Growth Management Act by counties not located in the
region in which the proposed airport project under consideration is
located or that is subject to the proposed transportation plan under
consideration.
(2) The chair of the council may designate another councilmember to
serve as the acting chair in the absence of the chair. The department
of transportation shall provide all administrative and staff support
for the council.
(3) The airport siting council appointed in response to a specific
finding of an impasse under section 3 or 4 of this act must be
disbanded once the governor has informed the council of his or her
decision under section 6 of this act regarding the council's airport
siting recommendations concerning the impasse. If, at a later date,
the transportation commission declares another impasse, the governor
shall appoint another airport siting council consistent with subsection
(1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If the transportation commission finds that
all of the following have occurred, it shall declare an impasse and
refer the issue to the airport siting council: (1) A regional
transportation plan does not satisfactorily address the state's
interest as defined in RCW 47.06.040 with respect to planning for
transportation needs through siting of an airport; (2) there has been
ample time to address siting of an airport in the regional
transportation plan and local comprehensive plans, but either no
decision has been reached or the process has resulted in a decision
that will not address the state's transportation needs as set forth in
RCW 47.06.040; (3) the department of transportation has sought by all
reasonable means to encourage local governments and regional bodies to
cooperate in a planning and decision-making process that addresses in
a timely manner statewide airport siting needs; (4) the transportation
commission has notified the local governments and regional bodies
responsible for the regional transportation plan of its intent to
declare an impasse; and (5) the local governments and regional bodies
responsible for the regional transportation plan have failed to show
cause within thirty days of such notification that an impasse should
not be declared.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The transportation commission must declare
an impasse by August 1, 2005, regarding the search for a supplemental
airport in the Puget Sound region or replacement for Seattle-Tacoma
International Airport.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The airport siting council shall convene
to make recommendations to the governor whenever the transportation
commission passes a resolution declaring that an impasse exists in the
siting of an airport of statewide significance, as provided in section
3 of this act. The council has eighteen months after the date on which
the transportation commission resolution is passed to make a
recommendation regarding the siting of the airport of statewide
significance and to communicate its recommendation in writing to the
governor.
(2) The responsibility of the council is to make airport siting
recommendations that reflect the interest of the entire state.
Accordingly, the council is not limited to the options examined by the
regional or local authority and may also consider alternative sites
outside the region. In forming its recommendation the council shall
review existing information and analyses regarding the siting issue,
including both technical data and the decision-making process that
failed to produce a resolution. The council may also hire staff for
technical evaluation, analysis, and research associated with the
preparation of its siting recommendation. The council may also
consider relationships between the proposed facility and other existing
or planned transportation facilities of statewide interest such as
airports, rail services, ferry systems, or highways.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The governor must accept or reject the
siting council's recommendation within sixty days. If the governor
rejects the siting council's recommendation, he or she may request the
siting council to provide an alternative recommendation within thirty
days. The governor has another sixty days to accept or reject the
siting council's alternative recommendation. Once the governor has
made a decision, the governor must inform in writing the members of the
airport siting council, the transportation commission, the chair(s) of
the legislative transportation committee, the county or city affected,
and the regional transportation planning organization located in the
region in which the transportation project will be sited.
(2) Subject to the conditions set forth in section 8(2) of this
act, a decision by the governor binds the state and each of its
political subdivisions, such as departments, agencies, divisions,
bureaus, commissions, boards, counties, cities, towns, ports, and
special districts, whether a political subdivision is a member of the
council or not, regarding approval of a site and the construction and
operation of a proposed airport.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The legislature may invalidate the
governor's decision if two-thirds of each house votes to object to his
or her choice of sites. The legislature must vote by the end of the
legislative session convened after the governor's decision. This will
ensure that the legislature has at least one full legislative session
for deliberation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) This chapter supersedes other laws for
establishing the location of airports of statewide significance or
rules adopted under state law for establishing the location of airports
of statewide significance.
(2) However, the requirements of this chapter and rules adopted
under it do not supersede the State Environmental Policy Act, the State
Clean Air Act, the State Clean Water Act, the Shoreline Management Act,
the laws relating to solid and hazardous waste management, and all the
related portions of the Washington Administrative Code that implement
these environmental laws.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 47.06 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature declares to be of statewide significance any
airports designated by the department as included in its plan as
determined by its own functional classification system and criteria.
The department shall assert leadership and cooperate with regional
transportation planning organizations, counties, cities, transit
agencies, public ports, and the private sector, by including in the
state's multimodal transportation plan improvements to transportation
facilities and services of statewide significance. Improvements to
facilities and services of statewide significance identified in the
statewide multimodal transportation plan developed under RCW
47.01.071(3) are considered essential public facilities under RCW
36.70A.200.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 47.80 RCW
to read as follows:
The regional transportation planning organization must adopt a
regional transportation plan that adequately implements the decision of
the governor to site an airport of statewide significance, as provided
in section 6 of this act.

Sec. 11 RCW 36.70A.200 and 2002 c 68 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The comprehensive plan of each county and city that is planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 shall include a process for identifying and siting
essential public facilities. Essential public facilities include those
facilities that are typically difficult to site, such as airports,
state education facilities and state or regional transportation
facilities as defined in RCW 47.06.140, state and local correctional
facilities, solid waste handling facilities, and in-patient facilities
including substance abuse facilities, mental health facilities, group
homes, and secure community transition facilities as defined in RCW
71.09.020. If the process of siting an airport fails, the airport
shall be sited by the process set forth in chapter 47.-- RCW (sections
1 through 8 of this act).
(2) Each county and city planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall, not
later than September 1, 2002, establish a process, or amend its
existing process, for identifying and siting essential public
facilities and adopt or amend its development regulations as necessary
to provide for the siting of secure community transition facilities
consistent with statutory requirements applicable to these facilities.
(3) Any city or county not planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall, not
later than September 1, 2002, establish a process for siting secure
community transition facilities and adopt or amend its development
regulations as necessary to provide for the siting of such facilities
consistent with statutory requirements applicable to these facilities.
(4) The office of financial management shall maintain a list of
those essential state public facilities that are required or likely to
be built within the next six years. The office of financial management
may at any time add facilities to the list.
(5) No local comprehensive plan or development regulation may
preclude the siting of essential public facilities.
(6) No person may bring a cause of action for civil damages based
on the good faith actions of any county or city to provide for the
siting of secure community transition facilities in accordance with
this section and with the requirements of chapter 12, Laws of 2001 2nd
sp. sess. For purposes of this subsection, "person" includes, but is
not limited to, any individual, agency as defined in RCW 42.17.020,
corporation, partnership, association, and limited liability entity.
(7) Counties or cities siting facilities pursuant to subsection (2)
or (3) of this section shall comply with RCW 71.09.341.
(8) The failure of a county or city to act by the deadlines
established in subsections (2) and (3) of this section is not:
(a) A condition that would disqualify the county or city for
grants, loans, or pledges under RCW 43.155.070 or 70.146.070;
(b) A consideration for grants or loans provided under RCW
43.17.250(2); or
(c) A basis for any petition under RCW 36.70A.280 or for any
private cause of action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The sum of five hundred thousand dollars,
or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the
biennium ending June 30, 2007, from the multimodal fund to the
department of transportation for the purposes of section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 47 RCW.

--- END ---