BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that quality services
and programs for children should be accessible to families living
throughout the state. In order to ensure quality and accessibility,
services and programs should be regulated in a fair and equitable
manner. Such regulation should be based upon the type of services
provided and the population of children served rather than on the
particular individual or entity that is offering the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The department of social and health services
shall establish a work group to study the regulation of services and
programs for children provided by licensed child care providers and the
regulation of after-school and summer services and programs provided by
local governments across the state.
(1) The work group shall:
(a) Determine whether or not there is an inequity in the regulation
of services and programs for children provided by licensed child care
providers and the regulation of after-school and summer services and
programs provided by local governments; and
(b) Identify strategies for addressing any inequities in the
regulation of services and programs for children that ensure access to
services and programs for children while maintaining the quality of
those services and programs.
(2) Membership of the work group shall include the following: A
representative of the division of child care and early learning of the
department of social and health services, a family home child care
provider, a child care center provider, a representative of the
association of Washington cities, and a representative of the
Washington state association of counties.
(3) The work group shall report to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the legislature by January 1, 2006, on the results of its
work.

--- END ---