BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.20.230 and 1998 c 161 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
employment security department will ensure that, within a reasonably
short period of time after the initiation of benefits, all unemployment
insurance claimants((, except those with employer attachment, union
referral, in commissioner-approved training, or the subject of
antiharassment orders,)) register for job search in an electronic labor
exchange system that supports direct employer access for the purpose of
selecting job applicants.
(2) The requirement that claimants register for job search in
subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:
(a) Individuals with employer attachment or union referral;
(b) Individuals who are the subject of antiharassment orders;
(c) Individuals in commissioner-approved training; and
(d) Individuals who are separated from employment as disaster
assistance employees of the federal emergency management agency.

Sec. 2 RCW 50.20.240 and 2004 c 110 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) To ensure that following the initial application for
benefits, an individual is actively engaged in searching for work, the
employment security department shall implement a job search monitoring
program. Effective January 4, 2004, the department shall contract with
employment security agencies in other states to ensure that individuals
residing in those states and receiving benefits under this title are
actively engaged in searching for work in accordance with the
requirements of this section. The department may use interactive voice
technology and other electronic means to ensure that individuals are
subject to comparable job search monitoring, regardless of whether they
reside in Washington or elsewhere.
(b) Except for ((those)) individuals with employer attachment or
union referral, individuals who qualify for unemployment compensation
under RCW 50.20.050 (1)(b)(iv) or (2)(b)(iv), as applicable, ((and))
individuals in commissioner-approved training, and individuals who are
separated from employment as disaster assistance employees of the
federal emergency management agency, an individual who has received
five or more weeks of benefits under this title, regardless of whether
the individual resides in Washington or elsewhere, must provide
evidence of seeking work, as directed by the commissioner or the
commissioner's agents, for each week beyond five in which a claim is
filed. With regard to claims with an effective date before January 4,
2004, the evidence must demonstrate contacts with at least three
employers per week or documented in-person job search activity at the
local reemployment center. With regard to claims with an effective
date on or after January 4, 2004, the evidence must demonstrate
contacts with at least three employers per week or documented in-person
job search activities at the local reemployment center at least three
times per week.
(c) In developing the requirements for the job search monitoring
program, the commissioner or the commissioner's agents shall utilize an
existing advisory committee having equal representation of employers
and workers.
(2) Effective January 4, 2004, an individual who fails to comply
fully with the requirements for actively seeking work under RCW
50.20.010 shall lose all benefits for all weeks during which the
individual was not in compliance, and the individual shall be liable
for repayment of all such benefits under RCW 50.20.190.

--- END ---