BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Motor vehicles are the largest source of air pollution in the
state of Washington, and motor vehicles contribute approximately fifty-seven percent of criteria air pollutant emissions, eighty percent of
air toxics emissions, and fifty-five percent of greenhouse gas
emissions;
(2) Air pollution levels routinely measured in the state of
Washington continue to harm public health, the environment, and the
economy. Air pollution causes or contributes to premature death,
cancer, asthma, and heart and lung disease. Over half of the state's
population suffers from one or more medical conditions that make them
very vulnerable to air pollution. Air pollution increases pain and
suffering for vulnerable individuals. Air pollution imposes several
hundred million dollars annually in added health care costs for air
pollution-associated death and illness, reducing the quality of life
and economic security of the citizens of Washington;
(3) Reductions of greenhouse gas emissions from transportation
sources are necessary, and it is equitable to seek such reductions
because reductions in greenhouse gas emissions have already been
initiated in other sectors such as power generation;
(4) Reductions in greenhouse gas emissions made under this act
should be credited toward any future federal, state, or regional
comprehensive regulatory structure enacted to address reducing
greenhouse gas emissions;
(5) Under the federal clean air act, the state of Washington has
the option to implement either federal motor vehicle emission standards
or California motor vehicle emission standards for passenger cars,
light duty trucks, and medium duty passenger vehicles;
(6) Opting into the California motor vehicle standards will provide
significant and necessary air quality benefits to residents of the
state of Washington; and
(7) Adoption of the California motor vehicle standards will
increase consumer choices of cleaner vehicles, provide better
warranties to consumers, and provide sufficient air quality benefit to
allow additional business and economic growth in the key airsheds of
the state while maintaining conformance with federal air quality
standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Pursuant to the federal clean air act,
the legislature adopts the California motor vehicle emission standards
in Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations, effective January 1,
2005. By December 31, 2005, the department of ecology shall adopt
rules to implement the emission standards of the state of California
for passenger cars, light duty trucks, and medium duty passenger
vehicles, and shall amend the rules from time to time, to maintain
consistency with the California motor vehicle emission standards and 42
U.S.C. Sec. 7507 (section 177 of the federal clean air act). During
rule development, the department of ecology shall convene an advisory
group composed of industry and consumer group representatives. Any
proposed rules or changes to rules shall be subject to review and
comment by the advisory group, prior to rule adoption. The order of
adoption for the rules required in this section shall include the
signature of the governor. Rules shall be applicable to motor vehicles
with a model year 2009 and later if an adjoining state, with a
population of greater than three million people, adopts the California
air emission standards for motor vehicles effective for model year
2009, otherwise the rules shall be applicable to motor vehicles with a
model year 2010 and later. This section does not limit the department
of ecology's authority to regulate motor vehicle emissions for any
other class of vehicle.
(2) Motor vehicles with a model year equal to or later than the
first model year for which new vehicles sold to Washington state
residents are required to comply with California motor vehicle emission
standards are exempt from emission inspections under chapter 70.120
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) In recognition of the provisions of the
federal clean air act which require a minimum phase-in period of three
model years for adoption of California motor vehicle emission
standards, the implementing rules shall include a system of early
credits and banking for manufacturers for zero emission vehicles
produced and sold earlier than the implementation date for the
standards in Washington. Beginning with the model year in which the
new standards become effective, each manufacturer's fleet of passenger
cars and light duty trucks delivered for sale in the state of
Washington shall proportionately conform to the zero emission vehicle
requirements of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations,
including early credit and banking provisions set forth in Title 13 of
the Code of California Regulations using Washington specific vehicle
numbers. A manufacturer shall be given early Washington zero emission
vehicle credits proportionally equivalent to the zero emission vehicle
credits possessed by the requesting manufacturer for use in the state
of California on January 1st of the model year the California standards
become effective in Washington.
(2) In addition, an alternative means of compliance with the
requirements of subsection (1) of this section shall be created in the
implementing rules provided for in section 2 of this act. The
alternative means of compliance shall allow a manufacturer to earn
Washington zero emission vehicle credits beginning with the 2005 model
year. The alternative means of compliance shall be developed to be
consistent in concept with the alternative compliance systems developed
for the states of Connecticut, New York, and Maine as they adopted the
zero emission vehicle provisions of the California motor vehicle
standards and shall contain a Washington multiplier consistent with the
multipliers in those systems. The implementing rules shall require
timely notification by the manufacturer to the department of ecology of
an election to use the alternative means of compliance.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.94.017 and 2003 c 264 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Money deposited in the segregated subaccount of the air
pollution control account under RCW 46.68.020(2) shall be distributed
as follows:
(a) Eighty-five percent shall be distributed to air pollution
control authorities created under this chapter. The money must be
distributed in direct proportion with the amount of fees imposed under
RCW 46.12.080, 46.12.170, and 46.12.181 that are collected within the
boundaries of each authority. However, an amount in direct proportion
with those fees collected in counties for which no air pollution
control authority exists must be distributed to the department.
(b) The remaining fifteen percent shall be distributed to the
department.
(2) Money distributed to air pollution control authorities and the
department under subsection (1) of this section must be used as
follows:
(a) Eighty-five percent of the money received by an air pollution
control authority or the department ((must be used)) is available on a
priority basis to retrofit school buses with exhaust emission control
devices or to provide funding for fueling infrastructure necessary to
allow school bus fleets to use alternative, cleaner fuels. In
addition, the director of ecology or the air pollution control officer
may direct funding under this section for other publicly owned diesel
equipment if the director of ecology or the air pollution control
officer finds that funding for other publicly owned diesel equipment
will provide public health benefits and further the purposes of this
chapter.
(b) The remaining fifteen percent may be used by the air pollution
control authority or department to reduce ((vehicle)) transportation-related air contaminant emissions and clean up air pollution, or reduce
and monitor toxic air contaminants.
(3) Money in the air pollution control account may be spent by the
department only after appropriation.
(4) ((The department shall provide a report to the legislative
transportation committees on the progress of the implementation of this
section by December 31, 2004)) This section expires July 1, 2020.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.120.170 and 1998 c 342 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall administer a system for emission
inspections of all motor vehicles, except those described in RCW
46.16.015(2), that are registered within the boundaries of each
emission contributing area. Under such system a motor vehicle shall be
inspected biennially except where an annual program would be required
to meet federal law and prevent federal sanctions. In addition, motor
vehicles shall be inspected at each change of registered owner of a
licensed vehicle as provided under RCW 46.16.015.
(2) The director shall:
(a) Adopt procedures for conducting emission inspections of motor
vehicles. The inspections may include idle and high revolution per
minute emission tests. The emission test for diesel vehicles shall
consist solely of a smoke opacity test.
(b) Adopt criteria for calibrating emission testing equipment.
Electronic equipment used to test for emissions standards provided for
in this chapter shall be properly calibrated. The department shall
examine frequently the calibration of the emission testing equipment
used at the stations.
(c) Authorize, through contracts, the establishment and operation
of inspection stations for conducting vehicle emission inspections
authorized in this chapter. No person contracted to inspect motor
vehicles may perform for compensation repairs on any vehicles. No
public body may establish or operate contracted inspection stations.
Any contracts ((must be let in accordance)) comply with the procedures
established for competitive bids in chapter 43.19 RCW.
(d) Beginning in 2012, authorize businesses other than those
contracted to operate inspection stations under (c) of this subsection
to conduct vehicle emission inspections. Businesses authorized under
this subsection may also inspect and perform, for compensation, repairs
on vehicles. The fee limitations under subsection (4) of this section
do not apply to the fee charged for a vehicle emissions inspection by
a business authorized to conduct vehicle emission inspections under
this subsection. The director may establish by rule a fee to be paid
to the department for the oversight costs for each vehicle emission
inspection performed by a business authorized under this subsection
(2)(d).
(3) Subsection (2)(c) of this section does not apply to volunteer
motor vehicle inspections under RCW 70.120.020(1) if the inspections
are conducted for the following purposes:
(a) Auditing;
(b) Contractor evaluation;
(c) Collection of data for establishing calibration and performance
standards; or
(d) Public information and education.
(4)(a) The director shall establish by rule the fee to be charged
for emission inspections. The inspection fee shall be a standard fee
applicable statewide or throughout an emission contributing area and
shall be no greater than fifteen dollars. Surplus moneys collected
from fees over the amount due the contractor shall be paid to the state
and deposited in the general fund. Fees shall be set at the minimum
whole dollar amount required to (i) compensate the contractor or
inspection facility owner, and (ii) offset the general fund
appropriation to the department to cover the administrative costs of
the motor vehicle emission inspection program.
(b) Before each inspection, a person whose motor vehicle is to be
inspected shall pay to the inspection station the fee established under
this section. The person whose motor vehicle is inspected shall
receive the results of the inspection. If the inspected vehicle
complies with the standards established by the director, the person
shall receive a dated certificate of compliance. If the inspected
vehicle does not comply with those standards, one reinspection of the
vehicle shall be afforded without charge.
(5) All units of local government and agencies of the state with
motor vehicles garaged or regularly operated in an emissions
contributing area shall test the emissions of those vehicles annually
to ensure that the vehicle's emissions comply with the emission
standards established by the director. All state agencies outside of
emission contributing areas with more than twenty motor vehicles housed
at a single facility or contiguous facilities shall test the emissions
of those vehicles annually to ensure that the vehicles' emissions
comply with standards established by the director. A report of the
results of the tests shall be submitted to the department.
(6) This section expires January 1, 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
After adoption of rules specified in section 2 of this act, no
vehicle shall be registered, leased, rented, or sold for use in the
state starting with the model year as provided in section 2 of this act
unless the vehicle: (1) Is consistent with the vehicle emission
standards adopted by the department of ecology; or (2) has seven
thousand five hundred miles or more. The department of licensing, in
consultation with the department of ecology, may adopt rules necessary
to implement this section and may provide for reasonable exemptions to
these requirements. The department of ecology may exempt public safety
vehicles from meeting the standards where the department finds that
vehicles necessary to meet the needs of public safety agencies are not
otherwise reasonably available.

Sec. 7 RCW 46.37.540 and 1983 c 3 s 119 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature intends to make it illegal for persons to turn
forward the odometer on a new car to avoid compliance with the
emissions standards required by this act.
(2) It shall be unlawful for any person to disconnect, turn back,
turn forward, or reset the odometer of any motor vehicle with the
intent to ((reduce)) change the number of miles indicated on the
odometer gauge. A violation of this subsection is a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The office of financial management shall
provide an annual progress report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature. The office of financial management, in conjunction with
the departments of licensing, revenue, and ecology, shall report on the
availability of vehicles meeting the standards, the progress of
automobile industries in meeting the requirements of the standards, and
any other matters relevant to the success of auto-related industries in
implementing these requirements.

Sec. 9 2003 c 264 s 9 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
Section((s 1 and)) 3 of this act expires July 1, ((2008)) 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 RCW 70.120.200 (Engine conformance) and
1991 c 199 s 211 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 1991 c 199 s 229 (uncodified) is repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 2 and 3 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 4, 5, and 9 of this act are
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health,
or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect July 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Sections 1, 2, 6, and 10 through 12 of this
act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace,
health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing
public institutions, and take effect immediately.

--- END ---