BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.600.300 and 2002 c 80 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 28A.600.310 through 28A.600.400,
"participating institution of higher education" or "institution of
higher education" means:
(1) A community or technical college as defined in RCW 28B.50.030;
((and))
(2) A public tribal college authorized to operate as a degree-granting institution by the higher education coordinating board; and
(3) Central Washington University, Eastern Washington University,
Washington State University, and The Evergreen State College, if the
institution's governing board decides to participate in the program in
RCW 28A.600.310 through 28A.600.400.

--- END ---