BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 76.09.240 and 2002 c 121 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((By December 31, 2005, each county and each city shall adopt
ordinances or promulgate regulations setting standards for those Class
IV forest practices regulated by local government. The regulations
shall: (a) Establish minimum standards for Class IV forest practices;
(b) set forth necessary administrative provisions; and (c) establish
procedures for the collection and administration of forest practices
and recording fees as set forth in this chapter.
(2) Class IV forest practices regulations shall be administered and
enforced by the counties and cities that promulgate them.
(3) The forest practices board shall continue to promulgate
regulations and the department shall continue to administer and enforce
the regulations promulgated by the board in each county and each city
for all forest practices as provided in this chapter until such time
as, in the opinion of the department, the county or city has
promulgated forest practices regulations that meet the requirements as
set forth in this section and that meet or exceed the standards set
forth by the board in regulations in effect at the time the local
regulations are adopted. Regulations promulgated by the county or city
thereafter shall be reviewed in the usual manner set forth for county
or city rules or ordinances. Amendments to local ordinances must meet
or exceed the forest practices rules at the time the local ordinances
are amended.
(a) Department review of the initial regulations promulgated by a
county or city shall take place upon written request by the county or
city. The department, in consultation with the department of ecology,
may approve or disapprove the regulations in whole or in part.
(b) Until January 1, 2006, the department shall provide technical
assistance to all counties or cities that have adopted forest practices
regulations acceptable to the department and that have assumed
regulatory authority over all Class IV forest practices within their
jurisdiction.
(c) Decisions by the department approving or disapproving the
initial regulations promulgated by a county or city may be appealed to
the forest practices appeals board, which has exclusive jurisdiction to
review the department's approval or disapproval of regulations
promulgated by counties and cities.
(4))) On or before December 31, 2007:
(a) Counties planning under RCW 36.70A.040, and the cities and
towns within those counties, where more than a total of twenty-five
Class IV forest practices applications, as defined in RCW 76.09.050(1)
Class IV (a) through (d), have been filed with the department between
January 1, 2000, and December 31, 2002, shall adopt and enforce
ordinances or regulations as provided in subsection (2) of this section
for the following:
(i) Forest practices classified as Class I, II, III, and IV that
are within urban growth areas designated under RCW 36.70A.110, except
for forest practices on ownerships of contiguous forest land equal to
or greater than twenty acres where the forest landowner provides, to
the department and the county, a written statement of intent, signed by
the forest landowner, not to convert to a use other than growing
commercial timber for ten years. This statement must be accompanied by
either:
(A) A written forest management plan acceptable to the department;
or
(B) Documentation that the land is enrolled as forest land of long-
term commercial significance under the provisions of chapter 84.33 RCW;
and
(ii) Forest practices classified as Class IV, outside urban growth
areas designated under RCW 36.70A.110, involving either timber harvest
or road construction, or both on:
(A) Lands platted after January 1, 1960, as provided in chapter
58.17 RCW;
(B) Lands that have or are being converted to another use; or
(C) Lands which, under RCW 76.09.070 as now or hereafter amended,
are not to be reforested because of the likelihood of future conversion
to urban development.
(b) Counties planning under RCW 36.70A.040, and the cities and
towns within those counties, not included in (a) of this subsection,
may adopt and enforce ordinances or regulations as provided in (a) of
this subsection.
(c) Counties not planning under RCW 36.70A.040, and the cities and
towns within those counties, where more than a total of twenty-five
Class IV forest practices applications, as defined in RCW 76.09.050(1)
Class IV (a) through (d), have been filed with the department between
January 1, 2000, and December 31, 2002, shall adopt and enforce
ordinances or regulations as provided in subsection (2) of this section
for forest practices classified as Class IV involving either timber
harvest or road construction, or both on:
(i) Lands platted after January 1, 1960, as provided in chapter
58.17 RCW;
(ii) Lands that have or are being converted to another use; or
(iii) Lands which, under RCW 76.09.070 as now or hereafter amended,
are not to be reforested because of the likelihood of future conversion
to urban development.
(d) Counties not planning under RCW 36.70A.040, and the cities and
towns within those counties, not included in (c) of this subsection,
may adopt and enforce ordinances or regulations as provided in (c) of
this subsection.
(2) Before a county, city, or town may regulate forest practices
under subsection (1) of this section, it shall ensure that its critical
areas and development regulations are in compliance with RCW 36.70A.130
and, if applicable, RCW 36.70A.215. The county, city, or town shall
notify the department and the department of ecology in writing sixty
days prior to adoption of the development regulations required in this
section. The transfer of jurisdiction shall not occur until the
county, city, or town has notified the department and the department of
ecology in writing of the effective date of the regulations.
Ordinances and regulations adopted under subsection (1) of this section
and this subsection (2) shall include:
(a) Provisions that require appropriate approvals for all phases of
the conversion of forest lands, including land clearing and grading;
and
(b) Procedures for the collection and administration of permit and
recording fees.
(3) Activities regulated by counties, cities, or towns as provided
in subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall be administered and
enforced by those counties, cities, or towns. The department shall not
regulate these activities under this chapter.
(4) The board shall continue to adopt rules and the department
shall continue to administer and enforce those rules in each county,
city, or town for all forest practices as provided in this chapter
until such a time as the county, city, or town has updated its
development regulations as required by RCW 36.70A.130 and, if
applicable, RCW 36.70A.215, and has adopted ordinances or regulations
under subsections (1) and (2) of this section. However, counties,
cities, and towns that have adopted ordinances or regulations regarding
forest practices prior to the effective date of this section are not
required to readopt their ordinances or regulations in order to satisfy
the requirements of this section.
(5) Upon request, the department shall provide technical assistance
to all counties, cities, and towns while they are in the process of
adopting the regulations required by this section, and after the
regulations become effective.
(6) For those forest practices over which the board and the
department maintain regulatory authority no county, city, municipality,
or other local or regional governmental entity shall adopt or enforce
any law, ordinance, or regulation pertaining to forest practices,
except that to the extent otherwise permitted by law, such entities may
exercise any:
(a) Land use planning or zoning authority: PROVIDED, That exercise
of such authority may regulate forest practices only: (i) Where the
application submitted under RCW 76.09.060 as now or hereafter amended
indicates that the lands have been or will be converted to a use other
than commercial forest product production; or (ii) on lands which have
been platted after January 1, 1960, as provided in chapter 58.17 RCW:
PROVIDED, That no permit system solely for forest practices shall be
allowed; that any additional or more stringent regulations shall not be
inconsistent with the forest practices regulations enacted under this
chapter; and such local regulations shall not unreasonably prevent
timber harvesting;
(b) Taxing powers;
(c) Regulatory authority with respect to public health; and
(d) Authority granted by chapter 90.58 RCW, the "Shoreline
Management Act of 1971".

Sec. 2 RCW 76.09.060 and 2003 c 314 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following shall apply to those forest practices administered
and enforced by the department and for which the board shall
((promulgate regulations)) adopt rules as provided in this chapter:
(1) The department shall prescribe the form and contents of the
notification and application. The forest practices rules shall specify
by whom and under what conditions the notification and application
shall be signed or otherwise certified as acceptable. The application
or notification shall be delivered in person to the department, sent by
first class mail to the department or electronically filed in a form
defined by the department. The form for electronic filing shall be
readily convertible to a paper copy, which shall be available to the
public pursuant to chapter 42.17 RCW. The information required may
include, but is not limited to:
(a) Name and address of the forest landowner, timber owner, and
operator;
(b) Description of the proposed forest practice or practices to be
conducted;
(c) Legal description and tax parcel identification numbers of the
land on which the forest practices are to be conducted;
(d) Planimetric and topographic maps showing location and size of
all lakes and streams and other public waters in and immediately
adjacent to the operating area and showing all existing and proposed
roads and major tractor roads;
(e) Description of the silvicultural, harvesting, or other forest
practice methods to be used, including the type of equipment to be used
and materials to be applied;
(f) Proposed plan for reforestation and for any revegetation
necessary to reduce erosion potential from roadsides and yarding roads,
as required by the forest practices rules;
(g) Soil, geological, and hydrological data with respect to forest
practices;
(h) The expected dates of commencement and completion of all forest
practices specified in the application;
(i) Provisions for continuing maintenance of roads and other
construction or other measures necessary to afford protection to public
resources;
(j) An affirmation that the statements contained in the
notification or application are true; and
(k) All necessary application or notification fees.
(2) Long range plans may be submitted to the department for review
and consultation.
(3) The application for a forest practice or the notification of a
Class II forest practice is subject to the three-year reforestation
requirement.
(a) If the application states that any such land will be or is
intended to be so converted:
(i) The reforestation requirements of this chapter and of the
forest practices rules shall not apply if the land is in fact so
converted unless applicable alternatives or limitations are provided in
forest practices rules issued under RCW 76.09.070 as now or hereafter
amended;
(ii) Completion of such forest practice operations shall be deemed
conversion of the lands to another use for purposes of chapters 84.33
and 84.34 RCW unless the conversion is to a use permitted under a
current use tax agreement permitted under chapter 84.34 RCW;
(iii) The forest practices described in the application are subject
to the regulations of the applicable county, city, town, ((and)) or
regional governmental authority as permitted under RCW 76.09.240 ((as
now or hereafter amended as well as)) if the forest practice described
in the application is being regulated by the local government under RCW
76.09.240. Forest practices that are not being regulated by a local
government under RCW 76.09.240 are subject to the forest practices
rules.
(b) Except as provided elsewhere in this section, if the
application or notification does not state that any land covered by the
application or notification will be or is intended to be so converted:
(i) For six years after the date of the application the county,
city, town, and regional governmental entities shall deny any or all
applications for permits or approvals, including building permits and
subdivision approvals, relating to nonforestry uses of land subject to
the application;
(A) The department shall submit to the local governmental entity a
copy of the statement of a forest landowner's intention not to convert
which shall represent a recognition by the landowner that the six-year
moratorium shall be imposed and shall preclude the landowner's ability
to obtain development permits while the moratorium is in place. This
statement shall be filed by the local governmental entity with the
county recording officer, who shall record the documents as provided in
chapter 65.04 RCW, except that lands designated as forest lands of
long-term commercial significance under chapter 36.70A RCW shall not be
recorded due to the low likelihood of conversion. Not recording the
statement of a forest landowner's conversion intention shall not be
construed to mean the moratorium is not in effect.
(B) The department shall collect the recording fee and reimburse
the local governmental entity for the cost of recording the
application.
(C) When harvesting takes place without an application, the local
governmental entity shall impose the six-year moratorium provided in
(b)(i) of this subsection from the date the unpermitted harvesting was
discovered by the department or the local governmental entity.
(D) The local governmental entity shall develop a process for
lifting the six-year moratorium, which shall include public
notification, and procedures for appeals and public hearings.
(E) The local governmental entity may develop an administrative
process for lifting or waiving the six-year moratorium for the purposes
of constructing a single-family residence or outbuildings, or both, on
a legal lot and building site. Lifting or waiving of the six-year
moratorium is subject to compliance with all local ordinances.
(F) The six-year moratorium shall not be imposed on a forest
practices application that contains a conversion option harvest plan
approved by the local governmental entity unless the forest practice
was not in compliance with the approved forest practice permit. Where
not in compliance with the conversion option harvest plan, the six-year
moratorium shall be imposed from the date the application was approved
by the department or the local governmental entity;
(ii) Failure to comply with the reforestation requirements
contained in any final order or decision shall constitute a removal of
designation under the provisions of RCW 84.33.140, and a change of use
under the provisions of RCW 84.34.080, and, if applicable, shall
subject such lands to the payments and/or penalties resulting from such
removals or changes; and
(iii) Conversion to a use other than commercial forest product
operations within six years after approval of the forest practices
without the consent of the county, city, or town shall constitute a
violation of each of the county, municipal city, town, and regional
authorities to which the forest practice operations would have been
subject if the application had so stated.
(c) The application or notification shall be signed by the forest
landowner and accompanied by a statement signed by the forest landowner
indicating his or her intent with respect to conversion and
acknowledging that he or she is familiar with the effects of this
subsection.
(4) Whenever an approved application authorizes a forest practice
which, because of soil condition, proximity to a water course or other
unusual factor, has a potential for causing material damage to a public
resource, as determined by the department, the applicant shall, when
requested on the approved application, notify the department two days
before the commencement of actual operations.
(5) Before the operator commences any forest practice in a manner
or to an extent significantly different from that described in a
previously approved application or notification, there shall be
submitted to the department a new application or notification form in
the manner set forth in this section.
(6) Except as provided in RCW 76.09.350(4), the notification to or
the approval given by the department to an application to conduct a
forest practice shall be effective for a term of two years from the
date of approval or notification and shall not be renewed unless a new
application is filed and approved or a new notification has been filed.
At the option of the applicant, an application or notification may be
submitted to cover a single forest practice or a number of forest
practices within reasonable geographic or political boundaries as
specified by the department. An application or notification that
covers more than one forest practice may have an effective term of more
than two years. The board shall adopt rules that establish standards
and procedures for approving an application or notification that has an
effective term of more than two years. Such rules shall include
extended time periods for application or notification approval or
disapproval. On an approved application with a term of more than two
years, the applicant shall inform the department before commencing
operations.
(7) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, no prior
application or notification shall be required for any emergency forest
practice necessitated by fire, flood, windstorm, earthquake, or other
emergency as defined by the board, but the operator shall submit an
application or notification, whichever is applicable, to the department
within forty-eight hours after commencement of such practice or as
required by local regulations.
(8) Forest practices applications or notifications are not required
for forest practices conducted to control exotic forest insect or
disease outbreaks, when conducted by or under the direction of the
department of agriculture in carrying out an order of the governor or
director of the department of agriculture to implement pest control
measures as authorized under chapter 17.24 RCW, and are not required
when conducted by or under the direction of the department in carrying
out emergency measures under a forest health emergency declaration by
the commissioner of public lands as provided in RCW 76.06.130.
(a) For the purposes of this subsection, exotic forest insect or
disease has the same meaning as defined in RCW 76.06.020.
(b) In order to minimize adverse impacts to public resources,
control measures must be based on integrated pest management, as
defined in RCW 17.15.010, and must follow forest practices rules
relating to road construction and maintenance, timber harvest, and
forest chemicals, to the extent possible without compromising control
objectives.
(c) Agencies conducting or directing control efforts must provide
advance notice to the appropriate regulatory staff of the department of
the operations that would be subject to exemption from forest practices
application or notification requirements.
(d) When the appropriate regulatory staff of the department are
notified under (c) of this subsection, they must consult with the
landowner, interested agencies, and affected tribes, and assist the
notifying agencies in the development of integrated pest management
plans that comply with forest practices rules as required under (b) of
this subsection.
(e) Nothing under this subsection relieves agencies conducting or
directing control efforts from requirements of the federal clean water
act as administered by the department of ecology under RCW 90.48.260.
(f) Forest lands where trees have been cut as part of an exotic
forest insect or disease control effort under this subsection are
subject to reforestation requirements under RCW 76.09.070.
(g) The exemption from obtaining approved forest practices
applications or notifications does not apply to forest practices
conducted after the governor, the director of the department of
agriculture, or the commissioner of public lands have declared that an
emergency no longer exists because control objectives have been met,
that there is no longer an imminent threat, or that there is no longer
a good likelihood of control.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each county, city, and town assuming regulation of forest
practices as provided in RCW 76.09.240 (1) and (2) shall adopt
development regulations that:
(a) Protect public resources, as defined in RCW 76.09.020, from
material damage or the potential for material damage;
(b) Require appropriate approvals for all phases of the conversion
of forest lands, including clearing and grading; and
(c) Are guided by the planning goals in RCW 36.70A.020 and by the
purposes and policies of the forest practices act as set forth in RCW
76.09.010.
(2) If necessary, each county, city, or town that assumes
regulation of forest practices under RCW 76.09.240 shall amend its
comprehensive plan to ensure consistency between its comprehensive plan
and development regulations.
(3) Before a county, city, or town may regulate forest practices
under RCW 76.09.240 (1) and (2), it shall update its development
regulations as required by RCW 36.70A.130 and, if applicable, RCW
36.70A.215. Forest practices regulations adopted under RCW 76.09.240
(1) and (2) may be adopted as part of the legislative action taken
under RCW 36.70A.130 or 36.70A.215.

--- END ---