BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 76.48.020 and 2000 c 11 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless otherwise required by the context, as used in this
chapter:)) The definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Authorization" means a properly completed preprinted form
authorizing the transportation or possession of Christmas trees which
contains the information required by RCW 76.48.080, a sample of which
is filed before the harvesting occurs with the sheriff of the county in
which the harvesting is to occur.
(2) "Bill of lading" means a written or printed itemized list or
statement of particulars pertinent to the transportation or possession
of a specialized forest product.
(3) "Cascara bark" means the bark of a Cascara tree.
(((3))) (4) "Cedar processor" means any person who purchases,
takes, or retains possession of cedar products or cedar salvage for
later sale in the same or modified form following removal and delivery
from the land where harvested.
(((4))) (5) "Cedar products" means cedar shakeboards, shake and
shingle bolts, and rounds one to three feet in length.
(((5))) (6) "Cedar salvage" means cedar chunks, slabs, stumps, and
logs having a volume greater than one cubic foot and being harvested or
transported from areas not associated with the concurrent logging of
timber stands (a) under a forest practices application approved or
notification received by the department of natural resources, or (b)
under a contract or permit issued by an agency of the United States
government.
(((6))) (7) "Christmas trees" means any evergreen trees or the top
thereof, commonly known as Christmas trees, with limbs and branches,
with or without roots, including fir, pine, spruce, cedar, and other
coniferous species.
(((7))) (8) "Cut or picked evergreen foliage," commonly known as
brush, means evergreen boughs, huckleberry, salal, fern, Oregon grape,
rhododendron, mosses, bear grass, scotch broom (Cytisus scoparius), and
other cut or picked evergreen products. "Cut or picked evergreen
foliage" does not mean cones, berries, any foliage that does not remain
green year-round, or seeds.
(((8))) (9) "Harvest" means to separate, by cutting, prying,
picking, peeling, breaking, pulling, splitting, or otherwise removing,
a specialized forest product (a) from its physical connection or
contact with the land or vegetation upon which it is or was growing or
(b) from the position in which it is lying upon the land.
(((9))) (10) "Harvest site" means each location where one or more
persons are engaged in harvesting specialized forest products close
enough to each other that communication can be conducted with an
investigating law enforcement officer in a normal conversational tone.
(((10))) (11) "Landowner" means, with regard to real property, the
private owner, the state of Washington or any political subdivision,
the federal government, or a person who by deed, contract, or lease has
authority to harvest and sell forest products of the property.
"Landowner" does not include the purchaser or successful high bidder at
a public or private timber sale.
(((11))) (12) "Native ornamental trees and shrubs" means any trees
or shrubs which are not nursery grown and which have been removed from
the ground with the roots intact.
(((12))) (13) "Permit area" means a designated tract of land that
may contain single or multiple harvest sites.
(((13))) (14) "Person" includes the plural and all corporations,
foreign or domestic, copartnerships, firms, and associations of
persons.
(((14))) (15) "Processed cedar products" means cedar shakes,
shingles, fence posts, hop poles, pickets, stakes, rails, or rounds
less than one foot in length.
(((15))) (16) "Sheriff" means, for the purpose of validating
specialized forest products permits, the county sheriff, deputy
sheriff, or an authorized employee of the sheriff's office or an agent
of the office.
(((16))) (17) "Specialized forest products" means Christmas trees,
native ornamental trees and shrubs, cut or picked evergreen foliage,
cedar products, cedar salvage, processed cedar products, specialty
wood, wild edible mushrooms, and Cascara bark.
(((17))) (18) "Specialized forest products permit" means a printed
document in a form ((specified)) printed by the department of natural
resources, or true copy thereof, that is signed by a landowner or his
or her authorized agent or representative, referred to in this chapter
as "permittors" and validated by the county sheriff and authorizes a
designated person, referred to in this chapter as "permittee," who has
also signed the permit, to harvest and transport a designated
specialized forest product from land owned or controlled and specified
by the permittor and that is located in the county where the permit is
issued.
(((18))) (19) "Specialty wood" means wood that is:
(a) In logs less than eight feet in length, chunks, slabs, stumps,
or burls; and
(b) One or more of the following:
(i) Of the species western red cedar, Englemann spruce, Sitka
spruce, big leaf maple, or western red alder;
(ii) Without knots in a portion of the surface area at least
twenty-one inches long and seven and a quarter inches wide when
measured from the outer surface toward the center; or
(iii) Suitable for the purposes of making musical instruments or
ornamental boxes.
(20) "Specialty wood buyer" means the first person that receives
any specialty wood product after it leaves the harvest site.
(21) "Specialty wood processor" means any person who purchases,
takes, or retains possession of specialty wood products or specialty
wood salvage for later sale in the same or modified form following
removal and delivery from the land where harvested.
(22) "Transportation" means the physical conveyance of specialized
forest products outside or off of a harvest site by any means.
(((19))) (23) "True copy" means a replica of a validated
specialized forest products permit as reproduced by a copy machine
capable of effectively reproducing the information contained on the
permittee's copy of the specialized forest products permit. A copy is
made true by the permittee or the permittee and permittor signing in
the space provided on the face of the copy. A true copy will be
effective until the expiration date of the specialized forest products
permit unless the permittee or the permittee and permittor specify an
earlier date. A permittor may require the actual signatures of both
the permittee and permittor for execution of a true copy by so
indicating in the space provided on the original copy of the
specialized forest products permit. A permittee, or, if so indicated,
the permittee and permittor, may condition the use of the true copy to
harvesting only, transportation only, possession only, or any
combination thereof.
(((20))) (24) "Wild edible mushrooms" means edible mushrooms not
cultivated or propagated by artificial means.

Sec. 2 RCW 76.48.050 and 1995 c 366 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Specialized forest products permits shall consist of properly
completed permit forms validated by the sheriff of the county in which
the specialized forest products are to be harvested. Each permit shall
be separately numbered and the issuance of the permits shall be
((issued)) by consecutive numbers. All specialized forest products
permits shall expire at the end of the calendar year in which issued,
or sooner, at the discretion of the permittor. A properly completed
specialized forest products permit form shall include:
(1) The date of its execution and expiration;
(2) The name, address, telephone number, if any, and signature of
the permittor;
(3) The name, address, telephone number, if any, and signature of
the permittee;
(4) The type of specialized forest products to be harvested or
transported;
(5) The approximate amount or volume of specialized forest products
to be harvested or transported;
(6) The legal description of the property from which the
specialized forest products are to be harvested or transported,
including the name of the county, or the state or province if outside
the state of Washington;
(7) A description by local landmarks of where the harvesting is to
occur, or from where the specialized forest products are to be
transported;
(8) ((The number from some type of)) For cedar products, cedar
salvage, and specialty wood, a copy of a map or aerial photograph, with
defined permitted boundaries, included as an attachment to the permit;
(9) A copy of a valid picture identification; and
(((9))) (10) Any other condition or limitation which the permittor
may specify.
Except for the harvesting of Christmas trees, the permit or true
copy thereof must be carried by the permittee and the permittee's
agents and be available for inspection at all times. For the
harvesting of Christmas trees only a single permit or true copy thereof
is necessary to be available at the harvest site.

Sec. 3 RCW 76.48.060 and 1995 c 366 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A specialized forest products permit validated by the county
sheriff shall be obtained by a person prior to harvesting from any
lands, including his or her own, more than five Christmas trees, more
than five native ornamental trees or shrubs, more than five pounds of
cut or picked evergreen foliage, any cedar products, cedar salvage,
processed cedar products, or more than five pounds of Cascara bark, or
more than ((three)) five United States gallons of a single species of
wild edible mushroom ((and more than an aggregate total of nine United
States gallons of wild edible mushrooms, plus one wild edible
mushroom)).
(2) Specialized forest products permit forms shall be provided by
the department of natural resources, and shall be made available
through the office of the county sheriff to permittees or permittors in
reasonable quantities. A permit form shall be completed in triplicate
for each permittor's property on which a permittee harvests specialized
forest products. A properly completed permit form shall be mailed or
presented for validation to the sheriff of the county in which the
specialized forest products are to be harvested.
(3) Before a permit form is validated by the sheriff, sufficient
personal identification may be required to reasonably identify the
person mailing or presenting the permit form and the sheriff may
conduct other investigations as deemed necessary to determine the
validity of the information alleged on the form. When the sheriff is
reasonably satisfied as to the truth of the information, the form shall
be validated with the sheriff's validation stamp.
(4) Upon validation, the form shall become the specialized forest
products permit authorizing the harvesting, possession, or
transportation of specialized forest products, subject to any other
conditions or limitations which the permittor may specify. Two copies
of the permit shall be given or mailed to the permittor, or one copy
shall be given or mailed to the permittor and the other copy given or
mailed to the permittee. The original permit shall be retained in the
office of the county sheriff validating the permit.
(5) In the event a single land ownership is situated in two or more
counties, a specialized forest product permit shall be completed as to
the land situated in each county.
(6) While engaged in harvesting of specialized forest products,
permittees, or their agents or employees, must have readily available
at each harvest site a valid permit or true copy of the permit.

Sec. 4 RCW 76.48.070 and 1995 c 366 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 76.48.100 and 76.48.075, it is
unlawful for any person (a) to possess, (b) to transport, or (c) to
possess and transport within the state of Washington, subject to any
other conditions or limitations specified in the specialized forest
products permit by the permittor, more than five Christmas trees, more
than five native ornamental trees or shrubs, more than five pounds of
cut or picked evergreen foliage, any processed cedar products, or more
than five pounds of Cascara bark, or more than ((three)) five gallons
of a single species of wild edible ((mushrooms and more than an
aggregate total of nine gallons of wild edible mushrooms, plus one wild
edible)) mushroom without having in his or her possession a written
authorization, sales invoice, bill of lading, or specialized forest
products permit or a true copy thereof evidencing his or her title to
or authority to have possession of specialized forest products being so
possessed or transported.
(2) It is unlawful for any person either (a) to possess, (b) to
transport, or (c) to possess and transport within the state of
Washington any cedar products ((or)), cedar salvage, or specialty wood
without having in his or her possession a specialized forest products
permit or a true copy thereof evidencing his or her title to or
authority to have possession of the materials being so possessed or
transported. The specialized forest products permit or true copy are
valid to possess, transport, or possess and transport the cedar
products, cedar salvage, or specialty wood from the harvest site to the
first cedar or specialty wood processor or buyer. For purposes of this
subsection, a true copy requires the actual signatures of both the
permittee and the permittor for the execution of a true copy.

Sec. 5 RCW 76.48.075 and 1995 c 366 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person to transport or cause to be
transported into this state from any other state or province
specialized forest products, except those harvested from that person's
own property, without: (a) First acquiring and having readily
available for inspection a document indicating the true origin of the
specialized forest products as being outside the state, or (b) without
acquiring a specialized forest products permit as provided in
subsection (4) of this section.
(2) Any person transporting or causing to be transported
specialized forest products into this state from any other state or
province shall, upon request of any person to whom the specialized
forest products are sold or delivered or upon request of any law
enforcement officer, prepare and sign a statement indicating the true
origin of the specialized forest products, the date of delivery, and
the license number of the vehicle making delivery, and shall leave the
statement with the person making the request.
(3) It is unlawful for any person to possess specialized forest
products, transported into this state, with knowledge that the products
were introduced into this state in violation of this chapter.
(4) When any person transporting or causing to be transported into
this state specialized forest products elects to acquire a specialized
forest products permit, the specialized forest products transported
into this state shall be deemed to be harvested in the county of entry,
and the sheriff of that county may validate the permit as if the
products were so harvested, except that the permit shall also indicate
the actual harvest site outside the state.
(5) A cedar or specialty wood processor shall comply with RCW
76.48.096 by requiring a person transporting specialized forest
products into this state from any other state or province to display a
specialized forest products permit, or true copy thereof, or other
governmental document indicating the true origin of the specialized
forest products as being outside the state. For purposes of this
subsection, a true copy requires the actual signatures of both the
permittee and the permittor for the execution of a true copy. The
cedar or specialty wood processor shall make and maintain a record of
the purchase, taking possession, or retention of cedar products and
cedar salvage in compliance with RCW 76.48.094.
(6) If, under official inquiry, investigation, or other authorized
proceeding regarding specialized forest products not covered by a valid
specialized forest products permit or other acceptable document, the
inspecting law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that
the specialized forest products were harvested in this state or
wrongfully obtained in another state or province, the officer may take
into custody and detain, for a reasonable time, the specialized forest
products, all supporting documents, invoices, and bills of lading, and
the vehicle in which the products were transported until the true
origin of the specialized forest products can be determined.

Sec. 6 RCW 76.48.085 and 2000 c 11 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
Buyers who purchase specialized forest products are required to
record (1) the permit number; (2) the type of forest product purchased;
(3) the permit holder's name; and (4) the amount of forest product
purchased. The buyer or processor shall keep a record of this
information for a period of one year from the date of purchase and must
make the records available for inspection upon demand by authorized
enforcement officials.
The buyer of specialized forest products must record the license
plate number of the vehicle transporting the forest products on the
bill of sale, as well as the seller's permit number on the bill of
sale. This section shall not apply to transactions involving Christmas
trees.
This section shall not apply to buyers of specialized forest
products at the retail sales level.

Sec. 7 RCW 76.48.094 and 1979 ex.s. c 94 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Cedar or specialty wood processors shall make and maintain a
record of the purchase, taking possession, or retention of cedar
products ((and)), cedar salvage, or specialty wood for at least one
year after the date of receipt. ((The record shall be legible and
shall include the date of delivery, the license number of the vehicle
delivering the products, the driver's name, and the specialized forest
products permit number or the information provided for in RCW
76.48.075(5).)) The record must be legible and must be made at the
time each delivery is made.
(2) The bill of lading must accompany all cedar products, cedar
salvage, or specialty wood products after the products are received by
the cedar or specialty wood processor. The bill of lading must include
the specialized forest products permit number or the information
provided for in RCW 76.48.075(5) and must also specify:
(a) The date of transportation;
(b) The name and address of the first cedar or specialty wood
processor or buyer who recorded the specialized forest products
information;
(c) The name and address from where the cedar or specialty wood
products are being transported;
(d) The name of the person receiving the cedar or specialty wood
products;
(e) The address to where the cedar or specialty wood products are
being transported;
(f) The name of the driver;
(g) The vehicle license number;
(h) The type of cedar or specialty wood product being shipped; and
(i) The amount of cedar or specialty wood product being shipped.

Sec. 8 RCW 76.48.096 and 1995 c 366 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is unlawful for any cedar or specialty wood buyer or processor
to purchase, take possession, or retain cedar or specialty wood
products or cedar salvage subsequent to the harvesting and prior to the
retail sale of the products, unless the supplier thereof displays a
specialized forest products permit, or true copy thereof that appears
to be valid, or obtains the information under RCW 76.48.075(5).

Sec. 9 RCW 76.48.098 and 1995 c 366 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every cedar or specialty wood buyer or processor shall prominently
display a valid registration certificate, or copy thereof, obtained
from the department of revenue under RCW 82.32.030 at each location
where the buyer or processor receives cedar products ((or)), cedar
salvage, or specialty wood.
Permittees shall sell cedar products ((or)), cedar salvage, or
specialty wood products only to cedar or specialty wood processors
displaying registration certificates which appear to be valid.

Sec. 10 RCW 76.48.100 and 1995 c 366 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
(1) Nursery grown products.
(2) Logs (except as included in the definition of "cedar salvage"
under RCW 76.48.020), poles, pilings, or other major forest products
from which substantially all of the limbs and branches have been
removed, specialty wood, and cedar salvage when harvested concurrently
with timber stands (a) under an approved forest practices application
or notification, or (b) under a contract or permit issued by an agency
of the United States government.
(3) The activities of a landowner, his or her agent, or
representative, or of a lessee of land in carrying on noncommercial
property management, maintenance, or improvements on or in connection
with the land of the landowner or lessee.

Sec. 11 RCW 76.48.110 and 1995 c 366 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Whenever any law enforcement officer has probable cause to
believe that a person is harvesting or is in possession of or
transporting specialized forest products in violation of the provisions
of this chapter, he or she may, at the time of making an arrest, seize
and take possession of any specialized forest products found. If the
specialized forest product is a cedar product, cedar salvage, or
specialty wood, at the time of making an arrest the law enforcement
officer may seize and take possession of any equipment, vehicles,
tools, or paperwork. The law enforcement officer shall provide
reasonable protection for the equipment, vehicles, tools, paperwork, or
specialized forest products involved during the period of litigation or
he or she shall dispose of the equipment, vehicles, tools, paperwork,
or specialized forest products at the discretion or order of the court
before which the arrested person is ordered to appear.
(2) Upon any disposition of the case by the court, the court shall
make a reasonable effort to return the equipment, vehicles, tools,
paperwork, or specialized forest products to its rightful owner or pay
the proceeds of any sale of specialized forest products less any
reasonable expenses of the sale to the rightful owner. If for any
reason, the proceeds of the sale cannot be disposed of to the rightful
owner, the proceeds, less the reasonable expenses of the sale, shall be
paid to the treasurer of the county in which the violation occurred.
The county treasurer shall deposit the same in the county general fund.
The return of the equipment, vehicles, tools, paperwork, or specialized
forest products or the payment of the proceeds of any sale of products
seized to the owner shall not preclude the court from imposing any fine
or penalty upon the violator for the violation of the provisions of
this chapter.

Sec. 12 RCW 76.48.140 and 1977 ex.s. c 147 s 15 are each amended
to read as follows:
All fines collected for violations of any provision of this chapter
shall be paid into the general fund of the county treasury of the
county in which the violation occurred and distributed equally among
the district courts in the county, the county sheriff's office, and the
county's general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 76.48 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of natural resources is the designated agency to
develop and print the specialized forest products permit and distribute
it to the county sheriffs. In addition, the department of natural
resources shall develop educational material and other printed
information for law enforcement, forest landowners, and specialized
forest products harvesters, buyers, and processors specific to this
chapter.

--- END ---