BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.08.180 and 2000 c 192 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 66.24.290(1), moneys in the liquor
revolving fund shall be distributed by the board at least once every
three months in accordance with RCW 66.08.190, 66.08.200 and 66.08.210:
PROVIDED, That the board shall reserve from distribution such amount
not exceeding five hundred thousand dollars as may be necessary for the
proper administration of this title.
(1) All license fees, penalties and forfeitures derived under
chapter 13, Laws of 1935 from spirits, beer, and wine restaurant;
spirits, beer, and wine private club; and sports entertainment facility
licenses or spirits, beer, and wine restaurant; spirits, beer, and wine
private club; and sports entertainment facility licensees shall every
three months be disbursed by the board as follows:
(a) Three hundred thousand dollars per biennium, to the death
investigations account for the state toxicology program pursuant to RCW
68.50.107; and
(b) Of the remaining funds:
(i) 6.06 percent to the University of Washington and 4.04 percent
to Washington State University for alcoholism and drug abuse research
and for the dissemination of such research; and
(ii) 89.9 percent to the general fund to be used by the department
of social and health services solely to carry out the purposes of RCW
70.96A.050;
(2) ((The first fifty-five)) One hundred fifty thousand dollars
((per)) annually from the license fees provided in RCW 66.24.320 and
66.24.330 ((up to a maximum of one hundred fifty thousand dollars
annually)) shall be ((disbursed every three months by the board to the
general fund to be used for juvenile alcohol and drug prevention
programs for kindergarten through third grade to be administered by the
superintendent of public instruction)) used by the board to fund its
alcohol education program authorized by RCW 66.08.050;
(3) Twenty percent of the remaining total amount derived from
license fees pursuant to RCW 66.24.320, 66.24.330, 66.24.350, and
66.24.360, shall be transferred to the general fund to be used by the
department of social and health services solely to carry out the
purposes of RCW 70.96A.050; and
(4) One-fourth cent per liter of the tax imposed by RCW 66.24.210
shall every three months be disbursed by the board to Washington State
University solely for wine and wine grape research, extension programs
related to wine and wine grape research, and resident instruction in
both wine grape production and the processing aspects of the wine
industry in accordance with RCW 28B.30.068. The director of financial
management shall prescribe suitable accounting procedures to ensure
that the funds transferred to the general fund to be used by the
department of social and health services and appropriated are
separately accounted for.

--- END ---