BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By March 30, 2006, the superintendent of public instruction
shall, in consultation with the Washington state school safety center
advisory committee and the criminal justice training commission,
develop a model policy and training standards and requirements for
school building administrators and other school security personnel
relative to the use of force and physical restraint in the common
schools. The superintendent shall report to the appropriate committees
of the legislature regarding the model training standards and
requirements for school building administrators and other school
security personnel relative to the use of force and physical restraint.
The superintendent and advisory committee also shall recommend:
(a) Options for the structure and delivery of training throughout
the state;
(b) Accountability measures for the training required under section
3 of this act; and
(c) A model for ongoing review and oversight of the training
standards by the advisory committee.
(2) The model policy and training standards shall be developed with
input from school safety stakeholders, including, but not limited to,
organizations that represent the interests of: (a) School boards; (b)
school administrators; (c) principals; (d) school security
professionals; (e) law enforcement; (f) prosecutors; (g) risk managers;
(h) parents; (i) victim assistance advocates; (j) human rights
advocates; (k) legal defense specialists; (l) teachers and
instructional paraprofessionals; (m) classified school employees; (n)
special education administrators and personnel; (o) school safety
training; (p) pediatric and adolescent health care specialists; (q)
mental health providers; and (r) other organizations deemed relevant by
the superintendent. Human rights advocates under this section shall
include representation from the Washington human rights commission.
(3) By March 30, 2006, the model policy and training standards and
requirements developed under this section shall be made available to
serve as guidance to school districts and educational service districts
and shall be posted on the superintendent of public instruction's web
site.
(4) For purposes of this section, "school security personnel" means
persons, other than commissioned law enforcement officers, who provide
security services at a school, including independent contractors hired
by a school or school district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) By March 30, 2006, the superintendent of
public instruction and the criminal justice training commission, in
consultation with the school safety advisory committee, shall
disseminate a schedule of regional training sessions, addressing the
training standards developed under section 1 of this act. Training
sessions shall be made available to school safety and security
personnel from May 1, 2006, through December 31, 2006.
(2) By December 1, 2006, the superintendent of public instruction
shall, in collaboration with the criminal justice training commission
and the school safety advisory committee, present to appropriate
committees of the legislature a plan for full implementation of the
training standards and requirements developed under section 1 of this
act. The plan shall include training content and costs associated with
the ongoing training of school security personnel, school
administrators, and other relevant school personnel.
(3) The definition of "school security personnel" in section 1 of
this act applies in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.600
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By September 1, 2007, each school district board of directors
shall adopt a policy and identify district personnel in need of
training regarding the use of force and physical restraint. District
policies under this section should be tailored to reflect the contexts
of the district's elementary, middle, and high schools, and may be
incorporated into existing district policies regarding student conduct,
discipline, and rights adopted pursuant and into procedures for
administering discipline developed under this chapter. Districts are
encouraged to adopt or amend policies through a process that includes
representation of parents or guardians, school employees, volunteers,
students, administrators, and community members that represent the
diversity within the community and school populations.
(2) Beginning in the 2005-06 school year, each school district
board of directors in which one or more schools employs an independent
contractor to meet its security and safety needs shall, in
collaboration with the appropriate building administrator, inquire and
be informed about an independent contractor's policy regarding the use
of force and physical restraint in the school building in which the
contractor provides services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2005, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---