BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that large vessels specifically designed
for the housing of people upon the seas, unlike vessels designed to
transport cargo or petroleum that carry crew as an ancillary function
of cargo transport, function primarily as a temporary residential
facility, especially while these vessels are stationary at their port
of call. The primary function of these vessels is more akin to a
floating hotel or a houseboat than it is to a transportation vessel.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to ensure that the
blackwater, graywater, and other wastes eventually released by the
owners and operators of commercial passenger vessels satisfies the
state's standards for protecting the quality of its waters. It is the
traditional and long-standing role of the state to ensure that any
substances being released into its waters will not, given the unique
nature of the state's local waters, adversely impact either the state's
economic or environmental interests.
(3) It is the intent of the legislature for the department to fund
the implementation of the commercial passenger vessel program created
in sections 2 through 11 of this act exclusively through appropriations
provided from the commercial passenger vessel enforcement account
created in section 9 of this act.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.48.020 and 2002 c 161 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Whenever the word)) The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Person" ((is used in this chapter, it shall be construed to))
includes any political subdivision, government agency, municipality,
industry, public or private corporation, copartnership, association,
firm, individual, or any other entity whatsoever.
((Wherever the words)) (2) "Waters of the state" ((shall be used in
this chapter, they shall be construed to)) includes lakes, rivers,
ponds, streams, inland waters, underground waters, salt waters, and all
other surface waters and watercourses within the jurisdiction of the
state of Washington.
((Whenever the word)) (3) "Pollution" ((is used in this chapter, it
shall be construed to)) means such contamination, or other alteration
of the physical, chemical, or biological properties, of any waters of
the state, including change in temperature, taste, color, turbidity, or
odor of the waters, or such discharge of any liquid, gaseous, solid,
radioactive, or other substance into any waters of the state as will or
is likely to create a nuisance or render such waters harmful,
detrimental, or injurious to the public health, safety, or welfare, or
to domestic, commercial, industrial, agricultural, recreational, or
other legitimate beneficial uses, or to livestock, wild animals, birds,
fish, or other aquatic life.
((Wherever the word)) (4) "Department" ((is used in this chapter it
shall)) means the department of ecology.
((Whenever the word)) (5) "Director" ((is used in this chapter it
shall)) means the director of ecology.
((Whenever the words)) (6) "Aquatic noxious weed" ((are used in
this chapter, they have)) has the meaning ((prescribed under)) provided
in RCW 17.26.020.
((Whenever the words)) (7) "General sewer plan" ((are used in this
chapter they shall be construed to)) includes all sewerage general
plans, sewer general comprehensive plans, plans for a system of
sewerage, and other plans for sewer systems adopted by a local
government entity including but not limited to cities, towns, public
utility districts, and water-sewer districts.
(8) "Blackwater" means treated or untreated sewage wastewater from
the toilets, urinals, medical sinks, and similar facilities on
commercial passenger vessels.
(9) "Biomedical waste" has the same meaning provided in RCW
70.95K.010.
(10) "Commercial passenger vessel" means a vessel not owned by the
government of the United States or a foreign nation that is authorized
and capable of providing overnight accommodations for at least fifty
passengers for hire.
(11) "Dangerous waste" has the meaning provided in RCW 70.105.010.
(12) "Graywater" means treated or untreated galley, dishwater,
bath, and laundry wastewaters from a commercial passenger vessel.
(13) "Oily bilge water" includes bilge water that contains used
lubrication oils, oil sludge and slops, fuel and oil sludge, used oil,
used fuel and fuel filters, and oily waste.
(14) "Passengers for hire" means vessel passengers that are
required to contribute some form of consideration as a condition of
carriage on the vessel, whether that consideration flows directly or
indirectly to the owner, charterer, operator, agent, or other person
having an interest in the vessel.
(15) "Release" means any discharge, however caused, from a
commercial passenger vessel, and includes any escape, disposal,
spilling, leaking, pumping, emitting, or emptying.
(16) "Sewage sludge" has the meaning provided in RCW 70.95.030.
(17) "Solid waste" has the meaning provided in RCW 70.95.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section or section 10 of
this act, a person may not, regardless of intent, release sewage
sludge, solid waste, biomedical waste, dangerous waste, untreated
graywater, or untreated blackwater from a commercial passenger vessel
into any waters of the state.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person may not,
regardless of intent, release oily bilge water into any waters of the
state if not in compliance with applicable federal law.
(3) This section does not apply to releases made for the purpose of
securing the safety of a commercial passenger vessel or saving life at
sea if all reasonable precautions have been taken to prevent or
minimize the release.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in this section or section 10 of this act,
a person may not release blackwater into any waters of the state from
a commercial passenger vessel that calls on a public port in Washington
unless the owner or operator of the commercial passenger vessel has
been approved for blackwater releases by the department for the vessel
in question.
(2)(a) The department shall approve blackwater releases from a
commercial passenger vessel if the owner or operator of the commercial
passenger vessel:
(i) Can demonstrate to the department's satisfaction, based on
effluent limits and requirements for sampling and reporting established
by the department, that the blackwater to be released from the vessel
will receive an adequate level of treatment to protect the quality of
the water receiving the release; and
(ii) Has paid the mandatory annual operating fee established in
section 8 of this act.
(b) The department shall presume that the level of treatment given
to blackwater releases from a vessel is adequate if the owner or
operator of a commercial passenger vessel satisfies the requirements of
section 5 of this act and provides documentation to the department
about the type of wastewater treatment system in use on the vessel, and
documentation that the wastewater treatment system on the vessel in
question has been certified by the United States coast guard for
continuous discharge of blackwater in the state of Alaska. If the
mandatory annual operating fee established in section 8 of this act has
been satisfied, the approval for blackwater release may be presumed by
the owner or operator of a commercial passenger vessel providing such
documentation if the department has not provided notification in
writing to the contrary or a request in writing for further
documentation to demonstrate coast guard approval within sixty days of
submitting the original documentation.
(3) Approvals granted by the department under this section remain
in effect until January 1st following the approval and may be rescinded
if substantial changes are made to the approved wastewater treatment
system or if a violation of section 5 of this act is discovered.
(4) This section does not apply to releases made for the purpose of
securing the safety of a commercial passenger vessel or saving life at
sea if all reasonable precautions have been taken to prevent or
minimize the release.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The owner or operator of a commercial passenger vessel that is
operating under the presumption of adequate blackwater treatment
granted in section 4 of this act may only maintain the presumption of
adequacy if the owner or operator agrees with the department to do all
of the following when the vessel is at least more than one nautical
mile from its berth at a public port in Washington and is traveling at
least six knots or more:
(a) Sample the quality of the treated blackwater released from the
commercial passenger vessel while at berth at a Washington public port
at least once during each month that the commercial passenger vessel
calls on a public port in Washington. The sample must be analyzed by
a department-approved laboratory for all parameters required to be
tested in order to obtain the necessary United States coast guard
certification referenced by section 4 of this act for continuous
discharge of blackwater in the state of Alaska, and must include, at a
minimum, the following five parameters: pH, biochemical oxygen demand,
fecal coliform, total suspended solids, and residual chlorine;
(b) Share all effluent samples with the department, when requested
in writing, for all samples taken in waters of the state;
(c) Conduct a whole effluent toxicity test, or WET test, at least
once every two years unless the department provides notification in
writing that such testing is unnecessary;
(d) Provide the department, when requested in writing, with
duplicate results of tests performed on the commercial passenger
vessel's wastewater treatment system in other jurisdictions;
(e) Notify the department at least one week before sampling in
waters of the state is to occur, and allow department staff to observe
the sampling events when requested;
(f) Immediately report to the department any unauthorized
discharges;
(g) Allow the department to conduct a minimum of one inspection of
the commercial passenger vessel, if requested in writing, to verify the
operating conditions of the wastewater treatment system; and
(h) Notify the department if material changes are made to the
wastewater treatment system approved under section 4 of this act.
(2) The owner or operator of a commercial passenger vessel that is
operating under the presumption of adequate blackwater treatment
granted in section 4 of this act may only maintain the presumption of
adequacy if the owner or operator agrees with the department to do all
of the following when the vessel is at or within one nautical mile of
its berth at a public port in Washington:
(a) Comply with the requirements set forth in subsection (1)(a)
through (h) of this section;
(b) Provide twenty-four hour continuous monitoring of the turbidity
of any released blackwater, or an equivalent to turbidity monitoring
agreed to by the department that judges the effluent released by the
wastewater treatment system of a commercial passenger vessel;
(c) Provide documentation to the department that all treated
blackwater will receive adequate disinfection immediately before
discharge;
(d) Provide copies of any water quality tests taken from the
effluent of the commercial passenger vessel during the six months
preceding the approved release; and
(e) Provide documentation of the commercial passenger vessel's
wastewater treatment system design that demonstrates:
(i) That the system can be either automatically shut down or that
there are operational procedures in place to ensure an immediate shut
down of the system if effluent monitoring reveals that the wastewater
treatment system is malfunctioning;
(ii) A plan has been adopted that describes protocols for notifying
the department if the wastewater treatment system malfunctions or is
shut down while in the waters of the state; and
(iii) How blackwater will be stored, including the capacity of any
holding tanks to be used, until the wastewater treatment system is
repaired and operating.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in this section or section 10 of this act,
a person may not release graywater into any waters of the state from a
commercial passenger vessel that calls on a public port in Washington
unless the owner or operator of the commercial passenger vessel has
been approved for graywater releases by the department for the vessel
in question.
(2)(a) The department shall approve graywater releases from a
commercial passenger vessel if the owner or operator of the commercial
passenger vessel:
(i) Can demonstrate to the department's satisfaction, based on
effluent limits and requirements for sampling and reporting established
by the department, that the graywater to be released from the vessel
will receive an adequate level of treatment to protect the quality of
the water receiving the release; and
(ii) Has paid the mandatory annual operating fee established in
section 8 of this act.
(b) The department shall presume that the level of treatment given
to graywater releases from a vessel is adequate if the owner or
operator of a commercial passenger vessel satisfies the requirements of
section 7 of this act and provides documentation to the department
about the type of wastewater treatment system in use on the vessel, and
documentation that the wastewater treatment system on the vessel in
question has been certified by the United States coast guard for
continuous discharge of graywater in the state of Alaska. If the
mandatory annual operating fee established in section 8 of this act has
been satisfied, the approval for graywater release may be presumed by
the owner or operator of a commercial passenger vessel providing such
documentation if the department has not provided notification in
writing to the contrary or a request in writing for further
documentation to demonstrate coast guard approval within sixty days of
submitting the original documentation.
(3) Approvals granted by the department under this section remain
in effect until January 1st following the approval and may be rescinded
if substantial changes are made to the approved wastewater treatment
system or if a violation of section 7 of this act is discovered.
(4) This section does not apply to releases made for the purpose of
securing the safety of a commercial passenger vessel or saving life at
sea if all reasonable precautions have been taken to prevent or
minimize the release.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The owner or operator of a commercial passenger vessel that is
operating under the presumption of adequate graywater treatment granted
in section 6 of this act may only maintain the presumption of adequacy
if the owner or operator agrees with the department to do all of the
following when the vessel is at least more than one nautical mile from
its berth at a public port in Washington and is traveling at least six
knots or more:
(a) Sample the quality of the treated graywater released from the
commercial passenger vessel while at berth at a Washington public port
at least once during each month that the commercial passenger vessel
calls on a public port in Washington. The sample must be analyzed by
a department-approved laboratory for all parameters required to be
tested in order to obtain the necessary United States coast guard
certification referenced by section 6 of this act for continuous
discharge of graywater in the state of Alaska, and must include, at a
minimum, the following five parameters: pH, biochemical oxygen demand,
fecal coliform, total suspended solids, and residual chlorine;
(b) Share all effluent samples with the department, when requested
in writing, for all samples taken in waters of the state;
(c) Conduct a whole effluent toxicity test, or WET test, at least
once every two years unless the department provides notification in
writing that such testing is unnecessary;
(d) Provide the department, when requested in writing, with
duplicate results of tests performed on the commercial passenger
vessel's wastewater treatment system in other jurisdictions;
(e) Notify the department at least one week before sampling in
waters of the state is to occur, and allow department staff to observe
the sampling events when requested;
(f) Immediately report to the department any unauthorized
discharges;
(g) Allow the department to conduct a minimum of one inspection of
the commercial passenger vessel, if requested in writing, to verify the
operating conditions of the wastewater treatment system; and
(h) Notify the department if material changes are made to the
wastewater treatment system approved under section 6 of this act.
(2) The owner or operator of a commercial passenger vessel that is
operating under the presumption of adequate graywater treatment granted
in section 6 of this act may only maintain the presumption of adequacy
if the owner or operator agrees with the department to do all of the
following when the vessel is at or within one nautical mile of its
berth at a public port in Washington:
(a) Comply with the requirements set forth in subsection (1)(a)
through (h) of this section;
(b) Provide twenty-four hour continuous monitoring of the turbidity
of any released graywater, or an equivalent to turbidity monitoring
agreed to by the department that judges the effluent released by the
wastewater treatment system of a commercial passenger vessel;
(c) Provide documentation to the department that all treated
graywater will receive adequate disinfection immediately before
discharge;
(d) Provide copies of any water quality tests taken from the
effluent of the commercial passenger vessel during the six months
preceding the approved release; and
(e) Provide documentation of the commercial passenger vessel's
wastewater treatment system design that demonstrates:
(i) That the system can be either automatically shut down or that
there are operational procedures in place to ensure an immediate shut
down of the system if effluent monitoring reveals that the wastewater
treatment system is malfunctioning;
(ii) A plan has been adopted that describes protocols for notifying
the department if the wastewater treatment system malfunctions or is
shut down while in the waters of the state; and
(iii) How graywater will be stored, including the capacity of any
holding tanks to be used, until the wastewater treatment system is
repaired and operating.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Before releasing treated blackwater under section 4 of this act
or treated graywater under section 6 of this act, the owner or operator
of a commercial passenger vessel must remit to the department an annual
operating fee in an amount set by the department.
(2)(a) The department shall establish the fee schedule necessary to
implement this section so that the total estimated receipts equal the
estimated annual costs in implementing sections 3 through 11 of this
act.
(b) The actual fee charged to an individual commercial passenger
vessel under this section shall be based on the number of passengers
for hire that can be provided with overnight accommodation on the
vessel; however, in no event may the annual fee for a commercial
passenger vessel under this section exceed four thousand dollars per
vessel per year.
(3) Fees collected under this section must be deposited into the
commercial passenger vessel enforcement account created in section 9 of
this act.
(4) The department may enter into agreements to collect the annual
operations fee from the owner or operators of the commercial passenger
vessels calling on a port.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
The commercial passenger vessel enforcement account is created in
the state treasury. All receipts from annual operating fees paid by
the owner or operator of a commercial passenger vessel must be
deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may only be used for
administering and enforcing the provisions of sections 3 through 11 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon the written application from the owner or operator of a
commercial passenger vessel that provides overnight accommodations for
less than two hundred fifty passengers for hire, the director of the
department shall exempt specific commercial passenger vessels from the
requirements of sections 3, 4, and 6 of this act.
(2) The owner or operator applying to the director for the
exemption allowed in this section has the responsibility to provide the
director with the necessary information about his or her specific
vessel; however, to streamline the application process for owners and
operators, trade associations may submit to the department lists of
individual vessels that qualify for an exemption under this section.
(3) This exemption in this section expires on December 31, 2009.
The director in 2008 shall investigate the state of technologies
available to small commercial passenger vessels with the small cruise
ship industry and report back to the legislature on January 12, 2009,
on whether the exemption should be extended or modified.
(4) Vessels that qualify for an exemption under this section are
not required to pay the annual operating fee under section 8 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By November 30, 2007, the department shall submit to the
appropriate committees of the legislature a report describing how the
management and releases of treated blackwater and graywater from
commercial passenger vessels under this chapter are or are not adequate
for protecting water quality and public health. At a minimum, the
report must make findings as to whether commercial passenger vessels
are releasing treated blackwater and graywater in the same locations,
and if so, whether the cumulative effects of these releases degrade the
water quality in those areas. The report must also address the
dilution and dispersion of viruses in the treated blackwater and the
impact on shellfish for human consumption.
(2) For each year from 2005 until 2010, the department shall
analyze all water quality data received from commercial passenger
vessels and make available to the public, using the agency's web site,
by December 31st of each year a report that summarizes all data
collected in lay terms.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Section 11 of this act expires January 1,
2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 This act takes effect January 1, 2006.

--- END ---