BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A carrier may not retroactively deny, adjust, or seek
recoupment or refund of an adjudicated claim submitted by a health care
provider for any reason, other than fraud or coordination of benefits
or as set forth in subsection (5) of this section, after the expiration
of two years from the date the initial claim was paid. If a carrier
retroactively denies, adjusts, or seeks recoupment or refund of an
adjudicated claim, the health care provider has an additional period of
six months from the date the notice required by subsection (6) of this
section was received within which to file either a revised claim or a
request for reconsideration supported by additional medical records or
information. If both the carrier and provider agree, adjudicated
claims may be adjusted after the expiration of two years from the date
the claim was paid.
(2) A health care provider may not retroactively seek adjustment of
an adjudicated claim by a carrier for any reason, other than fraud or
coordination of benefits, after the expiration of two years from the
date the initial claim was paid. If a provider retroactively seeks an
adjustment of an adjudicated claim, the carrier has an additional
period of six months from the date the notice required by subsection
(6) of this section was received within which to file a response. If
both the carrier and provider agree, adjudicated claims may be adjusted
after the expiration of two years from the date the claim was paid.
(3) A carrier may not retroactively deny, adjust, or seek
recoupment or refund of an adjudicated claim submitted by a health care
provider for reasons related to coordination of benefits with another
carrier or other entity responsible for payment of the claim after the
expiration of thirty months from the date the original claim was paid
by the primary or secondary payer, regardless who is seeking the
adjustment or recoupment. A carrier may not unreasonably delay initial
payment of a claim to a health care provider because of carrier efforts
to coordinate benefits nor may a carrier require the provider to assume
responsibility for coordination of benefits except to provide the
carrier information. If the carrier retroactively denies, adjusts, or
seeks recoupment or refund of an adjudicated claim based on
coordination of benefits, the carrier must provide the health care
provider with notice specifying the reason for the denial, adjustment,
recoupment, or refund, and provide the name and address of the entity
that has acknowledged responsibility for payment of the adjudicated
claim. The health care provider has an additional six months from the
date the health care provider received the notice specified in this
subsection to submit a claim for reimbursement for the health care
service to the carrier, medical assistance program, government health
benefit program, or any other entity responsible for payment of
services provided. If both the carrier and provider agree, adjudicated
claims may be adjusted after the expiration of eighteen months from the
date the claim was paid.
(4) A health care provider may not retroactively seek adjustment of
a claim payment by a carrier for reasons related to coordination of
benefits with another carrier or other entity responsible for payment
of the claim after the expiration of thirty months from the date the
original claim was paid. If a provider retroactively seeks adjustment
of an adjudicated claim based on coordination of benefits, the health
care provider must provide the carrier with notice specifying the
reason for the adjustment, and provide the name and address of the
entity that has failed to acknowledge responsibility for payment of the
claim. The carrier has an additional six months from the date the
carrier receives the notice specified in this subsection to respond.
If both the carrier and provider agree, adjudicated claims may be
adjusted after the expiration of eighteen months from the date the
claim was paid.
(5) To prevent duplicate recovery for the same health service, a
carrier may seek recoupment, adjustment, or refund of an adjudicated
claim paid to a health care provider after the expiration of one year
from the date the initial claim was paid if: (a) The carrier is
seeking recovery of a claim payment owed by a third party, including
government entities, as a consequence of liability imposed by law, such
as that arising from tort liability; and (b) the carrier is unable to
seek recovery directly from the third party because the third party
either has paid or will pay the provider for the same health service as
the initial claim.
(6) A carrier or health care provider that retroactively denies,
adjusts, or seeks recoupment, adjustment, or refund of an adjudicated
claim must give the other party written notice specifying the reason
for the action taken. Any actions that are based upon medical
necessity determinations, level of service determinations, coding
errors, or billing irregularities must be reconciled by the carrier or
the provider to the specific claims in question.
(7) A health care provider or a carrier has thirty days after
receipt of the notice under subsection (6) of this section in which to
notify the other party that they are disputing or contesting the
action. When a provider or a carrier fails to respond in writing in
thirty days to a written notice of recoupment or adjustment, the
carrier or provider may consider the recoupment or adjustment accepted.
If the health care provider or a carrier disputes or contests the
action, then any disputed or contested claim payment is not subject to
recoupment, refunds, or adjustment by the other party until all the
appeals procedures, hearings, or other remedies available to the health
care provider and the carrier have been finally decided. If the
decision is favorable to the carrier, any disputed payment may be
offset in a future claim payment for that provider.
(8) The requirements of this section may not be waived by contract
or otherwise by the health care provider or carrier. This section
neither permits nor precludes a carrier from recovering from a
subscriber, enrollee, or beneficiary any amounts paid to a health care
provider for benefits to which the subscriber, enrollee, or beneficiary
was not entitled under the terms and conditions of the health plan,
insurance policy, or other benefit agreement.
(9) This section does not apply to carrier or provider payment or
recoupment practices with respect to claims or payments for health care
services provided through dental-only health carriers, health care
services provided under Title XVIII (medicare) of the social security
act, or medicare supplemental plans regulated under chapter 48.66 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2006.

--- END ---