BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that consumers,
financial services providers, and financial institutions need
uniformity and certainty in their financial transactions. It is the
intent of the legislature to reserve the authority to regulate customer
financial transactions involving consumers, financial services
providers, and financial institutions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
A city, town, or governmental entity subject to this title may not
regulate the terms, conditions, or disclosures of any lawful financial
transaction between a consumer and (1) a business or professional under
the jurisdiction of the department of financial institutions, or (2)
any financial institution as defined under RCW 30.22.041.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW
to read as follows:
A code city or governmental entity subject to this title may not
regulate the terms, conditions, or disclosures of any lawful financial
transaction between a consumer and (1) a business or professional under
the jurisdiction of the department of financial institutions, or (2)
any financial institution as defined under RCW 30.22.041.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW
to read as follows:
A county or governmental entity subject to this title may not
regulate the terms, conditions, or disclosures of any lawful financial
transaction between a consumer and (1) a business or professional under
the jurisdiction of the department of financial institutions, or (2)
any financial institution as defined under RCW 30.22.041.

--- END ---