BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 81.68.010 and 1989 c 163 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions set forth in this section shall apply throughout
this chapter, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.
(1) "Corporation" means a corporation, company, association, or
joint stock association.
(2) "Person" means an individual, firm, or a copartnership.
(3) "Auto transportation company" means every corporation or
person, their lessees, trustees, receivers, or trustees appointed by
any court whatsoever, owning, controlling, operating, or managing any
motor propelled vehicle not usually operated on or over rails used in
the business of transporting persons, and baggage, mail, and express on
the vehicles of auto transportation companies carrying passengers, for
compensation over any public highway in this state between fixed
termini or over a regular route, and not operating exclusively within
the incorporated limits of any city or town.
(4) "Promotional fares" means rates, fares, charges, and tickets at
a free or reduced rate from existing or approved rates, fares, or
charges that are reasonably calculated to increase ridership and
revenues or decrease average costs per passenger in the long run, to
meet competitive demands, or to resolve passenger complaints or
compensate passengers for service quality issues.
(5) "Public highway" means every street, road, or highway in this
state.
(((5))) (6) The words "between fixed termini or over a regular
route" mean the termini or route between or over which any auto
transportation company usually or ordinarily operates any motor
propelled vehicle, even though there may be departure from the termini
or route, whether the departures are periodic or irregular. Whether or
not any motor propelled vehicle is operated by any auto transportation
company "between fixed termini or over a regular route" within the
meaning of this section is a question of fact, and the finding of the
commission thereon is final and is not subject to review.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 81.68 RCW
to read as follows:
Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 81.28.080, 81.28.180,
81.28.190, and 81.68.030, an auto transportation company may:
(1) Offer promotional fares. Promotions lasting more than fourteen
consecutive calendar days or offered to the same person or persons more
than twice in a calendar year must cover the incremental cost to the
company of the transportation and promotion.
(2) Increase or decrease aggregate revenues incrementally by up to
ten percent each year for passenger service between points for which
passengers have reasonable alternative means of public transportation
between the points. The incremental revenue increases or decreases
must be excluded from revenues if the commission undertakes a
traditional rate review or rate case under RCW 81.68.030, which rate
case or review must be limited to operations between points for which
passengers do not have reasonable alternative means of public
transportation. For purposes of this section, "reasonable alternative
means of public transportation" means alternatives that have reasonably
comparable costs to the passenger and quality of service and may
include the following or a combination of the following, whether
regulated by the commission or not: Another auto transportation
company, taxi service, public mass transit, airline, charter or
excursion company, but a "reasonable alternative means of public
transportation" does not have to be the same or lesser fare nor offer
the same speed or convenience to the passenger to be considered to be
"reasonably comparable" as used in this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act may be known and cited as the
Airport Ground Transportation Recovery Act.

--- END ---