BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.55.270 and 1997 c 415 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Small scale prospecting and placer mining shall not require
written approval under this chapter if the prospecting and placer
mining is conducted in accordance with provisions established by the
department.
(2) ((By December 31, 1998,)) The department shall adopt rules
applicable to small scale prospecting and placer mining activities
subject to this section. The department shall develop the rules in
cooperation with the ((recreational)) small scale placer mining
community and other interested parties.
(3) Within two months of adoption of the rules, the department
shall distribute an updated gold and fish pamphlet that describes
methods of ((mineral)) prospecting and placer mining that are
consistent with the department's rule. The pamphlet shall be written
to clearly indicate the prospecting and placer mining methods that
require written approval under this chapter and the prospecting and
placer mining methods that require compliance with the pamphlet. To
the extent possible, the department shall use the provisions of the
gold and fish pamphlet to minimize the number of specific provisions of
a written approval issued under this chapter.
(4) For the purposes of this chapter, "small scale prospecting and
placer mining" means only the use of the following methods((: Pans,
nonmotorized sluice boxes, concentrators, and minirocker boxes)) for
the discovery and recovery of minerals:
(a) Pans, either motorized or nonmotorized;
(b) Motorized and nonmotorized sluice boxes, concentrators, and
rocker boxes;
(c) Motorized suction dredges;
(d) Nonmotorized equipment and hand tools used in the collecting of
mineral samples;
(e) Motorized power sluice and combination suction dredges and
power sluice; and
(f) Nonmotorized equipment used for crevice cleaning.

--- END ---