BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 17.26 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the presence of invasive knotweed on
public and private land threatens wildlife habitat, agricultural
production, and environmental quality statewide. The legislature
further finds that invasive knotweed found on private lands is a source
of renewed infestation on public lands. The legislature therefore
finds that it is in the public interest to protect public resources by
making concerted efforts to control or contain invasive knotweed on
both public and private lands statewide.
(2) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose, the state department of agriculture, in consultation
with the state noxious weed control board, shall establish a program
for the control or containment of invasive knotweed statewide.
(a) The department of agriculture may enter into agreements for
this purpose with eligible entities including but not limited to:
State agencies, local governments, special purpose districts, Indian
tribes, and nonprofit corporations.
(b) The department of agriculture may adopt rules to implement this
program.
(c) This program is intended to build upon the 2004 knotweed
control pilot project conducted in southwest Washington.
(3) For purposes of this section, "invasive knotweed" means the
following plants: Polygonum cuspidatum (Japanese knotweed), Polygonum
polystachyum (Himalayan knotweed), Polygonum sachalinense (giant
knotweed), Polygonum x bohemicum (Bohemian knotweed), and hybrids and
crosses of these species.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The sum of five hundred thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2006, from the general fund to the
department of agriculture for the purposes of this act.
(2) The sum of five hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as
may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2007, from the general fund to the department of agriculture for the
purposes of this act.
(3) The department of agriculture may use no more than five percent
of the appropriated funds for agency administrative costs.
(4) It is the intent of the legislature that this appropriation
represents an ongoing commitment to a program to control and contain
invasive knotweed and that appropriations for it will continue in the
future.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Within the dollars available for
administration as specified in section 2(3)of this act, by December 1,
2006, the department of agriculture shall prepare and submit a report
to the legislature documenting progress made and future recommendations
for containing and controlling invasive knotweed under this program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---