BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.163.130 and 2001 c 304 s 2 and 2001 c 32 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The authority may issue its nonrecourse revenue bonds in order
to obtain the funds to carry out the programs authorized in this
chapter. The bonds shall be special obligations of the authority,
payable solely out of the special fund or funds established by the
authority for their repayment.
(2) Any bonds issued under this chapter may be secured by a
financing document between the authority and the purchasers or owners
of such bonds or between the authority and a corporate trustee, which
may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company
within or without the state.
(a) The financing document may pledge or assign, in whole or in
part, the revenues and funds held or to be received by the authority,
any present or future contract or other rights to receive the same, and
the proceeds thereof.
(b) The financing document may contain such provisions for
protecting and enforcing the rights, security, and remedies of
bondowners as may be reasonable and proper, including, without limiting
the generality of the foregoing, provisions defining defaults and
providing for remedies in the event of default which may include the
acceleration of maturities, restrictions on the individual rights of
action by bondowners, and covenants setting forth duties of and
limitations on the authority in conduct of its programs and the
management of its property.
(c) In addition to other security provided in this chapter or
otherwise by law, bonds issued by the authority may be secured, in
whole or in part, by financial guaranties, by insurance or by letters
of credit issued to the authority or a trustee or any other person, by
any bank, trust company, insurance or surety company or other financial
institution, within or without the state. The authority may pledge or
assign, in whole or in part, the revenues and funds held or to be
received by the authority, any present or future contract or other
rights to receive the same, and the proceeds thereof, as security for
such guaranties or insurance or for the reimbursement by the authority
to any issuer of such letter of credit of any payments made under such
letter of credit.
(3) Without limiting the powers of the authority contained in this
chapter, in connection with each issue of its obligation bonds, the
authority shall create and establish one or more special funds,
including, but not limited to debt service and sinking funds, reserve
funds, project funds, and such other special funds as the authority
deems necessary, useful, or convenient.
(4) Any security interest created against the unexpended bond
proceeds and against the special funds created by the authority shall
be immediately valid and binding against the money and any securities
in which the money may be invested without authority or trustee
possession. The security interest shall be prior to any party having
any competing claim against the moneys or securities, without filing or
recording under Article 9A of the Uniform Commercial Code, Title 62A
RCW, and regardless of whether the party has notice of the security
interest.
(5) The bonds may be issued as serial bonds, term bonds or any
other type of bond instrument consistent with the provisions of this
chapter. The bonds shall bear such date or dates; mature at such time
or times; bear interest at such rate or rates, either fixed or
variable; be payable at such time or times; be in such denominations;
be in such form; bear such privileges of transferability,
exchangeability, and interchangeability; be subject to such terms of
redemption; and be sold at public or private sale, in such manner, at
such time or times, and at such price or prices as the authority shall
determine. The bonds shall be executed by the manual or facsimile
signatures of the authority's chair and either its secretary or
executive director, and may be authenticated by the trustee (if the
authority determines to use a trustee) or any registrar which may be
designated for the bonds by the authority.
(6) Bonds may be issued by the authority to refund other
outstanding authority bonds, at or prior to maturity of, and to pay any
redemption premium on, the outstanding bonds. Bonds issued for
refunding purposes may be combined with bonds issued for the financing
or refinancing of new projects. Pending the application of the
proceeds of the refunding bonds to the redemption of the bonds to be
redeemed, the authority may enter into an agreement or agreements with
a corporate trustee regarding the interim investment of the proceeds
and the application of the proceeds and the earnings on the proceeds to
the payment of the principal of and interest on, and the redemption of,
the bonds to be redeemed.
(7) The bonds of the authority may be negotiable instruments under
Title 62A RCW.
(8) Neither the members of the authority, nor its employees or
agents, nor any person executing the bonds shall be personally liable
on the bonds or be subject to any personal liability or accountability
by reason of the issuance of the bonds.
(9) The authority may purchase its bonds with any of its funds
available for the purchase. The authority may hold, pledge, cancel or
resell the bonds subject to and in accordance with agreements with
bondowners.
(10) The authority shall not exceed ((seven hundred fifty million))
one billion dollars in total outstanding debt at any time.
(11) The state finance committee shall be notified in advance of
the issuance of bonds by the authority in order to promote the orderly
offering of obligations in the financial markets.
(((12) The authority may not issue any bonds after June 30, 2006.))

Sec. 2 RCW 43.163.210 and 2001 c 304 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purpose of facilitating economic development in the state
of Washington and encouraging the employment of Washington workers at
meaningful wages:
(1) The authority may develop and conduct a program or programs to
provide nonrecourse revenue bond financing for the project costs for
economic development activities.
(2) The authority may develop and conduct a program that will
stimulate and encourage the development of new products within
Washington state by the infusion of financial aid for invention and
innovation in situations in which the financial aid would not otherwise
be reasonably available from commercial sources. The authority is
authorized to provide nonrecourse revenue bond financing for this
program.
(a) For the purposes of this program, the authority shall have the
following powers and duties:
(i) To enter into financing agreements with eligible persons doing
business in Washington state, upon terms and on conditions consistent
with the purposes of this chapter, for the advancement of financial and
other assistance to the persons for the development of specific
products, procedures, and techniques, to be developed and produced in
this state, and to condition the agreements upon contractual assurances
that the benefits of increasing or maintaining employment and tax
revenues shall remain in this state and accrue to it;
(ii) Own, possess, and take license in patents, copyrights, and
proprietary processes and negotiate and enter into contracts and
establish charges for the use of the patents, copyrights, and
proprietary processes when the patents and licenses for products result
from assistance provided by the authority;
(iii) Negotiate royalty payments to the authority on patents and
licenses for products arising as a result of assistance provided by the
authority;
(iv) Negotiate and enter into other types of contracts with
eligible persons that assure that public benefits will result from the
provision of services by the authority; provided that the contracts are
consistent with the state Constitution;
(v) Encourage and provide technical assistance to eligible persons
in the process of developing new products;
(vi) Refer eligible persons to researchers or laboratories for the
purpose of testing and evaluating new products, processes, or
innovations; and
(vii) To the extent permitted under its contract with eligible
persons, to consent to a termination, modification, forgiveness, or
other change of a term of a contractual right, payment, royalty,
contract, or agreement of any kind to which the authority is a party.
(b) Eligible persons seeking financial and other assistance under
this program shall forward an application, together with an application
fee prescribed by rule, to the authority. An investigation and report
concerning the advisability of approving an application for assistance
shall be completed by the staff of the authority. The investigation
and report may include, but is not limited to, facts about the company
under consideration as its history, wage standards, job opportunities,
stability of employment, past and present financial condition and
structure, pro forma income statements, present and future markets and
prospects, integrity of management as well as the feasibility of the
proposed product and invention to be granted financial aid, including
the state of development of the product as well as the likelihood of
its commercial feasibility. After receipt and consideration of the
report set out in this subsection and after other action as is deemed
appropriate, the application shall be approved or denied by the
authority. The applicant shall be promptly notified of action by the
authority. In making the decision as to approval or denial of an
application, priority shall be given to those persons operating or
planning to operate businesses of special importance to Washington's
economy, including, but not limited to: (i) Existing resource-based
industries of agriculture, forestry, and fisheries; (ii) existing
advanced technology industries of electronics, computer and instrument
manufacturing, computer software, and information and design; and (iii)
emerging industries such as environmental technology, biotechnology,
biomedical sciences, materials sciences, and optics.
(3) The authority may also develop and implement, if authorized by
the legislature, such other economic development financing programs
adopted in future general plans of economic development finance
objectives developed under RCW 43.163.090.
(((4) The authority may not issue any bonds for the programs
authorized under this section after June 30, 2006.))

--- END ---