BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 81.104.015 and 1999 c 202 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "High-capacity transportation system" means a system of public
transportation services within an urbanized region operating
principally on exclusive rights of way, and the supporting services and
facilities necessary to implement such a system, including interim
express services and high occupancy vehicle lanes, which taken as a
whole, provides a substantially higher level of passenger capacity,
speed, and service frequency than traditional public transportation
systems operating principally in general purpose roadways. "High-capacity transportation system" also includes magnetic levitation and
personal rapid transit systems.
(2) "Rail fixed guideway system" means a light, heavy, or rapid
rail system, monorail, inclined plane, funicular, trolley, or other
fixed rail guideway component of a high-capacity transportation system
that is not regulated by the Federal Railroad Administration, or its
successor. "Rail fixed guideway system" does not mean elevators,
moving sidewalks or stairs, and vehicles suspended from aerial cables,
unless they are an integral component of a station served by a rail
fixed guideway system.
(3) "Regional transit system" means a high-capacity transportation
system under the jurisdiction of one or more transit agencies except
where a regional transit authority created under chapter 81.112 RCW
exists, in which case "regional transit system" means the high-capacity
transportation system under the jurisdiction of a regional transit
authority.
(4) "Transit agency" means city-owned transit systems, county
transportation authorities, metropolitan municipal corporations, and
public transportation benefit areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 81.104 RCW
to read as follows:
Counties are authorized to impose with voter approval, by a simple
majority of those voting, dedicated funding sources for magnetic
levitation and personal rapid transit systems as set forth in RCW
81.104.150, 81.104.160, and 81.104.170. The maximum tax rate
authorized in RCW 81.104.150, 81.104.160, and 81.104.170 is the maximum
allowable rate that may be imposed by all entities in a county for
magnetic levitation and personal rapid transit systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 81.104 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Counties implementing magnetic levitation and personal rapid
transit systems are exempt from the population requirements in RCW
81.104.030.
(2) Counties implementing magnetic levitation and personal rapid
transit systems are authorized to utilize public-private partnerships.
(3) The department of transportation shall develop, implement, and
administer a grant program for state and federal funding identified for
magnetic levitation systems and personal rapid transit systems. The
speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint four
representatives, two from each legislative caucus, the president of the
senate shall appoint four senators, two from each legislative caucus,
and the governor shall appoint a business person from private industry
and a person with academic credentials in magnetic levitation and
personal rapid transit systems technology to work with the department
of transportation to develop the criteria for the grant program. To
obtain grants through the grant program, entities shall submit magnetic
levitation and personal rapid transit systems technology design
proposals to the department of transportation and compete for grant
funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect August 1, 2006.

--- END ---