BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.320 and 2004 c 62 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be a beer and/or wine restaurant license to sell beer,
including strong beer, or wine, or both, at retail, for consumption on
the premises. A patron of the licensee may remove from the premises,
recorked or recapped in its original container, any portion of wine
that was purchased for consumption with a meal.
(1) The annual fee shall be two hundred dollars for the beer
license, two hundred dollars for the wine license, or four hundred
dollars for a combination beer and wine license.
(2)(a) The board may issue a caterer's endorsement to this license
to allow the licensee to remove from the liquor stocks at the licensed
premises, only those types of liquor that are authorized under the on-premises license privileges for sale and service at event locations at
a specified date and, except as provided in subsection (3) of this
section, place not currently licensed by the board. If the event is
open to the public, it must be sponsored by a society or organization
as defined by RCW 66.24.375. If attendance at the event is limited to
members or invited guests of the sponsoring individual, society, or
organization, the requirement that the sponsor must be a society or
organization as defined by RCW 66.24.375 is waived. Cost of the
endorsement is three hundred fifty dollars.
(b) The holder of this license with catering endorsement shall, if
requested by the board, notify the board or its designee of the date,
time, place, and location of any catered event. Upon request, the
licensee shall provide to the board all necessary or requested
information concerning the society or organization that will be holding
the function at which the endorsed license will be utilized.
(3) Licensees under this section that hold a caterer's endorsement
are allowed to use this endorsement on a domestic winery premises under
the following conditions:
(a) Agreements between the domestic winery and the retail licensee
shall be in writing, contain no exclusivity clauses regarding the
alcohol beverages to be served, and be filed with the board; and
(b) The domestic winery and the retail licensee shall be separately
contracted and compensated by the persons sponsoring the event for
their respective services.
(4) The holder of this license or its manager may furnish beer or
wine to the licensee's employees free of charge as may be required for
use in connection with instruction on beer and wine. The instruction
may include the history, nature, values, and characteristics of beer or
wine, the use of wine lists, and the methods of presenting, serving,
storing, and handling beer or wine. The beer and/or wine licensee must
use the beer or wine it obtains under its license for the sampling as
part of the instruction. The instruction must be given on the premises
of the beer and/or wine licensee.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.24.400 and 2001 c 199 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be a retailer's license, to be known and designated
as a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license, to sell spirituous
liquor by the individual glass, beer, and wine, at retail, for
consumption on the premises, including mixed drinks and cocktails
compounded or mixed on the premises only: PROVIDED, That a hotel, or
club licensed under chapter 70.62 RCW with overnight sleeping
accommodations, that is licensed under this section may sell liquor by
the bottle to registered guests of the hotel or club for consumption in
guest rooms, hospitality rooms, or at banquets in the hotel or club:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That a patron of a bona fide hotel, restaurant, or
club licensed under this section may remove from the premises recorked
or recapped in its original container any portion of wine which was
purchased for consumption with a meal, and registered guests who have
purchased liquor from the hotel or club by the bottle may remove from
the premises any unused portion of such liquor in its original
container. Such license may be issued only to bona fide restaurants,
hotels and clubs, and to dining, club and buffet cars on passenger
trains, and to dining places on passenger boats and airplanes, and to
dining places at civic centers with facilities for sports,
entertainment, and conventions, and to such other establishments
operated and maintained primarily for the benefit of tourists,
vacationers and travelers as the board shall determine are qualified to
have, and in the discretion of the board should have, a spirits, beer,
and wine restaurant license under the provisions and limitations of
this title.
(2) The board may issue an endorsement to the spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant license that allows the holder of a spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant license to sell for off-premises consumption wine
vinted and bottled in the state of Washington and carrying a label
exclusive to the license holder selling the wine. Spirits and beer may
not be sold for off-premises consumption under this section. The
annual fee for the endorsement under this ((chapter [section]))
subsection is one hundred twenty dollars.
(3) The holder of a spirits, beer, and wine license or its manager
may furnish beer, wine, or spirituous liquor to the licensee's
employees free of charge as may be required for use in connection with
instruction on beer, wine, or spirituous liquor. The instruction may
include the history, nature, values, and characteristics of beer, wine,
or spirituous liquor, the use of wine lists, and the methods of
presenting, serving, storing, and handling beer, wine, and spirituous
liquor. The spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensee must use the
beer, wine, or spirituous liquor it obtains under its license for the
sampling as part of the instruction. The instruction must be given on
the premises of the spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensee.

--- END ---