BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
STRATEGIC DIRECTION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the system of public higher
education in Washington state is at a crossroads. Demographic and
economic pressures place competing demands on policymakers and on
colleges and universities. Increasing numbers of students are
demanding access to work force training and baccalaureate and advanced
degree programs. Businesses are demanding highly qualified workers and
technological advancements gained through university research. At the
same time, taxpayers expect policymakers to set priorities and maximize
use of public resources.
(2) It is the legislature's intent to articulate a strategic
direction for public higher education on issues of access,
affordability, service delivery, and accountability that will guide
coordinated decision making on policies, operating budgets, and capital
plans. It is further the legislature's intent to provide the
management tools and resources necessary to implement the strategic
direction. Additional investment in higher education is needed, but
the public deserves assurance that such an investment is based on a
clear plan and will be carefully managed with specific expectations and
measurable outcomes.
(3) It is the strategic direction and intent of the legislature, by
the year 2012, to:
(a) Increase capacity in higher education by thirty thousand
enrollment slots, with fourteen thousand enrollment slots dedicated to
expanding work force training;
(b) Graduate three thousand eight hundred additional baccalaureate
degrees per year by focusing degree production at the regional
universities in partnership with community and technical colleges;
(c) Expand programs and enrollments targeted toward high demand
fields by twelve thousand five hundred enrollment slots;
(d) Maintain the market responsiveness and multiple missions of the
community and technical college system, including transfer preparation,
adult remedial education, work force training, and life-long learning;
(e) Assure that the cost of attendance for all students is less
than thirty percent of family income;
(f) Through the strategic master plan for higher education, create
specific targets for enrollments and degree production through analysis
of statewide and regional demographics and economic needs and
comparison to peer institutions and national benchmarks;
(g) Implement the strategic direction and master plan through
performance contracts with each institution of higher education;
(h) Through financial aid and other new financing or enrollment
allocation strategies, leverage the state investment in higher
education by using existing capacity at independent four-year
institutions of higher education; and
(i) Increase the state's overall investment in higher education by
four hundred sixty million dollars per biennium, including one hundred
million dollars per biennium invested in high priority research, to
ensure that Washington's institutions of higher education continue to
offer affordable access to the highest quality education and conduct
world class research and discovery.
(4) It is further the legislature's intent to implement the
strategic direction for higher education using the following policies:
(a) Expand enrollment at the regional universities, the state
college, and branch campuses and freeze undergraduate enrollment at the
main campuses of the research universities;
(b) Accelerate transition of the branch campuses into four-year
universities offering baccalaureate and master's degree programs;
(c) Provide a portion of new enrollment funding to community and
technical colleges and authorize the colleges to contract with a
regional university, branch campus, or the state college to offer
baccalaureate degree programs;
(d) Create new opportunities for students with associate degrees in
technical fields to earn applied baccalaureate degrees;
(e) Increase per-student funding for current and future enrollments
to the average of peer institutions;
(f) Reform the state need grant program to address the goal that
cost of attendance is less than thirty percent of family income;
(g) Authorize institution governing boards to set tuition rates so
that, by the year 2012 and thereafter, tuition and mandatory fees equal
the average tuition and fees of peer institutions; and
(h) Direct the higher education coordinating board to establish
performance contracts with each four-year institution and direct the
state board for community and technical colleges to establish a master
performance contract for the community and technical college system.

Sec. 102 RCW 28B.10.784 and 1993 sp.s. c 15 s 6 are each amended
to read as follows:
The office of financial management, as part of its responsibility
to develop and maintain student enrollment forecasts for colleges and
universities under RCW 43.62.050, shall calculate enrollment levels
necessary to maintain, by educational sector, the participation rate
funded in fiscal year 1993. The participation rate shall be based on
the state's estimated population ages seventeen and older by
appropriate age groups. The participation rate ((used to calculate
enrollment levels under RCW 28B.10.776 and 28B.10.782)) shall be based
on fall enrollment reported in the higher education enrollment report
as maintained by the office of financial management, fall enrollment as
reported in the management information system of the state board for
community and technical colleges, and the corresponding fall population
forecast by the office of financial management. ((Formal estimates of
the state participation rates and enrollment levels necessary to
fulfill the requirements of RCW 28B.10.776 and 28B.10.782 shall be
determined by the office of financial management as part of its
responsibility to develop and maintain student enrollment forecasts for
colleges and universities under RCW 43.62.050.)) Formal estimates of
the state participation rates and enrollment levels required by this
section shall be based on procedures and standards established by a
technical work group consisting of staff from the higher education
coordinating board, the public four-year institutions of higher
education, the state board for community and technical colleges, the
fiscal and higher education committees of the house of representatives
and the senate, and the office of financial management. Formal
estimates of the state participation rates and enrollment levels
required by this section shall be submitted to the fiscal committees of
the house of representatives and senate on or before November 15th of
each even-numbered year. ((The higher education coordinating board
shall periodically review the enrollment goals set forth in RCW
28B.10.776 and 28B.10.782 and submit recommendations concerning
modification of these goals to the governor and to the higher education
committees of the house of representatives and the senate.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 28B.10.776 (Budget calculation -- Enrollment levels--Participation rate) and 1993 sp.s. c 15 s 2;
(2) RCW 28B.10.778 (Budget calculation -- New enrollments -- Funding
level -- Inflation factor) and 1993 sp.s. c 15 s 3;
(3) RCW 28B.10.780 (Budget calculation -- Funding level) and 1993
sp.s. c 15 s 4;
(4) RCW 28B.10.782 (Budget calculation -- Increased enrollment target
level -- Availability of information) and 1993 sp.s. c 15 s 5; and
(5) RCW 28B.10.786 (Budget calculation -- Student financial aid
programs) and 1993 sp.s. c 15 s 7.

PART II
TUITION AND FINANCIAL AID
Sec. 201 RCW 28B.15.067 and 2003 c 232 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Tuition fees shall be established under the provisions of this
chapter.
(2) ((Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year and ending with the
2008-09 academic year, reductions or increases in full-time tuition
fees for resident undergraduates shall be as provided in the omnibus
appropriations act.)) Beginning with the 2005-06 academic year, the
policy of the legislature is that by the 2011-12 academic year and
thereafter, tuition and mandatory fees for full-time resident
undergraduates at Washington public institutions of higher education
shall be equal to the average tuition and mandatory fees for full-time
resident undergraduates at peer institutions. Beginning with the 2005-06 academic year, governing boards of the state universities, the
regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the state board
for community and technical colleges may increase full-time tuition
fees for resident undergraduates to achieve the policy in this
subsection, except that annual increases beginning with the 2005-06
academic year and through the 2011-12 academic year may not exceed
twelve percent at the four-year institutions and seven percent at the
community colleges. Percentage increases in full-time tuition fees may
exceed the fiscal growth factor. Reductions or increases may be made
for all or portions of an institution's programs, campuses, courses, or
students. The average tuition and mandatory fees at peer institutions
shall be determined by the higher education coordinating board.
(3) Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year ((and ending with the
2008-09 academic year)), the governing boards of the state
universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College,
and the state board for community and technical colleges may reduce or
increase full-time tuition fees for all students other than resident
undergraduates, including summer school students and students in other
self-supporting degree programs. Percentage increases in full-time
tuition fees may exceed the fiscal growth factor. Reductions or
increases may be made for all or portions of an institution's programs,
campuses, courses, or students.
(4) ((Academic year tuition for full-time students at the state's
institutions of higher education beginning with 2009-10, other than
summer term, shall be as charged during the 2008-09 academic year
unless different rates are adopted by the legislature.
(5))) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not
apply to high school students enrolling in participating institutions
of higher education under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.400.
(((6) For the academic years)) (5) Beginning with academic year
2003-04 ((through 2008-09)), the University of Washington shall use an
amount equivalent to ten percent of all revenues received as a result
of law school tuition increases beginning in academic year 2000-01
((through academic year 2008-09)) to assist needy low and middle income
resident law students.
(((7) For the academic years)) (6) Beginning with academic year
2003-04 ((through 2008-09)), institutions of higher education shall use
an amount equivalent to ten percent of all revenues received as a
result of graduate academic school tuition increases beginning in
academic year 2003-04 ((through academic year 2008-09)) to assist needy
low and middle-income resident graduate academic students.

Sec. 202 RCW 28B.92.010 and 2004 c 275 s 34 are each amended to
read as follows:
The purposes of this chapter are to establish the principles upon
which the state financial aid programs will be based and to establish
the state of Washington state need grant program, ((thus assisting
financially needy or disadvantaged)) with the goal of ensuring that
students domiciled in Washington ((to obtain the)) have an equitable
opportunity of attending an accredited institution of higher education.
State need grants under this chapter are available only to students who
are resident students as defined in RCW 28B.15.012(2) (a) through (d).

Sec. 203 RCW 28B.92.020 and 2003 c 19 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((The legislature finds that the higher education coordinating
board, in consultation with the higher education community, has
completed a review of the state need grant program.)) It is the intent
of the legislature ((to endorse the board's proposed changes to)) that
the board operate the state need grant program((, including)) according
to the following principles:
(a) ((Reaffirmation that)) The primary purpose of the state need
grant program is to ((assist low-income, needy, and disadvantaged))
ensure Washington residents have an equitable opportunity of attending
institutions of higher education;
(b) A goal that ((the base state need grant amount over time be
increased to be equivalent to the rate of tuition charged to resident
undergraduate students attending Washington state public colleges and
universities)) the state need grant be used in combination with other
state and federal grants, institutional aid, private scholarships and
sources of assistance, and employment so that the cost of attendance
for a student attending a public institution of higher education in
Washington does not exceed thirty percent of family income. Base state
need grant amounts for students attending independent institutions of
higher education may not exceed tuition at the University of
Washington;
(c) State need grant recipients be required to contribute a portion
of the total cost of their education through self-help;
(d) State need grant recipients be required to document their need
for dependent care assistance after taking into account other public
funds provided for like purposes; and
(e) Institutional aid administrators be allowed to determine
whether a student eligible for a state need grant in a given academic
year may remain eligible for the ensuing year if the student's family
income increases by no more than a marginal amount except for funds
provided through the educational assistance grant program for students
with dependents.
(2) The legislature further finds that the higher education
coordinating board, under its authority to implement the ((proposed
changes)) principles in subsection (1) of this section, should do so in
a timely manner. The board shall report to the higher education and
fiscal committees of the legislature by December 15, 2006, on the
changes made to implement the principles.
(3) The legislature also finds that:
(a) In most circumstances, need grant eligibility should not extend
beyond five years or one hundred twenty-five percent of the published
length of the program in which the student is enrolled or the credit or
clock-hour equivalent; and
(b) State financial aid programs should continue to adhere to the
principle that funding follows resident students to their choice of
institution of higher education.

PART III
SERVICE DELIVERY
Sec. 301 RCW 28B.45.014 and 2004 c 57 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The primary mission of the higher education branch campuses
created under this chapter remains to expand access to baccalaureate
and master's level graduate education in underserved urban areas of the
state ((in collaboration with community and technical colleges)).
(2) Branch campuses shall collaborate with the community and
technical colleges in their region to develop articulation agreements,
dual admissions policies, and other partnerships to ensure that branch
campuses serve as innovative models of a two plus two educational
system. Other possibilities for collaboration include but are not
limited to joint development of curricula and degree programs,
colocation of instruction, and arrangements to share faculty.
(3) In communities where a private postsecondary institution is
located, representatives of the private institution may be invited to
participate in the conversation about meeting the baccalaureate and
master's level graduate needs in underserved urban areas of the state.
(4) ((However, the legislature recognizes there are alternative
models for achieving this primary mission. Some campuses may have
additional missions in response to regional needs and demands. At
selected branch campuses, an innovative combination of instruction and
research targeted to support regional economic development may be
appropriate to meet the region's needs for both access and economic
viability. Other campuses should focus on becoming models of a two
plus two educational system through continuous improvement of
partnerships and agreements with community and technical colleges.
Still other campuses may be best suited to transition to a four-year
comprehensive university or be removed from designation as a branch
campus entirely.
(5))) It is the legislature's intent that each branch campus be
funded commensurate with its unique mission, the degree programs
offered, and the institutional combination of instruction and research,
but at a level less than a research university.
(((6))) (5) In consultation with the higher education coordinating
board, a branch campus may propose legislation to authorize practice-oriented or professional doctoral programs if: (a) Unique research
facilities and equipment are located near the campus; or (b) the campus
can clearly demonstrate student and employer demand in the region that
is linked to regional economic development.
(((7) It is not the legislature's intent to have each campus chart
its own future path without legislative guidance. Instead, the
legislature intends to consider carefully the mission and model of
education that best suits each campus and best meets the needs of
students, the community, and the region.))
(6) Beginning with the 2006-07 academic year, branch campuses may
offer lower division courses and undertake other strategies necessary
to transition to full-scale four-year institutions that are responsive
to student and employer demand for baccalaureate and master's degrees
within their respective regions.
(7) When the enrollment of a branch campus approaches seven
thousand five hundred full-time equivalent students or at the written
request of a campus community advisory board, the governing board of
the research university responsible for the campus shall conduct a
governance study to consider alternative governance options for the
campus, including transition to a separately governed regional
university. Results of any such study shall be forwarded to the higher
education committees of the senate and the house of representatives.

Sec. 302 RCW 28B.45.020 and 1994 c 217 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The University of Washington is responsible for ensuring the
expansion of ((upper-division)) baccalaureate and graduate educational
programs in the central Puget Sound area under rules or guidelines
adopted by the higher education coordinating board. The University of
Washington shall meet that responsibility through the operation of at
least two branch campuses. One branch campus shall be located in the
Tacoma area. Another branch campus shall be collocated with Cascadia
Community College in the Bothell-Woodinville area.

Sec. 303 RCW 28B.45.030 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 7 s 4 are each
amended to read as follows:
Washington State University is responsible for providing ((upper-division)) baccalaureate and graduate level higher education programs
to the citizens of the Tri-Cities area, under rules or guidelines
adopted by the higher education coordinating board. Washington State
University shall meet that responsibility through the operation of a
branch campus in the Tri-Cities area. The branch campus shall replace
and supersede the Tri-Cities university center. All land, facilities,
equipment, and personnel of the Tri-Cities university center shall be
transferred from the University of Washington to Washington State
University.

Sec. 304 RCW 28B.45.040 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 7 s 5 are each
amended to read as follows:
Washington State University is responsible for providing ((upper-division)) baccalaureate and graduate level higher education programs
to the citizens of the southwest Washington area, under rules or
guidelines adopted by the higher education coordinating board.
Washington State University shall meet that responsibility through the
operation of a branch campus in the southwest Washington area.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 28B.45.060 (Central Washington University -- Yakima area) and
1989 1st ex.s. c 7 s 7; and
(2) RCW 28B.45.080 (Partnership between community and technical
colleges and branch campuses) and 2004 c 57 s 5 & 1989 1st ex.s. c 7 s
8.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50
RCW to read as follows:
(1) It is the legislature's intent to expand baccalaureate capacity
in underserved regions of the state to meet student and employer
demand. One strategy to accomplish this intent is to allocate state
funds for student enrollment to community and technical colleges and
authorize the colleges to contract with a regional university or state
college as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 or branch campus under chapter
28B.45 RCW, to offer baccalaureate degree programs. Another strategy
is to authorize, under certain circumstances, community or technical
college baccalaureate degrees.
(2) Subject to legislative appropriation for the purpose described
in this section:
(a) A community or technical college may enter into a contract with
one or more regional universities, branch campuses, or the state
college to offer baccalaureate degree programs on the college campus;
(b) The college board may enter into a master contract with
regional universities, branch campuses, or the state college to offer
baccalaureate degree programs on multiple college campuses; or
(c) Subject to approval by the college board under RCW 28B.50.090,
a community or technical college may develop and offer an applied
baccalaureate degree program, but only if the degree program is not
offered by a public four-year institution of higher education.
(3) Allocation of funds by the college board shall be based on
analysis of gaps in service delivery, capacity, and student and
employer demand for programs. Students enrolled in programs under
subsection (2)(a) and (b) of this section are considered students of
the regional university, branch campus, or state college for all
purposes including tuition and reporting of state-funded enrollments.

Sec. 307 RCW 28B.50.030 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 33 are each
amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise, the
term:
(1) "System" shall mean the state system of community and technical
colleges, which shall be a system of higher education.
(2) "Board" shall mean the work force training and education
coordinating board.
(3) "College board" shall mean the state board for community and
technical colleges created by this chapter.
(4) "Director" shall mean the administrative director for the state
system of community and technical colleges.
(5) "District" shall mean any one of the community and technical
college districts created by this chapter.
(6) "Board of trustees" shall mean the local community and
technical college board of trustees established for each college
district within the state.
(7) "Occupational education" shall mean that education or training
that will prepare a student for employment that does not require a
baccalaureate degree, as well as education or training leading to an
applied baccalaureate degree.
(8) "K-12 system" shall mean the public school program including
kindergarten through the twelfth grade.
(9) "Common school board" shall mean a public school district board
of directors.
(10) "Community college" shall include those higher education
institutions that conduct education programs under RCW 28B.50.020.
(11) "Technical college" shall include those higher education
institutions with the sole mission of conducting occupational
education, basic skills, literacy programs, and offering on short
notice, when appropriate, programs that meet specific industry needs.
The programs of technical colleges shall include, but not be limited
to, continuous enrollment, competency-based instruction, industry-experienced faculty, curriculum integrating vocational and basic skills
education, and curriculum approved by representatives of employers and
labor. For purposes of this chapter, technical colleges shall include
Lake Washington Vocational-Technical Institute, Renton Vocational-Technical Institute, Bates Vocational-Technical Institute, Clover Park
Vocational Institute, and Bellingham Vocational-Technical Institute.
(12) "Adult education" shall mean all education or instruction,
including academic, vocational education or training, basic skills and
literacy training, and "occupational education" provided by public
educational institutions, including common school districts for persons
who are eighteen years of age and over or who hold a high school
diploma or certificate. However, "adult education" shall not include
academic education or instruction for persons under twenty-one years of
age who do not hold a high school degree or diploma and who are
attending a public high school for the sole purpose of obtaining a high
school diploma or certificate, nor shall "adult education" include
education or instruction provided by any four year public institution
of higher education.
(13) "Dislocated forest product worker" shall mean a forest
products worker who: (a)(i) Has been terminated or received notice of
termination from employment and is unlikely to return to employment in
the individual's principal occupation or previous industry because of
a diminishing demand for his or her skills in that occupation or
industry; or (ii) is self-employed and has been displaced from his or
her business because of the diminishing demand for the business'
services or goods; and (b) at the time of last separation from
employment, resided in or was employed in a rural natural resources
impact area.
(14) "Forest products worker" shall mean a worker in the forest
products industries affected by the reduction of forest fiber
enhancement, transportation, or production. The workers included
within this definition shall be determined by the employment security
department, but shall include workers employed in the industries
assigned the major group standard industrial classification codes "24"
and "26" and the industries involved in the harvesting and management
of logs, transportation of logs and wood products, processing of wood
products, and the manufacturing and distribution of wood processing and
logging equipment. The commissioner may adopt rules further
interpreting these definitions. For the purposes of this subsection,
"standard industrial classification code" means the code identified in
RCW 50.29.025(3).
(15) "Dislocated salmon fishing worker" means a finfish products
worker who: (a)(i) Has been terminated or received notice of
termination from employment and is unlikely to return to employment in
the individual's principal occupation or previous industry because of
a diminishing demand for his or her skills in that occupation or
industry; or (ii) is self-employed and has been displaced from his or
her business because of the diminishing demand for the business's
services or goods; and (b) at the time of last separation from
employment, resided in or was employed in a rural natural resources
impact area.
(16) "Salmon fishing worker" means a worker in the finfish industry
affected by 1994 or future salmon disasters. The workers included
within this definition shall be determined by the employment security
department, but shall include workers employed in the industries
involved in the commercial and recreational harvesting of finfish
including buying and processing finfish. The commissioner may adopt
rules further interpreting these definitions.
(17) "Rural natural resources impact area" means:
(a) A nonmetropolitan county, as defined by the 1990 decennial
census, that meets three of the five criteria set forth in subsection
(18) of this section;
(b) A nonmetropolitan county with a population of less than forty
thousand in the 1990 decennial census, that meets two of the five
criteria as set forth in subsection (18) of this section; or
(c) A nonurbanized area, as defined by the 1990 decennial census,
that is located in a metropolitan county that meets three of the five
criteria set forth in subsection (18) of this section.
(18) For the purposes of designating rural natural resources impact
areas, the following criteria shall be considered:
(a) A lumber and wood products employment location quotient at or
above the state average;
(b) A commercial salmon fishing employment location quotient at or
above the state average;
(c) Projected or actual direct lumber and wood products job losses
of one hundred positions or more;
(d) Projected or actual direct commercial salmon fishing job losses
of one hundred positions or more; and
(e) An unemployment rate twenty percent or more above the state
average. The counties that meet these criteria shall be determined by
the employment security department for the most recent year for which
data is available. For the purposes of administration of programs
under this chapter, the United States post office five-digit zip code
delivery areas will be used to determine residence status for
eligibility purposes. For the purpose of this definition, a zip code
delivery area of which any part is ten miles or more from an urbanized
area is considered nonurbanized. A zip code totally surrounded by zip
codes qualifying as nonurbanized under this definition is also
considered nonurbanized. The office of financial management shall make
available a zip code listing of the areas to all agencies and
organizations providing services under this chapter.
(19) "Applied baccalaureate degree" means a baccalaureate degree
awarded by a college under section 306 of this act for successful
completion of a program of study that is:
(a) Specifically designed for individuals who hold an associate of
applied science degree, or its equivalent, in order to maximize
application of their technical course credits toward the baccalaureate
degree; and
(b) Based on a curriculum that incorporates both theoretical and
applied knowledge and skills in a specific technical field.

Sec. 308 RCW 28B.50.140 and 2004 c 275 s 58 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each board of trustees:
(1) Shall operate all existing community and technical colleges in
its district;
(2) Shall create comprehensive programs of community and technical
college education and training and maintain an open-door policy in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 28B.50.090(3). However,
technical colleges, and college districts containing only technical
colleges, shall maintain programs solely for occupational education,
basic skills, and literacy purposes. For as long as a need exists,
technical colleges may continue those programs, activities, and
services they offered during the twelve-month period preceding
September 1, 1991;
(3) Shall employ for a period to be fixed by the board a college
president for each community and technical college and, may appoint a
president for the district, and fix their duties and compensation,
which may include elements other than salary. Compensation under this
subsection shall not affect but may supplement retirement, health care,
and other benefits that are otherwise applicable to the presidents as
state employees. The board shall also employ for a period to be fixed
by the board members of the faculty and such other administrative
officers and other employees as may be necessary or appropriate and fix
their salaries and duties. Compensation and salary increases under
this subsection shall not exceed the amount or percentage established
for those purposes in the state appropriations act by the legislature
as allocated to the board of trustees by the state board for community
and technical colleges. The state board for community and technical
colleges shall adopt rules defining the permissible elements of
compensation under this subsection;
(4) May establish, under the approval and direction of the college
board, new facilities as community needs and interests demand.
However, the authority of boards of trustees to purchase or lease major
off-campus facilities shall be subject to the approval of the higher
education coordinating board pursuant to RCW 28B.76.230;
(5) May establish or lease, operate, equip and maintain
dormitories, food service facilities, bookstores and other self-supporting facilities connected with the operation of the community and
technical college;
(6) May, with the approval of the college board, borrow money and
issue and sell revenue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness for the
construction, reconstruction, erection, equipping with permanent
fixtures, demolition and major alteration of buildings or other capital
assets, and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements,
improvements or appurtenances, for dormitories, food service
facilities, and other self-supporting facilities connected with the
operation of the community and technical college in accordance with the
provisions of RCW 28B.10.300 through 28B.10.330 where applicable;
(7) May establish fees and charges for the facilities authorized
hereunder, including reasonable rules ((and regulations)) for the
government thereof, not inconsistent with the rules ((and regulations))
of the college board; each board of trustees operating a community and
technical college may enter into agreements, subject to rules ((and
regulations)) of the college board, with owners of facilities to be
used for housing regarding the management, operation, and government of
such facilities, and any board entering into such an agreement may:
(a) Make rules ((and regulations)) for the government, management
and operation of such housing facilities deemed necessary or advisable;
and
(b) Employ necessary employees to govern, manage and operate the
same;
(8) May receive such gifts, grants, conveyances, devises and
bequests of real or personal property from private sources, as may be
made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, whenever the terms and
conditions thereof will aid in carrying out the community and technical
college programs as specified by law and the ((regulations)) rules of
the state college board; sell, lease or exchange, invest or expend the
same or the proceeds, rents, profits and income thereof according to
the terms and conditions thereof; and adopt ((regulations)) rules to
govern the receipt and expenditure of the proceeds, rents, profits and
income thereof;
(9) May establish and maintain night schools whenever in the
discretion of the board of trustees it is deemed advisable, and
authorize classrooms and other facilities to be used for summer or
night schools, or for public meetings and for any other uses consistent
with the use of such classrooms or facilities for community and
technical college purposes;
(10) May make rules ((and regulations)) for pedestrian and
vehicular traffic on property owned, operated, or maintained by the
district;
(11) Shall prescribe, with the assistance of the faculty, the
course of study in the various departments of the community and
technical college or colleges under its control, and publish such
catalogues and bulletins as may become necessary;
(12) May grant to every student, upon graduation or completion of
a course of study, a suitable diploma, ((nonbaccalaureate)) degree, or
certificate. Technical colleges shall offer only ((nonbaccalaureate))
technical or applied baccalaureate degrees under the rules of the state
board for community and technical colleges that are appropriate to
their work force education and training mission. The primary purpose
of ((this)) these degrees is to lead the individual directly to
employment in a specific occupation. Technical colleges may not offer
transfer degrees. The board, upon recommendation of the faculty, may
also confer honorary associate of arts degrees upon persons other than
graduates of the community college, in recognition of their learning or
devotion to education, literature, art, or science. No degree may be
conferred in consideration of the payment of money or the donation of
any kind of property;
(13) Shall enforce the rules ((and regulations)) prescribed by the
state board for community and technical colleges for the government of
community and technical colleges, students and teachers, and promulgate
such rules ((and regulations)) and perform all other acts not
inconsistent with law or rules ((and regulations)) of the state board
for community and technical colleges as the board of trustees may in
its discretion deem necessary or appropriate to the administration of
college districts: PROVIDED, That such rules ((and regulations)) shall
include, but not be limited to, rules ((and regulations)) relating to
housing, scholarships, conduct at the various community and technical
college facilities, and discipline: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the board
of trustees may suspend or expel from community and technical colleges
students who refuse to obey any of the duly promulgated rules ((and
regulations));
(14) May, by written order filed in its office, delegate to the
president or district president any of the powers and duties vested in
or imposed upon it by this chapter. Such delegated powers and duties
may be exercised in the name of the district board;
(15) May perform such other activities consistent with this chapter
and not in conflict with the directives of the college board;
(16) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, may offer
educational services on a contractual basis other than the tuition and
fee basis set forth in chapter 28B.15 RCW for a special fee to private
or governmental entities, consistent with rules ((and regulations))
adopted by the state board for community and technical colleges:
PROVIDED, That the whole of such special fee shall go to the college
district and be not less than the full instructional costs of such
services including any salary increases authorized by the legislature
for community and technical college employees during the term of the
agreement: PROVIDED FURTHER, That enrollments generated hereunder
shall not be counted toward the official enrollment level of the
college district for state funding purposes;
(17) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, may offer
educational services on a contractual basis, charging tuition and fees
as set forth in chapter 28B.15 RCW, counting such enrollments for state
funding purposes, and may additionally charge a special supplemental
fee when necessary to cover the full instructional costs of such
services: PROVIDED, That such contracts shall be subject to review by
the state board for community and technical colleges and to such rules
as the state board may adopt for that purpose in order to assure that
the sum of the supplemental fee and the normal state funding shall not
exceed the projected total cost of offering the educational service:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That enrollments generated by courses offered on the
basis of contracts requiring payment of a share of the normal costs of
the course will be discounted to the percentage provided by the
college;
(18) Shall be authorized to pay dues to any association of trustees
that may be formed by the various boards of trustees; such association
may expend any or all of such funds to submit biennially, or more often
if necessary, to the governor and to the legislature, the
recommendations of the association regarding changes which would affect
the efficiency of such association;
(19) May participate in higher education centers and consortia that
involve any four-year public or independent college or university:
PROVIDED, That new degree programs or off-campus programs offered by a
four-year public or independent college or university in collaboration
with a community or technical college are subject to approval by the
higher education coordinating board under RCW 28B.76.230; and
(20) Shall perform any other duties and responsibilities imposed by
law or rule ((and regulation)) of the state board.

Sec. 309 RCW 28B.15.069 and 2003 c 232 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The building fee for each academic year shall be a percentage
of total tuition fees. This percentage shall be calculated by the
higher education coordinating board and be based on the actual
percentage the building fee is of total tuition for each tuition
category in the 1994-95 academic year, rounded up to the nearest half
percent.
(2) The governing boards of each institution of higher education,
except for the technical colleges, shall charge to and collect from
each student a services and activities fee. A governing board may
increase the existing fee annually, consistent with budgeting
procedures set forth in RCW 28B.15.045, by a percentage not to exceed
the annual percentage increase in student tuition fees for resident
undergraduate students: PROVIDED, That such percentage increase shall
not apply to that portion of the services and activities fee previously
committed to the repayment of bonded debt. These rate adjustments may
exceed the fiscal growth factor. For the 2003-04 academic year, the
services and activities fee shall be based upon the resident
undergraduate services and activities fee in 2002-03. The services and
activities fee committee provided for in RCW 28B.15.045 may initiate a
request to the governing board for a fee increase.
(3) Tuition and services and activities fees consistent with
subsection (2) of this section shall be set by the state board for
community and technical colleges for community college summer school
students unless the community college charges fees in accordance with
RCW 28B.15.515.
(4) Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, each governing
board of a community college may charge such fees for ungraded courses,
noncredit courses, community services courses, and self-supporting
courses as it, in its discretion, may determine, consistent with the
rules of the state board for community and technical colleges.
(5) The governing board of a community or technical college
offering an applied baccalaureate degree program under section 306 of
this act may charge tuition fees for those courses above the associate
degree level at rates consistent with rules adopted by the state board
for community and technical colleges, not to exceed tuition fee rates
at the regional universities.

PART IV
ACCOUNTABILITY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 (1) The legislature finds that, since
1997, public institutions of higher education have developed and
maintained a system of performance measures to monitor progress in
improving graduation efficiency, faculty productivity, student
achievement of degrees and certifications, and other topics. However,
the current performance measurement system is too limited in scope and
scale. Only a few measures reflect the unique role and mission of an
institution. There is little dialogue between state policymakers and
institution leaders regarding the challenges facing our colleges and
universities and the outcomes expected by the public and the state.
(2) The legislature further finds that procedures for operating
budgets, enrollment management, and strategic planning for higher
education are not adequately coordinated. The state and institutions
must jointly discuss and establish clear priorities and acknowledge
potential trade-offs of funding decisions.
(3) Therefore, the legislature intends to explore a new
relationship between the state and public institutions of higher
education that includes dialogue and negotiation over goals,
priorities, performance, and resources, and also includes explicit
commitments made by each party aimed at achieving agreed-upon outcomes.
The mechanism to implement this relationship is a performance contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 As used in this chapter, a performance
contract:
(1) Is an agreement reached between the state and the governing
board of an institution of higher education, or in the case of
community or technical colleges the state board for community and
technical colleges, as provided in section 404 of this act and approved
by the legislature as provided in section 407 of this act;
(2) Addresses statewide goals and priorities of the legislature;
(3) Specifies enrollment and resource levels;
(4) Contains goals and commitments from both the institution and
the state;
(5) Includes quantifiable performance measures and benchmarks; and
(6) Reflects the unique role and mission of the institution within
the state's higher education system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 (1) The higher education coordinating
board, in consultation with the governor's office and the office of
financial management, shall enter into negotiations with the governing
boards of the state universities, the regional universities, and the
state college, as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, to create a performance
contract with each institution.
(2) The governor's office with assistance from the higher education
coordinating board and the office of financial management shall enter
into negotiations with the state board for community and technical
colleges to create a master performance contract with the system of
community and technical colleges created under chapter 28B.50 RCW.
(3) In developing a contract, the negotiating team from an
institution of higher education must involve student and faculty
representatives.
(4) The term of a performance contract negotiated under this
section is six years, however either party may request that a contract
be renegotiated and updated on a biennial basis if necessary to reflect
changed circumstances. All performance contracts must include a
process for renegotiation or update.
(5) The institutions of higher education and state board for
community and technical colleges shall report all data necessary to
implement, evaluate, and monitor each performance contract to the
office of financial management, the legislature, and the higher
education coordinating board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 (1) Performance contracts shall contain:
(a) Indicators that measure outcomes concerning cost, quality,
timeliness of student progress toward degrees and certifications, and
articulation between and within the K-12 and higher education systems;
(b) Each institution's share of enrollments and degrees needed to
meet the state's goals and strategic direction;
(c) Indicators that measure the efficiency and effectiveness of
institutional processes; and
(d) Strategies, actions, and results committed to by the
institution in order to achieve statewide goals.
(2) Performance contracts shall also identify the level of
resources necessary to meet the performance objectives, subject to
approval by the legislature under section 407 of this act.
(3) The governor and institutional negotiating teams shall identify
indicators and levels of performance that are clearly linked to the
role, mission, and strategic plan of the institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 405 (1) Performance contracts shall include
grants to the institution, under the terms of the contract, of
flexibility or waivers from state controls or rules.
(2) The negotiating teams shall identify areas where statutory
change is necessary to grant an institution flexibility or waivers of
state agency rules and submit any legislation necessary to implement a
performance contract to the higher education committees of the senate
and house of representatives.
(3) The following areas may not be included in a performance
contract:
(a) Flexibility or waivers of requirements in a collective
bargaining agreement negotiated under chapter 28B.52, 41.56, 41.59,
41.76, or 41.80 RCW;
(b) Flexibility or waivers of administrative rules or processes
governed by chapter 28B.52, 41.56, 41.59, 41.76, or 41.80 RCW;
(c) Rules, processes, duties, rights, and responsibilities of the
academic faculty as contained in the faculty codes of the four-year
institution;
(d) Flexibility or waivers of requirements under chapter 39.12 RCW;
(e) Flexibility or waivers of administrative rules or other
regulations that address health and safety, civil rights, and
nondiscrimination laws that apply to institutions of higher education;
and
(f) State laws covering terms and conditions of employment,
including but not limited to salaries, job security, and health,
retirement, unemployment, or any other employment benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 406 (1) The higher education coordinating
board and the governor's office shall submit completed performance
contracts to the legislature by January 15, 2006, and every six years
thereafter. Following public hearings, the legislature shall have the
opportunity, by concurrent resolution, to approve or reject each
performance contract as a whole.
(2) If the legislature rejects or fails to act on a submission, the
performance contract shall be returned to the parties for
renegotiation.
(3) All cost items contained within a performance contract are
subject to legislative appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 407 (1) Beginning December 2006, the higher
education coordinating board and the state board for community and
technical colleges shall provide annual progress reports to the higher
education committees of the senate and house of representatives on
implementation of the performance contracts and any short-term
outcomes. The overall purpose of the progress reports is to focus
attention on key measures of institutional performance and gain an
improved understanding of the causes of success or lack of success in
making progress in achieving the goals in the contract.
(2) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall conduct
an evaluation and make recommendations regarding changes to the
substance or process of performance contracting. The evaluation shall
be submitted to the governor and higher education committees of the
senate and house of representatives by January 15, 2012.

Sec. 408 RCW 28B.50.090 and 2004 c 275 s 57 are each amended to
read as follows:
The college board shall have general supervision and control over
the state system of community and technical colleges. In addition to
the other powers and duties imposed upon the college board by this
chapter, the college board shall be charged with the following powers,
duties and responsibilities:
(1) Review the budgets prepared by the boards of trustees, prepare
a single budget for the support of the state system of community and
technical colleges and adult education, and submit this budget to the
governor as provided in RCW 43.88.090;
(2) Establish guidelines for the disbursement of funds; and receive
and disburse such funds for adult education and maintenance and
operation and capital support of the college districts in conformance
with the state and district budgets, and in conformance with chapter
43.88 RCW;
(3) Ensure, through the full use of its authority:
(a) That each college district shall offer thoroughly comprehensive
educational, training and service programs to meet the needs of both
the communities and students served by combining high standards of
excellence in academic transfer courses; realistic and practical
courses in occupational education, both graded and ungraded; and
community services of an educational, cultural, and recreational
nature; and adult education, including basic skills and general,
family, and work force literacy programs and services. However,
technical colleges, and college districts containing only technical
colleges, shall maintain programs solely for occupational education,
basic skills, and literacy purposes. For as long as a need exists,
technical colleges may continue those programs, activities, and
services they offered during the twelve-month period preceding May 17,
1991;
(b) That each college district shall maintain an open-door policy,
to the end that no student will be denied admission because of the
location of the student's residence or because of the student's
educational background or ability; that, insofar as is practical in the
judgment of the college board, curriculum offerings will be provided to
meet the educational and training needs of the community generally and
the students thereof; and that all students, regardless of their
differing courses of study, will be considered, known and recognized
equally as members of the student body: PROVIDED, That the
administrative officers of a community or technical college may deny
admission to a prospective student or attendance to an enrolled student
if, in their judgment, the student would not be competent to profit
from the curriculum offerings of the college, or would, by his or her
presence or conduct, create a disruptive atmosphere within the college
not consistent with the purposes of the institution. This subsection
(3)(b) shall not apply to competency, conduct, or presence associated
with a disability in a person twenty-one years of age or younger
attending a technical college;
(4) Prepare a comprehensive master plan for the development of
community and technical college education and training in the state;
and assist the office of financial management in the preparation of
enrollment projections to support plans for providing adequate college
facilities in all areas of the state. The master plan shall include
implementation of the vision, goals, priorities, and strategies in the
statewide strategic master plan for higher education under RCW
28B.76.200 based on the community and technical college system's role
and mission. The master plan shall also contain measurable performance
indicators and benchmarks for gauging progress toward achieving the
goals and priorities;
(5) Define and administer criteria and guidelines for the
establishment of new community and technical colleges or campuses
within the existing districts;
(6) Establish criteria and procedures for modifying district
boundary lines consistent with the purposes set forth in RCW 28B.50.020
as now or hereafter amended and in accordance therewith make such
changes as it deems advisable;
(7) Establish minimum standards to govern the operation of the
community and technical colleges with respect to:
(a) Qualifications and credentials of instructional and key
administrative personnel, except as otherwise provided in the state
plan for vocational education,
(b) Internal budgeting, accounting, auditing, and financial
procedures as necessary to supplement the general requirements
prescribed pursuant to chapter 43.88 RCW,
(c) The content of the curriculums and other educational and
training programs, and the requirement for degrees and certificates
awarded by the colleges,
(d) Standard admission policies,
(e) Eligibility of courses to receive state fund support;
(8) Establish and administer criteria and procedures for all
capital construction including the establishment, installation, and
expansion of facilities within the various college districts;
(9) Encourage innovation in the development of new educational and
training programs and instructional methods; coordinate research
efforts to this end; and disseminate the findings thereof;
(10) Exercise any other powers, duties and responsibilities
necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter;
(11) Authorize the various community and technical colleges to
offer programs and courses in other districts when it determines that
such action is consistent with the purposes set forth in RCW 28B.50.020
as now or hereafter amended;
(12) Notwithstanding any other law or statute regarding the sale of
state property, sell or exchange and convey any or all interest in any
community and technical college real and personal property, except such
property as is received by a college district in accordance with RCW
28B.50.140(8), when it determines that such property is surplus or that
such a sale or exchange is in the best interests of the community and
technical college system;
(13) In order that the treasurer for the state board for community
and technical colleges appointed in accordance with RCW 28B.50.085 may
make vendor payments, the state treasurer will honor warrants drawn by
the state board providing for an initial advance on July 1, 1982, of
the current biennium and on July 1 of each succeeding biennium from the
state general fund in an amount equal to twenty-four percent of the
average monthly allotment for such budgeted biennium expenditures for
the state board for community and technical colleges as certified by
the office of financial management; and at the conclusion of such
initial month and for each succeeding month of any biennium, the state
treasurer will reimburse expenditures incurred and reported monthly by
the state board treasurer in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW:
PROVIDED, That the reimbursement to the state board for actual
expenditures incurred in the final month of each biennium shall be less
the initial advance made in such biennium;
(14) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (12) of this
section, may receive such gifts, grants, conveyances, devises, and
bequests of real or personal property from private sources as may be
made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, whenever the terms and
conditions thereof will aid in carrying out the community and technical
college programs and may sell, lease or exchange, invest or expend the
same or the proceeds, rents, profits and income thereof according to
the terms and conditions thereof; and adopt regulations to govern the
receipt and expenditure of the proceeds, rents, profits and income
thereof;
(15) The college board shall have the power of eminent domain;
(16) Provide general supervision over the state's technical
colleges. The president of each technical college shall report
directly to the director of the state board for community and technical
colleges, or the director's designee, until local control is assumed by
a new or existing board of trustees as appropriate, except that a
college president shall have authority over program decisions of his or
her college until the establishment of a board of trustees for that
college. The directors of the vocational-technical institutes on March
1, 1991, shall be designated as the presidents of the new technical
colleges; and
(17) Enter into negotiations to create a master performance
contract for the system of community and technical colleges as provided
in chapter 28B.-- RCW (sections 401 through 407 of this act).

Sec. 409 RCW 28B.76.290 and 1993 c 77 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board shall coordinate educational activities among all
segments of higher education taking into account the educational
programs, facilities, and other resources of both public and
independent two and four-year colleges and universities. The four-year
institutions and the state board for community and technical colleges
shall coordinate information and activities with the board. The board
shall have the following additional responsibilities:
(1) Promote interinstitutional cooperation;
(2) Establish minimum admission standards for four-year
institutions, including a requirement that coursework in American sign
language or an American Indian language shall satisfy any requirement
for instruction in a language other than English that the board or the
institutions may establish as a general undergraduate admissions
requirement;
(3) Establish transfer policies;
(4) Adopt rules implementing statutory residency requirements;
(5) Develop and administer reciprocity agreements with bordering
states and the province of British Columbia;
(6) Review and recommend compensation practices and levels for
administrative employees, exempt under chapter ((28B.16)) 41.06 RCW,
and faculty using comparative data from peer institutions;
(7) Monitor higher education activities for compliance with all
relevant state policies for higher education;
(8) Arbitrate disputes between and among four-year institutions or
between and among four-year institutions and community colleges at the
request of one or more of the institutions involved, or at the request
of the governor, or from a resolution adopted by the legislature. The
decision of the board shall be binding on the participants in the
dispute;
(9) Establish and implement a state system for collecting,
analyzing, and distributing information;
(10) Recommend to the governor and the legislature ways to remove
any economic incentives to use off-campus program funds for on-campus
activities; ((and))
(11) Make recommendations to increase minority participation, and
monitor and report on the progress of minority participation in higher
education; and
(12) Enter into negotiations to create performance contracts with
the governing boards of the public four-year institutions as provided
in chapter 28B.-- RCW (sections 401 through 407 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 410 RCW 28B.76.270 (Accountability monitoring
and reporting system -- Institution biennial plans and performance
targets -- Biennial reports to the legislature) and 2004 c 275 s 11 are
each repealed.

PART V
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 Sections 401 through 407 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

--- END ---