BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that:
(a) The health of the children of Washington state is critical to
their success in school and throughout their lives. Children with
health insurance coverage have better health outcomes than those who
lack coverage. Children without health insurance coverage are more
likely to be in poor health and more likely to delay receiving, or go
without, needed health care services;
(b) Access to preventive and well-child health services for
children is a cost-effective investment of both public and private
dollars that improves the health of children and of our communities at
large; and
(c) Health care coverage for children in Washington state is the
product of critical efforts in both the private and public sectors to
help children succeed. Private health insurance coverage is
complemented by public programs that meet needs of low-income children
whose parents are not offered health insurance coverage through their
employer or who cannot otherwise afford the costs of coverage. In
2004, thirty-five percent of children in Washington state had some form
of public health coverage. Yet, even with the efforts of both the
private and public sectors, too many children in Washington state lack
health insurance coverage. In 2004, almost one hundred thousand
children were uninsured. Two-thirds of these children are low income.
(2) It is therefore the intent of the legislature that all children
in the state of Washington have health care coverage by 2010. This
should be accomplished by building upon and strengthening the successes
of private health insurance coverage and publicly supported children's
health insurance programs in Washington state. Access to coverage
should be streamlined and efficient, with reductions in unnecessary
administrative costs and mechanisms to expeditiously link children with
a medical home.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.09.415 and 2002 c 366 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is hereby established a program to be known as the
children's health program. The legislature finds that the children's
health program is a more appropriate mechanism for providing health
services to poor children who are not otherwise eligible for medical
assistance than grants to community clinics to offset uncompensated
care or coverage through the Washington basic health plan.
To the extent of available funds:
(a) Health care services may be provided to persons who are under
eighteen years of age with household incomes at or below the federal
poverty level and not otherwise eligible for medical assistance or the
limited casualty program for the medically needy.
(b) The determination of eligibility of recipients for health care
services shall be the responsibility of the department. ((The
application process shall be easy to understand and, to the extent
possible, applications shall be made available at local schools and
other appropriate locations.)) The department shall make eligibility
determinations within the time frames for establishing eligibility for
children on medical assistance, as defined by RCW 74.09.510.
(c) The amount, scope, and duration of health care services
provided to eligible children under the children's health program shall
be the same as that provided to children under medical assistance, as
defined in RCW 74.09.520.
(2) ((The legislature is interested in assessing the effectiveness
of the prenatal care program. However, the legislature recognizes the
cost and complexity associated with such assessment.
The legislature accepts the effectiveness of prenatal and maternity
care at improving birth outcomes when these services are received by
eligible persons. Therefore, the legislature intends to focus scarce
assessment resources to determine the extent to which support services
such as child care, psychosocial and nutritional assessment and
counseling, case management, transportation, and other support services
authorized by chapter 296, Laws of 1990, result in receipt of prenatal
and maternity care by eligible persons.
The University of Washington shall conduct a study, based on a
statistically significant statewide sampling of data, to evaluate the
effectiveness of the maternity care access program set forth in RCW
74.09.760 through 74.09.820 based on the principles set forth in RCW
74.09.770.
The University of Washington shall develop a plan and budget for
the study in consultation with the joint legislative audit and review
committee. The joint legislative audit and review committee shall also
monitor the progress of the study.
The department of social and health services shall make data and
other information available as needed to the University of Washington
as required to conduct this study.
The study shall determine:
(a) The characteristics of women receiving services, including
health risk factors;
(b) The extent to which access to maternity care and support
services have improved in this state as a result of this program;
(c) The utilization of services and birth outcomes for women and
infants served by this program by type of practitioner;
(d) The extent to which birth outcomes for women receiving services
under this program have improved in comparison to birth outcomes of
nonmedicaid mothers;
(e) The impact of increased medicaid reimbursement to physicians on
provider participation;
(f) The difference between costs for services provided under this
program and medicaid reimbursement for the services;
(g) The gaps in services, if any, that may still exist for women
and their infants as defined by RCW 74.09.790 (1) and (4) served by
this program, excluding pregnant substance abusers, and women covered
by private health insurance; and
(h) The number and mix of services provided to eligible women as
defined by subsection (2)(g) of this section and the effect on birth
outcomes as compared to nonmedicaid birth outcomes.)) Enrollment in
the children's health program shall not result in expenditures that
exceed the amount that has been appropriated for the program in the
operating budget. If it appears that continued enrollment will result
in expenditures exceeding the appropriated level for a particular
fiscal year, the department may freeze new enrollment in the program
for that year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---