BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.05.195 and 1993 c 492 s 222 are each amended to
read as follows:
Notwithstanding any other provisions of this title or rules or
procedures adopted by the authority, the authority shall make available
to retired or disabled employees who are ((eligible for)) enrolled in
parts A and B of medicare ((at least two)) one or more medicare
supplemental insurance policies that conform to the medicare supplement
insurance minimum standards adopted by the national association of
insurance commissioners and the requirements of chapter 48.66 RCW.
((One policy shall include coverage for prescription drugs.)) The
policies shall be chosen in consultation with the public employees'
benefits board. These policies shall be made available to retired or
disabled state employees((, or)); retired or disabled school district
employees; retired employees of county, municipal, or other political
subdivisions eligible for coverage available under the authority; or
surviving spouses of emergency service personnel killed in the line of
duty. ((All offerings shall be made available not later than January
1, 1994.))

Sec. 2 RCW 41.05.197 and 1993 c 492 s 223 are each amended to
read as follows:
((If a waiver of the medicare statute, Title XVIII of the federal
social security act, sufficient to meet the requirements of chapter
492, Laws of 1993 is not granted on or before January 1, 1995,)) The
medicare supplemental insurance policies authorized under RCW 41.05.195
shall be made available to any resident of the state ((eligible for
medicare benefits. Except for those retired state or school district
employees eligible to purchase medicare supplemental benefits through
the authority, persons)) who:
(1) Is enrolled in parts A and B of medicare; and
(2) Is not eligible to purchase coverage under RCW 41.05.195.
State residents purchasing a medicare supplemental insurance policy
under this section shall be required to pay the full cost of any such
policy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 41.05.190 (Medicare supplemental
insurance plan) and 1998 c 245 s 37 & 1993 c 492 s 221 are each
repealed.

--- END ---