BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that fair and
open competition is a basic tenet of public works procurement, that
such competition reduces the appearance of and opportunity for
favoritism and inspires public confidence that contracts are awarded
equitably and economically, and that preservation of the integrity of
the competitive bid system dictates that, the contract should be
awarded to that responsible bidder submitting the lowest responsive bid
unless good cause is shown.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 39.30 RCW
to read as follows:
After bids for a public work, as defined in RCW 39.04.010, have
been opened by the state or municipalities, as defined in RCW
39.04.010, and institutions of higher education as defined in RCW
28B.10.016, award must be made to that responsible bidder who submitted
the lowest responsive bid, unless it is determined in writing
specifying the reasons that there is good cause to reject all bids and
cancel the invitation. The requirements of this section shall also
apply to general contractor/construction managers' procurement of
subcontract bid package work under RCW 39.10.061, except that both the
public owner and the contractor/construction manager must determine in
writing specifying the reasons that there is good cause to reject all
bids and cancel the invitation.

--- END ---