BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 FINDINGS AND PURPOSE. (1) The legislature
finds that it is in the public interest to examine the use of a voting
system that requires all victorious candidates to be elected with a
majority vote rather than a plurality of effective votes, and that
allows voters to designate secondary and other preferences for
potential tabulation if their first choice candidate does not receive
a majority of the votes cast. The legislature recognizes that the
system known as instant runoff voting achieves these purposes.
(2) The legislature wishes to examine whether voter interest and
participation in elections will increase when instant runoff voting, a
voting method that promotes additional voter choices and a more
meaningful recognition of all voter selections, is used to elect
nonpartisan candidates. The legislature declares that it is in the
interest of participatory democracy for voters to be given the
opportunity to vote for their first choice candidate while still making
effective secondary choices among the remaining candidates.
(3) The legislature therefore intends to authorize a limited pilot
project to study the effects of using instant runoff voting as a local
option for nonpartisan offices in any qualifying city.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 PILOT PROJECT--INSTANT RUNOFF VOTING. The
legislature intends to establish an instant runoff voting pilot project
to be completed by willing state and local election administrators in
full partnership and cooperation.
If the county auditor of a county containing any city that has
demonstrated support for instant runoff voting, as provided by
subsection (1)(c) of this section, provides written notification of
pilot project participation to the secretary of state by January 1,
2007, the secretary of state shall conduct a pilot project to examine
the use of instant runoff voting as a local option for nonpartisan
offices in any qualifying city in that county. Following the timely
receipt by the secretary of state of the written notification, the
pilot project must begin by August 1, 2008, and conclude no later than
July 1, 2013.
(1) For the purposes of this act, a qualifying city must:
(a) Be classified as a first class city as defined by chapter 35.22
RCW;
(b) Have a population greater than one hundred forty thousand and
less than two hundred thousand as of the effective date of this act as
determined by the office of financial management; and
(c) Have demonstrated support for instant runoff voting by
approving a city charter amendment authorizing the city council to use
instant runoff voting for the election of city officers.
(2)(a) Following the timely receipt by the secretary of state of a
notification of participation from a county auditor, and in accordance
with the provisions of this section, the secretary of state shall
certify at least one city in that county to qualify and participate in
the pilot project. Only a qualifying city or cities certified for
participation by the secretary of state may participate in the pilot
project.
(b) The county auditor of a county containing a qualifying and
certified city who has submitted a timely notification of participation
shall participate in the pilot project.
(3) Elections conducted under the instant runoff voting method for
the pilot project must comply with this chapter and may be held only on
the dates specified by RCW 29A.04.330(1).
(4) For the purpose of implementing this chapter, the secretary of
state shall develop and adopt:
(a) Rules governing the conduct of instant runoff voting elections;
and
(b) A pilot project timeline. The secretary of state may consult
with appropriate local officials to develop this timeline. The
timeline is subject to review and modification by the secretary of
state, as necessary.
(5) All election equipment and related processes shall be certified
by the secretary of state before an election may be conducted under the
instant runoff voting method.
(6) The secretary of state shall submit a report of findings to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by July 1, 2013, that
includes, but is not limited to:
(a) An assessment of all elections conducted using the instant
runoff voting method;
(b) Recommendations for statutory, rule, and local voting
procedural modifications that would be required prior to implementing
instant runoff voting as a permanent alternative election method for
special and general elections;
(c) An inventory of available election equipment necessary for
conducting elections under the instant runoff method, including costs
associated with the equipment; and
(d) Any recommendations from any city legislative body or county
auditor participating in this pilot project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Candidates who remain" means all candidates who have not been
eliminated at a previous stage.
(2) "Choice" means an indication on a ballot of a voter's ranking
of candidates for any single office according to the voter's
preference.
(3) "Continuing ballot" means a ballot that is not exhausted.
(4) "Exhausted ballot" means a ballot on which all indicated
choices have become votes for the candidates so designated or when the
ballot contains only choices for eliminated candidates.
(5) "Instant runoff voting" means a system of voting in which
voters may designate as many as three candidates for the same office in
order of preference by indicating a first choice, a second choice, and
a third choice.
(6) "Last place candidate" means a candidate who has received the
fewest votes among the candidates who remain at any stage. Two or more
candidates simultaneously become last place candidates when their
combined votes are equal to or fewer than all votes for the candidate
with the third highest vote total.
(7) "Next choice" means the highest ranked choice for a remaining
candidate that has not become a vote at a previous stage.
(8) "Remaining candidate" means a candidate who has not been
eliminated.
(9) "Stage" or "stage in the counting" means a step in the counting
process during which votes for all remaining candidates are tabulated
for the purpose of determining whether a candidate has achieved a
majority of the votes cast for a particular office, and, absent a
majority, which candidate or candidates must be eliminated.
(10) "Vote" means a ballot choice that is counted toward election
of a candidate. Except as provided by sections 5 and 6 of this act,
all first choices are votes. Lower ranked choices are potential votes
that may, in accordance with the requirements of this chapter, be
credited to and become votes for a candidate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 INSTANT RUNOFF VOTING--APPLICABLE
PROVISIONS. To the extent they are not inconsistent with this chapter,
the laws governing elections apply to the pilot project on instant
runoff voting authorized by this chapter. The authority of a city
meeting the criteria of sections 2 and 7 of this act to participate in
an election conducted under the instant runoff voting method expires on
July 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 TABULATION OF BALLOTS--COUNTING STAGES. The
following provisions, subject to the conditions of section 6 of this
act, govern how votes for candidates for each office shall be tabulated
under the instant runoff voting method:
(1) All first choice votes cast for the office shall be tabulated
in the first counting stage. If, following this first counting stage,
a candidate receives a majority of the votes cast for the office, that
candidate is deemed elected to the office and counting ends;
(2) If no candidate receives a majority of the votes cast for the
office during the first counting stage, the second counting stage
begins by eliminating the last place candidate for that office. On
ballots that indicate a first choice preference for the eliminated
candidate, the second choice preferences are counted as votes for the
candidates so designated. If, following this second counting stage, a
candidate receives a majority of the votes cast for the office, that
candidate is deemed elected to the office and counting ends;
(3) If, following the second counting stage, no candidate receives
a majority of the votes cast for the office, the third counting stage
begins by eliminating the last place candidate for that office. On
ballots that indicate a first choice preference for the eliminated
candidate, the next choice preferences are counted as votes for the
candidates so designated. If, following this third counting stage, a
candidate receives a majority of votes cast for the office, that
candidate is deemed elected to the office and counting ends;
(4) If, following the third counting stage, no candidate receives
a majority of the votes cast for the office, the counting process
provided by subsection (3) of this section continues in succession
until either a candidate receives a majority of the votes cast for the
office or all but one candidate has been eliminated. In accordance
with the provisions of this subsection, a candidate who receives either
a majority of the votes cast for the office or who is the sole
remaining candidate shall be deemed elected to the office; and
(5) If at any stage in the counting process there are two or more
last place candidates for the office, these candidates must be
eliminated simultaneously. On ballots that indicate a first choice
preference for the eliminated candidates, the next choice preferences
shall be counted as votes for the candidates so designated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 VOTING CONDITIONS AND LIMITATIONS. (1)(a)
Once a ballot is exhausted, it is disregarded and not subject to
additional tabulation procedures.
(b) A ballot assigning the same ranking to more than one candidate
for an office is exhausted when the duplicate ranking is reached. No
vote may be recorded for any candidates designated with the same
ranking on the same ballot.
(2) The county auditor may not count more than three choices for
any one office from a ballot.
(3) If the total number of votes for all write-in candidates in
each race during any counting stage is fewer than the last place
candidate among the candidates appearing on the ballot, all write-in
candidates must be eliminated for that counting stage and subsequent
counting stages.
(4) If, following the conclusion of the counting stages, the
tabulated ballots do not contain a sufficient number of effective
second and lower choices for a candidate to receive a majority of the
votes cast for any office, the candidate who either has the highest
number of votes credited to him or her for that office, or who is the
sole remaining candidate shall be deemed elected to the office.
(5) No votes may be counted for a candidate who has been
eliminated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 LOCAL OPTION AUTHORIZED. (1) In accordance
with the provisions of section 2 of this act, the legislative body of
a qualifying city may, for a specific election or elections, adopt
instant runoff voting as the method for electing candidates for all
nonpartisan city offices.
(2)(a) After adoption of instant runoff voting by the legislative
body of a qualifying city for a specific election or elections as
provided for by subsection (1) of this section, the city shall, before
conducting an election using the instant runoff voting method, notify
the county auditor and the secretary of state of its intent to hold
such an election.
(b) If the county auditor notifies the city that existing election
equipment of the county is insufficient for conducting an election
under the instant runoff voting method, the city and the auditor shall
negotiate an agreement for the purchase of any new equipment
specifically required for this election method. Nothing in this
subsection precludes the auditor from canvassing the returns of an
instant runoff voting election by hand.
(3) The date of any election conducted under the instant runoff
voting method must be consistent with the timeline required by section
2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 BALLOT SPECIFICATIONS AND DIRECTIONS TO
VOTERS. Ballots for elections conducted under the instant runoff
voting method should be clear and easily understood. Sample ballots
illustrating voting procedures must be posted in or near voting booths
and included within instruction packets for absentee ballots.
Directions provided to voters must conform substantially to the
following specifications:

"You may choose a maximum of three candidates for each
office in order of preference. Indicate your first choice
designation by marking the number "1" beside a candidate's name
(or by marking in the column labeled "First Choice"). Indicate
your second choice designation by marking the number "2" beside
a candidate's name (or by marking in the column labeled "Second
Choice"). Indicate your third choice designation by marking
the number "3" beside a candidate's name (or by marking in the
column labeled "Third Choice"). You are not required to choose
more than one candidate for each office. Designating two or
more candidates in order of preference will not affect your
first choice designation. Do not mark the same designation
number beside more than one candidate or put more than one mark
in each column for the office on which you are voting. Do not
skip designation numbers."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 CHANGES IN VOTING DEVICES AND COUNTING
METHODS. Participating state and local election officials may provide
for voting directions and the design, processing, and tabulation of
instant runoff voting ballots used in the pilot project authorized by
section 2 of this act. State and local actions must be consistent with
the provisions of this chapter.
Election officials should provide voters with a ballot that has a
distinctive design, format, or layout for offices to which instant
runoff voting applies. Ballot sections for contests that have fewer
than three candidates for the same office, however, may differ from
ballot sections for which the instant runoff voting method applies.

Sec. 10 RCW 29A.52.220 and 2003 c 111 s 1306 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No primary may be held for any single position in any city,
town, district, or district court, as required by RCW 29A.52.210, if,
after the last day allowed for candidates to withdraw, there are no
more than two candidates filed for the position. The county auditor
shall, as soon as possible, notify all the candidates so affected that
the office for which they filed will not appear on the primary ballot.
(2) No primary may be held for nonpartisan offices in any first
class city if the city:
(a) Is a qualifying city that has been certified to participate in
the pilot project authorized by section 2 of this act; and
(b) Is conducting an election using the instant runoff voting
method for the pilot project authorized by section 2 of this act.
(c) This subsection (2) expires July 1, 2013.
(3) No primary may be held for the office of commissioner of a park
and recreation district or for the office of cemetery district
commissioner.
(((3))) (4) Names of candidates for offices that do not appear on
the primary ballot shall be printed upon the general election ballot in
the manner specified by RCW ((29A.36.130)) 29A.36.131.

Sec. 11 RCW 29A.60.160 and 2003 c 111 s 1516 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except for an election conducted under the instant runoff voting
method for the pilot project authorized by section 2 of this act, at
least every third day after a primary or election and before
certification of the election results, except Sundays and legal
holidays, the county auditor, as delegated by the county canvassing
board, shall process absentee ballots and canvass the votes cast at
that primary or election, if the county auditor is in possession of
more than twenty-five ballots that have yet to be canvassed. The
county auditor, as delegated by the county canvassing board, may use
his or her discretion in determining when to process the remaining
absentee ballots and canvass the votes during the final four days
before the certification of election results in order to protect the
secrecy of any ballot. In counties where this process has not been
delegated to the county auditor, the county auditor shall convene the
county canvassing board to process absentee ballots and canvass the
votes cast at the primary or election as set forth in this section.
Except for an election conducted under the instant runoff voting
method for the pilot project authorized by section 2 of this act, each
absentee ballot previously not canvassed that was received by the
county auditor two days or more before processing absentee ballots and
canvassing the votes as delegated by or processed by the county
canvassing board, that either was received by the county auditor before
the closing of the polls on the day of the primary or election for
which it was issued, or that bears a postmark on or before the primary
or election for which it was issued, must be processed at that time.
The tabulation of votes that results from that day's canvass must be
made available to the general public immediately upon completion of the
canvass.

Sec. 12 RCW 29A.60.190 and 2004 c 266 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided by subsection (3) of this section, on the
tenth day after a special election or primary and on the fifteenth day
after a general election, the county canvassing board shall complete
the canvass and certify the results. Each absentee ballot that was
returned before the closing of the polls on the date of the primary or
election for which it was issued, and each absentee ballot with a
postmark on or before the date of the primary or election for which it
was issued and received on or before the date on which the primary or
election is certified, must be included in the canvass report.
(2) At the request of a caucus of the state legislature, the county
auditor shall transmit copies of all unofficial returns of state and
legislative primaries or elections prepared by or for the county
canvassing board to either the secretary of the senate or the chief
clerk of the house of representatives.
(3) On or before the thirtieth day after an election conducted
under the instant runoff voting method for the pilot project authorized
by section 2 of this act, the canvassing board shall complete the
canvass and certify the results.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 This chapter expires July 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Sections 11 and 12 of this act expire July
1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Sections 1 through 9 and 13 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 29A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Captions used in this act are not part of
the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---