BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 69.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person to possess more than one hundred
grams of ephedrine or any of its salts or isomers or salts of isomers,
pseudoephedrine or any of its salts or isomers or salts of isomers, or
phenylpropanolamine or any of its salts or isomers or salts of isomers,
or a combination of any of those substances.
(2) Any person who violates this section is guilty of a class B
felony.
(3) This section does not apply to any of the following:
(a) A pharmacist or other authorized person who sells or furnishes
ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, their salts,
isomers, or salts of isomers upon the prescription of a practitioner,
as defined in RCW 69.41.010;
(b) A practitioner who administers or furnishes ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, their salts, isomers, or salts
of isomers to his or her patients;
(c) A pharmacy, manufacturer, or wholesaler licensed by, or
shopkeeper or itinerant vendor registered with, the department of
health under chapter 18.64 RCW; or
(d) A person in the course of his or her business of selling,
transporting, or storing ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine, their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, for a
person described in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.518 and 2003 c 53 s 57 are each amended to read
as follows:

TABLE 4

DRUG OFFENSES
INCLUDED WITHIN EACH
SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

III Any felony offense under chapter
69.50 RCW with a deadly weapon
special verdict under RCW
9.94A.602

Controlled Substance Homicide (RCW
69.50.415)

Delivery of imitation controlled
substance by person eighteen or
over to person under eighteen
(RCW 69.52.030(2))

Involving a minor in drug dealing
(RCW 69.50.4015)

Manufacture of methamphetamine
(RCW 69.50.401(2)(b))

Over 18 and deliver heroin,
methamphetamine, a narcotic
from Schedule I or II, or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV
to someone under 18 (RCW
69.50.406)

Over 18 and deliver narcotic from
Schedule III, IV, or V or a
nonnarcotic, except flunitrazepam
or methamphetamine, from
Schedule I-V to someone under 18
and 3 years junior (RCW
69.50.406)

Possession of Ephedrine,
Pseudoephedrine, or Anhydrous
Ammonia with intent to
manufacture
methamphetamine (RCW
69.50.440)

Possession of unlawful amounts of
Ephedrine, Pseudoephedrine, or
Phenylpropanolamine (section 1
of this act)

Selling for profit (controlled or
counterfeit) any controlled
substance (RCW 69.50.410)

II Create, deliver, or possess a counterfeit
controlled substance (RCW
69.50.4011)

Deliver or possess with intent to
deliver methamphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(2)(b))

Delivery of a material in lieu of a
controlled substance (RCW
69.50.4012)

Maintaining a Dwelling or Place for
Controlled Substances (RCW
69.50.402(1)(f))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with
intent to deliver amphetamine
(RCW 69.50.401(2)(b))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with
intent to deliver narcotics from
Schedule I or II or flunitrazepam
from Schedule IV (RCW
69.50.401(2)(a))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with
intent to deliver narcotics from
Schedule III, IV, or V or
nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V
(except marijuana, amphetamine,
methamphetamines, or
flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(2) (c) through (e))

Manufacture, distribute, or possess
with intent to distribute an
imitation controlled substance
(RCW 69.52.030(1))

I Forged Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged Prescription for a Controlled
Substance (RCW 69.50.403)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with
intent to deliver marijuana (RCW
69.50.401(2)(c))

Possess Controlled Substance that is a
Narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or
V or Nonnarcotic from Schedule
I-V (RCW 69.50.4013)

Possession of Controlled Substance
that is either heroin or narcotics
from Schedule I or II (RCW
69.50.4013)

Unlawful Use of Building for Drug
Purposes (RCW 69.53.010)

--- END ---