BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1)(a) A joint select committee on off-road
vehicle noise management is established. The joint select committee
consists of the following members:
(i) Two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the house
of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives, one of which must be the chair of the state government
operations and accountability committee; and
(ii) Two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the
senate, appointed by the president of the senate.
(b) The committee shall choose its chair from among its membership.
(2) The committee shall review the following issues:
(a) The appropriateness and enforceability of current decibel
requirements for off-road vehicles;
(b) The appropriateness of any off-road vehicle usage requirements
that would minimize nuisance noise impacts on those not operating the
off-road vehicle;
(c) The applicability and consistency of local ordinances
concerning noise and off-road vehicle usage; and
(d) The availability of, and barriers to, using public lands or
other large ownerships to create areas where off-road vehicles can be
operated with minimum noise disturbance of neighbors.
(3) The committee, where feasible and when requested by the members
of the committee, may consult with individuals from the public and
private sector or ask such persons to establish an advisory committee.
(4)(a) The committee shall use legislative facilities, and the
house office of program research and senate committee services shall
provide staff support. The committee may hire additional staff with
specific technical expertise if the expertise is necessary to carry out
the mandates of this study.
(b) Legislative members of the committee will be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120.
(5) The committee shall report its findings and recommendations in
the form of draft legislation to the legislature by December 1, 2005.
(6) This section expires July 1, 2006.

--- END ---