BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Hood Canal and other marine waters in Puget Sound are at risk
of severe loss of marine life from low-dissolved oxygen. The increased
input of human-influenced nutrients, especially nitrogen, is a factor
causing this low-dissolved oxygen condition in some of Puget Sound's
waters, in addition to such natural factors as poor overall water
circulation and stratification that discourages mixing of surface-to-deeper waters;
(2) A significant portion of the state's residents live in homes
served by on-site sewage disposal systems, and many new residences will
be served by these systems;
(3) Properly functioning on-site sewage disposal systems largely
protect water quality. However, improperly functioning on-site sewage
disposal systems in marine recovery areas may contaminate surface
water, causing public health problems;
(4) Local programs designed to identify and correct failing on-site
sewage disposal systems have proven effective in reducing and
eliminating public health hazards, improving water quality, and
reopening previously closed shellfish areas; and
(5) State water quality monitoring data and analysis can help to
focus these enhanced local programs on specific geographic areas that
are sources of pollutants degrading Puget Sound waters.
Therefore, it is the purpose of this chapter to authorize enhanced
local programs in marine recovery areas to inventory existing on-site
sewage disposal systems, to identify the location of all on-site sewage
disposal systems in marine recovery areas, to require inspection of on-site sewage disposal systems and repairs to failing systems, to develop
electronic data systems capable of sharing information regarding on-site sewage disposal systems, and to monitor these programs to ensure
that they are working to protect public health and Puget Sound water
quality.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the state board of health.
(2) "Department" means the department of health.
(3) "Failing" means a condition of an existing on-site sewage
disposal system or component that threatens the public health by
inadequately treating sewage, or by creating a potential for direct or
indirect contact between sewage and the public. Examples of a failing
on-site sewage disposal system include:
(a) Sewage on the surface of the ground;
(b) Sewage backing up into a structure caused by slow soil
absorption of septic tank effluent;
(c) Sewage leaking from a sewage tank or collection system;
(d) Cesspools or seepage pits where evidence of ground water or
surface water quality degradation exists;
(e) Inadequately treated effluent contaminating ground water or
surface water; or
(f) Noncompliance with standards stipulated on the permit.
(4) "Local health officer" or "local health jurisdiction" means the
local health officers and local health jurisdictions in the following
counties bordering Puget Sound: Clallam, Island, Kitsap, Jefferson,
Mason, San Juan, Seattle-King, Skagit, Snohomish, Tacoma-Pierce,
Thurston, and Whatcom.
(5) "Marine recovery area" means an area of definite boundaries
where the local health officer, or the department in consultation with
the health officer, determines that additional requirements for
existing on-site sewage disposal systems may be necessary to reduce
potential failing systems or minimize negative impacts of on-site
sewage disposal systems.
(6) "Marine recovery area on-site strategy" or "on-site strategy"
means a local health jurisdiction's on-site sewage disposal system
strategy required under section 5 of this act. This strategy is a
component of the on-site program management plan required under section
3 of this act.
(7) "On-site sewage disposal system" means an integrated system of
components, located on or nearby the property it serves, that conveys,
stores, treats, or provides subsurface soil treatment and dispersal of
sewage. It consists of a collection system, a treatment component or
treatment sequence, and a soil dispersal component. An on-site sewage
disposal system also refers to a holding tank sewage system or other
system that does not have a soil dispersal component. For purposes of
this chapter, the term "on-site sewage disposal system" does not
include any system regulated by a water quality discharge permit issued
under chapter 90.48 RCW.
(8) "Unknown system" means an on-site sewage disposal system that
was installed without the knowledge or approval of the local health
jurisdiction, including those that were installed before such approval
was required.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 By July 1, 2007, the local health officers
of health jurisdictions in the twelve counties bordering Puget Sound
shall develop a written on-site program management plan to provide
guidance to the local health jurisdiction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) In developing on-site program management
plans required under section 3 of this act, the local health officer
shall propose a marine recovery area for those land areas where
existing on-site sewage disposal systems are a significant factor
contributing to concerns associated with:
(a) Shellfish growing areas that have been threatened or downgraded
by the department under chapter 69.30 RCW;
(b) Marine waters that are listed by the department of ecology
under section 303(d) of the federal clean water act (33 U.S.C. Sec.
1251 et seq.) for low-dissolved oxygen or fecal coliform; or
(c) Marine waters where nitrogen has been identified as a
contaminant of concern by the local health officer.
(2) In determining the boundaries for a marine recovery area, the
local health officer shall assess and include those land areas where
existing on-site sewage disposal systems may affect water quality in
the marine recovery area.
(3) Determinations made by the local health officer under this
section, including identification of nitrogen as a contaminant of
concern, will be based on published guidance developed by the
department. The guidance must be designed to ensure the proper use of
available scientific and technical data. The health officer shall
document the basis for these determinations when plans are submitted to
the department.
(4) After July 1, 2007, the local health officer may designate
additional marine recovery areas meeting the criteria of this section,
according to new information. Where the department recommends the
designation of a marine recovery area or expansion of a designated
marine recovery area, the local health officer shall notify the
department of its decision concerning the recommendation within ninety
days of receipt of the recommendation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The local health officer of a local
health jurisdiction where a marine recovery area has been proposed
under section 4 of this act shall develop and approve a marine recovery
area on-site strategy that includes designation of marine recovery
areas to guide the local health jurisdiction in developing and managing
all existing on-site sewage disposal systems within marine recovery
areas within its jurisdiction. The on-site strategy must be a
component of the program management plan required under section 3 of
this act. The department may grant an extension of twelve months where
a local health jurisdiction has demonstrated substantial progress
toward completing its on-site strategy.
(2) An on-site strategy for a marine recovery area must specify how
the local health jurisdiction will by July 1, 2012, and thereafter,
find:
(a) Existing failing systems and ensure that system owners make
necessary repairs; and
(b) Unknown systems and ensure that they are inspected as required
to ensure that they are functioning properly, and repaired, if
necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 In a marine recovery area, each local health
officer shall:
(1) Require that on-site sewage disposal system maintenance
specialists, septic tank pumpers, or others performing on-site sewage
disposal system inspections submit reports or inspection results to the
local health jurisdiction regarding any failing system; and
(2) Develop and maintain an electronic data system of all on-site
sewage disposal systems within a marine recovery area to enable the
local health jurisdiction to actively manage on-site sewage disposal
systems. In assisting development of electronic data systems, the
department shall work with local health jurisdictions with marine
recovery areas and the on-site sewage disposal system industry to
develop common forms and protocols to facilitate sharing of data. A
marine recovery area on-site sewage disposal electronic data system
must be compatible with all on-site sewage disposal electronic data
systems used throughout a local health jurisdiction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The on-site program management plans of
local health jurisdictions required under section 3 of this act must be
submitted to the department by July 1, 2007, and be reviewed to
determine if they contain all necessary elements. The department shall
provide in writing to the local board of health its review of the
completeness of the plan. The board may adopt additional criteria by
rule for approving plans.
(2) In reviewing the on-site strategy component of the plan, the
department shall ensure that all required elements, including
designation of any marine recovery area, have been addressed.
(3) Within thirty days of receiving an on-site strategy, the
department shall either approve the on-site strategy or provide in
writing the reasons for not approving the strategy and recommend
changes. If the department does not approve the on-site strategy, the
local health officer must amend and resubmit the plan to the department
for approval.
(4) Upon receipt of department approval or after thirty days
without notification, whichever comes first, the local health officer
shall implement the on-site strategy.
(5) If the department denies approval of an on-site strategy, the
local health officer may appeal the denial to the board. The board
must make a final determination concerning the denial.
(6) The department shall assist local health jurisdictions in:
(a) Developing written on-site program management plans required by
section 3 of this act;
(b) Identifying reasonable methods for finding unknown systems; and
(c) Developing or enhancing electronic data systems that will
enable each local health jurisdiction to actively manage all on-site
sewage disposal systems within their jurisdictions, with priority given
to those on-site sewage disposal systems that are located in or which
could affect designated marine recovery areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The department shall enter into a
contract with each local health jurisdiction subject to the
requirements of this chapter to implement plans developed under this
chapter, and to develop or enhance electronic data systems required by
this chapter. The contract must include state funding assistance to
the local health jurisdiction from funds appropriated to the department
for this purpose.
(2) The contract must require, at a minimum, that within a marine
recovery area, the local health jurisdiction:
(a) Show progressive improvement in finding failing systems;
(b) Show progressive improvement in working with on-site sewage
disposal system owners to make needed system repairs;
(c) Is actively taking steps to find previously unknown systems and
ensuring that they are inspected as required and repaired if necessary;
(d) Show progressive improvement in the percentage of on-site
sewage disposal systems that are included in an electronic data system;
and
(e) Of those on-site sewage disposal systems in the electronic data
system, show progressive improvement in the percentage that have had
required inspections.
(3) The contract must also include provisions for state assistance
in updating the plan. Beginning July 1, 2012, the contract may adopt
revised compliance dates, including those in section 5 of this act,
where the local health jurisdiction has demonstrated substantial
progress in updating the on-site strategy.
(4) The department shall convene a work group for the purpose of
making recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature
for the development of certification or licensing of maintenance
specialists. The work group shall make its recommendation with
consideration given to the 1998 report to the legislature entitled "On-Site Wastewater Certification Work Group" as it pertains to maintenance
specialists. The work group may give priority to appropriate levels of
certification or licensure of maintenance specialists who work in the
Puget Sound basin.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The provisions of this chapter are
supplemental to all other authorities governing on-site sewage disposal
systems, including chapter 70.118 RCW and rules adopted under that
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall offer financial and technical assistance to
local governments and tribal entities in Puget Sound counties to
establish or expand on-site sewage disposal system repair and
replacement through local loan and grant programs. The programs must
give priority to low-income and financially distressed homeowners.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) The department of health shall report
to the appropriate committees of the senate and house of
representatives by December 31, 2008, on progress in designating marine
recovery areas and developing and implementing on-site strategies for
such marine recovery areas.
(2) The report shall include information on:
(a) The status of on-site strategies in each county covered by
sections 2 through 9 of this act;
(b) The status of on-site sewage disposal system location,
identification, and inclusion within electronic data systems in each
county, including estimates of remaining on-site sewage disposal
systems within marine recovery areas that have not been identified or
included within electronic data systems;
(c) Areas for which shoreline surveys have been completed by the
department;
(d) The progress of and capacity of local health jurisdictions to
identify on-site sewage disposal systems within marine recovery areas
and to ensure that failing systems are repaired and all systems are
operated and maintained in compliance with board of health standards;
(e) Regulatory, statutory, and financial barriers to implementing
the on-site strategy; and
(f) Recommendations that will assist local health jurisdictions to
successfully implement plans.
(3) Local health jurisdictions shall provide information and data
requested by the department of health in developing the report, and the
department shall append all reports or information that the local
health jurisdictions request to be included in the report.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---