BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.56.005 and 2004 c 226 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature declares that ((the increasing reliance on))
water borne transportation as a source of supply for oil and hazardous
substances poses special concern for the state of Washington. Each
year billions of gallons of crude oil and refined petroleum products
are transported as cargo and fuel by vessel on the navigable waters of
the state. These shipments are expected to increase in the coming
years. Vessels transporting oil into Washington travel on some of the
most ((unique)) valuable and special marine environments in the United
States. These marine environments are a source of natural beauty,
recreation, and economic livelihood for many residents of this state.
As a result, the state has an obligation to ensure the citizens of the
state that the waters of the state will be protected from oil spills.
(2) The legislature finds that prevention is the best method to
protect the ((unique)) valuable and special marine environments in this
state. The technology for containing and cleaning up a spill of oil or
hazardous substances is ((in the early stages of development)) at best
only partially effective. Preventing spills is more protective of the
environment and more cost-effective when all the response and damage
costs associated with responding to a spill are considered. Therefore,
the legislature finds that the primary objective of the state is to
((adopt)) achieve a zero spills strategy to prevent any oil or
hazardous substances from entering waters of the state.
(3) The legislature also finds that:
(a) Recent accidents in Washington, Alaska, southern California,
Texas, Pennsylvania, and other parts of the nation have shown that the
transportation, transfer, and storage of oil have caused significant
damage to the marine environment;
(b) Even with the best efforts, it is nearly impossible to remove
all oil that is spilled into the water, and average removal rates are
only fourteen percent;
(c) Washington's navigable waters are treasured environmental and
economic resources that the state cannot afford to place at undue risk
from an oil spill; ((and))
(d) The state has a fundamental responsibility, as the trustee of
the state's natural resources and the protector of public health and
the environment to prevent the spill of oil; and
(e) In section 5002 of the federal oil pollution act of 1990, the
United States congress found that complacency on the part of industry
and government was one of the contributing factors to the Exxon Valdez
spill and, further, that one method to combat this complacency is to
involve local citizens in the monitoring and oversight of oil spill
plans. Moreover, congress concluded that, in addition to Alaska, a
program of citizen monitoring and oversight should be established in
other major crude oil terminals in the United States because recent oil
spills indicate that the safe transportation of oil is a national
problem.
(4) In order to establish a comprehensive prevention and response
program to protect Washington's waters and natural resources from
spills of oil, it is the purpose of this chapter:
(a) To establish state agency expertise in marine safety and to
centralize state activities in spill prevention and response
activities;
(b) To prevent spills of oil and to promote programs that reduce
the risk of both catastrophic and small chronic spills;
(c) To ensure that responsible parties are liable, and have the
resources and ability, to respond to spills and provide compensation
for all costs and damages;
(d) To provide for state spill response and wildlife rescue
planning and implementation;
(e) To support and complement the federal oil pollution act of 1990
and other federal law, especially those provisions relating to the
national contingency plan for cleanup of oil spills and discharges,
including provisions relating to the responsibilities of state agencies
designated as natural resource trustees. The legislature intends this
chapter to be interpreted and implemented in a manner consistent with
federal law;
(f) To provide broad powers of regulation to the department of
ecology relating to spill prevention and response;
(g) To provide for an independent monitoring and oversight
((board)) council, consistent with federal law, to review on an ongoing
basis the adequacy of spill prevention and response activities in this
state; and
(h) To provide an adequate funding source for state response and
prevention programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 90.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There is established in the office of the governor the oil
spill monitoring and oversight council. The primary purpose of the
council is to maintain the state's vigilance in the prevention of oil
spills, while recognizing the importance of also improving preparedness
and response.
(2) The council is composed of eleven members appointed by the
governor as provided in this subsection:
(a) The governor shall select one member each to represent the
interests of the following associations, based upon a list of
candidates if submitted by the association:
(i) Washington state association of counties;
(ii) Association of Washington cities;
(iii) Washington public ports association; and
(iv) Pacific shellfish growers association.
(b) The governor shall invite the Northwest Indian fisheries
commission to select a representative of Indian tribes to participate
as a member of the council.
(c) The governor shall select one representative to serve on the
council from each of the following interests:
(i) A representative of commercial fishing interests;
(ii) A representative of recreational fishing interests;
(iii) A representative of the tourism industry;
(iv) A representative of environmental organizations;
(v) A nongovernmental member of the Puget Sound council; and
(vi) A nongovernmental member of the biodiversity council, created
under executive order 04-02.
(3) Appointments to the council shall reflect a geographical
balance and the diversity of populations within the areas potentially
affected by oil spills to state waters.
(4) Members shall serve four-year terms, except that of the initial
members appointed to the council, three shall serve two-year terms,
three shall serve three-year terms, and five members shall serve four-year terms. Vacancies shall be filled by appointment in the same
manner as the original appointment for the remainder of the unexpired
term of the position vacated.
(5) The council shall elect a chair from among its members in odd-numbered years to serve for two years as chair. The chair shall
convene the council at least four times per year. At least one meeting
per year shall be held in a Columbia river community, an ocean coastal
community, and a Puget Sound community.
(6) Members shall not be compensated, but shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 90.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The duties of the council include:
(a) Selection and hiring of professional staff and expert
consultants to support the work of the council;
(b) Consultation with government decision makers in relation to the
state's oil spill prevention, preparedness, and response programs,
analyses, rule making, and related oil spill activities;
(c) Providing independent advice, expertise, research, monitoring,
assessment, and oversight for review of and necessary improvements to
the state's oil spill prevention, preparedness, and response programs,
analyses, rule making, and other decisions, including those of the
Northwest area committee, as well as the adequacy of funding for these
programs;
(d) Monitoring and providing information to the public as well as
state and federal agencies regarding state of the art prevention,
preparedness, and response programs;
(e) Actively seeking public comments on and proposals for specific
measures to improve the state's oil spill prevention, preparedness, and
response program, including measures to improve the effectiveness of
the Northwest area committee;
(f) Creating additional committees of the council as necessary to
carry out the functions in this subsection (1), including scientific
and technical committees;
(g) Promoting opportunities for the public to become involved in
spill response activities and provide assistance to community groups
with an interest in oil spill prevention and response;
(h) Preparing reports to embody the council's analyses and
recommendations; and
(i) Any other activities necessary to maintain the state's
vigilance in preventing oil spills.
(2) By December 1st of each year, the council shall make
recommendations for the continuing improvement of the state's oil spill
prevention, preparedness, and response through a report to the governor
and the appropriate committees of the senate and house of
representatives.
(3) The director shall prepare a response to the annual report
within ninety days of its submittal to the governor and the
legislature, including a description of recommended improvements the
department will adopt and the reasons established for rejecting the
adoption of or for significantly modifying any recommended improvement.

--- END ---