BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 89.08.550 and 2004 c 277 s 901 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The conservation assistance revolving account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. ((The account shall be administered by
the conservation commission.)) Moneys from the account may only be
spent after appropriation. Moneys placed in the account shall include
principal and interest from the repayment of any loans granted under
this section, and any other moneys appropriated to the account by the
legislature. ((Expenditures from the account may be used to make loans
to landowners for projects enrolled in the conservation reserve
enhancement program.)) Expenditures from the account may be used only
to make loans to landowners for projects enrolled in the conservation
reserve enhancement program and the continuous conservation reserve
program.
(2) In order to aid the financing of conservation reserve
enhancement program projects and continuous conservation reserve
program projects, the conservation commission, through the conservation
districts, may make interest-free loans to ((conservation reserve
enhancement program)) these enrollees from the conservation assistance
revolving account. The conservation commission may require such terms
and conditions as it deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this
section. Loans to landowners shall be for costs associated with the
installation of conservation improvements eligible for and secured by
federal farm service agency practice incentive payment reimbursement.
Loans under this program promote critical habitat protection and
restoration by bridging the financing gap between project
implementation and federal funding. The conservation commission shall
give loan preferences to those projects expected to generate the
greatest environmental benefits and that occur in basins with critical
or depressed salmonid stocks. Money received from landowners in loan
repayments made under this section shall be paid into the conservation
assistance revolving account for uses consistent with this section.

--- END ---