BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.210.080 and 1990 c 33 s 192 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The attendance of every child at every public and private
school in the state and licensed day care center shall be conditioned
upon the presentation before or on each child's first day of attendance
at a particular school or center, of proof of either (((1))) (a) full
immunization, (((2))) (b) the initiation of and compliance with a
schedule of immunization, as required by rules of the state board of
health, or (((3))) (c) a certificate of exemption as provided for in
RCW 28A.210.090. The attendance at the school or the day care center
during any subsequent school year of a child who has initiated a
schedule of immunization shall be conditioned upon the presentation of
proof of compliance with the schedule on the child's first day of
attendance during the subsequent school year. Once proof of full
immunization or proof of completion of an approved schedule has been
presented, no further proof shall be required as a condition to
attendance at the particular school or center.
(2)(a) Beginning with sixth grade entry, every public and private
school in the state shall provide parents and guardians with
information about meningococcal disease and its vaccine at the
beginning of every school year. The information about meningococcal
disease shall include:
(i) Its causes and symptoms, how meningococcal disease is spread,
and the places where parents and guardians may obtain additional
information and vaccinations for their children; and
(ii) Current recommendations from the United States centers for
disease control and prevention regarding the receipt of vaccines for
meningococcal disease and where the vaccination can be received.
(b) This subsection shall not be construed to require the
department of health or the school to provide meningococcal vaccination
to students.
(c) The department of health shall be consulted regarding the
preparation of the information materials provided to students.
(d) This subsection does not create a private right of action.
(e) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to
implement the requirements of this act and shall annually attest that
the program has been implemented.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---