BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the operator
of a street legal motorcycle approaching a left turn intersection that
is controlled by a triggered traffic control signal using a vehicle
detection device that is inoperative due to the size of the street
legal motorcycle shall come to a full and complete stop at the
intersection. If the left turn signal fails to operate after one cycle
of the traffic signal, the operator may, after exercising due care,
proceed to turn left. It is not a defense to a violation of RCW
46.61.050 that the driver of a motorcycle proceeded under the belief
that a traffic control signal used a vehicle detection device or was
inoperative due to the size of the motorcycle when the signal did not
use a vehicle detection device or that any such device was not in fact
inoperative due to the size of the motorcycle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect September 1, 2006.

--- END ---