BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.44.030 and 2003 c 207 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) When any practitioner, county coroner or medical examiner,
law enforcement officer, professional school personnel, registered or
licensed nurse, social service counselor, psychologist, pharmacist,
licensed or certified child care providers or their employees, employee
of the department, juvenile probation officer, placement and liaison
specialist, responsible living skills program staff, HOPE center staff,
or state family and children's ombudsman or any volunteer in the
ombudsman's office has reasonable cause to believe that a child has
suffered abuse or neglect, he or she shall report such incident, or
cause a report to be made, to the proper law enforcement agency or to
the department as provided in RCW 26.44.040.
(b)(i) When any person who is an employee or regular-service
volunteer of a nonprofit entity as defined in RCW 84.36.800 has
reasonable cause to believe that a child has suffered abuse or neglect,
and the alleged perpetrator is an employee, contractor, or regular-service or occasional-service volunteer of the same nonprofit entity,
he or she shall report such incident, or cause a report to be made, to
the proper law enforcement agency or to the department as provided in
RCW 26.44.040.
(ii) Nothing in this subsection (1)(b) shall limit a person's duty
to report under (a) of this subsection.
(c) The reporting requirement also applies to department of
corrections personnel who, in the course of their employment, observe
offenders or the children with whom the offenders are in contact. If,
as a result of observations or information received in the course of
his or her employment, any department of corrections personnel has
reasonable cause to believe that a child has suffered abuse or neglect,
he or she shall report the incident, or cause a report to be made, to
the proper law enforcement agency or to the department as provided in
RCW 26.44.040.
(((c))) (d) The reporting requirement shall also apply to any adult
who has reasonable cause to believe that a child who resides with them,
has suffered severe abuse, and is able or capable of making a report.
For the purposes of this subsection, "severe abuse" means any of the
following: Any single act of abuse that causes physical trauma of
sufficient severity that, if left untreated, could cause death; any
single act of sexual abuse that causes significant bleeding, deep
bruising, or significant external or internal swelling; or more than
one act of physical abuse, each of which causes bleeding, deep
bruising, significant external or internal swelling, bone fracture, or
unconsciousness.
(((d))) (e) The report must be made at the first opportunity, but
in no case longer than forty-eight hours after there is reasonable
cause to believe that the child has suffered abuse or neglect. The
report must include the identity of the accused if known.
(2)(a) The reporting requirement of subsection (1) of this section
does not apply to a member of the clergy with regard to information
obtained by the member of the clergy in his or her professional
character as a religious or spiritual advisor when the information is
obtained solely as a result of a confession made pursuant to the
clergy-penitent privilege as provided in RCW 5.60.060(3), and the
member of the clergy is authorized to hear such confession, and has a
duty under the discipline, tenets, doctrine, or custom of his or her
church, religious denomination, religious body, spiritual community, or
sect to keep the confession secret. The privilege shall not apply, and
the member of the clergy shall report child abuse or neglect pursuant
to this section, if the member of the clergy has received the
information from any source other than from a confession.
(b) Nothing in this subsection shall exempt a member of the clergy
from making a report of child abuse or neglect as required in
subsection (1) of this section when the member of the clergy is acting
in some other capacity that would otherwise require him or her to make
a report.
(3) The reporting requirement of subsection (1) of this section
does not apply to the discovery of abuse or neglect that occurred
during childhood if it is discovered after the child has become an
adult. However, if there is reasonable cause to believe other children
are or may be at risk of abuse or neglect by the accused, the reporting
requirement of subsection (1) of this section does apply.
(((3))) (4) Any other person who has reasonable cause to believe
that a child has suffered abuse or neglect may report such incident to
the proper law enforcement agency or to the department of social and
health services as provided in RCW 26.44.040.
(((4))) (5) The department, upon receiving a report of an incident
of alleged abuse or neglect pursuant to this chapter, involving a child
who has died or has had physical injury or injuries inflicted upon him
or her other than by accidental means or who has been subjected to
alleged sexual abuse, shall report such incident to the proper law
enforcement agency. In emergency cases, where the child's welfare is
endangered, the department shall notify the proper law enforcement
agency within twenty-four hours after a report is received by the
department. In all other cases, the department shall notify the law
enforcement agency within seventy-two hours after a report is received
by the department. If the department makes an oral report, a written
report must also be made to the proper law enforcement agency within
five days thereafter.
(((5))) (6) Any law enforcement agency receiving a report of an
incident of alleged abuse or neglect pursuant to this chapter,
involving a child who has died or has had physical injury or injuries
inflicted upon him or her other than by accidental means, or who has
been subjected to alleged sexual abuse, shall report such incident in
writing as provided in RCW 26.44.040 to the proper county prosecutor or
city attorney for appropriate action whenever the law enforcement
agency's investigation reveals that a crime may have been committed.
The law enforcement agency shall also notify the department of all
reports received and the law enforcement agency's disposition of them.
In emergency cases, where the child's welfare is endangered, the law
enforcement agency shall notify the department within twenty-four
hours. In all other cases, the law enforcement agency shall notify the
department within seventy-two hours after a report is received by the
law enforcement agency.
(((6))) (7) Any county prosecutor or city attorney receiving a
report under subsection (((5))) (6) of this section shall notify the
victim, any persons the victim requests, and the local office of the
department, of the decision to charge or decline to charge a crime,
within five days of making the decision.
(((7))) (8) The department may conduct ongoing case planning and
consultation with those persons or agencies required to report under
this section, with consultants designated by the department, and with
designated representatives of Washington Indian tribes if the client
information exchanged is pertinent to cases currently receiving child
protective services. Upon request, the department shall conduct such
planning and consultation with those persons required to report under
this section if the department determines it is in the best interests
of the child. Information considered privileged by statute and not
directly related to reports required by this section must not be
divulged without a valid written waiver of the privilege.
(((8))) (9) Any case referred to the department by a physician
licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW on the basis of an expert
medical opinion that child abuse, neglect, or sexual assault has
occurred and that the child's safety will be seriously endangered if
returned home, the department shall file a dependency petition unless
a second licensed physician of the parents' choice believes that such
expert medical opinion is incorrect. If the parents fail to designate
a second physician, the department may make the selection. If a
physician finds that a child has suffered abuse or neglect but that
such abuse or neglect does not constitute imminent danger to the
child's health or safety, and the department agrees with the
physician's assessment, the child may be left in the parents' home
while the department proceeds with reasonable efforts to remedy
parenting deficiencies.
(((9))) (10) Persons or agencies exchanging information under
subsection (((7))) (8) of this section shall not further disseminate or
release the information except as authorized by state or federal
statute. Violation of this subsection is a misdemeanor.
(((10))) (11) Upon receiving reports of alleged abuse or neglect,
the department or law enforcement agency may interview children. The
interviews may be conducted on school premises, at day-care facilities,
at the child's home, or at other suitable locations outside of the
presence of parents. Parental notification of the interview must occur
at the earliest possible point in the investigation that will not
jeopardize the safety or protection of the child or the course of the
investigation. Prior to commencing the interview the department or law
enforcement agency shall determine whether the child wishes a third
party to be present for the interview and, if so, shall make reasonable
efforts to accommodate the child's wishes. Unless the child objects,
the department or law enforcement agency shall make reasonable efforts
to include a third party in any interview so long as the presence of
the third party will not jeopardize the course of the investigation.
(((11))) (12) Upon receiving a report of alleged child abuse and
neglect, the department or investigating law enforcement agency shall
have access to all relevant records of the child in the possession of
mandated reporters and their employees.
(((12))) (13) The department shall maintain investigation records
and conduct timely and periodic reviews of all cases constituting abuse
and neglect. The department shall maintain a log of screened-out
nonabusive cases.
(((13))) (14) The department shall use a risk assessment process
when investigating alleged child abuse and neglect referrals. The
department shall present the risk factors at all hearings in which the
placement of a dependent child is an issue. Substance abuse must be a
risk factor. The department shall, within funds appropriated for this
purpose, offer enhanced community-based services to persons who are
determined not to require further state intervention.
(((14))) (15) Upon receipt of a report of alleged abuse or neglect
the law enforcement agency may arrange to interview the person making
the report and any collateral sources to determine if any malice is
involved in the reporting.
(((15))) (16) The department shall make reasonable efforts to learn
the name, address, and telephone number of each person making a report
of abuse or neglect under this section. The department shall provide
assurances of appropriate confidentiality of the identification of
persons reporting under this section. If the department is unable to
learn the information required under this subsection, the department
shall only investigate cases in which: (a) The department believes
there is a serious threat of substantial harm to the child; (b) the
report indicates conduct involving a criminal offense that has, or is
about to occur, in which the child is the victim; or (c) the department
has, after investigation, a report of abuse or neglect that has been
founded with regard to a member of the household within three years of
receipt of the referral.
(17) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Volunteer" means any person who, of his or her own free will,
provides goods or services without any financial gain to any agency,
instrumentality, political subdivision, or school district of the state
of Washington;
(b) "Occasional-service volunteer" means any person who provides a
one-time or occasional volunteer service; and
(c) "Regular-service volunteer" means any person engaged in
specific volunteer service activities on an ongoing or continuing
basis.

--- END ---