BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the
governing body of a public facilities district created after July 1,
2006, but before June 30, 2008, under chapter 35.57 or 36.100 RCW that
commences construction of a new regional center to be used for
community events, and artistic, musical, theatrical, or other cultural
exhibitions, presentations, or performances and having two thousand or
fewer permanent seats, or improvement or rehabilitation of an existing
regional center to be used for community events, and artistic, musical,
theatrical, or other cultural exhibitions, presentations, or
performances and having two thousand or fewer permanent seats, before
January 1, 2009, may impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the
terms of this chapter, provided the public facilities district is
located in a county with a population in excess of seven hundred
thousand. The tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by law and
shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state
under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable
event within the public facilities district. The rate of tax shall not
exceed 0.033 percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or
value of the article used in the case of a use tax.
(2) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be
deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or
paid over to the department of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12
RCW. The department of revenue shall perform the collection of the
taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the public facilities
district.
(3) No tax may be collected under this section before September 1,
2006. The tax imposed in this section expires on the earlier of: (a)
The date when the bonds issued for the construction of the cultural
center and related parking facilities are retired; (b) twenty years
after the tax is first collected; or (c) the date when the cumulative
total of taxes collected has exceeded eighteen million dollars.
(4) Money collected under this section shall only be used for the
purposes set forth in subsection (1) of this section and must be
matched with an amount from other public or private sources equal to
thirty-three percent of the amount collected under this section,
provided that amounts generated from nonvoter approved taxes authorized
under chapter 35.57 RCW or nonvoter approved taxes authorized under
chapter 36.100 RCW shall not constitute a public or private source.
For the purpose of this section, public or private sources include, but
are not limited to, cash or in-kind contributions used in all phases of
the development or improvement of the regional center, land that is
donated and used for the siting of the regional center, cash or in-kind
contributions from public or private foundations, or amounts attributed
to private sector partners as part of a public and private partnership
agreement negotiated by the public facilities district.
(5) The combined total tax rate levied under this section shall not
be greater than 0.033 percent. If both a public facilities district
created under chapter 35.57 RCW and a public facilities district
created under chapter 36.100 RCW impose a tax under this section, the
tax imposed by a public facilities district created under chapter 35.57
RCW shall be credited against the tax imposed by a public facilities
district created under chapter 36.100 RCW.
(6) A public facilities district created under chapter 36.100 RCW
is not eligible to impose the tax under this section if the legislative
authority of the county where the public facilities district is located
has imposed a sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.0485 or 82.14.0494.

--- END ---