BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 5.44.130 and Code 1881 s 434 are each amended to read
as follows:
A seal of court or public office, when required to any writ,
process, or proceeding to authenticate a copy of any record or
document, may be affixed by making an inked, printed, or embossed
impression directly on the ((paper which)) document and shall be ((as))
considered valid ((as if made upon a wafer or on wax)).

Sec. 2 RCW 5.52.050 and Code 1881 s 2356 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as ((hereinbefore)) otherwise provided in this chapter, any
instrument in writing, duly certified, under his or her hand and
official seal, by a notary public, commissioner of deeds, or clerk of
a court of record, to be genuine, within the personal knowledge of such
officer, may, together with such certificate, be sent by telegraph or
other electronic transmission and the telegraphic or other electronic
transmission copy thereof shall, prima facie, only have the same force,
effect and validity, in all respects whatsoever as the original, and
the burden of proof shall rest with the party denying the genuineness,
or due execution of the original.

--- END ---