BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act shall be known and cited as "the
Saul Gallegos Peace Officer Survival Act of 2005."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 10.93 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that since 1855, two hundred fifty-four law
enforcement officers, "heroes of the badge," in Washington state have
given their lives in the line of duty. The number of law enforcement
officers killed or harmed in the line of duty both here and around the
country is unacceptable. Many of these deaths and injuries result from
criminal suspects using the officers' own weapons against them. Most
of these incidents involve rapidly evolving situations, close quarters,
and hardened, high-risk subjects. If an aggressor attempts to strip an
officer of his or her weapon it should be considered a deadly force
issue and dealt with accordingly.
Promoting officer safety is an essential component in preserving
the thin blue line that protects law-abiding citizens from the criminal
element in society. One of the most important aspects of advancing
officer safety is ensuring officer expertise in maintaining possession
and control of their weapons and disarming their attackers.
Comprehensive training in weapon retention and survival techniques is
a necessary and critical element in preserving the well-being and lives
of law enforcement officers, and will reduce the number of officers
killed or injured with their own weapons.
Deputy Saul Gallegos of the Chelan County Sheriff's Department was
recently killed by his attackers with his own service weapon while in
the line of duty defending the public peace. The legislature intends
by this act to provide adequate funding for Washington state peace
officers to receive the training necessary for officers to achieve and
maintain expertise in weapon retention and survival techniques.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of one million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2006, from the general fund to the criminal justice training
commission for the sole purpose of providing Washington peace officers
comprehensive training in weapon retention and survival techniques,
including techniques for defending against assailants trying to disarm
an officer's drawn gun and for regaining control if disarmed.

--- END ---