BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The people of Washington state adopted the
cleanup priority act as Initiative 297 in November 2004, with the
highest vote count ever received for passage of a ballot initiative in
Washington state. The legislature finds that the intent of Initiative
297 is clearly stated in the intent and policy sections of the cleanup
priority act as passed by the voters. The cleanup priority act makes
the cleanup of contamination the top priority at sites with hazardous
or mixed waste contamination that threatens our rivers, ground water,
environment, and health. Consistent with that priority, the
legislature finds that adding more wastes to sites with mixed
radioactive and hazardous wastes where there have been releases into
the environment detracts from cleanup, and from the work needed to
bring wastes into compliance. The cleanup priority act should be
interpreted by the courts consistent with the clear intent of the
voters, and the findings and clarifications in this act.
The legislature further finds that nothing in the cleanup priority
act is intended to, or has the effect of, preventing the movement of
waste from one facility or unit within a site to another as part of an
approved cleanup order, agreement, or plan, or pursuant to permits.
Given claims made by the federal government in challenging the cleanup
priority act, the legislature finds that, the intent of the voters
being clear, it is desirable to clarify that the language of the
cleanup priority act should be interpreted consistent with voter
intent. Because the term facility is used in different ways in
different statutes and rules, the legislature finds that it is
desirable to clarify that the cleanup priority act does not prevent the
movement or transfer of waste within a site to accomplish cleanup of
the site. The legislature finds that the cleanup priority act does not
increase the universe of substances that are subject to regulation by
the state as hazardous or mixed wastes. The legislature finds that the
cleanup priority act does not regulate radioactive materials, medical
isotopes, other radioactive substances, or facilities exclusively
regulated by the United States pursuant to the federal atomic energy
act 42 U.S.C. Sec. 2011 et seq.
The legislature further finds that congress has clearly granted the
state the authority to adopt and enforce the cleanup priority act and
this act, under the federal facilities compliance act and federal
resource recovery and conservation act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 6901 et seq.
The cleanup priority act is intended to be consistent with limitations
of the federal superfund law, the comprehensive environmental response,
compensation and liability act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9601 et seq., relating
to the inappropriateness of adding more waste to sites with spreading
contamination and where hazardous wastes create risks of additional
release to the environment due to noncompliance with applicable
standards.
Court challenges have raised possible interpretations of the
cleanup priority act that the legislature finds are not consistent with
the clear intent. It is in the interest of the state to clarify as
quickly as possible that the cleanup priority act does not impact any
business operation, or federal or private facility, that was not
intended to be impacted by the cleanup priority act. Consistent with
the intent of the voters, the legislature finds and directs that the
courts shall interpret this act consistent with this finding; that the
universe of regulated hazardous or dangerous wastes was not expanded by
the passage of the cleanup priority act. Because court action has
prevented the normal role of the department of ecology from issuing
defining or interpretive rules, the legislature finds that adoption of
the amendments to the cleanup priority act will ensure that the intent
of the cleanup priority act is understood and clarified for the courts
as well as for businesses or cleanup operations without delay.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.105E.030 and 2005 c 1 s 3 (Initiative Measure No.
297) are each amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Dangerous waste" has the same meaning as the term is defined
in RCW 70.105.010.
(2) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(3) "Dispose" or "disposal" have the same meanings as the terms are
defined in RCW 70.105.010.
(4) "Facility" has the same meaning as the term is defined in RCW
70.105.010.
(5) "Hanford" means the geographic area comprising the Hanford
nuclear reservation, owned and operated by the United States department
of energy, or any successor federal agency.
(6) "Hazardous substance" has the same meaning as the term is
defined in RCW 70.105D.020.
(7) "Hazardous waste" means and includes all dangerous and
extremely hazardous waste, as those terms are defined in RCW
70.105.010.
(8) "Local government" means a city, town, or county.
(9) "Mixed waste" or "mixed radioactive and hazardous waste" means
any ((hazardous substance or)) dangerous or extremely hazardous waste
that contains both a nonradioactive hazardous component and a
radioactive component, ((including)) and any ((such)) hazardous
substances, as defined by RCW 70.105D.020 that contain both a
nonradioactive and radioactive hazardous component, that have been
released to the environment, or are discarded solid wastes found by the
department to pose a threat of future release, in a manner that may
expose persons or the environment to either the nonradioactive or
radioactive hazardous substances. Materials, useful products, or
substances, including medical isotopes and materials used to produce
medical or industrial isotopes, that are not otherwise regulated as
hazardous or mixed waste under chapter 70.105 RCW or the federal
hazardous waste law (RCRA 42 U.S.C. Sec. 6901, et seq.) are not
hazardous, dangerous, or mixed waste under this chapter. Mixed wastes
or mixed waste facility does not include radioactive materials or
facilities regulated exclusively by the federal government under the
federal atomic energy act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 2011 et seq.
(10) "Mixed waste surcharge" means an additional charge for the
purposes of local government and public participation in decisions
relating to mixed waste facilities((:)) to be added to the service
charge assessed under RCW 70.105.280 against those facilities that
store, treat, incinerate, or dispose of mixed wastes((;)), or against
facilities at which mixed wastes have been released((,)) or which are
undergoing closure pursuant to chapter 70.105 RCW or remedial action
pursuant to chapter 70.105D RCW. The mixed waste surcharge shall be
assessed based on the need to meet the specified purposes of this
chapter. Assessments shall not be based on budgets for a facility or
site owned or operated by a public agency where such funding, or
portion thereof, is not appropriated.
(11) "Person" has the same meaning as the term is defined in RCW
70.105D.020.
(12) "Release" has the same meaning as the term is defined in RCW
70.105D.020.
(13) "Remedy or remedial action" have the same meanings as the
terms are defined in RCW 70.105D.020.
(14) "Site" means the contiguous geographic area under the same
ownership, lease, or operation where a facility is located, or where
there has been a release of hazardous substances. In the event of a
release of hazardous substances, "site" includes any area, or body of
surface or ground water, where a hazardous substance has been
deposited, stored, disposed of, placed, migrated to, or otherwise come
to be located.
(15) Unless otherwise defined, or the context indicates otherwise,
terms not defined in this section have the same meaning as defined in
chapter 70.105 RCW, when used in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.105E
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Nothing in this chapter prohibits mixed wastes generated on-site as part of a remedial or corrective action from being transferred
to, stored, treated, recycled, or disposed at a facility or unit within
the site subject to applicable permits, plans, agreements, consent
orders, or conditions of an approved remedy or corrective action under
the federal superfund law, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9601 et seq., chapter 70.105D
RCW, chapter 70.105 RCW, or the federal resource conservation and
recovery act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 6921 et seq.
(2) New land disposal facilities may be permitted by the department
to accomplish the closure, remediation, or cleanup of facilities or
units at a site subject to RCW 70.105E.040(6), if there are releases or
suspected releases of hazardous substances at the site that are not
investigated and being controlled under chapter 70.105 RCW, chapter
70.105D RCW, CERCLA 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9601 et seq., or RCRA 42 U.S.C. Sec.
6921 et seq. New facilities permitted under this subsection may only
have a disposal capacity that is necessary to accomplish the closure,
remediation, or cleanup at that site.
(3) This chapter does not regulate radioactive materials or
substances, or the safety of facilities storing or processing such
radioactive materials, where such radioactive materials or facilities
are regulated exclusively by the federal government pursuant to the
federal atomic energy act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 2011 et seq., absent explicit
delegation by congress to the state of such authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.105E
RCW to read as follows:
The voters passed this chapter intending to prevent the addition of
more hazardous or mixed wastes to mixed wastes sites with releases of
hazardous substances that are impacting the environment or pose a risk
to public health. The department must implement this policy using its
authority under the hazardous waste management act, chapter 70.105 RCW,
the model toxics control act, chapter 70.105D RCW, and the state
environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW. The department shall
adopt rules necessary to carry out this intent and this chapter. The
department, by rule, shall define the term "actual characterization" of
wastes to reflect appropriate statistically valid sampling protocols
for determining the composition and appropriate designation of wastes.
The department shall consider local government and public participation
essential to its permitting and closure activities under chapter 70.105
RCW and this chapter, and, consistent with the intent of this chapter,
adopt rules to ensure that permittees or generators of hazardous
wastes, including mixed wastes, pay the appropriate costs for such
involvement. The department shall take into consideration whether such
permittees already pay a hazardous substance tax for such purpose under
chapter 70.105D RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---