BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.687 and 2003 c 353 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever a child who is less than sixteen years of age is being
transported in a motor vehicle that is in operation and that is
required by RCW 46.37.510 to be equipped with a safety belt system in
a passenger seating position, or is being transported in a neighborhood
electric vehicle that is in operation, the driver of the vehicle shall
keep the child properly restrained as follows:
(a) A child must be restrained in a child restraint system, if
((the child is less than six years old and/or sixty pounds and)) the
passenger seating position equipped with a safety belt system allows
sufficient space for installation, ((then the child will be restrained
in a)) until the child is eight years old, unless the child is four
feet nine inches or taller. The child restraint system ((that
complies)) must comply with standards of the United States department
of transportation and ((that is)) must be secured in the vehicle in
accordance with instructions of the ((manufacturer of)) vehicle
manufacturer and the child restraint system((;
(b) If the child is less than one year of age or weighs less than
twenty pounds, the child shall be properly restrained in a rear-facing
infant seat;
(c) If the child is more than one but less than four years of age
or weighs less than forty pounds but at least twenty pounds, the child
shall be properly restrained in a forward facing child safety seat
restraint system;
(d) If the child is less than six but at least four years of age or
weighs less than sixty pounds but at least forty pounds, the child
shall be properly restrained in a child booster seat;
(e) If the)) manufacturer.
(b) A child who is ((six)) eight years of age or older ((or weighs
more than sixty pounds, the child)) or four feet nine inches or taller
shall be properly restrained with the motor vehicle's safety belt
properly adjusted and fastened around the child's body or an
appropriately fitting ((booster seat; and)) child restraint system.
(c) The driver of a vehicle transporting a child who is under
thirteen years old shall transport the child in the back seat positions
in the vehicle where it is practical to do so.
(((f))) (2) Enforcement of (((a) through (e) of this)) subsection
(1) of this section is subject to a visual inspection by law
enforcement to determine if the child restraint system in use is
appropriate for the child's individual height, weight, and age. The
visual inspection for usage of a ((forward facing child safety seat))
child restraint system must ensure that ((the seat in use is equipped
with a four-point shoulder harness system. The visual inspection for
usage of a booster seat must ensure that the seat belt properly fits
across the child's lap and the shoulder strap crosses the center of the
child's chest. The visual inspection for the usage of a seat belt by
a child must ensure that the lap belt properly fits across the child's
lap and the shoulder strap crosses the center of the child's chest. In
determining violations, consideration to the above criteria must be
given in conjunction with the provisions of (a) through (e) of this
subsection)) the child restraint system is being used in accordance
with the instruction of the vehicle and the child restraint system
manufacturers. The driver of a vehicle transporting a child who is
under ((the age of six)) thirteen years old ((or weighs less than sixty
pounds, when the vehicle is equipped with a passenger side air bag
supplemental restraint system, and the air bag system is activated,))
shall transport the child in the back seat positions in the vehicle
where it is practical to do so.
(((2))) (3) A person violating subsection (1)(((a) through (e))) of
this section may be issued a notice of traffic infraction under chapter
46.63 RCW. If the person to whom the notice was issued presents proof
of acquisition of an approved child passenger restraint system or a
child booster seat, as appropriate, within seven days to the
jurisdiction issuing the notice and the person has not previously had
a violation of this section dismissed, the jurisdiction shall dismiss
the notice of traffic infraction.
(((3))) (4) Failure to comply with the requirements of this section
shall not constitute negligence by a parent or legal guardian((; nor
shall)). Failure to use a child restraint system shall not be
admissible as evidence of negligence in any civil action.
(((4))) (5) This section does not apply to: (a) For hire vehicles,
(b) vehicles designed to transport sixteen or less passengers,
including the driver, operated by auto transportation companies, as
defined in RCW 81.68.010, (c) vehicles providing customer shuttle
service between parking, convention, and hotel facilities, and airport
terminals, and (d) school buses.
(((5))) (6) As used in this section, "child ((booster seat))
restraint system" means a child passenger restraint system that meets
the Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards set forth in 49 C.F.R.
571.213 ((that is designed to elevate a child to properly sit in a
federally approved lap/shoulder belt system)).
(((6))) (7) The requirements of subsection (1)(((a) through (e)))
of this section do not apply in any seating position where there is
only a lap belt available and the child weighs more than forty pounds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
A person who has a current national certification as a child
passenger safety technician and who in good faith provides inspection,
adjustment, or educational services regarding child passenger restraint
systems is not liable for civil damages resulting from any act or
omission in providing the services, other than acts or omissions
constituting gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act takes effect June 1,
2007.

--- END ---