BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.92.151 and 2004 c 176 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section((,)):
(a) The sentence of a prisoner confined in a county jail facility
for a felony, gross misdemeanor, or misdemeanor conviction may be
reduced by earned release credits in accordance with procedures that
shall be developed and promulgated by the correctional agency having
jurisdiction. The earned ((early)) release time shall be for good
behavior and good performance as determined by the correctional agency
having jurisdiction. Any program established pursuant to this section
shall allow an offender to earn ((early)) release credits for
presentence incarceration. The correctional agency shall not credit
the offender with earned ((early)) release credits in advance of the
offender actually earning the credits.
(b) In the case of an offender convicted of a serious violent
offense or a sex offense that is a class A felony committed on or after
July 1, 1990, and before July 1, 2005, the aggregate earned early
release time may not exceed fifteen percent of the sentence. In the
case of an offender convicted of a serious violent offense, or a sex
offense that is a class A felony, committed on or after July 1, 2005,
the aggregate earned release time may not exceed ten percent of the
sentence.
(c) A correctional agency may adopt an earned release program that
exceeds one-third of the total sentence for those offenders who qualify
under (c)(i) and (ii) of this subsection. The aggregate earned release
time may not exceed fifty percent of the sentence. If the correctional
agency adopts an earned release program that exceeds one-third of the
total sentence, an offender is qualified to earn up to fifty percent of
aggregate earned release time under this subsection if he or she:
(i) Is not confined pursuant to a sentence for:
(A) A sex offense;
(B) A violent offense;
(C) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(D) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020;
(E) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(F) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(G) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor);
and
(ii) Has no prior conviction for:
(A) A sex offense;
(B) A violent offense;
(C) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(D) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020;
(E) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(F) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(G) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor).
(d) The facility shall recalculate the earned release time and
reschedule the expected release dates for each qualified offender under
(c) of this subsection.
(e) (c) of this subsection applies retroactively to eligible
offenders serving terms of total confinement in a city or county
facility as of the effective date of this section.
(f) In no other case may the aggregate earned ((early)) release
time exceed one-third of the total sentence.
(2) An offender serving a term of confinement imposed under RCW
9.94A.670(4)(a) is not eligible for earned release credits under this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9.92 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature declares that the changes to the maximum
percentages of earned release time in RCW 9.92.151 do not create any
expectation that the percentage of earned release time cannot be
revised and offenders have no reason to conclude that the maximum
percentage of earned release time is an entitlement or creates any
liberty interest. The legislature retains full control over the right
to revise the maximum percentages of earned release time available to
offenders at any time. This section applies to persons convicted on or
after the effective date of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.48.210 and 1990 c 3 s 203 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All cities and counties are authorized to establish and
maintain farms, camps, and work release programs and facilities, as
well as special detention facilities. The facilities shall meet the
requirements of this chapter ((70.48 RCW)) and any rules adopted
thereunder.
(2) Farms and camps may be established either inside or outside the
territorial limits of a city or county. A sentence of confinement in
a city or county jail may include placement in a farm or camp. Unless
directed otherwise by court order, the chief law enforcement officer or
department of corrections, may transfer the prisoner to a farm or camp.
The sentencing court, chief law enforcement officer, or department of
corrections may not transfer to a farm or camp a greater number of
prisoners than can be furnished with constructive employment and can be
reasonably accommodated.
(3) The city or county may establish a city or county work release
program and housing facilities for the prisoners in the program. In
such regard, factors such as employment conditions and the condition of
jail facilities should be considered. When a work release program is
established the following provisions apply:
(a) A person convicted of a felony and placed in a city or county
jail is eligible for the work release program. A person sentenced to
a city or county jail is eligible for the work release program. The
program may be used as a condition of probation for a criminal offense.
Good conduct is a condition of participation in the program.
(b) The court may permit a person who is currently, regularly
employed to continue his or her employment. The chief law enforcement
officer or department of corrections shall make all necessary
arrangements if possible. The court may authorize the person to seek
suitable employment and may authorize the chief law enforcement officer
or department of corrections to make reasonable efforts to find
suitable employment for the person. A person participating in the work
release program may not work in an establishment where there is a labor
dispute.
(c) The work release prisoner shall be confined in a work release
facility or jail unless authorized to be absent from the facility for
program-related purposes, unless the court directs otherwise.
(d) Each work release prisoner's earnings may be collected by the
chief law enforcement officer or a designee. The chief law enforcement
officer or a designee may deduct from the earnings moneys for the
payments for the prisoner's board, personal expenses inside and outside
the jail, a share of the administrative expenses of this section,
court-ordered victim compensation, and court-ordered restitution.
Support payments for the prisoner's dependents, if any, shall be made
as directed by the court. With the prisoner's consent, the remaining
funds may be used to pay the prisoner's preexisting debts. Any
remaining balance shall be returned to the prisoner.
(e) The prisoner's sentence may be reduced by earned ((early))
release time in accordance with procedures that shall be developed and
promulgated by the work release facility. The earned ((early)) release
time shall be for good behavior and good performance as determined by
the facility. The facility shall not credit the offender with earned
((early)) release credits in advance of the offender actually earning
the credits.
(i) In the case of an offender convicted of a serious violent
offense or a sex offense that is a class A felony committed on or after
July 1, 1990, and before July 1, 2005, the aggregate earned ((early))
release time may not exceed fifteen percent of the sentence. In the
case of an offender convicted of a serious violent offense, or a sex
offense that is a class A felony, committed on or after July 1, 2005,
the aggregate earned release time may not exceed ten percent of the
sentence.
(ii) A correctional agency may adopt an earned release program that
exceeds one-third of the total sentence for those offenders who qualify
under (e)(ii)(A) and (B) of this subsection. The aggregate earned
release time may not exceed fifty percent of the sentence. If the
correctional agency adopts an earned release program that exceeds one-third of the total sentence, an offender is qualified to earn up to
fifty percent of aggregate earned release time under this subsection
(3)(e)(ii) if he or she:
(A) Is not confined pursuant to a sentence for:
(I) A sex offense;
(II) A violent offense;
(III) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(IV) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW
10.99.020;
(V) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(VI) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(VII) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor);
and
(B) Has no prior conviction for:
(I) A sex offense;
(II) A violent offense;
(III) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(IV) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW
10.99.020;
(V) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(VI) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(VII) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor).
(iii) The facility shall recalculate the earned release time and
reschedule the expected release dates for each qualified offender under
(e)(ii) of this subsection.
(iv) (e)(ii) of this subsection applies retroactively to eligible
offenders serving terms of total confinement in a city or county
facility as of the effective date of this section.
(v) In no other case may the aggregate earned ((early)) release
time exceed one-third of the total sentence.
(f) If the work release prisoner violates the conditions of custody
or employment, the prisoner shall be returned to the sentencing court.
The sentencing court may require the prisoner to spend the remainder of
the sentence in actual confinement and may cancel any earned reduction
of the sentence.
(4) A special detention facility may be operated by a
noncorrectional agency or by noncorrectional personnel by contract with
the governing unit. The employees shall meet the standards of training
and education established by the criminal justice training commission
as authorized by RCW 43.101.080. The special detention facility may
use combinations of features including, but not limited to, low-security or honor prisoner status, work farm, work release, community
review, prisoner facility maintenance and food preparation, training
programs, or alcohol or drug rehabilitation programs. Special
detention facilities may establish a reasonable fee schedule to cover
the cost of facility housing and programs. The schedule shall be on a
sliding basis that reflects the person's ability to pay.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.48 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature declares that the changes to the maximum
percentages of earned release time in RCW 70.48.210 do not create any
expectation that the percentage of earned release time cannot be
revised and offenders have no reason to conclude that the maximum
percentage of earned release time is an entitlement or creates any
liberty interest. The legislature retains full control over the right
to revise the maximum percentages of earned release time available to
offenders at any time. This section applies to person convicted on or
after the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 and 3 of this act expire July 1,
2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---