BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The homeowners' association act
committee is created. The purpose of the committee is to review the
homeowners' association act, chapter 64.38 RCW, the uniform common
interest ownership act, and current issues concerning homeowners'
associations as defined in RCW 64.38.010 including, without limitation,
the method and manner of amending restrictive covenants, voting,
communications between homeowners' association boards and association
members, the budget ratification process, and potential conflicts
between the homeowners' association act and other laws that may be
applicable to the organizational form of the association.
(2) The committee shall consist of the following ten members:
(a) Two members of the senate appointed by the president of the
senate, one of the majority party and one of the minority party;
(b) Two members of the house of representatives appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives, one of the majority party and
one of the minority party; and
(c) The following six members appointed by the governor:
(i) A representative of the Washington state chapter of the
community associations institute;
(ii) A representative of the Washington homeowners' coalition;
(iii) A representative of the residential development industry;
(iv) A lawyer experienced in representing the interests of
homeowners' associations in their dealings with homeowners;
(v) A lawyer experienced in representing the interests of
homeowners in their dealings with the boards of homeowners'
associations; and
(vi) A person, who shall serve as the chair of the committee, who
has expertise in homeowners' association law.
(3) Legislative members of the committee shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(4) The committee shall examine the issues referenced in subsection
(1) of this section and whether any changes should be made to the
homeowners' association act. The committee shall deliver a report of
its findings and conclusions and any proposed implementing legislation
to the appropriate committees of the senate and house of
representatives not later than December 31, 2005.

--- END ---