BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.79.240 and 2003 c 258 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In the context of the definition of registered nursing practice
and advanced registered nursing practice, this chapter shall not be
construed as:
(a) Prohibiting the incidental care of the sick by domestic
servants or persons primarily employed as housekeepers, so long as they
do not practice registered nursing within the meaning of this chapter;
(b) Preventing a person from the domestic administration of family
remedies or the furnishing of nursing assistance in case of emergency;
(c) Prohibiting the practice of nursing by students enrolled in
approved schools as may be incidental to their course of study or
prohibiting the students from working as nursing technicians;
(d) Prohibiting auxiliary services provided by persons carrying out
duties necessary for the support of nursing services, including those
duties that involve minor nursing services for persons performed in
hospitals, nursing homes, or elsewhere under the direction of licensed
physicians or the supervision of licensed registered nurses;
(e) Prohibiting the practice of nursing in this state by a legally
qualified nurse of another state or territory whose engagement requires
him or her to accompany and care for a patient temporarily residing in
this state during the period of one such engagement, not to exceed six
months in length, if the person does not represent or hold himself or
herself out as a registered nurse licensed to practice in this state;
(f) Prohibiting nursing or care of the sick, with or without
compensation, when done in connection with the practice of the
religious tenets of a church by adherents of the church so long as they
do not engage in the practice of nursing as defined in this chapter;
(g) Prohibiting the practice of a legally qualified nurse of
another state who is employed by the United States government or a
bureau, division, or agency thereof, while in the discharge of his or
her official duties;
(h) Permitting the measurement of the powers or range of human
vision, or the determination of the accommodation and refractive state
of the human eye or the scope of its functions in general, or the
fitting or adaptation of lenses for the aid thereof;
(i) Permitting the prescribing or directing the use of, or using,
an optical device in connection with ocular exercises, visual training,
vision training, or orthoptics;
(j) Permitting the prescribing of contact lenses for, or the
fitting and adaptation of contact lenses to, the human eye;
(k) Prohibiting the performance of routine visual screening;
(l) Permitting the practice of dentistry or dental hygiene as
defined in chapters 18.32 and 18.29 RCW, respectively;
(m) Permitting the practice of chiropractic as defined in chapter
18.25 RCW including the adjustment or manipulation of the articulation
of the spine;
(n) Permitting the practice of podiatric medicine and surgery as
defined in chapter 18.22 RCW;
(o) Permitting the performance of major surgery, except such minor
surgery as the commission may have specifically authorized by rule
adopted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW;
(p) Permitting the prescribing of controlled substances as defined
in Schedule((s)) I ((through IV)) of the Uniform Controlled Substances
Act, chapter 69.50 RCW((, except as provided in (r) or (s) of this
subsection));
(q) Prohibiting the determination and pronouncement of death;
(r) Prohibiting advanced registered nurse practitioners, approved
by the commission as certified registered nurse anesthetists from
selecting, ordering, or administering controlled substances as defined
in Schedules II through IV of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act,
chapter 69.50 RCW, consistent with their commission-recognized scope of
practice; subject to facility-specific protocols, and subject to a
request for certified registered nurse anesthetist anesthesia services
issued by a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, an osteopathic
physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, a dentist
licensed under chapter 18.32 RCW, or a podiatric physician and surgeon
licensed under chapter 18.22 RCW; the authority to select, order, or
administer Schedule II through IV controlled substances being limited
to those drugs that are to be directly administered to patients who
require anesthesia for diagnostic, operative, obstetrical, or
therapeutic procedures in a hospital, clinic, ambulatory surgical
facility, or the office of a practitioner licensed under chapter 18.71,
18.22, 18.36, 18.36A, 18.57, 18.57A, or 18.32 RCW; "select" meaning the
decision-making process of choosing a drug, dosage, route, and time of
administration; and "order" meaning the process of directing licensed
individuals pursuant to their statutory authority to directly
administer a drug or to dispense, deliver, or distribute a drug for the
purpose of direct administration to a patient, under instructions of
the certified registered nurse anesthetist. "Protocol" means a
statement regarding practice and documentation concerning such items as
categories of patients, categories of medications, or categories of
procedures rather than detailed case-specific formulas for the practice
of nurse anesthesia;
(s) Prohibiting advanced registered nurse practitioners from
ordering or prescribing controlled substances as defined in Schedules
II through IV of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, chapter 69.50
RCW, if and to the extent((: (i))) that doing so is permitted by their
scope of practice((; (ii) it is in response to a combined request from
one or more physicians licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW and an
advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under this chapter,
proposing a joint practice arrangement under which such prescriptive
authority will be exercised with appropriate collaboration between the
practitioners; and (iii) it is consistent with rules adopted under this
subsection. The medical quality assurance commission, the board of
osteopathic medicine and surgery, and the commission are directed to
jointly adopt by consensus by rule a process and criteria that
implements the joint practice arrangements authorized under this
subsection. This subsection (1)(s) does not apply to certified
registered nurse anesthetists)).
(2) In the context of the definition of licensed practical nursing
practice, this chapter shall not be construed as:
(a) Prohibiting the incidental care of the sick by domestic
servants or persons primarily employed as housekeepers, so long as they
do not practice practical nursing within the meaning of this chapter;
(b) Preventing a person from the domestic administration of family
remedies or the furnishing of nursing assistance in case of emergency;
(c) Prohibiting the practice of practical nursing by students
enrolled in approved schools as may be incidental to their course of
study or prohibiting the students from working as nursing assistants;
(d) Prohibiting auxiliary services provided by persons carrying out
duties necessary for the support of nursing services, including those
duties that involve minor nursing services for persons performed in
hospitals, nursing homes, or elsewhere under the direction of licensed
physicians or the supervision of licensed registered nurses;
(e) Prohibiting or preventing the practice of nursing in this state
by a legally qualified nurse of another state or territory whose
engagement requires him or her to accompany and care for a patient
temporarily residing in this state during the period of one such
engagement, not to exceed six months in length, if the person does not
represent or hold himself or herself out as a licensed practical nurse
licensed to practice in this state;
(f) Prohibiting nursing or care of the sick, with or without
compensation, when done in connection with the practice of the
religious tenets of a church by adherents of the church so long as they
do not engage in licensed practical nurse practice as defined in this
chapter;
(g) Prohibiting the practice of a legally qualified nurse of
another state who is employed by the United States government or any
bureau, division, or agency thereof, while in the discharge of his or
her official duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 18.57.280 (Joint practice arrangements) and 2000 c 64 s 6;
(2) RCW 18.71.370 (Joint practice arrangements) and 2000 c 64 s 5;
and
(3) RCW 18.79.320 (Joint practice arrangements) and 2000 c 64 s 7.

--- END ---