BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that whenever
possible, children should remain in the home of their parents. It is
only when the safety of the child is a concern that the child should be
removed from the home.
The legislature finds that the safety of a child is put in jeopardy
when a child is subject to chronic neglect. The legislature recognizes
that chronic neglect may be more dangerous to a child than physical or
sexual abuse, and must be treated as such by those charged with the
protection of children in this state.
It is the intent of the legislature that the department of social
and health services be permitted to intervene in cases of chronic
neglect where the well-being of the child is at risk. One incident of
neglect may not rise to the level requiring state intervention;
however, a pattern of neglect has been shown to cause damage to the
health and well-being of the child subject to the neglect.
It is the intent of the legislature that when chronic neglect has
been found to exist in a family, the legal system reinforce the need
for the parent to engage in services that will decrease the likelihood
of future neglect. However, if the parents fail to comply with the
necessary services, the state must intervene to protect the children
who are at risk.

Sec. 2 RCW 13.34.138 and 2003 c 227 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except for children whose cases are reviewed by a citizen
review board under chapter 13.70 RCW, the status of all children found
to be dependent shall be reviewed by the court at least every six
months from the beginning date of the placement episode or the date
dependency is established, whichever is first, at a hearing in which it
shall be determined whether court supervision should continue. The
initial review hearing shall be an in-court review and shall be set six
months from the beginning date of the placement episode or no more than
ninety days from the entry of the disposition order, whichever comes
first. The initial review hearing may be a permanency planning hearing
when necessary to meet the time frames set forth in RCW 13.34.145(3) or
13.34.134. The review shall include findings regarding the agency and
parental completion of disposition plan requirements, and if necessary,
revised permanency time limits. This review shall consider both the
agency's and parent's efforts that demonstrate consistent measurable
progress over time in meeting the disposition plan requirements. The
requirements for the initial review hearing, including the in-court
requirement, shall be accomplished within existing resources. The
supervising agency shall provide a foster parent, preadoptive parent,
or relative with notice of, and their right to an opportunity to be
heard in, a review hearing pertaining to the child, but only if that
person is currently providing care to that child at the time of the
hearing. This section shall not be construed to grant party status to
any person who has been provided an opportunity to be heard.
(a) A child shall not be returned home at the review hearing unless
the court finds that a reason for removal as set forth in RCW 13.34.130
no longer exists. The parents, guardian, or legal custodian shall
report to the court the efforts they have made to correct the
conditions which led to removal. If a child is returned, casework
supervision shall continue for a period of six months, at which time
there shall be a hearing on the need for continued intervention.
(b) If the child is not returned home, the court shall establish in
writing:
(i) Whether reasonable services have been provided to or offered to
the parties to facilitate reunion, specifying the services provided or
offered;
(ii) Whether the child has been placed in the least-restrictive
setting appropriate to the child's needs, including whether
consideration and preference has been given to placement with the
child's relatives;
(iii) Whether there is a continuing need for placement and whether
the placement is appropriate;
(iv) Whether there has been compliance with the case plan by the
child, the child's parents, and the agency supervising the placement;
(v) Whether progress has been made toward correcting the problems
that necessitated the child's placement in out-of-home care;
(vi) Whether the parents have visited the child and any reasons why
visitation has not occurred or has been infrequent;
(vii) Whether additional services, including housing assistance,
are needed to facilitate the return of the child to the child's
parents; if so, the court shall order that reasonable services be
offered specifying such services; and
(viii) The projected date by which the child will be returned home
or other permanent plan of care will be implemented.
(c) The court at the review hearing may order that a petition
seeking termination of the parent and child relationship be filed.
(2)(a) In any case in which the court orders that a dependent child
may be returned to or remain in the child's home, the in-home placement
shall be contingent upon the following:
(i) The cooperation by the parents with the agency case plan;
(ii) The compliance of the parents with court orders related to the
care and supervision of the child; and
(iii) The continued participation of the parents in remedial
services.
(b) The following may be grounds for removal of the child from the
home, subject to review by the court:
(i) Noncompliance by the parents with the case plan or court order;
(ii) The parent's inability, unwillingness, or failure to
participate in services or treatment for themselves or the child; or
(iii) The failure of the parents to successfully and substantially
complete services or treatment for themselves or the child.
(3) The court's ability to order housing assistance under RCW
13.34.130 and this section is: (a) Limited to cases in which
homelessness or the lack of adequate and safe housing is the primary
reason for an out-of-home placement; and (b) subject to the
availability of funds appropriated for this specific purpose.
(((3))) (4) The court shall consider the child's relationship with
siblings in accordance with RCW 13.34.130(3).

Sec. 3 RCW 26.44.015 and 1999 c 176 s 28 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter shall not be construed to authorize interference
with child-raising practices, including reasonable parental discipline,
which are not injurious to the child's health, welfare, ((and)) or
safety.
(2) Nothing in this chapter may be used to prohibit the reasonable
use of corporal punishment as a means of discipline.
(3) No parent or guardian may be deemed abusive or neglectful
solely by reason of the parent's or child's blindness, deafness,
developmental disability, or other handicap.

Sec. 4 RCW 26.44.020 and 2000 c 162 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Court" means the superior court of the state of Washington,
juvenile department.
(2) "Law enforcement agency" means the police department, the
prosecuting attorney, the state patrol, the director of public safety,
or the office of the sheriff.
(3) "Practitioner of the healing arts" or "practitioner" means a
person licensed by this state to practice podiatric medicine and
surgery, optometry, chiropractic, nursing, dentistry, osteopathic
medicine and surgery, or medicine and surgery or to provide other
health services. The term "practitioner" includes a duly accredited
Christian Science practitioner: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That a person who
is being furnished Christian Science treatment by a duly accredited
Christian Science practitioner will not be considered, for that reason
alone, a neglected person for the purposes of this chapter.
(4) "Institution" means a private or public hospital or any other
facility providing medical diagnosis, treatment or care.
(5) "Department" means the state department of social and health
services.
(6) "Child" or "children" means any person under the age of
eighteen years of age.
(7) "Professional school personnel" include, but are not limited
to, teachers, counselors, administrators, child care facility
personnel, and school nurses.
(8) "Social service counselor" means anyone engaged in a
professional capacity during the regular course of employment in
encouraging or promoting the health, welfare, support or education of
children, or providing social services to adults or families, including
mental health, drug and alcohol treatment, and domestic violence
programs, whether in an individual capacity, or as an employee or agent
of any public or private organization or institution.
(9) "Psychologist" means any person licensed to practice psychology
under chapter 18.83 RCW, whether acting in an individual capacity or as
an employee or agent of any public or private organization or
institution.
(10) "Pharmacist" means any registered pharmacist under chapter
18.64 RCW, whether acting in an individual capacity or as an employee
or agent of any public or private organization or institution.
(11) "Clergy" means any regularly licensed or ordained minister,
priest, or rabbi of any church or religious denomination, whether
acting in an individual capacity or as an employee or agent of any
public or private organization or institution.
(12) "Abuse or neglect" means ((the injury,)) sexual abuse, sexual
exploitation, ((negligent treatment, or maltreatment)) or nonaccidental
injury of a child by any person under circumstances which ((indicate
that)) cause harm to the child's health, welfare, ((and)) or safety
((is harmed)), excluding conduct permitted under RCW 9A.16.100; or the
negligent treatment or maltreatment of a child by a person responsible
for or providing care to the child under circumstances which cause harm
to or present a substantial threat of harm to the child's health,
welfare, or safety. An abused child is a child who has been subjected
to child abuse or neglect as defined in this section.
(13) "Child protective services section" means the child protective
services section of the department.
(14) "Sexual exploitation" includes: (a) Allowing, permitting, or
encouraging a child to engage in prostitution by any person; or (b)
allowing, permitting, encouraging, or engaging in the obscene or
pornographic photographing, filming, or depicting of a child by any
person.
(15) "Negligent treatment or maltreatment" means an act or
((omission)) a failure to act, or the cumulative effects of a pattern
of conduct, behavior, or inaction, that evidences a serious disregard
of consequences of such magnitude as to ((constitute a clear and
present danger)) cause harm to or present a substantial threat of harm
to ((the)) a child's ((health, welfare, and safety. The fact that
siblings share a bedroom is not, in and of itself, negligent treatment
or maltreatment)) physical, mental, or cognitive condition or
development. Poverty, homelessness, or exposure to domestic violence
as defined in RCW 26.50.010 that is perpetrated against someone other
than the child do not constitute negligent treatment or maltreatment in
and of themselves.
(16) "Child protective services" means those services provided by
the department designed to protect children from child abuse and
neglect and safeguard such children from future abuse and neglect, and
conduct investigations of child abuse and neglect reports.
Investigations may be conducted regardless of the location of the
alleged abuse or neglect. Child protective services includes referral
to services to ameliorate conditions that endanger the welfare of
children, the coordination of necessary programs and services relevant
to the prevention, intervention, and treatment of child abuse and
neglect, and services to children to ensure that each child has a
permanent home. In determining whether protective services should be
provided, the department shall not decline to provide such services
solely because of the child's unwillingness or developmental inability
to describe the nature and severity of the abuse or neglect.
(17) "Malice" or "maliciously" means an evil intent, wish, or
design to vex, annoy, or injure another person. Such malice may be
inferred from an act done in willful disregard of the rights of
another, or an act wrongfully done without just cause or excuse, or an
act or omission of duty betraying a willful disregard of social duty.
(18) "Sexually aggressive youth" means a child who is defined in
RCW 74.13.075(1)(b) as being a sexually aggressive youth.
(19) "Unfounded" means available information indicates that, more
likely than not, child abuse or neglect did not occur. No unfounded
allegation of child abuse or neglect may be disclosed to a child-placing agency, private adoption agency, or any other provider licensed
under chapter 74.15 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 26.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If the department, upon investigation of a report that a child
has been abused or neglected as defined in this chapter, determines
that the child has been subject to or is at risk of negligent treatment
or maltreatment, the department may offer services to the child's
parents, guardians, or legal custodians (a) to ameliorate the
conditions that endangered the welfare of the child or that place the
child at risk of future abuse or neglect, or (b) to address or treat
the effects of mistreatment or neglect upon the child. If the child's
parents, guardians, or legal custodians are available and willing to
participate on a voluntary basis in in-home services, and the
department determines that in-home services on a voluntary basis are
appropriate for the family, the department may offer such services.
(2) In cases where the department has offered appropriate and
reasonable services under subsection (1) of this section, and the
parents, guardians, or legal custodians refuse to accept or fail to
obtain appropriate treatment or services, or are unable or unwilling to
participate in or successfully and substantially complete the treatment
or services identified by the department, the department may initiate
a dependency proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW on the basis that the
negligent treatment or maltreatment by the parent, guardian, or legal
custodian constitutes neglect.
(3) Nothing in this section precludes the department from filing a
dependency petition as provided in chapter 13.34 RCW if it determines
that such action is necessary to protect the child from abuse or
neglect or safeguard the child from future abuse or neglect.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to create in any
person an entitlement to services or financial assistance in paying for
services or to create judicial authority to order the provision of
services to any person or family if the services are unavailable or
unsuitable or if the child or family is not eligible for such services.

Sec. 6 RCW 74.13.031 and 2004 c 183 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall have the duty to provide child welfare
services and shall:
(1) Develop, administer, supervise, and monitor a coordinated and
comprehensive plan that establishes, aids, and strengthens services for
the protection and care of runaway, dependent, or neglected children.
(2) Within available resources, recruit an adequate number of
prospective adoptive and foster homes, both regular and specialized,
i.e. homes for children of ethnic minority, including Indian homes for
Indian children, sibling groups, handicapped and emotionally disturbed,
teens, pregnant and parenting teens, and annually report to the
governor and the legislature concerning the department's success in:
(a) Meeting the need for adoptive and foster home placements; (b)
reducing the foster parent turnover rate; (c) completing home studies
for legally free children; and (d) implementing and operating the
passport program required by RCW 74.13.285. The report shall include
a section entitled "Foster Home Turn-Over, Causes and Recommendations."
(3) Investigate ((complaints of any recent act or failure to act))
reports of child abuse or neglect as defined in chapter 26.44 RCW on
the part of a parent, guardian, or legal custodian of the child, member
of the household of such persons, agency as defined in chapter 74.15
RCW providing care to the child, or other caretaker ((that results in
death, serious physical or emotional harm, or sexual abuse or
exploitation, or that presents an imminent risk of serious harm)) of
the child who is serving in place of the parent, and on the basis of
the findings of such investigation, offer child welfare services in
relation to the problem to such ((parents, legal custodians, or))
persons ((serving in loco parentis)), and/or bring the situation to the
attention of an appropriate court, or another community agency:
PROVIDED, That an investigation is not required of nonaccidental
injuries which are clearly not the result of a lack of care or
supervision by the child's parents, guardians, legal custodians, or
persons serving in ((loco parentis)) place of a parent. If the
investigation reveals that a crime against a child may have been
committed, the department shall notify the appropriate law enforcement
agency.
(4) Offer, on a voluntary basis, family reconciliation services to
families who are in conflict.
(5) Monitor out-of-home placements, on a timely and routine basis,
to assure the safety, well-being, and quality of care being provided is
within the scope of the intent of the legislature as defined in RCW
74.13.010 and 74.15.010, and annually submit a report measuring the
extent to which the department achieved the specified goals to the
governor and the legislature.
(6) Have authority to accept custody of children from parents and
to accept custody of children from juvenile courts, where authorized to
do so under law, to provide child welfare services including placement
for adoption, and to provide for the physical care of such children and
make payment of maintenance costs if needed. Except where required by
Public Law 95-608 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1915), no private adoption agency
which receives children for adoption from the department shall
discriminate on the basis of race, creed, or color when considering
applications in their placement for adoption.
(7) Have authority to provide temporary shelter to children who
have run away from home and who are admitted to crisis residential
centers.
(8) Have authority to purchase care for children; and shall follow
in general the policy of using properly approved private agency
services for the actual care and supervision of such children insofar
as they are available, paying for care of such children as are accepted
by the department as eligible for support at reasonable rates
established by the department.
(9) Establish a children's services advisory committee which shall
assist the secretary in the development of a partnership plan for
utilizing resources of the public and private sectors, and advise on
all matters pertaining to child welfare, licensing of child care
agencies, adoption, and services related thereto. At least one member
shall represent the adoption community.
(10) Have authority to provide continued foster care or group care
for individuals from eighteen through twenty years of age to enable
them to complete their high school or vocational school program.
(11) Refer cases to the division of child support whenever state or
federal funds are expended for the care and maintenance of a child,
including a child with a developmental disability who is placed as a
result of an action under chapter 13.34 RCW, unless the department
finds that there is good cause not to pursue collection of child
support against the parent or parents of the child.
(12) Have authority within funds appropriated for foster care
services to purchase care for Indian children who are in the custody of
a federally recognized Indian tribe or tribally licensed child-placing
agency pursuant to parental consent, tribal court order, or state
juvenile court order; and the purchase of such care shall be subject to
the same eligibility standards and rates of support applicable to other
children for whom the department purchases care.
Notwithstanding any other provision of RCW 13.32A.170 through
13.32A.200 and 74.13.032 through 74.13.036, or of this section all
services to be provided by the department of social and health services
under subsections (4), (6), and (7) of this section, subject to the
limitations of these subsections, may be provided by any program
offering such services funded pursuant to Titles II and III of the
federal juvenile justice and delinquency prevention act of 1974.
(13) Within amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, provide
preventive services to families with children that prevent or shorten
the duration of an out-of-home placement.
(14) Have authority to provide independent living services to
youths, including individuals eighteen through twenty years of age, who
are or have been in foster care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The legislature recognizes that the fiscal
and workload impact of this act may not be fully determined until after
it is implemented and that such impact may further be affected by the
funding or availability of community-based prevention and remedial
services. For that reason, the department of social and health
services shall report on the implementation of this act to the
appropriate legislative committees and the governor by December 1,
2006. The report shall include information regarding any change over
previous years in the number and type of child abuse and neglect
referrals received and investigations conducted, any change in in-home
and out-of-home dependency placements and/or filings, any increased
service costs, barriers to implementation, and an assessment of the
fiscal and workload impact on the department. Such information shall
be reviewed by the legislature for possible amendment of this act or
additional allocation of resources to the department for implementation
purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act takes effect January 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act may be known and cited as the
Justice and Raiden Act.

--- END ---