BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there are youth
and family-focused intervention services that have been proven through
rigorous evaluation in the state of Washington and elsewhere to
significantly reduce violence and crime while saving more public safety
dollars than they cost. Under current state laws, no local government
acting alone has the financial incentive to invest in these cost-effective services because the savings accrue to multiple levels of
government with the largest savings going to the state. It is the
intent of the legislature to create incentives for local government to
invest in cost-effective intervention services that reduce crime by
reimbursing local governments with a portion of the cost savings that
accrue to the state as the result of local investments in such
services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 13.40 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall establish a reinvesting in youth
program that awards grants to counties for implementing research-based
early intervention services that target juvenile justice-involved youth
and reduce crime, subject to the availability of amounts appropriated
for this specific purpose.
(2) Effective July 1, 2007, any county or group of counties may
apply for participation in the reinvesting in youth program.
(3) Counties that participate in the reinvesting in youth program
shall have a portion of their costs of serving youth through the
research-based intervention service models paid for with moneys from
the reinvesting in youth account established pursuant to section 4 of
this act.
(4) The department of social and health services juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall review county applications for
funding through the reinvesting in youth program and shall select the
counties that will be awarded grants with funds appropriated to
implement this program. The department, in consultation with the
Washington state institute for public policy, shall develop guidelines
to determine which counties will be awarded funding in accordance with
the reinvesting in youth program. At a minimum, counties must meet the
following criteria in order to participate in the reinvesting in youth
program:
(a) Counties must match state moneys awarded for research-based
early intervention services with nonstate resources that are at least
proportional to the expected local government share of state and local
government cost avoidance that would result from the implementation of
such services;
(b) Counties must demonstrate that state funds allocated pursuant
to this section are used only for the intervention service models
authorized pursuant to section 3 of this act;
(c) Counties must participate fully in the state quality assurance
program established in section 6 of this act to ensure fidelity of
program implementation. If no state quality assurance program is in
effect for a particular selected research-based service, the county
must submit a quality assurance plan for state approval with its grant
application. Failure to demonstrate continuing compliance with quality
assurance plans shall be grounds for termination of state funding; and
(d) Counties that submit joint applications must submit for
approval by the department of social and health services juvenile
rehabilitation administration multicounty plans for efficient program
delivery.
(5) The department of social and health services juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall convene a technical advisory
committee comprised of representatives from the house of
representatives, the senate, the governor's office of financial
management, the department of social and health services juvenile
rehabilitation administration, the family policy council, the juvenile
court administrator's association, and the Washington association of
counties to assist in the implementation of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 13.40 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) In order to receive funding through the reinvesting in youth
program established pursuant to section 2 of this act, intervention
service models must meet the following minimum criteria:
(i) There must be scientific evidence from at least one rigorous
evaluation study of the specific service model that measures recidivism
reduction;
(ii) There must be evidence that the specific service model's
results can be replicated outside of an academic research environment;
(iii) The evaluation or evaluations of the service model must
permit dollar cost estimates of both benefits and costs so that the
benefit-cost ratio of the model can be calculated; and
(iv) The public taxpayer benefits to all levels of state and local
government must exceed the service model costs.
(b) In calendar year 2006, for use beginning in fiscal year 2008,
the Washington state institute for public policy shall publish a list
of service models that are eligible for reimbursement through the
investing in youth program. As authorized by the board of the
institute and to the extent necessary to respond to new research and
information, the institute shall periodically update the list of
service models. The institute shall use the technical advisory
committee established in section 2(5) of this act to review and provide
comments on the list of service models that are eligible for
reimbursement.
(2) In calendar year 2006, for use beginning in fiscal year 2008,
the Washington state institute for public policy shall review and
update the methodology for calculating cost savings resulting from
implementation of this program. As authorized by the board of the
institute and to the extent necessary to respond to new research and
information, the institute shall periodically further review and update
the methodology. As authorized by the board of the institute, when the
institute reviews and updates the methodology for calculating cost
savings, the institute shall provide an estimate of savings and avoided
costs resulting from this program, along with a projection of future
savings and avoided costs, to the appropriate committees of the
legislature. The institute shall use the technical advisory committee
established in section 2(5) of this act to review and provide comments
on its methodology and cost calculations.
(3) In calendar year 2006, for use beginning in fiscal year 2008,
the department of social and health services' juvenile rehabilitation
administration shall establish a distribution formula to provide
funding to local governments that implement research-based intervention
services pursuant to this program. The department shall periodically
update the distribution formula. The distribution formula shall
require that the state allocation to local governments be proportional
to the expected state government share of state and local government
cost avoidance that would result from the implementation of such
services based on the methodology maintained by the Washington state
institute for public policy pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.
The department shall use the technical advisory committee established
in section 2(5) of this act to review and provide comments on its
proposed distribution formula.
(4) The department of social and health services juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall provide a report to the legislature
on the initial cost savings calculation methodology and distribution
formula by October 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 13.40 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The reinvesting in youth account is created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account shall be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used to reimburse
local governments for the implementation of the reinvesting in youth
program established in sections 2 and 3 of this act.
(2) Revenues to the reinvesting in youth account consist of
revenues appropriated to or deposited in the account.
(3) The department of social and health services juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall review and monitor the expenditures
made by any county or group of counties that is funded, in whole or in
part, with funds provided through the reinvesting in youth account.
Counties shall repay any funds that are not spent in accordance with
sections 2 and 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.135 RCW
to read as follows:
RCW 43.135.035(4) does not apply to the transfers established in
section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 13.40 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of social and health services juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall establish a state quality assurance
program. The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall monitor the
implementation of intervention services funded pursuant to section 4 of
this act and shall evaluate adherence to service model design and
service completion rate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2007, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Nothing in this act creates an entitlement
for a county or group of counties to receive funding under the program
in sections 2 and 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---