BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.47 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The health care authority, in coordination with the department
of social and health services and the employment security department,
shall prepare a report on the employment status of basic health plan
enrollees under this chapter. The report shall include the following
composite information:
(a) The number of employees by employer;
(b) The employee size of the employer;
(c) The number of employees by industry type;
(d) The number of hours worked by employees; and
(e) The number of employees with multiple employers.
(2) The report shall be structured so as to identify seasonal
variations that may impact the composite information in the report.
(3) The report shall be delivered electronically to appropriate
committees of the senate and house of representatives annually,
commencing no later than November 15, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services, in coordination
with the health care authority and the employment security department,
shall prepare a report on the employment status of recipients of
medical assistance under this chapter. The report shall include the
following composite information:
(a) The number of employees by employer;
(b) The employee size of the employer;
(c) The number of employees by industry type;
(d) The number of hours worked by employees; and
(e) The number of employees with multiple employers.
(2) The report shall be structured so as to identify seasonal
variations that may impact the composite information in the report.
(3) The report shall be delivered electronically to appropriate
committees of the senate and house of representatives annually,
commencing no later than November 15, 2005.

--- END ---