BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.96.020 and 2004 c 108 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Financial advisor" means a financial services or financial
advisory firm:
(a) With recognized knowledge and experience in connection with the
negotiation and execution of payment agreements;
(b) That is acting solely as financial advisor to the governmental
entity in connection with the execution of the payment agreement and
the issuance or incurring of any related obligations, and not as a
principal, placement agent, purchaser, underwriter, or other similar
party, and that does not control, nor is it controlled by or under
common control with, any such party;
(c) That is compensated for its services in connection with the
execution of payment agreements, either directly or indirectly, solely
by the governmental entity; and
(d) Whose compensation is not based on a percentage of the notional
amount of the payment agreement or of the principal amount of any
related obligations.
(2) "Governmental entity" means state government or local
government.
(3) "Local government" means any city, county, city transportation
authority, regional transit authority established under chapter 81.112
RCW, port district, public hospital district, public facilities
district, or public utility district, or any joint operating agency
formed under RCW 43.52.360, that has or will have outstanding
obligations in an aggregate principal amount of at least one hundred
million dollars as of the date a payment agreement is executed or is
scheduled by its terms to commence or had at least one hundred million
dollars in gross revenues during the preceding calendar year.
(4) "Obligations" means bonds, notes, bond anticipation notes,
commercial paper, or other obligations for borrowed money, or lease,
installment purchase, or other similar financing agreements or
certificates of participation in such agreements.
(5) "Payment agreement" means a written agreement which provides
for an exchange of payments based on interest rates, or for ceilings or
floors on these payments, or an option on these payments, or any
combination, entered into on either a current or forward basis.
(6) "State government" means (a) the state of Washington, acting by
and through its state finance committee, (b) the Washington health care
facilities authority, (c) the Washington higher education facilities
authority, (d) the Washington state housing finance commission, or (e)
the state finance committee upon adoption of a resolution approving a
payment agreement on behalf of any state institution of higher
education as defined under RCW 28B.10.016: PROVIDED, That such
approval shall not constitute the pledge of the full faith and credit
of the state, but a pledge of only those funds specified in the
approved agreement.

--- END ---