BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(2) "Electronic enclosure" means the plastic housing that encloses
the components of electronic products, including but not limited to
televisions and computers.
(3) "Manufacturer" includes any person, firm, association,
partnership, corporation, governmental entity, organization, or joint
venture that produces a product containing polybrominated diphenyl
ethers or an importer or domestic distributor of a noncomestible
product containing polybrominated diphenyl ethers. A manufacturer does
not include a retailer:
(a) Of a private label brand or cobranding; or
(b) Who assembles components to create a single electronic product
based on an individual consumer preference.
(4) "Polybrominated diphenyl ethers" means chemical forms that
consist of diphenyl ethers bound with bromine atoms. Polybrominated
diphenyl ethers include, but are not limited to, the three primary
forms of the commercial mixtures known as pentabromodiphenylether
(penta-bde), octabromodiphenylether (octa-bde), and
decabromodiphenylether (deca-bde).
(5) "Retailer" means a person who offers a product for sale at
retail through any means including, but not limited to, remote
offerings such as sales outlets, catalogs, or the internet, but does
not include a sale that is a wholesale transaction with a distributor
or a retailer. A retailer does not include a person, firm,
association, partnership, corporation, governmental entity,
organization, or joint venture that both manufactures and sells a
product at retail.
(6) "Safer alternative" means an alternative that has undergone the
same level of study as the product it is meant to replace and has been
found to have a better toxicity profile and less impact for human
health or the environment.
(7) "Technically feasible alternative that is available at a
reasonable cost" means an alternative that is available at a cost and
in sufficient quantity to permit the manufacturer or user to maintain
an economically viable product.
(8) "Transportation vehicle" means any mechanized vehicle that is
used to transport goods or people including, but not limited to,
airplanes, automobiles, motorcycles, trucks, buses, trains, boats,
ships, streetcars, or monorail cars.
(9) "Used product" means any product that has been previously
owned, purchased, or sold in commerce. "Used product" does not include
any product manufactured after January 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section and section 3 of this act, after January 1, 2007, no
person may manufacture, knowingly sell, offer for sale, distribute for
sale, or distribute for use in this state noncomestible products
containing more than one percent of pentabromodiphenylether or
octabromodiphenylether.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:
(a) Products containing decabromodiphenylether;
(b) Original equipment manufacturer replacement parts;
(c) The processing and disposal of recyclables containing penta-bde
or octa-bde in compliance with applicable federal, state, and local
laws;
(d) A manufacturer or user of safety systems required by the
federal aviation administration;
(e) The manufacture, sale, repair, distribution, maintenance,
refurbishment, or modification of any raw material or component part
used in a transportation vehicle or any new or used transportation
vehicle with component parts, including original parts and spare parts;
(f) The manufacture, sale, repair, distribution, maintenance,
refurbishment, or modification of equipment used primarily for military
or federally funded space program applications. This exemption does
not cover consumer-based goods with broad applicability;
(g) The sale or distribution by a business, charity, or private
party of any used product containing polybrominated diphenyl ethers; or
(h) Medical monitoring and control instruments and systems, medical
devices, and products as defined in the federal food, drug, and
cosmetic act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 301 et seq.).
(3) In-state retailers in possession of products on January 1,
2007, that are banned for sale under subsection (1) of this section may
exhaust their stock through sales to the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A manufacturer or user of safety systems
required by the federal aviation administration may apply for an
exemption for a specific use of penta-bde or octa-bde by filing a
written petition with the department. The exemption may be granted for
a term not to exceed eighteen months and may be renewed upon written
application if the department finds that the specific use of penta-bde
or octa-bde continues to meet the criteria of this section and the
manufacturer or other persons comply with the conditions of its
original approval. The department may grant an exemption for a
specified use of penta-bde or octa-bde with or without conditions upon
finding that the petitioner has demonstrated that:
(1) A technically feasible alternative to the use of penta-bde or
octa-bde is not available at reasonable cost; or
(2) The potential harm to public health and the environment
directly posed by a technically feasible and available alternative is
greater than the potential harm posed by penta-bde or octa-bde.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 On or about December 15, 2007, the
department and the department of health shall submit to the appropriate
committees of the legislature a report that reviews and updates the
available scientific research on deca-bde, including relevant risk
assessments and relevant findings and rulings by the United States
environmental protection agency and the European commission, to address
the following issues:
(1) The use of deca-bde in products sold in the state;
(2) What human health effects could result from exposure to deca-bde, and are current levels of exposure at levels that could produce
these effects;
(3) Any data available on the human body burden or environmental
occurrence of deca-bde;
(4) Whether deca-bde breaks down into other chemicals that could
pose public health concerns;
(5) The availability of safer, technically feasible alternatives
for deca-bde.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Nothing in this chapter restricts the
ability of a manufacturer, importer, or distributor from transporting
products containing polybrominated diphenyl ethers through the state,
or storing such products in the state for later distribution outside
the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The department shall develop a program to
assist retailers in identifying potential products containing penta-bde
and octa-bde in their inventory.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A manufacturer of products containing penta-bde and octa-bde in violation of this chapter is punishable by a civil
penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars for each violation in the
case of a first offense. Manufacturers who are repeat violators are
liable for a civil penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars for each
repeat offense. Penalties collected under this section must be
deposited in the state toxics control account created in RCW
70.105D.070.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---