BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that a high percentage
of state-owned tidelands and shorelands were sold into private
ownership as part of the state legislature's earliest efforts to foster
Washington's economic expansion. The remaining state-owned tideland
and shoreland ownership is fragmented and some state-owned tidelands
and shorelands have been altered by fill to such a degree that they
have the characteristics of uplands. These filled lands may no longer
provide public benefits as aquatic lands as described in RCW 79.90.450
and 79.90.455 and remain underutilized as dry land because they are
subject to a management philosophy dedicated to the protection of
submerged lands.
The legislature recognizes that certain state-owned filled
tidelands and filled shorelands should be designated as aquatic
investment properties and commercially managed in order to generate
funding for the acquisition, protection, and management of functioning
aquatic lands. It is the intent of this act to authorize the
department of natural resources to buy and sell certain filled
tidelands and shorelands which, if bought or sold, would not cause the
loss of aquatic ecological functions, public access opportunities, or
interfere with water-dependent activities and businesses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 79.94 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that maintaining state-owned aquatic
lands in public ownership is often in the public interest. However,
when state-owned filled tidelands and filled shorelands do not provide
the ecological functions and public benefits normally associated with
state-owned aquatic lands and are better managed to generate revenue to
support acquisition of functioning aquatic lands, then the sale or
commercial management of such lands is not contrary to the public
interest.
(2) The department shall manage aquatic investment properties for
the purpose of generating revenue. This includes the authority to sell
lands designated as aquatic investment properties. Subject to sections
4, 6, and 9 of this act, revenue generated from the sale or leasing of
aquatic investment properties must be used to fund acquisition,
preservation, and management of functioning aquatic lands or for
reinvestment in more manageable filled lands that were formerly below
ordinary high tide in tidal waters or ordinary high water on navigable
rivers and lakes. The sale of aquatic investment properties must
demonstrate a clear economic benefit to the state.

Sec. 3 RCW 79.90.010 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 21 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
((Whenever used in)) The definitions in this section apply
throughout chapters 79.90 through 79.96 RCW ((the term)) unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Aquatic investment properties" means state-owned filled
tidelands and filled shorelands, designated by the board according to
section 4 of this act, that are currently upland in nature and no
longer provide the ecological functions and public benefits normally
intrinsic to functioning aquatic lands.
(2) "Aquatic lands" means all state-owned tidelands, shorelands,
harbor areas, and the beds of navigable waters.
(3) "Functioning aquatic lands" means lands that, in their current
condition, are below ordinary high tide in tidal waters or ordinary
high water on navigable rivers and lakes, and provide for important
ecological functions or public benefits as described in RCW 79.90.455.
(4) "Net acreage" means the difference between the total acres of
aquatic lands acquired and the total acres of aquatic lands disposed of
by the department under the authority of this act.
(5) "State-owned aquatic land base" means the amount of state-owned
aquatic lands managed by the department on the effective date of this
act or as subsequently updated through biennial reports submitted to
the board pursuant to section 9 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 79.94 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may, with approval of the board, purchase
functioning aquatic lands. Once acquired, these lands shall become a
permanent part of the state-owned aquatic land base and subject to the
provisions of chapters 79.90 through 79.96 RCW.
(2) The department may, with approval of the board, purchase filled
lands that were formerly below ordinary high tide in tidal waters or
ordinary high water on navigable rivers and lakes, and improvements
associated with any of these lands, that have the potential to generate
revenues to fund the acquisition, protection, and management of
functioning aquatic lands.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 79.94 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon request by the department, the board may designate certain
state-owned filled tidelands and filled shorelands as aquatic
investment properties. At the time it approves the purchase of filled
lands that were formerly below ordinary high tide in tidal waters or
ordinary high water on navigable rivers and lakes, and improvements
associated with any of these lands, the board may direct that a
property will be designated as an aquatic investment property. Only
property meeting all of the following criteria is eligible for
designation as an aquatic investment property:
(a) The property is state-owned tidelands or shorelands that are
filled to an elevation above ordinary high tide or ordinary high water.
Tidelands and shorelands that are not filled, but simply diked and
therefore more easily returned to their natural, inundated state may
not be designated as aquatic investment properties. Nothing in this
section authorizes the filling of state-owned aquatic lands subsequent
to this act for the purpose of making them available for designation as
aquatic investment properties;
(b) Except for the capacity to generate revenue, the property is
incapable of providing the public benefits described under RCW
79.90.455; and
(c) The property has greater potential capacity for long-term
economic gain, if designated as an aquatic investment property, than it
would if not designated. Capacity for long-term economic gain is
determined in accordance with techniques specified by rule.
(2) Designated aquatic investment properties are not subject to RCW
79.90.245, 79.94.070, 79.94.175, 79.94.181, or 79.94.260, or the free
use provisions for public parks or public recreational purposes in RCW
79.90.470.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 79.94 RCW
to read as follows:
Aquatic investment properties and improvements associated with
these lands may be managed primarily for revenue generation. After
deducting the management costs as provided in RCW 79.64.040 and
payments to towns under RCW 79.92.110, twenty-five percent of revenues
from the lease of aquatic investment properties must be deposited in
the aquatic sustaining investment account created in section 11 of this
act and the remainder deposited in the aquatic lands enhancement
account created in RCW 79.90.245.

Sec. 7 RCW 79.94.090 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 21 s 94 are each
amended to read as follows:
All tidelands, other than first class, shall be offered for sale,
when otherwise permitted under RCW 79.94.150 to be sold, and sold in
the same manner as state lands, other than capitol building lands, but
for not less than five dollars per lineal chain, measured on the United
States meander line bounding the inner shore limit of such tidelands,
and each applicant shall furnish a copy of the United States field
notes, certified to by the officer in charge thereof, of said meander
line with his or her application((, and shall pay one-tenth of the
purchase price on the date of sale)).

Sec. 8 RCW 79.94.150 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 21 s 100 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) This section shall apply to:
(a) First class tidelands as defined in RCW 79.90.030;
(b) Second class tidelands as defined in RCW 79.90.035;
(c) First class shorelands as defined in RCW 79.90.040;
(d) Second class shorelands as defined in RCW 79.90.045, except as
included within RCW 79.94.210;
(e) Waterways as described in RCW 79.93.010.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, from and after
August 9, 1971, all tidelands and shorelands enumerated in subsection
(1) of this section owned by the state of Washington shall not be sold
except to public entities as may be authorized by law and they shall
not be given away.
(3) Tidelands and shorelands enumerated in subsection (1) of this
section may be leased for a period not to exceed fifty-five years:
PROVIDED, That nothing in this section shall be construed as modifying
or canceling any outstanding lease during its present term.
(4) Nothing in this section shall:
(a) Be construed to cancel an existing sale contract;
(b) Prohibit sale or exchange of beds and shorelands where the
water course has changed and the area now has the characteristics of
uplands;
(c) Prevent exchange involving state-owned tide and shore lands;
(d) Prohibit the sale of aquatic investment properties as defined
in RCW 79.90.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 79.94 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Aquatic investment properties and improvements associated with
these lands may be sold for no less than fair market value if they meet
the criteria in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) Only an aquatic investment property meeting all of the
following criteria is eligible for sale:
(a) The property does not abut functioning aquatic lands; and
(b) The department determines through an economic analysis that
selling the property would be economically more advantageous than if it
were retained and managed by the department.
(3) Proceeds from the sale of aquatic investment properties shall
be deposited into the aquatic sustaining investment account created in
section 11 of this act. In addition, the department may charge the
reasonable direct administrative costs incurred in processing the sale.
For the purposes of this subsection, direct administrative costs
include, but are not limited to, the cost of hours worked directly on
the transaction, based on salaries and benefits, plus travel
reimbursement and other actual out-of-pocket costs, plus cost of
contracted services such as appraisals and environmental site
assessments. Direct administrative costs recovered by the department
must be deposited into the resource management cost account.
(4)(a) The department must maintain or increase the state-owned
aquatic land base over time.
(b) By December 31st of each even-numbered year, the department
must provide a report to the board on the acquisitions and disposals
completed under this act. If the report shows that a net acreage
reduction to the state-owned aquatic land base has occurred from
acquisitions and disposals completed under this act, the authority to
sell aquatic investment properties is suspended until such a time as
the state-owned aquatic land base is restored through acquisitions to
the level of the previous report to the board.
(c) Nothing in this section prohibits sales, exchanges, or
transfers of aquatic lands to public entities as permitted under RCW
79.94.150 or sales of second class shorelands on lakes as permitted
under RCW 79.94.210. These conveyances do not count toward a reported
increase or reduction to the state-owned aquatic land base.

Sec. 10 RCW 79.90.245 and 2004 c 276 s 914 are each amended to
read as follows:
After deduction for management costs as provided in RCW 79.64.040
and payments to towns under RCW 79.92.110(2), all moneys received by
the state from the ((sale or)) lease of state-owned aquatic lands and
from the sale of valuable material from state-owned aquatic lands shall
be deposited in the aquatic lands enhancement account which is hereby
created in the state treasury. After appropriation, these funds shall
be used solely for aquatic lands enhancement projects; for the
purchase, improvement, or protection of aquatic lands for public
purposes; for providing and improving access to such lands; and for
volunteer cooperative fish and game projects.
In providing grants for aquatic lands enhancement projects, the
department shall require grant recipients to incorporate the
environmental benefits of the project into their grant applications,
and the department shall utilize the statement of environmental
benefits in its prioritization and selection process. The department
shall also develop appropriate outcome-focused performance measures to
be used both for management and performance assessment of the grants.
To the extent possible, the department should coordinate its
performance measure system with other natural resource-related agencies
as defined in RCW 43.41.270. The department shall consult with
affected interest groups in implementing this section.
During the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2005, the funds may be
appropriated for boating safety, settlement costs for aquatic lands
cleanup, and shellfish management, enforcement, and enhancement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 79.90 RCW
to read as follows:
The aquatic sustaining investment account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from money received by the department from the
sale or lease of aquatic investment properties and money received by
the state from the sale of state-owned aquatic lands permitted to be
sold under RCW 79.94.150 or 79.94.210 must be deposited into the
account. Receipts from moneys received by the department from the
lease of aquatic investment properties must be distributed as described
in section 6 of this act. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only
for the acquisition of functioning aquatic lands, filled lands that
were formerly below ordinary high tide in tidal waters or ordinary high
water on navigable rivers and lakes, and improvements associated with
any of these lands.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 79.94 RCW
to read as follows:
The department must adopt rules as necessary to carry out the
purposes of this act, specifically including:
(1) Evaluation criteria for determining when state-owned aquatic
land may be designated as aquatic investment properties, as described
in sections 5 and 9 of this act; and
(2) Evaluation criteria for determining whether an aquatic
investment property should be retained and managed for revenue
generation or sold at no less than fair market value, as described in
section 5 of this act.

Sec. 13 RCW 43.84.092 and 2003 c 361 s 602, 2003 c 324 s 1, 2003
c 150 s 2, and 2003 c 48 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The aquatic sustaining
investment account, the capitol building construction account, the
Cedar River channel construction and operation account, the Central
Washington University capital projects account, the charitable,
educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the common
school construction fund, the county criminal justice assistance
account, the county sales and use tax equalization account, the data
processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account,
the department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking
water assistance account, the drinking water assistance administrative
account, the drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern
Washington University capital projects account, the education
construction fund, the election account, the emergency reserve fund,
The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the federal
forest revolving account, the health services account, the public
health services account, the health system capacity account, the
personal health services account, the state higher education
construction account, the higher education construction account, the
highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account,
the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the perpetual
surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement
system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan
revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health
supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puyallup
tribal settlement account, the regional transportation investment
district account, the resource management cost account, the site
closure account, the special wildlife account, the state employees'
insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the
state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the
Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system
plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and
plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco
settlement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the
tuition recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond
retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the
volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account, the
Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the
state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 14 RCW 43.84.092 and 2004 c 242 s 60 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The aquatic sustaining
investment account, the capitol building construction account, the
Cedar River channel construction and operation account, the Central
Washington University capital projects account, the charitable,
educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the common
school construction fund, the county criminal justice assistance
account, the county sales and use tax equalization account, the data
processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account,
the department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking
water assistance account, the drinking water assistance administrative
account, the drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern
Washington University capital projects account, the education
construction fund, the election account, the emergency reserve fund,
The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the federal
forest revolving account, the health services account, the public
health services account, the health system capacity account, the
personal health services account, the state higher education
construction account, the higher education construction account, the
highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account,
the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the perpetual
surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement
system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan
revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health
supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puyallup
tribal settlement account, the regional transportation investment
district account, the resource management cost account, the site
closure account, the special wildlife account, the state employees'
insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the
state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the
Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system
plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and
plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco
settlement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the
tuition recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond
retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the
volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account, the
Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety
employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the
state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 The sum of five hundred thousand dollars,
or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the
biennium ending June 30, 2007, from the aquatic sustaining investment
account to the department of natural resources for the purposes
described in section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Section 13 of this act expires July 1,
2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Section 14 of this act takes effect July 1,
2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 RCW 79.90.250 (Sale procedure -- Terms of
payment -- Deferred payments, rate of interest) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 21
s 31 are each repealed.

--- END ---