BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that schools are
increasingly required to play an expanding role in protecting our
children's health. Schools are responsible for monitoring the
immunization of children, evaluating children's hearing and vision, and
screening for scoliosis. Chronically ill children often require
medically ordered treatment to enable them to attend school.
Medication is often required to be given to children during the school
day. Schools are also responsible for identifying and reporting child
abuse, identifying drug and alcohol problems, treating emergencies,
providing counseling and assistance for teenage parents, and providing
AIDS, human growth and development, and personal safety education.
Schools are asked to coordinate with families and community services to
manage students with significant health problems and to make referrals
to appropriate community services. Schools are required to abide by
rules of confidentiality and to properly maintain health care records.
The legislature finds that additional school nurses with the
appropriate expertise are needed in our schools to play a pivotal role
in improving the health and educational success of the school-age
child.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The office of superintendent of public
instruction and the department of health shall collaborate and develop
a work group to assess school nursing services in class I school
districts. The work group shall consult with representatives from the
following groups: School nurses, schools, students, parents, teachers,
health officials, and administrators.
(2) The work group shall:
(a) Study the need for additional school nursing services by
gathering data about current school nurse-to-student ratios in each
class I school district and assessing the demand for school nursing
services by acuity levels and the necessary skills to meet those
demands. The work group also shall recommend to the legislature best
practices in school nursing services, including a dedicated,
sustainable funding model that would best meet the current and future
needs of Washington's schools and contribute to greater academic
success of all students. The work group shall make recommendations for
school nursing services, and may examine school nursing services by
grade level. The work group shall assess whether funding for school
nurses should continue as part of basic education; and
(b) In collaboration with managed care plans that contract with the
department of social and health services medical assistance
administration to provide health services to children participating in
the medicaid and state children's health insurance program, identify
opportunities to improve coordination of and access to health services
for low-income children through the use of school nurse services. The
work group shall evaluate the feasibility of pooling school district
and managed care plan funding to finance school nurse positions in
school districts with high numbers of low-income children.
(3) As used in this section, "school nurse" means a person who:
(a) Holds a bachelor of science degree in nursing, including
training in public health nursing;
(b) Holds a valid license as a registered nurse (RN) in Washington
state; and
(c) Is certified as an educational staff associate under the
requirements established by the office of superintendent of public
instruction.
(4) The office of superintendent of public instruction shall report
its findings and plans for implementation to the legislature by
February 1, 2006.
(5) This section expires June 30, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The school nurse account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from gifts, grants, or
endowments obtained under section 4 of this act must be deposited into
the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only to increase the
nursing services in class I school districts. School districts with
more than one thousand five hundred students for every school nurse
shall receive priority for these funds. As used in this section,
"school nurse" does not include nurses in the school nurse corps.
Only the superintendent of public instruction or the
superintendent's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW,
but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The office of the superintendent of public
instruction may receive gifts, grants, or endowments from public or
private sources that are made from time to time, in trust or otherwise,
for the use and benefit of the purposes of section 3 of this act and
spend gifts, grants, or endowments or income from the public or private
sources to support the purpose in section 3 of this act, unless the
receipt of the gifts, grants, or endowments violates RCW 42.17.710.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2005, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---