BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
promote the full success of the centennial accord, which was signed by
state and tribal government leaders in 1989. As those leaders declared
in the subsequent millennial accord in 1999, this will require
"educating the citizens of our state, particularly the youth who are
our future leaders, about tribal history, culture, treaty rights,
contemporary tribal and state government institutions and relations and
the contribution of Indian nations to the state of Washington." The
legislature recognizes that this goal has yet to be achieved in most of
our state's schools and districts. As a result, Indian students may
not find the school curriculum, especially Washington state history
curriculum, relevant to their lives or experiences. In addition, many
students may remain uninformed about the experiences, contributions,
and perspectives of their tribal neighbors, fellow citizens, and
classmates. The legislature further finds that the lack of accurate
and complete curricula may contribute to the persistent achievement gap
between Indian and other students. The legislature finds there is a
need to establish collaborative government-to-government relationships
between elected school boards and tribal councils to create local
and/or regional curricula about tribal history and culture, and to
promote dialogue and cultural exchanges that can help tribal leaders
and school leaders implement strategies to close the achievement gap.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.345
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Beginning in 2006, and at least once annually through 2010, the
Washington state school directors' association is encouraged to
schedule regional meetings and invite the respective tribal councils
from the region for the purpose of establishing government-to-government relationships and dialogue between tribal councils and
school district boards of directors. Such meetings should be for the
primary purposes of:
(a) Facilitating the development and implementation of local and/or
regional curricular materials to teach the information regarding the
history, culture, and government of Washington's Indian tribes; and
(b) Promoting collaboration in strategies to close the achievement
gap.
(2) By December 1, 2007, and every two years thereafter through
2011, the school directors' association shall report to the education
committees of the legislature regarding the progress made in the
development and implementation of tribal history, culture, and
government curricular materials, including any obstacles encountered,
and the potential for the curricula to contribute to efforts to close
the achievement gap. The report also is encouraged to include feedback
from students, teachers, and parents.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.230.090 and 2004 c 19 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education shall establish high school
graduation requirements or equivalencies for students.
(a) Any course in Washington state history and government used to
fulfill high school graduation requirements ((is encouraged to)) shall
include information on the culture, history, and government of the
American Indian peoples who were the first inhabitants of the state.
(b) The certificate of academic achievement requirements under RCW
28A.655.061 or the certificate of individual achievement requirements
under RCW 28A.155.045 are required for graduation from a public high
school but are not the only requirements for graduation.
(c) Any decision on whether a student has met the state board's
high school graduation requirements for a high school and beyond plan
shall remain at the local level.
(2) In recognition of the statutory authority of the state board of
education to establish and enforce minimum high school graduation
requirements, the state board shall periodically reevaluate the
graduation requirements and shall report such findings to the
legislature in a timely manner as determined by the state board.
(3) Pursuant to any requirement for instruction in languages other
than English established by the state board of education or a local
school district, or both, for purposes of high school graduation,
students who receive instruction in American sign language or one or
more American Indian languages shall be considered to have satisfied
the state or local school district graduation requirement for
instruction in one or more languages other than English.
(4) If requested by the student and his or her family, a student
who has completed high school courses before attending high school
shall be given high school credit which shall be applied to fulfilling
high school graduation requirements if:
(a) The course was taken with high school students, if the academic
level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth
grade classes, and the student has successfully passed by completing
the same course requirements and examinations as the high school
students enrolled in the class; or
(b) The academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for
seventh and eighth grade classes and the course would qualify for high
school credit, because the course is similar or equivalent to a course
offered at a high school in the district as determined by the school
district board of directors.
(5) Students who have taken and successfully completed high school
courses under the circumstances in subsection (4) of this section shall
not be required to take an additional competency examination or perform
any other additional assignment to receive credit.
(6) At the college or university level, five quarter or three
semester hours equals one high school credit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Each school district board of directors is encouraged to
incorporate into its history and social studies curricula for each
grade in which the district offers instruction on Washington state or
United States history, information about the history, culture, and
government of one or more federally recognized Indian tribes whose
reservation lands or traditional lands and territories are within the
state of Washington. A school district is encouraged to include in its
curriculum information about the history, culture, and government of
any tribe whose reservation lands, in whole or in part, are within the
boundaries of the school district.
(2) The program of Indian education within the office of the
superintendent of public instruction is encouraged to assist school
districts in determining the location of tribal reservations and
traditional lands and territories.
(3) A school district is encouraged to make a good faith effort to
collaborate with all Indian tribes whose reservation in whole or in
part lies within the boundaries of the school district in order to
develop and use the curricular materials for teaching about the
history, culture, and government of the tribe or tribes. Schools also
are encouraged to facilitate opportunities for cultural exchanges with
the tribes.

--- END ---