BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any private citizen or public employee to
release from captivity anywhere in the state a barred owl (Strix varia)
or a barred owl/spotted owl hybrid (Strix occidentalis x Strix varia)
that has been captured alive pursuant to the authority granted in a
federal permit.
(2) A violation of this section shall be punished as a natural
resource infraction under chapter 7.84 RCW.

--- END ---