BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.70.010 and 2001 c 187 s 26 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If, on or before December 31 in any calendar year, any real or
personal property placed upon the assessment roll of that year is
destroyed in whole or in part, or is in an area that has been declared
a disaster area by the governor or the county legislative authority and
has been reduced in value by more than twenty percent as a result of a
natural disaster, the true and fair value of such property shall be
reduced for that assessment year by an amount determined by taking the
true and fair value of such taxable property before destruction or
reduction in value and deduct therefrom the true and fair value of the
remaining property after destruction or reduction in value.
(2) Taxes levied for collection in the year in which the true and
fair value has been reduced under subsection (1) of this section shall
be abated in whole or in part as provided in this subsection. The
amount of taxes to be abated shall be determined by first multiplying
the amount deducted from the true and fair value under subsection (1)
of this section by the rate of levy applicable to the property in the
tax year. Then divide the product by the number of days in the year
and multiply the quotient by the number of days remaining in the
calendar year after the date of the destruction or reduction in value
of the property. If taxes abated under this section have been paid,
the amount paid shall be refunded under RCW 84.69.020. ((For taxes
levied for collection in 1998 and 1999, this subsection (2) applies to
property that is destroyed in whole or in part, or is in an area that
has been declared a disaster area by the governor and has been reduced
in value by more than twenty percent as a result of a natural disaster.
For taxes levied for collection in 2000 through 2004, this subsection
(2) applies to property that is destroyed in whole or in part, or is in
an area that has been declared a federal disaster area and has been
reduced in value by more than twenty percent as a result of a natural
disaster. This subsection (2) does not apply to taxes levied for
collection in 2005 and thereafter.)) The tax relief provided for in
this section for the tax year in which the damage or destruction
occurred does not apply to property damaged or destroyed voluntarily.
(3) No reduction in the true and fair value or abatements shall be
made more than three years after the date of destruction or reduction
in value.
(4) The assessor shall make such reduction on his or her own
motion; however, the taxpayer may make application for reduction on
forms prepared by the department and provided by the assessor. The
assessor shall notify the taxpayer of the amount of reduction.
(5) If destroyed property is replaced prior to the valuation dates
contained in RCW 36.21.080 and 36.21.090, the total taxable value for
that assessment year shall not exceed the value as of the appropriate
valuation date in RCW 36.21.080 or 36.21.090, whichever is appropriate.
(6) The taxpayer may appeal the amount of reduction to the county
board of equalization in accordance with the provisions of RCW
84.40.038. The board shall reconvene, if necessary, to hear the
appeal.

--- END ---