BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there are two
types of businesses performing towing services for the public in the
state of Washington, registered tow truck operators licensed under
chapter 46.55 RCW, and tow truck operators that are not registered tow
truck operators. Registered tow truck operators are required to meet
certain equipment, safety, and insurance standards and are inspected
annually by the Washington State Patrol.
The legislature further finds that under section 2, chapter 360,
Laws of 1995 and RCW 46.55.025, tow truck operators that are not
registered tow truck operators were required to maintain similar
insurance as registered tow truck operators and have their trucks
inspected in a like manner. No specific system was ever set out to do
this and the requirement has not been implemented.
The legislature therefore finds that it is necessary for the
protection of the public that a system of annual inspection be
established for these tow truck operators that are not licensed as
registered tow truck operators so that minimum standards for safe
equipment and insurance will be assured. It is the intent of this act
to establish such a system.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.55.025 and 1995 c 360 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
A vehicle engaging in the business of recovery of disabled vehicles
for monetary compensation, from or on a public road or highway must
either be operated by a registered tow truck operator, or someone who
at a minimum has insurance in a like manner and amount as prescribed in
RCW 46.55.030(3), and have had their tow trucks inspected in ((a like))
the manner ((as)) prescribed by ((RCW 46.55.040(1))) section 8 of this
act. The department shall adopt rules to enforce this section.
Failure to comply with this section is a class 1 civil infraction
punishable under RCW 7.80.120.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.55.030 and 1989 c 111 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Application for licensing as a registered tow truck operator
shall be made on forms furnished by the department, shall be
accompanied by an inspection certification from the Washington state
patrol, shall be signed by the applicant or an agent, and shall include
the following information:
(a) The name and address of the person, firm, partnership,
association, or corporation under whose name the business is to be
conducted;
(b) The names and addresses of all persons having an interest in
the business, or if the owner is a corporation, the names and addresses
of the officers of the corporation;
(c) The names and addresses of all employees who serve as tow truck
drivers;
(d) Proof of minimum insurance required by subsection (3) of this
section;
(e) The vehicle license and vehicle identification numbers of all
tow trucks of which the applicant is the registered owner;
(f) Any other information the department may require; and
(g) A certificate of approval from the Washington state patrol
certifying that:
(i) The applicant has an established place of business and that
mail is received at the address shown on the application;
(ii) The address of any storage locations where vehicles may be
stored is correctly stated on the application;
(iii) The place of business has an office area that is accessible
to the public without entering the storage area; and
(iv) The place of business has adequate and secure storage
facilities, as defined in this chapter and the rules of the department,
where vehicles and their contents can be properly stored and protected.
(2) Before issuing a registration certificate to an applicant the
department shall require the applicant to file with the department a
surety bond in the amount of five thousand dollars running to the state
and executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this
state. The bond shall be approved as to form by the attorney general
and conditioned that the operator shall conduct his business in
conformity with the provisions of this chapter pertaining to abandoned
or unauthorized vehicles, and to compensate any person, company, or the
state for failure to comply with this chapter or the rules adopted
hereunder, or for fraud, negligence, or misrepresentation in the
handling of these vehicles. Any person injured by the tow truck
operator's failure to fully perform duties imposed by this chapter and
the rules adopted hereunder, or an ordinance or resolution adopted by
a city, town, or county is entitled to recover actual damages,
including reasonable attorney's fees against the surety and the tow
truck operator. Successive recoveries against the bond shall be
permitted, but the aggregate liability of the surety to all persons
shall not exceed the amount of the bond. As a condition of authority
to do business, the operator shall keep the bond in full force and
effect. Failure to maintain the penalty value of the bond or
cancellation of the bond by the surety automatically cancels the
operator's registration.
(3) Before the department may issue a registration certificate to
an applicant, the applicant shall provide proof of minimum insurance
requirements of:
(a) One hundred thousand dollars for liability for bodily injury or
property damage per occurrence; and
(b) Fifty thousand dollars of legal liability per occurrence, to
protect against vehicle damage, including but not limited to fire and
theft, from the time a vehicle comes into the custody of an operator
until it is redeemed or sold.
Cancellation of or failure to maintain the insurance required by (a)
and (b) of this subsection automatically cancels the operator's
registration.
(4) The fee for each original registration and annual renewal is
one hundred twenty-five dollars per company, plus fifty dollars per
truck. The department shall forward the registration fee to the state
treasurer for deposit in the motor vehicle fund.
(5) The applicant must submit an inspection certificate from the
state patrol before the department may issue or renew an operator's
registration certificate or tow truck permits.
(6) Upon approval of the application, the department shall issue a
registration certificate to the registered operator to be displayed
prominently at the operator's place of business.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.55.040 and 1989 c 111 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A registered operator shall apply for and keep current a tow
truck permit for each tow truck of which the operator is the registered
owner. Application for a tow truck permit shall be accompanied by a
report from the Washington state patrol covering a physical inspection
of each tow truck capable of being used by the applicant.
(2) Upon receipt of the fee provided in RCW 46.55.030(4) and a
satisfactory inspection report from the state patrol, the department
shall issue each tow truck an annual tow truck permit or decal. The
class of the tow truck, determined according to RCW 46.55.050, shall be
stamped on the permit or decal. The permit or decal shall be displayed
on the passenger side of the truck's front windshield.
(3) A tow truck number from the department shall be affixed in a
permanent manner to each tow truck.
(4) The Washington state patrol shall conduct annual inspections of
tow truck operators' equipment and facilities during the operators'
normal business hours. Unscheduled inspections may be conducted
without notice at the operator's place of business by an inspector to
determine the fitness of a tow truck or facilities. At the time of the
inspection, the operator shall provide a paper copy of the master log
referred to in RCW 46.55.080.
(5) If at the time of the annual or subsequent inspections the
equipment does not meet the requirements of this chapter, and the
deficiency is a safety related deficiency, or the equipment is
necessary to the truck's performance, the inspector shall cause the
registered tow truck operator to remove that equipment from service as
a tow truck until such time as the equipment has been satisfactorily
repaired. A red tag shall be placed on the windshield of a tow truck
taken out of service, and the tow truck shall not provide tow truck
service until the Washington state patrol recertifies the truck and
removes the tag.
(6) A vehicle engaging in the business of towing vehicles for
monetary compensation that is not operated by a registered tow truck
operator must submit to an inspection as provided by section 8 of this
act as a condition for issuance of an original transporter license and
plates under RCW 46.76.040 and for any renewals under RCW 46.76.050.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.76.010 and 1961 c 12 s 46.76.010 are each amended
to read as follows:
It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, partnership,
association, or corporation to engage in the business of delivering by
the driveaway or towaway methods vehicles not his own and of a type
required to be registered under the laws of this state, without
procuring a transporter's license in accordance with the provisions of
this chapter.
This ((shall)) section does not apply to motor freight carriers or
operations regularly licensed under the provisions of chapter 81.80 RCW
to haul such vehicles on trailers or semitrailers.
This section does not apply to registered tow truck operators
licensed under RCW 46.55.040.
Driveaway or towaway methods means the delivery service rendered by
a motor vehicle transporter wherein motor vehicles are driven singly or
in combinations by the towbar, saddlemount or fullmount methods or any
lawful combinations thereof, or where a truck or truck-tractor draws or
tows a semitrailer or trailer.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.76.040 and 1990 c 250 s 68 are each amended to read
as follows:
The fee for an original transporter's license is twenty-five
dollars. Transporter license number plates bearing an appropriate
symbol and serial number shall be attached to all vehicles being
delivered in the conduct of the business licensed under this chapter.
The plates may be obtained for a fee of two dollars for each set.
Before issuance of the original transporter license and any plates
issued thereunder the applicant shall submit each vehicle to be used to
tow vehicles for monetary compensation to an inspection as provided by
section 8 of this act. The Washington State Patrol shall establish by
rule a fee for this initial inspection and for subsequent annual
inspections required by RCW 46.76.050.

Sec. 7 RCW 46.76.050 and 1985 c 109 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
A transporter's license expires on the date assigned by the
director, and may be renewed by filing a proper application ((and)),
paying an annual fee of fifteen dollars, and submitting to an
inspection as provided by section 8 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 46.76 RCW
to read as follows:
Upon the request of a transporter business license applicant or
licensee applying for the initial issuance, or annual renewal of their
transporter license with the department of licensing, the Washington
State Patrol shall conduct a safety inspection of the vehicle(s) to be
used in the transporter business. Applicants and licensees must
present their transporter vehicle(s) at a Washington State Patrol
inspection site, by appointment, Monday through Friday between the
hours of 8:00 a.m. and 5:00 p.m. The transporter vehicle(s) must pass
the inspection to qualify for initial issuance or renewal of the
transporter license by the department of licensing. The Washington
State Patrol shall by rule establish safety and insurance standards
which comply with RCW 46.55.025 for each transporter vehicle.

--- END ---