BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A statement shall not be excluded by the
rules of evidence applicable to hearsay if: (1) The declarant is
unavailable as a witness; and (2) the statement is being offered
against a party that has engaged or acquiesced in wrongdoing that was
intended to, and did, procure the unavailability of the declarant as a
witness.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act constitutes a new
chapter in Title 5 RCW.

--- END ---