BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.36.379 and 2000 c 103 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that the property tax exemption authorized by
Article VII, section 10 of the state Constitution should be made
available on the basis of a veteran's widow or widower or retired
person's ability to pay property taxes. The legislature further finds
that the best measure of a ((retired)) person's ability to pay taxes is
that person's disposable income as defined in RCW 84.36.383.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
A person shall be exempt from any legal obligation to pay all or a
portion of the amount of excess and regular real property taxes due and
payable in the year following the year in which a claim is filed, and
thereafter, in accordance with the following:
(1) The property taxes must have been imposed upon a residence
which was occupied by a veteran's widow or widower claiming the
exemption as a principal place of residence as of the time of filing.
Any person who sells, transfers, or is displaced from his or her
residence may transfer his or her exemption status to a replacement
residence, but no claimant shall receive an exemption on more than one
residence in any year. Confinement of the person to a hospital,
nursing home, boarding home, or adult family home shall not disqualify
the claim of exemption if:
(a) The residence is temporarily unoccupied;
(b) The residence is occupied by a person financially dependent on
the claimant for support; or
(c) The residence is rented for the purpose of paying nursing home,
hospital, boarding home, or adult family home costs;
(2) The person claiming the exemption must have owned, at the time
of filing, in fee, as a life estate, or by contract purchase, the
residence on which the property taxes have been imposed or if the
person claiming the exemption lives in a cooperative housing
association, corporation, or partnership, the person must own a share
therein representing the unit or portion of the structure in which he
or she resides. For purposes of this subsection, a residence owned by
cotenants shall be deemed to be owned by each cotenant, and any lease
for life shall be deemed a life estate;
(3)(a) The person claiming the exemption must be:
(i) Sixty-one years of age or older on December 31st of the year in
which the exemption claim is filed, or must have been, at the time of
filing, retired from regular gainful employment by reason of physical
disability; and
(ii) A widow or widower of a veteran who:
(A) Died as a result of a service-connected disability;
(B) Was rated as one hundred percent disabled by the United States
veterans' administration for the ten years prior to his or her death;
(C) Was a former prisoner of war as substantiated by the United
States veterans' administration and was rated as one hundred percent
disabled by the United States veterans' administration for one or more
years prior to his or her death; or
(D) Died on active duty or in active training status as a member of
the United States uniformed services, reserves, or national guard;
(b) The person claiming the exemption must not have remarried;
(4) The amount of property taxes from which the person is exempt
shall be calculated on the basis of disposable income, as defined in
RCW 84.36.383. If the income of the person claiming exemption is
reduced for two or more months of the assessment year due to
substantial changes that are likely to continue for an indefinite
period of time, the disposable income of the person shall be calculated
by multiplying the average monthly disposable income of the person
after such occurrences by twelve. If it is necessary to estimate
income to comply with this subsection, the assessor may require
confirming documentation of such income prior to May 31st of the year
following application;
(5)(a) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has
a disposable income of thirty-two thousand dollars or less is exempt
from all regular and excess property taxes on the first two hundred
thousand dollars of assessed value;
(b) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a
disposable income of forty thousand dollars or less but greater than
thirty two thousand dollars is exempt from all regular and excess
property taxes on the first one hundred fifty thousand dollars of
assessed value;
(c) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a
disposable income of fifty thousand dollars or less but greater than
forty thousand dollars is exempt from all regular and excess property
taxes on the first one hundred thousand dollars of assessed value; and
(6) For a person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has
a disposable income of fifty thousand dollars or less, the valuation of
the residence shall be the assessed value of the residence on January
1st of the assessment year in which the person first qualifies under
this section. If the person subsequently fails to qualify under this
section only for one year because of high income, this same valuation
shall be used upon requalification. If the person fails to qualify for
more than one year in succession because of high income or fails to
qualify for any other reason, the valuation upon requalification shall
be the assessed value on January 1st of the assessment year in which
the person requalifies. If the person transfers the exemption under
this section to a different residence, the valuation of the different
residence shall be the assessed value of the different residence on
January 1st of the assessment year in which the person transfers the
exemption.
In no event may the valuation under this subsection be greater than
the true and fair value of the residence on January 1st of the
assessment year.
For a person receiving an exemption under RCW 84.36.381, the
assessed value on January 1st is the assessed value of the residence
under RCW 84.36.381 on January 1st.
This subsection does not apply to subsequent improvements to the
property in the year in which the improvements are made. Subsequent
improvements to the property shall be added to the value otherwise
determined under this subsection at their true and fair value in the
year in which they are made.
(7) No person may claim an exemption under this section if the
person also claims an exemption under RCW 84.36.381.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.36.383 and 2004 c 270 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389 and section 2 of this
act, except where the context clearly indicates a different meaning:
(1) The term "residence" means a single family dwelling unit
whether such unit be separate or part of a multiunit dwelling,
including the land on which such dwelling stands not to exceed one
acre. The term shall also include a share ownership in a cooperative
housing association, corporation, or partnership if the person claiming
exemption can establish that his or her share represents the specific
unit or portion of such structure in which he or she resides. The term
shall also include a single family dwelling situated upon lands the fee
of which is vested in the United States or any instrumentality thereof
including an Indian tribe or in the state of Washington, and
notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 84.04.080 and 84.04.090, such a
residence shall be deemed real property.
(2) The term "real property" shall also include a mobile home which
has substantially lost its identity as a mobile unit by virtue of its
being fixed in location upon land owned or leased by the owner of the
mobile home and placed on a foundation (posts or blocks) with fixed
pipe, connections with sewer, water, or other utilities. A mobile home
located on land leased by the owner of the mobile home is subject, for
tax billing, payment, and collection purposes, only to the personal
property provisions of chapter 84.56 RCW and RCW 84.60.040.
(3) "Department" means the state department of revenue.
(4) "Combined disposable income" means the disposable income of the
person claiming the exemption, plus the disposable income of his or her
spouse, and the disposable income of each cotenant occupying the
residence for the assessment year, less amounts paid by the person
claiming the exemption or his or her spouse during the assessment year
for:
(a) Drugs supplied by prescription of a medical practitioner
authorized by the laws of this state or another jurisdiction to issue
prescriptions;
(b) The treatment or care of either person received in the home or
in a nursing home, boarding home, or adult family home; and
(c) Health care insurance premiums for medicare under Title XVIII
of the social security act.
(5) "Disposable income" means adjusted gross income as defined in
the federal internal revenue code, as amended prior to January 1, 1989,
or such subsequent date as the director may provide by rule consistent
with the purpose of this section, plus all of the following items to
the extent they are not included in or have been deducted from adjusted
gross income:
(a) Capital gains, other than gain excluded from income under
section 121 of the federal internal revenue code to the extent it is
reinvested in a new principal residence;
(b) Amounts deducted for loss;
(c) Amounts deducted for depreciation;
(d) Pension and annuity receipts;
(e) Military pay and benefits other than attendant-care and
medical-aid payments;
(f) Veterans benefits other than attendant-care and medical-aid
payments;
(g) Federal social security act and railroad retirement benefits;
(h) Dividend receipts; and
(i) Interest received on state and municipal bonds.
(6) "Cotenant" means a person who resides with the person claiming
the exemption and who has an ownership interest in the residence.
(7) "Disability" has the same meaning as provided in 42 U.S.C. Sec.
423(d)(1)(A) as amended prior to January 1, 2004, or such subsequent
date as the director may provide by rule consistent with the purpose of
this section.
(8) "Veteran" has the same meaning as provided under RCW 41.04.005.

Sec. 4 RCW 84.36.385 and 2001 c 185 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A claim for exemption under RCW 84.36.381 or section 2 of this
act as now or hereafter amended, shall be made and filed at any time
during the year for exemption from taxes payable the following year and
thereafter and solely upon forms as prescribed and furnished by the
department of revenue. However, an exemption from tax under RCW
84.36.381 or section 2 of this act shall continue for no more than four
years unless a renewal application is filed as provided in subsection
(3) of this section. The county assessor may also require, by written
notice, a renewal application following an amendment of the income
requirements set forth in RCW 84.36.381 or section 2 of this act.
Renewal applications shall be on forms prescribed and furnished by the
department of revenue.
(2) A person granted an exemption under RCW 84.36.381 or section 2
of this act shall inform the county assessor of any change in status
affecting the person's entitlement to the exemption on forms prescribed
and furnished by the department of revenue.
(3) Each person exempt from taxes under RCW 84.36.381 ((in 1993 and
thereafter,)) or section 2 of this act shall file with the county
assessor a renewal application not later than December 31 of the year
the assessor notifies such person of the requirement to file the
renewal application.
(4)(a) An application for exemption under section 2 of this act
must be accompanied by the following documentation to substantiate the
request for the exemption and any other documentation required by the
county in which the exemption is sought:
(i) The deceased veteran's DD 214 report of separation, or its
equivalent, that must be under honorable conditions;
(ii) A copy of the applicant's certificate of marriage to the
deceased;
(iii) A copy of the deceased veteran's death certificate; and
(iv) A letter from the United States veterans' administration
certifying that the death of the veteran meets the requirements of
section 2(3) of this act.
(b) The Washington state department of veterans affairs shall
assist an eligible widow or widower in the preparation and submission
of an application and the procurement of necessary substantiating
documentation to satisfy the pertinent county assessor's or other
designated official's requirements for obtaining the property tax
exemption under section 2 of this act.
(5) Beginning in 1992 and in each of the three succeeding years,
the county assessor shall notify approximately one-fourth of those
persons exempt from taxes under RCW 84.36.381 or section 2 of this act
in the current year who have not filed a renewal application within the
previous four years, of the requirement to file a renewal application.
(((5))) (6) If the assessor finds that the applicant does not meet
the qualifications as set forth in RCW 84.36.381 or section 2 of this
act, as now or hereafter amended, the claim or exemption shall be
denied but such denial shall be subject to appeal under the provisions
of RCW 84.48.010(5) and in accordance with the provisions of RCW
84.40.038. If the applicant had received exemption in prior years
based on erroneous information, the taxes shall be collected subject to
penalties as provided in RCW 84.40.130 for a period of not to exceed
three years.
(((6))) (7) The department and each local assessor is hereby
directed to publicize the qualifications and manner of making claims
under RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389 and section 2 of this act,
through communications media, including such paid advertisements or
notices as it deems appropriate. Notice of the qualifications, method
of making applications, the penalties for not reporting a change in
status, and availability of further information shall be included on or
with property tax statements and revaluation notices for all
residential property including mobile homes, except rental properties.

Sec. 5 RCW 84.36.387 and 2003 c 53 s 408 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All claims for exemption shall be made and signed by the person
entitled to the exemption, by his or her attorney in fact or in the
event the residence of such person is under mortgage or purchase
contract requiring accumulation of reserves out of which the holder of
the mortgage or contract is required to pay real estate taxes, by such
holder or by the owner, either before two witnesses or the county
assessor or his or her deputy in the county where the real property is
located: PROVIDED, That if a claim for exemption is made by a person
living in a cooperative housing association, corporation, or
partnership, such claim shall be made and signed by the person entitled
to the exemption and by the authorized agent of such cooperative.
(2) If the taxpayer is unable to submit his or her own claim, the
claim shall be submitted by a duly authorized agent or by a guardian or
other person charged with the care of the person or property of such
taxpayer.
(3) All claims for exemption and renewal applications shall be
accompanied by such documented verification of income as shall be
prescribed by rule adopted by the department of revenue.
(4) Any person signing a false claim with the intent to defraud or
evade the payment of any tax is guilty of perjury under chapter 9A.72
RCW.
(5) The tax liability of a cooperative housing association,
corporation, or partnership shall be reduced by the amount of tax
exemption to which a claimant residing therein is entitled and such
cooperative shall reduce any amount owed by the claimant to the
cooperative by such exact amount of tax exemption or, if no amount be
owed, the cooperative shall make payment to the claimant of such exact
amount of exemption.
(6) A remainderman or other person who would have otherwise paid
the tax on real property that is the subject of an exemption granted
under RCW 84.36.381 or section 2 of this act for an estate for life
shall reduce the amount which would have been payable by the life
tenant to the remainderman or other person to the extent of the
exemption. If no amount is owed or separately stated as an obligation
between these persons, the remainderman or other person shall make
payment to the life tenant in the exact amount of the exemption.

Sec. 6 RCW 84.36.389 and 1979 ex.s. c 214 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director of the department of revenue shall adopt such
rules and regulations and prescribe such forms as may be necessary and
appropriate for implementation and administration of this chapter
subject to chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act.
(2) The department may conduct such audits of the administration of
RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389 and section 2 of this act and the
claims for exemption filed thereunder as it considers necessary. The
powers of the department under chapter 84.08 RCW apply to these audits.
(3) Any information or facts concerning confidential income data
obtained by the assessor or the department, or their agents or
employees, under subsection (2) of this section shall be used only to
administer RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389 and section 2 of this act.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, absent written
consent by the person about whom the information or facts have been
obtained, the confidential income data shall not be disclosed by the
assessor or the assessor's agents or employees to anyone other than the
department or the department's agents or employees nor by the
department or the department's agents or employees to anyone other than
the assessor or the assessor's agents or employees except in a judicial
proceeding pertaining to the taxpayer's entitlement to the tax
exemption under RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389 and section 2 of this
act. Any violation of this subsection is a misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2006 and thereafter.

--- END ---