BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.36.030 and 1993 c 327 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following real and personal property shall be exempt from
taxation:
(1)(a) Property owned by nonprofit organizations or associations,
organized and conducted for nonsectarian purposes, which shall be used
for character-building, benevolent, protective or rehabilitative social
services directed at persons of all ages.
(b) The sale of donated merchandise shall not be considered a
commercial use of the property under this section if the proceeds are
devoted to the furtherance of the purposes of the selling organization
or association as specified in this ((paragraph)) subsection (1).
(c) In a county with a population of less than twenty thousand, the
rental or use of property, owned by a nonprofit organization or
association described in (a) of this subsection, by a person, group, or
organization in one of the following ways shall not nullify the
exemption:
(i) The property may be rented or used for pecuniary gain or for
business activities or by individuals, groups, and organizations for
private purposes if the rental or use:
(A) Does not exceed fifteen days each assessment year; and
(B) All income from the rental or use of the exempt property is
used for capital improvements to the exempt property, maintenance and
operation of the exempt property, or for exempt purposes; or
(ii) The property is rented or used by a nonprofit community group
or other nonprofit organization that might not qualify for exemption if
it owned the property as long as the rental or use of the property:
(A) Does not exceed fifteen days each assessment year;
(B) Does not result in pecuniary gain;
(C) Does not involve business activities;
(D) Is always for the general public good; and
(E) All income from the rental or use of the exempt property is
used for capital improvements to the exempt property, maintenance and
operation of the exempt property, or for exempt purposes.
(2) Property owned by any nonprofit church, denomination, group of
churches, or an organization or association, the membership of which is
comprised solely of churches or their qualified representatives, which
is utilized as a camp facility if used for organized and supervised
recreational activities and church purposes as related to such camp
facilities. The exemption provided by this paragraph shall apply to a
maximum of two hundred acres of any such camp as selected by the
church, including buildings and other improvements thereon.
(3) Property, including buildings and improvements required for the
maintenance and safeguarding of such property, owned by nonprofit
organizations or associations engaged in character building of boys and
girls under eighteen years of age, and used for such purposes and uses,
provided such purposes and uses are for the general public good:
PROVIDED, That if existing charters provide that organizations or
associations, which would otherwise qualify under the provisions of
this paragraph, serve boys and girls up to the age of twenty-one years,
then such organizations or associations shall be deemed qualified
pursuant to this section.
(4)(a) Property owned by all organizations and societies of
veterans of any war of the United States, recognized as such by the
department of defense, which shall have national charters, and which
shall have for their general purposes and objects the preservation of
the memories and associations incident to their war service and the
consecration of the efforts of their members to mutual helpfulness and
to patriotic and community service to state and nation. To be exempt
such property must be used in such manner as may be reasonably
necessary to carry out the purposes and objects of such societies.
(b) The use of the property for pecuniary gain or ((to promote))
for business activities, except as provided in this subsection (4),
nullifies the exemption otherwise available for the property for the
assessment year. The exemption is not nullified by:
(((a))) (i) The collection of rent or donations if the amount is
reasonable and does not exceed maintenance and operation expenses.
(((b))) (ii) Fund-raising activities conducted by a nonprofit
organization.
(((c))) (iii) The use of the property for pecuniary gain for
periods of not more than ((three)) fifteen days in a year.
(((d))) (c) An inadvertent use of the property in a manner
inconsistent with the purpose for which exemption is granted, if the
inadvertent use is not part of a pattern of use. A pattern of use is
presumed when an inadvertent use is repeated in the same assessment
year or in two or more successive assessment years.
(5) Property owned by all corporations, incorporated under any act
of congress, whose principal purposes are to furnish volunteer aid to
members of the armed forces of the United States and also to carry on
a system of national and international relief and to apply the same in
mitigating the sufferings caused by pestilence, famine, fire, floods,
and other national calamities and to devise and carry on measures for
preventing the same.
(6) Property owned by nonprofit organizations exempt from federal
income tax under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of
1954, as amended, that are guarantee agencies under the federal
guaranteed student loan program or that issue debt to provide or
acquire student loans.
(7) To be exempt under this section, the property must be used
exclusively for the purposes for which exemption is granted, except as
provided in RCW 84.36.805.
(8) For the purposes of this section, "general public good" means
members of the community derive a benefit from the rental or use of the
property by the nonprofit community group or organization.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.36.031 and 1969 c 137 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Property leased, loaned, sold with the option to repurchase, or
otherwise made available to organizations ((as set out)) described in
RCW 84.36.030 above shall not be exempt from taxation((: PROVIDED,
That property which)). However, property that is owned by an
organization ((as set out in)) exempt under RCW 84.36.030 may loan,
lease, or rent the property to another organization for the same
purpose as set out in RCW 84.36.030.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.36.037 and 1998 c 311 s 19 and 1998 c 189 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Real or personal property owned by a nonprofit organization,
association, or corporation in connection with the operation of a
public assembly hall or meeting place is exempt from taxation. The
area exempt under this section includes the building or buildings, the
land under the buildings, and an additional area necessary for parking,
not exceeding a total of one acre. When property for which exemption
is sought is essentially unimproved except for restroom facilities and
structures and this property has been used primarily for annual
community celebration events for at least ten years, the exempt
property shall not exceed twenty-nine acres.
(2) To qualify for this exemption the property must be used
exclusively for public gatherings and be available to all organizations
or persons desiring to use the property, but the owner may impose
conditions and restrictions which are necessary for the safekeeping of
the property and promote the purposes of this exemption. Membership
shall not be a prerequisite for the use of the property.
(3) The use of the property for pecuniary gain or ((to promote))
for business activities, except as provided in this section, nullifies
the exemption otherwise available for the property for the assessment
year. The exemption is not nullified by:
(a) The collection of rent or donations if ((the amount is
reasonable and does not exceed maintenance and operation expenses
created by the user)) all funds collected are used for capital
improvements to the exempt property, maintenance and operation of the
exempt property, or for exempt purposes.
(b) Fund-raising activities conducted by a nonprofit organization.
(c) The use of the property for pecuniary gain ((or to promote)),
for business activities for periods of not more than ((seven)) fifteen
days ((in a)) each assessment year so long as all income received from
rental or use of the exempt property is used for capital improvements
to the exempt property, maintenance and operation of the exempt
property, or for exempt purposes.
(d) In a county with a population of less than ((ten)) twenty
thousand, the use of the property to promote the following business
activities: Dance lessons, art classes, or music lessons.
(e) An inadvertent use of the property in a manner inconsistent
with the purpose for which exemption is granted, if the inadvertent use
is not part of a pattern of use. A pattern of use is presumed when an
inadvertent use is repeated in the same assessment year or in two or
more successive assessment years.
(4) The department of revenue shall narrowly construe this
exemption.

Sec. 4 RCW 84.36.810 and 2003 c 344 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Upon cessation of a use under which an exemption has been
granted pursuant to RCW 84.36.030, 84.36.037, 84.36.040, 84.36.041,
84.36.042, 84.36.043, 84.36.046, 84.36.050, 84.36.060, 84.36.550,
((84.36.650,)) 84.36.560, ((and)) 84.36.570, and 84.36.650, except as
provided in (b) of this subsection, the county treasurer shall collect
all taxes which would have been paid had the property not been exempt
during the three years preceding, or the life of such exemption, if
such be less, together with the interest at the same rate and computed
in the same way as that upon delinquent property taxes. If the
property has been granted an exemption for more than ten consecutive
years, taxes and interest shall not be assessed under this section.
(b) Upon cessation of use by an institution of higher education of
property exempt under RCW 84.36.050(2) the county treasurer shall
collect all taxes which would have been paid had the property not been
exempt during the seven years preceding, or the life of the exemption,
whichever is less.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section applies only when ownership of
the property is transferred or when fifty-one percent or more of the
area of the property loses its exempt status. The additional tax under
subsection (1) of this section shall not be imposed if the cessation of
use resulted solely from:
(a) Transfer to a nonprofit organization, association, or
corporation for a use which also qualifies and is granted exemption
under this chapter;
(b) A taking through the exercise of the power of eminent domain,
or sale or transfer to an entity having the power of eminent domain in
anticipation of the exercise of such power;
(c) Official action by an agency of the state of Washington or by
the county or city within which the property is located which disallows
the present use of such property;
(d) A natural disaster such as a flood, windstorm, earthquake, or
other such calamity rather than by virtue of the act of the
organization, association, or corporation changing the use of such
property;
(e) Relocation of the activity and use of another location or site
except for undeveloped properties of camp facilities exempted under RCW
84.36.030;
(f) Cancellation of a lease on leased property that had been exempt
under this chapter; ((or))
(g) A change in the exempt portion of a home for the aging under
RCW 84.36.041(3), as long as some portion of the home remains exempt;
or
(h) Transfer to an agency of the state of Washington or the city or
county within which the property is located.
(3) Subsection((s)) (2)(e) and (f) of this section do not apply to
property leased to a state institution of higher education and exempt
under RCW 84.36.050(2).

--- END ---