BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.92.015 and 2000 c 93 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
"Veterinary technician" means a person who has successfully
completed an examination administered by the board and who has either
successfully completed a post high school course approved by the board
in the care and treatment of animals or ((had five years' practical
experience, acceptable to the board, with a licensed veterinarian)) has
completed five years of practical experience with a licensed
veterinarian that the board has deemed acceptable prior to December 31,
2009.
"Board" means the Washington state veterinary board of governors.
"Department" means the department of health.
"Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health.
"Veterinary medication clerk" means a person who has satisfactorily
completed a board-approved training program developed in consultation
with the board of pharmacy and designed to prepare persons to perform
certain nondiscretionary functions defined by the board and used in the
dispensing of legend and nonlegend drugs (except controlled substances
as defined in or under chapter 69.50 RCW) associated with the practice
of veterinary medicine.

--- END ---