BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.37.020 and 1977 ex.s. c 355 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every vehicle upon a highway within this state at any time from
a half hour after sunset to a half hour before sunrise and at any other
time when, due to insufficient light or unfavorable atmospheric
conditions, persons and vehicles on the highway are not clearly
discernible at a distance of one thousand feet ahead shall display
lighted head lights, other lights, and illuminating devices as
hereinafter respectively required for different classes of vehicles,
subject to exceptions with respect to parked vehicles, and such stop
lights, turn signals, and other signaling devices shall be lighted as
prescribed for the use of such devices.
(2) Drivers may not use dedicated day-time running lights, as
defined in 49 CFR 571.108 S5.5.11(a) on the effective date of this act,
or reduced intensity upper-beam head lights as defined in 49 CFR
571.108 S5.5.11(a)(1)(ii) on the effective date of this act, during
times or conditions when head lights must be displayed as required by
subsection (1) of this section.

--- END ---