BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the health of
the children of Washington state is critical to their success in school
and throughout their lives. While health insurance coverage is a
substantial component of achieving better health outcomes for children,
ensuring access to essential preventive and well-child health services
is equally important. Preventive and well-child health services are a
cost-effective investment of both public and private dollars that
improves the health of children and of our communities at large.
(2) The legislature further finds that "kids get care" assures that
integrated preventive medical, oral, and developmental health services
are provided to young children. Improving the delivery of well child
visits, preventive oral health services, and developmental screening
can reduce the need for hospitalization, caries treatment, and
developmental interventions. "Kids get care" expands the use of
evidence-based preventive measures in community health centers and
private medical practices that treat many low-income children. "Kids
get care" also strengthens the connections between social service
agencies working with low-income families and local health care
providers.
(3) It is therefore the intent of the legislature to facilitate
low-income children's access to appropriate preventive and well-child
services and to other necessary health, mental health, and dental
services by supporting the extension of the successful "kids get care"
model for delivering health services to children.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of health shall develop and implement best
practices in preventive health care for children statewide. The
department of health and the "kids get care" program of public health -Seattle and King county shall work in collaboration with local health
care agencies and providers to disseminate strategic interventions that
are focused on evidence-based best practices for improving health
outcomes in children and saving health care costs. An interim report
shall be provided to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
June 30, 2006, on the program's effectiveness and cost savings. A
final report shall be provided by June 30, 2007. The department of
health and the kids get care program of public health - Seattle and
King county shall work with the department of social and health
services to obtain any federal medicaid matching funds that could be
available to support the services of kids get care sites.
(2) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose, and subject to any conditions and limitations in the
appropriations act:
(a) The department shall support the infrastructure of the
children's preventive health care collaborative, a structured set of
learning sessions to train medical practices about kids get care.
State appropriations shall be matched by an equal amount of local
funding;
(b) The department shall support five additional kids get care
sites to be implemented during fiscal year 2006 and ten additional kids
get care sites to be implemented during fiscal year 2007. The sites
shall use the services of a case manager and public health educator to
enhance the ability of health care providers to meet the needs of low-income children in their care; and
(c) The department shall support a structured evaluation of the
kids get care service delivery model. Preventive health care measures
and cost data shall be collected. Outcomes for children cared for by
clinics that are kids get care sites shall be compared to outcomes for
children not receiving care at kids get care sites.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for this act is not
referenced by bill or chapter number in the biennial omnibus
appropriations act by June 30, 2005, this act is null and void.

--- END ---