BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 INTENT. The legislature intends to create
the office of national guard ombudsman to be an advocate for men and
women serving in the national guard and their families, especially
those serving abroad with families at home and those returning home
from war. The ombudsman's role is to navigate government services
available to these men and women and their families, and connect them
with the appropriate services and counseling related to the special
needs that they might have, including mental health and counseling
services, marriage support, health care issues, pension and salary
issues, and job issues.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 OFFICE CREATED--PURPOSE. The office of
national guard ombudsman is created in the office of the governor for
the purpose of helping national guard members and their dependents
obtain needed services to ensure an economic and healthy quality of
life in the community. The focus of the office is to assist men and
women serving in the national guard who are currently serving abroad
with families remaining at home, as well as those who are returning
home, and the special needs that they might have, including mental
health and counseling services, marriage support, health care issues,
pension and salary issues, and job issues.
The office shall offer guidance, representation, and assistance
with the problems that members of the national guard and their family
members face, assisting in their economic and social welfare, and
facilitating equity in the receipt of benefits and privileges that
federal and state laws grant.
The office shall promote public awareness and understanding of
services, identifying system issues and responses for the governor and
the legislature to act upon, and monitoring and ensuring compliance
with administrative acts, relevant statutes, rules, and policies
pertaining to these issues.
The ombudsman shall report directly to the governor and shall
exercise his or her powers and duties independently of the director of
the department of veterans affairs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 OMBUDSMAN--APPOINTMENT, TERM OF OFFICE. (1)
Subject to confirmation by the senate, the governor shall appoint an
ombudsman who shall be a person of recognized judgment, independence,
objectivity, and integrity, and shall be qualified by training or
experience, or both, in services and policy relating to national guard
service. Before the appointment, the governor shall consult with the
joint committee on veterans' and military affairs created in RCW
73.04.150 and with other appropriate organizations regarding the
selection of the ombudsman.
(2) The appointed ombudsman shall hold office for a term of three
years and shall continue to hold office until reappointed or until his
or her successor is appointed.
(3) The governor may remove the ombudsman only for neglect of duty,
misconduct, or inability to perform duties.
(4) Any vacancy shall be filled by similar appointment for the
remainder of the unexpired term.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 DUTIES. The ombudsman shall:
(1) Be an advocate for men and women serving in the national guard
and their families, with particular focus on those who are serving
abroad and their families at home, and on those returning home from
duty, and the special needs that they might have, including mental
health and counseling services, marriage support, health care issues,
pension and salary issues, and employment issues;
(2) Provide information as appropriate on the rights and
responsibilities of individuals and their dependents receiving services
based on their national guard duty;
(3) Investigate, upon his or her own initiative or upon receipt of
a complaint, an administrative act alleged to be contrary to law, rule,
or policy, imposed without an adequate statement of reason, or based on
irrelevant, immaterial, or erroneous grounds; however, the ombudsman
may decline to investigate any complaint as provided by rules adopted
under this chapter;
(4) Monitor the procedures as established, implemented, and
practiced by the department of veterans affairs to carry out its
responsibilities in delivering services and assistance with a view
toward appropriate preservation of the quality of life of those serving
in the national guard and their dependents;
(5) Review periodically the facilities, procedures, and programs of
state agencies serving those serving in the national guard and their
dependents;
(6) Recommend changes in the procedures for addressing the needs of
those serving in the national guard and their dependents;
(7) Submit annually to the joint committee on veterans' and
military affairs and to the governor by November 1st a report analyzing
the work of the office including recommendations; and
(8) Adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 CONFIDENTIALITY. The ombudsman shall treat
all matters under investigation, including the identities of service
recipients, complainants, and individuals from whom information is
acquired, as confidential, except as far as disclosures may be
necessary to enable the ombudsman to perform the duties of the office
and to support any recommendations resulting from an investigation.
Upon receipt of information that by law is confidential or privileged,
the ombudsman shall maintain the confidentiality of such information
and shall not further disclose or disseminate the information except as
provided by applicable state or federal law. Investigative records of
the office of the ombudsman are confidential and are exempt from public
disclosure under chapter 42.17 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW
to read as follows:
The disclosure requirements of this chapter do not apply to
information gathered under chapter 43.-- RCW (sections 1 through 5 and
7 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this
chapter are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 5 and 7 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---