BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.42.100 and 2002 c 229 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person is guilty of the crime of endangerment with a controlled
substance if:
(1) The person ((knowingly or intentionally permits a dependent
child or dependent adult to be exposed to, ingest, inhale, or have
contact with methamphetamine or ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
anhydrous ammonia, that are being used in the manufacture of
methamphetamine)) manufactures, delivers, or possesses with the intent
to manufacture or deliver, a controlled substance in violation of
chapter 69.50 RCW, upon the same premises where a child or dependent
adult is present.
(2) As used in this section, "premises" means any:
(a) Motor vehicle or vessel;
(b) Dwelling or rental unit including, but not limited to,
apartment, townhouse, condominium, mobile home, manufactured home,
motel room, or hotel room;
(c) Dwelling house, its curtilage, and any other outbuildings.
(3) Endangerment with a controlled substance is a class B felony.

--- END ---