BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.010 and 2004 c 153 s 406 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Selling price" includes "sales price." "Sales price" means
the total amount of consideration, except separately stated trade-in
property of like kind, including cash, credit, property, and services,
for which tangible personal property or services defined as a "retail
sale" under RCW 82.04.050 are sold, leased, or rented, valued in money,
whether received in money or otherwise. No deduction from the total
amount of consideration is allowed for the following: (a) The seller's
cost of the property sold; (b) the cost of materials used, labor or
service cost, interest, losses, all costs of transportation to the
seller, all taxes imposed on the seller, and any other expense of the
seller; (c) charges by the seller for any services necessary to
complete the sale, other than delivery and installation charges; (d)
delivery charges; (e) installation charges; and (f) the value of exempt
tangible personal property given to the purchaser where taxable and
exempt tangible personal property have been bundled together and sold
by the seller as a single product or piece of merchandise. "Sales
price" includes all initiation fees and dues received by persons
engaging in amusement and recreation services under RCW
82.04.050(3)(a), physical fitness services under RCW 82.04.050(3)(g),
or lodging and other services under RCW 82.04.050(2)(f).
When tangible personal property is rented or leased under
circumstances that the consideration paid does not represent a
reasonable rental for the use of the articles so rented or leased, the
"selling price" shall be determined as nearly as possible according to
the value of such use at the places of use of similar products of like
quality and character under such rules as the department may prescribe.
"Selling price" or "sales price" does not include: Discounts,
including cash, term, or coupons that are not reimbursed by a third
party that are allowed by a seller and taken by a purchaser on a sale;
interest, financing, and carrying charges from credit extended on the
sale of tangible personal property or services, if the amount is
separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document
given to the purchaser; and any taxes legally imposed directly on the
consumer that are separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or
similar document given to the purchaser;
(2) "Seller" means every person, including the state and its
departments and institutions, making sales at retail or retail sales to
a buyer, purchaser, or consumer, whether as agent, broker, or
principal, except "seller" does not mean the state and its departments
and institutions when making sales to the state and its departments and
institutions;
(3) "Buyer," "purchaser," and "consumer" include, without limiting
the scope hereof, every individual, receiver, assignee, trustee in
bankruptcy, trust, estate, firm, copartnership, joint venture, club,
company, joint stock company, business trust, corporation, association,
society, or any group of individuals acting as a unit, whether mutual,
cooperative, fraternal, nonprofit, or otherwise, municipal corporation,
quasi municipal corporation, and also the state, its departments and
institutions and all political subdivisions thereof, irrespective of
the nature of the activities engaged in or functions performed, and
also the United States or any instrumentality thereof;
(4) "Delivery charges" means charges by the seller of personal
property or services for preparation and delivery to a location
designated by the purchaser of personal property or services including,
but not limited to, transportation, shipping, postage, handling,
crating, and packing;
(5) The meaning attributed in chapter 82.04 RCW to the terms "tax
year," "taxable year," "person," "company," "sale," "sale at retail,"
"retail sale," "sale at wholesale," "wholesale," "business," "engaging
in business," "cash discount," "successor," "consumer," "in this state"
and "within this state" shall apply equally to the provisions of this
chapter;
(6) For the purposes of the taxes imposed under this chapter and
under chapter 82.12 RCW, "tangible personal property" means personal
property that can be seen, weighed, measured, felt, or touched, or that
is in any other manner perceptible to the senses. Tangible personal
property includes electricity, water, gas, steam, and prewritten
computer software.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.4282 and 1994 c 124 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax
amounts derived from bona fide (1) initiation fees, (2) dues, (3)
contributions, (4) donations, (5) tuition fees, (6) charges made by a
nonprofit trade or professional organization for attending or occupying
space at a trade show, convention, or educational seminar sponsored by
the nonprofit trade or professional organization, which trade show,
convention, or educational seminar is not open to the general public,
(7) charges made for operation of privately operated kindergartens, and
(8) endowment funds. This section shall not be construed to exempt any
person, association, or society from tax liability upon selling
tangible personal property or upon providing facilities or services for
which a special charge is made to members or others. If dues are in
exchange for any significant amount of goods or services rendered by
the recipient thereof to members without any additional charge to the
member, or if the dues are graduated upon the amount of goods or
services rendered, the value of such goods or services shall not be
considered as a deduction under this section.
The deduction under this section for initiation fees and dues is
not available to any person engaging in amusement and recreation
services under RCW 82.04.050(3)(a), physical fitness services under RCW
82.04.050(3)(g), or lodging and other services under RCW
82.04.050(2)(f).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---