BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Arthritis encompasses more than one hundred diseases and
conditions that affect joints, the surrounding tissues, and other
connective tissues;
(b) Arthritis affects more than eight hundred thousand people in
Washington state;
(c) Compounding this picture are the enormous costs associated with
treating arthritis and its complications, which account for a total of
forty-nine thousand one hundred thirty-one hospital days and direct
charges of two hundred one million dollars in Washington state;
(d) Arthritis is the leading cause of disability nationwide,
significantly impacting the quality of life not only for the individual
who experiences its painful symptoms and resulting disability, but also
for family members and caregivers; and
(e) Although prevailing myths inaccurately portray arthritis as a
disease that affects primarily seniors, arthritis affects people of all
ages and has become one of the country's most pressing public health
problems.
(2) The purposes of this chapter are:
(a) To create and foster a statewide pilot project that promotes
public awareness and increases knowledge about the causes of arthritis,
the importance of early diagnosis and appropriate management, effective
prevention strategies, and pain prevention and management;
(b) To develop knowledge and enhance understanding of arthritis by
disseminating underutilized but available educational materials and
resources, information on research results, programs and services
provided, and strategies for prevention and control to patients, health
professionals, and the public;
(c) To implement and coordinate state and local pilot projects and
services to reduce the public health burden of arthritis; and
(d) To provide lasting improvements in the delivery of health care
for individuals with arthritis and their families, thus improving their
quality of life while also containing health care costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department of health shall contract
with the arthritis foundation Washington/Alaska chapter to establish a
two-year pilot project that would help reduce and prevent disability
associated with arthritis by consolidating and disseminating
underutilized educational materials and resources to raise public
awareness, educate consumers, educate and train health professionals,
teachers, and human services providers, and for other purposes.
(2) The department of health shall include in this contract a needs
assessment to identify:
(a) Epidemiological and other public health research being
conducted within the state;
(b) Available technical assistance and educational materials and
pilot projects nationwide and within the state;
(c) The services available to a person with arthritis;
(d) The existence of arthritis treatment, self-management, physical
activity, and other education pilot projects; and
(e) The existence of rehabilitation services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The secretary of health shall provide
sufficient staff to assist the arthritis foundation Washington/Alaska
chapter in the implementation of the pilot project created in section
2 of this act to prevent and reduce disability associated with
arthritis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The contract with the arthritis
foundation Washington/Alaska chapter must include a voluntary advisory
panel on arthritis that will provide nongovernmental input regarding
the arthritis prevention and control pilot project created in section
2 of this act. Membership includes, but is not limited to, persons
with arthritis, public health educators, medical experts on arthritis,
providers of arthritis health care, persons knowledgeable in health
promotion and education, and representatives of the arthritis
foundation.
(2) The advisory panel shall use, but is not limited to, strategies
consistent with the national arthritis action plan and existing
resources to raise public awareness and knowledge on the causes and
nature of arthritis, personal risk factors, the value of prevention and
early detection, ways to minimize preventable pain, and options for
diagnosing and treating the disease.
(3) The advisory panel shall report findings from their work to the
legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The secretary of health shall accept grants,
services, and property from the federal government, foundations,
organizations, medical schools, and other entities as are available for
the purposes of fulfilling the obligations of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The secretary of health shall seek any
federal waiver or waivers that are necessary to maximize funds from the
federal government to implement this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act may be known and cited as the pilot
project to prevent and reduce disability associated with arthritis.

--- END ---