BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.41.120 and 2004 c 261 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall make or cause to be made ((at least yearly))
an inspection of all hospitals at least every eighteen months. Every
inspection of a hospital may include an inspection of every part of the
premises. The department may make an examination of all phases of the
hospital operation necessary to determine compliance with the law and
the standards, rules and regulations adopted thereunder. Any licensee
or applicant desiring to make alterations or additions to its
facilities or to construct new facilities shall, before commencing such
alteration, addition or new construction, comply with the regulations
prescribed by the department.
No hospital licensed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter
shall be required to be inspected or licensed under other state laws or
rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, or local ordinances,
relative to hotels, restaurants, lodging houses, boarding houses,
places of refreshment, nursing homes, maternity homes, or psychiatric
hospitals.
To avoid unnecessary duplication in inspections, the department
shall coordinate with the department of social and health services, the
office of the state fire marshal, and local agencies when inspecting
facilities over which each agency has jurisdiction, the facilities
including but not necessarily being limited to hospitals with both
acute care and skilled nursing or psychiatric nursing functions. The
department shall notify the office of the state fire marshal and the
relevant local agency at least four weeks prior to any inspection
conducted under this section and invite their attendance at the
inspection, and shall provide a copy of its inspection report to each
agency upon completion.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.41.122 and 1999 c 41 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Notwithstanding RCW 70.41.120, a hospital accredited)) Surveys
conducted by the joint commission on the accreditation of health care
organizations or the American osteopathic association ((is not subject
to the annual inspection provided for)) on hospitals accredited by
those bodies shall be deemed equivalent to a department survey for
purposes of meeting the requirements for the survey specified in RCW
70.41.120 if((:
(1))) the department determines that the applicable survey
standards of the joint commission on the accreditation of health care
organizations or the American osteopathic association are substantially
equivalent to its own((;
(2) It has been inspected by the joint commission on the
accreditation of health care organizations or the American osteopathic
association within the previous twelve months; and
(3) The department receives directly from the joint commission on
the accreditation of health care organizations, the American
osteopathic association, or the hospital itself copies of the survey
reports prepared by the joint commission on the accreditation of health
care organizations or the American osteopathic association
demonstrating that the hospital meets applicable standards)).
(1) Hospitals so surveyed shall provide to the department within
thirty days of learning the result of a survey documentary evidence
that the hospital has been certified as a result of a survey and the
date of the survey.
(2) Hospitals shall make available to department surveyors the
written reports of such surveys during department surveys, upon
request.

--- END ---