BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.70.460 and 2004 c 184 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may establish a program to purchase and maintain
liability malpractice insurance for retired primary and specialty care
providers who provide ((primary)) health care services to low-income
patients. The following conditions apply to the program:
(a) ((Primary)) Health care services shall be provided at clinics
serving low-income patients that are public or private tax-exempt
corporations or other established practice settings as defined by the
department;
(b) ((Primary)) Health care services provided at the clinics shall
be offered to low-income patients based on their ability to pay;
(c) Retired ((primary)) health care providers providing health care
services shall not receive compensation for their services; and
(d) The department shall contract only with a liability insurer
authorized to offer liability malpractice insurance in the state.
(e) Specialists in this program will be limited to those whose
malpractice insurance premiums are comparable to primary care
providers.
(2) This section and RCW 43.70.470 shall not be interpreted to
require a liability insurer to provide coverage to a ((primary)) health
care provider should the insurer determine that coverage should not be
offered to a ((primary)) health care provider because of past claims
experience or for other appropriate reasons.
(3) The state and its employees who operate the program shall be
immune from any civil or criminal action involving claims against
clinics or ((primary)) health care providers that provided health care
services under this section and RCW 43.70.470. This protection of
immunity shall not extend to any clinic or ((primary)) health care
provider participating in the program.
(4) The department may monitor the claims experience of retired
((primary)) health care providers covered by liability insurers
contracting with the department.
(5) The department may provide liability insurance under chapter
113, Laws of 1992 only to the extent funds are provided for this
purpose by the legislature. If there are insufficient funds to support
all applications for liability insurance coverage, priority shall be
given to those retired ((primary)) health care providers working at
clinics operated by public or private tax-exempt corporations rather
than clinics operated by for-profit corporations.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.70.470 and 2004 c 184 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department may establish by rule the conditions of
participation in the liability insurance program by retired ((primary))
health care providers at clinics utilizing retired ((primary)) health
care providers for the purposes of this section and RCW 43.70.460.
These conditions shall include, but not be limited to, the following:
(1) The participating ((primary)) health care provider associated
with the clinic shall hold a valid license to practice as a physician
under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW, a naturopath under chapter 18.36A
RCW, a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A or 18.57A RCW, an
advanced registered nurse practitioner under chapter ((18.88)) 18.79
RCW, a dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW, or other health professionals
as may be deemed in short supply ((in the health personnel resource
plan under chapter 28B.125 RCW. A primary care provider may include a
specialist who is practicing in a primary care capacity)) by the
department. All ((primary)) health care providers must be in
conformity with current requirements for licensure ((as a retired
primary care provider)), including continuing education requirements;
(2) ((The participating primary care provider shall limit the scope
of practice in the clinic to primary care. Primary)) Health care shall
be limited to noninvasive procedures and shall not include obstetrical
care((, or any specialized care and treatment)). Noninvasive
procedures include injections, suturing of minor lacerations, and
incisions of boils or superficial abscesses. Primary dental care shall
be limited to diagnosis, oral hygiene, restoration, and extractions and
shall not include orthodontia, or other specialized care and treatment;
(3) The provision of liability insurance coverage shall not extend
to acts outside the scope of rendering ((medical)) health care services
pursuant to this section and RCW 43.70.460;
(4) The participating ((primary)) health care provider shall limit
the provision of health care services to primarily low-income persons
provided that clinics may, but are not required to, provide means tests
for eligibility as a condition for obtaining health care services;
(5) The participating ((primary)) health care provider shall not
accept compensation for providing health care services from patients
served pursuant to this section and RCW 43.70.460, nor from clinics
serving these patients. "Compensation" shall mean any remuneration of
value to the participating ((primary)) health care provider for
services provided by the ((primary)) health care provider, but shall
not be construed to include any nominal copayments charged by the
clinic, nor reimbursement of related expenses of a participating
((primary)) health care provider authorized by the clinic in advance of
being incurred; and
(6) The use of mediation or arbitration for resolving questions of
potential liability may be used, however any mediation or arbitration
agreement format shall be expressed in terms clear enough for a person
with a sixth grade level of education to understand, and on a form no
longer than one page in length.

--- END ---