BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.54.360 and 2003 c 273 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary of health shall design a state plan for education
efforts concerning hepatitis C and the prevention and management of the
disease by January 1, 2004. In developing the plan, the secretary
shall consult with:
(a) The public;
(b) Patient groups and organizations;
(c) Relevant state agencies that have functions that involve
hepatitis C or provide services to persons with hepatitis C;
(d) Local health departments;
(e) Public health and clinical laboratories;
(f) Providers and suppliers of services to persons with hepatitis
C;
(g) Research scientists;
(h) The University of Washington; and
(i) Relevant health care associations.
(2) The plan shall include implementation recommendations in the
following areas:
(a) Hepatitis C virus prevention and treatment strategies for
groups at risk for hepatitis C with an emphasis towards those groups
that are disproportionately affected by hepatitis C, including persons
infected with HIV, veterans, racial or ethnic minorities that suffer a
higher incidence of hepatitis C, and persons who engage in high-risk
behavior, such as intravenous drug use;
(b) Educational programs to promote public awareness about
hepatitis C and knowledge about risk factors, the value of early
detection, screening, services, and available treatment options for
hepatitis C, which may be incorporated in public awareness programs
concerning bloodborne infections;
(c) Education curricula for appropriate health and health-related
providers covered by the uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW;
(d) Training courses for persons providing hepatitis C counseling,
public health clinic staff, and any other appropriate provider, which
shall focus on disease prevention, early detection, and intervention;
(e) Capacity for voluntary hepatitis C testing programs to be
performed at facilities providing voluntary HIV testing under chapter
70.24 RCW;
(f) A comprehensive model for an evidence-based process for the
prevention and management of hepatitis C that is applicable to other
diseases; and
(g) Sources and availability of funding to implement the plan.
(3) The secretary of health shall develop the state plan described
in subsections (1) and (2) of this section only to the extent that((,
and for as long as, federal or private funds are available for that
purpose, including grants. Funding for chapter 273, Laws of 2003 shall
not come from state sources)) funding is available.
(4) The board of health may adopt rules necessary to implement
subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(5) The secretary of health shall submit the completed state plan
to the legislature by January 1, 2004. After the initial state plan is
submitted, the department shall update the state plan biennially and
shall submit the plan to the governor and make it available to other
interested parties. The update and progress reports are due December
1, 2004, and every two years thereafter.
(6) The state plan recommendations described in subsection (2)(b)
of this section shall be implemented by the secretary of health only to
the extent that((, and for as long as, federal or private funds are
available for that purpose)) funding is available, including grants.
(7) This section expires June 30, 2007.

--- END ---