BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.83.040 and 1999 c 76 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
When notified of positive screening tests, the state department of
health shall offer the use of its services and facilities, designed to
prevent mental retardation or physical defects in such children, to the
attending physician, or the parents of the newborn child if no
attending physician can be identified.
The services and facilities of the department, and other state and
local agencies cooperating with the department in carrying out programs
of detection and prevention of mental retardation and physical defects
shall be made available to the family and physician to the extent
required in order to carry out the intent of this chapter and within
the availability of funds. The department has the authority to collect
a reasonable fee, from the parents or other responsible party of each
infant screened to fund specialty clinics that provide treatment
services for ((hemoglobin diseases,)) phenylketonuria((, congenital
adrenal hyperplasia, and congenital hypothyroidism)) and other
disorders defined by the board of health under RCW 70.83.020 and
adopted in rule under RCW 70.83.050. The fee may be collected through
the facility where the screening specimen is obtained.

--- END ---