BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.20.418 and 1995 c 1 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
Notwithstanding any provision of any disability insurance contract
covering dental care as provided for in this chapter, effective January
1, 1995, benefits shall not be denied thereunder for any service
performed by a denturist licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW if (1) the
service performed was within the lawful scope of such person's license,
and (2) such contract would have provided benefits if such service had
been performed by a dentist licensed under chapter 18.32 RCW. An
insurer shall allow a denturist to participate in any preferred
provider network to the same extent, and under the same terms and
conditions, as a dentist.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.21.148 and 1995 c 1 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
Notwithstanding any provision of any group disability insurance
contract or blanket disability insurance contract covering dental care
as provided for in this chapter, effective January 1, 1995, benefits
shall not be denied thereunder for any service performed by a denturist
licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW if (1) the service performed was
within the lawful scope of such person's license, and (2) such contract
would have provided benefits if such service had been performed by a
dentist licensed under chapter 18.32 RCW. An insurer shall allow a
denturist to participate in any preferred provider network to the same
extent, and under the same terms and conditions, as a dentist.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.44.500 and 1995 c 1 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any provision of any health care service
contract covering dental care as provided for in this chapter,
effective January 1, 1995, benefits shall not be denied thereunder for
any service performed by a denturist licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW
if (((1))) (a) the service performed was within the lawful scope of
such person's license, and (((2))) (b) such contract would have
provided benefits if such service had been performed by a dentist
licensed under chapter 18.32 RCW.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a health
care service contractor shall allow a denturist to participate in any
preferred provider network to the same extent, and under the same terms
and conditions, as a dentist.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section does not apply to a health care
service contractor that employs one or more denturists and contracts
with a group dental practice on a reciprocal exclusive basis.

Sec. 4 RCW 48.46.570 and 1995 c 1 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any provision of any health maintenance
organization agreement covering dental care as provided for in this
chapter, effective January 1, 1995, benefits shall not be denied
thereunder for any service performed by a denturist licensed under
chapter 18.30 RCW if (((1))) (a) the service performed was within the
lawful scope of such person's license, and (((2))) (b) such agreement
would have provided benefits if such service had been performed by a
dentist licensed under chapter 18.32 RCW.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a health
maintenance organization shall allow a denturist to participate in any
preferred provider network to the same extent, and under the same terms
and conditions, as a dentist.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section does not apply to a health
maintenance organization that employs one or more denturists and
contracts with a group dental practice on a reciprocal exclusive basis.

--- END ---