BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT. The
legislature finds that the public-private initiatives act created under
chapter 47.46 RCW has not met the needs and expectations of the public
or private sectors for the development of transportation projects. The
legislature intends to phase out chapter 47.46 RCW coincident with the
completion of the Tacoma Narrows Bridge - SR 16 public-private
partnership. From the effective date of this act, this chapter will
provide a more desirable and effective approach to developing
transportation projects in partnership with the private sector by
applying lessons learned from other states and from this state's ten-year experience with chapter 47.46 RCW.
The legislature also intends to systematically evaluate and
identify those highways that are well-suited for toll projects, either
developed under this chapter or developed under the powers currently
possessed by the transportation commission and the department of
transportation.
The legislature intends that the powers granted in this chapter to
the commission or department are in addition to any powers granted
under chapter 47.56 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Eligible project" means any project eligible for development
under section 6 of this act.
(2) "Private sector partner" and "private partner" mean a person,
entity, or organization that is not the federal government, a state, or
a political subdivision of a state.
(3) "Public funds" means all moneys derived from taxes, fees,
charges, tolls, etc.
(4) "Public sector approval authority" means the transportation
commission for the state, or its successor; if none is provided, then
the public sector approval authority shall be the governor.
(5) "Public sector partner" and "public partner" means any federal
or state unit of government, bistate transportation organization, or
any other political subdivision of any state.
(6) "Transportation project" means a project, whether capital or
operating, where the state's primary purpose for the project is to
preserve or facilitate the safe transport of people or goods via any
mode of travel. However, this does not include projects that are
primarily for recreational purposes, such as parks, hiking trails, off-road vehicle trails, etc.
(7) "Unit of government" means any department or agency of the
federal government, any state or agency, office, or department of a
state, any city, county, district, commission, authority, entity, port,
or other public corporation organized and existing under statutory law
or under a voter-approved charter or initiative, and any
intergovernmental entity created under chapter 39.34 RCW or this
chapter.

PART I
POWERS AND DUTIES OF DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 POWERS CONFERRED ON DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION. (1) In addition to the powers it now possesses, the
department of transportation may:
(a) Enact rules necessary to carry out the purposes of this
chapter;
(b) Design, finance, construct, operate, control, maintain,
improve, preserve, and reconstruct toll facilities in this state,
whether the facilities are developed under the powers granted in this
chapter or under other powers the department possesses;
(c) Enter into contracts or agreements authorized under this
chapter; and
(d) Organize itself in ways necessary to support the purposes of
this chapter, including but not limited to the creation of offices to
support any or all tolling enterprises in the state.
(2) For projects that are financed with indebtedness issued by the
state treasurer, the department has the following powers and duties:
(a) To establish, revise periodically, and collect fees, fares, and
tolls for the privilege of using tolled facilities of this state;
(b) To adopt such rules governing the imposition and revision of
tolls, including but not limited to variable toll rates as deemed
necessary to ensure optimal public use of the facility, consistent with
state and federal law;
(c) To require technical studies and reports to be prepared by the
owner or operator of any facility to be tolled; and
(d) For facilities where revenues have been pledged as a first lien
for the retirement of debt issued by the state, to establish toll
charges on those facilities at least sufficient to pay all bonded
indebtedness in due course, and to set aside in a special reserve
account funds sufficient for reserves, insurance, required maintenance
or operation costs, or like purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 TOLLING FEASIBILITY STUDY REQUIRED. Before
soliciting and reviewing proposals for projects under section 10 of
this act, the transportation commission, with the technical assistance
of the department, must conduct a study of the state's transportation
system to determine the feasibility of administering tolls on specific
transportation facilities or a network of facilities. In addition to
identifying specific toll facilities or corridors, the study must
recommend any additional laws, rules, procedures, resources, studies,
reports, or the like that are necessary or desirable before proceeding
with the review and evaluation of any toll projects.
The transportation commission shall complete the study and report
back to the Legislature by January 15, 2006.

PART II
TRANSPORTATION INNOVATIVE PARTNERSHIPS PROGRAM
NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 PURPOSE OF TRANSPORTATION INNOVATIVE
PARTNERSHIPS. The Transportation Innovative Partnerships Act is
created for the planning, acquisition, design, financing, management,
development, construction, reconstruction, replacement, improvement,
maintenance, preservation, repair, and operation of transportation
projects. The goals of this chapter are to:
(1) Reduce the cost of transportation project delivery;
(2) Recover transportation investment costs;
(3) Develop an expedited project delivery process;
(4) Encourage business investment in public infrastructure;
(5) Use any fund source outside the state treasury, where
financially advantageous and in the public interest;
(6) Maximize innovation;
(7) Develop partnerships between and among private entities and the
public sector for the advancement of public purposes on mutually
beneficial terms;
(8) Create synergies between and among public sector entities to
develop projects that serve both transportation and other important
public purposes; and
(9) Access specialized construction management and project
management services and techniques available in the private sector.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 ELIGIBLE PROJECTS. Projects eligible for
development under this chapter include:
(1) Transportation projects, whether capital or operating, where
the state's primary purpose for the project is to facilitate the safe
transport of people or goods via any mode of travel. However, this
does not include projects that are primarily for recreational purposes,
such as parks, hiking trails, off-road vehicle trails, etc.; and
(2) Facilities, structures, operations, properties, vehicles,
vessels, or the like that are developed concurrently with an eligible
transportation project and that are capable of (a) providing revenues
to support financing of an eligible transportation project, or (b) that
are public projects that advance public purposes unrelated to
transportation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 ELIGIBLE TYPES OF FINANCING. (1) Subject to
the limitations in this section, the department may, in connection with
the evaluation of eligible projects, consider any financing mechanisms
identified under subsections (3) through (5) of this section or any
other lawful source, either integrated as part of a project proposal or
as a separate, stand-alone proposal to finance a project. Financing
may be considered for all or part of a proposed project. A project may
be financed in whole or in part with:
(a) The proceeds of grant anticipation revenue bonds authorized by
23 U.S.C. Sec. 122 and applicable state law. Legislative authorization
and appropriation is required in order to use this source of financing;
(b) Grants, loans, loan guarantees, lines of credit, revolving
lines of credit, or other financing arrangements available under the
Transportation Infrastructure Finance and Innovation Act under 23
U.S.C. Sec. 181 et seq., or any other applicable federal law;
(c) Infrastructure loans or assistance from the state
infrastructure bank established by RCW 82.44.195;
(d) Federal, state, or local revenues, subject to appropriation by
the applicable legislative authority;
(e) User fees, tolls, fares, lease proceeds, rents, gross or net
receipts from sales, proceeds from the sale of development rights,
franchise fees, or any other lawful form of consideration.
(2) As security for the payment of financing described in this
section, the revenues from the project may be pledged, but no such
pledge of revenues constitutes in any manner or to any extent a general
obligation of the state. Any financing described in this section may
be structured on a senior, parity, or subordinate basis to any other
financing.
(3) For any transportation project developed under this chapter
that is owned, leased, used, or operated by the state as a public
facility, if indebtedness is issued, it must be issued by the state
treasurer for the transportation project.
(4) For other public projects defined in section 6(2) of this act
that are developed in conjunction with a transportation project,
financing necessary to develop, construct, or operate the public
project must be approved by the state finance committee or by the
governing board of a public benefit corporation as provided in the
federal Internal Revenue Code section 63-20;
(5) For projects that are developed in conjunction with a
transportation project but are not themselves a public facility or
public project, any lawful means of financing may be used.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 USE OF FEDERAL FUNDS AND SIMILAR SOURCES OF
REVENUE. The department may accept from the United States or any of
its agencies such funds as are available to this state or to any other
unit of government for carrying out the purposes of this chapter,
whether the funds are made available by grant, loan, or other financing
arrangement. The department may enter into such agreements and other
arrangements with the United States or any of its agencies as may be
necessary, proper, and convenient for carrying out the purposes of this
chapter, subject to section 8 of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 OTHER SOURCES OF VALUABLE CONSIDERATION
AUTHORIZED. The department may accept from any source any grant,
donation, gift, or other form of conveyance of land, money, other real
or personal property, or other valuable thing made to the state of
Washington, the department, or a local government for carrying out the
purposes of this chapter.
Any eligible project may be financed in whole or in part by
contribution of any funds or property made by any private entity or
public sector partner that is a party to any agreement entered into
under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 REVIEW, EVALUATION, AND SELECTION OF
POTENTIAL PROJECTS. (1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, the
department may:
(a) Solicit concepts or proposals for eligible projects from
private entities and units of government;
(b) On or after July 1, 2006, accept unsolicited concepts or
proposals for eligible projects from private entities and units of
government, subject to section 18 of this act;
(c) Evaluate projects for inclusion in the transportation
innovative partnerships program that are already programmed or
identified for traditional development by the state; and
(d) Evaluate the concepts or proposals received under this section
and select potential projects based on the concepts or proposals. The
evaluation under this subsection must include consultation with any
appropriate unit of government.
(2) Before undertaking any of the activities contained in
subsection (1) of this section, the department must:
(a) Complete the tolling feasibility study specified in section 4
of this act; and
(b) Adopt rules specifying the procedures and criteria for the
proper solicitation, acceptance, review, evaluation, and selection of
projects proposed for development under this chapter. The rules
adopted by the department must include provisions for the constitution
of project evaluation teams.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 ADMINISTRATIVE FEE AUTHORIZED. The
department may charge an administrative fee for the evaluation of a
project proposal in an amount calculated to reasonably offset any costs
incurred that are not otherwise funded through governmental budget
appropriations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 AUTHORIZATION TO SPEND FUNDS FOR EVALUATION
AND NEGOTIATION OF PROPOSALS. The department may spend, out of any
funds identified for the purpose, such moneys as may be necessary for
the evaluation of concepts or proposals for eligible projects and for
negotiating agreements for eligible projects authorized by this
chapter. The department may employ engineers, consultants, or other
experts the department determines are needed for the purposes of doing
the evaluation and negotiation. Expenses incurred by the department
under this section before the issuance of transportation project bonds
or other financing must be paid by the department and charged to the
appropriate project. The department shall keep records and accounts
showing each amount so charged.
Unless otherwise provided in the omnibus transportation budget the
funds spent by the department under this section in connection with the
project must be repaid from the proceeds of the bonds or other
financing upon the sale of transportation project bonds or upon
obtaining other financing for an eligible project, as allowed by law or
contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 CONSULTATION WITH EXPERTS AUTHORIZED. The
commission and department may consult with legal, financial, and other
experts inside and outside the public sector in the evaluation,
negotiation, and development of projects under this chapter, consistent
with RCW 43.10.040 where applicable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 ENVIRONMENTAL, ENGINEERING, AND TECHNICAL
STUDIES CONTRACTED. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and in
the absence of any direct federal funding or direction, the department
may contract with a private developer of a selected project proposal to
conduct environmental impact studies and engineering and technical
studies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 TERMS OF PARTNERSHIP AGREEMENTS. (1) The
following provisions must be included in any agreement to which the
state is a party:
(a) For any project that proposes terms for stand-alone maintenance
or asset management services for a public facility, those services must
be provided in a manner consistent with any collective bargaining
agreements and civil service laws that are in effect for the public
facility;
(b) Transportation projects that are selected for development under
this chapter must be identified in a regional transportation plan
approved by a regional transportation planning organization or a
metropolitan transportation planning organization;
(c) Consistency with tolling technology standards adopted by the
department for transportation-related projects;
(d) Provisions for bonding, financial guarantees, deposits, or the
posting of other security to secure the payment of laborers,
subcontractors, and suppliers who perform work or provide materials as
part of the project;
(e) All projects must be financed in a manner consistent with
section 7 of this act. This chapter is null and void if this
subsection or section 7 of this act fails to become law or is held
invalid by a court of final jurisdiction.
(2) Agreements between the state and private sector partners
entered into under this section must specifically include the following
contractual elements:
(a) The point in the project at which public and private sector
partners will enter the project and which partners will assume
responsibility for specific project elements;
(b) How the partners will share management of the risks of the
project;
(c) How the partners will share the costs of development of the
project;
(d) How the partners will allocate financial responsibility for
cost overruns;
(e) The penalties for nonperformance;
(f) The incentives for performance;
(g) The accounting and auditing standards to be used to evaluate
work on the project;
(h) For any project that reverts to public ownership, the
responsibility for reconstruction or renovations that are required in
order for a facility to meet all applicable government standards upon
reversion of the facility to the state; and
(i) Provisions for patrolling and law enforcement on transportation
projects that are public facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 PUBLIC INVOLVEMENT AND PARTICIPATION PLAN.
(1) Before final approval, agreements entered into under this chapter
must include a process that provides for public involvement and
participation with respect to the development of the projects. This
plan must be submitted along with the proposed agreement, and both must
be approved under section 17 of this act before the state may enter a
binding agreement.
(2) All workshops, forums, open houses, meetings, public hearings,
or similar public gatherings must be administered and attended by
representatives of the state and any other public entities that are
party to an agreement authorized by this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 PROCESS FOR FINAL APPROVAL AND EXECUTION OF
CONTRACTS. (1) Before approving an agreement under subsection (2) of
this section, the public sector approval authority must:
(a) Prepare a financial analysis that fully discloses all project
costs, direct and indirect, including costs of any financing;
(b) Publish notice and make available the full contents of the
agreement at least twenty days before the public hearing required in
(c) of this subsection; and
(c) Hold a public hearing on the proposed agreement, with proper
notice provided at least twenty days before the hearing. The public
hearing must be held within the boundaries of the county seat of the
county containing the project.
(2) The public sector approval authority must allow at least twenty
days from the public hearing on the proposed agreement required under
subsection (1)(c) of this section before approving and executing any
agreements authorized under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 UNSOLICITED PROJECT PROPOSALS. Before
accepting any unsolicited project proposals, the department must adopt
rules to facilitate the acceptance, review, evaluation, and selection
of unsolicited project proposals. These rules must include provisions
that require publication of the basic elements of an unsolicited
proposal that has been submitted. These rules must also provide at
least ninety days from the date of publication for competing proposals
to be submitted.
The department may adopt other rules as necessary to avoid
conflicts with existing laws, statutes, or contractual obligations of
the state.
The department may not accept or consider any unsolicited proposals
before July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 ADVISORY COMMITTEES REQUIRED FOR LARGE
PROJECTS. For projects with costs, including financing costs, of three
hundred million dollars or greater, advisory committees are required.
(1) The public sector approval authority must establish an advisory
committee to advise with respect to eligible projects. An advisory
committee must consist of not fewer than five and not more than nine
members, as determined by the public partners. Members must be
appointed by the public sector approval authority, or for projects with
joint public sector participation, in a manner agreed to by the state
and any participating unit of government. In making appointments to
the committee, the commission shall consider persons or organizations
offering a diversity of viewpoints on the project.
(2) An advisory committee shall review concepts or proposals for
eligible projects and submit comments to the public sector partners.
(3) An advisory committee shall meet as necessary at times and
places fixed by the state, but not less than twice per year. The state
shall provide personnel services to assist the advisory committee
within the limits of available funds. An advisory committee may adopt
rules to govern its proceedings and may select officers.
(4) An advisory committee must be dissolved once the project has
been fully constructed and debt issued to pay for the project has been
fully retired.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 PROPRIETARY BUSINESS INFORMATION. Subject
to rules adopted under section 10(2)(b) of this act, sensitive
business, commercial, or financial information that is not customarily
provided to business competitors that is submitted to the state in
connection with a transportation project under this chapter is exempt
from disclosure under chapter 42.17 RCW only when releasing the
information would adversely affect the financial interest of the
private entity or the bargaining position of either entity. Projects
under federal jurisdiction or using federal funds must conform to
federal regulations under the Freedom of Information Act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 APPLICATION OF PREVAILING WAGE LAW. If
public funds are used to pay any costs of construction of a public
facility that is part of an eligible project, chapter 39.12 RCW applies
to the entire eligible public works project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 JOINT AGREEMENTS WITH OTHER GOVERNMENTAL
ENTITIES. The state may, either separately or in combination with any
other public sector partner, enter into working agreements,
coordination agreements, or similar implementation agreements,
including the formation of bistate transportation organizations, to
carry out the joint implementation of a transportation project selected
under this chapter. The state may enter into agreements with other
units of government or Canadian provinces for transborder
transportation projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 EMINENT DOMAIN. The state may exercise the
power of eminent domain to acquire property, rights of way, or other
rights in property for projects that are necessary to implement an
eligible project developed under this chapter, regardless of whether
the property will be owned in fee simple by the state.

PART III
GENERAL PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 CREATION OF TRANSPORTATION INNOVATIVE
PARTNERSHIP ACCOUNT. (1) The transportation innovative partnership
account is established in the custody of the state treasurer separate
and distinct from the state general fund. Interest earned by the
transportation innovative partnership account must be credited to the
account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW.
(2) The following moneys must be deposited into the transportation
innovative partnership account:
(a) Proceeds from bonds or other financing instruments issued under
section 26 of this act;
(b) Revenues received from any transportation project developed
under this chapter or developed under the general powers granted to the
department; and
(c) Any other moneys that are by donation, grant, contract, law, or
other means transferred, allocated, or appropriated to the account.
(3) Moneys in the transportation innovative partnership account may
only be expended upon evidence of approval by the Washington state
legislature, either upon appropriation of supporting state funds or by
other statutory direction.
(4) The state treasurer shall serve as a fiduciary for the purpose
of carrying out this chapter and implementing all or portions of any
transportation project financed under this chapter.
(5) Moneys in the transportation innovative partnership account
that were derived from revenue subject to Article II, section 40
(Amendment 18) of the Washington state Constitution, may be used only
for purposes authorized by that provision of the state Constitution.
(6) The state treasurer shall establish separate subaccounts within
the transportation innovative partnership account for each
transportation project that is initiated under this chapter or under
the general powers granted to the department. Except as provided in
subsection (5) of this section, the state may pledge moneys in the
transportation innovative partnership account to secure revenue bonds
or any other debt obligations relating to the project for which the
account is established.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 USE OF TRANSPORTATION INNOVATIVE
PARTNERSHIP ACCOUNT. (1) The state may use moneys in the
transportation innovative partnership subaccount to ensure the
repayment of loan guarantees or extensions of credit made to or on
behalf of private entities engaged in the planning, acquisition,
financing, development, design, construction, reconstruction,
replacement, improvement, maintenance, preservation, management,
repair, or operation of any eligible project that is related to a
subaccount established under this chapter.
(2) The lien of a pledge made under this section is subordinate to
the lien of a pledge securing bonds payable from moneys in the motor
vehicle fund established in RCW 46.68.070, or the transportation
innovative partnership account established in section 24 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 AUTHORITY TO ISSUE REVENUE BONDS AND OTHER
OBLIGATIONS. (1) In addition to any authority the commission or
department has to issue and sell bonds and other similar obligations,
this section establishes continuing authority for the issuance and sale
of bonds and other similar obligations in a manner consistent with this
section. To finance a project in whole or in part, the commission may
request that the state treasurer issue revenue bonds on behalf of the
public sector partner. The bonds must be secured by a pledge of, and
a lien on, and be payable only from moneys in the transportation
innovative partnership account established in section 24 of this act,
and any other revenues specifically pledged to repayment of the bonds.
Such a pledge by the public partner creates a lien that is valid and
binding from the time the pledge is made. Revenue bonds issued under
this section are not general obligations of the state or local
government and are not secured by or payable from any funds or assets
of the state other than the moneys and revenues specifically pledged to
the repayment of such revenue bonds.
(2) Moneys received from the issuance of revenue bonds or other
debt obligations, including any investment earnings thereon, may be
spent:
(a) For the purpose of financing the costs of the project for which
the bonds are issued;
(b) To pay the costs and other administrative expenses of the
bonds;
(c) To pay the costs of credit enhancement or to fund any reserves
determined to be necessary or advantageous in connection with the
revenue bonds; and
(d) To reimburse the public sector partners for any costs related
to carrying out the projects authorized under this chapter.

PART IV
ALTERNATIVE CONTRACTING AND INNOVATIVE PROJECT MANAGEMENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 STUDY OF ALTERNATIVE CONTRACTING AND
PROJECT MANAGEMENT AUTHORITIES. The department shall conduct a study
of:
(1) The contracting powers and project management authorities it
currently possesses; those same powers and authorities authorized under
this chapter; and those powers and authorities employed by other states
or the private sector;
(2) Methods of encouraging competition for the development of
transportation projects; and
(3) Any additional procedures that may be necessary or desirable
for negotiating contracts in situations of a single qualified bidder,
in either solicited or unsolicited proposals.
The department must submit its report, along with any recommended
legislative changes, to the governor and the legislature for
consideration in the 2006 legislative session.

PART V
CONSTRUCTION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 CONFORMITY WITH FEDERAL LAWS.
Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, applicable federal laws,
rules, and regulations govern in any situation that involves federal
funds if the federal laws, rules, or regulations:
(1) Conflict with any provision of this chapter;
(2) Require procedures that are additional to or different from
those provided in this chapter; or
(3) Require contract provisions not authorized in this chapter. If
no federal funds are provided, state laws, rates, and rules will
govern.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 Captions used in this chapter are not part
of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 Sections 1 through 29 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 47 RCW.

--- END ---