BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.101.005 and 1989 c 409 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that effective legal representation
((should)) must be provided for indigent persons and persons who are
indigent and able to contribute, consistent with the constitutional
requirements of fairness, equal protection, and due process in all
cases where the right to counsel attaches.

Sec. 2 RCW 10.101.030 and 1989 c 409 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each county or city under this chapter shall adopt standards for
the delivery of public defense services, whether those services are
provided by contract, assigned counsel, or a public defender office.
Standards shall include the following: Compensation of counsel, duties
and responsibilities of counsel, case load limits and types of cases,
responsibility for expert witness fees and other costs associated with
representation, administrative expenses, support services, reports of
attorney activity and vouchers, training, supervision, monitoring and
evaluation of attorneys, substitution of attorneys or assignment of
contracts, limitations on private practice of contract attorneys,
qualifications of attorneys, disposition of client complaints, cause
for termination of contract or removal of attorney, and
nondiscrimination. The standards endorsed by the Washington state bar
association for the provision of public defense services ((may)) should
serve as guidelines to ((contracting)) local legislative authorities in
adopting standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 10.101 RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington state office of public defense shall disburse
appropriated funds to counties and cities for the purpose of improving
the quality of public defense services. Counties may apply for up to
their pro rata share as set forth in section 4 of this act provided
that counties conform to application procedures established by the
office of public defense and improve the quality of services for both
juveniles and adults. Cities may apply for moneys pursuant to the
grant program set forth in section 6 of this act. In order to receive
funds, each applying county or city must require that attorneys
providing public defense services attend training approved by the
office of public defense at least once per calendar year. Each
applying county or city shall report the expenditure for all public
defense services in the previous calendar year, as well as case
statistics for that year, including per attorney caseloads, and shall
provide a copy of each current public defense contract to the office of
public defense with its application. Each individual or organization
that contracts to perform public defense services for a county or city
shall report to the county or city hours billed for nonpublic defense
legal services in the previous calendar year, including number and
types of private cases.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 10.101 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this
purpose, the office of public defense shall disburse to applying
counties that meet the requirements of section 3 of this act designated
funds under this chapter on a pro rata basis pursuant to the formula
set forth in section 5 of this act and shall disburse to eligible
cities, funds pursuant to section 6 of this act. Each fiscal year for
which it receives state funds under this chapter, a county or city must
document to the office of public defense that it is meeting the
standards for provision of indigent defense services as endorsed by the
Washington state bar association or that the funds received under this
chapter have been used to make appreciable demonstrable improvements in
the delivery of public defense services, including the following:
(i) Adoption by ordinance of a legal representation plan that
addresses the factors in RCW 10.101.030. The plan must apply to any
contract or agency providing indigent defense services for the county
or city;
(ii) Requiring attorneys who provide public defense services to
attend training under section 3 of this act;
(iii) Requiring attorneys who handle the most serious cases to meet
specified qualifications as set forth in the Washington state bar
association endorsed standards for public defense services or
participate in at least one case consultation per case with office of
public defense resource attorneys who are so qualified. The most
serious cases include all cases of murder in the first or second
degree, persistent offender cases, and class A felonies. This
subsection (1)(a)(iii) does not apply to cities receiving funds under
sections 3 through 6 of this act;
(iv) Requiring contracts to address the subject of compensation for
extraordinary cases;
(v) Identifying funding specifically for the purpose of paying
experts (A) for which public defense attorneys may file ex parte
motions, or (B) which should be specifically designated within a public
defender agency budget;
(vi) Identifying funding specifically for the purpose of paying
investigators (A) for which public defense attorneys may file ex parte
motions, and (B) which should be specifically designated within a
public defender agency budget.
(b) The cost of providing counsel in cases where there is a
conflict of interest shall not be borne by the attorney or agency who
has the conflict.
(2) The office of public defense shall determine eligibility of
counties and cities to receive state funds under this chapter. If a
determination is made that a county or city receiving state funds under
this chapter did not substantially comply with this section, the office
of public defense shall notify the county or city of the failure to
comply and unless the county or city contacts the office of public
defense and substantially corrects the deficiencies within ninety days
after the date of notice, or some other mutually agreed period of time,
the county's or city's eligibility to continue receiving funds under
this chapter is terminated. If an applying county or city disagrees
with the determination of the office of public defense as to the
county's or city's eligibility, the county or city may file an appeal
with the advisory committee of the office of public defense within
thirty days of the eligibility determination. The decision of the
advisory committee is final.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 10.101 RCW
to read as follows:
The moneys shall be distributed to each county determined to be
eligible to receive moneys by the office of public defense as
determined under this section. Ninety percent of the funding
appropriated shall be designated as "county moneys" and shall be
distributed as follows:
(1) Six percent of the county moneys appropriated shall be
distributed as a base allocation among the eligible counties. A
county's base allocation shall be equal to this six percent divided by
the total number of eligible counties.
(2) Ninety-four percent of the county moneys appropriated shall be
distributed among the eligible counties as follows:
(a) Fifty percent of this amount shall be distributed on a pro rata
basis to each eligible county based upon the population of the county
as a percentage of the total population of all eligible counties; and
(b) Fifty percent of this amount shall be distributed on a pro rata
basis to each eligible county based upon the annual number of criminal
cases filed in the county superior court as a percentage of the total
annual number of criminal cases filed in the superior courts of all
eligible counties.
(3) Under this section:
(a) The population of the county is the most recent number
determined by the office of financial management;
(b) The annual number of criminal cases filed in the county
superior court is determined by the most recent annual report of the
courts of Washington, as published by the office of the administrator
for the courts;
(c) Distributions and eligibility for distributions in the
2005-2007 biennium shall be based on 2004 figures for the annual number
of criminal cases that are filed as described under (b) of this
subsection. Future distributions shall be based on the most recent
figures for the annual number of criminal cases that are filed as
described under (b) of this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 10.101 RCW
to read as follows:
The moneys under section 3 of this act shall be distributed to each
city determined to be eligible under this section by the office of
public defense. Ten percent of the funding appropriated shall be
designated as "city moneys" and distributed as follows:
(1) The office of public defense shall administer a grant program
to select the cities eligible to receive city moneys. Incorporated
cities may apply for grants. Applying cities must conform to the
requirements of sections 3 and 4 of this act.
(2) City moneys shall be divided among a maximum of five applying
cities and shall be distributed in a timely manner to accomplish the
goals of the grants.
(3) Criteria for award of grants shall be established by the office
of public defense after soliciting input from the association of
Washington cities. Award of the grants shall be determined by the
office of public defense.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2005, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---