BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.04.934 and 2003 c 39 s 29 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) With the exception of a commercial fisher engaged in sales of
fish to a fish buyer, no person may sell at wholesale or retail any
fresh or frozen:
(((1))) (a) Private sector cultured aquatic salmon without
identifying the product as farm-raised salmon; ((or
(2))) (b) Commercially caught salmon designated as food fish under
Title 77 RCW without identifying the product as either "commercially"
caught salmon or "wild salmon"; or
(c) Salmon without identifying either the country in which the
salmon was produced, if the salmon is a private sector cultured aquatic
salmon, or the country in which the salmon was landed, if it is a
commercially caught salmon. For salmon produced or landed in the
United States, the label must also include the state in which the
salmon was produced or landed.
(2) Identification of the products under subsection((s)) (1) ((and
(2))) (a), (b), and (c) of this section shall be made to the buyer at
the point of sale such that the buyer can make an informed decision in
purchasing.
(3) A person knowingly violating this section is guilty of
misbranding under this chapter. A person who receives misleading or
erroneous information about whether the salmon is farm-raised or
commercially caught, and subsequently inaccurately identifies salmon
shall not be guilty of misbranding. This section shall not apply to
salmon that is minced, pulverized, coated with batter, or breaded.

--- END ---