BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.128 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall implement, as part of the required training
and continuing education, food safety training and testing integrated
into the curriculum that meets the standards established by the state
board of health pursuant to chapter 69.06 RCW. Individual food handler
permits are not required for persons who begin working in an adult
family home after June 30, 2005, and successfully complete the basic
and modified-basic caregiver training, provided they receive
information or training regarding safe food handling practices from the
employer prior to providing food handling or service for the clients.
Documentation that the information or training has been provided to the
individual must be kept on file by the employer.
Licensed adult family home providers or employees who hold
individual food handler permits prior to June 30, 2005, will be
required to maintain continuing education of .5 hours per year in order
to maintain food handling and safety training. Licensed adult family
home providers or employees who hold individual food handler permits
prior to June 30, 2005, will not be required to renew the permit
provided the continuing education requirement as stated above is met.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 69.06 RCW
to read as follows:
Except for the food safety training standards adopted by the state
board of health under RCW 69.06.010, the provisions of this chapter do
not apply to persons who work in adult family homes and successfully
complete training and continuing education as required by section 1 of
this act.

--- END ---