BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.36A.020 and 1991 c 3 s 87 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Department" means the department of health.
(2) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.
(3) "Naturopath" means an individual licensed under this chapter.
(4) "Committee" means the Washington state naturopathic practice
advisory committee.
(5) "Educational program" means ((a)) an accredited program
preparing persons for the practice of ((naturopathy)) naturopathic
medicine.
(6) "Nutrition and food science" means the prevention and treatment
of disease or other human conditions through the use of foods, water,
herbs, roots, bark, or natural food elements.
(7) "Manual manipulation" or "mechanotherapy" means manipulation of
a part or the whole of the body by hand or by mechanical means.
(8) "Physical modalities" means use of physical, chemical,
electrical, and other noninvasive modalities, including((,)) but not
limited to heat, cold, air, light, water in any of its forms, sound,
massage, and therapeutic exercise.
(9) "Homeopathy" means a system of medicine based on the use of
infinitesimal doses of medicines capable of producing symptoms similar
to those of the disease treated, as listed in the homeopathic
pharmacopeia of the United States.
(10) (("Medicines of mineral, animal, and botanical origin" means
medicines derived from animal organs, tissues, and oils, minerals, and
plants administered orally and topically, excluding legend drugs with
the following exceptions: Vitamins, minerals, whole gland thyroid, and
substances as exemplified in traditional botanical and herbal
pharmacopoeia, and nondrug contraceptive devices excluding interuterine
devices. The use of intermuscular injections are limited to vitamin
B-12 preparations and combinations when clinical and/or laboratory
evaluation has indicated vitamin B-12 deficiency. The use of
controlled substances is prohibited.)) "Naturopathic medicines" means
vitamins; minerals; botanical medicines; homeopathic medicines;
hormones; and those legend drugs and controlled substances consistent
with naturopathic medical practice in accordance with rules established
by the secretary. Controlled substances are limited to codeine and
testosterone products that are contained in Schedules III, IV, and V in
chapter 69.50 RCW.
(11) "Hygiene and immunization" means the use of such preventative
techniques as personal hygiene, asepsis, public health, and
immunizations, to the extent allowed by rule.
(12) "Minor office procedures" means care and procedures incident
thereto of superficial lacerations, lesions, and abrasions, and the
removal of foreign bodies located in superficial structures, not to
include the eye; and the use of antiseptics and topical or local
anesthetics in connection therewith. "Minor office procedures" also
includes intramuscular, intravenous, subcutaneous, and intradermal
injections of substances consistent with the practice of naturopathic
medicine and in accordance with rules established by the secretary.
(13) "Common diagnostic procedures" means the use of venipuncture
((to withdraw blood)) consistent with the practice of naturopathic
medicine, commonly used diagnostic modalities consistent with
naturopathic practice, health history taking, physical examination,
radiography, examination of body orifices excluding endoscopy, ((and))
laboratory medicine ((which obtains)), and obtaining samples of human
tissues ((products)), ((including superficial scrapings)) but excluding
((procedures which would require surgical)) incision or excision beyond
that which is authorized as a minor office procedure.
(14) "Suggestion" means techniques including but not limited to
counseling, biofeedback, and hypnosis.
(15) "Radiography" means the ordering, but not the interpretation,
of radiographic diagnostic and other imaging studies and the taking and
interpretation of standard radiographs.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.36A.040 and 1991 c 3 s 89 are each amended to read
as follows:
Naturopathic medicine ((or naturopathy)) is the practice by
naturopaths of the art and science of the diagnosis, prevention, and
treatment of disorders of the body by stimulation or support, or both,
of the natural processes of the human body. A naturopath is
responsible and accountable to the consumer for the quality of
naturopathic care rendered.
The practice of ((naturopathy)) naturopathic medicine includes
manual manipulation (mechanotherapy), the prescription, administration,
dispensing, and use, except for the treatment of malignancies ((or
neoplastic disease)), of nutrition and food science, physical
modalities, minor office procedures, homeopathy, ((certain))
naturopathic medicines ((of mineral, animal, and botanical origin)),
hygiene and immunization, nondrug contraceptive devices, common
diagnostic procedures, and suggestion; however, nothing in this chapter
shall prohibit consultation and treatment of a patient in concert with
a practitioner licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW. No person
licensed under this chapter may employ the term "chiropractic" to
describe any services provided by a naturopath under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The secretary, in consultation with the
naturopathic advisory committee and the Washington state board of
pharmacy, shall develop education and training requirements for the use
of controlled substances authorized under this act. The requirements
must be met by the naturopath prior to being authorized to prescribe
controlled substances under this act.

--- END ---