BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.24.260 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 701 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Physicians licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, dentists licensed
under chapter 18.32 RCW, and pharmacists licensed under chapter 18.64
RCW)) Any member of a health profession listed under RCW 18.130.040
who, in good faith, makes a report, files charges, or presents evidence
against another member of ((their)) a health profession based on the
claimed ((incompetency or gross misconduct)) unprofessional conduct as
provided in RCW 18.130.180 or inability to practice with reasonable
skill and safety to consumers by reason of any physical or mental
condition as provided in RCW 18.130.170 of such person before the
((medical quality assurance commission established under chapter 18.71
RCW, in a proceeding under chapter 18.32 RCW, or to the board of
pharmacy under RCW 18.64.160)) agency, board, or commission responsible
for disciplinary activities for the person's profession under chapter
18.130 RCW, shall be immune from civil action for damages arising out
of such activities. A person prevailing upon the good faith defense
provided for in this section is entitled to recover expenses and
reasonable attorneys' fees incurred in establishing the defense.

--- END ---