BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that more than
forty percent of children from high-income families received a
bachelor's degree or higher within five years of high school
graduation, compared with only six percent of those in the lowest
income group. Opening educational opportunities for these students can
address and correct this disparity. Effective mentoring programs,
along with financial assistance, prepare these low-income students to
succeed and achieve their educational goals.
(2) In order to broaden higher education opportunities, the
legislature supports the Washington state achievers' scholarship
program. This program: (a) Provides mentoring to ensure academic
support is available to students while in high school, encourages
college enrollment, and gives assistance when enrolled in college; (b)
identifies and reduces financial barriers to college for talented, low-income students; and (c) leverages private funding for higher education
financial assistance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The sum of one million dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2006, from the general fund to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to support community volunteer
mentors working with students selected as achievers' scholars.
(2) The sum of one million dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2007,
from the general fund to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction to support community volunteer mentors working with
students selected as achievers' scholars.

--- END ---