BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The sum of seven hundred fifty thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2006, from the general fund to
Snohomish county for the purposes of funding a law enforcement and
treatment pilot program. Six hundred thousand dollars would fund a ten
FTE strike team pilot for twelve months (eight sheriff deputies and two
sergeants) while the remaining one hundred fifty thousand dollars would
be applied to treatment and other related costs.
(2) The sum of seven hundred fifty thousand dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2007, from the general fund to Snohomish county for the
purposes of funding a law enforcement and treatment pilot program. Six
hundred thousand dollars would fund a ten FTE strike team pilot for
twelve months (eight sheriff deputies and two sergeants) while the
remaining one hundred fifty thousand dollars would be applied to
treatment and other related costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The sum of seven hundred fifty thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2006, from the general fund to Pierce
county to fund extension of treatment alternatives as well as targeting
the identification, arrest, and prosecution of perpetrators of
methamphetamine-related crime, including but not limited to crimes such
as identity theft.
(2) The sum of seven hundred fifty thousand dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2007, from the general fund to Pierce county to fund extension
of treatment alternatives as well as targeting the identification,
arrest, and prosecution of perpetrators of methamphetamine-related
crime, including but not limited to crimes such as identity theft.

--- END ---