BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature to honor veterans of the
global war on terrorism for the public service they have provided to
their country. It is the further intent of the legislature that, for
eligible veterans of the global war on terrorism, institutions of
higher education waive tuition and fee increases that have occurred
after the 2001-02 academic year.
(2) Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing
boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The
Evergreen State College, and the community colleges may exempt veterans
of the global war on terrorism from all or a portion of increases in
tuition and fees that occur after the 2001-02 academic year, if the
veteran could have qualified as a Washington resident student under RCW
28B.15.012(2), had he or she been enrolled as a student on September
11, 2001.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "a veteran of the global war
on terrorism" means any person serving on active duty in the armed
forces of the United States on or after September 11, 2001, and before
a terminal date to be prescribed by the United States secretary of
defense, in support of operation enduring freedom or operation Iraqi
freedom. Active duty service under this section includes service
outside and within the United States.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---