BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 85.38 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Every special district must use the assessed value applicable
to forest land, farm and agricultural land, or open space land, under
chapter 84.33 or 84.34 RCW, when the land has been designated as such
and the assessed value is used as a component in determining the
district assessment.
(2) If a district uses a fractional amount of assessed value as a
component in determining the district assessment, then a fractional
amount of the value applicable to forest land, farm and agricultural
land, or open space land, under chapter 84.33 or 84.34 RCW, shall be
used.

Sec. 2 RCW 17.28.255 and 1959 c 64 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board of trustees shall annually determine the amount of money
necessary to carry on the operations of the district and shall classify
the property therein in proportion to the benefits to be derived from
the operations of the district and in accordance with such
classification shall apportion and assess the several lots, blocks,
tracts, and parcels of land or other property within the district,
which assessment shall be collected with the general taxes of the
county or counties. A mosquito control district must use the assessed
value applicable to forest land, farm and agricultural land, or open
space land, under chapter 84.33 or 84.34 RCW, when the land has been
designated as such and the assessed value is used as a component in
determining the district assessment. If a district uses a fractional
amount of assessed value as a component in determining the district
assessment, then a fractional amount of the value applicable to forest
land, farm and agricultural land, or open space land, under chapter
84.33 or 84.34 RCW, shall be used.

--- END ---