BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
strengthen statewide policy relating to indoor air standards, while
protecting the rights, interests, health, and choices based on credible
scientific findings. It is too easy to unfairly burden local economies
through patchwork policy. State law preempts local options.
Local governments may establish standards consistent with this act,
but may not exceed state law nor eliminate choices as offered by state
law.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.160.040 and 1985 c 236 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A smoking area may be designated in a public place by the owner
or, in the case of a leased or rented space, by the lessee or other
person in charge except in:
(a) Elevators; buses, except for private hire; streetcars; taxis,
except those clearly and visibly designated by the owner to permit
smoking; public areas of retail stores and lobbies of financial
institutions; office reception areas and waiting rooms of any building
owned or leased by the state of Washington or by any city, county, or
other municipality in the state of Washington; museums; public meetings
or hearings; classrooms and lecture halls of schools, colleges, and
universities; and the seating areas and aisle ways which are contiguous
to seating areas of concert halls, theaters, auditoriums, exhibition
halls, and indoor sports arenas; and
(b) Hallways of health care facilities, with the exception of
nursing homes, and lobbies of concert halls, theaters, auditoriums,
exhibition halls, and indoor sports arenas, if the area is not
physically separated. Owners or other persons in charge are not
required to incur any expense to make structural or other physical
modifications in providing these areas.
Except as provided in other provisions of this chapter, no public
place, other than a bar, tavern, bowling alley, card room, tobacco
shop, ((or)) restaurant, or licensed charitable bingo hall, may be
designated as a smoking area in its entirety. If a bar, tobacco shop,
or restaurant is designated as a smoking area in its entirety, this
designation shall be posted conspicuously on all entrances normally
used by the public.
(2) Where smoking areas are designated, ((existing)) physical
barriers ((and)) or ventilation systems shall be used to minimize the
((toxic)) effect of environmental tobacco smoke in adjacent nonsmoking
areas. Barriers or ventilation systems shall be used to provide indoor
air that meets the following standards with respect to environmental
tobacco smoke constituents:
(a) In nonsmoking areas, vapor phase nicotine as measured by an
eight-hour time weighted average shall not exceed one hundred
micrograms per cubic meter of air or twenty percent of the current
United States department of labor, occupational safety and health
administration permissible exposure limit, whichever is less, and
carbon monoxide as measured by an eight-hour time weighted average
shall not exceed forty parts per million or eighty percent of the
current United States department of labor, occupational safety and
health administration permissible exposure limit, whichever is less.
(b) In designated smoking areas, vapor phase nicotine as measured
by an eight-hour time weighted average shall not exceed two hundred
micrograms per cubic meter of air or forty percent of the current
United States department of labor, occupational safety and health
administration permissible exposure limit, whichever is less, and
carbon monoxide as measured by an eight-hour time weighted average
shall not exceed fifty parts per million or one hundred percent of the
current United States department of labor, occupational safety and
health administration permissible exposure limit, whichever is less.
(3) Managers of restaurants who choose to provide smoking areas
shall designate an adequate amount of seating to meet the demands of
restaurant patrons who wish to smoke. Owners of restaurants are not
required to incur any expense to make structural or other physical
modifications in providing these areas as long as the indoor air in the
facility meets or exceeds the standards specified in subsection (2) of
this section. Restaurant patrons shall be informed that separate
smoking and nonsmoking sections are available.
(4) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a facility or
area may be designated in its entirety as a nonsmoking area by the
owner or other person in charge.
(5) Persons under the age of eighteen are prohibited from entering
the designated smoking area of a bar, tavern, bowling alley, bingo
hall, card room, private facility, or other public venue. Employees
under the age of eighteen are prohibited from performing duties in
designated smoking areas.
(6) A proceeding brought by a local or state agency to enforce this
section must include specification of contemporaneous onsite testing
for the described facility or business establishment that credibly
demonstrates indoor air at the business or facility fails to meet the
standards set forth in this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.160.050 and 1985 c 236 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Owners, or in the case of a leased or rented space the lessee
or other person in charge, of a place regulated under this chapter
shall make every reasonable effort to prohibit smoking in public places
by posting signs prohibiting or permitting smoking as appropriate under
this chapter. Signs shall be posted conspicuously at each building
entrance. In the case of retail stores and retail service
establishments, signs shall be posted conspicuously at each entrance
and in prominent locations throughout the place. The boundary between
a nonsmoking area and a smoking permitted area shall be clearly
designated so that persons may differentiate between the two areas.
(2) An employer shall disclose to prospective employees that all or
a portion of the establishment that prospective employees would work at
is a designated smoking area. An employer shall disclose to
prospective employees under age eighteen that they are prohibited by
state law from performing duties in any designated smoking area.
Federal and state health and safety worker right-to-know laws and
manufacturer and employer suggested operating and safety requirements
shall apply.

--- END ---