BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
With regard to waivers for courses offered for the purpose of
satisfying related or supplemental educational requirements for
apprentices registered with the Washington state apprenticeship council
or the federal bureau of apprenticeship and training, colleges may at
the request of an apprenticeship organization, deduct the tuition owed
from training contracts with that apprentice organization.

--- END ---