BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No life insurer may deny or refuse to accept an application for
insurance, or refuse to insure, refuse to renew, cancel, restrict, or
otherwise terminate a policy of insurance, or charge a different rate
for the same coverage, based upon the applicant's or insured person's
past or future lawful travel destinations.
(2) Nothing in this section prohibits a life insurer from excluding
or limiting coverage of specific lawful travel, or charging a
differential rate for such coverage, when bona fide statistical
differences in risk or exposure have been substantiated. A risk or
exposure is substantiated when the insurer demonstrates risk or
exposure greater than in all other countries where the insurer does not
exclude or limit coverage.

--- END ---