BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares the
following:
(1) A moral, medical, and ethical consensus exists that the
practice of performing a partial birth abortion, an abortion in which
a physician delivers an unborn child's body until only the head remains
inside the womb, punctures the back of the child's skull with a sharp
instrument, and sucks the child's brains out before completing delivery
of the dead infant, is a gruesome and inhumane procedure that is never
medically necessary and should be prohibited.
(2) Rather than being an abortion procedure that is embraced by the
medical community, particularly among physicians who routinely perform
other abortion procedures, partial birth abortion remains a disfavored
procedure that is not only unnecessary to preserve the health of the
mother, but in fact poses serious risks to the long-term health of
women and in some circumstances, their lives. As a result, at least
twenty-seven states banned the procedure as did the United States
Congress which voted to ban the procedure during the 104th, 105th, and
106th Congresses.
(3) In Stenberg v. Carhart, 530 U.S. 914, 932 (2000), the United
States supreme court opined "that significant medical authority
supports the proposition that in some circumstances, [partial birth
abortion] would be the safest procedure" for pregnant women who wish to
undergo an abortion. Thus, the court struck down the state of
Nebraska's ban on partial birth abortion procedures, concluding that it
placed an "undue burden" on women seeking abortions because it failed
to include an exception for partial birth abortions deemed necessary to
preserve the "health" of the mother.
(4) In reaching this conclusion, the court deferred to the federal
district court's factual findings that the partial birth abortion
procedure was statistically and medically as safe as, and in many
circumstances safer than, alternative abortion procedures.
(5) However, the great weight of evidence presented at the Stenberg
trial and other trials challenging partial birth abortion bans, as well
as at extensive congressional hearings, demonstrates that a partial
birth abortion is never necessary to preserve the health of a woman,
poses significant health risks to a woman upon whom the procedure is
performed, and is outside of the standard of medical care.
(6) Despite the dearth of evidence in the Stenberg trial court
record supporting the district court's findings, the United States
court of appeals for the eighth circuit and the supreme court refused
to set aside the district court's factual findings because, under the
applicable standard of appellate review, they were not "clearly
erroneous." A finding of fact is clearly erroneous "when although
there is evidence to support it, the reviewing court on the entire
evidence is left with the definite and firm conviction that a mistake
has been committed." Anderson v. City of Bessemer City, North
Carolina, 470 U.S. 564, 573 (1985). Under this standard, "if the
district court's account of the evidence is plausible in light of the
record viewed in its entirety, the court of appeals may not reverse it
even though convinced that had it been sitting as the trier of fact, it
would have weighed the evidence differently." Id. at 574.
(7) Thus, in Stenberg, the United States supreme court was required
to accept the very questionable findings issued by the district court
judge; the effect of which was to render null and void the reasoned
factual findings and policy determinations of the United States
congress and at least twenty-seven state legislatures.
(8) However, under well-settled supreme court jurisprudence, the
United States congress is not bound to accept the same factual findings
that the supreme court was bound to accept in Stenberg under the
"clearly erroneous" standard. Rather, the United States congress is
entitled to reach its own factual findings, findings that the supreme
court accords great deference, and to enact legislation based upon
these findings so long as it seeks to pursue a legitimate interest that
is within the scope of the Constitution, and draws reasonable
inferences based upon substantial evidence.
(9) In Katzenbach v. Morgan, 384 U.S. 641 (1966), the supreme court
articulated its highly deferential review of congressional factual
findings when it addressed the constitutionality of section 4(e) of the
voting rights act of 1965. Regarding congress's factual determination
that section 4(e) would assist the Puerto Rican community in "gaining
nondiscriminatory treatment in public services," the court stated that
"[i]t was for congress, as the branch that made this judgment, to
assess and weigh the various conflicting considerations.... It is not
for us to review the congressional resolution of these factors. It is
enough that we be able to perceive a basis upon which the congress
might resolve the conflict as it did. There plainly was such a basis
to support section 4(e) in the application in question in this case."
Id. at 653.
(10) Katzenbach's highly deferential review of congress's factual
conclusions was relied upon by the United States district court for the
District of Columbia when it upheld the bail-out provisions of the
voting rights act of 1965, (42 U.S.C. 1973c), stating that
"congressional fact finding, to which we are inclined to pay great
deference, strengthens the inference that, in those jurisdictions
covered by the act, state actions discriminatory in effect are
discriminatory in purpose." City of Rome, Georgia v. U.S., 472 F.
Supp. 221 (D.D. Col. 1979) aff'd City of Rome, Georgia v. U.S., 446
U.S. 156 (1980).
(11) The court continued its practice of deferring to congressional
factual findings in reviewing the constitutionality of the must-carry
provisions of the cable television consumer protection and competition
act of 1992. See Turner Broadcasting System, Inc. v. Federal
Communications Commission, 512 U.S. 622 (1994) (Turner I) and Turner
Broadcasting System, Inc. v. Federal Communications Commission, 520
U.S. 180 (1997) (Turner II). At issue in the Turner cases was
congress's legislative finding that, absent mandatory carriage rules,
the continued viability of local broadcast television would be
"seriously jeopardized." The Turner I court recognized that as an
institution, "congress is far better equipped than the judiciary to
'amass and evaluate the vast amounts of data' bearing upon an issue as
complex and dynamic as that presented here." 512 U.S. at 665-66.
Although the court recognized that "the deference afforded to
legislative findings does not foreclose our independent judgment of the
facts bearing on an issue of constitutional law," its "obligation to
exercise independent judgment when first amendment rights are
implicated is not a license to reweigh the evidence de novo, or to
replace congress's factual predictions with our own. Rather, it is to
assure that, in formulating its judgments, congress has drawn
reasonable inferences based on substantial evidence." Id. at 666.
(12) Three years later in Turner II, the court upheld the "must-carry" provisions based upon congress's findings, stating the court's
"sole obligation" is "to assure that, in formulating its judgments,
congress has drawn reasonable inferences based on substantial
evidence." 520 U.S. at 195. Citing its ruling in Turner I, the court
reiterated that "[w]e owe congress's findings deference in part because
the institution is far better equipped than the judiciary to amass and
evaluate the vast amounts of data bearing upon legislative questions,"
id. at 195, and added that it "owe[d] congress's findings an additional
measure of deference out of respect for its authority to exercise the
legislative power." Id. at 196.
(13) There exists substantial record evidence upon which congress
has reached its conclusion that a ban on partial birth abortion is not
required to contain a "health" exception, because the facts indicate
that a partial birth abortion is never necessary to preserve the health
of a woman, poses serious risks to a woman's health, and lies outside
the standard of medical care. Congress was informed by extensive
hearings held during the 104th and 105th congresses and passed a ban on
partial birth abortion in the 104th, 105th, and 106th congresses.
These findings reflect the very informed judgment of the congress that
a partial birth abortion is never necessary to preserve the health of
a woman, poses serious risks to a woman's health, and lies outside the
standard of medical care, and should, therefore, be banned.
(14) Pursuant to the testimony received during extensive
legislative hearings during the 104th and 105th congresses, the
congress found that:
(a) Partial birth abortion poses serious risks to the health of a
woman undergoing the procedure. Those risks include, among other
things: An increase in a woman's risk of suffering from cervical
incompetence, a result of cervical dilation making it difficult or
impossible for a woman to successfully carry a subsequent pregnancy to
term; an increased risk of uterine rupture, abruption, amniotic fluid
embolus, and trauma to the uterus as a result of converting the child
to a footling breech position, a procedure which, according to a
leading obstetrics textbook, "there are very few, if any, indications
for... other than for delivery of a second twin"; and a risk of
lacerations and secondary hemorrhaging due to the doctor blindly
forcing a sharp instrument into the base of the unborn child's skull
while he or she is lodged in the birth canal, an act which could result
in severe bleeding, brings with it the threat of shock, and could
ultimately result in maternal death.
(b) There is no credible medical evidence that partial birth
abortions are safe or are safer than other abortion procedures. No
controlled studies of partial birth abortions have been conducted nor
have any comparative studies been conducted to demonstrate its safety
and efficacy compared to other abortion methods. Furthermore, there
have been no articles published in peer-reviewed journals that
establish that partial birth abortions are superior in any way to
established abortion procedures. Indeed, unlike other more commonly
used abortion procedures, there are currently no medical schools that
provide instruction on abortions that include the instruction in
partial birth abortions in their curriculum.
(c) A prominent medical association has concluded that partial
birth abortion is "not an accepted medical practice," that it has
"never been subject to even a minimal amount of the normal medical
practice development," that "the relative advantages and disadvantages
of the procedure in specific circumstances remain unknown," and that
"there is no consensus among obstetricians about its use." The
association has further noted that partial birth abortion is broadly
disfavored by both medical experts and the public, is "ethically
wrong," and "is never the only appropriate procedure."
(d) Neither the plaintiff in Stenberg v. Carhart, nor the experts
who testified on his behalf, have identified a single circumstance
during which a partial birth abortion was necessary to preserve the
health of a woman.
(e) The physician credited with developing the partial birth
abortion procedure has testified that he has never encountered a
situation where a partial birth abortion was medically necessary to
achieve the desired outcome and, thus, is never medically necessary to
preserve the health of a woman.
(f) A ban on the partial birth abortion procedure will therefore
advance the health interests of pregnant women seeking to terminate a
pregnancy.
(g) In light of this overwhelming evidence, congress and the states
have a compelling interest in prohibiting partial birth abortions. In
addition to promoting maternal health, such a prohibition will draw a
bright line that clearly distinguishes abortion and infanticide, that
preserves the integrity of the medical profession, and promotes respect
for human life.
(h) Based upon Roe v. Wade, 410 U.S. 113 (1973) and Planned
Parenthood v. Casey, 505 U.S. 833 (1992), a governmental interest in
protecting the life of a child during the delivery process arises by
virtue of the fact that during a partial birth abortion, labor is
induced and the birth process has begun. This distinction was
recognized in Roe when the court noted, without comment, that the Texas
parturition statute, which prohibited one from killing a child "in a
state of being born and before actual birth," was not under attack.
This interest becomes compelling as the child emerges from the maternal
body. A child that is completely born is a full, legal person entitled
to constitutional protections afforded a "person" under the United
States constitution. Partial birth abortions involve the killing of a
child that is in the process, in fact mere inches away from, becoming
a "person." Thus, the government has a heightened interest in
protecting the life of the partially born child.
(i) This, too, has not gone unnoticed in the medical community,
where a prominent medical association has recognized that partial birth
abortions are "ethically different from other destructive abortion
techniques because the fetus, normally twenty weeks or longer in
gestation, is killed outside of the womb." According to this medical
association, the "partial birth" gives the fetus an autonomy which
separates it from the right of the woman to choose treatments for her
own body.
(j) Partial birth abortion also confuses the medical, legal, and
ethical duties of physicians to preserve and promote life, as the
physician acts directly against the physical life of a child, whom he
or she had just delivered, all but the head, out of the womb, in order
to end that life. Partial birth abortion thus appropriates the
terminology and techniques used by obstetricians in the delivery of
living children, obstetricians who preserve and protect the life of the
mother and the child, and instead uses those techniques to end the life
of the partially born child.
(k) Thus, by aborting a child in the manner that purposefully seeks
to kill the child after he or she has begun the process of birth,
partial birth abortion undermines the public's perception of the
appropriate role of a physician during the delivery process, and
perverts a process during which life is brought into the world, in
order to destroy a partially born child.
(l) The gruesome and inhumane nature of the partial birth abortion
procedure and its disturbing similarity to the killing of a newborn
infant promotes a complete disregard for infant human life that can
only be countered by a prohibition of the procedure.
(m) The vast majority of babies killed during partial birth
abortions are alive until the end of the procedure. It is a medical
fact, however, that unborn infants at this stage can feel pain when
subjected to painful stimuli and that their perception of this pain is
even more intense than that of newborn infants and older children when
subjected to the same stimuli. Thus, during a partial birth abortion
procedure, the child will fully experience the pain associated with
piercing his or her skull and sucking out his or her brain.
(n) Implicitly approving such a brutal and inhumane procedure by
choosing not to prohibit it will further coarsen society to the
humanity of not only newborns, but all vulnerable and innocent human
life, making it increasingly difficult to protect such life. Thus,
congress has a compelling interest in acting, indeed it must act, to
prohibit this inhumane procedure.
(o) For these reasons, the congress found that partial birth
abortion is never medically indicated to preserve the health of the
mother; is in fact unrecognized as a valid abortion procedure by the
mainstream medical community; poses additional health risks to the
mother; blurs the line between abortion and infanticide in the killing
of a partially born child just inches from birth; and confuses the role
of the physician in childbirth and should, therefore, be banned.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any physician who, in or affecting interstate or foreign
commerce, knowingly performs a partial birth abortion and thereby kills
a human fetus shall be fined under this section or imprisoned not more
than two years, or both. This subsection does not apply to a partial
birth abortion that is necessary to save the life of a mother whose
life is endangered by a physical disorder, physical illness, or
physical injury, including a life-endangering physical condition caused
by or arising from the pregnancy itself.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Partial birth abortion" means an abortion in which:
(i) The person performing the abortion deliberately and
intentionally vaginally delivers a living fetus until, in the case of
a head-first presentation, the entire fetal head is outside the body of
the mother, or, in the case of breech presentation, any part of the
fetal trunk past the navel is outside the body of the mother for the
purpose of performing an overt act that the person knows will kill the
partially delivered living fetus; and
(ii) Performs the overt act, other than completion of delivery,
that kills the partially delivered living fetus.
(b) "Physician" means a doctor of medicine or osteopathy legally
authorized to practice medicine and surgery by the state in which the
doctor performs such activity, or any other individual legally
authorized by the state to perform abortions. However, any individual
who is not a physician or not otherwise legally authorized by the state
to perform abortions, but who nevertheless directly performs a partial
birth abortion, is subject to the provisions of this section.
(3)(a) The father, if married to the mother at the time she
receives a partial birth abortion procedure, and if the mother has not
attained the age of eighteen years at the time of the abortion, the
maternal grandparents of the fetus, may in a civil action obtain
appropriate relief, unless the pregnancy resulted from the plaintiff's
criminal conduct or the plaintiff consented to the abortion.
(b) Such relief shall include:
(i) Money damages for all injuries, psychological and physical,
occasioned by the violation of this section; and
(ii) Statutory damages equal to three times the cost of the partial
birth abortion.
(4)(a) A defendant accused of an offense under this section may
seek a hearing before the board of health on whether the physician's
conduct was necessary to save the life of the mother whose life was
endangered by a physical disorder, physical illness, or physical
injury, including a life-endangering physical condition caused by or
arising from the pregnancy itself.
(b) The findings on that issue are admissible on that issue at the
trial of the defendant. Upon a motion of the defendant, the court
shall delay the beginning of the trial for not more than thirty days to
permit such a hearing to take place.
(5) A woman upon whom a partial birth abortion is performed may not
be prosecuted under this section, for a conspiracy to violate this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, morals, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes
effect immediately.

--- END ---