BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.58.150 and 1961 ex.s. c 5 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
A fetal death means any product of conception that shows no
evidence of life after complete expulsion or extraction from ((its))
his or her mother by or as the result of any means, including the
application of any abortion procedure or technique. The words
"evidence of life" include breathing, beating of the heart, pulsation
of the umbilical cord, or definite movement of voluntary muscles.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9.02 RCW
to read as follows:
The body, including the body parts, body organs, body tissue, and
body fluids, of a fetus whose death is the result of the application of
any abortion procedure or technique may not be sold, donated, or
otherwise transferred, with or without valuable consideration, for any
use, but shall be disposed of as human remains by burial or cremation
in accordance with the requirements of this chapter and chapter 70.58
RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 68.50.610 and 2003 c 53 s 312 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person may not knowingly, for valuable consideration,
purchase or sell a part for transplantation or therapy, if removal of
the part is intended to occur after the death of the decedent.
(2) Valuable consideration does not include reasonable payment for
the removal, processing, disposal, preservation, quality control,
storage, transportation, or implantation of a part.
(3) The donation of any part of the body, including the body parts,
body organs, body tissue, and body fluids, of a fetus whose death is
the result of the application of any abortion procedure or technique is
prohibited under any circumstance, with or without valuable
consideration, for purposes of making an anatomical gift.
(4) A person who violates this section is guilty of a class C
felony and upon conviction is subject to a fine not exceeding fifty
thousand dollars or imprisonment not exceeding five years, or both.

Sec. 4 RCW 68.04.020 and 1977 c 47 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Human remains" or "remains" means the body of ((a)) any deceased
person, and includes the body in any stage of decomposition except
cremated remains. "Human remains" or "remains" includes the body of a
dead fetus.

Sec. 5 RCW 68.50.110 and 1987 c 331 s 60 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except for pathological waste as defined in RCW 70.95K.010, in
cases of dissection provided for in RCW 68.50.070 and 68.50.100, and
where ((a dead body)) human remains shall rightfully be carried through
or removed from the state for the purpose of lawful burial or cremation
elsewhere, ((every dead body of a human being lying)) all human remains
within this state, ((and)) including the remains of any dissected body,
after dissection, shall be decently buried, or cremated within a
reasonable time after death.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 9.02 RCW
to read as follows:
For purposes of RCW 70.58.150, 68.50.610, and sections 2 and 7 of
this act, "application of any abortion technique or procedure" means
the exercise or use of any force, instrument, or drug, or other means,
device, or substance, intended to cause the termination of a pregnancy
resulting in the death of a fetus.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 9.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Section 2 of this act is not intended, and may not be
construed, to prevent a coroner, medical examiner, physician of the
mother of the fetus, or prosecuting attorney from using that part of
the body of a fetus whose death is the result of the application of any
abortion procedure or technique that is necessary for the sole and
exclusive purpose of diagnosing or determining: (a) A disease or
condition or cause of death of the mother of the fetus if the abortion
was performed because of such disease or condition of the mother of the
fetus, or (b) cause of death of the fetus, if in either case no other
reasonable means of making the diagnosis or determination is available
without such use, and after the diagnosis or determination all that
part of the body of the fetus used to make the diagnosis or
determination that remains is disposed of as required in section 2 of
this act.
(2) Section 2 of this act and RCW 68.50.610(3) are not intended,
and may not be construed, to apply to the donation for medical research
or use of any part of the body of a fetus whose death is the result of
a miscarriage, stillbirth, ectopic pregnancy, sickness, disease,
accident, or crime caused to the fetus or the mother by a third party
without the knowledge and consent of the mother. However, the donation
may only be made if a parent or guardian knows of and approves the
donation for such medical research or use.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, morals, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes
effect immediately.

--- END ---