BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.43.250 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 52 s 26 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Any member who has attained the age of sixty-one years shall be
retired on the first day of the calendar month next succeeding that in
which said member shall have attained the age of sixty: PROVIDED, That
the requirement to retire at age sixty-one shall not apply to a member
serving as chief of the Washington state patrol.
(2) Any member who has completed twenty-five years of credited
service or has attained the age of fifty-five may apply to retire as
provided in RCW 43.43.260, by completing and submitting an application
form to the department, setting forth at what time the member desires
to be retired.

--- END ---