BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The transportation element required by RCW 36.70A.070 may
include, in addition to improvements or strategies to accommodate the
impacts of development authorized under RCW 36.70A.070(6)(b),
multimodal transportation improvements or strategies that are made
concurrent with the development. These transportation improvements or
strategies may include, but are not limited to, measures implementing
or evaluating:
(a) Multiple modes of transportation with peak and nonpeak hour
capacity performance standards for locally owned transportation
facilities; and
(b) Modal performance standards meeting the peak and nonpeak hour
capacity performance standards.
(2) Jurisdictions implementing new transportation improvements or
strategies under this section or RCW 36.70A.070(6)(b) after December
31, 2005, shall prepare and submit to the department annual performance
reports that include, at a minimum, an evaluation of the effectiveness
of the improvements or strategies.
(3) Nothing in this section or RCW 36.70A.070(6)(b) shall be
construed as prohibiting a county or city planning under RCW 36.70A.040
from exercising existing authority to develop multimodal improvements
or strategies to satisfy the concurrency requirements of this chapter.
(4) Nothing in this section is intended to affect or otherwise
modify the authority of jurisdictions planning under RCW 36.70A.040.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.80.030 and 1998 c 171 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each regional transportation planning organization shall
develop in cooperation with the department of transportation, providers
of public transportation and high capacity transportation, ports, and
local governments within the region, adopt, and periodically update a
regional transportation plan that:
(a) Is based on a least cost planning methodology that identifies
the most cost-effective facilities, services, and programs;
(b) Identifies existing or planned transportation facilities,
services, and programs, including but not limited to major roadways
including state highways and regional arterials, transit and
nonmotorized services and facilities, multimodal and intermodal
facilities, marine ports and airports, railroads, and noncapital
programs including transportation demand management that should
function as an integrated regional transportation system, giving
emphasis to those facilities, services, and programs that exhibit one
or more of the following characteristics:
(i) Crosses member county lines;
(ii) Is or will be used by a significant number of people who live
or work outside the county in which the facility, service, or project
is located;
(iii) Significant impacts are expected to be felt in more than one
county;
(iv) Potentially adverse impacts of the facility, service, program,
or project can be better avoided or mitigated through adherence to
regional policies;
(v) Transportation needs addressed by a project have been
identified by the regional transportation planning process and the
remedy is deemed to have regional significance; and
(vi) Provides for system continuity;
(c) Establishes level of service standards for state highways and
state ferry routes, with the exception of transportation facilities of
statewide significance as defined in RCW 47.06.140. These regionally
established level of service standards for state highways and state
ferries shall be developed jointly with the department of
transportation, to encourage consistency across jurisdictions. In
establishing level of service standards for state highways and state
ferries, consideration shall be given for the necessary balance between
providing for the free interjurisdictional movement of people and goods
and the needs of local commuters using state facilities;
(d) Includes a financial plan demonstrating how the regional
transportation plan can be implemented, indicating resources from
public and private sources that are reasonably expected to be made
available to carry out the plan, and recommending any innovative
financing techniques to finance needed facilities, services, and
programs;
(e) Assesses regional development patterns, capital investment and
other measures necessary to:
(i) Ensure the preservation of the existing regional transportation
system, including requirements for operational improvements,
resurfacing, restoration, and rehabilitation of existing and future
major roadways, as well as operations, maintenance, modernization, and
rehabilitation of existing and future transit, railroad systems and
corridors, and nonmotorized facilities; and
(ii) Make the most efficient use of existing transportation
facilities to relieve vehicular congestion and maximize the mobility of
people and goods;
(f) Sets forth a proposed regional transportation approach,
including capital investments, service improvements, programs, and
transportation demand management measures to guide the development of
the integrated, multimodal regional transportation system. For
regional growth centers, the approach must address transportation
concurrency strategies required under RCW 36.70A.070 and include a
measurement of vehicle level of service for off-peak periods and total
multimodal capacity for peak periods; and
(g) Where appropriate, sets forth the relationship of high capacity
transportation providers and other public transit providers with regard
to responsibility for, and the coordination between, services and
facilities.
(2) The organization shall review the regional transportation plan
biennially for currency and forward the adopted plan along with
documentation of the biennial review to the state department of
transportation.
(3) All transportation projects, programs, and transportation
demand management measures within the region that have an impact upon
regional facilities or services must be consistent with the plan and
with the adopted regional growth and transportation strategies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1)(a) The department of transportation
shall administer a study to examine multimodal transportation
improvements and strategies to comply with the concurrency requirements
of RCW 36.70A.070(6), subject to the availability of amounts
appropriated for this specific purpose. The study shall be completed
by one or more regional transportation planning organizations
established under chapter 47.80 RCW electing to participate in the
study.
(b) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall provide technical assistance with the study to the department of
transportation and participating regional transportation planning
organizations.
(2) The department of transportation shall, in consultation with
members from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate, appointed
by the president of the senate, and members from each of the two
largest caucuses of the house of representatives, appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives, approve the scope of the study
established by this section.
(3) The study shall, at a minimum, include:
(a) An assessment and comprehensive summary of studies or reports
examining concurrency requirements and practices in Washington;
(b) An examination of existing or proposed multimodal
transportation improvements or strategies employed by a city in a
county with a population of one million or more residents;
(c) Recommendations for statutory and administrative rule changes
that will further the promotion of effective multimodal transportation
improvements and strategies that are consistent with the provisions of
RCW 36.70A.070 and 36.70A.020(3);
(d) Recommendations for improving the coordination of concurrency
practices in jurisdictions subject to RCW 36.70A.215;
(e) An identification of effective multimodal transportation
improvements and strategies employed by jurisdictions subject to RCW
36.70A.215; and
(f) Recommendations for model multimodal transportation
improvements and strategies that may be employed by counties and
cities.
(4) The department of transportation shall, in coordination with
participating regional transportation planning organizations completing
the study established by this section, submit a report of findings and
recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
December 31, 2006.

--- END ---