BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that: (1) Public
confidence in government is essential. Public programs must
continuously improve in quality, efficiency, and effectiveness in order
to increase public trust;
(2) Washington state government and other entities that receive tax
dollars must continuously improve the way they operate and deliver
services so citizens receive maximum value for their tax dollars;
(3) State government must establish priorities for the delivery of
governmental services and continually reassess the ability of state
agencies, departments, programs, and activities to contribute to those
priorities. The highest priority programs must be evaluated to
determine if they are operating at maximum efficiency and
effectiveness, while the lowest priority programs must be assessed to
determine their continued relevance and viability;
(4) Fair, independent, professional performance audits of state
agencies are essential to improving the efficiency and effectiveness of
government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The legislature finds that the highest
priority functions of state government serve the following objectives:
(a) Improve student achievement in elementary, middle, and high
schools;
(b) Improve the quality and productivity of, and respect for, the
state's work force, including consideration of competitive
compensation, realistic workloads, and recruitment and retention;
(c) Improve the value of a state college or university education;
(d) Improve the health of the state's citizens;
(e) Improve the security of the state's vulnerable children and
adults;
(f) Improve the economic vitality of businesses and individuals;
(g) Improve statewide mobility of people, goods, information, and
energy;
(h) Improve the safety of people and property;
(i) Improve the quality of the state's natural resources;
(j) Improve cultural and recreational opportunities throughout the
state; and
(k) Improve the overall efficiency and effectiveness of the
operations of state government.
(2) These priority functions of state government identified in this
section shall form the basis of the management reviews identified under
RCW 43.88.090.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.88.090 and 1997 c 372 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For purposes of developing budget proposals to the legislature,
the governor shall have the power, and it shall be the governor's duty,
to require from proper agency officials such detailed estimates and
other information in such form and at such times as the governor shall
direct. The estimates for the legislature and the judiciary shall be
transmitted to the governor and shall be included in the budget without
revision. The estimates for state pension contributions shall be based
on the rates provided in chapter 41.45 RCW. Copies of all such
estimates shall be transmitted to the standing committees on ways and
means of the house and senate at the same time as they are filed with
the governor and the office of financial management.
The estimates shall include statements or tables which indicate, by
agency, the state funds which are required for the receipt of federal
matching revenues. The estimates shall be revised as necessary to
reflect legislative enactments and adopted appropriations and shall be
included with the initial biennial allotment submitted under RCW
43.88.110. The estimates must reflect that the agency considered any
alternatives to reduce costs or improve service delivery identified in
the findings of a performance audit of the agency by the joint
legislative audit and review committee. Nothing in this subsection
requires performance audit findings to be published as part of the
budget.
(2) Each state agency shall define its mission and establish
measurable goals for achieving desirable results for those who receive
its services and the taxpayers who pay for those services. Each agency
shall also develop clear strategies and timelines to achieve its goals.
This section does not require an agency to develop a new mission or
goals in place of identifiable missions or goals that meet the intent
of this section. The mission and goals of each agency must conform to
statutory direction and limitations.
(3) For the purpose of assessing program performance, each state
agency shall establish program objectives for each major program in its
budget. The objectives must be consistent with the missions and goals
developed under this section. The objectives must be expressed to the
extent practicable in outcome-based, objective, and measurable form
unless an exception to adopt a different standard is granted by the
office of financial management and approved by the legislative
committee on performance review. The office of financial management
shall provide necessary professional and technical assistance to assist
state agencies in the development of strategic plans that include the
mission of the agency and its programs, measurable goals, strategies,
and performance measurement systems.
(4) Each state agency shall adopt procedures for continuous self-assessment of each program and activity, using the mission, goals,
objectives, and measurements required under subsections (2) and (3) of
this section.
(5) It is the policy of the legislature that each agency's budget
proposals must be directly linked to the agency's stated mission and
program goals and objectives as related to the priorities of
government. Consistent with this policy, agency budget proposals must
include integration of performance measures that allow objective
determination of a program's success in achieving its goals. The
office of financial management shall ((develop a plan to)) merge the
budget development process with agency performance assessment
procedures and management reviews under subsection (6) of this section.
((The plan must include a schedule to integrate agency strategic plans
and performance measures into agency budget requests and the governor's
budget proposal over three fiscal biennia. The plan must identify
those agencies that will implement the revised budget process in the
1997-1999 biennium, the 1999-2001 biennium, and the 2001-2003
biennium.)) In consultation with the legislative fiscal committees,
the office of financial management shall recommend statutory and
procedural modifications to the state's budget, accounting, and
reporting systems to facilitate the performance assessment procedures
and the merger of those procedures with the state budget process.
((The plan and recommended statutory and procedural modifications must
be submitted to the legislative fiscal committees by September 30,
1996.))
(6) The governor and the governor's executive cabinet shall develop
a performance measurement system and conduct coordinated quarterly and
annual management reviews of state agencies, departments, programs, and
activities as related to the priorities of government using that
system. The reviews shall include, but are not limited to, an
assessment of cost measures, including unit cost where appropriate,
quality measures, productivity measures, outcome measures, efficiency
measures, timeliness of delivery of services, and comparative
benchmarks.
(7) The governor shall forward these management reviews to the
legislative fiscal committees and the joint legislative audit and
review committee and the appropriate sections of the reviews to the
relevant policy committees of the legislature by January 1st of each
year.
(8) In the year of the gubernatorial election, the governor shall
invite the governor-elect or the governor-elect's designee to attend
all hearings provided in RCW 43.88.100; and the governor shall furnish
the governor-elect or the governor-elect's designee with such
information as will enable the governor-elect or the governor-elect's
designee to gain an understanding of the state's budget requirements.
The governor-elect or the governor-elect's designee may ask such
questions during the hearings and require such information as the
governor-elect or the governor-elect's designee deems necessary and may
make recommendations in connection with any item of the budget which,
with the governor-elect's reasons therefor, shall be presented to the
legislature in writing with the budget document. Copies of all such
estimates and other required information shall also be submitted to the
standing committees on ways and means of the house and senate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW
to read as follows:
All fiscal and policy committees of the legislature and the joint
legislative audit and review committee shall receive copies of the
quarterly and annual management review reports issued by the governor
and the office of financial management under RCW 43.88.090. The fiscal
committees of the legislature shall consider these management review
reports when developing the operating, capital, and transportation
budgets, and when developing revenue strategies. The policy committees
of the legislature shall consider the relevant sections of these
management review reports when developing policy for the state and
shall make recommendations to the fiscal committees for appropriation
of state funds that are consistent with state policy priorities. These
recommendations shall focus on the integration of capital and operating
expenditures and the alignment of appropriations with the state policy
priorities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 44.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall review
the performance and outcome measures of selected state agencies,
departments, programs, and activities and the executive branch's
performance management review and the metrics used by that system. The
purpose of these performance measure reviews is to ensure that the
legislature has the means to adequately and accurately assess the
performance of those agencies, departments, programs, and activities
and the outcomes of their performance. Where two or more agencies have
shared responsibility for functions or priorities of government, these
reviews can also determine whether effective interagency cooperation
and collaboration occurs in areas such as program coordination,
administrative structures, information systems, and administration of
grants, loans, and vendor rates.
(2) In conducting these reviews, the joint committee shall consult
with the office of financial management and other state agencies. The
legislative auditor may contract with and consult with public and
private independent professional and technical experts as necessary in
conducting the reviews.
(3) The joint committee shall develop a work plan and common
methodology for conducting these periodic reviews, which shall be
accomplished in five-year cycles. In setting the work plan and the
extent of these performance measure reviews, the joint legislative
audit and review committee shall consider the timing and results of
other recent state, federal, and independent reviews and audits, the
seriousness of past findings, any remedial action taken by an agency or
department, the executive branch's quarterly and annual management
review reports, the adequacy of existing additional performance and
outcome measures used by an agency, department, program, or activity,
and the desirability of including a diverse range of agencies each
year. The reviews may include, but are not limited to:
(a) A determination of whether the executive branch's performance
management system and the performance and outcome measures are
consistent with legislative mandates, as well as agency strategic
plans, mission statements, and goals and objectives;
(b) A determination of whether the legislature has established
clear mandates and policy directions that lend themselves to
performance and outcome measurement;
(c) An examination of how agency management uses the measures to
manage resources efficiently and effectively;
(d) An assessment of how the agency uses performance benchmarks for
the purpose of assessing program or agency performance compared to
external standards and benchmarks;
(e) An examination of how performance and outcome measures are used
to make planning and operational improvements;
(f) A determination of how performance and outcome measures are
used in the budget planning, development, and allotment processes and
the extent to which the agency is in compliance with its
responsibilities under RCW 43.88.090;
(g) An assessment of whether the performance and outcome measures
are reliable and collected in a uniform and timely manner; and
(h) Recommendations as necessary or appropriate.
(4) Completed performance measure reviews shall be presented to the
joint committee and published in the same manner as prescribed for
performance audits in RCW 44.28.088. Published performance measure
reviews shall be made available to the public through the joint
committee's web site and through customary public communications.
Final reports must also be transmitted to the appropriate policy and
fiscal standing committees of the legislature.
(5) Based on performance measure reviews authorized by subsection
(1) of this section, and on priorities of the executive branch's
quarterly and annual management review reports, authorized by RCW
43.88.090, the legislative auditor shall recommend full performance
audits of specific agencies or departments, or specific programs or
activities, within an agency or department, and publicly post those
recommendations. The joint committee shall solicit input from the
public to decide whether and how to proceed with a full performance
audit. If the committee decides by a majority vote that a full
performance audit of an agency or department, a specific program or
activity within an agency or department, or multiple agencies is
appropriate, the committee shall add that audit to its biennial
performance audit work plan under RCW 44.28.080 and 44.28.083.
(6) When conducting a full performance audit of an agency or
department, or a specific program or activity within an agency or
department, or multiple agencies, in accordance with subsection (5) of
this section, the joint committee shall solicit input from appropriate
representatives and experts in the field that is the subject of an
audit. The joint committee shall make recommendations regarding the
continuation, abolition, consolidation, or reorganization of each
affected agency, department, program, or activity. The joint committee
shall identify opportunities to develop government partnerships, and
eliminate redundancies to improve the quality, effectiveness, and
efficiency of state government.

Sec. 6 RCW 44.28.083 and 1996 c 288 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) During the regular legislative session of each odd-numbered
year, beginning with 1997, the joint legislative audit and review
committee shall develop and approve a performance audit work plan for
the subsequent sixteen to twenty-four-month period and an overall work
plan that identifies state agency programs for which formal evaluation
appears necessary. Among the factors to be considered in preparing the
work plans are:
(a) The results of the committee's reviews of the performance and
outcome measures of selected state agencies, departments, programs, and
activities as required by section 5 of this act, and the executive
branch's quarterly and annual management review reports;
(b) Whether a program newly created or significantly altered by the
legislature warrants continued oversight because (i) the fiscal impact
of the program is significant, or (ii) the program represents a
relatively high degree of risk in terms of reaching the stated goals
and objectives for that program;
(((b))) (c) Whether implementation of an existing program has
failed to meet its goals and objectives by any significant degree; and
(((c))) (d) Whether a follow-up audit would help ensure that
previously identified recommendations for improvements were being
implemented.
(2) The project description for each performance audit must include
start and completion dates, the proposed approach, and cost estimates.
(3) The legislative auditor may consult with the chairs and staff
of appropriate legislative committees, the state auditor, and the
director of financial management in developing the performance audit
work plan.
(4) The performance audit work plan and the overall work plan may
include proposals to employ contract resources. As conditions warrant,
the performance audit work plan and the overall work plan may be
amended from time to time. All performance audit work plans shall be
transmitted to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the
senate and the house of representatives no later than the sixtieth day
of the regular legislative session of each odd-numbered year, beginning
with 1997. All overall work plans shall be transmitted to the
appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the senate and the house of
representatives.

--- END ---