BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 38.08.040 and 1993 c 263 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
In event of war, insurrection, rebellion, invasion, tumult, riot,
mob, or organized body acting together by force with intent to commit
a felony or to offer violence to persons or property, or by force and
violence to break and resist the laws of this state, or the United
States, or in case of the imminent danger of the occurrence of any of
said events, or at the lawful request of competent state or local
authority in support of enforcement of controlled substance statutes,
or whenever responsible civil authorities shall, for any reason, fail
to preserve law and order, or protect life or property, or the governor
believes that such failure is imminent, or in event of public disaster,
or when otherwise required for the public health, safety, or welfare,
or to perform any military duty authorized by state law, or to prepare
for or recover from any of these events or the consequences thereof,
the governor shall have power to order the organized militia of
Washington, or any part thereof, into active service of the state to
execute the laws, and to perform such duty as the governor shall deem
proper.

Sec. 2 RCW 38.24.010 and 1991 c 43 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
All bills, claims and demands for military purposes shall be
certified or verified and audited in the manner prescribed by
regulations promulgated by the governor and shall be paid by the state
treasurer from funds available for that purpose. In all cases where
the organized militia, or any part of the organized militia, is called
into the service of the state to ((execute or enforce the laws or in
case of war, riot, insurrection, invasion, breach of the peace, public
disaster, or the imminent danger of the occurrence of any of these
events)) perform duties under RCW 38.08.040, except for anticipated
planning, training, exercises, and other administrative duties that are
not of an emergent nature, warrants for allowed pay and expenses for
such services or compensation for injuries or death shall be drawn upon
the general fund of the state treasury and paid out of any moneys in
said fund not otherwise appropriated. All such warrants shall be the
obligation of the state and shall bear interest at the legal rate from
the date of their presentation for payment.

--- END ---