BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Applicant" means a qualified small business applying for a tax
deferral under this chapter.
(2) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(3) "Eligible investment project" means an investment project by a
qualified small business as defined in this section.
(4) "Employee" means a full-time, part-time, or temporary employee
covered by Title 50 RCW for whom the small business is making
contributions.
(5) "Full-time employee" means a person whose employer requires
them to work thirty-five hours per week, four hundred fifty-five hours
a quarter, or one thousand eight hundred twenty hours a year.
(6) "Health care plan" means any "employee welfare benefit plan" as
defined by the employee retirement income security act of 1974, 29
U.S.C. Sec. 1001 et seq. and any "health plan" or "health benefit plan"
as defined in RCW 48.43.005, funded or established by an employer for
the purpose of providing for its employees or their beneficiaries,
through the purchase of insurance or otherwise, health care services.
For purposes of this subsection "health care services" means services
offered or provided by health care facilities and health care providers
relating to the prevention, cure, or treatment of illness, injury, or
disease.
(7) "Initiation of construction" means the date that a building
permit is issued under the building code adopted under RCW 19.27.031.
Initiation of construction does not include soil testing, site clearing
and grading, site preparation, or any other related activities that are
initiated before the issuance of a building permit for the construction
of the foundation of the building. If the investment project involves
more than one qualified building, initiation of construction shall
apply separately to each qualified building.
(8) "Investment project" means an investment in qualified buildings
or qualified machinery and equipment, including labor and services
rendered in the planning, installation, and construction of the
project. An investment project does not include any portion of an
investment project undertaken by a light and power business as defined
in RCW 82.16.010(5), other than that portion of a cogeneration project
that is used to generate power for consumption within the manufacturing
site of which the cogeneration project is an integral part, or
investment projects which have already received deferrals under this
chapter.
(9) "Manufacturing" means the same as defined in RCW 82.04.120.
(10) "Operationally complete" means that the investment project is
capable of being used for its intended purpose as described in the
application.
(11) "Qualified buildings" means construction of new structures
including parking facilities, and expansion or renovation of existing
structures, for the purpose of increasing floor space or production
capacity used for manufacturing, including plant offices and warehouses
or other facilities for the storage of raw material or finished goods
if such facilities are an essential or an integral part of a factory,
mill, or plant, used for manufacturing. If a building is used partly
for manufacturing and partly for other purposes, the applicable tax
deferral shall be determined by apportionment of the costs of
construction under rules adopted by the department.
(12) "Qualified machinery and equipment" means all new industrial
fixtures, equipment, and support facilities that are an integral and
necessary part of a manufacturing operation. "Qualified machinery and
equipment" includes manufacturing components such as belts, pulleys,
shafts, and moving parts; molds, tools, and dies; operating structures;
and all equipment used to control or operate the machinery.
(13) "Qualified small business" means a small business that:
(a) Pays all of its employees a wage of at least one and one-half
times the state's minimum wage as it exists at the time the department
certifies that the investment project is operationally complete; and
(b) Offers a health care plan to all of its full-time employees.
(14) "Recipient" means a qualified small business receiving a tax
deferral under this chapter.
(15) "Small business" means a "person" as defined in RCW 82.04.030
that does not exceed the following employment levels:
(a) Fifty or fewer employees at the time of application and at the
time the department certifies that the investment project is
operationally complete;
(b) One hundred or fewer employees at the end of the first calendar
year following the year in which the department certifies that the
investment project is operationally complete;
(c) Two hundred or fewer employees at the end of the second
calendar year following the year in which the department certifies that
the investment project is operationally complete; or
(d) Four hundred or fewer employees at the end of the third
calendar year following the year in which the department certifies that
the investment project is operationally complete.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Application for deferral of taxes under this
chapter must be made before initiation of the construction of the
investment project or acquisition of equipment or machinery. The
application shall be made to the department in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The application shall contain
information regarding the location of the investment project, the
applicant's average employment in the state for the prior year,
estimated or actual new employment related to the project, estimated or
actual wages of employees related to the project, estimated or actual
costs, time schedules for completion and operation, and other
information required by the department. The department shall rule on
the application within sixty days.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department shall issue a sales and
use tax deferral certificate for state and local sales and use taxes
due under chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW on each eligible
investment project.
(2) The department shall keep a running total of all deferrals
granted under this chapter during each fiscal biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Except as provided in subsections (2)
and (3) of this section, taxes deferred under this chapter need not be
repaid.
(2) Each recipient shall submit an annual report to the department
by March 31st following the year in which the eligible investment
project was certified as operationally complete, and on March 31st of
the three succeeding calendar years. The annual report shall contain
information, as required by the department, from which the department
may determine whether the recipient is meeting the requirements of this
chapter. If the recipient fails to submit a report or submits an
inadequate report, the department may declare the amount of deferred
taxes outstanding to be immediately due and payable.
(3) If, on the basis of an annual report under subsection (2) of
this section or other information, the department finds that an
investment project is used for purposes other than manufacturing or
that the recipient is no longer a qualified small business at any time
during the calendar year in which the investment project is certified
by the department as having been operationally completed, or at any
time during any of the three succeeding calendar years, a portion of
deferred taxes shall be immediately due and payable according to the
following schedule:

Repayment Year % of Deferred Tax Repaid

1 100%

2 75%

3 50%

4 25%

(4) The department shall assess interest, but not penalties, on the
deferred taxes under subsections (2) and (3) of this section. The
interest shall be assessed at the rate provided for delinquent taxes
under chapter 82.32 RCW, retroactively to the date of deferral, and
shall accrue until the deferred taxes are repaid.
(5) The debt for deferred taxes will not be extinguished by
insolvency or other failure of the recipient. Transfer of ownership
does not terminate the deferral. The deferral is transferred if the
new owner meets the eligibility requirements of this chapter, for the
remaining periods of the deferral, and the new owner agrees in writing
to assume liability for payment of any deferred taxes under subsections
(2) and (3) of this section. The original recipient of a deferral that
is transferred is not responsible for payment of any deferred tax under
subsection (2) or (3) of this section for periods subsequent to the
transfer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If a recipient must pay deferred tax under
section 4(3) of this act because the recipient is no longer a qualified
small business, the department shall issue a deferral certificate under
chapter 82.60 RCW for the deferred taxes outstanding if the investment
project is an eligible investment project as defined in RCW 82.60.020
or 82.60.049.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.60.030 and 1994 sp.s. c 1 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
application for deferral of taxes under this chapter must be made
before initiation of the construction of the investment project or
acquisition of equipment or machinery. The application shall be made
to the department in a form and manner prescribed by the department.
The application shall contain information regarding the location of the
investment project, the applicant's average employment in the state for
the prior year, estimated or actual new employment related to the
project, estimated or actual wages of employees related to the project,
estimated or actual costs, time schedules for completion and operation,
and other information required by the department. The department shall
rule on the application within sixty days.
(2) An application for deferral of taxes under this chapter is not
required to issue a deferral certificate for investment projects under
section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The employment security department shall
make, and certify to the department of revenue, all determinations of
employment as requested by the department under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the
administration of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Applications, reports, and any other
information received by the department under this chapter shall not be
confidential under RCW 82.32.330.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Taxes shall not be deferred under this act
prior to July 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 5 and 7 through 10 and
12 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---