BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, an eligible
person is allowed a credit against the tax due. The credit is equal to
six hundred fifty dollars for each qualified employment position
created after the effective date of this section.
(b) Credit may not be taken for hiring of persons into employment
positions that exist on the effective date of this section. Credit is
authorized for new employees hired for qualified employment positions
created on or after the effective date of this section. New qualified
employment positions filled by existing employees are eligible for the
credit under this section only if the employment position vacated by
the existing employee is filled by a new hire.
(c) If a vacancy occurs in a qualified employment position, it must
be filled within sixty consecutive days in order to maintain
eligibility for the credit.
(d) A credit is earned for the calendar year the qualified
employment position is filled. Credit may be accrued and carried over
until it is used. No refunds may be granted for credits under this
section.
(e) No application is necessary for the tax credit.
(2) An eligible person claiming the credit must keep records
necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this section,
including employment records, health care benefits offered, and health
care benefit costs.
(3) A person claiming credit under chapter 82.62 RCW or RCW
82.04.44525 or 82.04.448 cannot claim a credit under this section.
(4) The employment security department must provide to the
department of revenue such information needed by the department of
revenue to verify eligibility under this section.
(5) If at any time the department finds that a person is not
eligible for tax credit under this section, the amount of taxes against
which a credit was claimed is immediately due and payable. The
department shall assess interest, but not penalties, on the taxes
against which the credit was claimed. Interest shall be assessed at
the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW,
retroactively to the date the credit was claimed, and shall accrue
until the taxes against which a credit has been claimed are repaid.
(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Eligible person" means a person as defined in RCW 82.04.030
that has fifty or fewer employees and offers a health care plan to all
of its full-time employees.
(b) "Employee" means a full-time, part-time, or temporary employee
covered by Title 50 RCW for whom the small business is making
contributions.
(c) "Full-time employee" means a person whose employer requires
them to work thirty-five hours per week, four hundred fifty-five hours
a quarter, or one thousand eight hundred twenty hours a year.
(d) "Health care plan" means any "employee welfare benefit plan" as
defined by the employee retirement income security act of 1974, 29
U.S.C. Sec. 1001 et seq. and any "health plan" or "health benefit plan"
as defined in RCW 48.43.005, funded or established by an employer for
the purpose of providing for its employees or their beneficiaries,
through the purchase of insurance or otherwise, health care services.
For purposes of this subsection "health care services" means services
offered or provided by health care facilities and health care providers
relating to the prevention, cure, or treatment of illness, injury, or
disease.
(e) "Qualified employment position" means a new position filled by
a permanent full-time employee employed by an eligible person for at
least twelve consecutive months and who is paid a wage of at least one
and one-half times the state's minimum wage as it existed at the time
of hire.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---