BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 For the purposes of this chapter, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise, "projectile stun gun" means an
electronic device which projects wired probes attached to the device
that emit an electrical charge and is designed and primarily employed
to incapacitate a person or animal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) No person or business may sell a
projectile stun gun in the state of Washington unless the projectile
stun gun:
(a) Has a maximum charge of less than one hundred thousand volts;
(b) Has a maximum of less than nine joules of energy per pulse;
(c) Has an identification and tracking system which, upon
deployment of remote electrodes, disperses coded material traceable to
the purchaser through records kept by the manufacturer on all
projectile stun guns and all individual cartridges sold, which
information shall be made available to any law enforcement agency upon
request; and
(d) Is manufactured by a company that offers a training program.
(2) A person selling a projectile stun gun shall register the
identity of the purchaser with the manufacturer of the projectile stun
gun. Such identification shall be verified with a government-issued
identification, or by verifying the social security number and address
of the purchaser.
(3) No person or business may sell or give a projectile stun gun to
any person who has been convicted of a felony. It is the
responsibility of the person selling or giving the projectile stun gun
to complete a national criminal history background check to determine
if the person purchasing or receiving the projectile stun gun is a
felon.
(4) A person who violates subsection (1) or (2) of this section is
guilty of a misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A person may not purchase, possess, or
use a projectile stun gun that is in violation of section 2(1) of this
act.
(2) No person who has been convicted of a felony may purchase,
possess, or use a projectile stun gun.
(3) It is unlawful for any person to carry, exhibit, display, or
draw any projectile stun gun in a manner, under circumstances, and at
the time and place that either manifests an intent to intimidate
another or that warrants alarm for the safety of other persons.
(4) Subsection (3) of this section shall not apply to or affect the
following:
(a) Any act committed by a person while in his or her place of
abode or fixed place of business;
(b) Any person who by virtue of his or her office or public
employment is vested by law with a duty to preserve public safety,
maintain public order, or to make arrests for offenses, while in the
performance of such duty;
(c) Any person acting to protect himself or herself against the use
of presently threatened unlawful force by another, or to protect
another against the use of such unlawful force by a third person;
(d) Any person making or assisting in making a lawful arrest for
the commission of a felony; or
(e) Any person engaged in military activities sponsored by the
federal or state government.
(5) Any person violating this section is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Any person who knowingly uses a projectile
stun gun against a law enforcement officer is guilty of a class B
felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The state of Washington fully occupies and
preempts the entire field of regulation of projectile stun guns.
Cities, towns, and counties or other municipalities may enact only
those laws and ordinances relating to projectile stun guns that are
consistent with this chapter. Such local ordinances shall have the
same penalties as provided for by state law. Local laws and ordinances
that are inconsistent with the requirements of state law shall not be
enacted and are preempted and repealed, regardless of the nature of the
code, charter, or home rule status of the city, town, county, or
municipality.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 9 RCW.

--- END ---