BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that, due to lack of
a permanent address or other contact information, lack of skills and
training, lack of reliable personal transportation, frequent health
challenges, or other circumstances, homeless persons are vulnerable to
exploitation as low-wage laborers. In 1995, the legislature recognized
that the circumstances of another group of exploited low-wage laborers,
migrant agricultural workers, necessitated the creation of standards
for temporary worker housing to prevent those workers from being forced
to obtain housing that is unsafe and unsanitary; those standards are
reflected in chapter 70.114A RCW. The legislature finds that, due to
their poverty, extreme need, and dire circumstances, similar
exploitation of the labor of homeless persons also exists, and that,
due to an inadequate supply of affordable housing and of space in
permanent shelters for the homeless, they are likewise being forced to
seek shelter in unsafe and unsanitary conditions. If migrant
farmworkers, who in many cases are not citizens of the United States
and may not be in the United States legally, are worthy of the
protection of the state to ensure that their housing is safe and
sanitary, then our friends, neighbors, coworkers, and fellow citizens
who find themselves temporarily homeless are even more worthy of that
protection. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to
encourage temporary housing for homeless persons to be safe and
sanitary by establishing a clear and concise set of regulations for
temporary housing and encampments for homeless persons, substantially
equivalent to those provided for temporary worker housing.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.114A.020 and 1999 c 374 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Agricultural employee" means any person who renders personal
services to, or under the direction of, an agricultural employer in
connection with the employer's agricultural activity.
(2) "Agricultural employer" means any person engaged in
agricultural activity, including the growing, producing, or harvesting
of farm or nursery products, or engaged in the forestation or
reforestation of lands, which includes but is not limited to the
planting, transplanting, tubing, precommercial thinning, and thinning
of trees and seedlings, the clearing, piling, and disposal of brush and
slash, the harvest of Christmas trees, and other related activities.
(3) "Department" means the department of health.
(4) "Dwelling unit" means a shelter, building, or portion of a
building, that may include cooking and eating facilities, that is:
(a) Provided and designated by the operator as either a sleeping
area, living area, or both, for occupants; and
(b) Physically separated from other sleeping and common-use areas.
(5) "Enforcement" and "enforcement actions" include the authority
to levy and collect fines.
(6) "Facility" means a sleeping place, drinking water, toilet,
sewage disposal, food handling installation, or other installations
required for compliance with this chapter.
(7) "Occupant" means a temporary worker or a person who resides
with a temporary worker at the housing site.
(8) "Operator" means a person holding legal title to the land on
which temporary worker housing is located. However, if the legal title
and the right to possession are in different persons, "operator" means
a person having the lawful control or supervision over the temporary
worker housing under a lease, temporary use permit, or other
arrangement.
(9) "Temporary worker" means an agricultural employee employed
intermittently and not residing year-round at the same site, or a
homeless person.
(10) "Temporary worker housing" means a place, area, or piece of
land where sleeping places or housing sites are provided by an
agricultural employer for his or her agricultural employees or by
another person, including a temporary worker housing operator, who is
providing such accommodations for employees or for homeless persons,
for temporary((, seasonal)) occupancy.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.114A.085 and 1999 c 374 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall prepare a report to the legislature on
utilization of the temporary worker building code authorized by RCW
70.114A.081. The report shall include the number of housing units,
number of families or individuals housed, number of growers or
operators obtaining permits, the geographic distribution of the
permits, and recommendations of changes in the temporary worker
building code necessary to avoid health and safety problems for the
occupants. The report shall be transmitted to the ((senate committee
on commerce, trade, housing and financial institutions and the house of
representatives committee on economic development, housing and trade by
December 15, 2000, and an update shall be transmitted every two years
thereafter)) legislature electronically by December 15th in each even-numbered year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---