BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 72.01.140 and 1981 c 238 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary shall:
(1) Make a survey, investigation, and classification of the lands
connected with the state institutions under his control, and determine
which thereof are of such character as to be most profitably used for
agricultural, horticultural, dairying, and stock raising purposes,
taking into consideration the costs of making them ready for
cultivation, the character of the soil, its depth and fertility, the
number of kinds of crops to which it is adapted, the local climatic
conditions, the local annual rainfall, the water supply upon the land
or available, the needs of all state institutions for the food products
that can be grown or produced, and the amount and character of the
available labor of inmates at the several institutions;
(2) Establish and carry on suitable farming operations at the
several institutions under his control;
(3) Supply the several institutions with the necessary food
products produced thereat;
(4) Exchange with, or furnish to, other institutions, food products
at the cost of production;
(5) Sell and dispose of surplus food products produced.
((This section shall not apply to the Rainier school for which
cognizance of farming operations has been transferred to Washington
State University by RCW 72.01.142.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 28B.30.820 (Dairy/forage and agricultural research
facility -- Transfer of property and facilities for) and 1981 c 238 s 3;
and
(2) RCW 72.01.142 (Transfer of dairy operation from Rainier school)
and 1981 c 238 s 2.

--- END ---