BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.330.090 and 2003 c 153 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall work with private sector organizations,
local governments, local associate development organizations, and
higher education and training institutions to assist in the development
of strategies to diversify the economy, facilitate technology transfer
and diffusion, and increase value-added production by focusing on
targeted sectors. The targeted sectors may include, but are not
limited to, software, forest products, biotechnology, environmental
industries, recycling markets and waste reduction, aerospace, food
processing, tourism, film and video, microelectronics, new materials,
robotics, and machine tools. The department shall, on a continuing
basis, evaluate the potential return to the state from devoting
additional resources to a targeted sector's approach to economic
development and including additional sectors in its efforts. The
department shall use information gathered in each service delivery
region in formulating its sectoral strategies and in designating new
targeted sectors.
(2) The department shall pursue a coordinated program to expand the
tourism industry throughout the state in cooperation with the public
and private tourism development organizations. The department, in
operating its tourism program, shall:
(a) Promote Washington as a tourism destination to national and
international markets to include nature-based and wildlife viewing
tourism;
(b) Provide information to businesses and local communities on
tourism opportunities that could expand local revenues;
(c) Assist local communities to strengthen their tourism
partnerships, including their relationships with state and local
agencies;
(d) Provide leadership training and assistance to local communities
to facilitate the development and implementation of local tourism
plans;
(e) Coordinate the development of a statewide tourism and marketing
plan. The department's tourism planning efforts shall be carried out
in conjunction with public and private tourism development
organizations including the department of fish and wildlife and other
appropriate agencies. The plan shall specifically address mechanisms
for: (i) Funding national and international marketing and nature-based
tourism efforts; (ii) interagency cooperation; and (iii) integrating
the state plan with local tourism plans; and
(f) Implement a regional television campaign to promote tourism in
Washington, featuring tourism opportunities in both eastern and western
Washington.
(3) The department may, in carrying out its efforts to expand the
tourism industry in the state:
(a) Solicit and receive gifts, grants, funds, fees, and endowments,
in trust or otherwise, from tribal, local or other governmental
entities, as well as private sources, and may expend the same or any
income therefrom for tourism purposes. All revenue received for
tourism purposes shall be deposited into the tourism development and
promotion account created in RCW 43.330.094;
(b) Host conferences and strategic planning workshops relating to
the promotion of nature-based and wildlife viewing tourism;
(c) Conduct or contract for tourism-related studies;
(d) Contract with individuals, businesses, or public entities to
carry out its tourism-related activities under this section;
(e) Provide tourism-related organizations with marketing and other
technical assistance;
(f) Evaluate and make recommendations on proposed tourism-related
policies.
(4) The department shall promote, market, and encourage growth in
the production of films and videos, as well as television commercials
within the state; to this end the department is directed to assist in
the location of a film and video production studio within the state.
(5) In assisting in the development of a targeted sector, the
department's activities may include, but are not limited to:
(a) Conducting focus group discussions, facilitating meetings, and
conducting studies to identify members of the sector, appraise the
current state of the sector, and identify issues of common concern
within the sector;
(b) Supporting the formation of industry associations, publications
of association directories, and related efforts to create or expand the
activities or industry associations;
(c) Assisting in the formation of flexible networks by providing
(i) agency employees or private sector consultants trained to act as
flexible network brokers and (ii) funding for potential flexible
network participants for the purpose of organizing or implementing a
flexible network;
(d) Helping establish research consortia;
(e) Facilitating joint training and education programs;
(f) Promoting cooperative market development activities;
(g) Analyzing the need, feasibility, and cost of establishing
product certification and testing facilities and services; and
(h) Providing for methods of electronic communication and
information dissemination among firms and groups of firms to facilitate
network activity.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.330.094 and 2003 c 153 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The tourism development and promotion account is created in the
state treasury. All receipts from RCW 36.102.060(10) and
43.330.090(3)(a) must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the
account received under RCW 36.102.060(10) may be spent only after
appropriation. No appropriation is required for expenditures from
moneys received under RCW 43.330.090(3)(a). Expenditures from the
account may be used by the department of community, trade, and economic
development only for the purposes of expanding and promoting the
tourism industry in the state of Washington. For expenditures
appropriated for regional television promotion, only fifteen percent of
each appropriation may be spent on overhead or staff costs.

--- END ---