BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
To decrease administrative burdens for providers and plans
participating in state purchased health care programs, the
administrator, the assistant secretary for the medical assistance
administration of the department of social and health services, and the
director of the department of labor and industries, in collaboration
with health carriers, health care providers, and the office of the
insurance commissioner shall, within available resources:
(1) Improve the timeliness of claims processing and the
distribution of medical assistance program fee schedules, and more
clearly define the scope of coverage under managed care contracts;
(2) Improve the capacity for electronic billing and claims
submission and provide electronic access to eligibility, benefits, and
exclusion information;
(3) Develop clear audit and data requirements for contracting
managed health care plans and improve consistency between claims
processing and published fee schedules;
(4) Conform billing codes with providers and between agencies with
national and regional standards wherever possible;
(5) Take steps to implement cost-effective measures under this
section by December 2006, and on or before December 1, 2005, provide a
progress report to the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature on the feasibility of implementation and any fiscal
constraints or regulatory or statutory barriers; and
(6) Participate in a standardized, secure on-line health care
information exchange program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The sum of one hundred thousand dollars,
or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2006, from the general fund to the department of
social and health services to participate in a standardized, secure on-line health care information exchange program.
(2) The sum of one hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as
may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2007, from the general fund to the department of social and health
services to participate in a standardized, secure on-line health care
information exchange program.

--- END ---