BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of health, the department, and the building code
council shall develop standards for small boarding homes between seven
and sixteen beds that address at least the following issues:
(1) Domestic food refrigeration and freezer storage;
(2) Sinks and sink placement;
(3) Dishwashers;
(4) Use of heat supplements for water temperature in clothes
washers;
(5) Yard shrubbery;
(6) Number of janitorial rooms in a facility;
(7) Number and cross-purpose of dirty rooms;
(8) Instant hot water faucets;
(9) Medication refrigeration; and
(10) Walled and gated facilities.
Based on the standards developed under this section, the department
of health and the building code council shall study the risks and
benefits of modifying and simplifying construction and equipment
standards for boarding homes with a capacity of seven to sixteen
persons. The study shall include coordination with the department.
The department of health shall report its findings and recommendations
to appropriate committees of the legislature no later than December 1,
2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The department of health and the department
of social and health services may adopt rules to implement section 1 of
this act.

--- END ---