BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The farmers market nutrition programs promote health, alleviate
hunger, prevent obesity, and encourage the development of good eating
habits by enabling low-income women to purchase locally grown fresh
fruit and vegetables for themselves and their young children and low-income seniors to purchase or have delivered to them, locally grown
fresh fruit and vegetables for themselves through farmers markets,
congregate meals sites, home delivered meals, and senior housing.
Women and children in twenty-three counties and seniors in thirty-five
counties of the state are presently able to participate in the program.
(2) The farmers market nutrition programs support small farmers and
rural economies through the promotion of Washington state agriculture.
Farmers market nutrition programs increase sales of Washington grown
fruits and vegetables, increase marketing opportunities for local
farms, strengthen local economies and communities, preserve farmlands,
reduce energy usage and pollutants, and promote collaboration among
agriculture, health, and social service and food assistance programs.
(3) Low-income women and children, low-income seniors, farmers
markets, and agencies administering the farmers market nutrition
programs will be denied the opportunity to participate in coming years
because of cuts at the federal level and lack of sufficient state funds
to continue current program levels.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 During the 2005-2007 biennium, an additional
four hundred thousand dollars from the general fund--state are
appropriated to the department of health to maintain 2004 participation
levels for the farmers market nutrition program for women, infants, and
children. During the 2005-2007 biennium, seven hundred fifty thousand
dollars from the general fund--state are appropriated to the department
of social and health services to maintain 2004 participation levels for
the senior farmers market nutrition program.

--- END ---