BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Washington state has many world class
companies within its borders producing family wage jobs and benefits.
The state continues to be home to entrepreneurs and innovative
technologies, however, the future development of many of the state's
emerging businesses depends on access to capital.
The legislature finds that prudent targeted private equity
investment by the state investment board would strengthen the local
venture capital infrastructure, increase access to capital for local
companies, support emerging businesses, create jobs for Washington
citizens, and maximize the investment returns of pension funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.33A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state investment board shall establish a fund of no less
than five hundred million dollars of the board's investment portfolio
in the Washington growing business fund, an account that shall be
maintained separately and apart from other money invested by the board.
Investments from the account may be made in start-up and expanding
businesses based in Washington with a substantial employment base
located in the state. These investments may be made directly by the
board or through the board's investment advisors, including venture
capital firms. The earnings on the Washington growing business fund
must be accounted for separately from other investments by the board.
(2) The purpose of the Washington growing business fund is to:
(a) Increase the capital funds available to minority and women-owned business enterprises based in Washington; and
(b) Create jobs and economic opportunities within Washington.
(3) Investments under this section must be made in a manner
consistent with investment or management criteria established by the
board or its executive director. In making investments of money in the
Washington growing business fund, the primary investment objective is
to maximize the rate of return at a level consistent with the other
funds under the control of the board, at a prudent level of risk, as
required by RCW 43.33A.110.
(a) In choosing among equal investment opportunities that satisfy
this primary investment objective, the board shall give priority to
those investments from the account that assist start-up and expanding
Washington-based businesses.
(b) Assets in the fund shall be diversified across different
industry sectors and regions of the state, such that the assets are
prudently invested and that jobs and economic opportunity are equitably
distributed across the entire state and encouraged in those communities
which are economically distressed.
(4) A management company selected to manage a portion of the
Washington growing business fund shall manage the money in the account,
subject to the investment policies established by the state investment
board, with the care, skill, and diligence required by RCW 43.33A.110.
In selecting management companies, the board shall consider the
potential company's physical and employment presence in Washington as
well as a demonstrable ability to find investment opportunities in
communities throughout the state.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) "Emerging business" means:
(i) A business with its principal place of business located in this
state or with a substantial employment base in Washington;
(ii) A business with average annual gross receipts over the last
three years not exceeding one million dollars for construction firms
and three hundred thousand dollars for nonconstruction firms;
(iii) A business with fewer than twenty employees;
(iv) An independent business; and
(v) A business properly licensed and legally registered in this
state.
An "emerging business" does not mean a subsidiary or parent company
belonging to a group of firms which are owned and controlled by the
same individuals which have aggregate annual gross receipts in excess
of one million dollars for construction firms or three hundred thousand
dollars for nonconstruction firms.
(b) "Minority and women-owned business enterprise" means any
resident minority business enterprise or women's business enterprise,
certified as such by the office of minority and women's business
enterprises under chapter 39.19 RCW.
(c) "Start-up business" means a Washington business in the act or
instance of being set in operation around a technology, product, or
service based on a sound business plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.33A RCW
to read as follows:
The board and its designees must include in their statement of
investment principles: The extent, if at all, to which social,
environmental, or ethical considerations are taken into account in
their selection, retention, and realization of investments; and their
policy, if any, in relation to the exercise of rights, including voting
rights, attaching to investments.

--- END ---