BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 53.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A district may manage all lands, wharves, docks, and real and
personal property it owns and controls that have been acquired from
commercial waterway districts, for such purposes and upon such terms as
the port commission deems proper. A district's management authority
includes granting licenses, leases, and easements for such former
commercial waterway district property. These properties are subject to
all other statutes governing port district property.
(2) A port commission may, by resolution, authorize the managing
official of a port district to sell and convey port district property
obtained by the district from a commercial waterway district. The
district shall sell and convey such property in accordance with all
applicable statutes governing the sale of port district property.

--- END ---