BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.78.040 and 1991 c 363 s 83 are each amended to read
as follows:
Six members of the county road administration board shall be county
legislative authority members and three members shall be county
engineers. If any member, during the term for which he or she is
appointed ceases to be either a member of a county legislative
authority or a county engineer, as the case may be, his or her
membership on the county road administration board is likewise
terminated. Three members of the board shall be from counties with a
population of one hundred twenty-five thousand or more. Four members
shall be from counties with a population of from ((twelve)) twenty
thousand to less than one hundred twenty-five thousand. Two members
shall be from counties with a population of less than ((twelve)) twenty
thousand. Not more than one member of the board shall be from any one
county.

--- END ---