BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.82 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A joint housing authority may be dissolved pursuant to
substantially identical resolutions or ordinances of the legislative
authority of each of the counties or cities that previously authorized
that joint housing authority, together with a resolution of the joint
housing authority's board of commissioners. These resolutions or
ordinances may authorize the execution of an agreement among the
counties, cities, and the joint housing authority that provides for the
timing, distribution of assets, obligations and liabilities, and other
matters deemed necessary or appropriate by the contracting entities.
(2) Each resolution or ordinance dissolving a joint housing
authority shall provide for the following:
(a) Activation or reactivation of a housing authority or joint
housing authority by each of the cities and counties that previously
authorized the joint housing authority and any additional cities or
counties that are then to be added. This activation or reactivation
takes effect upon the dissolution of the joint housing authority or at
an earlier time provided in the resolutions or ordinances dissolving
the joint housing authority; and
(b) Distribution of all assets, obligations, and liabilities of the
joint housing authority to the housing authorities activated or
reactivated under (a) of this subsection. Distribution of assets,
obligations, and liabilities shall be based on:
(i) The population within the boundaries of each of the housing
authorities activated or reactivated under (a) of this subsection;
(ii) The number of housing units owned by the joint housing
authority within the boundaries of each of the housing authorities
activated or reactivated under (a) of this subsection;
(iii) The number of low-income residents within the boundaries of
each of the housing authorities activated or reactivated under (a) of
this subsection; or
(iv) Any other reasonable criteria to determine the distribution of
assets, obligations, and liabilities.
(3) Each activated or reactivated housing authority shall be
responsible for debt service on bonds or other obligations issued or
incurred to finance the acquisition, construction, or improvement of
the projects, properties, and other assets that have been distributed
to them under the dissolution. However, unless an outstanding bond
issue is secured solely by specific property and not by an authority's
general revenues, each housing authority activated or reactivated under
subsection (2)(a) of this section shall remain jointly and severally
liable for repayment of outstanding bonds and other obligations of the
joint housing authority, from general revenues of each of the activated
or reactivated housing authorities, and from any other revenues and
accounts that had been expressly pledged by the joint housing authority
to the payment of those bonds or other obligations. As used in this
subsection, "general revenues" means all revenues of a housing
authority from any source, but only to the extent that those revenues
are available to pay debt service on bonds or other obligations and are
not then or thereafter pledged or restricted by law, regulation,
contract, covenant, resolution, deed of trust, or otherwise, solely to
another particular purpose.

--- END ---