BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17.320 and 1995 c 397 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Responses to requests for public records shall be made promptly
by agencies, the office of the secretary of the senate, and the office
of the chief clerk of the house of representatives. Within five
business days of receiving a public record request, an agency, the
office of the secretary of the senate, or the office of the chief clerk
of the house of representatives must respond by either (((1))) (a)
providing the record; (((2))) (b) acknowledging that the agency, the
office of the secretary of the senate, or the office of the chief clerk
of the house of representatives has received the request and providing
a reasonable estimate of the time the agency, the office of the
secretary of the senate, or the office of the chief clerk of the house
of representatives will require to respond to the request; or (((3)))
(c) denying the public record request. Additional time required to
respond to a request may be based upon the need to clarify the intent
of the request, to locate and assemble the information requested, to
notify third persons or agencies affected by the request, or to
determine whether any of the information requested is exempt and that
a denial should be made as to all or part of the request.
(2) An agency, the office of the secretary of the senate, or the
office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives may not deny
a public record request on the grounds that it is overbroad. In
acknowledging receipt of a public record request that is unclear or
overbroad, an agency, the office of the secretary of the senate, or the
office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives may ask the
requestor to clarify or narrow what information the requestor is
seeking. If the requestor fails to clarify or narrow the request, the
agency, the office of the secretary of the senate, or the office of the
chief clerk of the house of representatives need not respond to it.
(3) Denials of requests must be accompanied by a written statement
of the specific reasons therefor. Agencies, the office of the
secretary of the senate, and the office of the chief clerk of the house
of representatives shall establish mechanisms for the most prompt
possible review of decisions denying inspection, and such review shall
be deemed completed at the end of the second business day following the
denial of inspection and shall constitute final agency action or final
action by the office of the secretary of the senate or the office of
the chief clerk of the house of representatives for the purposes of
judicial review.

--- END ---