BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.04.311 and 2004 c 271 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
Nominating primaries for general elections to be held in November,
and the election of precinct committee officers, must be held on the
((third)) first Tuesday of the preceding ((September or on the seventh
Tuesday immediately preceding such general election, whichever occurs
first)) June.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.12.010 and 2003 c 111 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
At any primary or election in any county, votes may be cast,
registered, recorded, or counted by means of one voting system((s))
that ((have)) has been approved under RCW 29A.12.020.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.12.020 and 2003 c 111 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of state shall ((inspect, evaluate, and publicly test
all voting systems or components of voting systems that are submitted
for review under RCW 29A.12.030)) select a single, universal form of
voting system and shall adopt rules to establish the process for the
selection. The process must include requests for proposals from voting
system manufacturers that wish to be considered. The secretary of
state's final selection must be the only voting system used in all
counties. The secretary of state shall determine whether the voting
system((s)) conforms with all of the requirements of this title, the
applicable rules adopted in accordance with this title, and with
generally accepted safety requirements. The secretary of state shall
transmit a copy of the report of any examination under this section,
within thirty days after completing the examination, to the county
auditor of each county.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.12.040 and 2003 c 111 s 304 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The secretary of state may rely on the results of independent
design, engineering, and performance evaluations in the examination
under RCW 29A.12.020 if the source and scope of these independent
evaluations are specified by rule.
(2) The secretary of state may contract with experts in mechanical
or electrical engineering or data processing to assist in examining a
voting system or component as part of the selection of a single voting
system to be used in all counties. The manufacturer or distributor who
has submitted a voting system for ((testing under RCW 29A.12.030))
consideration shall pay the secretary of state a deposit to reimburse
the cost of any contract for consultation under this section and for
any other unrecoverable costs associated with the examination of a
voting system or component by the manufacturer or distributor who
submitted the voting system or component for examination.

Sec. 5 RCW 29A.12.060 and 2003 c 111 s 306 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county auditor of a county in which the voting system((s are))
is used is responsible for the preparation, maintenance, and operation
of ((those)) the system((s)) and may employ and direct persons to
perform some or all of these functions.

Sec. 6 RCW 29A.12.080 and 2003 c 111 s 308 are each amended to
read as follows:
No voting device ((shall be approved)) may be selected by the
secretary of state as the single, uniform voting device for the entire
state unless it:
(1) Secures to the voter secrecy in the act of voting;
(2) Permits the voter to vote for any person for any office and
upon any measure that he or she has the right to vote for;
(3) Permits the voter to vote for all the candidates of one party
or in part for the candidates of one or more other parties;
(4) Correctly registers all votes cast for any and all persons and
for or against any and all measures;
(5) Provides that a vote for more than one candidate cannot be cast
by one single operation of the voting device or vote tally system
except when voting for president and vice president of the United
States; ((and))
(6) Gives the voter a printed receipt that notes the votes cast by
the voter; and
(7) Except for functions or capabilities unique to this state, has
been tested, certified, and used in at least one other state or
election jurisdiction.

Sec. 7 RCW 29A.12.130 and 2003 c 111 s 313 are each amended to
read as follows:
At least three days before each state primary or general election,
the office of the secretary of state shall provide for the conduct of
tests of the programming for each ((vote tallying)) voting system unit
to be used at that primary or general election. The test must verify
that the ((system)) unit will correctly count the vote cast for all
candidates and on all measures appearing on the ballot at that primary
or general election. The test shall verify the capability of the
((vote tallying system)) unit to perform all of the functions that can
reasonably be expected to occur during conduct of that particular
primary or election. If any error is detected, the cause shall be
determined and corrected, and an errorless total shall be produced
before the primary or election.
Such tests shall be observed by at least one representative from
each major political party, if representatives have been appointed by
the respective major political parties and are present at the test, and
shall be open to candidates, the press, and the public. The county
auditor and any political party observers shall certify that the test
has been conducted in accordance with this section. Copies of this
certification shall be retained by the secretary of state and the
county auditor. All programming materials, test results, and test
ballots shall be securely sealed until the day of the primary or
general election.

Sec. 8 RCW 29A.12.140 and 2003 c 111 s 314 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of state may publish recommended procedures for the
operation of the ((various)) single vote tallying system((s)) that
((have)) has been approved. These procedures allow the office of the
secretary of state to restrict or define the use of the approved
system((s)) in elections.

Sec. 9 RCW 29A.12.160 and 2004 c 266 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary of state shall adopt rules and establish
standards ((for voting technology and systems)) so that the single
voting system used by the state or any political subdivision ((to be))
is accessible for individuals with disabilities, including nonvisual
accessibility for the blind and visually impaired, in a manner that
provides the same opportunity for access and participation, including
privacy and independence, as other voters.
(2) At each polling location, at least one voting unit certified by
the secretary of state shall provide access to individuals who are
blind or visually impaired.
(3) ((Compliance with this provision in regard to voting technology
and systems purchased prior to July 27, 2003, shall be achieved at the
time of procurement of an upgrade of technology compatible with
nonvisual voting methods or replacement of existing voting equipment or
systems.
(4))) Compliance with subsection((s)) (2) ((and (3))) of this
section is contingent on available funds to implement this provision.
(((5))) (4) For purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Accessible" includes receiving, using, selecting, and
manipulating voter data and controls.
(b) (("Nonvisual" includes synthesized speech, Braille, and other
output methods.
(c))) "Blind and visually impaired" excludes persons who are both
deaf and blind.
(((6))) (5) This section does not apply to voting by absentee
ballot.

Sec. 10 RCW 29A.12.160 and 2004 c 267 s 701 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) At each polling location, at least one voting unit certified by
the secretary of state shall provide access to individuals who are
blind or visually impaired.
(2) ((Compliance with this provision in regard to voting technology
and systems purchased prior to July 27, 2003, shall be achieved at the
time of procurement of an upgrade of technology compatible with
nonvisual voting methods or replacement of existing voting equipment or
systems.
(3) Compliance with subsection (2) of this section is contingent on
available funds to implement this provision.
(4))) For purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Accessible" includes receiving, using, selecting, and
manipulating voter data and controls.
(b) (("Nonvisual" includes synthesized speech, Braille, and other
output methods.
(c))) "Blind and visually impaired" excludes persons who are both
deaf and blind.
(((5))) (3) This section does not apply to voting by absentee
ballot.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 29A.36
RCW to read as follows:
Provisional ballots must be a different color than standard ballots
and absentee ballots. The secretary of state shall make rules to
implement this section.

Sec. 12 RCW 29A.40.091 and 2004 c 271 s 135 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county auditor shall send each absentee voter a ballot, a
security envelope in which to seal the ballot after voting, a larger
envelope in which to return the security envelope, and instructions on
how to mark the ballot and how to return it to the county auditor. The
instructions that accompany an absentee ballot for a partisan primary
must include instructions for voting the applicable ballot style, as
provided in chapter 29A.36 RCW. The larger return envelope must
contain a declaration by the absentee voter reciting his or her
qualifications and stating that he or she has not voted in any other
jurisdiction at this election, together with a summary of the penalties
for any violation of any of the provisions of this chapter. The return
envelope must provide space ((for the voter to indicate the date on
which the ballot was voted and)) for the voter to sign the oath. A
summary of the applicable penalty provisions of this chapter must be
printed on the return envelope immediately adjacent to the space for
the voter's signature. The signature of the voter on the return
envelope must affirm and attest to the statements regarding the
qualifications of that voter and to the validity of the ballot. For
out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and service voters, the signed
declaration on the return envelope constitutes the equivalent of a
voter registration for the election or primary for which the ballot has
been issued. The voter must be instructed to either return the ballot
to the county auditor by whom it was issued or attach sufficient first
class postage((, if applicable, and mail the ballot to)). The ballot
must be received by the appropriate county auditor no later than 8:00
p.m. on the day of the election or primary for which the ballot was
issued.
If the county auditor chooses to forward absentee ballots, he or
she must include with the ballot a clear explanation of the
qualifications necessary to vote in that election and must also advise
a voter with questions about his or her eligibility to contact the
county auditor. This explanation may be provided on the ballot
envelope, on an enclosed insert, or printed directly on the ballot
itself. If the information is not included, the envelope must clearly
indicate that the ballot is not to be forwarded and that return postage
is guaranteed.
The secretary of state must adjust his or her rules in accordance
with this section.

Sec. 13 RCW 29A.40.110 and 2003 c 111 s 1011 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The opening and subsequent processing of return envelopes for
any primary or election may begin on or after the tenth day before the
primary or election. The tabulation of absentee ballots must not
commence until after 8:00 p.m. on the day of the primary or election.
(2) After opening the return envelopes, the county canvassing board
shall place all of the ballots in secure storage until after 8:00 p.m.
of the day of the primary or election. Absentee ballots that are to be
tabulated on an electronic vote tallying system may be taken from the
inner envelopes and all the normal procedural steps may be performed to
prepare these ballots for tabulation.
(3) Before opening a returned absentee ballot, the canvassing
board, or its designated representatives, shall examine the
((postmark,)) statement((,)) and signature on the return envelope that
contains the security envelope and absentee ballot. They shall verify
that the absentee ballot was received no later than 8:00 p.m. on
election day. They shall verify that the voter's signature on the
return envelope is the same as the signature of that voter in the
registration files of the county. ((For registered voters casting
absentee ballots, the date on the return envelope to which the voter
has attested determines the validity, as to the time of voting for that
absentee ballot if the postmark is missing or is illegible. For out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and service voters, the date on the
return envelope to which the voter has attested determines the validity
as to the time of voting for that absentee ballot.)) For any absentee
ballot, a variation between the signature of the voter on the return
envelope and the signature of that voter in the registration files due
to the substitution of initials or the use of common nicknames is
permitted so long as the surname and handwriting are clearly the same.
The secretary of state must adjust his or her rules in accordance
with this section.

Sec. 14 RCW 29A.48.050 and 2003 c 111 s 1205 are each amended to
read as follows:
The voter shall return the ballot to the county auditor in the
return identification envelope. If mailed, a ballot must be
((postmarked)) received by the county auditor not later than 8:00 p.m.
on the date of the primary or election. Otherwise, the ballot must be
deposited at the office of the county auditor or the designated place
of deposit not later than 8:00 p.m. on the date of the primary or
election.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 (1) Upon breaking the seals and opening the
ballot containers from the precincts, all voting positions on voted
ballots must be manually inspected on both sides of the ballot and
every voting position for unreadable ballots. The same manual
inspection process applies to absentee ballots, mail ballot precinct
ballots, and vote-by-mail ballots. This manual inspection must include
examining each voter response position, and is a required part of
processing ballots used with all electronic vote tabulating systems.
(2) The inspection of ballots tabulated at the poll site is not
required if the poll-site ballot programming provisions of RCW
29A.44.340 are being complied with.
(3) If the manual inspection process detects any physically damaged
ballots, unreadable ballots that might not be correctly counted by the
tabulating equipment, or that contain marks or punches that differ from
those specified in the voting instructions contained on or with the
ballot but clearly form a discernible and consistent pattern on the
ballot to the extent that the voter's intent can be clearly determined,
the county may either:
(a) Refer the ballots to the county canvassing board;
(b) Duplicate the ballots if authorized by the county canvassing
board under section 19 of this act; or
(c) Enhance the ballots if authorized by the county canvassing
board and enhancement can be accomplished without permanently obscuring
the original marks or punches of the voters as required by sections 17
and 18 of this act.
(4) In the case of punchcard ballots, if two or more corners or
attachment points are detached in a punch position, the vote is valid
and the chad must be removed without duplication, enhancement, or
reference to the county canvassing board. If fewer than two corners
are detached, then subsection (3) of this section applies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 (1) If the voter returns voting responses
by mail on any form other than the ballot sent, the votes on it are
acceptable and will be tallied under the following conditions:
(a) Only votes for offices or measures for which the voter is
eligible are counted;
(b) The candidate or measure response position for which the voter
is voting can be clearly identified;
(c) The ballot issued is not returned, or if returned, contains no
marks or punches indicating an attempt to vote it;
(d) A valid signature on an absentee oath is on file with the
county auditor.
The votes accepted must then be duplicated to a ballot that can be
read by the electronic voting equipment as prescribed in section 19 of
this act.
(2) Corrected absentee ballots must be counted in the following
manner:
(a) If a voter follows the instructions for correcting a vote,
either the written instructions or other instructions given to the
voter by the county auditor, the correction must be made and the
corrected vote tabulated. The county auditor may enhance or duplicate
the ballot.
(b) If a voter appears to have corrected the ballot in a manner
other than as instructed, the vote for that candidate or issue must not
be tabulated unless the voter provides written instructions directing
how the vote should be counted.
(3) Where a voter has indicated a write-in vote on the ballot that
duplicates the name of a candidate who already appears on the ballot
for the same office, the ballot must be enhanced or duplicated to count
one vote for the candidate indicated. Such a vote must not be
considered an overvote or a write-in vote.
(4) An absentee ballot, a mail ballot precinct ballot, and a vote-by-mail ballot may not be counted if a voter signs the oath with a mark
and does not have two witnesses attest to the signature.
(5) If a ballot contains marks or punches that differ from those
specified in the voting instructions, those marks or punches may not be
counted as valid votes unless there is a discernable and consistent
pattern, to the extent that the voter's intent can clearly be
determined. If there is such a pattern, the ballot must be enhanced or
duplicated to reflect the voter's intent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Optical scan system ballots may be enhanced
only when the enhancement will not permanently obscure the original
marks of the voters. Ballots must be enhanced by teams of two or more
people working together. When enhancing ballots, the county shall take
the following steps to create and maintain an audit trail of the
actions taken with respect to the enhanced ballots:
(1) Each ballot to be enhanced must be assigned a unique control
number, with the number being marked on the face of the enhanced
ballot.
(2) A log must be kept of the ballots enhanced and include at least
the following information:
(a) The control number of each ballot enhanced;
(b) The initials of at least two people who participated in
enhancing each ballot; and
(c) The total number of ballots enhanced.
(3) Enhanced ballots and ballots to be enhanced must be sealed into
secure storage at all times, except when the ballots are in the process
of being enhanced, are being tabulated, or are being inspected by the
canvassing board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Punch card ballots may be enhanced only
when the enhancement will not permanently obscure marks or punches of
the voters. Teams of two or more people working together shall enhance
ballots. When enhancing ballots, the county auditor shall take the
following steps to create and maintain an audit trail of the actions
taken with respect to the enhanced ballots:
(1) Each ballot to be enhanced must be assigned a unique control
number, with the number being marked on the enhanced ballot.
(2) A log must be kept of the ballots enhanced and include at least
the following information:
(a) The control number of each ballot enhanced;
(b) The initials of at least two people who participated in
enhancing each ballot; and
(c) The total number of ballots enhanced.
(3) When the county canvassing board rejects one or more votes on
a ballot that contains other valid votes, as in the case of special
ballots, the ballot must be duplicated without the rejected vote or the
vote may be overvoted on the original ballot. When overvoting, the
punch made by the county auditor must be clearly indicated on the
ballot and follow the rules for enhancement.
(4) Enhanced ballots and ballots to be enhanced must be sealed into
secure storage at all times, except when the ballots are in the process
of being enhanced, are being tabulated, or are being inspected by the
canvassing board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 A ballot may be duplicated only if the
intent of the voter's marks on the ballot is clear and the electronic
voting equipment might not otherwise properly tally the ballot to
reflect the intent of the voter. Ballots must be duplicated by teams
of two or more people working together. When duplicating ballots, the
county auditor shall take the following steps to create and maintain an
audit trail of the actions taken with respect to the duplicated ballots
and the corresponding duplicate ballots:
(1) Each ballot to be duplicated and the corresponding duplicate
ballot must be assigned a unique control number, with the number being
marked upon the face of each ballot, the purpose being to insure that
each duplicate ballot may be tied back to the original ballot.
(2) A log must be kept of the ballots duplicated and include at
least the following information:
(a) The control number of each ballot duplicated and the
corresponding duplicate ballot;
(b) The initials of at least two people who participated in the
duplication of each ballot; and
(c) The total number of ballots duplicated.
(3) Duplicated ballots and the corresponding duplicate ballots, as
well as ballots requiring duplication must be sealed into secure
storage at all times, except when the ballots are in the process of
being duplicated, are being tabulated, or are being inspected by the
canvassing board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 Written procedures must be established
detailing the situations in which ballots may be enhanced or
duplicated. These procedures must be included as a part of the county
canvassing board manual.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 As used in this chapter:
(1) "Canvassing" is that process of examining in detail a ballot,
groups of ballots, election subtotals, or grand totals, in order to
determine the final official returns of a primary, special, or general
election, and to safeguard the integrity of the election process.
(2) "County canvassing board" is that body charged by law with the
duty of canvassing absentee ballots, of ruling on the validity of
questioned or challenged ballots, of the verifying all unofficial
returns as listed in the auditor's abstract of votes, and the producing
of the official county canvass report. The board is composed of the
county auditor, prosecuting attorney, and chair of the board of the
county legislative authority, or their designated representatives.
(3) "Auditor's abstract of votes" is the report prepared by the
county auditor that lists the number of registered voters, votes cast,
all of the vote totals by precinct, or by combination of precincts if
applicable, and includes absentee ballot totals, legislative district
subtotals, if any, and county-wide totals. Vote totals in the
auditor's abstract of votes are unofficial until verified and certified
by the county canvassing board.
(4) "County canvass report" is the auditor's abstract of votes
after verification by the county canvassing board and must contain a
certificate that includes the oath as specified in RCW 29A.60.200, the
original signatures of each member of the county canvassing board, the
county seal, and all other material pertinent to the election.
(5) "Certified copy of the county canvass report" is the report
transmitted by the county auditor to the secretary of state that
contains registered voters and votes cast by precinct, or combination
of precincts if applicable, votes cast for and against state measures,
and votes cast for candidates for federal and statewide offices and for
any office whose jurisdiction encompasses more than one county,
absentee ballot totals for those measures and candidates, subtotals if
applicable, and county-wide totals. It must also include a
certificate, bearing original signatures and an original county seal,
identical to that included in the official county canvass report, and
any other material that may be pertinent to the canvass of the
election.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 The county auditor, prosecuting attorney,
and chair of the county legislative authority, or designees under this
chapter, are responsible for the performance of all duties of the
county canvassing board, as set forth in this chapter and chapter
29A.40 RCW, and the rules on canvassing adopted by the secretary of
state. These duties must be performed by the members of the board, or
they may in writing delegate representatives to perform these duties.
The written delegation of authority must be filed with the county
auditor before any person undertakes any action on behalf of the board.
In no instance may the members of the county canvassing board delegate
the responsibility of certifying the returns of any primary or
election, of determining the validity of any challenged ballots, or of
determining the validity of any special ballots referred to them by the
county auditor, to anyone other than a person authorized by law to act
on their behalf.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 After the election and before the official
canvass, the county auditor shall prepare a preliminary abstract of
votes, listing the number of registered voters and votes cast. The
preliminary abstract of votes must also list separately for votes cast
by absentee ballot and those cast at the polls, votes cast for and
against measures, votes cast for candidates, overvotes and undervotes,
by precinct or groups of precincts if precincts have been combined
under RCW 29A.16.060, for canvassing purposes. The county auditor
shall inspect the preliminary abstract of votes for errors or anomalies
that may affect the results of the election. Correction of any errors
or anomalies discovered must be made before the official canvass.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 All activities of the canvassing board must
be open to the public, although they may limit the number of persons
observing any aspect of the process whenever, in their judgment, it is
necessary to do so to preserve order and to safeguard the integrity of
the process. The canvassing board may adopt rules, not inconsistent
with this section, to ensure that the process is open to the public and
that the procedures themselves are performed by the board free of any
outside interference. The auditor shall publish notice of the meetings
of the canvassing board. The notice or notices must be in
substantially the following form:

OPEN PUBLIC MEETING NOTICE

The canvassing board of (Name of County) County, under chapter
29A.60 RCW, will hold public meetings at (Time of Meetings) ,
(Dates) , at (Locations) , to (Purpose of Meetings) .
These meetings of the canvassing board are open, public meetings, and
will be continued until the activity for which the meetings are held
has been completed.
A record of the proceedings of the county canvassing board will be
made and maintained in the county auditor's office, and will be
available for public inspection and copying. The record will be
retained for the same time period required by law for the retention of
absentee ballots.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 No later than the tenth day after a primary
or special election and the fifteenth day after a general election the
county canvassing board shall meet and canvass all absentee ballots not
previously processed under chapter 29A.40 RCW, together with all
special and challenged ballots. Upon completion of this canvass the
board shall direct the county auditor to include all absentee ballot
totals and all challenged and special ballot totals, or legislative
district subtotals if applicable, in the preliminary abstract of votes
prepared under section 23 of this act. The county auditor shall then
add these totals to the existing precinct totals. The ensuing report,
containing a count of all ballots cast in the election, subtotal
reports by legislative district, and county-wide totals constitutes the
auditor's abstract of votes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 The county canvassing board shall examine
each absentee ballot and related material and shall determine whether
or not the ballot will be counted. The canvassing board may employ
local law enforcement officials or any other persons they deem
necessary to assist them in this effort. If the canvassing board
determines the absentee ballot will be counted, they shall direct the
county auditor to do so. If the canvassing board determines that the
signature on the absentee ballot was not made by the voter to whom the
ballot was issued or that the voter has attempted to vote more than
once, they shall direct the auditor to refer all such ballots and
related materials to the prosecuting attorney.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 The county canvassing board shall examine
the auditor's abstract of votes and shall verify that all of the
individual precinct and absentee ballot totals have been included in
the abstract and that the subtotals and county-wide totals for
registered voters and votes cast are an accurate reflection of the sum
of those individual precinct and absentee ballot totals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 Except as otherwise provided by law, mail
ballots must be canvassed in the same manner as absentee ballots issued
at the request of the voter. To be counted, the mail ballots must be
deposited at a designated place of return not later than 8:00 p.m. on
election day or postmarked not later than the day of the election. If
the postmark is missing or illegible, the county canvassing board may
rely on the date of the oath signed by the voter on the outside of the
return envelope. Any mail ballot may be challenged in the same manner
as absentee ballots are challenged, and the county canvassing board
must determine that the challenged ballot is valid before it may be
counted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 If the county canvassing board, during the
verifications process, discovers that errors exist in the auditor's
abstract of votes or that discrepancies exist between that abstract and
the manual or adding machine totals for registered voters and votes
cast produced under section 27 of this act, the board shall investigate
those errors and discrepancies. They may take whatever corrective
steps a majority of the board deems necessary, including changing or
modifying the auditor's abstract of votes if the error or discrepancy
is discovered in that document. The canvassing board may then proceed
to verify votes cast on measures or for candidates if a majority of the
board believes that the nature of the errors or discrepancies
discovered warrant the further action on their part.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 If the canvassing board decides to take
corrective action with respect to any part of the auditor's abstract of
votes, they shall prepare a written narrative of the errors or
discrepancies discovered, the cause of those errors, if known, and the
corrective action taken. If the auditor's abstract of votes is altered
or modified by the canvassing board, those alterations and
modifications must be initialed by each member of the canvassing board,
additionally, the written narrative must be signed by each member of
the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 Upon completion of the verification of the
auditor's abstract of votes and the documentation of any corrective
action taken, the county canvassing board shall sign a certification
that the abstract is a full, true, and correct representation of the
votes cast for the issues and offices listed thereon. The
certification must also state the total number of registered voters and
votes cast in the county. The certification must contain the oath
required by RCW 29A.60.200, signed by the county auditor and attested
to by the chairman of the board of the county legislative authority,
and must have a space where the official seal of the county must be
attached. This certification, the auditor's abstract of votes, any
adding machine tapes produced during the verification process, and the
written narrative of errors and discrepancies discovered and corrected,
if applicable, constitute the official county canvass report. This
report may not be subsequently amended or altered, except in the event
a recount conducted under chapter 29A.64 RCW, or upon order of the
superior court, or by the county canvassing board reconvened
specifically for that purpose. The vote totals contained in it are the
official returns of that election.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32 No later than the next business day after
the certification of the returns of any primary, special, or general
election at which votes were cast for or against state measures or for
candidates for federal and statewide office or for state legislative
and judicial offices whose jurisdiction encompasses more than one
county, the county auditor shall send a certified copy of that part of
the auditor's abstract of votes covering those issues and offices to
the secretary of state. This copy must be no larger than eleven inches
by fourteen inches and have a certificate identical to that
accompanying the official county canvass report, bearing the county
seal and original signatures of the officers required to sign that
document attached or affixed to it. A copy of the written narrative
documenting errors and discrepancies discovered and corrective action
taken must accompany the abstract if applicable. Copies of the adding
machine tapes used during the verification process need not be sent to
the secretary of state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 33 The secretary of state shall ensure that
all material required to be submitted under state law has been included
in the certified copy of the auditor's abstract of votes transmitted to
his or her office. If the secretary of state determines that the
certified copy of the auditor's abstract of votes is incomplete, he or
she shall notify the county auditor of that fact and shall request that
the missing part of the abstract be forwarded immediately. No county's
certified copy of the abstract of votes may be considered as complete
for acceptance by the secretary of state until all of the material
required by statute and rule has been received by the secretary of
state. If the certified copy of the official abstract is illegible or
in improper form, the secretary of state shall return that abstract and
require an immediate resubmission of the abstract in proper or legible
form.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 34 Sections 15 through 33 of this act are
added to chapter 29A.60 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 35 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 29A.12.030 (Submitting system or component for examination)
and 2003 c 111 s 303;
(2) RCW 29A.12.050 (Approval required -- Modification) and 2003 c 111
s 305, 1990 c 59 s 21, & 1982 c 40 s 4;
(3) RCW 29A.12.150 (Recording requirements) and 2003 c 111 s 315,
1998 c 245 s 26, 1991 c 363 s 30, & 1990 c 184 s 1; and
(4) RCW 42.17.710 (Time limit for state official to solicit or
accept contributions) and 2003 c 164 s 3 & 1993 c 2 s 11.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 36 Section 9 of this act expires January 1,
2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 37 Section 10 of this act takes effect January
1, 2006.

--- END ---