BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.15.0131 and 1994 c 188 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of determining resident tuition rates, resident
students shall include American Indian students who meet two
conditions. First, for a period of one year immediately prior to
enrollment at a state institution of higher education as defined in RCW
28B.10.016, the student must have been domiciled in one or a
combination of the following states: Idaho; Montana; Oregon; or
Washington. Second, the students must be members of one of the
((following American)) federally recognized Indian tribes whose
traditional and customary tribal boundaries included portions of the
state of Washington, or whose tribe was granted reserved lands within
the state of Washington((:
(1) Colville Confederated Tribes;
(2) Confederated Tribes of the Chehalis Reservation;
(3) Hoh Indian Tribe;
(4) Jamestown S'Klallam Tribe;
(5) Kalispel Tribe of Indians;
(6) Lower Elwha Klallam Tribe;
(7) Lummi Nation;
(8) Makah Indian Tribe;
(9) Muckleshoot Indian Tribe;
(10) Nisqually Indian Tribe;
(11) Nooksack Indian Tribe;
(12) Port Gamble S'Klallam Community;
(13) Puyallup Tribe of Indians;
(14) Quileute Tribe;
(15) Quinault Indian Nation;
(16) Confederated Tribes of Salish Kootenai;
(17) Sauk Suiattle Indian Nation;
(18) Shoalwater Bay Indian Tribe;
(19) Skokomish Indian Tribe;
(20) Snoqualmie Tribe;
(21) Spokane Tribe of Indians;
(22) Squaxin Island Tribe;
(23) Stillaguamish Tribe;
(24) Suquamish Tribe of the Port Madison Reservation;
(25) Swinomish Indian Community;
(26) Tulalip Tribes;
(27) Upper Skagit Indian Tribe;
(28) Yakama Indian Nation;
(29) Coeur d'Alene Tribe;
(30) Confederated Tribes of the Umatilla Indian Reservation;
(31) Confederated Tribes of Warm Springs;
(32) Kootenai Tribe; and
(33) Nez Perce Tribe)). Federal recognition of an Indian tribe
shall be as determined under 25 C.F.R. by the United States bureau of
Indian affairs.
Any student enrolled at a state institution of higher education as
defined in RCW 28B.10.016 who is paying resident tuition under this
section, and who has not established domicile in the state of
Washington at least one year before enrollment, shall not be included
in any calculation of state-funded enrollment for budgeting purposes,
and no state general fund moneys shall be appropriated to a state
institution of higher education for the support of such student.

--- END ---