BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.32.195 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 218 are each amended to
read as follows:
The commission may, without examination, issue a license to persons
who possess the qualifications set forth in this section.
(1) The commission may, upon written request of the dean of the
school of dentistry of the University of Washington, issue a license to
practice dentistry in this state to persons who have been licensed or
otherwise authorized to practice dentistry in another state or country
and who have been accepted for employment by the school of dentistry as
((full-time)) faculty members. For purposes of this subsection, this
means teaching members of the faculty of the school of dentistry of the
University of Washington ((who are so employed on a one hundred percent
of work time basis)). Such license shall permit the holder thereof to
practice dentistry within the confines of the university facilities for
a period of one year while he or she is so employed as a ((full-time))
faculty member by the school of dentistry of the University of
Washington. It shall terminate whenever the holder ceases to be
((such)) a ((full-time)) faculty member. Such license shall permit the
holder thereof to practice dentistry only in connection with his or her
duties in employment with the school of dentistry of the University of
Washington. This limitation shall be stated on the license.
(2) The commission may, upon written request of the dean of the
school of dentistry of the University of Washington, issue a limited
license to practice dentistry in this state to university residents in
postgraduate dental education. The license shall permit the resident
dentist to provide dental care only in connection with his or her
duties as a university resident.
(3) The commission may condition the granting of a license under
this section with terms the commission deems appropriate. All persons
licensed under this section shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the
commission to the same extent as other members of the dental
profession, in accordance with this chapter, and in addition the
licensee may be disciplined by the commission after a hearing has been
held in accordance with the provisions set forth in this chapter, and
determination by the commission that such licensee has violated any of
the restrictions set forth in this section.
(4) Persons applying for licensure pursuant to this section shall
pay the application fee determined by the secretary and, in the event
the license applied for is issued, a license fee at the rate provided
for licenses generally. After review by the commission, licenses
issued under this section may be renewed annually if the licensee
continues to be employed as a ((full-time)) faculty member of the
school of dentistry of the University of Washington, or a university
resident in postgraduate dental education, and otherwise meets the
requirements of the provisions and conditions deemed appropriate by the
commission. Any person who obtains a license pursuant to this section
may, without an additional application fee, apply for licensure under
this chapter, in which case the applicant shall be subject to
examination and the other requirements of this chapter.

--- END ---