BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
A program, facility, or institution operated by the department of
corrections, or pursuant to a contract with the department of
corrections, that serves violent offenders, including but not limited
to facilities sited under RCW 72.65.220, may not be located or operated
on the grounds of a state hospital as designated under chapter 72.23
RCW. This section does not apply to a program, facility, or
institution located or operated on the grounds of a state hospital on
the effective date of this act.

--- END ---