BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 74.46.091 (Additional reporting requirements for quality
maintenance fee) and 2003 1st sp.s. c 16 s 4;
(2) RCW 74.46.535 (Quality maintenance fee) and 2003 1st sp.s. c 16
s 5;
(3) RCW 82.71.010 (Definitions) and 2003 1st sp.s. c 16 s 1;
(4) RCW 82.71.020 (Fee imposed) and 2003 1st sp.s. c 16 s 2; and
(5) RCW 82.71.030 (Administration of chapter) and 2003 1st sp.s. c
16 s 3.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act does not affect any existing right
acquired or liability or obligation incurred under the sections amended
or repealed in this act or under any rule or order adopted under those
sections, nor does it affect any proceeding instituted under those
sections.

--- END ---