BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.16.040 and 2004 c 61 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as otherwise provided by law, an employee in a state liquor
store or agency may sell liquor to any person of legal age to purchase
alcoholic beverages and may also sell to holders of permits such liquor
as may be purchased under such permits.
Where there may be a question of a person's right to purchase
liquor by reason of age, such person shall be required to present any
one of the following officially issued cards of identification which
shows his/her correct age and bears his/her signature and photograph:
(1) ((Liquor control authority card of identification of any state
or province of Canada.
(2))) Driver's license, instruction permit or identification card
of any state or province of Canada, or "identicard" issued by the
Washington state department of licensing pursuant to RCW 46.20.117.
(((3))) (2) United States armed forces identification card issued
to active duty, reserve, and retired personnel and the personnel's
dependents, which may include an imbedded, digital signature in lieu of
a visible signature.
(((4))) (3) Passport.
(((5))) (4) Merchant Marine identification card issued by the
United States Coast Guard.
The board may adopt such regulations as it deems proper covering
the cards of identification listed in this section.
No liquor sold under this section shall be delivered until the
purchaser has paid for the liquor in cash, except as allowed under RCW
66.16.041. The use of a personal credit card does not rely upon the
credit of the state as prohibited by Article VIII, section 5 of the
state Constitution.

--- END ---