BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Clearly excessive price" means a price which exceeds one
hundred and fifteen percent of the price per MBtu charged to a person
who owns their own liquefied gas container.
(2) "Cylinder" means a portable container that is constructed to
United States department of transportation specifications that has less
than two hundred thirty-nine pounds of water capacity and that is
capable of storing liquefied petroleum gas.
(3) "Liquefied petroleum gas" means any hydrocarbon or mixture of
hydrocarbons composed predominantly of propane, propylene, butanes,
normal butane, isobutane, or butylenes.
(4) "Person" means a natural person, corporation, partnership,
firm, receiver, trustee, or any organized group of persons.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A person, other than the owner of a
liquefied petroleum gas container or a person authorized in writing by
the owner, may not:
(a) Fill or refill a liquefied petroleum gas container with
liquefied petroleum gas or any other gas or compound; or
(b) Deface, erase, obliterate, cover up, or otherwise remove or
conceal any name, mark, initial, or device on a liquefied petroleum gas
container.
(2) This section does not apply to cylinders.
(3) A person violating this section is subject to a one thousand
dollar fine payable to the county where the violation occurs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---