BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the composition
of today's student population continues to change in relation to the
number, complexity, and acuity of medical and psychiatric problems with
which students come to school daily. The legislature also finds that
due to an emerging lack of access to routine health care for many
children, the role of the school nurse in protecting children's health
and improving their ability to achieve academically continues to grow.
The legislature also finds that student health is fundamental to the
educational process, that access to school nursing services is a vital
component of supporting student academic success, and that removing
health barriers to learning is essential to the successful education of
students.
The legislature further finds that in response to the increasingly
diverse needs that challenge school communities today, the nature and
scope of school nursing services required to meet student needs
continues to expand. The legislature recognizes that in addition to
meeting the health care needs of the general student population by
assessing student health status, identifying health problems that have
an impact on learning, delivering emergency care, administering
medications, performing health care procedures, and providing wellness
programs, health counseling, and health education, school nurses also
must meet the health needs of special student populations including,
but not limited to, special education students, students with 504
plans, and students with mental or social concerns that impede
learning.
The legislature also finds that due to the growing complexity of
student health needs, the delegation of nursing tasks to unlicensed and
untrained school personnel compromises the health and safety of
students, creates the potential for errors with life-threatening
consequences, and exposes school districts to legal liability. The
legislature acknowledges that the department of health, in its 2001
sunrise review of school health aides, recommended the state regulation
of registered school health aides according to established nursing
practice standards and the state's uniform professional accountability
processes. The legislature declares that the training of registered
school health aides is in the interest of public health and safety.
The legislature intends to undertake a more comprehensive
examination of overall student health care needs in the school setting
to determine how school nursing services can be best integrated into
existing efforts to raising student academic achievement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Commission" means the nursing care quality assurance
commission created in RCW 18.79.070.
(2) "Department" means the department of health.
(3) "School health aide" means a person registered under this
chapter who performs health care tasks under training and supervision
of a registered nurse licensed under RCW 18.79.040.
(4) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) No certificated or noncertificated
school district employee may practice or represent himself or herself
as a school health aide by use of any title or description of services
without being registered to practice by the department, unless
otherwise exempted by this chapter.
(2) Tasks delegated to a school health aide include those nursing
procedures applicable to school districts under RCW 28A.210.260 and
28A.210.280.
(3) This section shall not be construed to affect the scope of
nursing procedures applicable to school districts as provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This chapter shall not be construed to
prohibit or restrict:
(1) The practice by an individual licensed, certified, or
registered under the laws of this state and performing services within
the authorized scope of practice;
(2) The practice by an individual employed by the government of the
United States while engaged in the performance of duties prescribed by
the laws of the United States; or
(3) The practice by a person who is a regular student in an
educational program approved by the secretary, and whose performance of
services is pursuant to a regular course of instruction or assignments
from an instructor and under the general supervision of the instructor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 In addition to any other authority provided
by law, the secretary has the authority to:
(1) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to implement this
chapter;
(2) Establish all registration, examination, and renewal fees in
accordance with RCW 43.70.250;
(3) Establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this
chapter;
(4) Register any applicants, and to deny registration to applicants
who do not meet the minimum qualifications, except that proceedings
concerning the denial of registration based upon unprofessional conduct
or impairment shall be governed by the uniform disciplinary act,
chapter 18.130 RCW; and
(5) Hire clerical, administrative, investigative, and other staff
as needed to implement this chapter, and hire individuals registered
under this chapter to serve as examiners for any practical
examinations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The secretary shall keep an official record
of all proceedings. A part of the record shall consist of a register
of all applicants for registration under this chapter and the results
of each application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The secretary shall issue a registration to
any applicant who completes an application that identifies the name and
address of the applicant, the registration being requested, and
information required by the secretary necessary to establish whether
there are grounds for denial of a registration or issuance of a
conditional registration under chapter 18.130 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The superintendent of public instruction
shall establish by rule, in consultation with the commission, standards
and procedures for approval of educational and alternative training
programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Applications for registration shall be
submitted on forms provided by the secretary. The secretary may
require any information and documentation that reasonably relates to
the need to determine whether the applicant meets the criteria for
registration provided for in this chapter and chapter 18.130 RCW. Each
applicant shall pay a fee determined by the secretary under RCW
43.70.250. The fee shall accompany the application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The secretary shall establish by rule the
procedural requirements and fees for renewal of a registration.
Failure to renew shall invalidate the registration and all privileges
granted by the registration. If a registration has lapsed for a period
longer than three years, the person shall demonstrate competence to the
satisfaction of the secretary by taking continuing education courses,
or meeting other standards determined by the secretary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The uniform disciplinary act, chapter
18.130 RCW, governs the issuance and denial of registrations,
unauthorized practice, and the discipline of persons registered under
this chapter. The secretary is the disciplining authority under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This chapter only applies to a business or
profession regulated under the laws of this state if this chapter is
specifically referenced in the laws regulating that business or
profession.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) The joint legislative task force on
student health is created. The task force shall consist of three
members of each major caucus of the senate, representing the committees
on health and long-term care, ways and means, and early learning, K-12
and higher education, appointed by the president of the senate; and
three members of each major caucus of the house of representatives,
representing the committees on education, appropriations, and health
care, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. Every
effort shall be made to ensure that members of the joint task force are
appointed by the effective date of this section.
(2) The task force, in consultation with the department of health
and the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall
investigate the need for additional school nursing services by
gathering data about current school nurse-to-student ratios, and
assessing the demand for school nursing services by acuity levels and
the necessary skills to meet those demands. The task force also shall
recommend to the legislature best practices in school nursing services,
including a dedicated, sustainable funding model that would best meet
the current and future needs of Washington's schools and contribute to
greater academic success of all students.
(3) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to
the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2005.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The school nurse account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from gifts, grants, or
endowments obtained under section 15 of this act must be deposited into
the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only to increase the
number of certificated educational staff associate school nurses in
class I school districts. School districts with more than one thousand
five hundred students for every school nurse shall receive priority for
these funds. As used in this section, "school nurse" does not include
nurses in the school nurse corps.
Only the superintendent of public instruction or the
superintendent's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW,
but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 The office of the superintendent of public
instruction may receive gifts, grants, or endowments from public or
private sources that are made from time to time, in trust or otherwise,
for the use and benefit of the purposes of section 14 of this act and
spend gifts, grants, or endowments or income from the public or private
sources to support the purpose in section 14 of this act, unless the
receipt of the gifts, grants, or endowments violates RCW 42.17.710.

Sec. 16 RCW 28A.305.130 and 2002 c 205 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to any other powers and duties as provided by law, the
state board of education shall:
(1) Approve or disapprove the program of courses leading to
teacher, school administrator, and school specialized personnel
certification offered by all institutions of higher education within
the state which may be accredited and whose graduates may become
entitled to receive such certification. Program approval under this
section shall require that the certification program include a
requirement for the successful completion of a course in emergency
first-aid and cardiopulmonary resuscitation training.
(2) Conduct every five years a review of the program approval
standards, including the minimum standards for teachers,
administrators, and educational staff associates, to reflect research
findings and assure continued improvement of preparation programs for
teachers, administrators, and educational staff associates.
(3) Investigate the character of the work required to be performed
as a condition of entrance to and graduation from any institution of
higher education in this state relative to such certification as
provided for in subsection (1) of this section, and prepare a list of
accredited institutions of higher education of this and other states
whose graduates may be awarded such certificates.
(4)(a) The state board of education shall adopt rules to allow a
teacher certification candidate to fulfill, in part, teacher
preparation program requirements through work experience as a
classified teacher's aide in a public school or private school meeting
the requirements of RCW 28A.195.010. The rules shall include, but are
not limited to, limitations based upon the recency of the teacher
preparation candidate's teacher aide work experience, and limitations
based on the amount of work experience that may apply toward teacher
preparation program requirements under this chapter.
(b) The state board of education shall require that at the time of
the individual's enrollment in a teacher preparation program, the
supervising teacher and the building principal shall jointly provide to
the teacher preparation program of the higher education institution at
which the teacher candidate is enrolled, a written assessment of the
performance of the teacher candidate. The assessment shall contain
such information as determined by the state board of education and
shall include: Evidence that at least fifty percent of the candidate's
work as a classified teacher's aide was involved in instructional
activities with children under the supervision of a certificated
teacher and that the candidate worked a minimum of six hundred thirty
hours for one school year; the type of work performed by the candidate;
and a recommendation of whether the candidate's work experience as a
classified teacher's aide should be substituted for teacher preparation
program requirements. In compliance with such rules as may be
established by the state board of education under this section, the
teacher preparation programs of the higher education institution where
the candidate is enrolled shall make the final determination as to what
teacher preparation program requirements may be fulfilled by teacher
aide work experience.
(5) Supervise the issuance of such certificates as provided for in
subsection (1) of this section and specify the types and kinds of
certificates necessary for the several departments of the common
schools by rule or regulation in accordance with RCW 28A.410.010.
(6) Accredit, subject to such accreditation standards and
procedures as may be established by the state board of education, all
schools that apply for accreditation, and approve, subject to the
provisions of RCW 28A.195.010, private schools carrying out a program
for any or all of the grades kindergarten through twelve: PROVIDED,
That no private school may be approved that operates a kindergarten
program only: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no public or private schools
shall be placed upon the list of accredited schools so long as secret
societies are knowingly allowed to exist among its students by school
officials: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the state board may elect to require
all or certain classifications of the public schools to conduct and
participate in such preaccreditation examination and evaluation
processes as may now or hereafter be established by the board.
(7) Make rules and regulations governing the establishment in any
existing nonhigh school district of any secondary program or any new
grades in grades nine through twelve. Before any such program or any
new grades are established the district must obtain prior approval of
the state board.
(8) Prepare such outline of study for the common schools as the
board shall deem necessary, and prescribe such rules for the general
government of the common schools, as shall seek to secure regularity of
attendance, prevent truancy, secure efficiency, and promote the true
interest of the common schools.
(9) Continuously reevaluate courses and adopt and enforce
regulations within the common schools so as to meet the educational
needs of students and articulate with the institutions of higher
education and unify the work of the public school system.
(10) Carry out board powers and duties relating to the organization
and reorganization of school districts under chapter 28A.315 RCW
((28A.315.010 through 28A.315.680 and 28A.315.900)).
(11) Hear and decide appeals as otherwise provided by law.
The state board of education is given the authority to promulgate
information and rules dealing with the prevention of child abuse for
purposes of curriculum use in the common schools.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 28A.210
RCW to read as follows:
School building administrators and school district boards of
directors are encouraged to provide ample opportunities for all school
employees to receive training in emergency first aid and
cardiopulmonary resuscitation, and to periodically attend refresher
courses in these vital areas of preparedness necessary to provide
assistance to students and other employees in emergency situations.

Sec. 18 RCW 28A.150.260 and 1997 c 13 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The basic education allocation for each annual average full time
equivalent student shall be determined in accordance with the following
procedures:
(1) The governor shall and the superintendent of public instruction
may recommend to the legislature a formula based on a ratio of students
to staff for the distribution of a basic education allocation for each
annual average full time equivalent student enrolled in a common
school. The distribution formula shall have the primary objective of
equalizing educational opportunities and shall provide appropriate
recognition of the following costs among the various districts within
the state:
(a) Certificated instructional staff and their related costs;
(b) Certificated administrative staff and their related costs;
(c) Classified staff and their related costs;
(d) Registered nurses licensed under RCW 18.79.040;
(e) Nonsalary costs;
(((e))) (f) Extraordinary costs of remote and necessary schools and
small high schools, including costs of additional certificated and
classified staff; and
(((f))) (g) The attendance of students pursuant to RCW 28A.335.160
and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing school district.
(2)(a) This formula for distribution of basic education funds shall
be reviewed biennially by the superintendent and governor. The
recommended formula shall be subject to approval, amendment or
rejection by the legislature. The formula shall be for allocation
purposes only. While the legislature intends that the allocations for
additional instructional staff be used to increase the ratio of such
staff to students, nothing in this section shall require districts to
reduce the number of administrative staff below existing levels.
(b) The formula adopted by the legislature shall reflect the
following ratios at a minimum: (i) Forty-nine certificated
instructional staff to one thousand annual average full time equivalent
students enrolled in grades kindergarten through three; (ii) forty-six
certificated instructional staff to one thousand annual average full
time equivalent students in grades four through twelve; (iii) four
certificated administrative staff to one thousand annual average full
time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through twelve; ((and))
(iv) sixteen and sixty-seven one-hundredths classified personnel to one
thousand annual average full time equivalent students enrolled in
grades kindergarten through twelve; and (v) one and thirty-three one-hundredths registered school nurse personnel to one thousand annual
average full-time equivalent students enrolled in grades kindergarten
through twelve.
(c) In the event the legislature rejects the distribution formula
recommended by the governor, without adopting a new distribution
formula, the distribution formula for the previous school year shall
remain in effect: PROVIDED, That the distribution formula developed
pursuant to this section shall be for state apportionment and
equalization purposes only and shall not be construed as mandating
specific operational functions of local school districts other than
those program requirements identified in RCW 28A.150.220 and
28A.150.100. The enrollment of any district shall be the annual
average number of full time equivalent students and part time students
as provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the first school day of
each month and shall exclude full time equivalent students with
disabilities recognized for the purposes of allocation of state funds
for programs under RCW 28A.155.010 through 28A.155.100. The definition
of full time equivalent student shall be determined by rules of the
superintendent of public instruction: PROVIDED, That the definition
shall be included as part of the superintendent's biennial budget
request: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That any revision of the present
definition shall not take effect until approved by the house
appropriations committee and the senate ways and means committee:
PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the office of financial management shall make
a monthly review of the superintendent's reported full time equivalent
students in the common schools in conjunction with RCW 43.62.050.
(3)(a) Certificated instructional staff shall include those persons
employed by a school district who are nonsupervisory employees within
the meaning of RCW 41.59.020(8): PROVIDED, That in exceptional cases,
people of unusual competence but without certification may teach
students so long as a certificated person exercises general
supervision: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the hiring of such classified
people shall not occur during a labor dispute and such classified
people shall not be hired to replace certificated employees during a
labor dispute.
(b) Certificated administrative staff shall include all those
persons who are chief executive officers, chief administrative
officers, confidential employees, supervisors, principals, or assistant
principals within the meaning of RCW 41.59.020(4).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 Sections 2 through 12 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 The sum of forty-five thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2006, from the general fund to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for the purpose of funding a
position to pursue grants and obtain funds for the school nurse
account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---