BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 1988 c 236 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
The legislature recognizes the changing nature of the work force
brought about by increasing numbers of working mothers, single parent
households, and dual career families. The legislature finds that the
needs of families must be balanced with the demands of the workplace to
promote family stability and economic security. The legislature
further finds that it is in the public interest for employers to
accommodate employees by providing reasonable leaves from work for
family reasons, especially the care of children who have health
conditions that require treatment or supervision, such as minor
childhood illnesses, and other family members who have serious health
conditions or emergency conditions. In order to promote family
stability, economic security, and the public interest, the legislature
hereby establishes a minimum standard for family care. Nothing
contained in ((this act)) RCW 49.12.270 through 49.12.295 shall
prohibit any employer from establishing family care standards more
generous than the minimum standards set forth in ((this act)) RCW
49.12.270 through 49.12.295.

Sec. 2 RCW 49.12.265 and 2002 c 243 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 49.12.270
through 49.12.295 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Child" means a biological, adopted, or foster child, a
stepchild, a legal ward, or a child of a person standing in loco
parentis who is: (a) Under eighteen years of age; or (b) eighteen
years of age or older and incapable of self-care because of a mental or
physical disability.
(2) "Domestic partner" means an unmarried person eighteen years of
age or older: (a) With whom the individual entered into a close
personal relationship when both parties were mentally competent and has
maintained a close personal relationship solely with that person for a
minimum of six continuous months; (b) with whom the individual shares
a regular and permanent residence; (c) with whom the individual has
agreed to be jointly responsible for basic living expenses incurred
during the domestic partnership; and (d) to whom the individual is not
related by blood as would bar marriage.
(3) "Grandparent" means a parent of a parent of an employee.
(((3))) (4) "Parent" means a biological parent of an employee or an
individual who stood in loco parentis to an employee when the employee
was a child.
(((4))) (5) "Parent-in-law" means a parent of the spouse or
domestic partner of an employee.
(((5))) (6) "Sick leave or other paid time off" means time allowed
under the terms of an appropriate collective bargaining agreement or
employer policy, as applicable, to an employee for illness, vacation,
and personal holiday.
(((6))) (7) "Spouse" means a husband or wife, as the case may be.

Sec. 3 RCW 49.12.270 and 2002 c 243 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) If, under the terms of a collective bargaining agreement or
employer policy applicable to an employee, the employee is entitled to
sick leave or other paid time off, then an employer shall allow an
employee to use ((any or all of)) the employee's ((choice of)) sick
leave or other paid time off to care for:
(((a))) (i) A child of the employee with a health condition that
requires treatment or supervision; or
(((b))) (ii) A spouse, domestic partner, parent, parent-in-law, or
grandparent of the employee who has a serious health condition or an
emergency condition.
(b) An employee taking leave under the circumstances described in
(a) of this subsection:
(i) Is entitled to choose both the amount and the type of leave he
or she takes under the circumstances described in this section;
(ii) May not take advance leave until it has been earned((. The
employee taking leave under the circumstances described in this
section)); and
(iii) Must comply with the terms of the collective bargaining
agreement or employer policy applicable to the leave, except for any
terms relating to the choice of leave, amount of earned leave that may
be used in a given period, attendance requirements, or waiting periods.
(2) Use of leave other than sick leave or other paid time off to
care for a child, spouse, domestic partner, parent, parent-in-law, or
grandparent under the circumstances described in this section shall be
governed by the terms of the appropriate collective bargaining
agreement or employer policy, as applicable.

Sec. 4 RCW 49.12.290 and 1988 c 236 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Nothing in RCW 49.12.270 through 49.12.295 shall be construed
to reduce any provision in a collective bargaining agreement or
employer policy.
(2) Nothing in RCW 49.12.270 through 49.12.295 shall be construed
to discourage employers from entering into agreements or adopting
policies that provide greater rights to employees than those required
by RCW 49.12.270 through 49.12.295.
(3) Except as provided in RCW 49.12.270 through 49.12.295, the
rights under RCW 49.12.270 through 49.12.295 are in addition to any
other rights provided by law. The remedies under RCW 49.12.270 through
49.12.295 shall be exclusive.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 1 of this act is codified as a new
section in chapter 49.12 RCW to be added between RCW 49.12.270 and
49.12.295.

--- END ---