BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.360 and 2003 c 167 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be a beer and/or wine retailer's license to be
designated as a grocery store license to sell beer, strong beer, and/or
wine at retail in bottles, cans, and original containers, not to be
consumed upon the premises where sold, at any store other than the
state liquor stores.
(1) Licensees obtaining a written endorsement from the board may
also sell malt liquor in kegs or other containers capable of holding
less than five and one-half gallons of liquid.
(2) The annual fee for the grocery store license is one hundred
fifty dollars for each store.
(3)(a) Licensees under this section may provide, free or for a
charge, single-serving samples of two ounces or less, but no more than
a total of eight ounces, to customers for the purpose of sales
promotion if the licensees operate fully enclosed retail areas
encompassing at least twenty thousand square feet. Sampling activities
of licensees under this section are subject to RCW 66.28.010 and
66.28.040.
(b) Except as provided in this subsection, manufacturers,
importers, and distributors of liquor may not bear the direct or the
indirect costs of providing any samples. Domestic breweries,
microbreweries, and certificate of approval holders may bear both the
direct and the indirect costs of providing samples of their own brands
of beer. Domestic wineries may bear only the indirect costs of
providing samples of their own brands of wine.
(c) The service area and facilities must be located within the
licensee's fully enclosed retail area, and must be of a size and design
such that the licensee can observe and control persons in the area to
ensure that persons under twenty-one years of age and apparently
intoxicated persons cannot possess or consume alcohol. Customers must
remain in the service area while consuming samples.
(4) The board shall issue a restricted grocery store license
authorizing the licensee to sell beer and only table wine, if the board
finds upon issuance or renewal of the license that the sale of strong
beer or fortified wine would be against the public interest. In
determining the public interest, the board shall consider at least the
following factors:
(a) The likelihood that the applicant will sell strong beer or
fortified wine to persons who are intoxicated;
(b) Law enforcement problems in the vicinity of the applicant's
establishment that may arise from persons purchasing strong beer or
fortified wine at the establishment; and
(c) Whether the sale of strong beer or fortified wine would be
detrimental to or inconsistent with a government-operated or funded
alcohol treatment or detoxification program in the area.
If the board receives no evidence or objection that the sale of
strong beer or fortified wine would be against the public interest, it
shall issue or renew the license without restriction, as applicable.
The burden of establishing that the sale of strong beer or fortified
wine by the licensee would be against the public interest is on those
persons objecting.
(((4))) (5) Licensees holding a grocery store license must maintain
a minimum three thousand dollar inventory of food products for human
consumption, not including pop, beer, strong beer, or wine.
(((5))) (6) Upon approval by the board, the grocery store licensee
may also receive an endorsement to permit the international export of
beer, strong beer, and wine.
(a) Any beer, strong beer, or wine sold under this endorsement must
have been purchased from a licensed beer or wine distributor licensed
to do business within the state of Washington.
(b) Any beer, strong beer, and wine sold under this endorsement
must be intended for consumption outside the state of Washington and
the United States and appropriate records must be maintained by the
licensee.
(c) A holder of this special endorsement to the grocery store
license shall be considered not in violation of RCW 66.28.010.
(d) Any beer, strong beer, or wine sold under this license must be
sold at a price no less than the acquisition price paid by the holder
of the license.
(e) The annual cost of this endorsement is five hundred dollars and
is in addition to the license fees paid by the licensee for a grocery
store license.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.24.371 and 2003 c 167 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be a beer and/or wine retailer's license to be
designated as a beer and/or wine specialty shop license to sell beer,
strong beer, and/or wine at retail in bottles, cans, and original
containers, not to be consumed upon the premises where sold, at any
store other than the state liquor stores. Licensees obtaining a
written endorsement from the board may also sell malt liquor in kegs or
other containers capable of holding less than five and one-half gallons
of liquid. The annual fee for the beer and/or wine specialty shop
license is one hundred dollars for each store.
(2) Licensees under this section may provide, free or for a charge,
single-serving samples of two ounces or less to customers for the
purpose of sales promotion. Sampling activities of licensees under
this section are subject to RCW 66.28.010 and 66.28.040 ((and)).
Except as provided in this subsection, the cost of sampling under this
section may not be borne, directly or indirectly, by any manufacturer,
importer, or distributor of liquor. Domestic breweries,
microbreweries, and certificate of approval holders may bear both the
direct and the indirect costs of providing samples of their own brands
of beer. Domestic wineries may bear only the indirect costs of
providing samples of their own brands of wine.
(3) The board shall issue a restricted beer and/or wine specialty
shop license, authorizing the licensee to sell beer and only table
wine, if the board finds upon issuance or renewal of the license that
the sale of strong beer or fortified wine would be against the public
interest. In determining the public interest, the board shall consider
at least the following factors:
(a) The likelihood that the applicant will sell strong beer or
fortified wine to persons who are intoxicated;
(b) Law enforcement problems in the vicinity of the applicant's
establishment that may arise from persons purchasing strong beer or
fortified wine at the establishment; and
(c) Whether the sale of strong beer or fortified wine would be
detrimental to or inconsistent with a government-operated or funded
alcohol treatment or detoxification program in the area.
If the board receives no evidence or objection that the sale of
strong beer or fortified wine would be against the public interest, it
shall issue or renew the license without restriction, as applicable.
The burden of establishing that the sale of strong beer or fortified
wine by the licensee would be against the public interest is on those
persons objecting.
(4) Licensees holding a beer and/or wine specialty shop license
must maintain a minimum three thousand dollar wholesale inventory of
beer, strong beer, and/or wine.

Sec. 3 RCW 66.28.010 and 2004 c 160 s 9 and 2004 c 62 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) No manufacturer, importer, distributor, or authorized
representative, or person financially interested, directly or
indirectly, in such business; whether resident or nonresident, shall
have any financial interest, direct or indirect, in any licensed retail
business, unless the retail business is owned by a corporation in which
a manufacturer or importer has no direct stock ownership and there are
no interlocking officers and directors, the retail license is held by
a corporation that is not owned directly or indirectly by a
manufacturer or importer, the sales of liquor are incidental to the
primary activity of operating the property as a hotel, alcoholic
beverages produced by the manufacturer or importer or their
subsidiaries are not sold at the licensed premises, and the board
reviews the ownership and proposed method of operation of all involved
entities and determines that there will not be an unacceptable level of
control or undue influence over the operation or the retail licensee;
nor shall any manufacturer, importer, distributor, or authorized
representative own any of the property upon which such licensed persons
conduct their business; nor shall any such licensed person, under any
arrangement whatsoever, conduct his or her business upon property in
which any manufacturer, importer, distributor, or authorized
representative has any interest unless title to that property is owned
by a corporation in which a manufacturer has no direct stock ownership
and there are no interlocking officers or directors, the retail license
is held by a corporation that is not owned directly or indirectly by
the manufacturer, the sales of liquor are incidental to the primary
activity of operating the property either as a hotel or as an
amphitheater offering live musical and similar live entertainment
activities to the public, alcoholic beverages produced by the
manufacturer or any of its subsidiaries are not sold at the licensed
premises, and the board reviews the ownership and proposed method of
operation of all involved entities and determines that there will not
be an unacceptable level of control or undue influence over the
operation of the retail licensee. Except as provided in subsections
(3) and (4) of this section, no manufacturer, importer, distributor, or
authorized representative shall advance moneys or moneys' worth to a
licensed person under an arrangement, nor shall such licensed person
receive, under an arrangement, an advance of moneys or moneys' worth.
"Person" as used in this section only shall not include those state or
federally chartered banks, state or federally chartered savings and
loan associations, state or federally chartered mutual savings banks,
or institutional investors which are not controlled directly or
indirectly by a manufacturer, importer, distributor, or authorized
representative as long as the bank, savings and loan association, or
institutional investor does not influence or attempt to influence the
purchasing practices of the retailer with respect to alcoholic
beverages. Except as otherwise provided in this section, no
manufacturer, importer, distributor, or authorized representative shall
be eligible to receive or hold a retail license under this title, nor
shall such manufacturer, importer, distributor, or authorized
representative sell at retail any liquor as herein defined. A
corporation granted an exemption under this subsection may use debt
instruments issued in connection with financing construction or
operations of its facilities.
(b) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a licensed domestic
brewery or microbrewery from being licensed as a retailer pursuant to
chapter 66.24 RCW for the purpose of selling beer or wine at retail on
the brewery premises and nothing in this section shall prohibit a
domestic winery from being licensed as a retailer pursuant to chapter
66.24 RCW for the purpose of selling beer or wine at retail on the
winery premises. Such beer and wine so sold at retail shall be subject
to the taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210 and to reporting
and bonding requirements as prescribed by regulations adopted by the
board pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, and beer and wine that is not
produced by the brewery or winery shall be purchased from a licensed
beer or wine distributor.
(c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a licensed distiller,
domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery, or a lessee of a
licensed domestic brewer, microbrewery, or domestic winery, from being
licensed as a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant pursuant to chapter
66.24 RCW for the purpose of selling liquor at a spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant premises on the property on which the primary
manufacturing facility of the licensed distiller, domestic brewer,
microbrewery, or domestic winery is located or on contiguous property
owned or leased by the licensed distiller, domestic brewer,
microbrewery, or domestic winery as prescribed by rules adopted by the
board pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.
(d) Nothing in this section prohibits retail licensees with a
caterer's endorsement issued under RCW 66.24.320 or 66.24.420 from
operating on a domestic winery premises.
(2) Financial interest, direct or indirect, as used in this
section, shall include any interest, whether by stock ownership,
mortgage, lien, or through interlocking directors, or otherwise.
Pursuant to rules promulgated by the board in accordance with chapter
34.05 RCW manufacturers, distributors, and importers may perform, and
retailers may accept the service of building, rotating and restocking
case displays and stock room inventories; rotating and rearranging can
and bottle displays of their own products; provide point of sale
material and brand signs; price case goods of their own brands; and
perform such similar normal business services as the board may by
regulation prescribe.
(3)(a) This section does not prohibit a manufacturer, importer, or
distributor from providing services to a special occasion licensee for:
(i) Installation of draft beer dispensing equipment or advertising,
(ii) advertising, pouring, or dispensing of beer or wine at a beer or
wine tasting exhibition or judging event, or (iii) a special occasion
licensee from receiving any such services as may be provided by a
manufacturer, importer, or distributor. Nothing in this section shall
prohibit a retail licensee, or any person financially interested,
directly or indirectly, in such a retail licensee from having a
financial interest, direct or indirect, in a business which provides,
for a compensation commensurate in value to the services provided,
bottling, canning or other services to a manufacturer, so long as the
retail licensee or person interested therein has no direct financial
interest in or control of said manufacturer.
(b) A person holding contractual rights to payment from selling a
liquor distributor's business and transferring the license shall not be
deemed to have a financial interest under this section if the person
(i) lacks any ownership in or control of the distributor, (ii) is not
employed by the distributor, and (iii) does not influence or attempt to
influence liquor purchases by retail liquor licensees from the
distributor.
(c) The board shall adopt such rules as are deemed necessary to
carry out the purposes and provisions of subsection (3)(a) of this
section in accordance with the administrative procedure act, chapter
34.05 RCW.
(4) With respect to sampling activities under RCW 66.24.360 and
66.24.371, this section does not prohibit: (a) A domestic brewery,
microbrewery, or certificate of approval holder from furnishing its own
brands of beer to a licensee; or (b) a domestic brewery, microbrewery,
domestic winery, or certificate of approval holder from pouring or
dispensing samples of its own brands of beer or wine for a licensee's
customers. Such sampling activities, however, may occur no more than
eight times per calendar year, no longer than two consecutive days, and
no more frequently than once every four weeks.
(5) A license issued under RCW 66.24.395 does not constitute a
retail license for the purposes of this section.
(((5))) (6) A public house license issued under RCW 66.24.580 does
not violate the provisions of this section as to a retailer having an
interest directly or indirectly in a liquor-licensed manufacturer.

Sec. 4 RCW 66.28.040 and 2004 c 160 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as permitted by the board under RCW 66.20.010, no domestic
brewery, microbrewery, distributor, distiller, domestic winery,
importer, rectifier, certificate of approval holder, or other
manufacturer of liquor shall, within the state of Washington, give to
any person any liquor; but nothing in this section nor in RCW 66.28.010
shall prevent a domestic brewery, microbrewery, distributor, domestic
winery, distiller, certificate of approval holder, or importer from
furnishing samples of beer, wine, or spirituous liquor to authorized
licensees for the purpose of negotiating a sale, in accordance with
regulations adopted by the liquor control board, provided that the
samples are subject to taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210,
and in the case of spirituous liquor, any product used for samples must
be purchased at retail from the board; nothing in this section shall
prevent the furnishing of samples of liquor to the board for the
purpose of negotiating the sale of liquor to the state liquor control
board; nothing in this section shall prevent a domestic brewery,
microbrewery, domestic winery, distillery, certificate of approval
holder, or distributor from furnishing beer, wine, or spirituous liquor
for instructional purposes under RCW 66.28.150; nothing in this section
shall prevent a domestic winery, certificate of approval holder, or
distributor from furnishing wine without charge, subject to the taxes
imposed by RCW 66.24.210, to a not-for-profit group organized and
operated solely for the purpose of enology or the study of viticulture
which has been in existence for at least six months and that uses wine
so furnished solely for such educational purposes or a domestic winery,
or an out-of-state certificate of approval holder, from furnishing wine
without charge or a domestic brewery, or an out-of-state certificate of
approval holder, from furnishing beer without charge, subject to the
taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.210 or 66.24.290, to a nonprofit charitable
corporation or association exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3)
of the internal revenue code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)) for use
consistent with the purpose or purposes entitling it to such exemption;
nothing in this section shall prevent a domestic brewery or
microbrewery from serving beer without charge, on the brewery premises;
nothing in this section shall prevent donations of wine for the
purposes of RCW 66.12.180; ((and)) nothing in this section shall
prevent a domestic winery from serving wine without charge, on the
winery premises; and, with respect to sampling activities under RCW
66.24.360 and 66.24.371, and so long as such sampling activities occur
no more than eight times per calendar year, no longer than two
consecutive days, and no more frequently than once every four weeks,
nothing in this section shall prevent: (1) A domestic brewery,
microbrewery, or certificate of approval holder from furnishing its own
brands of beer to a licensee; or (2) a domestic brewery, microbrewery,
domestic winery, or certificate of approval holder from pouring or
dispensing samples of its own brands of beer or wine for a licensee's
customers.

Sec. 5 RCW 66.28.155 and 2004 c 160 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery, distillery,
distributor, certificate of approval holder, or its licensed agent may
conduct educational activities or provide product information to the
consumer on the licensed premises of a retailer. Information on the
subject of wine, beer, or spirituous liquor, including but not limited
to, the history, nature, quality, and characteristics of a wine, beer,
or spirituous liquor, methods of harvest, production, storage,
handling, and distribution of a wine, beer, or spirituous liquor, and
the general development of the wine, beer, and spirituous liquor
industry may be provided by a domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic
winery, distillery, distributor, certificate of approval holder, or its
licensed agent to the public on the licensed premises of a retailer.
The retailer requesting such activity shall attempt to schedule a
series of brewery, winery, authorized representative, or distillery and
distributor appearances in an effort to equitably represent the
industries. Nothing in this section permits a domestic brewery,
microbrewery, domestic winery, distillery, distributor, certificate of
approval holder, or its licensed agent to receive compensation or
financial benefit from the educational activities or product
information presented on the licensed premises of a retailer. The
promotional value of such educational activities or product information
shall not be considered advancement of moneys or of moneys' worth
within the meaning of RCW 66.28.010.
(2) A domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery, or
certificate of approval holder may pour or dispense single-serving
samples of its own brands of beer or wine to customers of grocery store
and beer and/or wine specialty shop licensees consistent with the
provisions of RCW 66.24.360 and 66.24.371 for the purposes of sales
promotion, so long as such sampling activities occur no more than eight
times per calendar year, no longer than two consecutive days, and no
more frequently than once every four weeks. The promotional value of
such services shall not be considered advancement of moneys or of
moneys' worth within the meaning of RCW 66.28.010.

--- END ---