BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that digital learning courses and
programs can provide students with opportunities to study subjects that
may not otherwise be available within the students' schools, school
districts, or communities. These courses can also meet the
instructional needs of students who have scheduling conflicts, students
who learn best from technology-based instructional methods, and
students who have a need to enroll in schools on a part-time basis.
Digital learning courses can also meet the needs of students and
families seeking nontraditional learning environments. The legislature
further finds that the state rules used by school districts to support
some digital learning courses were adopted before these types of
courses were created, so the rules are not well-suited to the delivery
of online instruction. As a result, at least one school district has
received an audit exception for the way the district operated and
accounted for its digital learning courses. It is the intent of the
legislature to clarify the requirements for digital learning courses
and to give school districts and the auditors a common set of
guidelines for their delivery and funding.
(2) The board of directors of a school district may operate digital
learning programs for eligible full-time students, or eligible part-time students who meet the provisions of RCW 28A.150.350. The board of
directors may also provide such programs through contract to the extent
permitted under RCW 28A.150.305. The board of directors of a school
district claiming state funding for digital learning programs shall:
(a) Adopt and periodically review written policies for such
programs;
(b) Formally approve programs that rely primarily on digital
curriculum;
(c) Require that individual courses offered primarily through
digital curriculum be approved by a designated school district
official;
(d) Receive an annual report on its digital learning programs from
its staff. The report should include, at a minimum, information
included in guidelines provided by the superintendent of public
instruction;
(e) Institute reliable methods to verify a student is doing his or
her own work. The methods may include proctored examinations or
projects, including the use of web cams or other technologies.
"Proctored" means directly monitored by an adult authorized by the
school district;
(f) Grant credit to a student who successfully demonstrates,
through examination, project completion, or other performance-based
methods instead of counting contact hours, that the student has
successfully completed a course;
(g) Complete any program evaluation requirement adopted by the
superintendent of public instruction under subsection (5)(d) of this
section;
(h) Report annually to the superintendent of public instruction on
the number of its digital learning programs and courses and the number
of students enrolled in the programs or courses;
(i) Define a full-time equivalent student under RCW 28A.150.260 and
a part-time student under RCW 28A.150.350 based upon the district's
estimated average weekly hours; and
(j) Periodically complete a self-evaluation component designed to
objectively measure the effectiveness of the programs, including the
impact of the courses on student learning and achievement.
(3) Digital learning courses must provide each student with:
(a) Direct personal contact with certificated staff designated by
either the school district or by the contractor with the approval of
the school district. Direct personal contact is for the purposes of
instruction, assignment review, testing, evaluation of student
progress, or other learning activities. Direct personal contact may
include the use of telephone, e-mail, instant messaging, interactive
computer, or interactive video communication;
(b) A description of course objectives monitored by certificated
staff, including information on the requirements a student must meet to
successfully complete the programs or courses;
(c) Information on the ways the courses or programs meet the school
district's learning goals and, for high school courses, whether and how
the courses meet state and district graduation requirements; and
(d) An assessment of each student's progress at least annually
using, for full-time students, the state assessment for the student's
grade level and any other annual assessment required by the school
district. Part-time students shall also be assessed at least annually.
Part-time students who are either receiving home-based instruction
under chapter 28A.200 RCW or who are enrolled in an approved private
school under chapter 28A.195 RCW are not required to participate in the
state assessments required under chapter 28A.655 RCW.
(4) A school district that provides one or more digital courses to
a student who is receiving home-based instruction under chapter 28A.200
RCW shall provide the parent or guardian of the student, prior to the
student's enrollment, with a description of any difference between
home-based education and the enrollment option selected by the student.
The parent or guardian shall sign documentation attesting to his or her
understanding of the difference and the documentation shall be retained
by the district and made available for audit.
(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
adopt rules for the implementation of this section, including program
implementation standards and enrollment documentation and reporting as
follows:
(a) Each school district shall receive apportionment generated in
accordance with this chapter based upon the student full-time
equivalent enrollment reported for this program;
(b) For funding purposes, enrollment shall be determined based upon
the learning activities specified in the digital course objectives,
including the estimated average weekly hours spent by each individual
student participating in a digital program; and
(c) Enrollment of part-time students shall be subject to the
provisions of RCW 28A.150.350, and shall generate the pro rata share of
full-time funding.

--- END ---