BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that ambulance and
emergency medical services are essential services and the availability
of these services is vital to preserving and promoting the health,
safety, and welfare of people in local communities throughout the
state. All persons, businesses, and industries benefit from the
availability of ambulance and emergency medical services, and survival
rates can be increased when these services are available, adequately
funded, and appropriately regulated. It is the legislature's intent to
explicitly recognize local jurisdictions' ability and authority to
collect utility service charges to fund ambulance and emergency medical
service systems that are based, at least in some part, upon a charge
for the availability of these services.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.21.766 and 2004 c 129 s 34 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever a regional fire protection service authority ((or the
legislative authority of any city or town)) determines that the fire
protection jurisdictions that are members of the authority ((or the
city or town or a substantial portion of the city or town is)) are not
adequately served by existing private ambulance service, the governing
board of the authority may by resolution((, or the legislative
authority of the city or town may by appropriate legislation,)) provide
for the establishment of a system of ambulance service to be operated
by the authority as a public utility ((of the city or town, or))
operated by contract after a call for bids.
(2) The legislative authority of any city or town may establish an
ambulance service to be operated as a public utility. However, the
legislative authority of the city or town shall not provide for the
establishment of an ambulance service utility that would compete with
any existing private ambulance service, unless the legislative
authority of the city or town determines that the city or town, or a
substantial portion of the city or town, is not adequately served by an
existing private ambulance service. In determining the adequacy of an
existing private ambulance service, the legislative authority of the
city or town shall take into consideration objective generally accepted
medical standards and reasonable levels of service which shall be
published by the city or town legislative authority. When it is
preliminarily concluded that the private ambulance service is
inadequate, before issuing a call for bids or before the city or town
establishes an ambulance service utility, the legislative authority of
the city or town shall allow a minimum of sixty days for the private
ambulance service to meet the generally accepted medical standards and
reasonable levels of service.
(3) The city or town legislative authority is authorized to set and
collect rates and charges in an amount sufficient to regulate, operate,
and maintain an ambulance utility. Prior to setting such rates and
charges, the legislative authority must determine, through a cost-of-service study, the total cost necessary to regulate, operate, and
maintain the ambulance utility. Total costs shall not include capital
cost for the construction, major renovation, or major repair of the
physical plant. For purposes of establishing and setting rates and
charges under this section, costs shall be reduced by any revenues
collected and described in subsection (5)(a) through (c) of this
section. Once the legislative authority determines the total costs,
the legislative authority shall then identify that portion of the total
costs that are attributable to the availability of the ambulance
service and that portion of the total costs that are attributable to
the demand placed on the ambulance utility.
(a) Availability costs are those costs attributable to the basic
infrastructure needed to respond to a single call for service within
the utility's response criteria. Availability costs may include costs
for dispatch, labor, training of personnel, equipment, patient care
supplies, and maintenance of equipment.
(b) Demand costs are those costs that are attributable to the
burden placed on the ambulance service by individual calls for
ambulance service. Demand costs shall include costs related to
frequency of calls, distances from hospitals, and other factors
identified in the cost-of-service study conducted to assess burdens
imposed on the ambulance utility.
(c) Beginning on the effective date of this act, the rate
attributable to costs for availability described under (a) of this
subsection shall be uniformly applied across user classifications
within the utility.
(d) Beginning on the effective date of this act, the rate
attributable to costs for demand, described under (b) of this
subsection, shall be established and billed to each utility user
classification based on each user classification's burden on the
ambulance utility.
(e) The fee charged by the utility shall reflect a combination of
the availability cost and the demand cost.
(4) The combined rates charged shall reflect an exemption for
persons who are medicaid eligible and reside in a nursing facility,
boarding home, or adult family home, and shall reflect an exemption or
reduction for designated classes consistent with Article VIII, section
7 of the state Constitution. The amounts of exemption or reduction
shall be a general expense of the utility, and designated as an
availability cost, to be spread uniformly across the utility user
classifications.
(5) In each city or town operating an ambulance utility pursuant to
this section:
(a) The legislative authority must continue to allocate at least
ninety percent of the total amount of general fund revenues expended,
as of May 6, 2004, toward the total costs necessary to regulate,
operate, and maintain the ambulance utility.
However, cities or towns that operated an ambulance service as a
public utility as of May 6, 2004, and commingled general fund dollars
and ambulance service utility dollars, may reasonably estimate that
portion of general fund dollars that were, as of that date, applied
toward the operation of the ambulance service utility, and at least
ninety percent of such estimated amount must then continue to be
applied toward the total cost necessary to regulate, operate, and
maintain the ambulance utility.
(b) The legislative authority must allocate available emergency
medical service levy funds towards the total costs necessary to
regulate, operate, and maintain the ambulance utility.
(c) The legislative authority must allocate all revenues received
through direct billing to the individual user of the ambulance service
to the demand-related costs under subsection (3)(b) of this section.
(d) The total revenue generated by the rates and charges shall not
exceed the total costs necessary to regulate, operate, and maintain an
ambulance utility.
(e) Revenues generated by the rates and charges must be deposited
in a separate fund or funds and be used only for the purpose of paying
for the cost of regulating, maintaining, and operating the ambulance
utility.
(6) Ambulance service rates charged pursuant to this section do not
constitute taxes or charges under RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090, or
RCW 35.21.768, or charges otherwise prohibited by law.

--- END ---