BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that there are
factors unique to the relationship between a manufactured/mobile
homeowner and a manufactured/mobile home park owner. Once occupancy
has commenced, the difficulty and expense in moving and relocating a
manufactured/mobile home can affect the operation of market forces, and
lead to an inequality of the bargaining position of the parties. Once
occupancy has commenced, a homeowner may be subject to violations of
the manufactured/mobile home landlord-tenant act or unfair practices
without a timely and cost-effective conflict resolution process.
Although a homeowner, landlord, or park owner may take legal action as
prescribed in the manufactured/mobile home landlord-tenant act, the
judicial process is often time and cost prohibitive. This act is
created for the purpose of protecting the public, fostering fair and
honest competition, and regulating the factors unique to the
relationship between the manufactured/mobile homeowner and park owner.
(2) The legislature finds that taking legal action against a park
owner for violations of the manufactured/mobile home landlord-tenant
act can be a costly and lengthy process, and that many people cannot
afford to pursue a court process to vindicate statutory rights. Park
owners similarly are impacted by legal fees and lengthy proceedings
resulting from pursuing a remedy through the legal system and would
also, therefore, benefit from having access to an appropriate,
effective process that resolves disputes quickly and efficiently.
(3) Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to provide a
less costly and more efficient way for manufactured/mobile homeowners
and park owners to resolve disputes, and to provide a mechanism for
state authorities to quickly locate owners of manufactured housing
communities. The legislature further intends to authorize the
department of community, trade, and economic development to:
(a) Register mobile home parks or manufactured housing communities
and report upon data to the appropriate committees of the legislature
by December 31, 2005;
(b) Expand its current ombudsman program by hiring or contracting
with additional persons to conduct a greater number of investigations
of alleged violations of the manufactured/mobile home landlord-tenant
act; and
(c) Collect and report upon data related to conflicts and
violations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December
31, 2005.
(4) If after receiving the reports under subsection (3) of this
section, the legislature finds that the provisions of this act
authorizing the department to register mobile/manufactured home
communities, investigate complaints, clarify existing law, and work to
resolve disputes in good faith voluntarily prove insufficient to
adequately protect the rights and responsibilities of mobile home park
tenants and owners, it is the intent of the legislature to find other
methods for resolution in the future.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this act unless the context requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(2) "Director" means the director of the department of community,
trade, and economic development.
(3) "Mobile home park" or "manufactured housing community" means
any real property that is rented or held out for rent to others for the
placement of two or more mobile homes, manufactured homes, or park
models for the primary purpose of production of income, except when the
real property is rented or held out for rent for seasonal recreational
purposes only and is not intended for year-round occupancy.
(4) "Landlord" or "park owner" means the owner of a mobile home
park or a manufactured housing community and includes the agents of the
landlord.
(5) "Tenant" or "homeowner" means any person, except a transient,
who rents or occupies a mobile home lot.
(6) "Owner" means one or more persons, jointly or severally, in
whom is vested:
(a) All or part of the legal title to the real property; or
(b) All or part of the beneficial ownership, and a right to present
use and enjoyment of the real property.
(7) "Unfair practice" means any act that would constitute an unfair
or deceptive act or practice under chapter 19.86 RCW.
(8) "Complainant" means a landlord, park owner, tenant, or
homeowner, who has a complaint alleging an unfair practice or violation
of chapter 59.20 RCW.
(9) "Respondent" means a landlord, park owner, tenant, or
homeowner, alleged to have committed an unfair practice or violation of
chapter 59.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A complainant shall have the right to
file a complaint with the department alleging an unfair practice or a
violation of chapter 59.20 RCW.
(2) The complainant must provide written notice to the respondent
prior to notifying the department of an alleged violation of chapter
59.20 RCW or unfair practice. If the complaint is not remedied within
the time frame provided by RCW 59.20.080 for tenant violations or
59.20.200 for landlord violations, the complainant may then file a
complaint with the department.
(3) The department may:
(a) Investigate the alleged violations at its discretion upon
receipt of a complaint alleging unfair practices or violations of
chapter 59.20 RCW;
(b) Utilize investigative ombudsman staff or contractors to
investigate and evaluate complaints alleging unfair practices or
violations of chapter 59.20 RCW;
(c) Discuss the issues surrounding or relating to the complaint
with the complainant, respondent, or any witnesses, either individually
or jointly;
(d) Explain options available to the complainant or respondent,
including the involvement of other agencies; and
(e) Negotiate an agreement that is agreed upon by both the
complainant and the respondent.
(4) The department may require or permit any person to file a
complaint or statement in writing or otherwise as the department
determines, as to the facts and circumstances concerning a matter to be
investigated.
(5) The department has the power to employ investigative,
administrative, and clerical staff as necessary for administration of
this act.
(6)(a) Complainants and respondents shall cooperate with the
department in the course of an investigation by:
(i) Furnishing any papers or documents requested; and
(ii) Furnishing in writing an explanation covering the matter
contained in a complaint when requested by the department.
(b) Failure to cooperate with the department in the course of an
investigation is a violation of this act.
(7) After the department has completed its investigation and other
duties, the department shall compile a written report documenting the
process and resolution of the complaint investigation. Under no
circumstances shall the department make or issue any finding,
conclusion, decision, or ruling on whether there was a violation of
chapter 59.20 or 19.86 RCW.
(8) By December 31, 2005, the department shall submit a summary
report of its activities under this act during the period after the
effective date of this act, through December 31, 2005, to the house of
representatives housing committee and the senate committee on financial
institutions, housing and consumer protection, including:
(a) The number of complaints received;
(b) The nature and extent of the complaints received;
(c) The actions taken on each complaint by the department;
(d) Recommendations on what further changes in law are necessary to
resolve disputes;
(e) Recommendations on changes to the department's ombudsman and
investigative programs;
(f) Recommendations on resources necessary to retain or improve the
program; and
(g) Recommendations on whether a formal mobile/manufactured home
landlord-tenant act enforcement and administrative hearing process
should be adopted and how such a process should be structured.
(9) The department shall ensure that notice of the ombudsman
complaint resolution program is given to each mobile/manufactured home
landlord or park owner and each mobile home unit owner or tenant. The
landlord shall post an easily visible notice in all common areas of
mobile/manufactured home communities, including in each clubhouse,
summarizing mobile home park tenant rights and responsibilities, in a
style and format to be determined by the department, and including a
toll-free telephone number that mobile home park owners and tenants can
use to seek additional information and communicate complaints.
(10) This section is not exclusive and does not limit the right of
landlords or tenants to take legal action against another party as
provided in chapter 59.20 RCW or otherwise. Exhaustion of this
ombudsman remedy process is not required before bringing legal action.
This act is not subject to chapter 34.05 RCW. This section does not
apply to unlawful detainer actions initiated under chapters 59.20,
59.12, and 59.18 RCW; however, a tenant is not precluded from seeking
relief under this act if the complaint claims the notice of termination
violates RCW 59.20.080. Filing a complaint with the department is not
a defense nor shall it in any way delay or otherwise affect an unlawful
detainer action. Department-written reports documenting the process
and resolution of the complaint investigation, any written explanation
covering the matter requested by the department, any other documents or
papers requested or produced by the department, or any other record of
the complaint may be admissible only for purposes of impeachment in any
unlawful detainer or other administrative or legal action in regard to
chapter 59.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The director or individuals acting on the
director's behalf are immune from suit in any action, civil or
criminal, based upon any disciplinary actions or other official acts
performed in the course of their duties under this act, except their
intentional or willful misconduct.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) All mobile home parks and manufactured
housing communities must be registered with the department.
(2) To apply for registration, the owner of a mobile home park or
manufactured housing community must file with the department an
application for registration on a form prescribed by the department.
The application must include, but is not limited to:
(a) The name and address of the owner of the mobile home park or
manufactured housing community;
(b) The name and address of the mobile home park or manufactured
housing community;
(c) The name and address of the manager of the mobile home park or
manufactured housing community; and
(d) The number of lots within the mobile home park or manufactured
housing community that are subject to chapter 59.20 RCW.
(3) Certificates of registration are effective on the date issued
by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The department must:
(1) Compile the most accurate list possible of all the mobile home
parks or manufactured housing communities in the state, the number of
lots subject to chapter 59.20 RCW located in each mobile home park or
manufactured housing community, and the names and addresses of the
owners of these parks. The department shall present this list to the
house of representatives housing committee and the senate committee on
financial institutions, housing and consumer protection by December 31,
2005. The department is encouraged to work with groups including, but
not limited to: The office of community development, mobile
homeowners' associations, tenant advocacy groups, park owners'
associations, and county assessors to generate the list;
(2) Send out notifications to all known mobile home park owners or
manufactured housing community owners regarding the due date of the
assessment pursuant to section 7 of this act. These notifications must
include information about late fees, liens, and passing costs on to
tenants; and
(3) Collect the registration assessment due from all mobile home
park owners or manufactured housing community owners, and allow ninety
days to pass before late fees and lien notices are sent to noncomplying
owners as provided in this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The owner of each mobile home park or
manufactured housing community shall pay to the department a
registration assessment of five dollars for each mobile home or
manufactured home that is subject to chapter 59.20 RCW within a park or
community to fund the costs associated with administering this act.
Manufactured housing community owners or mobile home park owners may
pass on no more than two dollars and fifty cents of this assessment to
tenants.
(2) If an owner fails to pay the assessment before the registration
expiration date, a late fee shall be assessed at the prevailing
interest rate for superior court civil judgments for each mobile home
or manufactured home that is subject to chapter 59.20 RCW. The owner
is not entitled to any reimbursement of this fee from the tenants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The manufactured/mobile home investigations
account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts
from fees collected under section 7 of this act must be deposited into
the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the
costs associated with administering this act. Only the director or the
director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but
an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

Sec. 9 RCW 59.22.050 and 1991 c 327 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In order to provide general assistance to mobile home resident
organizations, park owners, and landlords and tenants, the department
shall establish an office of mobile home affairs which will serve as
the coordinating office within state government for matters relating to
mobile homes or manufactured housing.
This office will provide an ombudsman service to mobile home park
owners and mobile home tenants with respect to problems and disputes
between park owners and park residents and to provide technical
assistance to resident organizations or persons in the process of
forming a resident organization pursuant to chapter 59.22 RCW. The
office will keep records of its activities in this area.
(2) The office shall perform all the consumer complaint and related
functions of the state administrative agency that are required for
purposes of complying with this chapter and the regulations established
by the federal department of housing and urban development for
manufactured housing, including the preparation and submission of the
state administrative plan.
(3) The office shall administer the mobile/manufactured home
community registration program including the collection of assessments,
associated late fees, and the compilation of data related to the number
of communities and number of lots within the community that are subject
to chapter 59.20 RCW.
(4) The office shall administer the mobile home relocation
assistance program established in chapter 59.21 RCW, including
verifying the eligibility of tenants for relocation assistance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Except for section 12 of this act, this act
expires December 31, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 In January 2006, the state treasurer shall
transfer any funds remaining in the manufactured/mobile home
investigations account under section 8 of this act to the mobile home
affairs account under RCW 59.22.070 for the purposes under RCW
59.22.050.

--- END ---