BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 88.02.020 and 1985 c 267 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in this chapter, no person may own or operate
any vessel on the waters of this state unless the vessel has been
registered and displays a registration number and a valid decal in
accordance with this chapter, except that a vessel which has or is
required to have a valid marine document as a vessel of the United
States is only required to display a valid decal. A violation of this
section is a class 2 civil infraction.

Sec. 2 RCW 88.02.090 and 1983 c 7 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person charged with the enforcement of this chapter may request
for inspection the certificate of registration from any vessel owner or
operator to ascertain the legal and registered ownership of such
vessel. Failure to provide such certificate for inspection upon the
request of any person charged with enforcement of this chapter
((constitutes)) is a ((violation of this chapter and subjects the
person requested to produce such document to the penalties provided by
RCW 88.02.110)) class 2 civil infraction.

Sec. 3 RCW 88.02.110 and 1993 c 244 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a violation of
this chapter and the rules adopted by the department pursuant to these
statutes is a misdemeanor punishable only by a fine not to exceed one
hundred dollars per vessel for the first violation. Subsequent
violations in the same year are subject to the following fines:
(a) For the second violation, a fine of two hundred dollars per
vessel;
(b) For the third and successive violations, a fine of four hundred
dollars per vessel.
(2) A violation designated in this chapter as a civil infraction
shall be punished accordingly pursuant to chapter 7.80 RCW.
(3) After subtraction of court costs and administrative collection
fees, moneys collected under this section shall be credited to the
current expense fund of the arresting jurisdiction.
(((3))) (4) All law enforcement officers shall have the authority
to enforce this chapter, and the rules adopted by the department
pursuant to these statutes within their respective jurisdictions:
PROVIDED, That a city, town, or county may contract with a fire
protection district for such enforcement and fire protection districts
are authorized to engage in such activities.

--- END ---