BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 13.40 RCW
to read as follows:
Parents have a fundamental interest in knowing if their child has
been taken into police custody for questioning and where their child is
being held. Because a parent or guardian is most often in a position
to provide a juvenile with guidance in matters of great importance to
a juvenile, it is the intent of the legislature to assist parents in
their ability to aid and guide their children when making important
legal decisions, including the decision to waive legal rights during
custodial interrogations. It is also the intent of the legislature to
provide children in police custody the opportunity to seek and receive
consultation with his or her parents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 13.40 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a law enforcement officer takes a juvenile into custody,
the officer must make reasonable attempts to notify a parent, guardian,
or custodian that the juvenile is in custody and where the juvenile is
being held.
(2) When a parent, guardian, or custodian requests to consult with
a juvenile in custody and makes himself or herself immediately
available, he or she shall be permitted to consult with the juvenile
immediately upon his or her request, unless: (a) The juvenile objects
to the consultation while in the presence of the parent, guardian, or
custodian; or (b) the parent, guardian, or custodian is a codefendant
or victim of the juvenile.

Sec. 3 RCW 13.40.140 and 1981 c 299 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Prior to questioning a juvenile in custody, a juvenile must be
advised of his or her rights in substantially the following language:
(a) That the juvenile has a right to remain silent;
(b) That any statement the juvenile makes can be and may be used
against the juvenile;
(c) That the juvenile has a right to consult with an attorney; and
(d) That the juvenile has a right to consult with his or her
parent, guardian, or custodian prior to questioning.
(2) A juvenile shall be advised of his or her rights when appearing
before the court.
(((2))) (3) A juvenile and his or her parent, guardian, or
custodian shall be advised by the court or its representative that the
juvenile has a right to be represented by counsel at all critical
stages of the proceedings. ((Unless waived,)) Counsel shall be
provided to a juvenile who is financially unable to obtain counsel
without causing substantial hardship to himself or herself or the
juvenile's family, in any proceeding where the juvenile may be subject
to transfer for criminal prosecution, or in any proceeding where the
juvenile may be in danger of confinement. The ability to pay part of
the cost of counsel does not preclude assignment. In no case may a
juvenile be deprived of counsel because of a parent, guardian, or
custodian refusing to pay therefor. The juvenile shall be fully
advised of his or her right to an attorney and of the relevant services
an attorney can provide.
(((3))) (4) In any court proceeding pursuant to this chapter in
which a child has a right to the assistance of counsel under
constitutional, statutory, or common law, or by court rule, the child
may not waive this right except as provided in this subsection.
(a) A parent, guardian, or custodian of a child may not waive the
child's right to the assistance of counsel.
(b) In any court proceeding pursuant to this chapter in which a
child has a right to the assistance of counsel under constitutional,
statutory, or common law, or by court rule, and the child indicates a
desire to waive that right, the court may not accept the waiver unless:
(i) The child is in the presence of counsel and has consulted with
counsel; and
(ii) The court determines that the waiver is knowing and voluntary.
(c) The court shall find that the waiver was knowing and voluntary
only if, after appropriate questioning in open court and on the record,
it finds that the child fully comprehends:
(i) The nature of the allegations and the proceedings, and the
range of allowable dispositions;
(ii) That counsel would be of valuable assistance in determining
and presenting any defenses to the allegations in the petition or
charge, or other mitigating circumstances;
(iii) That the right to the assistance of counsel includes the
right to the prompt assignment of an attorney, without charge to the
child or the child's parents if they are financially unable to obtain
private counsel;
(iv) That even if the child intends not to contest the petition or
charge, counsel may be of substantial assistance in developing and
presenting material that could favorably affect the disposition;
(v) That among the child's rights at any hearing are the right to
call witnesses on the child's behalf, the right to confront and cross-examine witnesses, the right to obtain witnesses by compulsory process,
and the right to require proof of the elements of the charge or status
offense.
(d) In making its judgment, the court should consider evidence of
the child's school performance and any testing which the school may
have conducted.
(e)(i) Unless the court dismisses the case, if a child appears
without counsel for any hearing, including a waiver hearing, and the
child has not previously waived the right to the assistance of counsel
in accordance with this subsection, the court shall continue and the
clerk shall reschedule the hearing, and the clerk shall issue a notice
of the date, time, and location of the hearing at least ten days prior
to the date of the hearing.
(ii) The continuance of a hearing may not be a basis for detaining
the child.
(5) The right to counsel includes the right to the appointment of
experts necessary, and the experts shall be required pursuant to the
procedures and requirements established by the supreme court.
(((4))) (6) Upon application of a party, the clerk of the court
shall issue, and the court on its own motion may issue, subpoenas
requiring attendance and testimony of witnesses and production of
records, documents, or other tangible objects at any hearing, or such
subpoenas may be issued by an attorney of record.
(((5))) (7) All proceedings shall be transcribed verbatim by means
which will provide an accurate record.
(((6))) (8) The general public and press shall be permitted to
attend any hearing unless the court, for good cause, orders a
particular hearing to be closed. The presumption shall be that all
such hearings will be open.
(((7))) (9) In all adjudicatory proceedings before the court, all
parties shall have the right to adequate notice, discovery as provided
in criminal cases, opportunity to be heard, confrontation of witnesses
except in such cases as this chapter expressly permits the use of
hearsay testimony, findings based solely upon the evidence adduced at
the hearing, and an unbiased fact-finder.
(((8))) (10) A juvenile shall be accorded the same privilege
against self-incrimination as an adult. An extrajudicial statement
which would be constitutionally inadmissible in a criminal proceeding
may not be received in evidence at an adjudicatory hearing over
objection. Evidence illegally seized or obtained may not be received
in evidence over objection at an adjudicatory hearing to prove the
allegations against the juvenile if the evidence would be inadmissible
in an adult criminal proceeding. An extrajudicial admission or
confession made by the juvenile out of court is insufficient to support
a finding that the juvenile committed the acts alleged in the
information unless evidence of a corpus delicti is first independently
established in the same manner as required in an adult criminal
proceeding.
(((9))) (11) Waiver of any right which a juvenile has under this
chapter must be an express waiver intelligently made by the juvenile
after the juvenile has been fully informed of the right being waived.
(((10))) (12) Whenever this chapter refers to waiver or objection
by a juvenile, the word juvenile shall be construed to refer to a
juvenile who is at least twelve years of age. If a juvenile is under
twelve years of age, the juvenile's parent, guardian, or custodian
shall give any waiver or offer any objection contemplated by this
chapter.

--- END ---