BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.38.080 and 1998 c 176 s 60 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is exempted from the tax imposed by this chapter, the use
of fuel for:
(a) Street and highway construction and maintenance purposes in
motor vehicles owned and operated by the state of Washington, or any
county or municipality;
(b) Publicly owned fire fighting equipment;
(c) Special mobile equipment as defined in RCW 46.04.552;
(d) Power pumping units or other power take-off equipment of any
motor vehicle which is accurately measured by metering devices that
have been specifically approved by the department or which is
established by any of the following formulae:
(i) Pumping propane, or fuel or heating oils or milk picked up from
a farm or dairy farm storage tank by a power take-off unit on a
delivery truck, at a rate determined by the department: PROVIDED, That
claimant when presenting his or her claim to the department in
accordance with this chapter, shall provide to the claim, invoices of
propane, or fuel or heating oil delivered, or such other appropriate
information as may be required by the department to substantiate his or
her claim;
(ii) Operating a power take-off unit on a cement mixer truck or a
load compactor on a garbage truck at the rate of twenty-five percent of
the total gallons of fuel used in such a truck; or
(iii) The department is authorized to establish by rule additional
formulae for determining fuel usage when operating other types of
equipment by means of power take-off units when direct measurement of
the fuel used is not feasible. The department is also authorized to
adopt rules regarding the usage of on board computers for the
production of records required by this chapter;
(e) Motor vehicles owned and operated by the United States
government;
(f) Heating purposes;
(g) Moving a motor vehicle on a public highway between two pieces
of private property when said moving is incidental to the primary use
of the motor vehicle;
(h) Transportation services for persons with special transportation
needs by a private, nonprofit transportation provider regulated under
chapter 81.66 RCW;
(i) Vehicle refrigeration units, mixing units, or other equipment
powered by separate motors from separate fuel tanks; and
(j) The operation of a motor vehicle as a part of or incidental to
logging operations upon a highway under federal jurisdiction within the
boundaries of a federal area if the federal government requires a fee
for the privilege of operating the motor vehicle upon the highway, the
proceeds of which are reserved for constructing or maintaining roads in
the federal area, or requires maintenance or construction work to be
performed on the highway for the privilege of operating the motor
vehicle on the highway.
(2) There is exempted from the tax imposed by this chapter the
removal or entry of special fuel under the following circumstances and
conditions:
(a) If it is the removal from a terminal or refinery of, or the
entry or sale of, a special fuel if all of the following apply:
(i) The person otherwise liable for the tax is a licensee other
than a dyed special fuel user or international fuel tax agreement
licensee;
(ii) For a removal from a terminal, the terminal is a licensed
terminal; and
(iii) The special fuel satisfies the dyeing and marking
requirements of this chapter;
(b) If it is an entry or removal from a terminal or refinery of
taxable special fuel transferred to a refinery or terminal and the
persons involved, including the terminal operator, are licensed; and
(c)(i) If it is a special fuel that, under contract of sale, is
shipped to a point outside this state by a supplier by means of any of
the following:
(A) Facilities operated by the supplier;
(B) Delivery by the supplier to a carrier, customs broker, or
forwarding agent, whether hired by the purchaser or not, for shipment
to the out-of-state point;
(C) Delivery by the supplier to a vessel clearing from port of this
state for a port outside this state and actually exported from this
state in the vessel.
(ii) For purposes of this subsection (2)(c):
(A) "Carrier" means a person or firm engaged in the business of
transporting for compensation property owned by other persons, and
includes both common and contract carriers; and
(B) "Forwarding agent" means a person or firm engaged in the
business of preparing property for shipment or arranging for its
shipment.
(3) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, every
urban passenger transportation system and carriers as defined by
chapters 81.68 and 81.70 RCW shall be exempt from the provisions of
this chapter requiring the payment of special fuel taxes. For the
purposes of this section "urban passenger transportation system" means
every transportation system, publicly or privately owned, having as its
principal source of revenue the income from transporting persons for
compensation by means of motor vehicles and/or trackless trolleys, each
having a seating capacity for over fifteen persons over prescribed
routes in such a manner that the routes of such motor vehicles and/or
trackless trolleys, either alone or in conjunction with routes of other
such motor vehicles and/or trackless trolleys subject to routing by the
same transportation system, shall not extend for a distance exceeding
twenty-five road miles beyond the corporate limits of the county in
which the original starting points of such motor vehicles are located:
PROVIDED, That no refunds or credits shall be granted on special fuel
used by any urban transportation vehicle or vehicle operated pursuant
to chapters 81.68 and 81.70 RCW on any trip where any portion of said
trip is more than twenty-five road miles beyond the corporate limits of
the county in which said trip originated.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, every
student transportation program, whether operated by a school district
or a commercial chartered bus service, is exempt from the provisions of
this chapter requiring the payment of special fuel taxes on the
biodiesel fuel portion of a biodiesel blend, on natural gas, and on
liquefied petroleum gas.
(b) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Biodiesel fuel" means a mono alkyl ester of long chain fatty
acids derived from vegetable oils or animal fats for use in
compression-ignition engines and that meets the requirements of the
American society of testing and materials specification D 6751 in
effect as of January 1, 2003.
(ii) "Biodiesel blend" means fuel that contains at least twenty
percent biodiesel fuel by volume.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of new
alternative fuel vehicles to be used primarily in a student
transportation program, whether operated by a school district or a
commercial chartered bus service.
(2) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
tangible personal property, or for labor and services rendered in
respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the
property, including repair and replacement parts, if:
(a) The property is used to convert vehicles for the purpose of
operating on alternative fuels;
(b) The conversion is performed on a vehicle or engine for which a
United States environmental protection agency certificate of conformity
or a certification from the California air resources board has been
issued for the model year and exhaust and evaporative emissions test
groups of the vehicle or engine; and
(c) The vehicles are used primarily in a student transportation
program, whether operated by a school district or a commercial
chartered bus service.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Alternative fuel" means natural gas (compressed or liquid) or
liquefied petroleum gas (commonly called propane).
(b) "New alternative fuel vehicle" means a new motor vehicle, as
defined in RCW 46.96.020, originally designed and equipped by the
manufacturer to operate exclusively on an alternative fuel.
(c) "Primarily" means at least fifty percent of total use.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of new alternative fuel vehicles to be used primarily in a student
transportation program, whether operated by a school district or a
commercial chartered bus service.
(2) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of tangible personal property, or of labor and services rendered in
respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the
property, if:
(a) The property is used to convert vehicles for the purpose of
operating on alternative fuels;
(b) The conversion is performed on a vehicle or engine for which a
United States environmental protection agency certificate of conformity
or a certification from the California air resources board has been
issued for the model year and exhaust and evaporative emissions test
groups of the vehicle or engine; and
(c) The vehicles are used primarily in a student transportation
program, whether operated by a school district or a commercial
chartered bus service.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the definitions in section 2
of this act apply.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
emissions control equipment, or for labor and services rendered in
respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the
equipment, including repair and replacement parts, if the equipment is
used to retrofit diesel vehicles that are used primarily in a student
transportation program, whether operated by a school district or a
commercial chartered bus service.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Emissions control equipment" means a device with an oxidation
catalyst, particulate filter, crankcase ventilation filter, or other
means of reducing emissions from diesel vehicles, and that has been
verified under the federal environmental protection agency's voluntary
diesel retrofit program.
(b) "Primarily" has the same meaning as provided in section 2 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of emissions control equipment, or of labor and services rendered
in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving
the equipment, if the equipment is used to retrofit vehicles that are
used primarily in a student transportation program, whether operated by
a school district or a commercial chartered bus service.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the definitions in section 4
of this act apply.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) This act expires the earlier of July 1,
2015, or July 1st of the year following the year in which the
department of licensing estimates that the aggregate volume of
alternative fuels sold at retail for vehicular purposes represents
twenty percent of the aggregate volume of all fuels sold at retail for
vehicular purposes.
(2) In order to calculate the percentage of alternative fuel sales
in subsection (1) of this section, the department of licensing may use
as a proxy the estimated portion of the tax base of the special fuels
tax under chapter 82.38 RCW relating to fuels other than diesel fuel.
If exact volumes are unknown, the department may use reasonable methods
to derive estimates of volumes. To make the calculation, the
department shall convert fuel volumes to gasoline-equivalent gallons,
using the method utilized by the United States department of energy in
reporting such comparisons as of January 1, 2005.
(3) The department of licensing is authorized to promulgate rules
necessary to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---