BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
tangible personal property that is used in the construction of a
manufacturing facility or sales of or charges made for labor and
services rendered with respect to the construction of a manufacturing
facility, if the facility is used primarily to manufacture an
alternative fuel.
(2) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of fuel
storage tanks, delivery vehicles, or associated facilities or to sales
of or charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to
installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the storage
tanks, delivery vehicles, and associated facilities, including repair
parts and replacement parts, necessary for fuel storage or distribution
if the fuel distributed by the vehicles is liquefied natural gas
produced from renewable, waste, or stranded sources of methane gas.
(3) A person taking an exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "alternative fuel" has the
same meaning as provided in section 6(1)(a) of this act.
(5)(a) This section expires July 1, 2015 or July 1 of the year
following the year in which the department of licensing estimates that
the aggregate volume of alternative fuels sold at retail for vehicular
purposes represents twenty percent of the aggregate volume of all fuels
sold at retail for vehicular purposes.
(b) In order to calculate the percentage of alternative fuel sales
in (a) of this subsection, the department of licensing may use as a
proxy the estimated portion of the tax base of the special fuels tax
under chapter 82.38 RCW relating to fuels other than diesel fuel. If
exact volumes are unknown, the department may use reasonable methods to
derive estimates of volumes. To make the calculation, the department
shall convert fuel volumes to gasoline-equivalent gallons, using the
method utilized by the United States department of energy in reporting
such comparisons as of January 1, 2005.
(c) The department of licensing is authorized to promulgate rules
necessary to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to the use of
tangible personal property that is incorporated in the construction of
a manufacturing facility or the use of labor and services rendered with
respect to the construction of a manufacturing facility, if the
facility is used primarily to manufacture an alternative fuel.
(2) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to the use of fuel
storage tanks, delivery vehicles, or associated facilities or to sales
of or charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to
installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the storage
tanks, delivery vehicles, and associated facilities, including repair
parts and replacement parts, necessary for fuel storage or distribution
if the fuel distributed by the vehicles is liquefied natural gas
produced from renewable, waste, or stranded sources of methane gas.
(3) A person taking an exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "alternative fuel" has the
same meaning as provided in section 6(1)(a) of this act.
(5)(a) This section expires July 1, 2015 or July 1 of the year
following the year in which the department of licensing estimates that
the aggregate volume of alternative fuels sold at retail for vehicular
purposes represents twenty percent of the aggregate volume of all fuels
sold at retail for vehicular purposes.
(b) In order to calculate the percentage of alternative fuel sales
in (a) of this subsection, the department of licensing may use as a
proxy the estimated portion of the tax base of the special fuels tax
under chapter 82.38 RCW relating to fuels other than diesel fuel. If
exact volumes are unknown, the department may use reasonable methods to
derive estimates of volumes. To make the calculation, the department
shall convert fuel volumes to gasoline-equivalent gallons, using the
method utilized by the United States department of energy in reporting
such comparisons as of January 1, 2005.
(c) The department of licensing is authorized to promulgate rules
necessary to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) All buildings, machinery, equipment, and other personal
property which is used primarily for the manufacture of an alternative
fuel, the land upon which this property is located, and land that is
reasonably necessary in the manufacture of the alternative fuel, which
together comprise a new manufacturing facility or an addition to an
existing manufacturing facility, are exempt from property taxes payable
for the six years beginning with taxes payable the following year from
the date the facility or the addition to the existing facility becomes
operational.
(b) For manufacturing facilities which manufacture products in
addition to an alternative fuel, the amount of the property tax
exemption shall be based upon the annual percentage of the total value
of all products manufactured that is the value of the alternative fuel
manufactured.
(2) Claims for exemptions authorized by this section shall be filed
with the county assessor on forms prescribed by the department of
revenue and furnished by the assessor. Once filed, the exemption is
valid for six years and shall not be renewed. The assessor shall
verify and approve claims as the assessor determines to be justified
and in accordance with this section. No claims may be approved after
December 31, 2009.
(3) The department of revenue may promulgate rules, pursuant to
chapter 34.05 RCW, as necessary to properly administer this section.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "alternative fuel" has the
same meaning as provided in section 6(1)(a) of this act.
(5)(a) This section expires January 1, 2016 or January 1 of the
year following the year in which the department of licensing estimates
that the aggregate volume of alternative fuels sold at retail for
vehicular purposes represents twenty percent of the aggregate volume of
all fuels sold at retail for vehicular purposes.
(b) In order to calculate the percentage of alternative fuel sales
in (a) of this subsection, the department of licensing may use as a
proxy the estimated portion of the tax base of the special fuels tax
under chapter 82.38 RCW relating to fuels other than diesel fuel. If
exact volumes are unknown, the department may use reasonable methods to
derive estimates of volumes. To make the calculation, the department
shall convert fuel volumes to gasoline-equivalent gallons, using the
method utilized by the United States department of energy in reporting
such comparisons as of January 1, 2005.
(c) The department of licensing is authorized to promulgate rules
necessary to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.29A RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) All leasehold interests in buildings, machinery, equipment,
and other personal property which is used primarily for the manufacture
of an alternative fuel, the land upon which this property is located,
and land that is reasonably necessary in the manufacture of the
alternative fuel, which together comprise a new manufacturing facility
or an addition to an existing manufacturing facility, are exempt from
leasehold taxes for a period of six years from the date on which the
facility or the addition to the existing facility becomes operational.
(b) For manufacturing facilities which manufacture products in
addition to an alternative fuel, the amount of the leasehold tax
exemption shall be based upon the annual percentage of the total value
of all products manufactured that is the value of the alternative fuel
manufactured.
(2) Claims for exemptions authorized by this section shall be filed
with the department of revenue on forms prescribed by the department of
revenue and furnished by the department of revenue. Once filed, the
exemption is valid for six years and shall not be renewed. The
department of revenue shall verify and approve claims as the department
of revenue determines to be justified and in accordance with this
section. No claims may be approved after December 31, 2009.
(3) The department may promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter 34.05
RCW, as necessary to properly administer this section.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "alternative fuel" has the
same meaning as provided in section 6(1)(a) of this act.
(5)(a) This section expires July 1, 2015 or July 1 of the year
following the year in which the department of licensing estimates that
the aggregate volume of alternative fuels sold at retail for vehicular
purposes represents twenty percent of the aggregate volume of all fuels
sold at retail for vehicular purposes.
(b) In order to calculate the percentage of alternative fuel sales
in (a) of this subsection, the department of licensing may use as a
proxy the estimated portion of the tax base of the special fuels tax
under chapter 82.38 RCW relating to fuels other than diesel fuel. If
exact volumes are unknown, the department may use reasonable methods to
derive estimates of volumes. To make the calculation, the department
shall convert fuel volumes to gasoline-equivalent gallons, using the
method utilized by the United States department of energy in reporting
such comparisons as of January 1, 2005.
(c) The department of licensing is authorized to promulgate rules
necessary to implement this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.04.260 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 4 and 2003 2nd
sp.s. c 1 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing:
(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into
soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola byproducts,
or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola byproduct
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;
(b) Seafood products which remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw
salted state at the completion of the manufacturing by that person; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the value of the products manufactured, multiplied by the
rate of 0.138 percent;
(c) By canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating
fresh fruits and vegetables, or selling at wholesale fresh fruits and
vegetables canned, preserved, frozen, processed, or dehydrated by the
seller and sold to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of
business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
products canned, preserved, frozen, processed, or dehydrated multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent. As proof of sale to a person who
transports in the ordinary course of business goods out of this state,
the seller shall annually provide a statement in a form prescribed by
the department and retain the statement as a business record;
(d) Dairy products that as of September 20, 2001, are identified in
21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135, including byproducts
from the manufacturing of the dairy products such as whey and casein;
or selling the same to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course
of business the goods out of state; as to such persons the tax imposed
shall be equal to the value of the products manufactured multiplied by
the rate of 0.138 percent. As proof of sale to a person who transports
in the ordinary course of business goods out of this state, the seller
shall annually provide a statement in a form prescribed by the
department and retain the statement as a business record;
(e) ((Alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock, as
those terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to the business shall be equal to the value
of alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock manufactured,
multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. This subsection (1)(e)
expires July 1, 2009; and
(f) Alcohol fuel or wood biomass fuel, as those terms are defined
in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to
the business shall be equal to the value of alcohol fuel or wood
biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent))
Alternative fuel; as to such persons the amount of tax imposed shall be
equal to the value of the products manufactured multiplied by the rate
of 0.138 percent. This subsection (1)(e) expires July 1, 2015; and
(f) Natural gas liquefaction equipment, including equipment to
produce compressed natural gas formed by pressurizing and vaporizing
liquefied natural gas; as to such persons the amount of tax imposed
shall be equal to the value of the products manufactured multiplied by
the rate of 0.138 percent. This subsection (1)(f) expires July 1,
2015.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
peas split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association
engaging within this state in research and development, as to such
corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such
activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products
and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such
persons the tax imposed shall be equal to the gross proceeds derived
from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales, at retail or wholesale, of nuclear fuel assemblies
manufactured by that person, as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales
of the assemblies multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing nuclear fuel assemblies, as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
products manufactured multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to such activities shall be equal to the
gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of
0.275 percent.
(8) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an
international steamship agent, international customs house broker,
international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in
foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international
activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(9) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of
goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied
by the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to taxation under this
subsection shall be exempt from payment of taxes imposed by chapter
82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under
this subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to
the conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or
foreign commerce are defined as all activities of a labor, service or
transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or
from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or
similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or similar holding
or storage yard or area to await further movement in import or export
or may move to a consolidation freight station and be stuffed,
unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or
aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for
delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this
definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of
cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a
convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation
services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care,
custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo;
imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal
stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited
to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers,
trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship
hatch covers.
(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to
such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the gross income of the business, excluding any fees
imposed under chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3
percent.
If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities
both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to
this state shall be determined in accordance with the methods of
apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.
(11) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance
agent, insurance broker, or insurance solicitor licensed under chapter
48.17 RCW; as to such persons, the amount of the tax with respect to
such licensed activities shall be equal to the gross income of such
business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(12) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a
hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a
nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political
subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to
such activities shall be equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and 1.5
percent thereafter. The moneys collected under this subsection shall
be deposited in the health services account created under RCW
43.72.900.
(13)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging
within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial
airplanes, or components of such airplanes, as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business shall, in the case of
manufacturers, be equal to the value of the product manufactured, or in
the case of processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the
business, multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through the later of June
30, 2007, or the day preceding the date final assembly of a
superefficient airplane begins in Washington state, as determined under
RCW 82.32.550; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning on the later of July 1, 2007, or the
date final assembly of a superefficient airplane begins in Washington
state, as determined under RCW 82.32.550.
(b) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging within
this state in the business of making sales, at retail or wholesale, of
commercial airplanes, or components of such airplanes, manufactured by
that person, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the airplanes
or components multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through the later of June
30, 2007, or the day preceding the date final assembly of a
superefficient airplane begins in Washington state, as determined under
RCW 82.32.550; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning on the later of July 1, 2007, or the
date final assembly of a superefficient airplane begins in Washington
state, as determined under RCW 82.32.550.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (13), "commercial
airplane," "component," and "final assembly of a superefficient
airplane" have the meanings given in RCW 82.32.550.
(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person eligible for the tax rate under this subsection (13) must report
as required under RCW 82.32.545.
(e) This subsection (13) does not apply after the earlier of: July
1, 2024; or December 31, 2007, if assembly of a superefficient airplane
does not begin by December 31, 2007, as determined under RCW 82.32.550.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW,
to be codified between RCW 82.04.010 and 82.04.220, to read as follows:
(1)(a) Alternative fuel means:
(i) Alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, biodiesel feedstock, or wood
biomass fuel, as those terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135; or
(ii)(A) Liquefied natural gas, if the gas is manufactured from
renewable, waste, or stranded sources of methane gas;
(B) Compressed natural gas, if the gas is derived from liquefied
natural gas that is manufactured from renewable, waste, or stranded
sources of methane gas; or
(C) Methane, if the methane is: (I) Obtained from the anaerobic
digestion of material, including but not limited to, agricultural waste
or sewage; and (II) subsequently used to manufacture liquefied natural
gas.
(b) "Anaerobic digestion" means a biological process that enables
organic matter to be broken down by bacteria in the absence of air to
produce a gas principally composed of methane.
(2)(a) Subsection (1)(a)(i) of this section expires July 1, 2009.
(b) This section expires July 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Section 3 of this act applies to taxes
levied for collection in 2006 and thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---