BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.63 RCW
to read as follows:
Whenever any person is served with a notice of infraction or
citation, whether traffic or civil, by electronic means or by mail, the
signature provisions of RCW 46.61.021, 46.63.060, 46.64.025, 7.80.070,
7.80.160, 7.84.050, 18.27.240, 18.106.190, 20.01.482, 43.63B.140, and
81.112.230 shall not apply.

--- END ---