BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 52.02.020 and 2003 c 309 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Fire protection districts for the provision of fire prevention
services, fire suppression services, emergency medical services, and
for the protection of life and property in areas outside of cities and
towns, except where the cities and towns have been annexed into a fire
protection district or where the district is continuing service
pursuant to RCW 35.02.202, are authorized to be established as provided
in this title.
(2) In addition to other services authorized under this section,
fire protection districts that share a common border with Canada and
are surrounded on three sides by water or are bounded on the north by
Bremerton, on the west by Mason county, on the south by Pierce county,
and on the east by the Puget Sound, may also establish or participate
in the provision of health clinic services.

--- END ---