BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that a significant
cause of lead poisoning in children may be the ingestion of lead
particles from deteriorating lead-based paint in older, poorly
maintained residences or from lead particles in the soil. The
legislature finds that the health and development of these children
could be endangered by chipping or peeling lead-based paint, excessive
amounts of lead-contaminated dust in poorly maintained homes, and lead
in soil of the residential property where they play. The legislature
therefore finds that it is in the public interest to assess the risks
to children's health caused by exposure to lead in paint and educate
residential property owners about the potential dangers to children
from exposure to lead in paint.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.103 RCW
to read as follows:
The department and the department of health shall jointly assess
housing stock in Washington state to identify areas of potentially high
risk for child lead exposure. In assessing the housing stock, the
department and the department of health may use existing data and
targeted testing for child lead exposure. Testing of buildings and
land for the purpose of identifying the presence of lead shall be
limited to areas inside a residential dwelling, as well as yard areas
immediately surrounding the dwelling where children play. Commercial
and industrial buildings and properties shall not be tested through the
housing stock assessment program. The department and the department of
health shall report their findings to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 31, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.103 RCW
to read as follows:
The department, in conjunction with the department of health and
the department of ecology, shall establish a lead paint hazard
education and awareness strategy to notify owners of affected
residential properties and tenants about the risks of exposure from
lead paint.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2005, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---