BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79.91.100 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 21 s 57 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Counties, cities, towns, and other municipalities shall have
the right to construct bridges and trestles across waterways heretofore
or hereafter laid out under the authority of the state of Washington,
and over and across any ((tide or shore lands and harbor areas of))
tidelands, shorelands, bedlands, or harbor areas owned and managed by
the state adjacent thereto over which the projected line or lines of
highway will run, if such bridges or trestles are constructed in good
faith for the purpose of being made a part of the constructed line of
such a highway, ((upon payment for any such right of way and)) upon
payment for any natural resource damages to those aquatic lands
affected not already covered by an approved state or federal regulatory
mitigation plan. Such a right shall be granted by easement and no
charge may be made to the county, city, town, or other municipality,
for such an easement. The department may recover only its reasonable
direct administrative costs incurred in processing and approving the
request or application, and reviewing plans for construction of the
bridge or trestle.
(2) For purposes of this section, "direct administrative costs"
means the cost of hours worked directly on an application or request,
based on salaries and benefits, plus travel reimbursement and other
actual out-of-pocket costs. Direct administrative costs recovered by
the department must be deposited into the resource management cost
account.
(3) By December 1, 2008, the department must deliver a report to
the legislature regarding the collection of administrative fees as
described in this section.

--- END ---