BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that freight rail
service is an essential part of Washington state's participation in the
world marketplace. The legislature further finds that by earmarking
freight rail funds through state fiscal year 2012-2013, it limits its
ability to effectively compete in the worldwide marketplace. The
legislature further finds that such an inability to compete decreases
its ability to retain or secure economic development opportunities that
wholly, or in part, depend on establishing, maintaining, or
rehabilitating short line freight rail service. The legislature
further finds that short line freight rail service has been a deciding
factor in economic development opportunities, particularly the
construction of a $110 million glass manufacturing plant near Winlock,
Washington. A total state expenditure of $800,000 for a short line
freight rail spur line will help create an estimated 210 family-wage
jobs in Washington state, with an average salary of $45,300 per year,
and help create a local payroll of $9.5 million per year to help
energize Washington's economy. Therefore, the legislature finds that
it would be well served by establishing a short line rail
revitalization program within the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
It is the intent of the legislature to establish a short line rail
revitalization program within the community economic revitalization
board within the department of community, trade, and economic
development to allow political subdivisions to be approved for a sales
and use tax credit for short line rail projects that are reasonably
expected to provide a direct economic benefit in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.160 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board shall develop a short line rail revitalization
program, through which the board shall consider applications from
political subdivisions of the state for the purpose of:
(a) Acquiring, building, rebuilding, rehabilitating, or improving
rail lines;
(b) Purchasing or rehabilitating railroad equipment necessary to
maintain essential rail service;
(c) Constructing railroad improvements to mitigate port access or
mainline congestion; or
(d) Construction of loading facilities to increase business on
light density lines or to mitigate the impacts of abandonment.
(2) In consultation with the Washington state department of
transportation freight rail program, the board shall develop criteria
for approving and prioritizing applications. The board may approve
applications only where a direct economic benefit is reasonably
expected in this state as a direct or indirect result of the rail
improvement.
(3) The board shall consider, process, and either approve or reject
an application within sixty days of submission.
(4) In consultation with the Washington state department of
transportation freight rail program, the board shall develop, publish,
and make available to short line rail stakeholders, and the public,
materials describing the short line rail revitalization program and its
application process. Short line rail stakeholders must include, but
not be limited to, owners and operators of all short line railroads in
this state.
(5) A political subdivision of the state whose short line rail
revitalization application has been approved qualifies for a state
sales and use tax credit of 0.033 percent, in a maximum project amount
to be determined by the board. The tax credit expires when the
political subdivision has been fully reimbursed for actual costs
associated with the approved short line rail project. The cumulative
impact on the state general fund from approved state sales and use tax
credits issued under the short line rail revitalization program may not
exceed twenty-five million dollars per state fiscal year.
(6) Political subdivisions of the state may submit applications to
the short line rail revitalization program on behalf of a privately
owned short line railroad.
(7) In consultation with the Washington state department of
transportation freight rail program, the board shall report to the
legislature on a biennial basis on the short line rail revitalization
program. The report must give a detailed account of approved and
rejected projects under the program, their cumulative impact on the
state's general fund, a cost-benefit analysis of projects to the state
including highway maintenance and improvement savings, and a summary of
the economic benefits realized through the program.

--- END ---