BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there is credible
evidence that certain well-implemented prevention and intervention
programs can achieve significantly more benefits than costs. As
research continues to develop, the array of proven prevention and
intervention programs continues to expand. By keeping abreast of the
latest research and investing in proven prevention and intervention
programs, the state can ensure the best possible return on the
investment of the state's resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice for which there is
consistent scientific evidence showing that the interventions improve
client outcomes.
(2) "Research-based" means a program or practice that has some
research demonstrating effectiveness, but that does not yet meet the
standard of evidence-based.
(3) "Theory-based" means a program or practice that has general
support among treatment providers and experts, based on experience or
professional literature, may have anecdotal or case-study support, and
has potential for becoming a research-based program or practice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The prevention and intervention investment
council is hereby created to direct and support the following:
(1) The investment of state resources in evidence-based prevention
and intervention programs in the state; and
(2) Ongoing research and evaluation of sound, theory-based and
research-based prevention and intervention programs with the goal of
expanding the number and type of available evidence-based programs.
In conducting its work, the council shall consult a broad range of
available research, including research conducted by the Washington
state institute for public policy on prevention and early intervention
programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The prevention and intervention
investment council shall develop and maintain a defined menu of
evidence-based prevention and intervention programs that have been
demonstrated to achieve significantly more benefits than costs with
respect to the two following outcomes: Reduction in child abuse; and
reduction in child neglect.
(2) The council shall also develop guidelines for implementation of
the identified programs, which shall address quality control, adherence
to program design, monitoring, and evaluation.
(3) By July 1, 2006, the council shall identify additional outcomes
for which it shall develop and maintain defined menus of evidence-based
prevention and intervention programs that have been demonstrated to
achieve significantly more benefits than costs with respect to those
outcomes.
(4) The council shall encourage public and private efforts to
support training of state staff and service providers and to expand
capacity for the provision of theory-based, research-based, and
evidence-based prevention and intervention services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The prevention and intervention
investment council shall consist of ten members as follows:
(a) The secretary of the department of social and health services,
the secretary of the department of health, and the director of the
office of financial management;
(b) Three individuals appointed by the governor, two of whom shall
be researchers; and
(c) Two members of the house of representatives appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives, one of whom shall be a member
of the majority caucus and one of whom shall be a member of the
minority caucus, and two members of the senate appointed by the
president of the senate, one of whom shall be a member of the majority
caucus and one of whom shall be a member of the minority caucus.
(2) Members of the council shall be compensated in accordance with
RCW 43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided
in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(3) The council shall employ an executive director who is exempt
from the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW. The council may fix the
compensation of the executive director. The executive director may
employ such other staff as are necessary to carry out the purposes of
this chapter.
(4) The council shall create a prevention and intervention
investment work group to provide technical support to the prevention
and intervention investment council.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Twenty percent of state spending for
alternate response systems, family preservation services, and early
intervention public health nurse services shall be spent on evidence-based prevention and intervention programs identified by the prevention
and intervention investment council pursuant to section 4(1) of this
act. This funding shall be limited to spending for services to
families involved with the child welfare system. With the approval of
the council, the department of social and health services may spend up
to ten percent of the amount provided in this section to meet costs of
staffing, training, and information system changes necessary to
implement this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Existing state entities that support
prevention and intervention programs, including but not limited to the
Washington council for the prevention of child abuse and neglect, the
family policy council, and the governor's juvenile justice advisory
committee, shall focus on funding sound, theory-based and research-based prevention and intervention programs with the goal of expanding
the number and type of available evidence-based programs. These state
entities shall coordinate their activities with the activities of the
prevention and intervention investment council.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---