BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The song, music, and lyrics, "Thanks to Them," composed by Jerry
Hayes, is hereby designated as the official veterans' song of the state
of Washington.

--- END ---