BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An eligible person shall receive a sales tax exemption from the
state sales tax in the form of a remittance in accordance with the
terms of this section.
(2) A claim for exemption under this section shall be made and
filed at any time during the year upon forms prescribed and furnished
by the department. The exemption under this section shall not be
granted more than once every twelve months. An applicant must file
every year to receive the exemption. If the department finds that the
applicant meets the requirements of this section the department shall
issue a check or warrant payable to the eligible person. The
department must determine eligibility under this section within four
weeks from the time an applicant files a claim for exemption under this
section. The remittance shall equal four hundred fifty dollars. If
the department finds that the applicant does not meet the requirements
of this section, the exemption shall be denied, but is subject to
appeal as follows:
(a) The person must first petition for a conference with the
department as provided in RCW 82.32.160.
(b) If the person receives a denial of a petition or unfavorable
notice of determination under (a) of this subsection, the person may
appeal to the board of tax appeals as provided under RCW 82.03.190.
(3) The department may adopt any rules necessary to properly
administer this section.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "eligible person" means a
resident of this state who has a combined disposable income, as defined
in RCW 84.36.383, that is less than one hundred fifty percent of the
federal poverty level as adjusted for household size and determined
annually by the federal department of health and human services.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.03.190 and 1998 c 54 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person having received notice of a denial of a petition or a
notice of determination made under RCW 82.32.160, 82.32.170, 82.34.110,
((or)) 82.49.060, or section 1 of this act may appeal by filing in
accordance with RCW 1.12.070 a notice of appeal with the board of tax
appeals within thirty days after the mailing of the notice of such
denial or determination. In the notice of appeal the taxpayer shall
set forth the amount of the tax which the taxpayer contends should be
reduced or refunded and the reasons for such reduction or refund, in
accordance with rules of practice and procedure prescribed by the
board. However, if the notice of appeal relates to an application made
to the department under chapter 82.34 RCW, the taxpayer shall set forth
the amount to which the taxpayer claims the credit or exemption should
apply, and the grounds for such contention, in accordance with rules of
practice and procedure prescribed by the board. The board shall
transmit a copy of the notice of appeal to the department and all other
named parties within thirty days of its receipt by the board. If the
taxpayer intends that the hearing before the board be held pursuant to
the administrative procedure act (chapter 34.05 RCW), the notice of
appeal shall also so state. In the event that the notice of appeal
does not so state, the department may, within thirty days from the date
of its receipt of the notice of appeal, file with the board notice of
its intention that the hearing be held pursuant to the administrative
procedure act.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.32.160 and 1989 c 378 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person having been issued a notice of additional taxes,
delinquent taxes, interest, or penalties assessed by the department,
may within thirty days after the issuance of the original notice of the
amount thereof or within the period covered by any extension of the due
date thereof granted by the department petition the department in
writing for a correction of the amount of the assessment, and a
conference for examination and review of the assessment. The petition
shall set forth the reasons why the correction should be granted and
the amount of the tax, interest, or penalties, which the petitioner
believes to be due. The department shall promptly consider the
petition and may grant or deny it. If denied, the petitioner shall be
notified by mail thereof forthwith. If a conference is granted, the
department shall fix the time and place therefor and notify the
petitioner thereof by mail. After the conference the department may
make such determination as may appear to it to be just and lawful and
shall mail a copy of its determination to the petitioner. If no such
petition is filed within the thirty-day period the assessment covered
by the notice shall become final.
(2) The procedures provided for ((herein)) in subsection (1) of
this section shall apply also to:
(a) A notice denying, in whole or in part, an application for a
pollution control tax exemption and credit certificate, with such
modifications to such procedures established by departmental rules and
regulations as may be necessary to accommodate a claim for exemption or
credit;
(b) A determination that an applicant is not eligible for the
remittance under section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect January 1, 2006.

--- END ---