BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Patients are not at optimum levels of safety while being
lifted, transferred, or repositioned manually. Mechanical lift
programs can reduce skin tears suffered by patients by threefold.
Nurses, thirty-eight percent of whom have previous back injuries, can
drop patients if their pain thresholds are triggered.
(2) According to the bureau of labor statistics, hospitals in
Washington have a nonfatal employee injury incidence rate that exceeds
the rate of construction, agriculture, manufacturing, and
transportation.
(3) The physical demands of the nursing profession lead many nurses
to leave the profession. Research shows that the annual prevalence
rate for nursing back injury is over forty percent and many nurses who
suffer a back injury do not return to nursing. Considering the present
nursing shortage in Washington, measures must be taken to protect
nurses from disabling injury.
(4) Washington hospitals have made progress toward implementation
of safe patient handling programs that are effective in decreasing
employee injuries. It is not the intent of this act to place an undue
financial burden on hospitals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Lift team" means hospital employees specially trained to
conduct patient lifts, transfers, and repositioning using lifting
equipment when appropriate.
(b) "Safe patient handling" means the use of engineering controls,
lifting and transfer aids, or assistive devices, by lift teams or other
staff, instead of manual lifting to perform the acts of lifting,
transferring, and repositioning health care patients and residents.
(c) "Musculoskeletal disorders" means conditions that involve the
nerves, tendons, muscles, and supporting structures of the body.
(2) By February 1, 2007, each hospital must establish a safe
patient handling committee either by creating a new committee or
assigning the functions of a safe patient handling committee to an
existing committee. The purpose of the committee is to design and
recommend the process for implementing a safe patient handling program.
At least half of the members of the safe patient handling committee
shall be frontline nonmanagerial employees who provide direct care to
patients unless doing so will adversely affect patient care.
(3) By December 1, 2007, each hospital must establish a safe
patient handling program. As part of this program, a hospital must:
(a) Implement a safe patient handling policy for all shifts and
units of the hospital. Implementation of the safe patient handling
policy may be phased-in with the acquisition of equipment under
subsection (4) of this section;
(b) Conduct a patient handling hazard assessment. This assessment
should consider such variables as patient-handling tasks, types of
nursing units, patient populations, and the physical environment of
patient care areas;
(c) Develop a process to identify the appropriate use of the safe
patient handling policy based on the patient's physical and medical
condition and the availability of lifting equipment or lift teams. The
policy shall include a means to address circumstances under which it
would be medically contraindicated to use lifting or transfer aids or
assistive devices for particular patients;
(d) Conduct an annual performance evaluation of the program to
determine its effectiveness, with the results of the evaluation
reported to the safe patient handling committee. The evaluation shall
determine the extent to which implementation of the program has
resulted in a reduction in musculoskeletal disorder claims and days of
lost work attributable to musculoskeletal disorder caused by patient
handling, and include recommendations to increase the program's
effectiveness; and
(e) When developing architectural plans for constructing or
remodeling a hospital or a unit of a hospital in which patient handling
and movement occurs, consider the feasibility of incorporating patient
handling equipment or the physical space and construction design needed
to incorporate that equipment at a later date.
(4) By January 30, 2010, each hospital must complete, at a minimum,
acquisition of their choice of: (a) One readily available lift per
acute care unit on the same floor unless the safe patient handling
committee determines a lift is unnecessary in the unit; (b) one lift
for every ten acute care available inpatient beds; or (c) equipment for
use by lift teams. Hospitals must train staff on policies, equipment,
and devices at least annually.
(5) Nothing in this section precludes lift team members from
performing other duties as assigned during their shift.
(6) A hospital shall develop procedures for hospital employees to
refuse to perform or be involved in patient handling or movement that
the hospital employee believes in good faith will expose a patient or
a hospital employee to an unacceptable risk of injury. A hospital
employee who in good faith follows the procedure developed by the
hospital in accordance with this subsection shall not be the subject of
disciplinary action by the hospital for the refusal to perform or be
involved in the patient handling or movement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 72.23 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Lift team" means hospital employees specially trained to
conduct patient lifts, transfers, and repositioning using lifting
equipment when appropriate.
(b) "Safe patient handling" means the use of engineering controls,
lifting and transfer aids, or assistive devices, by lift teams or other
staff, instead of manual lifting to perform the acts of lifting,
transferring, and repositioning health care patients and residents.
(c) "Musculoskeletal disorders" means conditions that involve the
nerves, tendons, muscles, and supporting structures of the body.
(2) By February 1, 2007, each hospital must establish a safe
patient handling committee either by creating a new committee or
assigning the functions of a safe patient handling committee to an
existing committee. The purpose of the committee is to design and
recommend the process for implementing a safe patient handling program.
At least half of the members of the safe patient handling committee
shall be frontline nonmanagerial employees who provide direct care to
patients unless doing so will adversely affect patient care.
(3) By December 1, 2007, each hospital must establish a safe
patient handling program. As part of this program, a hospital must:
(a) Implement a safe patient handling policy for all shifts and
units of the hospital. Implementation of the safe patient handling
policy may be phased-in with the acquisition of equipment under
subsection (4) of this section;
(b) Conduct a patient handling hazard assessment. This assessment
should consider such variables as patient-handling tasks, types of
nursing units, patient populations, and the physical environment of
patient care areas;
(c) Develop a process to identify the appropriate use of the safe
patient handling policy based on the patient's physical and medical
condition and the availability of lifting equipment or lift teams;
(d) Conduct an annual performance evaluation of the program to
determine its effectiveness, with the results of the evaluation
reported to the safe patient handling committee. The evaluation shall
determine the extent to which implementation of the program has
resulted in a reduction in musculoskeletal disorder claims and days of
lost work attributable to musculoskeletal disorder caused by patient
handling, and include recommendations to increase the program's
effectiveness; and
(e) When developing architectural plans for constructing or
remodeling a hospital or a unit of a hospital in which patient handling
and movement occurs, consider the feasibility of incorporating patient
handling equipment or the physical space and construction design needed
to incorporate that equipment at a later date.
(4) By January 30, 2010, hospitals must complete acquisition of
their choice of: (a) One readily available lift per acute care unit on
the same floor, unless the safe patient handling committee determines
a lift is unnecessary in the unit; (b) one lift for every ten acute
care available inpatient beds; or (c) equipment for use by lift teams.
Hospitals must train staff on policies, equipment, and devices at least
annually.
(5) Nothing in this section precludes lift team members from
performing other duties as assigned during their shift.
(6) A hospital shall develop procedures for hospital employees to
refuse to perform or be involved in patient handling or movement that
the hospital employee believes in good faith will expose a patient or
a hospital employee to an unacceptable risk of injury. A hospital
employee who in good faith follows the procedure developed by the
hospital in accordance with this subsection shall not be the subject of
disciplinary action by the hospital for the refusal to perform or be
involved in the patient handling or movement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 51.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By January 1, 2007, the department shall develop rules to
provide a reduced workers' compensation premium for hospitals that
implement a safe patient handling program. The rules shall include any
requirements for obtaining the reduced premium that must be met by
hospitals.
(2) The department shall complete an evaluation of the results of
the reduced premium, including changes in claim frequency and costs,
and shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2010, and 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a hospital may
take a credit for the cost of purchasing mechanical lifting devices and
other equipment that are primarily used to minimize patient handling by
health care providers, consistent with a safe patient handling program
developed and implemented by the hospital in compliance with section 2
of this act. The credit is equal to one hundred percent of the cost of
the mechanical lifting devices or other equipment.
(2) No application is necessary for the credit, however, a hospital
taking a credit under this section must maintain records, as required
by the department, necessary to verify eligibility for the credit under
this section. The hospital is subject to all of the requirements of
chapter 82.32 RCW. A credit earned during one calendar year may be
carried over to be credited against taxes incurred in a subsequent
calendar year. No refunds shall be granted for credits under this
section.
(3) The maximum credit that may be earned under this section for
each hospital is limited to one thousand dollars for each acute care
available inpatient bed.
(4) Credits are available on a first in-time basis. The department
shall disallow any credits, or portion thereof, that would cause the
total amount of credits claimed statewide under this section to exceed
ten million dollars. If the ten million dollar limitation is reached,
the department shall notify hospitals that the annual statewide limit
has been met. In addition, the department shall provide written notice
to any hospital that has claimed tax credits after the ten million
dollar limitation in this subsection has been met. The notice shall
indicate the amount of tax due and shall provide that the tax be paid
within thirty days from the date of such notice. The department shall
not assess penalties and interest as provided in chapter 82.32 RCW on
the amount due in the initial notice if the amount due is paid by the
due date specified in the notice, or any extension thereof.
(5) Credit may not be claimed under this section for the
acquisition of mechanical lifting devices and other equipment if the
acquisition occurred before the effective date of this section.
(6) Credit may not be claimed under this section for any
acquisition of mechanical lifting devices and other equipment that
occurs after December 30, 2010.
(7) The department shall issue an annual report on the amount of
credits claimed by hospitals under this section, with the first report
due on July 1, 2008.
(8) For the purposes of this section, "hospital" has the meaning
provided in RCW 70.41.020.

--- END ---