BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) This chapter does not apply to a new business during the
first twelve months of operation of the business.
(b) This chapter does not apply to a new business during the first
twenty-four months of operation of the business if the new business has
less than twenty-five employment positions at the time it begins to
engage in the normal course of business. During the next thirty-six
months of operation of the business, the business is exempt from taxes
due under this chapter according to the following schedule:

Year
% of Tax Exempt

3 75%

4 50%

5 25%

after year 5 0

(2) A new business shall not take an exemption under this section
during any reporting period in an amount that exceeds eight thousand
three hundred thirty-three dollars, multiplied by the number of months
in the reporting period.
(3) As used in this section:
(a)(i) "New business" means a business that obtained or was
required to obtain a registration certificate under RCW 82.32.030 for
the first time during the calendar year for which exemption is first
claimed under this section.
(ii) "New business" does not include:
(A) A business that has been restructured, reorganized, or
transferred, unless the majority of the activities to be conducted
after restructuring, reorganization, or transferral are significantly
different from the activities previously conducted;
(B) A new branch location or other facility except by an existing
out-of-state entity first doing business in this state;
(C) A business that is substantially similar to a business
currently operated, or operated within the past five years, by the same
principals.
(b) "Employment position" means a full-time, permanent employee of
the new business.
(4) A new business must file an application, in a form and manner
required by the department, before taking a credit under this section.
The department shall rule on the application within twenty days.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect August 1, 2005.

--- END ---