BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.135 RCW
to read as follows:
A political subdivision may choose to comply with a requirement of
any nature imposed by the state, or any instrumentality of the state,
if the total state funds provided to the political subdivision that may
be expended or are required to be expended by the political subdivision
to meet the requirement are not sufficient to pay for all the costs of
meeting the requirement. If these state moneys are not sufficient, the
requirement loses its mandatory nature and becomes a recommendation or
option for the political subdivision and a penalty may not be imposed
on the political subdivision for failing to comply with the
requirement.
For the purposes of this section, "political subdivision" includes
any local government, or taxing district created under state law.

--- END ---