BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2004 c 41 s 2 (uncodified) is reenacted and amended to
read as follows:
(1) A joint task force on criminal background check processes is
established. The joint task force shall consist of the following
members:
(a) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate,
appointed by the president of the senate;
(b) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house
of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(c) The chief of the Washington state patrol, or the chief's
designee;
(d) The secretary of the department of social and health services,
or the secretary's designee;
(e) The state superintendent of public instruction, or the
superintendent's designee;
(f) An elected sheriff or police chief, selected by the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs; and
(g) The following ((seven)) nine members, jointly appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the
senate:
(i) A representative from a nonprofit service organization that
serves primarily children under sixteen years of age;
(ii) A health care provider as defined in RCW 7.70.020;
(iii) A representative from a business or organization that
primarily serves persons with a developmental disability or vulnerable
adults;
(iv) A representative from a local youth athletic association;
(v) A representative from the insurance industry; ((and))
(vi) Two representatives from a local parks and recreation program;
one member shall be selected by the association of Washington cities
and one member shall be selected by the Washington association of
counties;
(vii) A representative from a for-profit entity that primarily
serves children or vulnerable adults; and
(viii) A representative of an organization that serves as a
clearinghouse for other nonprofit organizations in the state and that
recruits volunteers and trains nonprofit boards of directors.
(2) The task force shall choose two cochairs from among its
membership.
(3) The task force shall review and make recommendations to the
legislature and the governor regarding criminal background check policy
in Washington state. In preparing the recommendations, the committee
shall, at a minimum, review the following issues:
(a) What state and federal statutes require regarding criminal
background checks, and determine whether any changes should be made;
(b) What criminal offenses are currently reportable through the
criminal background check program, and determine whether any changes
should be made;
(c) What information is available through the Washington state
patrol and the federal bureau of investigation criminal background
check systems, and determine whether any changes should be made;
(d) What are the best practices among organizations for obtaining
criminal background checks on their employees and volunteers;
(e) What is the feasibility and costs for businesses and
organizations to do periodic background checks;
(f) What is the feasibility of requiring all businesses and
organizations, including nonprofit entities, to conduct criminal
background checks for all employees, contractors, agents, and
volunteers who have regularly scheduled supervised or unsupervised
access to children, persons with a developmental disability, or
vulnerable adults; and
(g) A review of the benefits and obstacles of implementing a
criminal history record information background check program created by
the national child protection act of 1993. The national child
protection act of 1993 increases the availability of criminal history
record information background checks for employers who have employees
or volunteers who work with children, elderly persons, or persons with
disabilities.
(4) The task force, where feasible, may consult with individuals
from the public and private sector.
(5) The task force shall use legislative facilities and staff from
senate committee services and the house office of program research.
(6) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to
the legislature by December 31, ((2004)) 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act expires January 31, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---