BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the technology
used for criminal history record information background checks for
employment purposes are rapidly increasing in Washington. Live-scan is
a means to electronically gather and transmit fingerprint data for
background check purposes. Gathering fingerprints electronically not
only reduces the number of rejected fingerprints by improving the
accuracy and quality of prints, but it also reduces the turnaround time
for gathering criminal background checks for perspective employees.
The legislature has learned that live-scan technology is currently
limited in the state for noncriminal justice purposes. There are no
public or private sector fingerprinting service centers to accommodate
individuals applying for noncriminal justice employment or licensing.
The legislature further finds that creating a pilot program, by
strategically placing several live-scan devices in government offices
throughout the state, will help employers and prospective employees to
more easily gather and transmit data for noncriminal justice purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The amount of two hundred seventy thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from
the state general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2006, to the
superintendent of public instruction. The amount in this section is
provided solely to purchase a live-scan device for each educational
service district, to be used for noncriminal justice purposes.

--- END ---