BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The office of the insurance commissioner
shall contract for an independent health care actuarial review of all
existing health care coverage statutory requirements. The statutory
requirements to be reviewed shall be those listed in "Mandated Benefits
in Washington State," policy division, Washington state office of the
insurance commissioner, January 10, 2002. The review shall determine
the cost of including the statutory requirements in a health plan,
including the premium cost per member per month; an assessment of the
cost-benefit ratio of the statutory requirement and whether the
statutory requirement can be correlated to savings in other services;
and an assessment of whether market demand has already resulted in
inclusion of current statutory requirements in a significant number of
health benefit plans in states that do not have such statutory
requirements. There shall be an interim report to appropriate
committees of the legislature on December 1, 2005, and a final report
submitted by December 1, 2006.

--- END ---