BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) The cost of health care, along with the number of uninsured
persons, is continuing to rise;
(b) Many individuals are uninsured because employers are not given
adequate health insurance options that they and their employees can
afford;
(c) Due to the increasing number of mandated health benefits,
willing small employers are financially unable to provide affordable
health insurance to their employees that meets the employees'
individual needs;
(d) The purchaser and recipient of health care should have more
control over the services and products they purchase; and
(e) It is in the best interest of the people of the state of
Washington to contain the significantly increasing costs of malpractice
insurance for licensed health care professionals and institutions and
noninstitutional care providers in order to ensure the continued
availability and affordability of health care services in this state by
enacting further reforms to the health care tort liability system.
(2) The legislature intends to:
(a) Provide employees with more options in choosing a quality
health care plan that meets their individual needs;
(b) Create a moratorium on new mandated health benefits, and
require an independent cost-benefit analysis of all current health
benefit mandates;
(c) Direct the public employees' benefits board to offer a health
savings account option to public employees; and
(d) Enact medical malpractice reforms to stabilize the health care
professional liability insurance market, maintain access to affordable
quality health care services, and avert the kind of crisis now facing
the residents of Washington.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.21.045 and 2004 c 244 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(((a))) An insurer offering any health benefit plan to a small
employer, either directly or through an association or member-governed
group formed specifically for the purpose of purchasing health care,
may offer and actively market to the small employer ((a)) no more than
one health benefit plan featuring a limited schedule of covered health
care services. ((Nothing in this subsection shall preclude an insurer
from offering, or a small employer from purchasing, other health
benefit plans that may have more comprehensive benefits than those
included in the product offered under this subsection. An insurer
offering a health benefit plan under this subsection shall clearly
disclose all covered benefits to the small employer in a brochure filed
with the commissioner.
(b) A health benefit plan offered under this subsection shall
provide coverage for hospital expenses and services rendered by a
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not subject
to the requirements of RCW 48.21.130, 48.21.140, 48.21.141, 48.21.142,
48.21.144, 48.21.146, 48.21.160 through 48.21.197, 48.21.200,
48.21.220, 48.21.225, 48.21.230, 48.21.235, 48.21.240, 48.21.244,
48.21.250, 48.21.300, 48.21.310, or 48.21.320.
(2))) (a) The plan offered under this subsection may be offered
with a choice of cost-sharing arrangements, and may, but is not
required to, comply with: RCW 48.21.130 through 48.21.240, 48.21.244
through 48.21.280, 48.21.300 through 48.21.320, 48.43.045(1) except as
required in (b) of this subsection, 48.43.093, 48.43.115 through
48.43.185, 48.43.515(5), or 48.42.100.
(b) In offering the plan under this subsection, the insurer must
offer the small employer the option of permitting every category of
health care provider to provide health services or care for conditions
covered by the plan pursuant to RCW 48.43.045(1).
(2) An insurer offering the plan under subsection (1) of this
section must also offer and actively market to the small employer at
least one additional health benefit plan.
(3) Nothing in this section shall prohibit an insurer from
offering, or a purchaser from seeking, health benefit plans with
benefits in excess of the health benefit plan offered under subsection
(1) of this section. All forms, policies, and contracts shall be
submitted for approval to the commissioner, and the rates of any plan
offered under this section shall be reasonable in relation to the
benefits thereto.
(((3))) (4) Premium rates for health benefit plans for small
employers as defined in this section shall be subject to the following
provisions:
(a) The insurer shall develop its rates based on an adjusted
community rate and may only vary the adjusted community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age; and
(iv) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments, which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Employees under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The insurer shall be permitted to develop separate rates for
individuals age sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare is
the primary payer and coverage for which medicare is not the primary
payer. Both rates shall be subject to the requirements of this
subsection (((3))) (4).
(d) The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs.
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the enrollment of the small employer;
(ii) Changes to the family composition of the employee;
(iii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the small
employer; or
(iv) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) Rating factors shall produce premiums for identical groups that
differ only by the amounts attributable to plan design, with the
exception of discounts for health improvement programs.
(h) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. A carrier
may develop its rates based on claims costs ((due to network provider
reimbursement schedules or type of network)) for a plan. This
subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as
provided in RCW 48.43.015.
(i) Except for small group health benefit plans that qualify as
insurance coverage combined with a health savings account as defined by
the United States internal revenue service, adjusted community rates
established under this section shall pool the medical experience of all
small groups purchasing coverage. However, annual rate adjustments for
each small group health benefit plan may vary by up to plus or minus
((four)) eight percentage points from the overall adjustment of a
carrier's entire small group pool((, such overall adjustment to be
approved by the commissioner, upon a showing by the carrier, certified
by a member of the American academy of actuaries that: (i) The
variation is a result of deductible leverage, benefit design, or
provider network characteristics; and (ii) for a rate renewal period,
the projected weighted average of all small group benefit plans will
have a revenue neutral effect on the carrier's small group pool.
Variations of greater than four percentage points are subject to review
by the commissioner, and must be approved or denied within sixty days
of submittal)) if certified by a member of the American academy of
actuaries, that: (i) The variation is a result of deductible leverage,
benefit design, claims cost trend for the plan, or provider network
characteristics; and (ii) for a rate renewal period, the projected
weighted average of all small group benefit plans will have a revenue
neutral effect on the carrier's small group pool. Variations of
greater than eight percentage points are subject to review by the
commissioner, and must be approved or denied within thirty days of
submittal. A variation that is not denied within ((sixty)) thirty days
shall be deemed approved. The commissioner must provide to the carrier
a detailed actuarial justification for any denial ((within thirty
days)) at the time of the denial.
(((4))) (5) Nothing in this section shall restrict the right of
employees to collectively bargain for insurance providing benefits in
excess of those provided herein.
(((5))) (6)(a) Except as provided in this subsection, requirements
used by an insurer in determining whether to provide coverage to a
small employer shall be applied uniformly among all small employers
applying for coverage or receiving coverage from the carrier.
(b) An insurer shall not require a minimum participation level
greater than:
(i) One hundred percent of eligible employees working for groups
with three or less employees; and
(ii) Seventy-five percent of eligible employees working for groups
with more than three employees.
(c) In applying minimum participation requirements with respect to
a small employer, a small employer shall not consider employees or
dependents who have similar existing coverage in determining whether
the applicable percentage of participation is met.
(d) An insurer may not increase any requirement for minimum
employee participation or modify any requirement for minimum employer
contribution applicable to a small employer at any time after the small
employer has been accepted for coverage.
(((6))) (7) An insurer must offer coverage to all eligible
employees of a small employer and their dependents. An insurer may not
offer coverage to only certain individuals or dependents in a small
employer group or to only part of the group. An insurer may not modify
a health plan with respect to a small employer or any eligible employee
or dependent, through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to restrict or
exclude coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical conditions,
or services otherwise covered by the plan.
(((7))) (8) As used in this section, "health benefit plan," "small
employer," "adjusted community rate," and "wellness activities" mean
the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.44.023 and 2004 c 244 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(((a))) A health care services contractor offering any health
benefit plan to a small employer, either directly or through an
association or member-governed group formed specifically for the
purpose of purchasing health care, may offer and actively market to the
small employer ((a)) no more than one health benefit plan featuring a
limited schedule of covered health care services. ((Nothing in this
subsection shall preclude a contractor from offering, or a small
employer from purchasing, other health benefit plans that may have more
comprehensive benefits than those included in the product offered under
this subsection. A contractor offering a health benefit plan under
this subsection shall clearly disclose all covered benefits to the
small employer in a brochure filed with the commissioner.
(b) A health benefit plan offered under this subsection shall
provide coverage for hospital expenses and services rendered by a
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not subject
to the requirements of RCW 48.44.225, 48.44.240, 48.44.245, 48.44.290,
48.44.300, 48.44.310, 48.44.320, 48.44.325, 48.44.330, 48.44.335,
48.44.340, 48.44.344, 48.44.360, 48.44.400, 48.44.440, 48.44.450, and
48.44.460.
(2))) (a) The plan offered under this subsection may be offered
with a choice of cost-sharing arrangements, and may, but is not
required to, comply with: RCW 48.44.210, 48.44.212, 48.44.225,
48.44.240 through 48.44.245, 48.44.290 through 48.44.340, 48.44.344,
48.44.360 through 48.44.380, 48.44.400, 48.44.420, 48.44.440 through
48.44.460, 48.44.500, 48.43.045(1) except as required in (b) of this
subsection, 48.43.093, 48.43.115 through 48.43.185, 48.43.515(5), or
48.42.100.
(b) In offering the plan under this subsection, the health care
service contractor must offer the small employer the option of
permitting every category of health care provider to provide health
services or care for conditions covered by the plan pursuant to RCW
48.43.045(1).
(2) A health care service contractor offering the plan under
subsection (1) of this section must also offer and actively market to
the small employer at least one additional health benefit plan.
(3) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a health care service
contractor from offering, or a purchaser from seeking, health benefit
plans with benefits in excess of the health benefit plan offered under
subsection (1) of this section. All forms, policies, and contracts
shall be submitted for approval to the commissioner, and the rates of
any plan offered under this section shall be reasonable in relation to
the benefits thereto.
(((3))) (4) Premium rates for health benefit plans for small
employers as defined in this section shall be subject to the following
provisions:
(a) The contractor shall develop its rates based on an adjusted
community rate and may only vary the adjusted community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age; and
(iv) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments, which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Employees under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The contractor shall be permitted to develop separate rates for
individuals age sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare is
the primary payer and coverage for which medicare is not the primary
payer. Both rates shall be subject to the requirements of this
subsection (((3))) (4).
(d) The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs.
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the enrollment of the small employer;
(ii) Changes to the family composition of the employee;
(iii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the small
employer; or
(iv) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) Rating factors shall produce premiums for identical groups that
differ only by the amounts attributable to plan design, with the
exception of discounts for health improvement programs.
(h) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. A carrier
may develop its rates based on claims costs ((due to network provider
reimbursement schedules or type of network)) for a plan. This
subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as
provided in RCW 48.43.015.
(i) Except for small group health benefit plans that qualify as
insurance coverage combined with a health savings account as defined by
the United States internal revenue service, adjusted community rates
established under this section shall pool the medical experience of all
groups purchasing coverage. However, annual rate adjustments for each
small group health benefit plan may vary by up to plus or minus
((four)) eight percentage points from the overall adjustment of a
carrier's entire small group pool((, such overall adjustment to be
approved by the commissioner, upon a showing by the carrier, certified
by a member of the American academy of actuaries that: (i) The
variation is a result of deductible leverage, benefit design, or
provider network characteristics; and (ii) for a rate renewal period,
the projected weighted average of all small group benefit plans will
have a revenue neutral effect on the carrier's small group pool.
Variations of greater than four percentage points are subject to review
by the commissioner, and must be approved or denied within sixty days
of submittal)) if certified by a member of the American academy of
actuaries, that: (i) The variation is a result of deductible leverage,
benefit design, claims cost trend for the plan, or provider network
characteristics; and (ii) for a rate renewal period, the projected
weighted average of all small group benefit plans will have a revenue
neutral effect on the carrier's small group pool. Variations of
greater than eight percentage points are subject to review by the
commissioner, and must be approved or denied within thirty days of
submittal. A variation that is not denied within ((sixty)) thirty days
shall be deemed approved. The commissioner must provide to the carrier
a detailed actuarial justification for any denial ((within thirty
days)) at the time of the denial.
(((4))) (5) Nothing in this section shall restrict the right of
employees to collectively bargain for insurance providing benefits in
excess of those provided herein.
(((5))) (6)(a) Except as provided in this subsection, requirements
used by a contractor in determining whether to provide coverage to a
small employer shall be applied uniformly among all small employers
applying for coverage or receiving coverage from the carrier.
(b) A contractor shall not require a minimum participation level
greater than:
(i) One hundred percent of eligible employees working for groups
with three or less employees; and
(ii) Seventy-five percent of eligible employees working for groups
with more than three employees.
(c) In applying minimum participation requirements with respect to
a small employer, a small employer shall not consider employees or
dependents who have similar existing coverage in determining whether
the applicable percentage of participation is met.
(d) A contractor may not increase any requirement for minimum
employee participation or modify any requirement for minimum employer
contribution applicable to a small employer at any time after the small
employer has been accepted for coverage.
(((6))) (7) A contractor must offer coverage to all eligible
employees of a small employer and their dependents. A contractor may
not offer coverage to only certain individuals or dependents in a small
employer group or to only part of the group. A contractor may not
modify a health plan with respect to a small employer or any eligible
employee or dependent, through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to
restrict or exclude coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical
conditions, or services otherwise covered by the plan.

Sec. 4 RCW 48.46.066 and 2004 c 244 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(((a))) A health maintenance organization offering any health
benefit plan to a small employer, either directly or through an
association or member-governed group formed specifically for the
purpose of purchasing health care, may offer and actively market to the
small employer ((a)) no more than one health benefit plan featuring a
limited schedule of covered health care services. ((Nothing in this
subsection shall preclude a health maintenance organization from
offering, or a small employer from purchasing, other health benefit
plans that may have more comprehensive benefits than those included in
the product offered under this subsection. A health maintenance
organization offering a health benefit plan under this subsection shall
clearly disclose all the covered benefits to the small employer in a
brochure filed with the commissioner.
(b) A health benefit plan offered under this subsection shall
provide coverage for hospital expenses and services rendered by a
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not subject
to the requirements of RCW 48.46.275, 48.46.280, 48.46.285, 48.46.290,
48.46.350, 48.46.355, 48.46.375, 48.46.440, 48.46.480, 48.46.510,
48.46.520, and 48.46.530.
(2))) (a) The plan offered under this subsection may be offered
with a choice of cost-sharing arrangements, and may, but is not
required to, comply with: RCW 48.46.250, 48.46.272 through 48.46.290,
48.46.320, 48.46.350, 48.46.375, 48.46.440 through 48.46.460,
48.46.480, 48.46.490, 48.46.510, 48.46.520, 48.46.530, 48.46.565,
48.46.570, 48.46.575, 48.43.045(1) except as required in (b) of this
subsection, 48.43.093, 48.43.115 through 48.43.185, 48.43.515(5), or
48.42.100.
(b) In offering the plan under this subsection, the health
maintenance organization must offer the small employer the option of
permitting every category of health care provider to provide health
services or care for conditions covered by the plan pursuant to RCW
48.43.045(1).
(2) A health maintenance organization offering the plan under
subsection (1) of this section must also offer and actively market to
the small employer at least one additional health benefit plan.
(3) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a health maintenance
organization from offering, or a purchaser from seeking, health benefit
plans with benefits in excess of the health benefit plan offered under
subsection (1) of this section. All forms, policies, and contracts
shall be submitted for approval to the commissioner, and the rates of
any plan offered under this section shall be reasonable in relation to
the benefits thereto.
(((3))) (4) Premium rates for health benefit plans for small
employers as defined in this section shall be subject to the following
provisions:
(a) The health maintenance organization shall develop its rates
based on an adjusted community rate and may only vary the adjusted
community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age; and
(iv) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments, which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Employees under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The health maintenance organization shall be permitted to
develop separate rates for individuals age sixty-five or older for
coverage for which medicare is the primary payer and coverage for which
medicare is not the primary payer. Both rates shall be subject to the
requirements of this subsection (((3))) (4).
(d) The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs.
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the enrollment of the small employer;
(ii) Changes to the family composition of the employee;
(iii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the small
employer; or
(iv) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) Rating factors shall produce premiums for identical groups that
differ only by the amounts attributable to plan design, with the
exception of discounts for health improvement programs.
(h) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. A carrier
may develop its rates based on claims costs ((due to network provider
reimbursement schedules or type of network)) for a plan. This
subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as
provided in RCW 48.43.015.
(i) Except for small group health benefit plans that qualify as
insurance coverage combined with a health savings account as defined by
the United States internal revenue service, adjusted community rates
established under this section shall pool the medical experience of all
groups purchasing coverage. However, annual rate adjustments for each
small group health benefit plan may vary by up to plus or minus
((four)) eight percentage points from the overall adjustment of a
carrier's entire small group pool((, such overall adjustment to be
approved by the commissioner, upon a showing by the carrier, certified
by a member of the American academy of actuaries that: (i) The
variation is a result of deductible leverage, benefit design, or
provider network characteristics; and (ii) for a rate renewal period,
the projected weighted average of all small group benefit plans will
have a revenue neutral effect on the carrier's small group pool.
Variations of greater than four percentage points are subject to review
by the commissioner, and must be approved or denied within sixty days
of submittal)) if certified by a member of the American academy of
actuaries, that: (i) The variation is a result of deductible leverage,
benefit design, claims cost trend for the plan, or provider network
characteristics; and (ii) for a rate renewal period, the projected
weighted average of all small group benefit plans will have a revenue
neutral effect on the health maintenance organization's small group
pool. Variations of greater than eight percentage points are subject
to review by the commissioner, and must be approved or denied within
thirty days of submittal. A variation that is not denied within
((sixty)) thirty days shall be deemed approved. The commissioner must
provide to the carrier a detailed actuarial justification for any
denial ((within thirty days)) at the time of the denial.
(((4))) (5) Nothing in this section shall restrict the right of
employees to collectively bargain for insurance providing benefits in
excess of those provided herein.
(((5))) (6)(a) Except as provided in this subsection, requirements
used by a health maintenance organization in determining whether to
provide coverage to a small employer shall be applied uniformly among
all small employers applying for coverage or receiving coverage from
the carrier.
(b) A health maintenance organization shall not require a minimum
participation level greater than:
(i) One hundred percent of eligible employees working for groups
with three or less employees; and
(ii) Seventy-five percent of eligible employees working for groups
with more than three employees.
(c) In applying minimum participation requirements with respect to
a small employer, a small employer shall not consider employees or
dependents who have similar existing coverage in determining whether
the applicable percentage of participation is met.
(d) A health maintenance organization may not increase any
requirement for minimum employee participation or modify any
requirement for minimum employer contribution applicable to a small
employer at any time after the small employer has been accepted for
coverage.
(((6))) (7) A health maintenance organization must offer coverage
to all eligible employees of a small employer and their dependents. A
health maintenance organization may not offer coverage to only certain
individuals or dependents in a small employer group or to only part of
the group. A health maintenance organization may not modify a health
plan with respect to a small employer or any eligible employee or
dependent, through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to restrict or
exclude coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical conditions,
or services otherwise covered by the plan.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.05.065 and 2003 c 158 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall study all matters connected with the provision
of health care coverage, life insurance, liability insurance,
accidental death and dismemberment insurance, and disability income
insurance or any of, or a combination of, the enumerated types of
insurance for employees and their dependents on the best basis possible
with relation both to the welfare of the employees and to the state.
However, liability insurance shall not be made available to dependents.
(2) The board shall develop employee benefit plans that include
comprehensive health care benefits for all employees. In developing
these plans, the board shall consider the following elements:
(a) Methods of maximizing cost containment while ensuring access to
quality health care;
(b) Development of provider arrangements that encourage cost
containment and ensure access to quality care, including but not
limited to prepaid delivery systems and prospective payment methods;
(c) Wellness incentives that focus on proven strategies, such as
smoking cessation, injury and accident prevention, reduction of alcohol
misuse, appropriate weight reduction, exercise, automobile and
motorcycle safety, blood cholesterol reduction, and nutrition
education;
(d) Utilization review procedures including, but not limited to a
cost-efficient method for prior authorization of services, hospital
inpatient length of stay review, requirements for use of outpatient
surgeries and second opinions for surgeries, review of invoices or
claims submitted by service providers, and performance audit of
providers;
(e) Effective coordination of benefits;
(f) Minimum standards for insuring entities; and
(g) Minimum scope and content of public employee benefit plans to
be offered to enrollees participating in the employee health benefit
plans. To maintain the comprehensive nature of employee health care
benefits, employee eligibility criteria related to the number of hours
worked and the benefits provided to employees shall be substantially
equivalent to the state employees' health benefits plan and eligibility
criteria in effect on January 1, 1993. Nothing in this subsection
(2)(g) shall prohibit changes or increases in employee point-of-service
payments or employee premium payments for benefits.
(3) The board shall design benefits and determine the terms and
conditions of employee participation and coverage, including
establishment of eligibility criteria. The same terms and conditions
of participation and coverage, including eligibility criteria, shall
apply to state employees and to school district employees and
educational service district employees.
(4) The board may authorize premium contributions for an employee
and the employee's dependents in a manner that encourages the use of
cost-efficient managed health care systems. The board shall require
participating school district and educational service district
employees to pay at least the same employee premiums by plan and family
size as state employees pay.
(5) The board shall develop a health savings account option for
employees that conforms to section 223, Part VII of subchapter B of
chapter 1 of the internal revenue code of 1986. The board shall comply
with all applicable federal standards related to the establishment of
health savings accounts.
(6) Employees shall choose participation in one of the health care
benefit plans developed by the board and may be permitted to waive
coverage under terms and conditions established by the board.
(((6))) (7) The board shall review plans proposed by insuring
entities that desire to offer property insurance and/or accident and
casualty insurance to state employees through payroll deduction. The
board may approve any such plan for payroll deduction by insuring
entities holding a valid certificate of authority in the state of
Washington and which the board determines to be in the best interests
of employees and the state. The board shall promulgate rules setting
forth criteria by which it shall evaluate the plans.
(((7))) (8) Before January 1, 1998, the public employees' benefits
board shall make available one or more fully insured long-term care
insurance plans that comply with the requirements of chapter 48.84 RCW.
Such programs shall be made available to eligible employees, retired
employees, and retired school employees as well as eligible dependents
which, for the purpose of this section, includes the parents of the
employee or retiree and the parents of the spouse of the employee or
retiree. Employees of local governments and employees of political
subdivisions not otherwise enrolled in the public employees' benefits
board sponsored medical programs may enroll under terms and conditions
established by the administrator, if it does not jeopardize the
financial viability of the public employees' benefits board's long-term
care offering.
(a) Participation of eligible employees or retired employees and
retired school employees in any long-term care insurance plan made
available by the public employees' benefits board is voluntary and
shall not be subject to binding arbitration under chapter 41.56 RCW.
Participation is subject to reasonable underwriting guidelines and
eligibility rules established by the public employees' benefits board
and the health care authority.
(b) The employee, retired employee, and retired school employee are
solely responsible for the payment of the premium rates developed by
the health care authority. The health care authority is authorized to
charge a reasonable administrative fee in addition to the premium
charged by the long-term care insurer, which shall include the health
care authority's cost of administration, marketing, and consumer
education materials prepared by the health care authority and the
office of the insurance commissioner.
(c) To the extent administratively possible, the state shall
establish an automatic payroll or pension deduction system for the
payment of the long-term care insurance premiums.
(d) The public employees' benefits board and the health care
authority shall establish a technical advisory committee to provide
advice in the development of the benefit design and establishment of
underwriting guidelines and eligibility rules. The committee shall
also advise the board and authority on effective and cost-effective
ways to market and distribute the long-term care product. The
technical advisory committee shall be comprised, at a minimum, of
representatives of the office of the insurance commissioner, providers
of long-term care services, licensed insurance agents with expertise in
long-term care insurance, employees, retired employees, retired school
employees, and other interested parties determined to be appropriate by
the board.
(e) The health care authority shall offer employees, retired
employees, and retired school employees the option of purchasing long-term care insurance through licensed agents or brokers appointed by the
long-term care insurer. The authority, in consultation with the public
employees' benefits board, shall establish marketing procedures and may
consider all premium components as a part of the contract negotiations
with the long-term care insurer.
(f) In developing the long-term care insurance benefit designs, the
public employees' benefits board shall include an alternative plan of
care benefit, including adult day services, as approved by the office
of the insurance commissioner.
(g) The health care authority, with the cooperation of the office
of the insurance commissioner, shall develop a consumer education
program for the eligible employees, retired employees, and retired
school employees designed to provide education on the potential need
for long-term care, methods of financing long-term care, and the
availability of long-term care insurance products including the
products offered by the board.
(h) By December 1998, the health care authority, in consultation
with the public employees' benefits board, shall submit a report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature, including an analysis of the
marketing and distribution of the long-term care insurance provided
under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) After the effective date of this section, no health carrier may
deliver, issue, or renew a health insurance policy that includes any
additional coverage mandates, beyond those mandates in effect on the
effective date of this section.
(2) The office of the insurance commissioner shall contract for an
independent health care actuarial review of all existing health care
coverage mandates. The first mandate to be reviewed is the requirement
to cover every category of health care provider as required by RCW
48.43.045.

Sec. 7 RCW 4.56.250 and 1986 c 305 s 301 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As used in this section, the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Economic damages" means objectively verifiable monetary
losses, including medical expenses, loss of earnings, burial costs,
loss of use of property, cost of replacement or repair, cost of
obtaining substitute domestic services, loss of employment, and loss of
business or employment opportunities.
(b) "Noneconomic damages" means subjective, nonmonetary losses,
including((,)) but not limited to pain, suffering, inconvenience,
mental anguish, disability or disfigurement incurred by the injured
party, loss of ability to enjoy life, emotional distress, loss of
society and companionship, loss of consortium, injury to reputation and
humiliation, ((and)) destruction of the parent-child relationship, and
other nonpecuniary damages of any type.
(c) "Bodily injury" means physical injury, sickness, or disease,
including death.
(d) "Average annual wage" means the average annual wage in the
state of Washington as determined under RCW 50.04.355.
(2) Except as provided in section 8 of this act, in no action
seeking damages for personal injury or death may a claimant recover a
judgment for noneconomic damages exceeding an amount determined by
multiplying 0.43 by the average annual wage and by the life expectancy
of the person incurring noneconomic damages, as the life expectancy is
determined by the life expectancy tables adopted by the insurance
commissioner. For purposes of determining the maximum amount allowable
for noneconomic damages, a claimant's life expectancy shall not be less
than fifteen years. The limitation contained in this subsection
applies to all claims for noneconomic damages made by a claimant who
incurred bodily injury. Claims for loss of consortium, loss of society
and companionship, destruction of the parent-child relationship, and
all other derivative claims asserted by persons who did not sustain
bodily injury are to be included within the limitation on claims for
noneconomic damages arising from the same bodily injury.
(3) If a case is tried to a jury, the jury shall not be informed of
the limitation contained in subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 4.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In any action or arbitration for damages for injury or death
occurring as a result of health care or related services, or the
arranging for the provision of health care or related services, whether
brought under chapter 7.70 RCW, RCW 4.20.010, 4.20.020, 4.20.046,
4.20.060, 4.24.010, or 48.43.545(1), any other applicable law, or any
combination thereof, that is based upon the alleged wrongful acts or
omissions of one or more health care professionals, whether or not
those health care professionals are named as defendants, the total
combined civil liability for noneconomic damages for all health care
professionals, all persons, entities, and health care institutions for
whose conduct the health care professionals could be held liable, and
all persons, entities, and health care institutions that could be held
liable for the conduct of any health care professionals, shall not
exceed three hundred fifty thousand dollars for each claimant,
regardless of the number of health care professionals, health care
providers, or health care institutions against whom the claim for
injury or death is or could have been asserted or the number of
separate causes of action on which the claim is based.
(2) Any and all health care institutions against whom liability is
imposed based upon a wrongful act or omission of any health care
professional are specifically included within the limitation on
liability for noneconomic damages contained in subsection (1) of this
section, even if the health care institution also is or could be held
liable for a wrongful act or omission of a person other than a health
care professional, another health care institution, or a related
entity, facility, or institution.
(3) If, in an action or arbitration for injury or death occurring
as a result of health care or related services, or the arranging for
health care or related services, whether brought under chapter 7.70
RCW, RCW 4.20.010, 4.20.020, 4.20.046, 4.20.060, 4.24.010, or
48.43.545(1), any other applicable law, or any combination thereof, one
or more health care institutions are liable for any wrongful acts or
omissions of persons other than health care professionals, but are not
liable for any alleged wrongful act or omission of any health care
professional, the total civil liability for noneconomic damages for
each such health care institution, including all persons, entities, and
other health care institutions for whose conduct the health care
institution could be liable, shall not exceed three hundred fifty
thousand dollars for each claimant, and the total combined limit of
civil liability for noneconomic damages for all health care
institutions, including all persons, entities, and other health care
institutions for whose conduct the health care institutions could be
held liable, shall not exceed seven hundred thousand dollars for each
claimant, regardless of the number of health care institutions, health
care professionals, or health care providers against whom the claim for
damages for injury or death is or could have been asserted or the
number of separate causes of action on which the claim is based.
(4) A claimant shall not be permitted to obtain more than one
recovery of noneconomic damages by splitting his or her claim or cause
of action for damages for injury or death occurring as a result of
health care or related services, or the arranging for the provision of
health care or related services, or by bringing separate actions for
such injury or death against more than one health care professional or
health care institution. A claimant who has recovered noneconomic
damages in one action for damages for injury or death occurring as a
result of health care or related services, or the arranging for the
provision of health care or related services, shall be precluded from
seeking or recovering additional noneconomic damages for the injury or
death in any other action.
(5) If the jury's assessment of noneconomic damages exceeds the
limitations contained in subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section,
nothing in RCW 4.44.450 precludes the court from entering a judgment
that limits the total amount of noneconomic damages to those limits
provided in subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section.
(6) If a case is tried to a jury, the jury shall not be informed of
the limitations on noneconomic damages contained in subsections (1),
(2), and (3) of this section.
(7) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Claimant" means a person, including a decedent's estate,
seeking or who has sought recovery of damages in an action or
arbitration for injury or death occurring as a result of health care or
related services, or the arranging for the provision of health care or
related services. All persons claiming to have sustained damages as a
result of the injury or death of a single person are considered a
single claimant, and the limitations on noneconomic damages specified
in subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section shall include all
noneconomic damages claimed by or on behalf of the person whose injury
or death occurred as a result of health care or related services, or
the arranging for the provision of health care or related services, as
well as all claims for noneconomic damages asserted by or on behalf of
others arising from the same injury or death.
(b) "Economic damages" has the meaning set forth in RCW
4.56.250(1)(a).
(c) "Health care institution" means any entity, whether or not
incorporated, facility, or institution that is licensed, registered, or
certified by this state to provide health care or related services or
to arrange for the provision of health care or related services,
including, but not limited to, an ambulatory diagnostic, treatment, or
surgical facility, an adult family home, an ambulance, aid, or
emergency medical service, a blood bank or blood center, a boarding
home, a community health center, a community mental health center, a
comprehensive community health center, a disability insurer, a drug and
alcohol treatment center, an extended care facility, a group home, a
health carrier, a health care service contractor, a health maintenance
organization, a home health agency, a hospice, a hospice care center,
a hospital, an independent clinical laboratory, an in-home services
agency, an intermediate care facility, a kidney disease treatment
facility, a long-term care facility, a migrant health center, a nursing
home, a pharmacy, a psychiatric hospital, a psychiatric,
neuropsychiatric, or mental health facility, a rehabilitation facility,
a renal dialysis center, a rural health care facility, a skilled
nursing facility, a soldiers or veterans home, a sperm bank, a tissue
bank, a tribal clinic, or a visiting nurse service, including any
related entity, facility, or institution owned or operated by the
health care institution, and any officer, director, employee, agent, or
apparent agent of the health care institution or such related entity,
facility, or institution, acting in the course and scope of his or her
employment or agency, including in the event such officer, director,
employee, or agent is deceased, his or her estate or personal
representative.
(d) "Health care professional" means:
(i) Any health care provider described in RCW 7.70.020 (1) and (2);
(ii) Any clinic, corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, or limited liability partnership comprised of one or more
of the health care providers described in RCW 7.70.020(1), and any
officer, director, employee, agent, or apparent agent thereof acting
within the scope of his or her employment or agency, including in the
event such officer, director, employee, agent, or apparent agent is
deceased, his or her estate or personal representative; or
(iii) Any entity, facility, or institution that is owned or
operated by a health care provider described in RCW 7.70.020(1), or by
a clinic, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or
limited liability partnership comprised of one or more of the health
care providers described in RCW 7.70.020(1), and any officer, director,
employee, agent, or apparent agent thereof acting in the course and
scope of his or her employment or agency, including in the event such
officer, director, employee, agent, or apparent agent is deceased, his
or her estate or personal representative.
(e) "Health care provider" means any person or entity described in
RCW 7.70.020.
(f) "Noneconomic damages" has the meaning set forth in RCW
4.56.250(1)(b).

Sec. 9 RCW 7.70.020 and 1995 c 323 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter "health care provider" means either:
(1) A person licensed, registered, or certified by this state to
provide health care or related services, including, but not limited to,
a licensed acupuncturist, a physician, an osteopathic physician, a
dentist, a nurse, an optometrist, a podiatric physician and surgeon, a
chiropractor, a physical therapist, a psychologist, a pharmacist, an
optician, a physician's assistant, a midwife, an osteopathic
physician's assistant, an advanced registered nurse practitioner, a
drugless healer, a naturopath, a dental hygienist, a denturist, an
ocularist, an occupational therapist, a pharmacy assistant, a
radiologic technologist, a nursing assistant, a respiratory care
practitioner, a health care assistant, a dietician, a nutritionist, a
surgical technologist, a mental health counselor, a marriage and family
therapist, a social worker, or a physician's trained mobile intensive
care paramedic, including, in the event such person is deceased, his or
her estate or personal representative;
(2) An employee or agent of a person described in ((part))
subsection (1) ((above)) of this section, acting in the course and
scope of his or her employment or agency, including, in the event such
employee or agent is deceased, his or her estate or personal
representative; or
(3) An entity, whether or not incorporated, facility, or
institution employing one or more persons described in ((part))
subsection (1) ((above)) of this section, including, but not limited
to, a hospital, clinic, health maintenance organization, or nursing
home; or an officer, director, employee, or agent thereof acting in the
course and scope of his or her employment or agency, including in the
event such officer, director, employee, or agent is deceased, his or
her estate or personal representative.

Sec. 10 RCW 7.70.070 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 56 s 12 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as set forth in subsection (2) of this section, the
court shall, in any action under this chapter, determine the
reasonableness of each party's attorneys' fees. The court shall take
into consideration the following:
(((1))) (a) The time and labor required, the novelty and difficulty
of the questions involved, and the skill requisite to perform the legal
service properly;
(((2))) (b) The likelihood, if apparent to the client, that the
acceptance of the particular employment will preclude other employment
by the lawyer;
(((3))) (c) The fee customarily charged in the locality for similar
legal services;
(((4))) (d) The amount involved and the results obtained;
(((5))) (e) The time limitations imposed by the client or by the
circumstances;
(((6))) (f) The nature and length of the professional relationship
with the client;
(((7))) (g) The experience, reputation, and ability of the lawyer
or lawyers performing the services;
(((8))) (h) Whether the fee is fixed or contingent.
(2)(a) An attorney may not contract for or collect a contingency
fee for representing a person in connection with an action for damages
for injury or death occurring as a result of health care or related
services, or the arranging for the provision of health care or related
services, in excess of the following limits:
(i) Forty percent of the first fifty thousand dollars recovered;
(ii) Thirty-three and one-third percent of the next fifty thousand
dollars recovered;
(iii) Twenty-five percent of the next five hundred thousand dollars
recovered;
(iv) Fifteen percent of any amount in which the recovery exceeds
six hundred thousand dollars.
(b) The limitations in this section apply regardless of whether the
recovery is by judgment, settlement, arbitration, mediation, or other
form of alternative dispute resolution.
(c) If periodic payments are awarded to the plaintiff, the court
shall place a total value on these payments and include this amount in
computing the total award from which attorneys' fees are calculated
under this subsection.
(d) For purposes of this subsection, "recovered" means the net sum
recovered after deducting any disbursements or costs incurred in
connection with the arbitration, litigation, or settlement of the
claim. Costs of medical care incurred by the plaintiff and the
attorney's office overhead costs or charges are not deductible
disbursements or costs for such purposes.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section applies to all contingency fee
arrangements or agreements, including any modification of the amount of
any contingency fee, entered into after the effective date of this
section.

Sec. 11 RCW 7.70.100 and 1993 c 492 s 419 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No action for damages for injury or death occurring as a result
of health care or related services, or the arranging for the provision
of health care or related services, may be commenced unless the
defendant has been given at least ninety days' notice of the intention
to commence the action. If the notice is served within ninety days
before the expiration of the applicable statute of limitations, the
time for the commencement of the action must be extended ninety days
from the service of the notice.
(2) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section are not
applicable with respect to any defendant whose name is unknown to the
plaintiff at the time of filing the complaint and who is identified
therein by a fictitious name.
(3) After the filing of the ninety-day presuit notice, and before
a superior court trial, all causes of action, whether based in tort,
contract, or otherwise, for damages ((arising from)) for injury or
death occurring as a result of health care or related services, or the
arranging for the provision of health care or related services,
provided after July 1, 1993, shall be subject to mandatory mediation
prior to trial.
(((2))) (4) The supreme court shall by rule adopt procedures to
implement mandatory mediation of actions under this chapter. The rules
shall require mandatory mediation without exception and address, at a
minimum:
(a) Procedures for the appointment of, and qualifications of,
mediators. A mediator shall have experience or expertise related to
actions arising from injury occurring as a result of health care, and
be a member of the state bar association who has been admitted to the
bar for a minimum of five years or who is a retired judge. The parties
may stipulate to a nonlawyer mediator. The court may prescribe
additional qualifications of mediators;
(b) Appropriate limits on the amount or manner of compensation of
mediators;
(c) The number of days following the filing of a claim ((under this
chapter)) within which a mediator must be selected;
(d) The method by which a mediator is selected. The rule shall
provide for designation of a mediator by the superior court if the
parties are unable to agree upon a mediator;
(e) The number of days following the selection of a mediator within
which a mediation conference must be held;
(f) A means by which mediation of an action ((under this chapter))
may be waived by a mediator who has determined that the claim is not
appropriate for mediation; and
(g) Any other matters deemed necessary by the court.
(((3))) (5) Mediators shall not impose discovery schedules upon the
parties.
(6) The supreme court shall by rule also adopt procedures for the
parties to certify to the court the manner of mediation used by the
parties to comply with this section.

Sec. 12 RCW 4.16.350 and 1998 c 147 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any civil action or arbitration for damages for injury or death
occurring as a result of health care or related services, or the
arranging for the provision of health care or related services, which
is provided after June 25, 1976, against((:
(1) A person licensed by this state to provide health care or
related services, including, but not limited to, a physician,
osteopathic physician, dentist, nurse, optometrist, podiatric physician
and surgeon, chiropractor, physical therapist, psychologist,
pharmacist, optician, physician's assistant, osteopathic physician's
assistant, nurse practitioner, or physician's trained mobile intensive
care paramedic, including, in the event such person is deceased, his
estate or personal representative;
(2) An employee or agent of a person described in subsection (1) of
this section, acting in the course and scope of his employment,
including, in the event such employee or agent is deceased, his estate
or personal representative; or
(3) An entity, whether or not incorporated, facility, or
institution employing one or more persons described in subsection (1)
of this section, including, but not limited to, a hospital, clinic,
health maintenance organization, or nursing home; or an officer,
director, employee, or agent thereof acting in the course and scope of
his employment, including, in the event such officer, director,
employee, or agent is deceased, his estate or personal
representative;)) a health care provider as defined in RCW 7.70.020, or
a health care institution as defined in section 8(7)(c) of this act,
based upon alleged professional negligence shall be commenced within
three years of the act or omission alleged to have caused the injury,
death, or condition, or within one year of the time the patient or his
or her representative or custodial parent or guardian discovered or
reasonably should have discovered that the injury, death, or condition
was caused by said act or omission, whichever period ((expires later,
except that in no event shall an action be commenced more than eight
years after said act or omission: PROVIDED, That the time for
commencement of an action is tolled upon proof of fraud, intentional
concealment, or the presence of a foreign body not intended to have a
therapeutic or diagnostic purpose or effect, until the date the patient
or the patient's representative has actual knowledge of the act of
fraud or concealment, or of the presence of the foreign body; the
patient or the patient's representative has one year from the date of
the actual knowledge in which to commence a civil action for damages.
For purposes of this section, notwithstanding RCW 4.16.190, the
knowledge of a custodial parent or guardian shall be imputed to a
person under the age of eighteen years, and such imputed knowledge
shall operate to bar the claim of such minor to the same extent that
the claim of an adult would be barred under this section. Any action
not commenced in accordance with this section shall be barred.
For purposes of this section, with respect to care provided after
June 25, 1976, and before August 1, 1986, the knowledge of a custodial
parent or guardian shall be imputed as of April 29, 1987, to persons
under the age of eighteen years)) occurs first.
(2) In no event may an action be commenced more than three years
after the act or omission alleged to have caused the injury or
condition except:
(a) Upon proof of fraud, intentional concealment, or the presence
of a foreign body not intended to have a therapeutic or diagnostic
purpose or effect, in which case the patient or the patient's
representative has one year from the date the patient or the patient's
representative or custodial parent or guardian has actual knowledge of
the act of fraud or concealment or of the presence of the foreign body
within which to commence a civil action for damages.
(b) In the case of a minor, upon proof that the minor's custodial
parent or guardian and the defendant or the defendant's insurer have
committed fraud or collusion in the failure to bring an action on
behalf of the minor, in which case the patient or the patient's
representative has one year from the date the patient or the patient's
representative other than the custodial parent or guardian who
committed the fraud or collusion has actual knowledge of the fraud or
collusion, or one year from the date of the minor's eighteenth
birthday, whichever provides a longer period.
(c) In the case of a minor under the full age of six years, in
which case the action on behalf of the minor must be commenced within
three years, or prior to the minor's eighth birthday, whichever
provides a longer period.
(3) For purposes of this section, the tolling provisions of RCW
4.16.190 do not apply.
(4) This section does not apply to a civil action based on
intentional conduct brought against those individuals or entities
specified in this section by a person for recovery of damages for
injury occurring as a result of childhood sexual abuse as defined in
RCW 4.16.340(5).
(5) This section applies to all causes of action for injury or
death occurring as a result of health care or related services, or the
arranging for the provision of health care or related services, filed
on or after the effective date of this section. However, any action
which, if filed on or after the effective date of this section, would
have been timely under former law, but now would be barred under the
chapter . . ., Laws of 2005 amendments contained in this section, may
be brought within one year following the effective date of this
section.
(6) Any action not commenced in accordance with this section is
barred.

Sec. 13 RCW 7.70.080 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 56 s 13 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Any party may present evidence to the trier of fact that the
patient or claimant has already been, or will be, compensated for the
injury complained of from ((any source except the assets of the
patient, his representative, or his immediate family, or insurance
purchased with such assets. In the event such evidence is admitted,
the plaintiff may present evidence of an obligation to repay such
compensation. Insurance bargained for or provided on behalf of an
employee shall be considered insurance purchased with the assets of the
employee)) a collateral source. In the event the evidence is admitted,
the other party may present evidence of any amount that was paid or
contributed to secure the right to any compensation. Compensation as
used in this section shall mean payment of money or other property to
or on behalf of the patient or claimant, rendering of services to the
patient free of charge to the patient or claimant, or indemnification
of expenses incurred by or on behalf of the patient or claimant.
Notwithstanding this section, evidence of compensation by a defendant
health care provider may be offered only by that provider.
(2) Unless otherwise provided by superseding federal law, there is
no right of subrogation or reimbursement from the patient's or
claimant's tort recovery with respect to compensation covered in
subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 7.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A contract for health care or related services that contains a
provision for arbitration of a dispute as to professional negligence of
a health care provider as defined in RCW 7.70.020, whether brought
under chapter 7.70 RCW, RCW 4.20.010, 4.20.020, 4.20.046, 4.20.060, or
4.24.010, any other applicable law, or any combination thereof, must
have the provision as the first article of the contract and the
provision must be expressed in the following language:
"It is understood that any dispute as to medical malpractice that
is as to whether any health care or related services rendered under
this contract were unnecessary or unauthorized or were improperly,
negligently, or incompetently rendered, will be determined by
submission to arbitration as provided by Washington law, and not by a
lawsuit or resort to court process except as Washington law provides
for judicial review of arbitration proceedings. Both parties to this
contract, by entering into it, are giving up their constitutional right
to have such a dispute decided in a court of law before a jury, and
instead are accepting the use of arbitration."
(2) Immediately before the signature line provided for the
individual contracting for the health care or related services, there
must appear the following in at least ten-point bold red type:
"NOTICE: BY SIGNING THIS CONTRACT YOU ARE AGREEING TO HAVE ANY
ISSUE OF MALPRACTICE DECIDED BY NEUTRAL ARBITRATION AND YOU ARE GIVING
UP YOUR RIGHT TO A JURY OR COURT TRIAL. SEE ARTICLE ONE OF THIS
CONTRACT."
(3) Once signed, such a contract governs all subsequent open-book
account transactions for health care or related services for which the
contract was signed until or unless rescinded by written notice within
thirty days of signature. Written notice of such rescission may be
given by a guardian or other legal representative of the patient if the
patient is incapacitated or a minor.
(4) Where the contract is one for health care or related services
to a minor, it may not be disaffirmed if signed by the minor's parent
or legal guardian.
(5) A contract for the provision of health care or related services
that contains a provision for arbitration of a dispute as to
professional negligence of a health care provider shall not be deemed
a contract of adhesion, or unconscionable, or otherwise improper, where
it complies with subsections (1) through (3) of this section.
(6) Subsections (1) through (3) of this section do not apply to any
health benefit plan contract offered by an organization regulated under
Title 48 RCW that has been negotiated to contain an arbitration
agreement with subscribers and enrollees under such a contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
RCW 7.70.100, 7.70.110, 7.70.120, and 7.70.130 do not apply if
there is a contract for binding arbitration under section 14 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Future damages" includes damages for future health care or
related services, care or custody, loss of future earnings, loss of
bodily function, or future pain and suffering of the judgment creditor.
(b) "Periodic payments" means the payment of money or delivery of
other property to the judgment creditor at regular intervals.
(2) In any action for damages for injury occurring as a result of
health care or related services, or for the arranging for the provision
of health care or related services, the court shall, at the request of
either party, enter a judgment ordering that money damages or its
equivalent for future damages of the judgment creditor be paid in whole
or in part by periodic payments rather than by a lump-sum payment if
the award equals or exceeds fifty thousand dollars in future damages.
In entering a judgment ordering the payment of future damages by
periodic payments, the court shall make a specific finding as to the
dollar amount of periodic payments which will compensate the judgment
creditor for such future damages. As a condition to authorizing
periodic payments of future damages, the court shall require the
judgment debtor who is not adequately insured to post security adequate
to ensure full payment of such damages awarded by the judgment. Upon
termination of periodic payments of future damages, the court shall
order the return of this security, or so much as remains, to the
judgment debtor.
(3)(a) The judgment ordering the payment of future damages by
periodic payments must specify the recipient or recipients of the
payments, the dollar amount of the payments, the interval between
payments, and the number of payments or the period of time over which
payments must be made. The payments are only subject to modification
in the event of the death of the judgment creditor.
(b) In the event that the court finds that the judgment debtor has
exhibited a continuing pattern of failing to make the payments, as
specified in (a) of this subsection, the court shall find the judgment
debtor in contempt of court and, in addition to the required periodic
payments, shall order the judgment debtor to pay the judgment creditor
all damages caused by the failure to make such periodic payments,
including court costs and attorneys' fees.
(4) In the event of the death of the judgment creditor, the court,
upon petition of any party in interest, shall modify the judgment to
eliminate future periodic payments of damages awarded for future
medical treatment, care or custody, loss of bodily function, or future
pain and suffering of the judgment creditor. However, money damages
awarded for loss of future earnings may not be reduced or payments
terminated by reason of the death of the judgment creditor, but must be
paid to persons to whom the judgment creditor owed a duty of support,
as provided by law, immediately prior to his or her death. In such
cases, the court that rendered the original judgment may, upon petition
of any party in interest, modify the judgment to award and apportion
the unpaid future damages in accordance with this subsection (4).
(5) Following the occurrence or expiration of all obligations
specified in the periodic payment judgment, any obligation of the
judgment debtor to make further payments ceases and any security given
under subsection (2) of this section reverts to the judgment debtor.
(6) For purposes of this section, the provisions of RCW 4.56.250 do
not apply.
(7) It is intended in enacting this section to authorize, in
actions for damages for injury occurring as a result of health care or
related services, or the arranging for the provision of health care or
related services, the entry of judgments that provide for the payment
of future damages through periodic payments rather than lump-sum
payments. By authorizing periodic payment judgments, it is further
intended that the courts will utilize such judgments to provide
compensation sufficient to meet the needs of an injured plaintiff and
those persons who are dependent on the plaintiff for whatever period is
necessary while eliminating the potential windfall from a lump-sum
recovery that was intended to provide for the care of an injured
plaintiff over an extended period who then dies shortly after the
judgment is paid, leaving the balance of the judgment award to persons
and purposes for which it was not intended. It is also intended that
all elements of the periodic payment program be specified with
certainty in the judgment ordering such payments and that the judgment
not be subject to modification at some future time that might alter the
specifications of the original judgment, except in the event of the
death of the judgment creditor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 It is intended in enacting sections 18 and
19 of this act that health care providers should remain personally
liable for their own negligent or wrongful acts or omissions in
connection with the provision of health care services, but that their
vicarious liability for the negligent or wrongful acts or omissions of
others should be curtailed. To that end, it is intended that Adamski
v. Tacoma General Hospital, 20 Wn. App. 98, 579 P.2d 970 (1978), and
its holding that hospitals may be held liable for a physician's acts or
omissions under so-called "apparent agency" or "ostensible agency"
theories should be reversed, so that hospitals will not be liable for
the act or omission of a health care provider granted hospital
privileges unless the health care provider is an actual agent or
employee of the hospital. It is further intended that, notwithstanding
any generally applicable principle of vicarious liability to the
contrary, individual health care professionals will not be liable for
the negligent or wrongful acts of others, except those who were acting
under their direct supervision and control.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
A public or private hospital shall be liable for an act or omission
of a health care provider granted privileges to provide health care at
the hospital only if the health care provider is an actual agent or
employee of the hospital and the act or omission of the health care
provider occurred while the health care provider was acting within the
course and scope of the health care provider's agency or employment
with the hospital.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
A person who is a health care provider under RCW 7.70.020 (1) or
(2) shall not be personally liable for any act or omission of any other
health care provider who was not the person's actual agent or employee
or who was not acting under the person's direct supervision and control
at the time of the act or omission.

Sec. 20 RCW 74.34.200 and 1999 c 176 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to other remedies available under the law, a
vulnerable adult who has been subjected to abandonment, abuse,
financial exploitation, or neglect either while residing in a facility
or in the case of a person residing at home who receives care from a
home health, hospice, or home care agency, or an individual provider,
shall have a cause of action for damages on account of his or her
injuries, pain and suffering, and loss of property sustained thereby.
This action shall be available where the defendant is or was a
corporation, trust, unincorporated association, partnership,
administrator, employee, agent, officer, partner, or director of a
facility, or of a home health, hospice, or home care agency licensed or
required to be licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, as now or
subsequently designated, or an individual provider.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature, however, that where there
is a dispute about the care or treatment of a vulnerable adult, the
parties should use the least formal means available to try to resolve
the dispute. Where feasible, parties are encouraged but not mandated
to employ direct discussion with the health care provider, use of the
long-term care ombudsman or other intermediaries, and, when necessary,
recourse through licensing or other regulatory authorities.
(3) In an action brought under this section, a prevailing plaintiff
shall be awarded his or her actual damages, together with the costs of
the suit((, including a reasonable attorney's fee)). The term "costs"
includes((, but is not limited to,)) the reasonable fees for a
guardian((,)) and guardian ad litem, ((and experts,)) if any, that
((may be)) were necessary to the litigation of a claim brought under
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 In the event that the Washington state
supreme court or other court of competent jurisdiction rules or affirms
that section 8 of this act is unconstitutional, then the prescribed
limitations on noneconomic damages set forth in section 8 of this act
take effect upon the ratification of a state constitutional amendment
that empowers the legislature to enact limits on the amount of
noneconomic damages recoverable in any or all civil causes of action or
upon the enactment by the United States congress of a law permitting
such limitations on noneconomic damages, whichever occurs first.

Sec. 22 RCW 4.22.070 and 1993 c 496 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In all actions involving fault of more than one entity, the
trier of fact shall determine the percentage of the total fault which
is attributable to every entity which caused the claimant's damages
except entities immune from liability to the claimant under Title 51
RCW. The sum of the percentages of the total fault attributed to at-fault entities shall equal one hundred percent. The entities whose
fault shall be determined include the claimant or person suffering
personal injury or incurring property damage, defendants, third-party
defendants, entities ((released by)) who have entered into a release,
covenant not to sue, covenant not to enforce judgment, or similar
agreement with the claimant, entities with any other individual defense
against the claimant, and entities immune from liability to the
claimant, but shall not include those entities immune from liability to
the claimant under Title 51 RCW. Judgment shall be entered against
each defendant except those entities who have ((been released by))
entered into a release, covenant not to sue, covenant not to enforce
judgment, or similar agreement with the claimant or are immune from
liability to the claimant or have prevailed on any other individual
defense against the claimant in an amount which represents that party's
proportionate share of the claimant's total damages. The liability of
each defendant shall be several only and shall not be joint except:
(a) A party shall be responsible for the fault of another person or
for payment of the proportionate share of another party where both were
acting in concert or when a person was acting as an agent or servant of
the party.
(b) If the trier of fact determines that the claimant or party
suffering bodily injury or incurring property damages was not at fault,
the defendants against whom judgment is entered shall be jointly and
severally liable for the sum of their proportionate shares of the
((claimants [claimant's])) claimant's total damages.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1)(a) and (b) of
this section, in an action for damages for injury or death occurring as
a result of health care or related services, or the arranging for the
provision of health care or related services, whether brought under
chapter 7.70 RCW, RCW 4.20.010, 4.20.020, 4.20.046, 4.24.010, or
48.43.545(1), any other applicable law, or any combination thereof, the
liability of each health care provider, health care professional, and
health care institution, as those terms are defined in section 8(7) of
this act, shall be several only except that a party shall be
responsible for the fault of another person or for payment of the
proportionate share of another party where both were acting in concert
or when a person was acting as the actual agent or servant of the party
or was acting under the party's direct supervision and control.
(3) If a defendant is jointly and severally liable under one of the
exceptions listed in subsection((s)) (1)(a) ((or (1))), (b), or (2) of
this section, such defendant's rights to contribution against another
jointly and severally liable defendant, and the effect of settlement by
either such defendant, shall be determined under RCW 4.22.040,
4.22.050, and 4.22.060.
(((3))) (4)(a) Nothing in this section affects any cause of action
relating to hazardous wastes or substances or solid waste disposal
sites.
(b) Nothing in this section shall affect a cause of action arising
from the tortious interference with contracts or business relations.
(c) Nothing in this section shall affect any cause of action
arising from the manufacture or marketing of a fungible product in a
generic form which contains no clearly identifiable shape, color, or
marking.

Sec. 23 RCW 4.22.015 and 1981 c 27 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Fault" includes acts or omissions, including misuse of a product,
that are in any measure negligent or reckless toward the person or
property of the actor or others, or that subject a person to strict
tort liability or liability on a product liability claim. The term
also includes breach of warranty, unreasonable assumption of risk, and
unreasonable failure to avoid an injury or to mitigate damages. Legal
requirements of causal relation apply both to fault as the basis for
liability and to contributory fault.
A comparison of fault for any purpose under RCW 4.22.005 through
((4.22.060)) 4.22.070 shall involve consideration of both the nature of
the conduct of the parties to the action and the extent of the causal
relation between such conduct and the damages.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 Sections 7 through 9, 13, 16 through 20,
22, and 23 of this act apply to all causes of action, whether filed or
not, that the parties have not settled or in which judgment has not
been entered before the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 Sections 11, 14, and 15 of this act apply
to all causes of action filed on or after the effective date of this
section.

--- END ---