BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.41.040 and 2003 c 53 s 26 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A person, whether an adult or juvenile, is guilty of the
crime of unlawful possession of a firearm in the first degree, if the
person owns, has in his or her possession, or has in his or her control
any firearm after having previously been convicted or found not guilty
by reason of insanity in this state or elsewhere of any serious offense
as defined in this chapter.
(b) Unlawful possession of a firearm in the first degree is a class
B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(2)(a) A person, whether an adult or juvenile, is guilty of the
crime of unlawful possession of a firearm in the second degree, if the
person does not qualify under subsection (1) of this section for the
crime of unlawful possession of a firearm in the first degree and the
person owns, has in his or her possession, or has in his or her control
any firearm:
(i) After having previously been convicted or found not guilty by
reason of insanity in this state or elsewhere of any felony not
specifically listed as prohibiting firearm possession under subsection
(1) of this section, or any of the following crimes when committed by
one family or household member against another, committed on or after
July 1, 1993: Assault in the fourth degree, coercion, stalking,
reckless endangerment, criminal trespass in the first degree, or
violation of the provisions of a protection order or no-contact order
restraining the person or excluding the person from a residence (RCW
26.50.060, 26.50.070, 26.50.130, or 10.99.040);
(ii) After having previously been involuntarily committed for
mental health treatment under RCW 71.05.320, 71.34.090, chapter 10.77
RCW, or equivalent statutes of another jurisdiction, unless his or her
right to possess a firearm has been restored as provided in RCW
9.41.047;
(iii) If the person is under eighteen years of age, except as
provided in RCW 9.41.042; and/or
(iv) If the person is free on bond or personal recognizance pending
trial, appeal, or sentencing for a serious offense as defined in RCW
9.41.010.
(b) Unlawful possession of a firearm in the second degree is a
class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(3) Notwithstanding RCW 9.41.047 or any other provisions of law, as
used in this chapter, a person has been "convicted", whether in an
adult court or adjudicated in a juvenile court, at such time as a plea
of guilty has been accepted, or a verdict of guilty has been filed,
notwithstanding the pendency of any future proceedings including but
not limited to sentencing or disposition, post-trial or post-factfinding motions, and appeals. Conviction includes a dismissal
entered after a period of probation, suspension or deferral of
sentence, and also includes equivalent dispositions by courts in
jurisdictions other than Washington state. A person shall not be
precluded from possession of a firearm if the conviction has been the
subject of a pardon, annulment, certificate of rehabilitation, or other
equivalent procedure based on a finding of the rehabilitation of the
person convicted or the conviction or disposition has been the subject
of a pardon, annulment, or other equivalent procedure based on a
finding of innocence. Where no record of the court's disposition of
the charges can be found, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that
the person was not convicted of the charge.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (1) or (2) of this section, a person
convicted of an offense prohibiting the possession of a firearm under
this section other than murder, manslaughter, robbery, rape, indecent
liberties, arson, assault, kidnapping, extortion, burglary, or
violations with respect to controlled substances under RCW 69.50.401
and 69.50.410, who received a probationary sentence under RCW 9.95.200,
and who received a dismissal of the charge under RCW 9.95.240, shall
not be precluded from possession of a firearm as a result of the
conviction. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, if
a person is prohibited from possession of a firearm under subsection
(1) or (2) of this section and has not previously been convicted of a
sex offense prohibiting firearm ownership under subsection (1) or (2)
of this section and/or any felony defined under any law as a class A
felony or with a maximum sentence of at least twenty years, or both,
the individual may petition a court of record to have his or her right
to possess a firearm restored:
(a) Under RCW 9.41.047; and/or
(b)(i) If the conviction was for a felony offense, after five or
more consecutive years in the community without being convicted or
currently charged with any felony, gross misdemeanor, or misdemeanor
crimes, if the individual has no prior felony convictions that prohibit
the possession of a firearm counted as part of the offender score under
RCW 9.94A.525; or
(ii) If the conviction was for a nonfelony offense, after three or
more consecutive years in the community without being convicted or
currently charged with any felony, gross misdemeanor, or misdemeanor
crimes, if the individual has no prior felony convictions that prohibit
the possession of a firearm counted as part of the offender score under
RCW 9.94A.525 and the individual has completed all conditions of the
sentence.
(5) In addition to any other penalty provided for by law, if a
person under the age of eighteen years is found by a court to have
possessed a firearm in a vehicle in violation of subsection (1) or (2)
of this section or to have committed an offense while armed with a
firearm during which offense a motor vehicle served an integral
function, the court shall notify the department of licensing within
twenty-four hours and the person's privilege to drive shall be revoked
under RCW 46.20.265.
(6) Nothing in chapter 129, Laws of 1995 shall ever be construed or
interpreted as preventing an offender from being charged and
subsequently convicted for the separate felony crimes of theft of a
firearm or possession of a stolen firearm, or both, in addition to
being charged and subsequently convicted under this section for
unlawful possession of a firearm in the first or second degree.
Notwithstanding any other law, if the offender is convicted under this
section for unlawful possession of a firearm in the first or second
degree and for the felony crimes of theft of a firearm or possession of
a stolen firearm, or both, then the offender shall serve consecutive
sentences for each of the felony crimes of conviction listed in this
subsection.
(7) Each firearm unlawfully possessed under this section shall be
a separate offense.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.41.047 and 1996 c 295 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At the time a person is convicted or found not guilty by reason
of insanity of an offense making the person ineligible to possess a
firearm, or at the time a person is committed by court order under RCW
71.05.320, 71.34.090, or chapter 10.77 RCW for mental health treatment,
the convicting or committing court shall notify the person, orally and
in writing, that the person must immediately surrender any concealed
pistol license and that the person may not possess a firearm unless his
or her right to do so is restored by a court of record. For purposes
of this section a convicting court includes a court in which a person
has been found not guilty by reason of insanity.
The convicting or committing court also shall forward a copy of the
person's driver's license or identicard, or comparable information, to
the department of licensing, along with the date of conviction or
commitment.
(2) Upon receipt of the information provided for by subsection (1)
of this section, the department of licensing shall determine if the
convicted or committed person has a concealed pistol license. If the
person does have a concealed pistol license, the department of
licensing shall immediately notify the license-issuing authority which,
upon receipt of such notification, shall immediately revoke the
license.
(3)(a) A person who is prohibited from possessing a firearm, by
reason of having been involuntarily committed for mental health
treatment under RCW 71.05.320, 71.34.090, chapter 10.77 RCW, or
equivalent statutes of another jurisdiction may, upon discharge,
petition a court of record to have his or her right to possess a
firearm restored. At the time of commitment, the court shall
specifically state to the person that he or she is barred from
possession of firearms.
(b) The secretary of social and health services shall develop
appropriate rules to create an approval process under this subsection.
The rules must provide for the restoration of the right to possess a
firearm upon a showing in a court of competent jurisdiction that the
person is no longer required to participate in an inpatient or
outpatient treatment program, is no longer required to take medication
to treat any condition related to the commitment, and does not present
a substantial danger to himself or herself, others, or the public.
Unlawful possession of a firearm under this subsection shall be
punished as a class C felony under chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(c) A person petitioning the court under this subsection (3) shall
bear the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that the
circumstances resulting in the commitment no longer exist and are not
reasonably likely to recur. If a preponderance of the evidence in the
record supports a finding that the person petitioning the court has
engaged in violence and that it is more likely than not that the person
will engage in violence after his or her right to possess a firearm is
restored, the person shall bear the burden of proving by clear, cogent,
and convincing evidence that he or she does not present a substantial
danger to the safety of others.
(4) No person who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity
may petition a court for restoration of the right to possess a firearm
unless the person meets the requirements for the restoration of the
right to possess a firearm that would have applied under RCW
9.41.040(4) if the person had been found guilty of the crime.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements, the conflicting part of this act is
hereby declared to be inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict,
and such finding or determination does not affect the operation of the
remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---