BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.14.0201 and 2004 c 260 s 24 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "taxpayer" means a health maintenance
organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020, a health care service
contractor as defined in RCW 48.44.010, or a self-funded multiple
employer welfare arrangement as defined in RCW 48.125.010.
(2) Each taxpayer shall pay a tax on or before the first day of
March of each year to the state treasurer through the insurance
commissioner's office. The tax shall be equal to the total amount of
all premiums and prepayments for health care services received by the
taxpayer during the preceding calendar year multiplied by the rate of
two percent.
(3) Taxpayers shall prepay their tax obligations under this
section. The minimum amount of the prepayments shall be percentages of
the taxpayer's tax obligation for the preceding calendar year
recomputed using the rate in effect for the current year. For the
prepayment of taxes due during the first calendar year, the minimum
amount of the prepayments shall be percentages of the taxpayer's tax
obligation that would have been due had the tax been in effect during
the previous calendar year. The tax prepayments shall be paid to the
state treasurer through the commissioner's office by the due dates and
in the following amounts:
(a) On or before June 15, forty-five percent;
(b) On or before September 15, twenty-five percent;
(c) On or before December 15, twenty-five percent.
(4) For good cause demonstrated in writing, the commissioner may
approve an amount smaller than the preceding calendar year's tax
obligation as recomputed for calculating the health maintenance
organization's, health care service contractor's, self-funded multiple
employer welfare arrangement's, or certified health plan's prepayment
obligations for the current tax year.
(5) Moneys collected under this section shall be deposited in the
general fund through March 31, 1996, and in the health services account
under RCW 43.72.900 after March 31, 1996.
(6) The taxes imposed in this section do not apply to:
(a) Amounts received by any taxpayer from the United States or any
instrumentality thereof as prepayments for health care services
provided under Title XVIII (medicare) of the federal social security
act.
(b) Amounts received by any taxpayer from the state of Washington
as prepayments for health care services provided under:
(i) The medical care services program as provided in RCW 74.09.035;
(ii) The Washington basic health plan on behalf of subsidized
enrollees as provided in chapter 70.47 RCW; or
(iii) The medicaid program on behalf of elderly or disabled clients
as provided in chapter 74.09 RCW when these prepayments are associated
with a managed care contracting program that has been implemented on a
demonstration or pilot project basis.
(c) Amounts received by any health care service contractor, as
defined in RCW 48.44.010, as prepayments for health care services
included within the definition of practice of dentistry under RCW
18.32.020.
(((c))) (d) Participant contributions to self-funded multiple
employer welfare arrangements that are not taxable in this state.
(7) Beginning January 1, 2000, the state does hereby preempt the
field of imposing excise or privilege taxes upon taxpayers and no
county, city, town, or other municipal subdivision shall have the right
to impose any such taxes upon such taxpayers. This subsection shall be
limited to premiums and payments for health benefit plans offered by
health care service contractors under chapter 48.44 RCW, health
maintenance organizations under chapter 48.46 RCW, and self-funded
multiple employer welfare arrangements as defined in RCW 48.125.010.
The preemption authorized by this subsection shall not impair the
ability of a county, city, town, or other municipal subdivision to
impose excise or privilege taxes upon the health care services directly
delivered by the employees of a health maintenance organization under
chapter 48.46 RCW.
(8) The taxes imposed by this section apply to a self-funded
multiple employer welfare arrangement only in the event that they are
not preempted by the employee retirement income security act of 1974,
as amended, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 1001 et seq. The arrangements and the
commissioner shall initially request an advisory opinion from the
United States department of labor or obtain a declaratory ruling from
a federal court on the legality of imposing state premium taxes on
these arrangements. If there has not been a final determination by the
United States department of labor or a federal court that the taxes are
not preempted by federal law, the taxes provided for in this section
become effective on March 1, 2005, or thirty days following the
issuance of a certificate of authority, whichever is later. During the
time period between March 1, 2005, or thirty days following the
issuance of a certificate of authority, whichever is later, and the
final determination by the United States department of labor or a
federal court, any taxes shall be deposited in an interest bearing
escrow account maintained by the (([self-funded])) self-funded multiple
employer welfare arrangement. Upon a final determination that the
taxes are not preempted by the employee retirement income security act
of 1974, as amended, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 1001 et seq., all funds in the
interest bearing escrow account shall be transferred to the state
treasurer.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.41.090 and 2000 c 79 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Following the close of each accounting year, the pool
administrator shall determine the net premium (premiums less
administrative expense allowances), the pool expenses of
administration, and incurred losses for the year, taking into account
investment income and other appropriate gains and losses.
(2)(a) Each member's proportion of participation in the pool shall
be determined annually by the board based on annual statements and
other reports deemed necessary by the board and filed by the member
with the commissioner; and shall be determined by multiplying the total
cost of pool operation by a fraction. The numerator of the fraction
equals that member's total number of resident insured persons,
including spouse and dependents, covered under all health plans in the
state by that member during the preceding calendar year. The
denominator of the fraction equals the total number of resident insured
persons, including spouses and dependents, covered under all health
plans in the state by all pool members during the preceding calendar
year.
(b) For purposes of calculating the numerator and the denominator
under (a) of this subsection:
(i) All health plans in the state by the state health care
authority include only the uniform medical plan; ((and))
(ii) Each ten resident insured persons, including spouse and
dependents, under a stop loss plan or the uniform medical plan shall
count as one resident insured person; and
(iii) Health plans established to serve elderly or disabled
medicaid clients under chapter 74.09 RCW when the plan has been
implemented on a demonstration or pilot project basis or to serve
medical care services program clients under RCW 74.09.035 are exempted
from the calculation.
(c) Except as provided in RCW 48.41.037, any deficit incurred by
the pool shall be recouped by assessments among members apportioned
under this subsection pursuant to the formula set forth by the board
among members.
(3) The board may abate or defer, in whole or in part, the
assessment of a member if, in the opinion of the board, payment of the
assessment would endanger the ability of the member to fulfill its
contractual obligations. If an assessment against a member is abated
or deferred in whole or in part, the amount by which such assessment is
abated or deferred may be assessed against the other members in a
manner consistent with the basis for assessments set forth in
subsection (2) of this section. The member receiving such abatement or
deferment shall remain liable to the pool for the deficiency.
(4) If assessments exceed actual losses and administrative expenses
of the pool, the excess shall be held at interest and used by the board
to offset future losses or to reduce pool premiums. As used in this
subsection, "future losses" includes reserves for incurred but not
reported claims.

--- END ---