BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79.64.110 and 2003 c 334 s 207 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any moneys derived from the lease of state forest lands or from the
sale of valuable materials, oils, gases, coal, minerals, or fossils
from those lands, must be distributed as follows:
(1) State forest lands acquired through RCW 79.22.040 or by
exchange for lands acquired through RCW 79.22.040:
(a) The expense incurred by the state for administration,
reforestation, and protection, not to exceed twenty-five percent, which
rate of percentage shall be determined by the board, must be returned
to the forest development account in the state general fund.
(b) Any balance remaining must be paid to the county in which the
land is located to be paid, distributed, and prorated, except as
otherwise provided in this section, to the various funds in the same
manner as general taxes are paid and distributed during the year of
payment, except that no distribution may be made to the state general
fund. Revenues that would otherwise be dedicated to the state general
fund must be redistributed proportionally among the other funds
receiving general tax revenue.
(c) Any balance remaining, paid to a county with a population of
less than sixteen thousand, must first be applied to the reduction of
any indebtedness existing in the current expense fund of the county
during the year of payment.
(d) With regard to moneys remaining under this subsection (1),
within seven working days of receipt of these moneys, the department
shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts to be distributed to
the counties. The state treasurer shall distribute funds to the
counties four times per month, with no more than ten days between each
payment date.
(2) State forest lands acquired through RCW 79.22.010 or by
exchange for lands acquired through RCW 79.22.010, except as provided
in RCW 79.64.120:
(a) Fifty percent shall be placed in the forest development
account.
(b) Fifty percent shall be prorated and distributed to the state
general fund, to be dedicated for the benefit of the public schools,
and the county in which the land is located according to the relative
proportions of tax levies of all taxing districts in the county. The
portion to be distributed to the state general fund shall be based on
the regular school levy rate under RCW 84.52.065 and the levy rate for
any maintenance and operation special school levies. With regard to
the portion to be distributed to the counties, the department shall
certify to the state treasurer the amounts to be distributed within
seven working days of receipt of the money. The state treasurer shall
distribute funds to the counties four times per month, with no more
than ten days between each payment date. The money distributed to the
county must be paid, distributed, and prorated to the various other
funds in the same manner as general taxes are paid and distributed
during the year of payment.

--- END ---