BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If the department finds that the failure of a taxpayer to file
an annual survey under RCW 82.04.4452 by the due date was the result of
circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer, the department shall
extend the time for filing the survey. Such extension shall be for a
period of thirty days from the date the department issues its written
notification to the taxpayer that it qualifies for an extension under
this section. The department may grant additional extensions as it
deems proper.
(2) In making a determination whether the failure of a taxpayer to
file an annual survey by the due date was the result of circumstances
beyond the control of the taxpayer, the department shall be guided by
WAC 458-20-228 relating to the waiver or cancellation of penalties when
the underpayment or untimely payment of any tax was due to
circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Persons required to file surveys under RCW 82.04.4452 must
electronically file with the department all surveys, returns, and any
other forms or information the department requires in an electronic
format as provided or approved by the department, unless the department
grants relief under subsection (2) of this section. As used in this
section, "returns" has the same meaning as "return" in RCW 82.32.050.
(2) Upon request, the department may relieve a person of the
obligations in subsection (1) of this section if the person's taxes
have been reduced a cumulative total of less than one thousand dollars
from all of the credits, exemptions, or preferential business and
occupation tax rates, for which a person is required to file an annual
survey under RCW 82.04.4452, 82.04.4483, 82.04.4484, 82.32.535,
82.32.545, 82.32.570, 82.32.560, 82.60.070, 82.62.050, or 82.63.020.
(3) Persons who no longer qualify for relief under subsection (2)
of this section will be notified in writing by the department and must
comply with subsection (1) of this section by the date provided in the
notice.
(4) Any survey, return, or any other form or information required
to be filed in an electronic format under subsection (1) of this
section is not filed until received by the department in an electronic
format.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.04.4452 and 2004 c 2 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for each person whose research and development spending during
the year in which the credit is claimed exceeds 0.92 percent of the
person's taxable amount during the same calendar year.
(2) The credit shall be calculated as follows: (a) Determine the
greater of the amount of qualified research and development
expenditures of a person or eighty percent of amounts received by a
person other than a public educational or research institution in
compensation for the conduct of qualified research and development; (b)
subtract 0.92 percent of the person's taxable amount from the amount
determined under (a) of this subsection; (c) multiply the amount
determined under (b) of this subsection by ((the rate provided in RCW
82.04.260(3) in the case of a nonprofit corporation or nonprofit
association engaging within this state in research and development,
and)) the person's average tax rate for ((every other person)) the
calendar year for which the credit is claimed. For purposes of
calculating the credit, if a person's reporting period is less than
annual, the person may use an estimated average tax rate for the
calendar year for which the credit is claimed by using the person's
average tax rate for each reporting period. A person who uses an
estimated average tax rate must make an adjustment to the total credit
claimed for the calendar year using the person's actual average tax
rate for the calendar year when the person files its last return for
the calendar year for which the credit is claimed.
(3) Any person entitled to the credit provided in subsection (2) of
this section as a result of qualified research and development
conducted under contract may assign all or any portion of the credit to
the person contracting for the performance of the qualified research
and development.
(4) The credit, including any credit assigned to a person under
subsection (3) of this section, shall be ((taken)) claimed against
taxes due for the same calendar year in which the qualified research
and development expenditures are incurred. The credit, including any
credit assigned to a person under subsection (3) of this section, for
each calendar year shall not exceed the lesser of two million dollars
or the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter for the calendar
year.
(5) For any person ((taking)) claiming the credit, including any
credit assigned to a person under subsection (3) of this section, whose
research and development spending during the calendar year in which the
credit is claimed fails to exceed 0.92 percent of the person's taxable
amount during the same calendar year ((shall be liable for payment of
the additional)), the department shall declare the taxes ((represented
by the amount of)) against which the credit ((taken together with)) was
claimed to be immediately due and payable. The department shall assess
interest, but not penalties, on the taxes against which the credit was
claimed. Interest shall be ((due)) assessed at the rate provided for
delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, retroactively to the
date the credit was ((taken until the taxes are paid)) claimed, and
shall accrue until the taxes against which the credit was claimed are
repaid. Any credit assigned to a person under subsection (3) of this
section that is disallowed as a result of this section may be ((taken))
claimed by the person who performed the qualified research and
development subject to the limitations set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.
(6) ((Any person claiming the credit, and any person assigning a
credit as provided in subsection (3) of this section, shall file an
annual report in a form prescribed by the department which shall
include the amount of the credit claimed, the qualified research and
development expenditures during the calendar year for which the credit
is claimed, and the taxable amount during the calendar year for which
the credit is claimed, and such additional information as the
department may prescribe. The report is due by March 31st following
any year a credit is taken.
(7)))(a) The legislature finds that accountability and
effectiveness are important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to
make policy choices regarding the best use of limited state resources
the legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(b) A person claiming the credit shall ((agree to)) file a complete
((an)) annual survey with the department. ((The annual survey is in
addition to the annual report due under subsection (6) of this
section.)) The survey is due by March 31st following any year in which
a credit is ((taken)) claimed. The department may extend the due date
for timely filing of annual surveys under this section as provided in
section 1 of this act. The survey shall include the amount of the tax
credit ((taken)) claimed, the qualified research and development
expenditures during the calendar year for which the credit is claimed,
the taxable amount during the calendar year for which the credit is
claimed, the number of new products or research projects by general
classification, ((and)) the number of trademarks, patents, and
copyrights associated with the research and development activities for
which a credit was ((taken)) claimed, and whether the credit has been
assigned under subsection (3) of this section and who assigned the
credit. The survey shall also include the following information for
employment positions in Washington:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(c) The department may request additional information necessary to
measure the results of the tax credit program, to be submitted at the
same time as the survey.
(d) All information collected under this subsection, except the
amount of the tax credit ((taken)) claimed, is deemed taxpayer
information under RCW 82.32.330 ((and is not disclosable)).
Information on the amount of tax credit ((taken)) claimed is not
subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be
disclosed to the public upon request except that persons ((taking))
claiming less than ten thousand dollars of credit during the period
covered by the survey may request the department to treat the
tax credit amount as confidential under RCW 82.32.330.
(e) If a person fails to file a complete ((the)) annual survey
required under this subsection with the department by the due date or
any extension under section 1 of this act, the person entitled to the
credit provided in subsection (2) of this section is not eligible to
((take)) claim or assign the credit provided in subsection (2) of this
section in the year the person failed to timely file a complete ((the))
survey.
(((8))) (7) The department shall use the information from
subsection (((7))) (6) of this section to prepare summary descriptive
statistics by category. No fewer than three taxpayers shall be
included in any category. The department shall report these statistics
to the legislature each year by September 1st.
(((9))) (8) The department shall use the information from
subsection (((7))) (6) of this section to study the tax credit program
authorized under this section. The department shall report to the
legislature by December 1, 2009, and December 1, 2013. The reports
shall measure the effect of the program on job creation, the number of
jobs created for Washington residents, company growth, the introduction
of new products, the diversification of the state's economy, growth in
research and development investment, the movement of firms or the
consolidation of firms' operations into the state, and such other
factors as the department selects.
(((10))) (9) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Average tax rate" means a person's total tax liability under
this chapter for the ((reporting period)) calendar year for which the
credit is claimed divided by the taxpayer's total taxable ((income))
amount under this chapter for the ((reporting period)) calendar year
for which the credit is claimed.
(b) "Qualified research and development expenditures" means
operating expenses, including wages, compensation of a proprietor or a
partner in a partnership as determined under rules adopted by the
department, benefits, supplies, and computer expenses, directly
incurred in qualified research and development by a person claiming the
credit provided in this section. The term does not include amounts
paid to a person other than a public educational or research
institution to conduct qualified research and development. Nor does
the term include capital costs and overhead, such as expenses for land,
structures, or depreciable property.
(c) "Qualified research and development" shall have the same
meaning as in RCW 82.63.010.
(d) "Research and development spending" means qualified research
and development expenditures plus eighty percent of amounts paid to a
person other than a public educational or research institution to
conduct qualified research and development.
(e) "Taxable amount" means the taxable amount subject to the tax
imposed in this chapter required to be reported on the person's
combined excise tax returns ((during)) for the calendar year ((in)) for
which the credit is claimed, less any taxable amount for which a credit
is allowed under RCW 82.04.440.
(((11))) (10) This section expires January 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A person who owes additional tax as a
result of section 3(9)(a), chapter ..., Laws of 2005 (section 3(9)(a)
of this act) is liable for interest, but not penalties as provided in
RCW 82.32.090 (1) and (2), if the entire additional tax liability is
paid in full to the department of revenue before January 1, 2006.
Interest shall be assessed at the rate provided for delinquent excise
taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, retroactively to the date the credit was
claimed, and shall accrue until the additional tax is repaid.
(2) Persons who fail to repay the full amount of additional tax
owed as a result of section 3(9)(a), chapter ..., Laws of 2005 (section
3(9)(a) of this act) before January 1, 2006, are subject to all
applicable penalties and interest as provided in chapter 82.32 RCW on
the additional tax owing after December 31, 2005.
(3) This section expires December 31, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 3 of this act applies retroactively
to June 10, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 1 of this act applies retroactively
to annual surveys required under RCW 82.04.4452 that are due after
December 31, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Section 2 of this act takes effect January
1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 and 3 through 5 of this act are
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health,
or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect immediately.

--- END ---