BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.25.080 and 2000 c 11 s 74 are each amended to read
as follows:
Moneys transferred to the recreation resource account from the
marine fuel tax refund account may be used when appropriated by the
legislature, as well as any federal or other funds now or hereafter
available, to pay the necessary administrative and coordinative costs
of the interagency committee for outdoor recreation established by RCW
79A.25.110. All moneys so transferred, except those appropriated as
aforesaid, ((shall be divided into two equal shares and)) shall be used
to benefit watercraft recreation in this state as follows:
(1) ((One share)) As grants to state agencies for (a) acquisition
of title to, or any interests or rights in, marine recreation land, (b)
capital improvement and renovation of marine recreation land, including
periodic dredging in accordance with subsection (3) of this section, if
needed, to maintain or make the facility more useful, or (c) matching
funds in any case where federal or other funds are made available on a
matching basis for purposes described in (a) or (b) of this subsection;
(2) ((One share)) As grants to public bodies to help finance (a)
acquisition of title to, or any interests or rights in, marine
recreation land, or (b) capital improvement and renovation of marine
recreation land, including periodic dredging in accordance with
subsection (3) of this section, if needed, to maintain or make the
facility more useful. A public body is authorized to use a grant,
together with its own contribution, as matching funds in any case where
federal or other funds are made available for purposes described in (a)
or (b) of this subsection. The committee may prescribe further terms
and conditions for the making of grants in order to carry out the
purposes of this chapter.
(3) For the purposes of this section "periodic dredging" is limited
to dredging of materials that have been deposited in a channel due to
unforeseen events. This dredging should extend the expected usefulness
of the facility for at least five years.

--- END ---