BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 By December 31, 2005, the board of natural
resources shall transfer common school trust land, commonly known as
the "Harbor Pointe" parcel, located in Mukilteo, Washington, to the
city of Mukilteo for public and recreational purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of four million five hundred
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2007, from the state
building construction account to the natural resources real property
replacement account for the department of natural resources to purchase
replacement land of equal value to that transferred under section 1 of
this act, to maintain the value of the common school trust. The
maximum amount that may be expended pursuant to this appropriation may
not exceed the valuation of the land dependent on a third party
independent appraisal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---