BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART 1
EXPANDING ACCESS TO HEALTH INSURANCE THROUGH FEES ON LARGE EMPLOYERS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Most working Washingtonians obtain their health insurance
coverage through their employment;
(b) In 2004, more than six hundred thousand Washingtonians were
uninsured, and, among uninsured working age adults, most have either
one or two workers in their family;
(c) People who are covered by health insurance have better health
outcomes than those who lack coverage. Persons without health
insurance are more likely to be in poor health, more likely to have
missed needed medications and treatment, and more likely to have
chronic conditions that are not properly managed;
(d) Persons without health insurance are at significant risk of
financial ruin or personal bankruptcy;
(e) The unpaid cost of health services provided to uninsured people
is shifted to paying patients, which increases the cost of health
services for employers, individuals, and state and local government.
Controlling health care costs can be more readily achieved if a greater
share of working people and their families have health benefits; and
(f) The state of Washington provides health insurance to low-income
working families through medicaid, the state children's health
insurance program, and the basic health plan. These programs are
paying the cost of coverage for some people who work for large
employers who do not offer affordable health care coverage to their
employees. The state also funds hospitals, community clinics, and
other safety net providers that provide care to those working people
whose employers do not provide affordable health coverage to their
workers as well as to other uninsured persons.
(2) It is therefore the intent of the legislature to:
(a) Expand access to health care by increasing the number of large
employers who provide health benefits to their employees and imposing
a fee on large employers who do not offer such benefits. Fee revenues
will be used to fund basic health plan coverage for as many employees
of employers paying the fee as the fee revenues can support. However,
consistent with this act, large employers can reduce or eliminate their
fee through expenditures on health services for their employees;
(b) Maintain existing protections in law for persons eligible for
medical assistance programs, the state children's health insurance
program, and the basic health plan.
(3) In enacting this act, it is not the intent of the legislature
to influence the content or administration of employee benefit plans,
and the legislature is neutral as to whether large employers choose to
pay the tax or provide health services to their employees and
dependents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Administrator" means the administrator of the state health
care authority, as established in chapter 41.05 RCW.
(2) "Authority" means the state health care authority, as
established in chapter 41.05 RCW.
(3) "Basic health plan" means the program established in chapter
70.47 RCW.
(4) "Employee" means a person in employment under Title 50 RCW who
has worked for an employer for at least three months.
(5) "Fee" means the fee as determined in sections 103 and 104 of
this act.
(6) "Large employer" means an employer as defined in RCW 50.04.080
who, on at least fifty percent of its working days during the preceding
calendar quarter, had fifty or more people in employment within this
state, and is not formed primarily for purposes of buying health
insurance. In determining the number of people in employment,
companies that are affiliated companies, or that are eligible to file
a combined tax return for purposes of taxation by this state, are
considered an employer.
(7) "Medicaid" means Title XIX of the federal social security act,
as administered by the department of social and health services under
chapter 74.09 RCW.
(8) "State children's health insurance program" means the program
established under RCW 74.09.450 and administered by the department of
social and health services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 (1) Except as otherwise provided in this
chapter, beginning January 1, 2006, each large employer shall pay a fee
to the extent required in this section.
(2) The administrator shall establish the amount of the fee as
follows:
(a) On a calendar year basis, based upon the results of its basic
health plan procurement for that calendar year, the administrator shall
determine the monthly cost of providing basic health plan coverage to
an adult. That amount shall be multiplied by 0.85. The administrator
shall add to this amount a calculation of the monthly per capita cost
associated with the administration of this act, including those costs
associated with collection of the fee and its enforcement by the
employment security department;
(b) The amount calculated in (a) of this subsection is then divided
by eighty-six. The result is the hourly fee applicable for that
calendar year.
(3)(a) On a monthly basis, each large employer shall calculate the
aggregate fee due for that month by:
(i) Multiplying the hourly fee by the total number of hours that
each of its employees has worked during that month, up to a maximum of
eighty-six hours per month per employee; and
(ii) Deducting from the amount resulting from the calculation in
(a) of this subsection the aggregate amount paid by the employer to
provide health insurance coverage for its employees, allowable for the
current quarter by the internal revenue service as a deductible
business expense. A nonincorporated large employer may deduct its
aggregate expenses for providing health insurance coverage or other
health care benefits for its employees as reported and allowed pursuant
to rules adopted by the employment security department.
(b) Each large employer shall pay an aggregate monthly fee equal to
the amount remaining after the deductions provided for in this section.
A deduction for a large employer may not reduce the aggregate monthly
fee due below zero. The employer shall transmit any applicable fee to
the department on a quarterly basis.
(4) The program implemented under this act shall be fully supported
by the fees and basic health plan enrollee premium contributions
collected under this section and section 205 of this act.
(5) The fees collected under this act may not be used for any
purpose other than providing basic health plan coverage to fee
supported enrollees, as defined in RCW 70.47.020, as well as costs
associated with the administration of the basic health plan and with
collection of the fee under this chapter and its enforcement by the
employment security department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 (1) The administrator shall provide notice
to the employment security department of the hourly fee in a time and
manner that permits the employment security department to provide
notice to all large employers of the estimated hourly fee for the
calendar year.
(2) Revenue from the fee must be deposited into the basic health
plan employer fee account established in RCW 70.47.030.
(3) If a large employer fails to pay the required fee, for whatever
reason, the large employer is responsible to the basic health plan
employer fee account for payment of a penalty of two hundred percent of
the amount of any fee that would have otherwise been paid by the large
employer. The penalty must be made to the administrator and must be
paid into the basic health plan employer fee account created in RCW
70.47.030.
(4) If amounts due under this section, including penalties, are not
paid on the date on which they are due and payable as prescribed by the
administrator, the whole or part thereof remaining unpaid bears
interest at the rate of one percent per month or fraction thereof from
and after such date until payment plus accrued interest is received by
the administrator. The date as of which payment of contributions, if
mailed, is deemed to have been received may be determined by rule.
Interest collected under this section must be paid into the basic
health plan employer fee account created in RCW 70.47.030.
(5) Nothing in this section precludes a large employer from
purchasing additional benefits or coverage, in addition to paying the
fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 Sections 101 through 104 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 50 RCW.

PART 2
BASIC HEALTH PLAN MODIFICATIONS AND RELATED PROVISIONS
Sec. 201 RCW 70.47.010 and 2000 c 79 s 42 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(((a) The legislature finds that limitations on access to health
care services for enrollees in the state, such as in rural and
underserved areas, are particularly challenging for the basic health
plan. Statutory restrictions have reduced the options available to the
administrator to address the access needs of basic health plan
enrollees. It is the intent of the legislature to authorize the
administrator to develop alternative purchasing strategies to ensure
access to basic health plan enrollees in all areas of the state,
including: (i) The use of differential rating for managed health care
systems based on geographic differences in costs; and (ii) limited use
of self-insurance in areas where adequate access cannot be assured
through other options.
(b) In developing alternative purchasing strategies to address
health care access needs, the administrator shall consult with
interested persons including health carriers, health care providers,
and health facilities, and with other appropriate state agencies
including the office of the insurance commissioner and the office of
community and rural health. In pursuing such alternatives, the
administrator shall continue to give priority to prepaid managed care
as the preferred method of assuring access to basic health plan
enrollees followed, in priority order, by preferred providers, fee for
service, and self-funding.
(2))) The legislature ((further)) finds that:
(a) A significant percentage of the population of this state does
not have reasonably available insurance or other coverage of the costs
of necessary basic health care services;
(b) This lack of basic health care coverage is detrimental to the
health of the individuals lacking coverage and to the public welfare,
and results in substantial expenditures for emergency and remedial
health care, often at the expense of health care providers, health care
facilities, and all purchasers of health care, including the state; and
(c) The use of managed health care systems has significant
potential to reduce the growth of health care costs incurred by the
people of this state generally, and by low-income pregnant women, and
at-risk children and adolescents who need greater access to managed
health care.
(((3))) (2) The purpose of this chapter is to provide or make more
readily available necessary basic health care services in an
appropriate setting to working persons and others who lack coverage, at
a cost to these persons that does not create barriers to the
utilization of necessary health care services. To that end, this
chapter establishes a program to be made available to those residents
not eligible for medicare who share in a portion of the cost or who pay
the full cost of receiving basic health care services from a managed
health care system.
(((4))) (3)(a) The legislature further finds that many small
employers struggle with the cost of providing employer-sponsored health
insurance coverage to their employees and their employees' families,
while others are unable to offer employer-sponsored health insurance
due to its high cost. Low-wage workers also struggle with the burden
of paying their share of the costs of employer-sponsored health
insurance, while others turn down their employer's offer of coverage
due to its costs.
(b) It is not the intent of this chapter to provide health care
services for those persons who are presently covered through private
employer-based health plans, nor to replace employer-based health
plans. However, the legislature recognizes that cost-effective and
affordable health plans may not always be available to small
((business)) employers and that the basic health plan provides an
opportunity to blend private and public funds in a manner that makes
employer-based health plans more affordable for low-wage employees.
((Further, it is the intent of the legislature to expand, wherever
possible,)) By blending private and public funds, the legislature
intends to expand the availability of private health care coverage and
to discourage the decline of employer-based coverage.
(((5))) (4)(a) It is the purpose of this chapter to acknowledge the
initial success of this program that has (i) assisted thousands of
families in their search for affordable health care; (ii) demonstrated
that low-income, uninsured families are willing to pay for their own
health care coverage to the extent of their ability to pay; and (iii)
proved that local health care providers are willing to enter into a
public-private partnership as a managed care system.
(b) As a consequence, the legislature intends to extend an option
to enroll to certain citizens above two hundred percent of the federal
poverty guidelines within the state who reside in communities where the
plan is operational and who collectively or individually wish to
exercise the opportunity to purchase health care coverage through the
basic health plan if the purchase is done at no cost to the state. It
is also the intent of the legislature to allow employers and other
financial sponsors to financially assist such individuals to purchase
health care through the program ((so long as such purchase does not
result in a lower standard of coverage for employees)).
(c) The legislature intends that, to the extent of available funds,
the program be available throughout Washington state to subsidized and
nonsubsidized enrollees. It is also the intent of the legislature to
enroll subsidized enrollees first, to the maximum extent feasible.
(d) The legislature directs that the basic health plan
administrator identify enrollees who are likely to be eligible for
medical assistance and assist these individuals in applying for and
receiving medical assistance. The administrator and the department of
social and health services shall implement a seamless system to
coordinate eligibility determinations and benefit coverage for
enrollees of the basic health plan and medical assistance recipients.
(5)(a) The legislature further finds that limitations on access to
health care services for enrollees in the state, such as in rural and
underserved areas, are particularly challenging for the basic health
plan. Statutory restrictions have reduced the options available to the
administrator to address the access needs of basic health plan
enrollees. It is the intent of the legislature to authorize the
administrator to develop alternative purchasing strategies to ensure
access to basic health plan enrollees in all areas of the state,
including: (i) The use of differential rating for managed health care
systems based on geographic differences in costs; and (ii) limited use
of self-insurance in areas where adequate access cannot be ensured
through other options.
(b) In developing alternative purchasing strategies to address
health care access needs, the administrator shall consult with
interested persons including health carriers, health care providers,
and health facilities, and with other appropriate state agencies
including the office of the insurance commissioner and the office of
community and rural health.

Sec. 202 RCW 70.47.020 and 2004 c 192 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Washington basic health plan" or "plan" means the system of
enrollment and payment for basic health care services, administered by
the plan administrator through participating managed health care
systems or as provided in RCW 70.47.060(11), created by this chapter.
(2) "Administrator" means the Washington basic health plan
administrator, who also holds the position of administrator of the
Washington state health care authority.
(3) "Health coverage tax credit program" means the program created
by the Trade Act of 2002 (P.L. 107-210) that provides a federal tax
credit that subsidizes private health insurance coverage for displaced
workers certified to receive certain trade adjustment assistance
benefits and for individuals receiving benefits from the pension
benefit guaranty corporation.
(4) "Health coverage tax credit eligible enrollee" means individual
workers and their qualified family members who lose their jobs due to
the effects of international trade and are eligible for certain trade
adjustment assistance benefits; or are eligible for benefits under the
alternative trade adjustment assistance program; or are people who
receive benefits from the pension benefit guaranty corporation and are
at least fifty-five years old.
(5) "Managed health care system" means: (a) Any health care
organization, including health care providers, insurers, health care
service contractors, health maintenance organizations, or any
combination thereof, that provides directly or by contract basic health
care services, as defined by the administrator and rendered by duly
licensed providers, to a defined patient population enrolled in the
plan and in the managed health care system; or (b) a self-funded or
self-insured method of providing insurance coverage to subsidized or
fee supported enrollees provided under RCW 41.05.140 and subject to the
limitations under RCW 70.47.100(7).
(6) "Subsidized enrollee" means an individual, or an individual
plus the individual's spouse or dependent children: (a) Who is not
eligible for medicare; (b) who is not confined or residing in a
government-operated institution, unless he or she meets eligibility
criteria adopted by the administrator; (c) who resides in an area of
the state served by a managed health care system participating in the
plan; (d) whose gross family income at the time of enrollment does not
exceed two hundred percent of the federal poverty level as adjusted for
family size and determined annually by the federal department of health
and human services; and (e) who chooses to obtain basic health care
coverage from a particular managed health care system in return for
periodic payments to the plan. To the extent that state funds are
specifically appropriated for this purpose, with a corresponding
federal match, "subsidized enrollee" also means an individual, or an
individual's spouse or dependent children, who meets the requirements
in (a) through (c) and (e) of this subsection and whose gross family
income at the time of enrollment is more than two hundred percent, but
less than two hundred fifty-one percent, of the federal poverty level
as adjusted for family size and determined annually by the federal
department of health and human services.
(7) "Nonsubsidized enrollee" means an individual, or an individual
plus the individual's spouse or dependent children: (a) Who is not
eligible for medicare; (b) who is not confined or residing in a
government-operated institution, unless he or she meets eligibility
criteria adopted by the administrator; (c) who resides in an area of
the state served by a managed health care system participating in the
plan; (d) who chooses to obtain basic health care coverage from a
particular managed health care system; and (e) who pays or on whose
behalf is paid the full costs for participation in the plan, without
any subsidy from the plan.
(8) "Fee supported enrollee" means an individual not eligible for
medicare whose employer has paid a fee deposited in the basic health
plan employer fee account according to section 103 of this act, who
works at least eighty-six hours per month for the employer that has
paid the fee, and who chooses to obtain basic health plan coverage from
a participating managed health care system in return for periodic
payments to the plan.
(9) "Premium assistance enrollee" means an individual or an
individual plus the individual's spouse and dependent children: (a)
Who is not eligible for medicare; (b) who is not confined or residing
in a government-operated institution, unless he or she meets
eligibility criteria adopted by the administrator; (c) whose gross
family income at the time of enrollment does not exceed two hundred
percent of the federal poverty level as adjusted for family size and
determined annually by the federal department of health and human
services; (d) who resides within the state of Washington; and (e) who
qualifies for and chooses to participate in the small employer premium
assistance option under RCW 70.47.060(11).
(10) "Subsidy" means the difference between the amount of periodic
payment the administrator makes to a managed health care system on
behalf of a subsidized or fee supported enrollee or the amount of a
periodic payment made under RCW 70.47.060(11) on behalf of a premium
assistance enrollee plus the administrative cost to the plan of
providing the plan to that subsidized, fee supported, or premium
assistance enrollee, and the amount determined to be the subsidized,
fee supported, or premium assistance enrollee's responsibility under
((RCW 70.47.060(2))) section 205 of this act.
(((9))) (11) "Premium" means a periodic payment, based upon gross
family income which an individual, their employer, or another financial
sponsor makes to the plan as consideration for enrollment in the plan
as a subsidized enrollee, a fee supported enrollee, a premium
assistance enrollee, a nonsubsidized enrollee, or a health coverage tax
credit eligible enrollee.
(((10))) (12) "Rate" means the amount, negotiated by the
administrator with and paid to a participating managed health care
system, that is based upon the enrollment of subsidized, fee supported,
nonsubsidized, and health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees in the
plan and in that system.
(13) "Small employer" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
48.43.005.

Sec. 203 RCW 70.47.030 and 2004 c 192 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The basic health plan trust account is hereby established in
the state treasury. Any nongeneral fund-state funds collected for this
program shall be deposited in the basic health plan trust account and
may be expended without further appropriation. Moneys in the account
shall be used exclusively for the purposes of this chapter, including
payments to participating managed health care systems on behalf of
enrollees in the plan and payment of costs of administering the plan.
((During the 1995-97 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer
funds from the basic health plan trust account to the state general
fund.))
(2) The basic health plan subscription account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from amounts due from or
on behalf of nonsubsidized enrollees and health coverage tax credit
eligible enrollees shall be deposited into the account. Funds in the
account shall be used exclusively for the purposes of this chapter,
including payments to participating managed health care systems on
behalf of nonsubsidized enrollees and health coverage tax credit
eligible enrollees in the plan and payment of costs of administering
the plan. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures.
(3) The basic health plan employer fee account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from fees collected under
sections 103 and 104 of this act must be deposited in the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes of this
chapter, including payments to participating managed health care
systems for fee supported enrollees in the basic health plan and
payment of costs of administering the basic health plan coverage. Only
the administrator or the administrator's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.
(4) The administrator shall take every precaution to see that none
of the funds in the separate accounts created in this section or that
any premiums paid either by subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees are
commingled in any way, except that the administrator may combine funds
designated for administration of the plan into a single administrative
account.

Sec. 204 RCW 70.47.060 and 2004 c 192 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The administrator has the following powers and duties:
(1) To design and from time to time revise a schedule of covered
basic health care services, including physician services, inpatient and
outpatient hospital services, prescription drugs and medications, and
other services that may be necessary for basic health care. In
addition, the administrator may, to the extent that funds are
available, offer as basic health plan services chemical dependency
services, mental health services and organ transplant services;
however, no one service or any combination of these three services
shall increase the actuarial value of the basic health plan benefits by
more than five percent excluding inflation, as determined by the office
of financial management. All subsidized, fee supported, and
nonsubsidized enrollees in any participating managed health care system
under the Washington basic health plan shall be entitled to receive
covered basic health care services in return for premium payments to
the plan. The schedule of services shall emphasize proven preventive
and primary health care and shall include all services necessary for
prenatal, postnatal, and well-child care. However, with respect to
coverage for subsidized enrollees who are eligible to receive prenatal
and postnatal services through the medical assistance program under
chapter 74.09 RCW, the administrator shall not contract for such
services except to the extent that such services are necessary over not
more than a one-month period in order to maintain continuity of care
after diagnosis of pregnancy by the managed care provider. The
schedule of services shall also include a separate schedule of basic
health care services for children, eighteen years of age and younger,
for those subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees who choose to secure
basic coverage through the plan only for their dependent children. In
designing and revising the schedule of services, the administrator
shall consider the guidelines for assessing health services under the
mandated benefits act of 1984, RCW 48.47.030, and such other factors as
the administrator deems appropriate.
(2)(((a) To design and implement a structure of periodic premiums
due the administrator from subsidized enrollees that is based upon
gross family income, giving appropriate consideration to family size
and the ages of all family members. The enrollment of children shall
not require the enrollment of their parent or parents who are eligible
for the plan. The structure of periodic premiums shall be applied to
subsidized enrollees entering the plan as individuals pursuant to
subsection (11) of this section and to the share of the cost of the
plan due from subsidized enrollees entering the plan as employees
pursuant to subsection (12) of this section.
(b) To determine the periodic premiums due the administrator from
nonsubsidized enrollees. Premiums due from nonsubsidized enrollees
shall be in an amount equal to the cost charged by the managed health
care system provider to the state for the plan plus the administrative
cost of providing the plan to those enrollees and the premium tax under
RCW 48.14.0201.
(c) To determine the periodic premiums due the administrator from
health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees. Premiums due from
health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees must be in an amount
equal to the cost charged by the managed health care system provider to
the state for the plan, plus the administrative cost of providing the
plan to those enrollees and the premium tax under RCW 48.14.0201. The
administrator will consider the impact of eligibility determination by
the appropriate federal agency designated by the Trade Act of 2002
(P.L. 107-210) as well as the premium collection and remittance
activities by the United States internal revenue service when
determining the administrative cost charged for health coverage tax
credit eligible enrollees.
(d) An employer or other financial sponsor may, with the prior
approval of the administrator, pay the premium, rate, or any other
amount on behalf of a subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollee, by
arrangement with the enrollee and through a mechanism acceptable to the
administrator. The administrator shall establish a mechanism for
receiving premium payments from the United States internal revenue
service for health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees.
(e) To develop, as an offering by every health carrier providing
coverage identical to the basic health plan, as configured on January
1, 2001, a basic health plan model plan with uniformity in enrollee
cost-sharing requirements.
(3))) To evaluate, with the cooperation of participating managed
health care system providers, the impact on the basic health plan of
enrolling health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees. The
administrator shall issue to the appropriate committees of the
legislature preliminary evaluations on June 1, 2005, and January 1,
2006, and a final evaluation by June 1, 2006. The evaluation shall
address the number of persons enrolled, the duration of their
enrollment, their utilization of covered services relative to other
basic health plan enrollees, and the extent to which their enrollment
contributed to any change in the cost of the basic health plan.
(((4))) (3) To end the participation of health coverage tax credit
eligible enrollees in the basic health plan if the federal government
reduces or terminates premium payments on their behalf through the
United States internal revenue service.
(((5))) (4) To design and implement a structure of enrollee cost-sharing due a managed health care system from subsidized, fee
supported, nonsubsidized, and health coverage tax credit eligible
enrollees. The structure shall discourage inappropriate enrollee
utilization of health care services, and may utilize copayments,
deductibles, and other cost-sharing mechanisms, but shall not be so
costly to enrollees as to constitute a barrier to appropriate
utilization of necessary health care services.
(((6))) (5) To limit enrollment of persons who qualify for
subsidies, as subsidized or fee supported enrollees, or premium
assistance enrollees so as to prevent an overexpenditure of
appropriations for such purposes. Whenever the administrator finds
that there is danger of such an overexpenditure, the administrator
shall close enrollment until the administrator finds the danger no
longer exists. Such a closure does not apply to health coverage tax
credit eligible enrollees who receive a premium subsidy from the United
States internal revenue service as long as the enrollees qualify for
the health coverage tax credit program.
(((7))) (6) To limit the payment of subsidies or premium assistance
to subsidized enrollees, fee supported enrollees, and premium
assistance enrollees, as defined in RCW 70.47.020, except to the extent
authorized in section 207 of this act. The level of subsidy provided
to persons who qualify may be based on the lowest cost plans, as
defined by the administrator.
(((8))) (7) To adopt a schedule for the orderly development of the
delivery of services and availability of the plan to residents of the
state, subject to the limitations contained in RCW 70.47.080 or any act
appropriating funds for the plan.
(((9))) (8) To solicit and accept applications from managed health
care systems, as defined in this chapter, for inclusion as eligible
basic health care providers under the plan for subsidized enrollees,
fee supported enrollees, nonsubsidized enrollees, or health coverage
tax credit eligible enrollees. The administrator shall endeavor to
assure that covered basic health care services are available to any
enrollee of the plan from among a selection of two or more
participating managed health care systems. In adopting any rules or
procedures applicable to managed health care systems and in its
dealings with such systems, the administrator shall consider and make
suitable allowance for the need for health care services and the
differences in local availability of health care resources, along with
other resources, within and among the several areas of the state.
Contracts with participating managed health care systems shall ensure
that basic health plan enrollees who become eligible for medical
assistance may, at their option, continue to receive services from
their existing providers within the managed health care system if such
providers have entered into provider agreements with the department of
social and health services.
(((10) To receive periodic premiums from or on behalf of
subsidized, nonsubsidized, and health coverage tax credit eligible
enrollees, deposit them in the basic health plan operating account,
keep records of enrollee status, and authorize periodic payments to
managed health care systems on the basis of the number of enrollees
participating in the respective managed health care systems.
(11))) (9) To accept applications from individuals residing in
areas served by the plan, on behalf of themselves and their spouses and
dependent children, for enrollment in the Washington basic health plan
as subsidized, fee supported, premium assistance, nonsubsidized, or
health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees, to establish appropriate
minimum-enrollment periods for enrollees as may be necessary, and to
determine, upon application and on a reasonable schedule defined by the
authority, or at the request of any enrollee, eligibility due to
current gross family income for sliding scale premiums. Applications
from individuals as fee supported enrollees may be submitted for
calendar years beginning January 1, 2006. Applications from
individuals as premium assistance enrollees may be accepted by the
administrator only during those biennia for which the biennial
appropriations act includes funding sufficient to support enrollment of
at least one hundred thousand subsidized or fee supported enrollees.
If appropriations in a subsequent biennium are not sufficient to
support enrollment of at least one hundred thousand subsidized or fee
supported enrollees, current premium assistance enrollees will maintain
their enrolled status. Funds received by a family as part of
participation in the adoption support program authorized under RCW
26.33.320 and 74.13.100 through 74.13.145 shall not be counted toward
a family's current gross family income for the purposes of this
chapter. When an enrollee fails to report income or income changes
accurately, the administrator shall have the authority either to bill
the enrollee for the amounts overpaid by the state or to impose civil
penalties of up to two hundred percent of the amount of subsidy
overpaid due to the enrollee incorrectly reporting income. The
administrator shall adopt rules to define the appropriate application
of these sanctions and the processes to implement the sanctions
provided in this subsection, within available resources. No subsidy
may be paid with respect to any enrollee whose current gross family
income exceeds twice the federal poverty level or, subject to RCW
70.47.110, who is a recipient of medical assistance or medical care
services under chapter 74.09 RCW. If a number of enrollees drop their
enrollment for no apparent good cause, the administrator may establish
appropriate rules or requirements that are applicable to such
individuals before they will be allowed to reenroll in the plan. If a
fee supported enrollee loses their fee supported enrollee status, the
individual may apply to convert their enrollment to enrollment as a
subsidized enrollee. If subsidized enrollment is subject to a
reservation or waiting list at the time of the application, the
enrollee must be given the opportunity to place their name on the
reservation or waiting list.
(((12))) (10) To accept applications from business owners on behalf
of themselves and their employees, spouses, and dependent children, as
subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees, who reside in an area served by
the plan. The administrator may require all or the substantial
majority of the eligible employees of such businesses to enroll in the
plan and establish those procedures necessary to facilitate the orderly
enrollment of groups in the plan and into a managed health care system.
The administrator may require that a business owner pay at least an
amount equal to what the employee pays after the state pays its portion
of the subsidized premium cost of the plan on behalf of each employee
enrolled in the plan. Enrollment is limited to those not eligible for
medicare who wish to enroll in the plan and choose to obtain the basic
health care coverage and services from a managed care system
participating in the plan. The administrator shall adjust the amount
determined to be due on behalf of or from all such enrollees whenever
the amount negotiated by the administrator with the participating
managed health care system or systems is modified or the administrative
cost of providing the plan to such enrollees changes.
(((13))) (11)(a) To accept applications from individuals as premium
assistance enrollees, on behalf of themselves and their spouses and
dependent children, for assistance in payment of their share of their
small employer's health plan premiums, and to determine, upon
application and on a reasonable schedule defined by the authority, or
at the request of any enrollee, eligibility due to current gross family
income for sliding scale premium assistance. The amount of the
enrollee's premium assistance shall be based upon the premium schedule
for subsidized enrollees. The administrator may use basic health plan
funds on behalf of premium assistance enrollees when:
(i) The cost of paying the premium assistance enrollee's premium
obligation would be less than the subsidy that would be paid if the
individual, or the individual plus his or her spouse and dependent
children, were to enroll in a participating managed care system;
(ii) The small employer health benefit plan for which the enrollee
is seeking premium assistance meets any standards for minimum
thresholds of coverage established by the administrator. The office of
the insurance commissioner, under Title 48 RCW, will certify small
employer health benefit plans that meet any standards adopted under
this subsection (11);
(iii) The premium assistance enrollee agrees to provide
verification of continued enrollment in his or her small employer's
health benefit plan on a semiannual basis, or to notify the
administrator whenever his or her enrollment status changes, whichever
is earlier. Verification or notification may be made directly by the
employee, or through their employer or the carrier providing the small
employer health benefit plan.
(b) The administrator, in consultation with small employers,
carriers, and the office of the insurance commissioner, shall determine
the most efficient method for payment of premium assistance, with a
goal of minimizing the administrative burden on small employers.
(c) Funds received by a family as part of participation in the
adoption support program authorized under RCW 26.33.320 and 74.13.100
through 74.13.145 shall not be counted toward a family's current gross
family income for the purposes of this chapter. The enrollee reporting
and sanctions provisions of subsection (9) of this section apply to
premium assistance enrollees. No premium assistance may be paid with
respect to any enrollee whose current gross family income exceeds twice
the federal poverty level or, subject to RCW 70.47.110, who is a
recipient of medical assistance or medical care services under chapter
74.09 RCW.
(12) To determine the rate to be paid to each participating managed
health care system in return for the provision of covered basic health
care services to enrollees in the system. Although the schedule of
covered basic health care services will be the same or actuarially
equivalent for similar enrollees, the rates negotiated with
participating managed health care systems may vary among the systems.
In negotiating rates with participating systems, the administrator
shall consider the characteristics of the populations served by the
respective systems, economic circumstances of the local area, the need
to conserve the resources of the basic health plan trust account, and
other factors the administrator finds relevant.
(((14))) (13) To monitor the provision of covered services to
enrollees by participating managed health care systems in order to
assure enrollee access to good quality basic health care, to require
periodic data reports concerning the utilization of health care
services rendered to enrollees in order to provide adequate information
for evaluation, and to inspect the books and records of participating
managed health care systems to assure compliance with the purposes of
this chapter. In requiring reports from participating managed health
care systems, including data on services rendered enrollees, the
administrator shall endeavor to minimize costs, both to the managed
health care systems and to the plan. The administrator shall
coordinate any such reporting requirements with other state agencies,
such as the insurance commissioner and the department of health, to
minimize duplication of effort.
(((15))) (14) To evaluate the effects this chapter has on private
employer-based health care coverage and to take appropriate measures
consistent with state and federal statutes that will discourage the
reduction of such coverage in the state.
(((16))) (15) To develop a program of proven preventive health
measures and to integrate it into the plan wherever possible and
consistent with this chapter.
(((17))) (16) To provide, consistent with available funding,
assistance for rural residents, underserved populations, and persons of
color.
(((18))) (17) In consultation with appropriate state and local
government agencies, to establish criteria defining eligibility for
persons confined or residing in government-operated institutions.
(((19))) (18) To administer the premium discounts provided under
RCW 48.41.200(3)(a) (i) and (ii) pursuant to a contract with the
Washington state health insurance pool.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 A new section is added to chapter 70.47
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The administrator shall:
(a) Design and implement a structure of periodic premiums due from
subsidized and premium assistance enrollees that is based upon gross
family income, giving appropriate consideration to family size and the
ages of all family members. A subsidized enrollee's premium may not
exceed twenty percent of the age-adjusted rate paid to the
participating managed health care system that the subsidized enrollee
has chosen to enroll in. The enrollment of children does not require
the enrollment of their parent or parents who are eligible for the
plan. The structure of periodic premiums must be applied to subsidized
enrollees entering the plan as individuals under RCW 70.47.060(9), and
to the share of the cost of their small employer-sponsored health
insurance coverage due from premium assistance enrollees entering the
plan under RCW 70.47.060(11);
(b) Design and implement a structure of periodic premiums due from
fee supported enrollees. A fee supported enrollee's premium will be
fifteen percent of the age-adjusted rate paid to the participating
managed health care system that the fee supported enrollee has chosen
to enroll in;
(c) Determine the periodic premiums due the administrator from
nonsubsidized enrollees. Premiums due from nonsubsidized enrollees
must be in an amount equal to the cost charged by the managed health
care system provider to the state for the plan plus the administrative
cost of providing the plan to those enrollees and the premium tax under
RCW 48.14.0201.
(2) An employer or other financial sponsor may, with the prior
approval of the administrator, pay the premium, rate, or any other
amount on behalf of a subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollee, by
arrangement with the enrollee and through a mechanism acceptable to the
administrator.
(3) The administrator shall receive periodic premiums from or on
behalf of subsidized, fee supported, and nonsubsidized enrollees,
deposit them in the appropriate account, keep records of enrollee
status, and authorize periodic payments to managed health care systems
on the basis of the number of enrollees participating in the respective
managed health care systems.

Sec. 206 RCW 70.47.080 and 1993 c 492 s 213 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) On and after July 1, 1988, the administrator shall accept
for enrollment applicants eligible to receive covered basic health care
services from the respective managed health care systems which are then
participating in the plan.
(b) Thereafter, total subsidized enrollment shall not result in
expenditures that exceed the total amount that has been made available
by the legislature in any act appropriating funds to the plan. To the
extent that new funding is appropriated for expansion, the
administrator shall endeavor to secure participation contracts from
managed health care systems in geographic areas of the state that are
unserved by the plan at the time at which the new funding is
appropriated. In the selection of any such areas the administrator
shall take into account the levels and rates of unemployment in
different areas of the state, the need to provide basic health care
coverage to a population reasonably representative of the portion of
the state's population that lacks such coverage, and the need for
geographic, demographic, and economic diversity.
(c) The administrator shall at all times closely monitor growth
patterns of enrollment so as not to exceed that consistent with the
orderly development of the plan as a whole, in any area of the state or
in any participating managed health care system. The annual or
biennial enrollment limitations derived from operation of the plan
under this section do not apply to nonsubsidized enrollees as defined
in RCW 70.47.020(((5))) (7).
(2) Total fee supported enrollment shall not result in expenditures
that exceed the total amount that has been deposited into the basic
health plan employer fee account under section 203 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 A new section is added to chapter 70.47
RCW to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that savings result from the conversion of
subsidized enrollees to fee supported enrollees under sections 101
through 104 of this act and to the extent that such savings are
appropriated for this purpose by the legislature, the administrator may
establish an option for small employer group enrollment in the basic
health plan. Under this option, as distinguished from individual
enrollment, the administrator may accept applications for group
coverage from small employers who meet the requirements of this section
on behalf of themselves and their employees, spouses, and dependent
children who reside in an area served by the plan.
(2) A small employer seeking coverage through the basic health plan
must certify upon application, and annually thereafter, that at least
seventy-five percent of the small employer's employees have wages or
salary that are at or below two hundred percent of the federal poverty
guidelines as adjusted for a family of three and determined annually by
the federal department of health and human services. Small employer
group coverage through the basic health plan is not conditioned upon
all of the employer's employees meeting the eligibility requirements
for subsidized enrollees as defined in RCW 70.47.020. The
administrator may not require employers to report total household
income of their employees as a condition of receiving group coverage
through the basic health plan.
(3) The administrator may require a substantial majority of the
eligible employees of small employers to enroll in the plan and
establish those procedures necessary to facilitate the orderly
enrollment of small employer groups in the plan and into a managed
health care system.
(4) Basic health plan coverage must be purchased for small employer
group enrollees through the basic health plan subsidized enrollee pool,
even though not all employees in the group may be subsidized enrollees
as defined in RCW 70.47.020.
(5) Enrollment is limited to small employer groups who wish to
enroll in the plan and choose to obtain basic health care coverage and
services from a managed care system participating in the plan. For
each employee of the small employer group with wages below the level
established in subsection (2) of this section, the employer must pay at
least forty percent, the employee must pay a maximum of twenty percent,
and the plan must pay forty percent, of the age-adjusted rate paid to
the participating managed health care system that the small employer
group has chosen to enroll in. No state subsidy may be paid on behalf
of employees with wages in excess of the level established in
subsection (2) of this section. The administrator shall adjust the
amount determined to be due from small employer group enrollees
whenever the amount negotiated by the administrator with the
participating managed health care system or systems is modified or the
administrative cost of providing the plan to such enrollees changes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 A new section is added to chapter 48.21
RCW to read as follows:
On or after July 1, 2005, regardless of any applicable open
enrollment period, an insurer shall enroll any individual or family
member of an individual who requests enrollment in a group disability
insurance contract for health care within thirty days after becoming
eligible for a basic health plan small employer-sponsored health
insurance premium assistance under RCW 70.47.060(11).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 A new section is added to chapter 48.44
RCW to read as follows:
On or after July 1, 2005, regardless of any applicable open
enrollment period, a health care service contractor shall enroll any
individual or family member of an individual who requests enrollment in
a group health care service contract within thirty days after becoming
eligible for a basic health plan small employer-sponsored health
insurance premium assistance under RCW 70.47.060(11).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210 A new section is added to chapter 48.46
RCW to read as follows:
On or after July 1, 2005, regardless of any applicable open
enrollment period, a health maintenance organization shall enroll any
individual or family member of an individual who requests enrollment in
a group health maintenance agreement within thirty days after becoming
eligible for a basic health plan small employer-sponsored health
insurance premium assistance under RCW 70.47.060(11).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211 A new section is added to chapter 74.09
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The department shall make every effort to maximize
opportunities to blend public and private funds through subsidization
of small employer-sponsored health insurance premiums on behalf of
individuals eligible for medical assistance and children eligible for
the state children's health insurance program when such subsidization
is cost-effective for the state. In developing policies under this
section, the department shall consult with the health care authority
and, to the extent allowed by federal law, develop policies that are
consistent with those developed by the health care authority under RCW
70.47.060(11) so that entire families will have the opportunity to
enroll in the same small employer-sponsored health insurance plan.
(2) If a federal waiver is necessary to achieve consistency with
health care authority policies under RCW 70.47.060(11), the department
shall notify the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the
legislature on or before January 1, 2006. The notification must
include recommendations regarding federal waiver options that would
provide the flexibility needed to optimize the use of medical
assistance and state children's health insurance program funds to
subsidize small employer-sponsored health insurance premiums on behalf
of low-income families.

PART 3
MISCELLANEOUS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act
must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the
receipt of federal funds by the state or the granting of federal
unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 This act shall be known as the "health
care responsibility act."

--- END ---