BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 63.29.010 and 2004 c 168 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Department" means the department of revenue established under
RCW 82.01.050.
(2) "Apparent owner" means the person whose name appears on the
records of the holder as the person entitled to property held, issued,
or owing by the holder.
(3) "Attorney general" means the chief legal officer of this state
referred to in chapter 43.10 RCW.
(4) "Banking organization" means a bank, trust company, savings
bank, land bank, safe deposit company, private banker, or any
organization defined by other law as a bank or banking organization.
(5) "Business association" means a nonpublic corporation, joint
stock company, investment company, business trust, partnership, or
association for business purposes of two or more individuals, whether
or not for profit, including a banking organization, financial
organization, insurance company, or utility.
(6) "Domicile" means the state of incorporation of a corporation
and the state of the principal place of business of an unincorporated
person.
(7) "Fare card" means any pass or instrument, and value contained
therein, purchased to utilize public transportation facilities or
services. "Fare card" does not include "gift card" or "gift
certificate" as those terms are defined in RCW 19.240.010.
(8) "Financial organization" means a savings and loan association,
cooperative bank, building and loan association, or credit union.
(((8))) (9) "Gift certificate" has the same meaning as in RCW
19.240.010.
(((9))) (10) "Holder" means a person, wherever organized or
domiciled, who is:
(a) In possession of property belonging to another,
(b) A trustee, or
(c) Indebted to another on an obligation.
(((10))) (11) "Insurance company" means an association,
corporation, fraternal or mutual benefit organization, whether or not
for profit, which is engaged in providing insurance coverage, including
accident, burial, casualty, credit life, contract performance, dental,
fidelity, fire, health, hospitalization, illness, life (including
endowments and annuities), malpractice, marine, mortgage, surety, and
wage protection insurance.
(((11))) (12) "Intangible property" does not include contract
claims which are unliquidated but does include:
(a) Moneys, checks, drafts, deposits, interest, dividends, and
income;
(b) Credit balances, customer overpayments, gift certificates,
security deposits, refunds, credit memos, unpaid wages, unused airline
tickets, and unidentified remittances, but does not include discounts
which represent credit balances for which no consideration was given;
(c) Stocks, and other intangible ownership interests in business
associations;
(d) Moneys deposited to redeem stocks, bonds, coupons, and other
securities, or to make distributions;
(e) Liquidated amounts due and payable under the terms of insurance
policies; and
(f) Amounts distributable from a trust or custodial fund
established under a plan to provide health, welfare, pension, vacation,
severance, retirement, death, stock purchase, profit sharing, employee
savings, supplemental unemployment insurance, or similar benefits.
(((12))) (13) "Last known address" means a description of the
location of the apparent owner sufficient for the purpose of the
delivery of mail.
(((13))) (14) "Owner" means a depositor in the case of a deposit,
a beneficiary in case of a trust other than a deposit in trust, a
creditor, claimant, or payee in the case of other intangible property,
or a person having a legal or equitable interest in property subject to
this chapter or his legal representative.
(((14))) (15) "Person" means an individual, business association,
state or other government, governmental subdivision or agency, public
corporation, public authority, estate, trust, two or more persons
having a joint or common interest, or any other legal or commercial
entity.
(((15))) (16) "State" means any state, district, commonwealth,
territory, insular possession, or any other area subject to the
legislative authority of the United States.
(((16))) (17) "Third party bank check" means any instrument drawn
against a customer's account with a banking organization or financial
organization on which the banking organization or financial
organization is only secondarily liable.
(((17))) (18) "Utility" means a person who owns or operates for
public use any plant, equipment, property, franchise, or license for
the transmission of communications or the production, storage,
transmission, sale, delivery, or furnishing of electricity, water,
steam, or gas.

Sec. 2 RCW 63.29.190 and 1993 c 498 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section, a person who is required to file a report under RCW 63.29.170
shall pay or deliver to the department all abandoned property required
to be reported at the time of filing the report.
(2)(a) Counties, cities, towns, and other municipal and quasi-municipal corporations that hold funds representing warrants canceled
pursuant to RCW 36.22.100 and 39.56.040, uncashed checks, excess
proceeds from property tax and irrigation district foreclosures, and
property tax overpayments or refunds may retain the funds until the
owner notifies them and establishes ownership as provided in RCW
63.29.135. Counties, cities, towns, or other municipal or quasi-municipal corporations shall provide to the department a report of
property it is holding pursuant to this section. The report shall
identify the property and owner in the manner provided in RCW 63.29.170
and the department shall publish the information as provided in RCW
63.29.180.
(b)(i) A public transportation authority that holds funds
representing value on abandoned fare cards may retain the funds until
the owner notifies the authority and establishes ownership as provided
in RCW 63.29.135.
(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (2)(b), "public
transportation authority" means a municipality, as defined in RCW
35.58.272, a regional transit authority authorized by chapter 81.112
RCW, a public mass transportation system authorized by chapter 47.60
RCW, or a city transportation authority authorized by chapter 35.95A
RCW.
(3) The contents of a safe deposit box or other safekeeping
repository presumed abandoned under RCW 63.29.160 and reported under
RCW 63.29.170 shall be paid or delivered to the department within six
months after the final date for filing the report required by RCW
63.29.170.
If the owner establishes the right to receive the abandoned
property to the satisfaction of the holder before the property has been
delivered or it appears that for some other reason the presumption of
abandonment is erroneous, the holder need not pay or deliver the
property to the department, and the property will no longer be presumed
abandoned. In that case, the holder shall file with the department a
verified written explanation of the proof of claim or of the error in
the presumption of abandonment.
(4) The holder of an interest under RCW 63.29.100 shall deliver a
duplicate certificate or other evidence of ownership if the holder does
not issue certificates of ownership to the department. Upon delivery
of a duplicate certificate to the department, the holder and any
transfer agent, registrar, or other person acting for or on behalf of
a holder in executing or delivering the duplicate certificate is
relieved of all liability of every kind in accordance with RCW
63.29.200 to every person, including any person acquiring the original
certificate or the duplicate of the certificate issued to the
department, for any losses or damages resulting to any person by the
issuance and delivery to the department of the duplicate certificate.

--- END ---