BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
preserve the number of private medical practitioners providing
essential safety net care to uninsured and medicaid patients by
addressing barriers to private practice participation. Private
practitioners are critical to preserving health care access for lower-income patients. The legislature intends to provide targeted economic
incentives for private provider participation in safety net care and
calls for the streamlining of medicaid administrative procedures and a
reduction of the administrative burden on private medical providers.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.09.510 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 15 s 3 and 2001 1st
sp.s. c 4 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Medical assistance may be provided in accordance with
eligibility requirements established by the department, as defined in
the social security Title XIX state plan for mandatory categorically
needy persons and: (((1))) (a) Individuals who would be eligible for
cash assistance except for their institutional status; (((2))) (b)
individuals who are under twenty-one years of age, who would be
eligible for medicaid, but do not qualify as dependent children and who
are in (((a))) (i) foster care, (((b))) (ii) subsidized adoption,
(((c))) (iii) a nursing facility or an intermediate care facility for
the mentally retarded, or (((d))) (iv) inpatient psychiatric
facilities; (((3))) (c) the aged, blind, and disabled who: (((a))) (i)
Receive only a state supplement, or (((b))) (ii) would not be eligible
for cash assistance if they were not institutionalized; (((4))) (d)
categorically eligible individuals who meet the income and resource
requirements of the cash assistance programs; (((5))) (e) individuals
who are enrolled in managed health care systems, who have otherwise
lost eligibility for medical assistance, but who have not completed a
current six-month enrollment in a managed health care system, and who
are eligible for federal financial participation under Title XIX of the
social security act; (((6))) (f) children and pregnant women allowed by
federal statute for whom funding is appropriated; (((7))) (g) working
individuals with disabilities authorized under section
1902(a)(10)(A)(ii) of the social security act for whom funding is
appropriated; (((8))) (h) other individuals eligible for medical
services under RCW 74.09.035 and 74.09.700 for whom federal financial
participation is available under Title XIX of the social security act;
(((9))) (i) persons allowed by section 1931 of the social security act
for whom funding is appropriated; and (((10))) (j) women who: (((a)))
(i) Are under sixty-five years of age; (((b))) (ii) have been screened
for breast and cervical cancer under the national breast and cervical
cancer early detection program administered by the department of health
or tribal entity and have been identified as needing treatment for
breast or cervical cancer; and (((c))) (iii) are not otherwise covered
by health insurance. Medical assistance provided under this subsection
is limited to the period during which the woman requires treatment for
breast or cervical cancer, and is subject to any conditions or
limitations specified in the omnibus appropriations act.
(2) The department shall reverify eligibility for medical
assistance on an annual basis.
(3) The department shall not charge copremiums for medical and
dental coverage of children.
(4) The department shall upgrade the medicaid management
information system and participate in a single secure eligibility
verification system used by carriers and health care providers.
(5) The department shall require health care contractors to develop
policies and practices to support collaborative efforts to promote a
new model of chronic disease management.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.09.522 and 1997 c 59 s 15 and 1997 c 34 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "managed health care system"
means any health care organization, including health care providers,
insurers, health care service contractors, health maintenance
organizations, health insuring organizations, or any combination
thereof, that provides directly or by contract health care services
covered under RCW 74.09.520 and rendered by licensed providers, on a
prepaid capitated basis and that meets the requirements of section
1903(m)(1)(A) of Title XIX of the federal social security act or
federal demonstration waivers granted under section 1115(a) of Title XI
of the federal social security act.
(2) The department of social and health services shall enter into
agreements with managed health care systems to provide health care
services to recipients of temporary assistance for needy families under
the following conditions:
(a) Agreements shall be made for at least thirty thousand
recipients statewide;
(b) Agreements in at least one county shall include enrollment of
all recipients of temporary assistance for needy families;
(c) To the extent that this provision is consistent with section
1903(m) of Title XIX of the federal social security act or federal
demonstration waivers granted under section 1115(a) of Title XI of the
federal social security act, recipients shall have a choice of systems
in which to enroll and shall have the right to terminate their
enrollment in a system: PROVIDED, That the department may limit
recipient termination of enrollment without cause to the first month of
a period of enrollment, which period shall not exceed twelve months:
AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the department shall not restrict a
recipient's right to terminate enrollment in a system for good cause as
established by the department by rule;
(d) To the extent that this provision is consistent with section
1903(m) of Title XIX of the federal social security act, participating
managed health care systems shall not enroll a disproportionate number
of medical assistance recipients within the total numbers of persons
served by the managed health care systems, except as authorized by the
department under federal demonstration waivers granted under section
1115(a) of Title XI of the federal social security act;
(e) In negotiating with managed health care systems the department
shall adopt a uniform procedure to negotiate and enter into contractual
arrangements, including standards regarding the quality of services to
be provided; and financial integrity of the responding system;
(f) The department shall seek waivers from federal requirements as
necessary to implement this chapter;
(g) The department shall, wherever possible, enter into prepaid
capitation contracts that include inpatient care. However, if this is
not possible or feasible, the department may enter into prepaid
capitation contracts that do not include inpatient care;
(h) The department shall define those circumstances under which a
managed health care system is responsible for out-of-plan services and
assure that recipients shall not be charged for such services; and
(i) Nothing in this section prevents the department from entering
into similar agreements for other groups of people eligible to receive
services under this chapter.
(3) The department shall provide retroactive payment to health care
providers when patient medicaid eligibility and health contractor
verification is not available at the time of service.
(4) The department shall require health care contractors to have
primary care and specialty care networks in place and shall verify the
integrity of their primary care and specialty care networks, that those
networks are geographically within the service area, and that the
providers are actually open to accepting referrals before the
department signs or extends contracts. If an out-of-county specialist
is needed for a medicaid client because of an inadequate specialist
network within the county, written documentation is not required.
(5) The department shall develop a grant program to reimburse
providers who serve individuals who are medically indigent.
(6) The department shall ensure that publicly supported community
health centers and providers in rural areas, who show serious intent
and apparent capability to participate as managed health care systems
are seriously considered as contractors. The department shall
coordinate its managed care activities with activities under chapter
70.47 RCW.
(((4))) (7) The department shall work jointly with the state of
Oregon and other states in this geographical region in order to develop
recommendations to be presented to the appropriate federal agencies and
the United States congress for improving health care of the poor, while
controlling related costs.
(((5))) (8) The legislature finds that competition in the managed
health care marketplace is enhanced, in the long term, by the existence
of a large number of managed health care system options for medicaid
clients. In a managed care delivery system, whose goal is to focus on
prevention, primary care, and improved enrollee health status,
continuity in care relationships is of substantial importance, and
disruption to clients and health care providers should be minimized.
To help ensure these goals are met, the following principles shall
guide the department in its healthy options managed health care
purchasing efforts:
(a) All managed health care systems should have an opportunity to
contract with the department to the extent that minimum contracting
requirements defined by the department are met, at payment rates that
enable the department to operate as far below appropriated spending
levels as possible, consistent with the principles established in this
section.
(b) Managed health care systems should compete for the award of
contracts and assignment of medicaid beneficiaries who do not
voluntarily select a contracting system, based upon:
(i) Demonstrated commitment to or experience in serving low-income
populations;
(ii) Quality of services provided to enrollees;
(iii) Accessibility, including appropriate utilization, of services
offered to enrollees;
(iv) Demonstrated capability to perform contracted services,
including ability to supply an adequate provider network;
(v) Payment rates; and
(vi) The ability to meet other specifically defined contract
requirements established by the department, including consideration of
past and current performance and participation in other state or
federal health programs as a contractor.
(c) Consideration should be given to using multiple year
contracting periods.
(d) Quality, accessibility, and demonstrated commitment to serving
low-income populations shall be given significant weight in the
contracting, evaluation, and assignment process.
(e) All contractors that are regulated health carriers must meet
state minimum net worth requirements as defined in applicable state
laws. The department shall adopt rules establishing the minimum net
worth requirements for contractors that are not regulated health
carriers. This subsection does not limit the authority of the
department to take action under a contract upon finding that a
contractor's financial status seriously jeopardizes the contractor's
ability to meet its contract obligations.
(f) Procedures for resolution of disputes between the department
and contract bidders or the department and contracting carriers related
to the award of, or failure to award, a managed care contract must be
clearly set out in the procurement document. In designing such
procedures, the department shall give strong consideration to the
negotiation and dispute resolution processes used by the Washington
state health care authority in its managed health care contracting
activities.
(((6))) (9) The department may apply the principles set forth in
subsection (((5))) (8) of this section to its managed health care
purchasing efforts on behalf of clients receiving supplemental security
income benefits to the extent appropriate.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.05.013 and 2003 c 276 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The authority shall coordinate state agency efforts to develop
and implement uniform policies across state purchased health care
programs that will ensure prudent, cost-effective health services
purchasing, maximize efficiencies in administration of state purchased
health care programs, improve the quality of care provided through
state purchased health care programs, and reduce administrative burdens
on health care providers participating in state purchased health care
programs. The policies adopted should be based, to the extent
possible, upon the best available scientific and medical evidence and
shall endeavor to address:
(a) Methods of formal assessment, such as health technology
assessment. Consideration of the best available scientific evidence
does not preclude consideration of experimental or investigational
treatment or services under a clinical investigation approved by an
institutional review board;
(b) Monitoring of health outcomes, adverse events, quality, and
cost-effectiveness of health services;
(c) Development of a common definition of medical necessity;
((and))
(d) Exploration of common strategies for disease management and
demand management programs; and
(e) Implementation of administrative simplification procedures
relating to claims processing, referrals and prospective review, and
practitioner credentialing.
(2) The administrator may invite health care provider
organizations, carriers, other health care purchasers, and consumers to
participate in efforts undertaken under this section.
(3) For the purposes of this section "best available scientific and
medical evidence" means the best available external clinical evidence
derived from systematic research.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The department of health shall develop, in
consultation with the department of revenue, a program to provide
business and occupation tax credits for physicians who serve uninsured
and medicaid patients in a private practice or a reduced fee access
program for the uninsured and shall submit proposed legislation to the
legislature by December 15, 2005.

--- END ---