BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that skill centers
provide students with high quality educational opportunities through
programs that combine academics with career and technical education.
The legislature also finds that skill centers provide extremely
valuable support to local businesses seeking skilled entry-level
employees and to communities attempting to enhance local economic
development opportunities. Through skill center programs, students
learn the technical knowledge and skills necessary either to pursue
additional education through apprenticeships, technical schools, or
institutions of higher education, or go directly into entry-level
employment and begin careers. The legislature finds that skill centers
permit a number of school districts to cooperatively offer programs
that the school districts cannot provide individually. The legislature
further finds that the funding formula used for skill center students
needs to be revised to ensure that a student who is taking classes at
a skill center and high school simultaneously generates full funding
for the instruction that each provides to the student. The legislature
intends to enhance the opportunities that students have to enroll in
skill centers by revising the funding formula for skill center
students.

Sec. 2 RCW 28C.22.010 and 1993 c 380 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Skill centers, to the extent funds are available, are
encouraged to operate afternoon and evening programs.
(2) The funding formula for a skill center student shall be
determined based upon the student's aggregate enrolled hours of
instruction, not to exceed 1.2 full-time equivalent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect September 1, 2005.

--- END ---