BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that assessments
provide teachers, parents, the community, and policymakers with
valuable information that can be used for a variety of purposes.
Assessments that are nationally normed help teachers, parents, and the
community know how well their children are learning in comparison to
other children across the country and in neighboring schools and school
districts. These norm-referenced assessments are well understood by
parents and have been accepted for generations as one of the best ways
to measure the achievement and progress of individual students.
Criterion-referenced assessments, including the Washington assessment
of student learning, provide teachers, parents, and the community with
information on how well students are learning to state standards.
While criterion-referenced assessments provide information on how well
students are learning compared to their local and state peers, they do
not provide information on how well students are learning compared to
their peers in neighboring states or across the country. The
legislature finds that, while norm and criterion-referenced assessments
are useful, the most valuable assessments of all are diagnostic
assessments that provide teachers and parents with the information they
need to support and enhance the learning of individual students. The
legislature further finds that the state's assessment system needs to
be designed to give teachers, parents, and the community information in
all those dimensions.
Therefore, the legislature intends to ensure that the state's
assessment system is designed to provide information on how well
Washington's students are learning compared to their peers in
neighboring schools and across the state and country. The legislature
further intends that the assessment system include diagnostic
assessments and other instruments that help teachers and parents
discover the specific grade level expectations that students need
additional support to learn.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that assessments that are nationally
normed help teachers, parents, and the community know how well their
students are learning in comparison to other children across the
country and in neighboring schools and school districts. These norm-referenced assessments are well understood by parents and have been
accepted for generations as one way to measure the achievement and
progress of individual students.
(2) School districts may, at their own expense, administer norm-referenced assessments to students.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.655.070 and 2004 c 19 s 204 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop
essential academic learning requirements that identify the knowledge
and skills all public school students need to know and be able to do
based on the student learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210, develop student
assessments, and implement the accountability recommendations and
requests regarding assistance, rewards, and recognition of the academic
achievement and accountability commission.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall:
(a) Periodically revise the essential academic learning
requirements, as needed, based on the student learning goals in RCW
28A.150.210. Goals one and two shall be considered primary. To the
maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall integrate goal four
and the knowledge and skill areas in the other goals in the essential
academic learning requirements; and
(b) Review and prioritize the essential academic learning
requirements and identify, with clear and concise descriptions, the
grade level content expectations to be assessed on the Washington
assessment of student learning and used for state or federal
accountability purposes. The review, prioritization, and
identification shall result in more focus and targeting with an
emphasis on depth over breadth in the number of grade level content
expectations assessed at each grade level. Grade level content
expectations shall be articulated over the grades as a sequence of
expectations and performances that are logical, build with increasing
depth after foundational knowledge and skills are acquired, and
reflect, where appropriate, the sequential nature of the discipline.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction, within seven
working days, shall post on its web site any grade level content
expectations provided to an assessment vendor for use in constructing
the Washington assessment of student learning.
(3) In consultation with the academic achievement and
accountability commission, the superintendent of public instruction
shall maintain and continue to develop and revise a statewide academic
assessment system in the content areas of reading, writing,
mathematics, and science for use in the elementary, middle, and high
school years designed to determine if each student has mastered the
essential academic learning requirements identified in subsection (1)
of this section. School districts shall administer the assessments
under guidelines adopted by the superintendent of public instruction.
The academic assessment system shall include a variety of assessment
methods, including criterion-referenced and performance-based measures.
Beginning with the 2006-07 school year, the results of at least one
criterion-referenced assessment in reading and in mathematics for
elementary school, middle school, and high school shall be available in
a format that provides nationally norm-referenced results in addition
to other results. The norm-referenced results shall be annually
reported to parents, the community, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, and the public at the same time and in the same
manner as the criterion-referenced results of the assessment.
(4) If the superintendent proposes any modification to the
essential academic learning requirements or the statewide assessments,
then the superintendent shall, upon request, provide opportunities for
the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate
to review the assessments and proposed modifications to the essential
academic learning requirements before the modifications are adopted.
(5)(a) The assessment system shall be designed so that the results
under the assessment system are used by educators as tools to evaluate
instructional practices, and to initiate appropriate educational
support for students who have not mastered the essential academic
learning requirements at the appropriate periods in the student's
educational development.
(b) Assessments measuring the essential academic learning
requirements in the content area of science shall be available for
mandatory use in middle schools and high schools by the 2003-04 school
year and for mandatory use in elementary schools by the 2004-05 school
year unless the legislature takes action to delay or prevent
implementation of the assessment.
(6) By September 2007, the results for reading and mathematics
shall be reported in a format that will allow parents and teachers to
determine the academic gain a student has acquired in those content
areas from one school year to the next.
(7) To assist parents and teachers in their efforts to provide
educational support to individual students, the superintendent of
public instruction shall provide as much individual student performance
information as possible within the constraints of the assessment
system's item bank. The superintendent shall also provide to school
districts:
(a) Information on classroom-based and other assessments that may
provide additional achievement information for individual students; and
(b) A collection of diagnostic tools that educators may use to
evaluate the academic status of individual students. The tools shall
((be designed to be inexpensive, easily administered, and quickly and
easily scored, with results provided in a format that may be easily
shared with parents and students)):
(i) Be aligned to the state's grade level expectations;
(ii) Be individualized to challenge every student and dynamically
adjust to each student's performance level in order to provide
information that is as accurate as possible and to provide teachers
with information to enhance instruction for each student;
(iii) Have the ability to be delivered and scored by computer in
under one hour, providing information to the teacher within forty-eight
hours, and with the fastest possible turnaround time for district and
state reports;
(iv) Provide results that allow the measurement of individual
student growth using reliable and stable measurement scales;
(v) Be cost-effective; and
(vi) Be available for first through twelfth grade beginning no
later than September 1, 2006, subject to available funds.
(8) To the maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall
integrate knowledge and skill areas in development of the assessments.
(9) Assessments for goals three and four of RCW 28A.150.210 shall
be integrated in the essential academic learning requirements and
assessments for goals one and two.
(10) The superintendent shall develop assessments that are directly
related to the essential academic learning requirements, and are not
biased toward persons with different learning styles, racial or ethnic
backgrounds, or on the basis of gender.
(11) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the
unique needs of special education students when developing the
assessments under this section.
(12) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the
unique needs of highly capable students when developing the assessments
under this section.
(13) The superintendent shall post on the superintendent's web site
lists of resources and model assessments in social studies, the arts,
and health and fitness.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect August 1, 2005.

--- END ---