BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each hospital shall compile and post in a visible and
accessible manner and location of the patient care area of each unit of
the hospital the following information regarding each unit and shift:
(a) The number of registered nurses licensed under chapter 18.79
RCW providing direct patient care and the ratio of patients to
registered nurses;
(b) The number of licensed practical nurses licensed under chapter
18.79 RCW providing direct patient care and the ratio of patients to
licensed practical nurses;
(c) The number of nursing assistants certified or registered under
chapter 18.88A RCW providing direct patient care and the ratio of
patients to nursing assistants;
(d) The number of other credentialed health care providers
providing direct patient care to meet any state or federal staffing
requirements; and
(e) The methods used by the hospital for determining and adjusting
direct patient care staffing levels.
(2) Each hospital shall compile the monthly averages of the
information listed in subsection (1) of this section by unit and shift
and report the data to the department every six months at a time and in
a manner prescribed by the department. In addition, the hospital shall
provide a copy of the report to any member of the public upon request.
The department shall compile an annual report of the reports that it
receives from each hospital and make the information available to the
public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.51 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each nursing home shall compile and post in a visible and
accessible manner and location of the residential area information
about the number and type of credentialed health care providers who are
directly responsible for resident care. The information shall specify
the ratio of credentialed health care providers to residents according
to each shift.
(2) Each nursing home shall compile the monthly averages of the
information listed in subsection (1) of this section by shift and
report it to the department every six months at a time and manner
prescribed by the department. In addition, the nursing home shall
provide a copy of the report to any member of the public upon request.
The department shall compile an annual report of the reports that it
receives from each nursing home and make the information available to
the public.

--- END ---