BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.15.628 and 1999 c 82 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that military and naval veterans who have
served their country in wars on foreign soil have risked their own
lives to defend both the lives of all Americans and the freedoms that
define and distinguish our nation. It is the intent of the legislature
to honor Persian Gulf combat zone veterans for the public service they
have provided to their country. It is the further intent of the
legislature that, for eligible Persian Gulf combat zone veterans,
institutions of higher education waive tuition and fee increases that
have occurred after the 1990-91 academic year.
(2) Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing
boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The
Evergreen State College, and the community colleges may exempt veterans
of the Persian Gulf combat zone from all or a portion of increases in
tuition and fees that occur after the 1990-91 academic year, if the
veteran ((could have qualified)) qualifies as a Washington resident
student under RCW 28B.15.012(2)((, had he or she been enrolled as a
student on August 1, 1990)).
(3) For the purposes of this section, "a veteran of the Persian
Gulf combat zone" means a person who served on active duty in the armed
forces of the United States during any portion of the 1991 calendar
year in the Persian Gulf combat zone as designated by executive order
of the president of the United States.

--- END ---