BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.03.260 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 5 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Each application for permit to appropriate water shall set
forth the name and post office address of the applicant, the source of
water supply, the nature and amount of the proposed use, the time
during which water will be required each year, the location and
description of the proposed ditch, canal, or other work, the time
within which the completion of the construction and the time for the
complete application of the water to the proposed use.
(2) If for agricultural purposes, the application shall give the
legal subdivision of the land and the acreage to be irrigated, as near
as may be, and the amount of water expressed in acre feet to be
supplied per season. If for power purposes, it shall give the nature
of the works by means of which the power is to be developed, the head
and amount of water to be utilized, and the uses to which the power is
to be applied.
(3) If for construction of a reservoir, the application shall give
the height of the dam, the capacity of the reservoir, and the uses to
be made of the impounded waters.
(4) If for community or multiple domestic water supply, the
application shall give the projected number of service connections
sought to be served. However((,)):
(a) For a municipal water supplier that has an approved water
system plan under chapter 43.20 RCW or an approval from the department
of health to serve a specified number of service connections, the
service connection figure in the application or any subsequent water
right document is not an attribute limiting exercise of the water right
as long as the number of service connections to be served under the
right is consistent with the approved water system plan or specified
number; and
(b) For a domestic water supply to fourteen or fewer service
connections, the service connection figure in the application or any
subsequent water right documents is not an attribute limiting exercise
of the water right as long as the amount of water withdrawn or diverted
under the water right does not exceed the instantaneous or annual
amounts authorized by the permit or such subsequent documents for the
water right.
(5) If for municipal water supply, the application shall give the
present population to be served, and, as near as may be estimated, the
future requirement of the municipality. However, for a municipal water
supplier that has an approved water system plan under chapter 43.20 RCW
or an approval from the department of health to serve a specified
number of service connections, the population figures in the
application or any subsequent water right document are not an attribute
limiting exercise of the water right as long as the population to be
provided water under the right is consistent with the approved water
system plan or specified number.
(6) If for mining purposes, the application shall give the nature
of the mines to be served and the method of supplying and utilizing the
water; also their location by legal subdivisions.
(7) All applications shall be accompanied by such maps and
drawings, in duplicate, and such other data, as may be required by the
department, and such accompanying data shall be considered as a part of
the application.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.14.140 and 2001 c 240 s 1, 2001 c 237 s 27, and
2001 c 69 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of RCW 90.14.130 through 90.14.180,
"sufficient cause" shall be defined as the nonuse of all or a portion
of the water by the owner of a water right for a period of five or more
consecutive years where such nonuse occurs as a result of:
(a) Drought, or other unavailability of water;
(b) Active service in the armed forces of the United States during
military crisis;
(c) Nonvoluntary service in the armed forces of the United States;
(d) The operation of legal proceedings;
(e) Federal or state agency leases of or options to purchase lands
or water rights which preclude or reduce the use of the right by the
owner of the water right;
(f) Federal laws imposing land or water use restrictions either
directly or through the voluntary enrollment of a landowner in a
federal program implementing those laws, or acreage limitations, or
production quotas;
(g) Temporarily reduced water need for irrigation use where such
reduction is due to varying weather conditions, including but not
limited to precipitation and temperature, that warranted the reduction
in water use, so long as the water user's diversion and delivery
facilities are maintained in good operating condition consistent with
beneficial use of the full amount of the water right;
(h) Temporarily reduced diversions or withdrawals of irrigation
water directly resulting from the provisions of a contract or similar
agreement in which a supplier of electricity buys back electricity from
the water right holder and the electricity is needed for the diversion
or withdrawal or for the use of the water diverted or withdrawn for
irrigation purposes;
(i) Water conservation measures implemented under the Yakima river
basin water enhancement project, so long as the conserved water is
reallocated in accordance with the provisions of P.L. 103-434;
(j) Reliance by an irrigation water user on the transitory presence
of return flows in lieu of diversion or withdrawal of water from the
primary source of supply, if such return flows are measured or reliably
estimated using a scientific methodology generally accepted as reliable
within the scientific community; or
(k) The reduced use of irrigation water resulting from crop
rotation. For purposes of this subsection, crop rotation means the
temporary change in the type of crops grown resulting from the exercise
of generally recognized sound farming practices. Unused water
resulting from crop rotation will not be relinquished if the remaining
portion of the water continues to be beneficially used.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provisions of RCW 90.14.130 through
90.14.180, there shall be no relinquishment of any water right:
(a) If such right is claimed for power development purposes under
chapter 90.16 RCW and annual license fees are paid in accordance with
chapter 90.16 RCW;
(b) If such right is used for a standby or reserve water supply to
be used in time of drought or other low flow period so long as
withdrawal or diversion facilities are maintained in good operating
condition for the use of such reserve or standby water supply;
(c) If such right is claimed for a determined future development to
take place either within fifteen years of July 1, 1967, or the most
recent beneficial use of the water right, whichever date is later;
(d) If such right is claimed for municipal water supply purposes or
for domestic water supply under chapter 90.03 RCW;
(e) If such waters are not subject to appropriation under the
applicable provisions of RCW 90.40.030;
(f) If such right or portion of the right is leased to another
person for use on land other than the land to which the right is
appurtenant as long as the lessee makes beneficial use of the right in
accordance with this chapter and a transfer or change of the right has
been approved by the department in accordance with RCW 90.03.380,
90.03.383, 90.03.390, or 90.44.100;
(g) If such a right or portion of the right is authorized for a
purpose that is satisfied by the use of agricultural industrial process
water as authorized under RCW 90.46.150; or
(h) If such right is a trust water right under chapter 90.38 or
90.42 RCW.
(3) In adding provisions to this section by chapter 237, Laws of
2001, the legislature does not intend to imply legislative approval or
disapproval of any existing administrative policy regarding, or any
existing administrative or judicial interpretation of, the provisions
of this section not expressly added or revised.

--- END ---