BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.95A.050 and 2002 c 248 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every authority has the following powers:
(1) To acquire by purchase, condemnation, gift, or grant and to
lease, construct, add to, improve, replace, repair, maintain, operate,
and regulate the use of public monorail transportation facilities,
including passenger terminal and parking facilities and properties, and
other facilities and properties as may be necessary for passenger and
vehicular access to and from public monorail transportation facilities,
together with all lands, rights of way, and property within or outside
the authority area, and together with equipment and accessories
necessary or appropriate for these facilities, except that property,
including but not limited to other types of public transportation
facilities, that is owned by any city, county, county transportation
authority, public transportation benefit area, metropolitan municipal
corporation, or regional transit authority may be acquired or used by
an authority only with the consent of the public entity owning the
property. The entities are authorized to convey or lease property to
an authority or to contract for their joint use on terms fixed by
agreement between the entity and the authority. The right of eminent
domain must be exercised by the authority under a resolution to the
same extent, in the same manner, and by the same procedure as is or may
be provided by law for cities of the first class, except insofar as
those laws may be inconsistent with this chapter;
(2) To fix rates, tolls, fares, and charges for the use of
facilities and to establish various routes and classes of service.
Rates, tolls, fares, or charges may be adjusted or eliminated for any
distinguishable class of users including, but not limited to, senior
citizens and ((handicapped)) persons with disabilities;
(3) To contract with the United States or any of its agencies, any
state or any of its agencies, any metropolitan municipal corporation,
and other ((country)) county, city, other political subdivision or
governmental instrumentality, or governmental agency, or any private
person, firm, or corporation for the purpose of receiving any gifts or
grants or securing loans or advances for preliminary planning and
feasibility studies((, or));
(4) Notwithstanding the provisions of any law to the contrary, and
in addition to any other authority provided by law, to contract with
parties including but not limited to the United States or any of its
agencies, any state or any of its agencies, any metropolitan municipal
corporation, any other county, city, other political subdivision or
governmental instrumentality, or governmental agency, or any private
person, firm, or corporation for the design, construction, operation,
or maintenance of public monorail transportation facilities as follows:
(a) ((Notwithstanding the provisions of any law to the contrary,
and in addition to any other authority provided by law,)) The governing
body of a city transportation authority may contract with one or more
((vendors)) parties for the design, construction, operation, or
maintenance, or other service related to the development of a monorail
public transportation system including, but not limited to, monorail
trains, operating systems and control equipment, guideways, and pylons,
together with the necessary passenger stations, terminals, parking
facilities, and other related facilities necessary and appropriate for
passenger and vehicular access to and from the monorail train.
(b) If the governing body of the city transportation authority
decides to proceed with the consideration of qualifications or
proposals for services from qualified ((vendors)) parties, the
authority must publish notice of its requirements and request
submission of qualifications statements or proposals. The notice must
be published in the official newspaper of the city creating the
authority at least once a week for two weeks, not less than sixty days
before the final date for the submission of qualifications statements
or proposals. The notice must state in summary form: (i) The general
scope and nature of the design, construction, operation, maintenance,
or other services being sought related to the development of the
proposed monorail, tram, or trolley public transportation system; (ii)
the name and address of a representative of the city transportation
authority who can provide further details; (iii) the final date for the
submission of qualifications statements or proposals; (iv) an estimated
schedule for the consideration of qualifications statements or
proposals((, the)) and selection ((of vendors)) among them, and the
negotiation of a contract or contracts for services; (v) the location
of which a copy of any requests for qualifications statements or
requests for proposals will be made available; and (vi) the selection
criteria established by the governing body of the authority ((to select
a vendor or vendors)), which may include, but is not limited to, ((the
vendor's)) prior experience, including design, construction, operation,
or maintenance of other similar public transportation facilities,
((respondent's)) management capabilities, proposed project schedule,
availability and financial resources, costs of the services to be
provided, nature of facility design proposed ((by the vendors)), system
reliability, performance standards required for the facilities,
compatibility with existing public transportation facilities operated
by the authority or any other public body or other providers of similar
services to the public, project performance guarantees, penalties, and
other enforcement provisions, environmental protection measures to be
used ((by the vendor)), consistency with the applicable regional
transportation plans, and the proposed allocation of project risks.
(c) If the governing body of the city transportation authority
decides to proceed with the consideration of qualifications statements
or proposals submitted ((by vendors)), it may designate a
representative or representatives to evaluate the ((vendors)) parties
who submitted qualifications statements or proposals, request
clarifications, and conduct interviews and discussions regarding
qualifications or proposals with one or more ((vendors)) parties. The
governing body or its representative may request submission of
qualifications statements and may later request more detailed proposals
from one or more ((vendors)) parties who have submitted qualifications
statements, or may request detailed proposals without having first
received and evaluated qualifications statements. The governing body
or its representative will evaluate the qualifications or proposals, as
applicable. If two or more ((vendors)) parties submit qualifications
or proposals that meet the criteria established by the governing body
of the authority, ((discussions and)) interviews must be held with at
least two ((vendors)) parties. Any revisions to a request for
qualifications or request for proposals must be made available to all
((vendors)) parties then under consideration by the governing body of
the authority and must be made available to any other person who has
requested receipt of that information.
(d) Based on the criteria established by the governing body of the
authority, the representative will recommend to the governing body a
((vendor or vendors)) party or parties that are initially determined to
be the best qualified to provide one or more of the design,
construction, operation, or maintenance, or other service related to
the development of the proposed monorail public transportation system.
(e) The governing body of the authority or its representative may
attempt to negotiate a contract with the ((vendor or vendors)) party or
parties selected for one or more of the design, construction,
operation, or maintenance, or other service related to the development
of the proposed monorail public transportation system on terms that the
governing body of the authority determines to be fair and reasonable
and in the best interest of the authority. If the governing body, or
its representative, is unable to negotiate a contract with any one or
more of the ((vendors)) parties, first selected on terms that it
determines to be fair and reasonable and in the best interest of the
authority, negotiations with any one or more of the ((vendors))
parties, must be terminated or suspended and another qualified ((vendor
or vendors)) party or parties may be selected in accordance with the
procedures set forth in this section. If the governing body decides to
continue the process of selection, negotiations will continue with a
qualified ((vendor or vendors)) party or parties in accordance with
this section at the sole discretion of the governing body of the
authority until an agreement is reached with one or more qualified
((vendors)) parties, or the process is terminated by the governing
body. The process may be repeated until an agreement is reached.
(f) Prior to entering into a contract ((with a vendor)) under this
subsection (4), the governing body of the authority must make written
findings, after holding a public hearing on the proposal, that it is in
the public interest to enter into the contract, that the contract is
financially sound, and that it is advantageous for the governing body
of the authority to use this method for awarding contracts for one or
more of the design, construction, ((or)) operation, or maintenance of
the proposed monorail public transportation system as compared to all
other methods of awarding such contracts.
(g) Each contract under this subsection (4) must include a project
performance bond or bonds or other security by the vendor.
(h) The provisions of chapters 39.12 and 39.19 RCW apply to a
contract entered into under this ((section as if the public
transportation systems and facilities were owned by a public body))
subsection (4).
(i) The ((vendor)) selection process permitted by this ((section))
subsection (4) is ((supplemental)) alternative to and is not construed
as a repeal of or limitation on any other authority granted by
law((.));
(((j))) (5) To contract((s)) for the construction of facilities,
other than contracts ((for facilities to be provided by the selected
vendor,)) procured under subsection (4) of this section and contracts
with an estimated cost ((greater)) less than two hundred thousand
dollars ((must be awarded after)), through a competitive bid process
consistent with chapter 39.04 RCW or awarded through an alternative
public works contracting procedure consistent with chapter 39.10 RCW;
(((4))) (6) To contract with the United States or any of its
agencies, any state or any of its agencies, any metropolitan municipal
corporation, any other county, city, other political subdivision or
governmental instrumentality, any governmental agency, or any private
person, firm, or corporation for the use by either contracting party of
all or any part of the facilities, structures, lands, interests in
lands, air rights over lands, and rights of way of all kinds which are
owned, leased, or held by the other party and for the purpose of
planning, designing, constructing, operating any public transportation
facility, or performing any service related to transportation which the
authority is authorized to operate or perform, on terms as may be
agreed upon by the contracting parties;
(((5))) (7) To acquire any existing public transportation facility
by conveyance, sale, or lease. In any acquisition from a county, city,
or other political subdivision of the state, the authority will receive
credit from the county or city or other political subdivision for any
federal assistance and state matching assistance used by the county or
city or other political subdivision in acquiring any portion of the
public transportation facility. Upon acquisition, the authority must
assume and observe all existing labor contracts relating to the public
transportation facility and, to the extent necessary for operation of
the public transportation facility, all of the employees of the public
transportation facility whose duties are necessary to efficiently
operate the public transportation facility must be appointed to
comparable positions to those which they held at the time of the
transfer, and no employee or retired or pensioned employee of the
public transportation facility will be placed in any worse position
with respect to pension seniority, wages, sick leave, vacation, or
other benefits than he or she enjoyed as an employee of the public
transportation facility prior to the acquisition. Furthermore, the
authority must engage in collective bargaining with the duly appointed
representatives of any employee labor organization having existing
contracts with the acquired facility and may enter into labor contracts
with the employee labor organization;
(((6))) (8) To contract for, participate in, and support research,
demonstration, testing, and development of public monorail
transportation facilities, equipment, and use incentives, and have all
powers necessary to comply with any criteria, standards, and
regulations which may be adopted under state and federal law, and to
take all actions necessary to meet the requirements of those laws. The
authority has, in addition to these powers, the authority to prepare,
adopt, and carry out a comprehensive public monorail plan and to make
other plans and studies and to perform programs as the authority deems
necessary to implement and comply with those laws;
(((7))) (9) To establish local improvement districts within the
authority area to finance public monorail transportation facilities, to
levy special assessments on property specially benefited by those
facilities, and to issue local improvement bonds to be repaid by the
collection of local improvement assessments. The method of
establishment, levying, collection, enforcement, and all other matters
relating to the local improvement districts, assessments, collection,
and bonds are as provided in the statutes governing local improvement
districts of cities and towns. The duties devolving upon the city
treasurer in those statutes are imposed on the treasurer of the
authority;
(((8))) (10) To submit ballot propositions to the qualified
electors of the authority area on one or more of the following issues,
after a public hearing and adoption of a resolution by the governing
body of the authority submitting the proposition for approval: (a)
Amendments to the ordinance or petition creating the authority under
RCW 35.95A.020 and 35.95A.030, including but not limited to an
amendment regarding election of a majority of members of the governing
body of the authority; and (b) the imposition of taxes and fees
authorized under this chapter for the funding of additional monorail
lines and associated public transportation facilities. A ballot
proposition must be submitted at a specified general or special
election occurring not less than forty-five days after the adoption of
the resolution;
(11) To exercise all other powers necessary and appropriate to
carry out its responsibilities, including without limitation the power
to sue and be sued, to own, construct, purchase, lease, add to, and
maintain any real and personal property or property rights necessary
for the conduct of the affairs of the authority, to make rules and
regulations by resolution relating to elections held for the governing
body of the authority that are consistent with the ordinance or
petition creating the authority under RCW 35.95A.020 and 35.95A.030, to
enter into contracts, and to employ the persons as the authority deems
appropriate. An authority may also sell, lease, convey, or otherwise
dispose of any real or personal property no longer necessary for the
conduct of the affairs of the authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.95A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An authority may establish, by resolution, a schedule of fines
and penalties for civil infractions established in section 3 of this
act. Fines established by a city transportation authority may not
exceed those imposed for class 1 civil infractions under RCW 7.80.120.
(2)(a) In order to monitor fare payment, an authority may designate
persons authorized to exercise all the powers of an enforcement
officer, defined in RCW 7.80.040. An authority may either employ
personnel to monitor fare payment, or contract for those services, or
both.
(b) In addition to the specific powers granted to enforcement
officers under RCW 7.80.050 and 7.80.060, persons designated to monitor
fare payment may also take the following actions:
(i) Request proof of payment from passengers;
(ii) Request personal identification from a passenger who does not
produce proof of payment when requested;
(iii) Issue a citation conforming to RCW 7.80.070; and
(iv) Request that a passenger leave the monorail train or station
when the passenger has not produced proof of payment after being asked
to do so by a person designated to monitor fare payment.
(3) City transportation authorities shall keep, or cause to be
kept, records of citations as prescribed by RCW 7.80.150. All civil
infractions under section 3 of this act must be heard and determined by
a district court for the county in which the infraction occurred as
provided in RCW 7.80.010 (1) and (4).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35.95A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Persons traveling on monorail trains operated by an authority
shall pay the fare established by the authority. They shall produce
proof of payment when requested by a person designated to monitor fare
payment.
(2) The following are civil infractions punishable according to the
schedule of fines and penalties established by the authority under
section 2 of this act:
(a) Failure to pay or attempting to evade payment of the required
fare;
(b) Failure to display proof of payment when requested to do so by
a person designated to monitor fare payment; and
(c) Failure to leave the monorail train or station when requested
to do so by a person designated to monitor fare payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 35.95A RCW
to read as follows:
Nothing in section 2 or 3 of this act prevents law enforcement
authorities from prosecuting for theft, trespass, or other criminal
charge a person who:
(1) Fails to pay or attempts to evade payment of the required fare
on more than one occasion within a twelve-month period;
(2) Fails to sign a notice of civil infraction;
(3) Fails to leave the monorail train or station when requested to
do so by a person designated to monitor fare payment; or
(4) Acts or fails to act in violation of law.

Sec. 5 RCW 35.95A.110 and 2002 c 248 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
All taxes and fees levied and collected by an authority must be
used solely for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of
acquiring, designing, constructing, equipping, maintaining, or
operating public monorail transportation facilities or contracting for
the services thereof, or to pay or secure the payment of contracts
entered into under RCW 35.95A.050 or payment of all or part of the
principal of or interest on any general obligation bonds or revenue
bonds issued for authority purposes. Until expended, money accumulated
in the funds and accounts of an authority may be invested in the manner
authorized by the governing body of the authority, consistent with
state law.
If any of the revenue from any tax or fee authorized to be levied
by an authority has been pledged by the authority to secure the payment
of any contracts or bonds as ((herein)) authorized in this chapter,
then as long as that pledge is in effect the legislature will not
withdraw from the authority the authorization to levy and collect the
tax or fee.

Sec. 6 RCW 39.36.030 and 1986 c 50 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever it shall be necessary to compute the indebtedness of
a taxing district for bonding or any other indebtedness purposes, taxes
levied for the current year and cash on hand received for the purpose
of carrying on the business of such taxing district for such current
year shall be considered as an asset only as against indebtedness
incurred during such current year which is payable from such taxes or
cash on hand: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That all taxes levied for the payment
of bonds, warrants or other public debts of such taxing district, shall
be deemed a competent and sufficient asset of the taxing district to be
considered in calculating the constitutional debt limit or the debt
limit prescribed by this chapter for any taxing district: PROVIDED,
That the provisions of this section shall not apply in computing the
debt limit of a taxing district in connection with bonds authorized
pursuant to a vote of the electors at an election called prior to March
1, 1917.
(2) If reductions in assessed valuation of property within a taxing
district result in the outstanding indebtedness of the taxing district
exceeding its statutory indebtedness limitations, the amount of such
excess indebtedness shall not be included in the statutory indebtedness
ceiling. Additional indebtedness that is subject to indebtedness
limitations, other than refinancing indebtedness that does not increase
the total amount of indebtedness, may not be issued by such a taxing
district until its total outstanding indebtedness, including that which
this subsection removes from the statutory indebtedness limitations, is
below these limitations.
(3) The calculation of outstanding indebtedness must include the
initial principal amount of an issue and may not include interest that
is currently payable or that compounds, accretes, appreciates, or
accrues as a part of the amount payable at maturity or earlier
redemption.
(4) Nothing in this section authorizes taxing districts to incur
indebtedness beyond constitutional indebtedness limitations.

Sec. 7 RCW 35.95A.070 and 2002 c 248 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every authority has the power to:
(1) Levy excess levies upon the property included within the
authority area, in the manner prescribed by Article VII, section 2 of
the state Constitution and by RCW 84.52.052 for operating funds,
capital outlay funds, and cumulative reserve funds;
(2) Issue general obligation bonds, not to exceed an amount,
together with any outstanding nonvoter-approved general obligation
indebtedness equal to one and one-half percent of the value of the
taxable property within the authority area, as the term "value of the
taxable property" is defined in RCW 39.36.015. An authority may
additionally issue general obligation bonds, together with outstanding
voter-approved and nonvoter-approved general obligation indebtedness,
equal to two and one-half percent of the value of the taxable property
within the authority area, as the term "value of the taxable property"
is defined in RCW 39.36.015, when the bonds are approved by three-fifths of the qualified electors of the authority at a general or
special election called for that purpose and may provide for the
retirement thereof by levies in excess of dollar rate limitations in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 84.52.056. These elections will
be held as provided in RCW 39.36.050;
(3) Issue revenue bonds payable from any revenues other than taxes
levied by the authority, and to pledge those revenues for the repayment
of the bonds. Proceeds of revenue bonds may only be expended for the
costs of public monorail transportation facilities, for financing
costs, and for capitalized interest during construction plus six months
thereafter. The bonds and warrants will be issued and sold in
accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.
No bonds issued by an authority are obligations of any city,
county, or the state of Washington or any political subdivision thereof
other than the authority, and the bonds will so state, unless the
legislative authority of any city or county or the legislature
expressly authorizes particular bonds to be either guaranteed by or
obligations of its respective city or county or of the state.
The maximum term of any general obligation or revenue bond issue is
the greater of forty years or the maximum period of time permitted by
the Internal Revenue Code at the time of financing for tax-exempt
financing of the assets being acquired or constructed with the proceeds
of the bonds.

Sec. 8 RCW 35.95A.130 and 2002 c 248 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
The special excise tax imposed under RCW 35.95A.080(1) will be
collected at the same time and in the same manner as relicensing tab
fees under RCW 46.16.0621 and 35.95A.090. Every year on January 1st,
April 1st, July 1st, and October 1st the department of licensing shall
remit special excise taxes collected on behalf of an authority, back to
the authority, at no cost to the authority. Valuation of motor
vehicles for purposes of the special excise tax imposed under RCW
35.95A.080(1) must be ((consistent with chapter 82.44 RCW)) performed
under section 9 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 35.95A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purpose of determining the amount of special motor
vehicle excise tax validly authorized and levied by any taxing district
in this state, the value of a truck-type power or trailing unit shall
be the latest purchase price of the vehicle, excluding applicable
federal excise taxes, state and local sales or use taxes,
transportation or shipping costs, or preparatory or delivery costs,
multiplied by the following percentage based on year of service of the
vehicle since last sale. The latest purchase year is considered the
first year of service.

YEAR OF SERVICE PERCENTAGE

1 100

2 90

3 83

4 75

5 67

6 59

7 52

8 44

9 36

10 28

11 21

12 13

13 or older 10

(2) The reissuance of title and registration for a truck-type power
or trailing unit because of the installation of body or special
equipment must be treated as a sale, and the value of the truck-type
power or trailing unit at that time, as determined by the department
from such information as may be available, is considered the latest
purchase price.
(3) For the purpose of determining the amount of special motor
vehicle excise tax validly authorized and levied by any taxing district
in this state, the value of a motor vehicle other than a truck-type
power or trailing unit is the manufacturer's base suggested retail
price of the vehicle when first offered for sale as a new vehicle,
excluding any optional equipment, applicable federal excise taxes,
state and local sales or use taxes, transportation or shipping costs,
or preparatory or delivery costs, multiplied by the applicable
percentage listed in this subsection based on year of service of the
vehicle.
If the manufacturer's base suggested retail price is unavailable or
otherwise unascertainable at the time of initial registration in this
state, the department shall determine a value equivalent to a
manufacturer's base suggested retail price as follows:
(a) The department shall determine a value using any information
that may be available, including any guidebook, report, or compendium
of recognized standing in the automotive industry or the selling price
and year of sale of the vehicle. The department may use an appraisal
by the county assessor. In valuing a vehicle for which the current
value or selling price is not indicative of the value of similar
vehicles of the same year and model, the department shall establish a
value that more closely represents the average value of similar
vehicles of the same year and model.
(b) The value determined in (a) of this subsection shall be
multiplied by the applicable percentage listed in this subsection to
establish a value equivalent to a manufacturer's base suggested retail
price. The applicable percentage must be based on the year of service
of the vehicle for which the value is determined.

YEAR OF SERVICE PERCENTAGE

1 100

2 95

3 89

4 83

5 74

6 65

7 57

8 48

9 40

10 31

11 22

12 14

13 or older 10

(4) For purposes of this chapter, value excludes value attributable
to modifications of a motor vehicle and equipment that are designed to
facilitate the use or operation of the motor vehicle by a person with
a disability.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In order to obtain or renew a vehicle license, an applicant
must satisfy all special motor vehicle excise tax obligations with
respect to any taxing district in which the applicant primarily
resides. If the department or its agents have a reasonable basis to
believe that a vehicle registered at an address outside any taxing
district is owned by a person whose primary residence address is in
that taxing district, then the renewal application may be processed by
the department or its agents only if the applicant:
(a) Presents evidence reasonably satisfactory to the department or
its agents that the applicant's primary residence is not in the taxing
district;
(b) Establishes eligibility of the applicant for an exemption from
the special motor vehicle excise tax; or
(c) Tenders payment of the applicable special motor vehicle excise
tax, including, but not limited to, any such tax that should have been
paid with respect to previous renewal periods, files a change of
address under RCW 46.20.205, and pays a surcharge of fifteen dollars.
(2) The surcharge will be allocated as follows:
(a) Ten dollars must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund to be
used exclusively for the administrative costs of the department; and
(b) Five dollars may be retained by the agent handling the renewal
application to be used by the agent for the administration of this
section.
(3) If the department has a reasonable basis to believe that a
vehicle registered at an address outside the boundaries of any taxing
district is owned by a person whose primary residence address is in
that taxing district, the department shall send to the person, at the
time of renewal, a statement setting out the presumed address of
residency, the taxing district to which the address relates, the
amounts of special motor vehicle excise tax relating to the vehicle,
and the surcharge to be collected.

Sec. 11 RCW 82.44.065 and 1990 c 42 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
If the department determines a value for a motor vehicle under
((RCW 82.44.041)) section 9 of this act equivalent to a manufacturer's
base suggested retail price or the value of a truck-type power or
trailing unit under ((RCW 82.44.041(2))) section 9 of this act, any
person who pays ((the)) a special motor vehicle excise tax ((under this
chapter)) collected by the department for that vehicle may appeal the
valuation to the department under chapter 34.05 RCW. If the taxpayer
is successful on appeal, the department shall refund the excess tax in
the manner provided in RCW 82.44.120.

Sec. 12 RCW 82.44.120 and 2003 c 53 s 403 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Whenever any person has paid a motor vehicle license fee, and
together therewith has paid ((an)) a special motor vehicle excise tax
((imposed under the provisions of this chapter)) collected by the
department, and the director determines that the payor is entitled to
a refund of the entire amount of the license fee as provided by law,
then the payor shall also be entitled to a refund of the entire excise
tax collected under the provisions of this chapter. In case the
director determines that any person is entitled to a refund of only a
part of the license fee so paid, the payor shall be entitled to a
refund of the difference, if any, between the excise tax collected and
that which should have been collected.
(2) In case no claim is to be made for the refund of the license
fee or any part thereof, but claim is made by any person that he or she
has paid an erroneously excessive amount of excise tax, the department
shall determine in the manner generally provided in this chapter the
amount of such excess, if any, that has been paid and shall certify to
the state treasurer that such person is entitled to a refund in such
amount.
(3) In any case where due to error, a person has been required to
pay an excise tax ((pursuant to this chapter)) collected by the
department and a vehicle license fee pursuant to Title 46 RCW which
amounts to an overpayment of ten dollars or more, such person shall be
entitled to a refund of the entire amount of such overpayment,
regardless of whether or not a refund of the overpayment has been
requested. Conversely, if due to error, the department or its agents
has failed to collect the full amount of the license fee and excise tax
due, which underpayment is in the amount of ten dollars or more, the
department shall charge and collect such additional amount as will
constitute full payment of the tax.
(4) Any claim for refund of an erroneously excessive amount of
excise tax or overpayment of excise tax with a motor vehicle license
fee must be filed with the director within three years after the
claimed erroneous payment was made.
(5) If the department approves the claim it shall notify the state
treasurer to that effect, and the treasurer shall make such approved
refunds from the general fund and the funds that would otherwise be
payable to the taxing district that has levied any special motor
vehicle excise tax and shall mail or deliver the same to the person
entitled thereto.
(6) Any person making any false statement under which he or she
obtains any amount of refund to which he or she is not entitled under
the provisions of this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 All prior actions by a city transportation
authority and the department of licensing that are consistent with the
provisions of this act are ratified and confirmed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---