BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.80.005 and 2002 c 354 s 321 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Agency" means any agency as defined in RCW 41.06.020 and
covered by chapter 41.06 RCW.
(2) "Collective bargaining" means the performance of the mutual
obligation of the representatives of the employer and the exclusive
bargaining representative to meet at reasonable times and to bargain in
good faith in an effort to reach agreement with respect to the subjects
of bargaining specified under RCW 41.80.020. The obligation to bargain
does not compel either party to agree to a proposal or to make a
concession, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.
(3) "Commission" means the public employment relations commission.
(4) "Confidential employee" means an employee who, in the regular
course of his or her duties, assists in a confidential capacity persons
who formulate, determine, and effectuate management policies with
regard to labor relations or who, in the regular course of his or her
duties, has authorized access to information relating to the
effectuation or review of the employer's collective bargaining
policies, or who assists or aids a manager. "Confidential employee"
also includes employees who assist assistant attorneys general who
advise and represent managers or confidential employees in personnel or
labor relations matters, or who advise or represent the state in tort
actions.
(5) "Director" means the director of the public employment
relations commission.
(6) "Employee" means any employee, including employees whose work
has ceased in connection with the pursuit of lawful activities
protected by this chapter, covered by chapter 41.06 RCW, except:
(a) Employees covered for collective bargaining by chapter 41.56
RCW;
(b) Confidential employees;
(c) Members of the Washington management service;
(d) Internal auditors in any agency; or
(e) Any employee of the commission, the office of financial
management, or the department of personnel.
(7) "Employee organization" means any organization, union, or
association in which employees participate and that exists for the
purpose, in whole or in part, of collective bargaining with employers.
(8) "Employer" means the state of Washington.
(9) "Exclusive bargaining representative" means any employee
organization that has been certified under this chapter as the
representative of the employees in an appropriate bargaining unit.
(10) "Institutions of higher education" means the University of
Washington, Washington State University, Central Washington University,
Eastern Washington University, Western Washington University, The
Evergreen State College, and the various state community colleges.
(11) "Labor dispute" means any controversy concerning terms,
tenure, or conditions of employment, or concerning the association or
representation of persons in negotiating, fixing, maintaining,
changing, or seeking to arrange terms or conditions of employment with
respect to the subjects of bargaining provided in this chapter,
regardless of whether the disputants stand in the proximate relation of
employer and employee.
(12) "Manager" means "manager" as defined in RCW 41.06.022.
(13) "Supervisor" means an employee who has authority, in the
interest of the employer, to hire, transfer, suspend, lay off, recall,
promote, discharge, direct, reward, or discipline employees, including
the supervision of student workers at an institution of higher
education, or to adjust employee grievances, or effectively to
recommend such action, if the exercise of the authority is not of a
merely routine nature but requires the consistent exercise of
individual judgment. However, no employee who is a member of the
Washington management service may be included in a collective
bargaining unit established under this section.
(14) "Unfair labor practice" means any unfair labor practice listed
in RCW 41.80.110.

--- END ---