BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that state and
tribal jurisdiction to tax the same transaction results in confusion
regarding the imposition and collection of tax. It is the
legislature's intent to allow tribal municipalities to contract with
the department of revenue for the distribution of tax in the same
manner as other cities and towns within the state of Washington.
Additionally, it is the legislature's intent that the tribal municipal
tax be treated the same as a tax imposed by a city or town tax insofar
as calculating the percentage of tax to be shared between the county
and the city or town.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the sole purposes of tax administration, in addition to the
meaning given it in RCW 82.14.020, the word "city" includes an
incorporated political subdivision of the Tulalip Tribes of Washington
when that incorporated political subdivision, with defined boundaries
within the reservation of the tribe, has received approval from the
United States department of the treasury pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec.
7871(d) and the regulations and procedures of the United States under
26 U.S.C. Sec. 7871(d) to be treated as a political subdivision of an
Indian tribal government for purposes of 26 U.S.C. Sec. 7871(d).
(2) As a pilot project, the department may enter into an interlocal
cooperation agreement pursuant to chapter 39.34 RCW with any Indian
tribe that has a city, as that term is used in subsection (1) of this
section, to administer and collect tax under the provisions of RCW
82.14.050 to be levied on activities occurring on federal Indian trust
or restricted fee lands within the boundaries of the city as the
boundaries are defined by the charter of the city. Any such agreement
is subject to the following provisions:
(a) The tribal sales and use tax definitions must be uniform with
the state and local sales and use tax definitions under chapters 82.08
and 82.12 RCW and this chapter.
(b) The tribal tax rate must be no greater than that allowed cities
under RCW 82.14.030.
(c) The tribe must agree to provide the county with a percentage of
its revenue, in accordance with the provisions of RCW 82.14.030; this
percentage subject to distribution by the department.
(3) The agreement may also cover additional areas of tax
administration, including audit and compliance, and other
administrative provisions of chapters 82.03, 82.08, 82.12, and 82.32
RCW, as may be required to simplify tax administration and tax
reporting. The department shall report to the legislature by December
1, 2006, regarding the agreement. The report shall contain information
on the fiscal impact of the agreement, administrative issues
encountered during implementation, any legal issues that need to be
addressed in state law, and any other matter significant to the
agreement. The report shall contain a recommendation on the
feasibility of extending this pilot project.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.14.030 and 1989 c 384 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governing body of any county or city while not required by
legislative mandate to do so, may, by resolution or ordinance for the
purposes authorized by this chapter, fix and impose a sales and use tax
in accordance with the terms of this chapter. Such tax shall be
collected from those persons who are taxable by the state pursuant to
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW, upon the occurrence of any taxable event
within the county or city as the case may be: PROVIDED, That except as
provided in RCW 82.14.230, this sales and use tax shall not apply to
natural or manufactured gas. The rate of such tax imposed by a county
shall be five-tenths of one percent of the selling price (in the case
of a sales tax) or value of the article used (in the case of a use
tax). The rate of such tax imposed by a city shall not exceed five-tenths of one percent of the selling price (in the case of a sales tax)
or value of the article used (in the case of a use tax): PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That in the event a county shall impose a sales and use tax
under this subsection, the rate of such tax imposed under this
subsection by any city therein shall not exceed four hundred and
twenty-five one-thousandths of one percent.
(2) Subject to the enactment into law of the 1982 amendment to RCW
82.02.020 by section 5, chapter 49, Laws of 1982 1st ex. sess., in
addition to the tax authorized in subsection (1) of this section, the
governing body of any county or city may by resolution or ordinance
impose an additional sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of
this chapter. Such additional tax shall be collected upon the same
taxable events upon which the tax imposed under subsection (1) of this
section is levied. The rate of such additional tax imposed by a county
shall be up to five-tenths of one percent of the selling price (in the
case of a sales tax) or value of the article used (in the case of a use
tax). The rate of such additional tax imposed by a city shall be up to
five-tenths of one percent of the selling price (in the case of a sales
tax) or value of the article used (in the case of a use tax): PROVIDED
HOWEVER, That in the event a county shall impose a sales and use tax
under this subsection at a rate equal to or greater than the rate
imposed under this subsection by a city within the county, the county
shall receive fifteen percent of the city tax: PROVIDED FURTHER, That
in the event that the county shall impose a sales and use tax under
this subsection at a rate which is less than the rate imposed under
this subsection by a city within the county, the county shall receive
that amount of revenues from the city tax equal to fifteen percent of
the rate of tax imposed by the county under this subsection. The
authority to impose a tax under this subsection is intended in part to
compensate local government for any losses from the phase-out of the
property tax on business inventories.
(3) As used in this section, in addition to the meaning given in
RCW 82.14.020, "city" has the meaning given in section 2 of this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.14.040 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 49 s 18 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Any county ordinance adopted under RCW 82.14.030(1) shall
contain, in addition to all other provisions required to conform to
this chapter, a provision allowing a credit against the county tax
imposed under RCW 82.14.030(1) for the full amount of any city sales or
use tax imposed under RCW 82.14.030(1) or in conformance with an
agreement subject to section 2 of this act upon the same taxable event.
(2) Any county ordinance adopted under RCW 82.14.030(2) shall
contain, in addition to all other provisions required to conform to
this chapter, a provision allowing a credit against the county tax
imposed under RCW 82.14.030(2) for the full amount of any city sales or
use tax imposed under RCW 82.14.030(2) or in conformance with an
agreement subject to section 2 of this act upon the same taxable event
up to the additional tax imposed by the county under RCW 82.14.030(2).
(3) As used in this section, in addition to the meaning given in
RCW 82.14.020, "city" has the meaning given in section 2 of this act.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.14.050 and 2003 c 168 s 201 and 2003 c 83 s 208 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The counties, cities, and transportation authorities under RCW
82.14.045, public facilities districts under chapters 36.100 and 35.57
RCW, public transportation benefit areas under RCW 82.14.440, and
regional transportation investment districts shall contract, prior to
the effective date of a resolution or ordinance imposing a sales and
use tax, the administration and collection to the state department of
revenue, which shall deduct a percentage amount, as provided by
contract, not to exceed two percent of the taxes collected for
administration and collection expenses incurred by the department.
(2) The remainder of any portion of any tax authorized by this
chapter that is collected by the department of revenue shall be
deposited by the state department of revenue in the local sales and use
tax account hereby created in the state treasury. Moneys in the local
sales and use tax account may be spent only for distribution to
counties, cities, transportation authorities, public facilities
districts, public transportation benefit areas, and regional
transportation investment districts imposing a sales and use tax.
(3) All administrative provisions in chapters 82.03, 82.08, 82.12,
and 82.32 RCW, as they now exist or may hereafter be amended, shall,
insofar as they are applicable to state sales and use taxes, be
applicable to taxes imposed pursuant to this chapter. Counties,
cities, transportation authorities, public facilities districts, and
regional transportation investment districts may not conduct
independent sales or use tax audits of sellers registered under the
streamlined sales tax agreement.
(4) Except as provided in RCW 43.08.190, all earnings of
investments of balances in the local sales and use tax account shall be
credited to the local sales and use tax account and distributed to the
counties, cities, transportation authorities, public facilities
districts, public transportation benefit areas, and regional
transportation investment districts monthly.
(5) As used in this section, in addition to the meaning given in
RCW 82.14.020, "city" has the meaning given in section 2 of this act.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.14.060 and 1991 c 207 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Monthly the state treasurer shall make distribution from the
local sales and use tax account to the counties, cities, transportation
authorities, and public facilities districts the amount of tax
collected on behalf of each taxing authority, less the deduction
provided for in RCW 82.14.050. The state treasurer shall make the
distribution under this section without appropriation.
(2) In the event that any ordinance or resolution imposes a sales
and use tax at a rate in excess of the applicable limits contained
herein, such ordinance or resolution shall not be considered void in
toto, but only with respect to that portion of the rate which is in
excess of the applicable limits contained herein.
(3) As used in this section, in addition to the meaning given in
RCW 82.14.020, "city" has the meaning given in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---