BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.4452 and 2004 c 2 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for each person whose research and development spending during
the year in which the credit is claimed exceeds 0.92 percent of the
person's taxable amount during the same calendar year.
(2) The credit ((shall be calculated as follows: (a) Determine))
is equal to the greater of the amount of qualified research and
development expenditures of a person or eighty percent of amounts
received by a person other than a public educational or research
institution in compensation for the conduct of qualified research and
development((; (b) subtract 0.92 percent of the person's taxable amount
from the amount determined under (a) of this subsection; (c) multiply
the amount determined under (b) of this subsection)), multiplied by the
rate provided in RCW 82.04.260(3) in the case of a nonprofit
corporation or nonprofit association engaging within this state in
research and development, ((and)) or the ((person's average)) tax rate
provided in RCW 82.04.290(2) for every other person.
(3) Any person entitled to the credit provided in subsection (2) of
this section as a result of qualified research and development
conducted under contract may assign all or any portion of the credit to
the person contracting for the performance of the qualified research
and development.
(4) The credit, including any credit assigned to a person under
subsection (3) of this section, shall be taken against taxes due for
the same calendar year in which the qualified research and development
expenditures are incurred. The credit, including any credit assigned
to a person under subsection (3) of this section, for each calendar
year shall not exceed the lesser of two million dollars or the amount
of tax otherwise due under this chapter for the calendar year.
(5) Any person taking the credit, including any credit assigned to
a person under subsection (3) of this section, whose research and
development spending during the calendar year in which the credit is
claimed fails to exceed 0.92 percent of the person's taxable amount
during the same calendar year shall be liable for payment of the
additional taxes represented by the amount of credit taken together
with interest, but not penalties. Interest shall be due at the rate
provided for delinquent excise taxes retroactively to the date the
credit was taken until the taxes are paid. Any credit assigned to a
person under subsection (3) of this section that is disallowed as a
result of this section may be taken by the person who performed the
qualified research and development subject to the limitations set forth
in subsection (4) of this section.
(6) Any person claiming the credit, and any person assigning a
credit as provided in subsection (3) of this section, shall file an
annual report in a form prescribed by the department which shall
include the amount of the credit claimed, the qualified research and
development expenditures during the calendar year for which the credit
is claimed, and the taxable amount during the calendar year for which
the credit is claimed, and such additional information as the
department may prescribe. The report is due by March 31st following
any year a credit is taken.
(7)(a) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness
are important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources the
legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(b) A person claiming the credit shall agree to complete an annual
survey. The annual survey is in addition to the annual report due
under subsection (6) of this section. The survey is due by March 31st
following any year in which a credit is taken. The survey shall
include the amount of the tax credit taken, the number of new products
or research projects by general classification, and the number of
trademarks, patents, and copyrights associated with the research and
development activities for which a credit was taken. The survey shall
also include the following information for employment positions in
Washington:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(c) The department may request additional information necessary to
measure the results of the tax credit program, to be submitted at the
same time as the survey.
(d) All information collected under this subsection, except the
amount of the tax credit taken, is deemed taxpayer information under
RCW 82.32.330 and is not disclosable. Information on the amount of tax
credit taken is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW
82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request except that
persons taking less than ten thousand dollars of credit during the
period covered by the survey may request the department to treat the
tax credit amount as confidential under RCW 82.32.330.
(e) If a person fails to complete the survey required under this
subsection by the due date, the person entitled to the credit provided
in subsection (2) of this section is not eligible to take or assign the
credit provided in subsection (2) of this section in the year the
person failed to complete the survey.
(8) The department shall use the information from subsection (7) of
this section to prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No
fewer than three taxpayers shall be included in any category. The
department shall report these statistics to the legislature each year
by September 1st.
(9) The department shall use the information from subsection (7) of
this section to study the tax credit program authorized under this
section. The department shall report to the legislature by December 1,
2009, and December 1, 2013. The reports shall measure the effect of
the program on job creation, the number of jobs created for Washington
residents, company growth, the introduction of new products, the
diversification of the state's economy, growth in research and
development investment, the movement of firms or the consolidation of
firms' operations into the state, and such other factors as the
department selects.
(10) For the purpose of this section:
(a) (("Average tax rate" means a person's total tax under this
chapter for the reporting period divided by the taxpayer's total
taxable income under this chapter for the reporting period.
(b))) "Qualified research and development expenditures" means
operating expenses, including wages, compensation of a proprietor or a
partner in a partnership as determined under rules adopted by the
department, benefits, supplies, and computer expenses, directly
incurred in qualified research and development by a person claiming the
credit provided in this section. The term does not include amounts
paid to a person other than a public educational or research
institution to conduct qualified research and development. Nor does
the term include capital costs and overhead, such as expenses for land,
structures, or depreciable property.
(((c))) (b) "Qualified research and development" shall have the
same meaning as in RCW 82.63.010.
(((d))) (c) "Research and development spending" means qualified
research and development expenditures plus eighty percent of amounts
paid to a person other than a public educational or research
institution to conduct qualified research and development.
(((e))) (d) "Taxable amount" means the taxable amount subject to
the tax imposed in this chapter required to be reported on the person's
combined excise tax returns during the year in which the credit is
claimed, less any taxable amount for which a credit is allowed under
RCW 82.04.440.
(11) This section expires January 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If the department finds that the failure of a taxpayer to file
an annual survey under RCW 82.04.4452 by the due date was the result of
circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer, the department shall
extend the time for filing the survey. Such extension shall be for a
period of thirty days from the date the department issues its written
notification to the taxpayer that it qualifies for an extension under
this section. The department may grant additional extensions as it
deems proper.
(2) In making a determination whether the failure of a taxpayer to
file an annual survey by the due date was the result of circumstances
beyond the control of the taxpayer, the department shall be guided by
WAC 458-20-228 relating to the waiver or cancellation of penalties when
the underpayment or untimely payment of any tax was due to
circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A person who owes additional tax as a
result of section 1 of this act and this section is liable for
interest, but not penalties as provided in RCW 82.32.090 (1) and (2),
if the entire additional tax liability is paid in full to the
department of revenue before January 1, 2006. Interest shall be
assessed at the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under chapter
82.32 RCW, retroactively to the date the credit was claimed, and shall
accrue until the additional tax is repaid.
(2) Persons who fail to repay the full amount of additional tax
owed as a result of section 1 of this act and this section before
January 1, 2006, are subject to all applicable penalties and interest
as provided in chapter 82.32 RCW on the additional tax owing after
December 31, 2005.
(3) This section expires December 31, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 1 of this act applies retroactively
to June 10, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 2 of this act applies retroactively
to annual surveys required under RCW 82.04.4452 that are due after
December 31, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---