BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 88.02.052 and 1996 c 3 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
In conjunction with the registration of vessels under this chapter,
the department shall provide an opportunity for each person registering
a vessel to make a voluntary donation to support the maritime historic
restoration and preservation activities of the Grays Harbor Historical
Seaport ((and)), the Steamer Virginia V Foundation, and the Sandman
Foundation. All voluntary donations collected under this section shall
be deposited in the maritime historic restoration and preservation
account created under RCW 88.02.053.

Sec. 2 RCW 88.02.053 and 1996 c 3 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) The maritime historic restoration and preservation account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from the
voluntary donations made simultaneously with the registration of
vessels under chapter 88.02 RCW shall be deposited into this account.
These deposits are not public funds and are not subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.
(2) At the end of each fiscal year, the state treasurer shall pay
from this account to the department of licensing an amount equal to the
reasonable administrative expenses of that agency for that fiscal year
for collecting the voluntary donations and transmitting them to the
state treasurer and shall pay to the state treasurer an amount equal to
the reasonable administrative expenses of that agency for that fiscal
year for maintaining the account and disbursing funds from the account.
(3) At the end of each fiscal year, the state treasurer shall pay
((one-half)) one-third of the balance of the funds in the account after
payment of the administrative costs provided in subsection (2) of this
section, to the Grays Harbor historical seaport or its corporate
successor ((and the remainder)), one-third to the Steamer Virginia V
foundation or its corporate successor, and the remainder to the Sandman
Foundation or its corporate successor.
(4) If ((either)) the Grays Harbor historical seaport and its
corporate successors ((or)), the Steamer Virginia V foundation and its
corporate successors, or the Sandman Foundation and its corporate
successors legally ceases to exist, the state treasurer shall, at the
end of each fiscal year, pay an equal amount of the balance of the
funds in the account to the remaining organizations.
(5) If ((both)) the Grays Harbor historical seaport and its
corporate successors ((and)), the Steamer Virginia V foundation and its
corporate successors, and the Sandman Foundation and its corporate
successors all legally cease to exist, the department of licensing
shall discontinue the collection of the voluntary donations in
conjunction with the registration of vessels under RCW 88.02.052, and
the balance of the funds in the account escheat to the state. If funds
in the account escheat to the state, one-half of the fund balance shall
be provided to the office of archaeology and historic preservation and
the remainder shall be deposited into the parks renewal and stewardship
account.
(6) The secretary of state, the directors of the state historical
societies, the director of the office of archaeology and historic
preservation within the department of community, trade, and economic
development, and two members representing the recreational boating
community appointed by the secretary of state, shall review the success
of the voluntary donation program for maritime historic restoration and
preservation established under RCW 88.02.052 and report their findings
to the appropriate legislative committees by January 31, 1998. The
findings must include the progress of the program and the potential to
expand the voluntary funding to other historic vessels.

--- END ---