BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.175.010 and 1991 c 235 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each school district shall account for the educational progress of
each of its students. To achieve this, school districts shall be
required to report annually to the superintendent of public
instruction:
(1) For students enrolled in each of a school district's high
school programs:
(a) The number of students eligible for graduation in fewer than
four years;
(b) The number of students who graduate in four years;
(c) The number of students who remain in school for more than four
years but who eventually graduate and the number of students who remain
in school for more than four years but do not graduate;
(d) The number of students who transfer to other schools;
(e) The number of students who enter from other schools;
(f) The number of students in the ninth through twelfth grade who
drop out of school over a four-year period; and
(g) The number of students whose status is unknown.
(2) Dropout rates of students in each of the grades ((nine)) seven
through twelve.
(3) Dropout rates for student populations in each of the grades
((nine)) seven through twelve by:
(a) Ethnicity;
(b) Gender;
(c) Socioeconomic status; and
(d) Disability status.
(4) The causes or reasons, or both, attributed to students for
having dropped out of school in grades ((nine)) seven through twelve.
(5) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules
under chapter 34.05 RCW to assure uniformity in the information
districts are required to report under subsections (1) through (4) of
this section. In developing rules, the superintendent of public
instruction shall consult with school districts, including
administrative and counseling personnel, with regard to the methods
through which information is to be collected and reported.
(6) In reporting on the causes or reasons, or both, attributed to
students for having dropped out of school, school building officials
shall, to the extent reasonably practical, obtain such information
directly from students. In lieu of obtaining such information directly
from students, building principals and counselors shall identify the
causes or reasons, or both, based on their professional judgment.
(7) The superintendent of public instruction shall report annually
to the legislature the information collected under subsections (1)
through (4) of this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.655.030 and 2004 c 19 s 205 are each amended to
read as follows:
The powers and duties of the academic achievement and
accountability commission shall include, but are not limited to the
following:
(1) For purposes of statewide accountability, the commission shall:
(a) Adopt and revise performance improvement goals in reading,
writing, science, and mathematics by subject and grade level as the
commission deems appropriate to improve student learning, once
assessments in these subjects are required statewide. The goals shall
be consistent with student privacy protection provisions of RCW
28A.655.090(7) and shall not conflict with requirements contained in
Title I of the federal elementary and secondary education act of 1965,
as amended. The goals may be established for all students,
economically disadvantaged students, limited English proficient
students, students with disabilities, and students from
disproportionately academically underachieving racial and ethnic
backgrounds. The commission ((may)) shall establish school and school
district goals addressing high school graduation rates and dropout
reduction goals for students in grades seven through twelve. The
commission shall adopt the goals by rule. However, before each goal is
implemented, the commission shall present the goal to the education
committees of the house of representatives and the senate for the
committees' review and comment in a time frame that will permit the
legislature to take statutory action on the goal if such action is
deemed warranted by the legislature;
(b) Identify the scores students must achieve in order to meet the
standard on the Washington assessment of student learning and, for high
school students, to obtain a certificate of academic achievement. The
commission shall also determine student scores that identify levels of
student performance below and beyond the standard. The commission
shall consider the incorporation of the standard error of measurement
into the decision regarding the award of the certificates. The
commission shall set such performance standards and levels in
consultation with the superintendent of public instruction and after
consideration of any recommendations that may be developed by any
advisory committees that may be established for this purpose. The
initial performance standards and any changes recommended by the
commission in the performance standards for the tenth grade assessment
shall be presented to the education committees of the house of
representatives and the senate by November 30th of the school year in
which the changes will take place to permit the legislature to take
statutory action before the changes are implemented if such action is
deemed warranted by the legislature. The legislature shall be advised
of the initial performance standards and any changes made to the
elementary level performance standards and the middle school level
performance standards;
(c) Adopt objective, systematic criteria to identify successful
schools and school districts and recommend to the superintendent of
public instruction schools and districts to be recognized for two types
of accomplishments, student achievement and improvements in student
achievement. Recognition for improvements in student achievement shall
include consideration of one or more of the following accomplishments:
(i) An increase in the percent of students meeting standards. The
level of achievement required for recognition may be based on the
achievement goals established by the legislature and by the commission
under (a) of this subsection;
(ii) Positive progress on an improvement index that measures
improvement in all levels of the assessment; and
(iii) Improvements despite challenges such as high levels of
mobility, poverty, English as a second language learners, and large
numbers of students in special populations as measured by either the
percent of students meeting the standard, or the improvement index.
When determining the baseline year or years for recognizing
individual schools, the commission may use the assessment results from
the initial years the assessments were administered, if doing so with
individual schools would be appropriate;
(d) Adopt objective, systematic criteria to identify schools and
school districts in need of assistance and those in which significant
numbers of students persistently fail to meet state standards. In its
deliberations, the commission shall consider the use of all statewide
mandated criterion-referenced and norm-referenced standardized tests;
(e) Identify schools and school districts in which state
intervention measures will be needed and a range of appropriate
intervention strategies, beginning no earlier than June 30, 2001, and
after the legislature has authorized a set of intervention strategies.
Beginning no earlier than June 30, 2001, and after the legislature has
authorized a set of intervention strategies, at the request of the
commission, the superintendent shall intervene in the school or school
district and take corrective actions. This chapter does not provide
additional authority for the commission or the superintendent of public
instruction to intervene in a school or school district;
(f) Identify performance incentive systems that have improved or
have the potential to improve student achievement;
(g) Annually review the assessment reporting system to ensure
fairness, accuracy, timeliness, and equity of opportunity, especially
with regard to schools with special circumstances and unique
populations of students, and a recommendation to the superintendent of
public instruction of any improvements needed to the system;
(h) Annually report by December 1st to the legislature, the
governor, the superintendent of public instruction, and the state board
of education on the progress, findings, and recommendations of the
commission. The report may include recommendations of actions to help
improve student achievement;
(i) By December 1, 2000, and by December 1st annually thereafter,
report to the education committees of the house of representatives and
the senate on the progress that has been made in achieving goals
adopted by the commission;
(j) Coordinate its activities with the state board of education and
the office of the superintendent of public instruction;
(k) Seek advice from the public and all interested educational
organizations in the conduct of its work; and
(l) Establish advisory committees, which may include persons who
are not members of the commission;
(2) Holding meetings and public hearings, which may include
regional meetings and hearings;
(3) Hiring necessary staff and determining the staff's duties and
compensation. However, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall provide staff support to the commission until the
commission has hired its own staff, and shall provide most of the
technical assistance and logistical support needed by the commission
thereafter. The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall be the fiscal agent for the commission. The commission may
direct the office of the superintendent of public instruction to enter
into subcontracts, within the commission's resources, with school
districts, teachers, higher education faculty, state agencies, business
organizations, and other individuals and organizations to assist the
commission in its deliberations; and
(4) Receiving per diem and travel allowances as permitted under RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

--- END ---