BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) No later than December 1, 2005, the
department of social and health services shall determine and inform the
legislature of:
(a) The number of licensed nursing home beds and the average
occupancy rate of each licensed nursing home in the state of Washington
between July 1, 2004, and June 30, 2005;
(b) The number of licensed boarding home beds and the average
occupancy rate of each licensed boarding home in the state of
Washington between July 1, 2004, and June 30, 2005;
(c) The number of licensed adult family home beds and the average
occupancy rate of licensed adult family homes in the state of
Washington between July 1, 2004, and June 30, 2005; and
(d) The number of individuals receiving home and community services
in the state of Washington by service area between July 1, 2004, and
June 30, 2005.
(2) Upon determining the licensed bed capacity and average
occupancy rates for residential care facilities in the state of
Washington, the department shall assess and analyze each planning
area's bed capacity, occupancy rates, and projected future need of
residential care facilities, and the impact of future construction of
residential care facilities on current providers.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) "Planning area" means each individual county designated by the
department as the smallest geographic area for which nursing home bed
need projections are developed except as follows:
(i) Clark and Skamania counties shall be one planning area; and
(ii) Chelan and Douglas counties shall be one planning area.
(b) "Residential care facility" means an adult family home licensed
under chapter 70.128 RCW, a boarding home licensed under chapter 18.20
RCW, or a nursing home licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---