BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.38.111 and 1997 c 210 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall not require a certificate of need for the
offering of an inpatient tertiary health service by:
(a) A health maintenance organization or a combination of health
maintenance organizations if (i) the organization or combination of
organizations has, in the service area of the organization or the
service areas of the organizations in the combination, an enrollment of
at least fifty thousand individuals, (ii) the facility in which the
service will be provided is or will be geographically located so that
the service will be reasonably accessible to such enrolled individuals,
and (iii) at least seventy-five percent of the patients who can
reasonably be expected to receive the tertiary health service will be
individuals enrolled with such organization or organizations in the
combination;
(b) A health care facility if (i) the facility primarily provides
or will provide inpatient health services, (ii) the facility is or will
be controlled, directly or indirectly, by a health maintenance
organization or a combination of health maintenance organizations which
has, in the service area of the organization or service areas of the
organizations in the combination, an enrollment of at least fifty
thousand individuals, (iii) the facility is or will be geographically
located so that the service will be reasonably accessible to such
enrolled individuals, and (iv) at least seventy-five percent of the
patients who can reasonably be expected to receive the tertiary health
service will be individuals enrolled with such organization or
organizations in the combination; or
(c) A health care facility (or portion thereof) if (i) the facility
is or will be leased by a health maintenance organization or
combination of health maintenance organizations which has, in the
service area of the organization or the service areas of the
organizations in the combination, an enrollment of at least fifty
thousand individuals and, on the date the application is submitted
under subsection (2) of this section, at least fifteen years remain in
the term of the lease, (ii) the facility is or will be geographically
located so that the service will be reasonably accessible to such
enrolled individuals, and (iii) at least seventy-five percent of the
patients who can reasonably be expected to receive the tertiary health
service will be individuals enrolled with such organization;
if, with respect to such offering or obligation by a nursing home, the
department has, upon application under subsection (2) of this section,
granted an exemption from such requirement to the organization,
combination of organizations, or facility.
(2) A health maintenance organization, combination of health
maintenance organizations, or health care facility shall not be exempt
under subsection (1) of this section from obtaining a certificate of
need before offering a tertiary health service unless:
(a) It has submitted at least thirty days prior to the offering of
services reviewable under RCW 70.38.105(4)(d) an application for such
exemption; and
(b) The application contains such information respecting the
organization, combination, or facility and the proposed offering or
obligation by a nursing home as the department may require to determine
if the organization or combination meets the requirements of subsection
(1) of this section or the facility meets or will meet such
requirements; and
(c) The department approves such application. The department shall
approve or disapprove an application for exemption within thirty days
of receipt of a completed application. In the case of a proposed
health care facility (or portion thereof) which has not begun to
provide tertiary health services on the date an application is
submitted under this subsection with respect to such facility (or
portion), the facility (or portion) shall meet the applicable
requirements of subsection (1) of this section when the facility first
provides such services. The department shall approve an application
submitted under this subsection if it determines that the applicable
requirements of subsection (1) of this section are met.
(3) A health care facility (or any part thereof) with respect to
which an exemption was granted under subsection (1) of this section may
not be sold or leased and a controlling interest in such facility or in
a lease of such facility may not be acquired and a health care facility
described in (1)(c) which was granted an exemption under subsection (1)
of this section may not be used by any person other than the lessee
described in (1)(c) unless:
(a) The department issues a certificate of need approving the sale,
lease, acquisition, or use; or
(b) The department determines, upon application, that (i) the
entity to which the facility is proposed to be sold or leased, which
intends to acquire the controlling interest, or which intends to use
the facility is a health maintenance organization or a combination of
health maintenance organizations which meets the requirements of
(1)(a)(i), and (ii) with respect to such facility, meets the
requirements of (1)(a)(ii) or (iii) or the requirements of (1)(b)(i)
and (ii).
(4) In the case of a health maintenance organization, an ambulatory
care facility, or a health care facility, which ambulatory or health
care facility is controlled, directly or indirectly, by a health
maintenance organization or a combination of health maintenance
organizations, the department may under the program apply its
certificate of need requirements only to the offering of inpatient
tertiary health services and then only to the extent that such offering
is not exempt under the provisions of this section.
(5)(a) The department shall not require a certificate of need for
the construction, development, or other establishment of a nursing
home, or the addition of beds to an existing nursing home, that is
owned and operated by a continuing care retirement community that:
(i) Offers services only to contractual members;
(ii) Provides its members a contractually guaranteed range of
services from independent living through skilled nursing, including
some assistance with daily living activities;
(iii) Contractually assumes responsibility for the cost of services
exceeding the member's financial responsibility under the contract, so
that no third party, with the exception of insurance purchased by the
retirement community or its members, but including the medicaid
program, is liable for costs of care even if the member depletes his or
her personal resources;
(iv) Has offered continuing care contracts and operated a nursing
home continuously since January 1, 1988, or has obtained a certificate
of need to establish a nursing home;
(v) Maintains a binding agreement with the state assuring that
financial liability for services to members, including nursing home
services, will not fall upon the state;
(vi) Does not operate, and has not undertaken a project that would
result in a number of nursing home beds in excess of one for every four
living units operated by the continuing care retirement community,
exclusive of nursing home beds; and
(vii) Has obtained a professional review of pricing and long-term
solvency within the prior five years which was fully disclosed to
members.
(b) A continuing care retirement community shall not be exempt
under this subsection from obtaining a certificate of need unless:
(i) It has submitted an application for exemption at least thirty
days prior to commencing construction of, is submitting an application
for the licensure of, or is commencing operation of a nursing home,
whichever comes first; and
(ii) The application documents to the department that the
continuing care retirement community qualifies for exemption.
(c) The sale, lease, acquisition, or use of part or all of a
continuing care retirement community nursing home that qualifies for
exemption under this subsection shall require prior certificate of need
approval to qualify for licensure as a nursing home unless the
department determines such sale, lease, acquisition, or use is by a
continuing care retirement community that meets the conditions of (a)
of this subsection.
(6) A rural hospital, as defined by the department, reducing the
number of licensed beds to become a rural primary care hospital under
the provisions of Part A Title XVIII of the Social Security Act Section
1820, 42 U.S.C., 1395c et seq. may, within three years of the reduction
of beds licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, increase the number of
licensed beds to no more than the previously licensed number without
being subject to the provisions of this chapter.
(7) A rural health care facility licensed under RCW 70.175.100
formerly licensed as a hospital under chapter 70.41 RCW may, within
three years of the effective date of the rural health care facility
license, apply to the department for a hospital license and not be
subject to the requirements of RCW 70.38.105(4)(a) as the construction,
development, or other establishment of a new hospital, provided there
is no increase in the number of beds previously licensed under chapter
70.41 RCW and there is no redistribution in the number of beds used for
acute care or long-term care, the rural health care facility has been
in continuous operation, and the rural health care facility has not
been purchased or leased.
(8)(a) A nursing home that voluntarily reduces the number of its
licensed beds to provide assisted living, licensed boarding home care,
adult day care, adult day health, respite care, hospice, outpatient
therapy services, congregate meals, home health, or senior wellness
clinic, or to reduce to one or two the number of beds per room or to
otherwise enhance the quality of life for residents in the nursing
home, may convert the original facility or portion of the facility
back, and thereby increase the number of nursing home beds to no more
than the previously licensed number of nursing home beds without
obtaining a certificate of need under this chapter, provided the
facility has been in continuous operation and has not been purchased or
leased. Any conversion to the original licensed bed capacity, or to
any portion thereof, shall comply with the same life and safety code
requirements as existed at the time the nursing home voluntarily
reduced its licensed beds; unless waivers from such requirements were
issued, in which case the converted beds shall reflect the conditions
or standards that then existed pursuant to the approved waivers.
(b) To convert beds back to nursing home beds under this
subsection, the nursing home must:
(i) Give notice of its intent to preserve conversion options to the
department of health no later than thirty days after the effective date
of the license reduction; and
(ii) Give notice to the department of health and to the department
of social and health services of the intent to convert beds back. If
construction is required for the conversion of beds back, the notice of
intent to convert beds back must be given, at a minimum, one year prior
to the effective date of license modification reflecting the restored
beds; otherwise, the notice must be given a minimum of ninety days
prior to the effective date of license modification reflecting the
restored beds. Prior to any license modification to convert beds back
to nursing home beds under this section, the licensee must demonstrate
that the nursing home meets the certificate of need exemption
requirements of this section.
The term "construction," as used in (b)(ii) of this subsection, is
limited to those projects that are expected to equal or exceed the
expenditure minimum amount, as determined under this chapter.
(c) Conversion of beds back under this subsection must be completed
no later than ((four)) ten years after the effective date of the
license reduction. However, for good cause shown, the ((four)) ten-year period for conversion may be extended by the department of health
for one additional ((four)) ten-year period. Contractors currently
banking beds under the provisions of this chapter shall be granted an
additional ten-year period upon the expiration of the bed-banking
period currently in effect.
(d) Nursing home beds that have been voluntarily reduced under this
section shall be counted as available nursing home beds for the purpose
of evaluating need under RCW 70.38.115(2) (a) and (k) so long as the
facility retains the ability to convert them back to nursing home use
under the terms of this section.
(e) When a building owner has secured an interest in the nursing
home beds, which are intended to be voluntarily reduced by the licensee
under (a) of this subsection, the applicant shall provide the
department with a written statement indicating the building owner's
approval of the bed reduction.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.46.020 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Accrual method of accounting" means a method of accounting in
which revenues are reported in the period when they are earned,
regardless of when they are collected, and expenses are reported in the
period in which they are incurred, regardless of when they are paid.
(2) "Actual patient day" means a calendar day of care provided to
a nursing facility resident, regardless of payment source, which
includes the day of admission and excludes the day of discharge. When
used for rate setting purposes, the term "actual patient days" or
"total patient days" means the total number of days of care provided to
residents by the nursing facility regardless of payment sources.
(3) "Adjusted patient days" or "adjusted resident days" or "audited
patient days" means those actual patient days accepted by the
department for rate setting purposes after a desk review or desk audit.
(4) "Appraisal" means the process of estimating the fair market
value or reconstructing the historical cost of an asset acquired in a
past period as performed by a professionally designated real estate
appraiser with no pecuniary interest in the property to be appraised.
It includes a systematic, analytic determination and the recording and
analyzing of property facts, rights, investments, and values based on
a personal inspection and inventory of the property.
(((3))) (5) "Arm's-length transaction" means a transaction
resulting from good-faith bargaining between a buyer and seller who are
not related organizations and have adverse positions in the market
place. Sales or exchanges of nursing home facilities among two or more
parties in which all parties subsequently continue to own one or more
of the facilities involved in the transactions shall not be considered
as arm's-length transactions for purposes of this chapter. Sale of a
nursing home facility which is subsequently leased back to the seller
within five years of the date of sale shall not be considered as an
arm's-length transaction for purposes of this chapter.
(((4))) (6) "Assets" means economic resources of the contractor,
recognized and measured in conformity with generally accepted
accounting principles.
(((5))) (7) "Audit" or "department audit" means an examination of
the records of a nursing facility participating in the medicaid payment
system, including but not limited to: The contractor's financial and
statistical records, cost reports and all supporting documentation and
schedules, receivables, and resident trust funds, to be performed as
deemed necessary by the department and according to department rule.
(((6))) (8) "Bad debts" means amounts considered to be
uncollectible from accounts and notes receivable.
(((7))) (9) "Beneficial owner" means:
(a) Any person who, directly or indirectly, through any contract,
arrangement, understanding, relationship, or otherwise has or shares:
(i) Voting power which includes the power to vote, or to direct the
voting of such ownership interest; and/or
(ii) Investment power which includes the power to dispose, or to
direct the disposition of such ownership interest;
(b) Any person who, directly or indirectly, creates or uses a
trust, proxy, power of attorney, pooling arrangement, or any other
contract, arrangement, or device with the purpose or effect of
divesting himself or herself of beneficial ownership of an ownership
interest or preventing the vesting of such beneficial ownership as part
of a plan or scheme to evade the reporting requirements of this
chapter;
(c) Any person who, subject to (b) of this subsection, has the
right to acquire beneficial ownership of such ownership interest within
sixty days, including but not limited to any right to acquire:
(i) Through the exercise of any option, warrant, or right;
(ii) Through the conversion of an ownership interest;
(iii) Pursuant to the power to revoke a trust, discretionary
account, or similar arrangement; or
(iv) Pursuant to the automatic termination of a trust,
discretionary account, or similar arrangement;
except that, any person who acquires an ownership interest or power
specified in (c)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this subsection with the purpose
or effect of changing or influencing the control of the contractor, or
in connection with or as a participant in any transaction having such
purpose or effect, immediately upon such acquisition shall be deemed to
be the beneficial owner of the ownership interest which may be acquired
through the exercise or conversion of such ownership interest or power;
(d) Any person who in the ordinary course of business is a pledgee
of ownership interest under a written pledge agreement shall not be
deemed to be the beneficial owner of such pledged ownership interest
until the pledgee has taken all formal steps necessary which are
required to declare a default and determines that the power to vote or
to direct the vote or to dispose or to direct the disposition of such
pledged ownership interest will be exercised; except that:
(i) The pledgee agreement is bona fide and was not entered into
with the purpose nor with the effect of changing or influencing the
control of the contractor, nor in connection with any transaction
having such purpose or effect, including persons meeting the conditions
set forth in (b) of this subsection; and
(ii) The pledgee agreement, prior to default, does not grant to the
pledgee:
(A) The power to vote or to direct the vote of the pledged
ownership interest; or
(B) The power to dispose or direct the disposition of the pledged
ownership interest, other than the grant of such power(s) pursuant to
a pledge agreement under which credit is extended and in which the
pledgee is a broker or dealer.
(((8))) (10) "Capitalization" means the recording of an expenditure
as an asset.
(((9))) (11) "Case mix" means a measure of the intensity of care
and services needed by the residents of a nursing facility or a group
of residents in the facility.
(((10))) (12) "Case mix index" means a number representing the
average case mix of a nursing facility.
(((11))) (13) "Case mix weight" means a numeric score that
identifies the relative resources used by a particular group of a
nursing facility's residents.
(((12))) (14) "Certificate of capital authorization" means a
certification from the department for an allocation from the biennial
capital financing authorization for all new or replacement building
construction, or for major renovation projects, receiving a certificate
of need or a certificate of need exemption under chapter 70.38 RCW
after July 1, 2001.
(((13))) (15) "Contractor" means a person or entity licensed under
chapter 18.51 RCW to operate a medicare and medicaid certified nursing
facility, responsible for operational decisions, and contracting with
the department to provide services to medicaid recipients residing in
the facility.
(((14))) (16) "Default case" means no initial assessment has been
completed for a resident and transmitted to the department by the
cut-off date, or an assessment is otherwise past due for the resident,
under state and federal requirements.
(((15))) (17) "Department" means the department of social and
health services (DSHS) and its employees.
(((16))) (18) "Depreciation" means the systematic distribution of
the cost or other basis of tangible assets, less salvage, over the
estimated useful life of the assets.
(((17))) (19) "Direct care" means nursing care and related care
provided to nursing facility residents. Therapy care shall not be
considered part of direct care.
(((18))) (20) "Direct care supplies" means medical, pharmaceutical,
and other supplies required for the direct care of a nursing facility's
residents.
(((19))) (21) "Entity" means an individual, partnership,
corporation, limited liability company, or any other association of
individuals capable of entering enforceable contracts.
(((20))) (22) "Equity" means the net book value of all tangible and
intangible assets less the recorded value of all liabilities, as
recognized and measured in conformity with generally accepted
accounting principles.
(((21))) (23) "Essential community provider" means a facility which
is the only nursing facility within a commuting distance radius of at
least forty minutes duration, traveling by automobile.
(((22))) (24) "Facility" or "nursing facility" means a nursing home
licensed in accordance with chapter 18.51 RCW, excepting nursing homes
certified as institutions for mental diseases, or that portion of a
multiservice facility licensed as a nursing home, or that portion of a
hospital licensed in accordance with chapter 70.41 RCW which operates
as a nursing home.
(((23))) (25) "Fair market value" means the replacement cost of an
asset less observed physical depreciation on the date for which the
market value is being determined.
(((24))) (26) "Financial statements" means statements prepared and
presented in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles
including, but not limited to, balance sheet, statement of operations,
statement of changes in financial position, and related notes.
(((25))) (27) "Generally accepted accounting principles" means
accounting principles approved by the financial accounting standards
board (FASB).
(((26))) (28) "Goodwill" means the excess of the price paid for a
nursing facility business over the fair market value of all net
identifiable tangible and intangible assets acquired, as measured in
accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.
(((27))) (29) "Grouper" means a computer software product that
groups individual nursing facility residents into case mix
classification groups based on specific resident assessment data and
computer logic.
(((28))) (30) "High labor-cost county" means an urban county in
which the median allowable facility cost per case mix unit is more than
ten percent higher than the median allowable facility cost per case mix
unit among all other urban counties, excluding that county.
(((29))) (31) "Historical cost" means the actual cost incurred in
acquiring and preparing an asset for use, including feasibility
studies, architect's fees, and engineering studies.
(((30))) (32) "Home and central office costs" means costs that are
incurred in the support and operation of a home and central office.
Home and central office costs include centralized services that are
performed in support of a nursing facility. The department may exclude
from this definition costs that are nonduplicative, documented,
ordinary, necessary, and related to the provision of care services to
authorized patients.
(((31))) (33) "Imprest fund" means a fund which is regularly
replenished in exactly the amount expended from it.
(((32))) (34) "Joint facility costs" means any costs which
represent resources which benefit more than one facility, or one
facility and any other entity.
(((33))) (35) "Lease agreement" means a contract between two
parties for the possession and use of real or personal property or
assets for a specified period of time in exchange for specified
periodic payments. Elimination (due to any cause other than death or
divorce) or addition of any party to the contract, expiration, or
modification of any lease term in effect on January 1, 1980, or
termination of the lease by either party by any means shall constitute
a termination of the lease agreement. An extension or renewal of a
lease agreement, whether or not pursuant to a renewal provision in the
lease agreement, shall be considered a new lease agreement. A strictly
formal change in the lease agreement which modifies the method,
frequency, or manner in which the lease payments are made, but does not
increase the total lease payment obligation of the lessee, shall not be
considered modification of a lease term.
(((34))) (36) "Licensed beds" or "licensed bed capacity" means a
facility's occupied bed and beds available for occupancy. "Licensed
beds" or "licensed bed capacity" shall never include beds banked under
chapter 70.38 RCW or beds permanently removed from service under the
provisions of this chapter.
(37) "Medical care program" or "medicaid program" means medical
assistance, including nursing care, provided under RCW 74.09.500 or
authorized state medical care services.
(((35))) (38) "Medical care recipient," "medicaid recipient," or
"recipient" means an individual determined eligible by the department
for the services provided under chapter 74.09 RCW.
(((36))) (39) "Minimum data set" means the overall data component
of the resident assessment instrument, indicating the strengths, needs,
and preferences of an individual nursing facility resident.
(((37))) (40) "Net book value" means the historical cost of an
asset less accumulated depreciation.
(((38))) (41) "Net invested funds" means the net book value of
tangible fixed assets employed by a contractor to provide services
under the medical care program, including land, buildings, and
equipment as recognized and measured in conformity with generally
accepted accounting principles.
(((39))) (42) "Nonurban county" means a county which is not located
in a metropolitan statistical area as determined and defined by the
United States office of management and budget or other appropriate
agency or office of the federal government.
(((40))) (43) "Operating lease" means a lease under which rental or
lease expenses are included in current expenses in accordance with
generally accepted accounting principles.
(((41))) (44) "Owner" means a sole proprietor, general or limited
partners, members of a limited liability company, and beneficial
interest holders of five percent or more of a corporation's outstanding
stock.
(((42))) (45) "Ownership interest" means all interests beneficially
owned by a person, calculated in the aggregate, regardless of the form
which such beneficial ownership takes.
(((43))) (46) "Patient day" or "resident day" means a calendar day
of care provided to a nursing facility resident, regardless of payment
source, which will include the day of admission and exclude the day of
discharge; except that, when admission and discharge occur on the same
day, one day of care shall be deemed to exist. A "medicaid day" or
"recipient day" means a calendar day of care provided to a medicaid
recipient determined eligible by the department for services provided
under chapter 74.09 RCW, subject to the same conditions regarding
admission and discharge applicable to a patient day or resident day of
care.
(((44))) (47) "Professionally designated real estate appraiser"
means an individual who is regularly engaged in the business of
providing real estate valuation services for a fee, and who is deemed
qualified by a nationally recognized real estate appraisal educational
organization on the basis of extensive practical appraisal experience,
including the writing of real estate valuation reports as well as the
passing of written examinations on valuation practice and theory, and
who by virtue of membership in such organization is required to
subscribe and adhere to certain standards of professional practice as
such organization prescribes.
(((45))) (48) "Provider fees" means taxes and assessments levied by
any state or local government, in the form of real estate or property
taxes, the quality maintenance fee levied pursuant to chapter 82.71
RCW, and the business and occupation tax levied pursuant to chapter
82.04 RCW.
(49) "Qualified therapist" means:
(a) A mental health professional as defined by chapter 71.05 RCW;
(b) A mental retardation professional who is a therapist approved
by the department who has had specialized training or one year's
experience in treating or working with the mentally retarded or
developmentally disabled;
(c) A speech pathologist who is eligible for a certificate of
clinical competence in speech pathology or who has the equivalent
education and clinical experience;
(d) A physical therapist as defined by chapter 18.74 RCW;
(e) An occupational therapist who is a graduate of a program in
occupational therapy, or who has the equivalent of such education or
training; and
(f) A respiratory care practitioner certified under chapter 18.89
RCW.
(((46))) (50) "Rate" or "rate allocation" means the medicaid per-patient-day payment amount for medicaid patients calculated in
accordance with the allocation methodology set forth in part E of this
chapter.
(((47))) (51) "Real property," whether leased or owned by the
contractor, means the building, allowable land, land improvements, and
building improvements associated with a nursing facility.
(((48))) (52) "Rebased rate" or "cost-rebased rate" means a
facility-specific component rate assigned to a nursing facility for a
particular rate period established on desk-reviewed, adjusted costs
reported for that facility covering at least six months of a prior
calendar year designated as a year to be used for cost-rebasing payment
rate allocations under the provisions of this chapter.
(((49))) (53) "Records" means those data supporting all financial
statements and cost reports including, but not limited to, all general
and subsidiary ledgers, books of original entry, and transaction
documentation, however such data are maintained.
(((50))) (54) "Related organization" means an entity which is under
common ownership and/or control with, or has control of, or is
controlled by, the contractor.
(a) "Common ownership" exists when an entity is the beneficial
owner of five percent or more ownership interest in the contractor and
any other entity.
(b) "Control" exists where an entity has the power, directly or
indirectly, significantly to influence or direct the actions or
policies of an organization or institution, whether or not it is
legally enforceable and however it is exercisable or exercised.
(((51))) (55) "Related care" means only those services that are
directly related to providing direct care to nursing facility
residents. These services include, but are not limited to, nursing
direction and supervision, medical direction, medical records, pharmacy
services, activities, and social services.
(((52))) (56) "Resident assessment instrument," including federally
approved modifications for use in this state, means a federally
mandated, comprehensive nursing facility resident care planning and
assessment tool, consisting of the minimum data set and resident
assessment protocols.
(((53))) (57) "Resident assessment protocols" means those
components of the resident assessment instrument that use the minimum
data set to trigger or flag a resident's potential problems and risk
areas.
(((54))) (58) "Resource utilization groups" means a case mix
classification system that identifies relative resources needed to care
for an individual nursing facility resident.
(((55))) (59) "Restricted fund" means those funds the principal
and/or income of which is limited by agreement with or direction of the
donor to a specific purpose.
(((56))) (60) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of
social and health services.
(((57))) (61) "Support services" means food, food preparation,
dietary, housekeeping, and laundry services provided to nursing
facility residents.
(((58))) (62) "Therapy care" means those services required by a
nursing facility resident's comprehensive assessment and plan of care,
that are provided by qualified therapists, or support personnel under
their supervision, including related costs as designated by the
department.
(((59))) (63) "Title XIX" or "medicaid" means the 1965 amendments
to the social security act, P.L. 89-07, as amended and the medicaid
program administered by the department.
(((60))) (64) "Total beds" or "total bed capacity" means the total
number of beds certified by the facility's certificate of need. "Total
beds" or "total bed capacity" means occupied beds, beds available for
occupancy, and beds banked under chapter 70.38 RCW.
(65) "Urban county" means a county which is located in a
metropolitan statistical area as determined and defined by the United
States office of management and budget or other appropriate agency or
office of the federal government.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.46.431 and 2004 c 276 s 913 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Effective July 1, 1999, nursing facility medicaid payment rate
allocations shall be facility-specific and shall have seven components:
Direct care, therapy care, support services, operations, property,
financing allowance, and variable return. The department shall
establish and adjust each of these components, as provided in this
section and elsewhere in this chapter, for each medicaid nursing
facility in this state. Effective July 1, 2005, the property component
rate shall be known as the property and tax component.
(2) ((All component rate allocations for essential community
providers as defined in this chapter shall be based upon a minimum
facility occupancy of eighty-five percent of licensed beds, regardless
of how many beds are set up or in use. For all facilities other than
essential community providers, effective July 1, 2001, component rate
allocations in direct care, therapy care, support services, variable
return, operations, property, and financing allowance shall continue to
be based upon a minimum facility occupancy of eighty-five percent of
licensed beds.)) For all facilities, effective July 1, 2005, component
rate allocations in direct care, therapy care, support services, and
operations shall be based upon actual facility occupancy. For all
facilities other than essential community providers, effective July 1,
2002, the component rate allocations in ((operations,)) property((,))
and financing allowance shall be based upon a minimum facility
occupancy of ninety percent of licensed beds, regardless of how many
beds are set up or in use.
(3) Information and data sources used in determining medicaid
payment rate allocations, including formulas, procedures, cost report
periods, resident assessment instrument formats, resident assessment
methodologies, and resident classification and case mix weighting
methodologies, may be substituted or altered from time to time as
determined by the department.
(4)(a) Direct care component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months. Adjusted
cost report data from 1996 will be used for October 1, 1998, through
June 30, 2001, direct care component rate allocations; adjusted cost
report data from 1999 will be used for July 1, 2001, through June 30,
2005, direct care component rate allocations. Effective for the July
1, 2005, rate setting, a direct care component rate allocation shall be
established using adjusted cost report data from 2003 adjusted for
inflation. The 2003 cost report data shall be adjusted to reflect 1999
audited cost report ratios of allowable costs to disallowed costs. If
2003 cost report data is unavailable, actual current audited findings
shall be used.
(b) Direct care component rate allocations based on 1996 cost
report data shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial
appropriations act for facilities whose direct care component rate is
set equal to their adjusted June 30, 1998, rate, as provided in RCW
74.46.506(5)(i).
(c) Direct care component rate allocations based on 1999 cost
report data shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial
appropriations act for facilities whose direct care component rate is
set equal to their adjusted June 30, 1998, rate, as provided in RCW
74.46.506(5)(i).
(d) Direct care component rate allocations based on 2003 cost
report data shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions. The annual inflation factor used to adjust the component
rate shall be based on the Centers for Medicaid and Medicare Services
Total Skilled Nursing Facility Market Basket Index published by Data
Resources, Inc.
(5)(a) Therapy care component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months. Adjusted
cost report data from 1996 will be used for October 1, 1998, through
June 30, 2001, therapy care component rate allocations; adjusted cost
report data from 1999 will be used for July 1, 2001, through June 30,
2005, therapy care component rate allocations. Effective for the July
1, 2005, rate setting, therapy care component rate allocations shall be
established using adjusted cost report data from 2003. The 2003 cost
report data shall be adjusted to reflect 1999 audited cost report
ratios of allowable costs to disallowed costs. If 2003 cost report
data is unavailable, actual current audit findings shall be used.
(b) Therapy care component rate allocations ((shall be adjusted
annually for economic trends and conditions by a factor or factors
defined in the biennial appropriations act)) based on 2003 cost report
data shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and conditions.
The annual inflation factor used to adjust the component rate shall be
based on the Centers for Medicaid and Medicare Services Total Skilled
Nursing Facility Market Basket Index published by Data Resources, Inc.
(6)(a) Support services component rate allocations shall be
established using adjusted cost report data covering at least six
months. Adjusted cost report data from 1996 shall be used for October
1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, support services component rate
allocations; adjusted cost report data from 1999 shall be used for July
1, 2001, through June 30, 2005, support services component rate
allocations. Effective for the July 1, 2005, rate setting, support
services component rate allocations shall be established using adjusted
cost report data from 2003. The 2003 cost report data shall be
adjusted to reflect 1999 audited cost report ratios of allowable costs
to disallowed costs. If 2003 cost report data is unavailable, actual
current audited findings shall be used.
(b) Support services component rate allocations ((shall be adjusted
annually for economic trends and conditions by a factor or factors
defined in the biennial appropriations act)) based on 2003 cost report
data shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and conditions.
The annual inflation factor used to adjust the component rate shall be
based on the Centers for Medicaid and Medicare Services Total Skilled
Nursing Facility Market Basket Index published by Data Resources, Inc.
(7)(a) Operations component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months. Adjusted
cost report data from 1996 shall be used for October 1, 1998, through
June 30, 2001, operations component rate allocations; adjusted cost
report data from 1999 shall be used for July 1, 2001, through June 30,
2005, operations component rate allocations. Effective for the July 1,
2005, rate setting, operations component rate allocations shall be
established using adjusted cost report data from 2003. The 2003 cost
report data shall be adjusted to reflect 1999 audited cost report
ratios of allowable costs to disallowed costs. If 2003 cost report
data is unavailable, actual current audited findings shall be used.
(b) Operations component rate allocations ((shall be adjusted
annually for economic trends and conditions by a factor or factors
defined in the biennial appropriations act)) based on 2003 cost report
data shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and conditions.
The annual inflation factor used to adjust the component rate shall be
based on the Centers for Medicaid and Medicare Services Total Skilled
Nursing Facility Market Basket Index published by Data Resources, Inc.
(8) For July 1, 1998, through September 30, 1998, a facility's
property and return on investment component rates shall be the
facility's June 30, 1998, property and return on investment component
rates, without increase. For October 1, 1998, through June 30, 1999,
a facility's property and return on investment component rates shall be
rebased utilizing 1997 adjusted cost report data covering at least six
months of data.
(9) Total payment rates under the nursing facility medicaid payment
system shall not exceed facility rates charged to the general public
for comparable services.
(10) Medicaid contractors shall pay to all facility staff a minimum
wage of the greater of the state minimum wage or the federal minimum
wage.
(11) The department shall establish in rule procedures, principles,
and conditions for determining component rate allocations for
facilities in circumstances not directly addressed by this chapter,
including but not limited to: The need to prorate inflation for
partial-period cost report data, newly constructed facilities, existing
facilities entering the medicaid program for the first time or after a
period of absence from the program, existing facilities with expanded
new bed capacity, existing medicaid facilities following a change of
ownership of the nursing facility business, facilities banking beds or
converting beds back into service, facilities temporarily reducing the
number of set-up beds during a remodel, facilities having less than six
months of either resident assessment, cost report data, or both, under
the current contractor prior to rate setting, and other circumstances.
(12) The department shall establish in rule procedures, principles,
and conditions, including necessary threshold costs, for adjusting
rates to reflect capital improvements or new requirements imposed by
the department or the federal government. Any such rate adjustments
are subject to the provisions of RCW 74.46.421.
(13) ((Effective July 1, 2001, medicaid rates shall continue to be
revised downward in all components, in accordance with department
rules, for facilities converting banked beds to active service under
chapter 70.38 RCW, by using the facility's increased licensed bed
capacity to recalculate minimum occupancy for rate setting. However,))
For facilities ((other than essential community providers)) which bank
beds under chapter 70.38 RCW, ((after May 25, 2001,)) medicaid rates
shall be revised upward, in accordance with department rules, ((in
direct care, therapy care, support services, and variable return
components only, by using the facility's decreased licensed bed
capacity to recalculate minimum occupancy for rate setting, but no
upward revision shall be made to operations, property, or financing
allowance component rates)) by using the facility's decreased licensed
bed capacity to recalculate occupancy for all rate settings. The
effective date of the recalculated prospective rate for beds banked
from service shall be the first of the month:
(a) In which the beds are banked from service when the beds are
banked on the first of the month;
(b) Following the month in which the banked beds returned to
service when the beds are returned to service after the first of the
month.
(14) In order to allow a facility the opportunity to fill beds,
facilities converting banked beds to active service under chapter 70.38
RCW, the increased licensed bed capacity shall not be used to
recalculate occupancy for six months or until the next annual scheduled
July 1 rate setting, whichever is longer. After the department
recalculates the contractor's prospective medicaid component rate
allocations using the increased number of licensed beds, the department
shall use the increased number of licensed beds in all subsequent rate
settings, until under this chapter the number of licensed beds changes.
(((14))) (15) Facilities obtaining a certificate of need or a
certificate of need exemption under chapter 70.38 RCW after June 30,
2001, must have a certificate of capital authorization in order for (a)
the depreciation resulting from the capitalized addition to be included
in calculation of the facility's property and tax component rate
allocation; and (b) the net invested funds associated with the
capitalized addition to be included in calculation of the facility's
financing allowance rate allocation.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.46.435 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 7 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Effective July 1, 2001, the property component rate allocation
for each facility shall be determined by dividing the sum of the
reported allowable prior period actual depreciation, subject to RCW
74.46.310 through 74.46.380, adjusted for any capitalized additions or
replacements approved by the department, and the retained savings from
such cost center, by the greater of a facility's total resident days
for the facility in the prior period or resident days as calculated on
eighty-five percent facility occupancy. Effective July 1, 2002, the
property component rate allocation for all facilities, except essential
community providers, shall be set by using the greater of a facility's
total resident days from the most recent cost report period or resident
days calculated at ninety percent facility occupancy. If a capitalized
addition or retirement of an asset will result in a different licensed
bed capacity during the ensuing period, the prior period total resident
days used in computing the property component rate shall be adjusted to
anticipated resident day level.
(2) Effective for the July 1, 2005, rate setting the property and
tax component rate allocation for all facilities shall be set by using
a facility's total resident days from the most recent cost report
period. If a capitalized addition or retirement of an asset will
result in a different licensed bed capacity during the ensuing period,
the prior period total resident days used in computing the property
component rate shall be adjusted to anticipated resident day level.
(3) A nursing facility's property component rate allocation shall
be rebased annually, effective July 1st, in accordance with this
section and this chapter. Effective July 1, 2005, the property
component rate shall be termed the property and tax component rate.
(((3))) (4) When a certificate of need for a new facility is
requested, the department, in reaching its decision, shall take into
consideration per-bed land and building construction costs for the
facility which shall not exceed a maximum to be established by the
secretary.
(((4) Effective July 1, 2001, for the purpose of calculating a
nursing facility's property component rate,)) (5) If a contractor ((has
elected to bank licensed beds prior to April 1, 2001, or)) elects to
convert banked beds to active service at any time, under chapter 70.38
RCW, the department shall use the facility's new licensed bed capacity
to recalculate minimum occupancy for rate setting and revise the
property component rate((, as needed, effective as of the date the beds
are banked or converted to active service. However, in no case shall
the department use less than eighty-five percent occupancy of the
facility's licensed bed capacity after banking or conversion.
Effective July 1, 2002, in no case, other than essential community
providers, shall the department use less than ninety percent occupancy
of the facility's licensed bed capacity after conversion)) as defined
in RCW 74.46.431(14).
(((5))) (6) The property and tax component rate allocations
calculated in accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the
extent necessary to comply with RCW 74.46.421.
(7) Beginning July 1, 2005, and effective every year thereafter,
the department shall grant a property and business tax add-on rate to
the property and tax component rate. The property and business tax
add-on rate shall be revised annually.
(a) The property and business tax add-on rate shall be determined
by dividing the sum of property taxes, business taxes, and other
provider fees of the reported period by a facility's total resident
days for the facility in the prior period. Minimum occupancy levels
shall not be used in calculating the property and business tax add-on
rate.
(b) The property and business tax add-on rate shall be added to the
per-resident day payment rate for the property and tax component rate.

Sec. 5 RCW 74.46.437 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 8 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 1999, the department shall establish for each
medicaid nursing facility a financing allowance component rate
allocation. The financing allowance component rate shall be rebased
annually, effective July 1st, in accordance with the provisions of this
section and this chapter.
(2) Effective July 1, 2001, the financing allowance shall be
determined by multiplying the net invested funds of each facility by
.10, and dividing by the greater of a nursing facility's total resident
days from the most recent cost report period or resident days
calculated on eighty-five percent facility occupancy. Effective July
1, 2002, the financing allowance component rate allocation for all
facilities, other than essential community providers, shall be set by
using the greater of a facility's total resident days from the most
recent cost report period or resident days calculated at ninety percent
facility occupancy. However, assets acquired on or after May 17, 1999,
shall be grouped in a separate financing allowance calculation that
shall be multiplied by .085. The financing allowance factor of .085
shall not be applied to the net invested funds pertaining to new
construction or major renovations receiving certificate of need
approval or an exemption from certificate of need requirements under
chapter 70.38 RCW, or to working drawings that have been submitted to
the department of health for construction review approval, prior to May
17, 1999. If a capitalized addition, renovation, replacement, or
retirement of an asset will result in a different licensed bed capacity
during the ensuing period, the prior period total resident days used in
computing the financing allowance shall be adjusted to the greater of
the anticipated resident day level or eighty-five percent of the new
licensed bed capacity. Effective July 1, 2002, for all facilities,
other than essential community providers, the total resident days used
to compute the financing allowance after a capitalized addition,
renovation, replacement, or retirement of an asset shall be set by
using the greater of a facility's total resident days from the most
recent cost report period or resident days calculated at ninety percent
facility occupancy.
(3) In computing the portion of net invested funds representing the
net book value of tangible fixed assets, the same assets, depreciation
bases, lives, and methods referred to in RCW 74.46.330, 74.46.350,
74.46.360, 74.46.370, and 74.46.380, including owned and leased assets,
shall be utilized, except that the capitalized cost of land upon which
the facility is located and such other contiguous land which is
reasonable and necessary for use in the regular course of providing
resident care shall also be included. Subject to provisions and
limitations contained in this chapter, for land purchased by owners or
lessors before July 18, 1984, capitalized cost of land shall be the
buyer's capitalized cost. For all partial or whole rate periods after
July 17, 1984, if the land is purchased after July 17, 1984,
capitalized cost shall be that of the owner of record on July 17, 1984,
or buyer's capitalized cost, whichever is lower. In the case of leased
facilities where the net invested funds are unknown or the contractor
is unable to provide necessary information to determine net invested
funds, the secretary shall have the authority to determine an amount
for net invested funds based on an appraisal conducted according to RCW
74.46.360(1).
(4) ((Effective July 1, 2001, for the purpose of calculating a
nursing facility's financing allowance component rate,)) If a
contractor ((has elected to bank licensed beds prior to May 25, 2001,
or)) elects to convert banked beds to active service at any time, under
chapter 70.38 RCW, the department shall use the facility's new licensed
bed capacity to recalculate minimum occupancy for rate setting and
revise the financing allowance component rate((, as needed, effective
as of the date the beds are banked or converted to active service.
However, in no case shall the department use less than eighty-five
percent occupancy of the facility's licensed bed capacity after banking
or conversion. Effective July 1, 2002, in no case, other than for
essential community providers, shall the department use less than
ninety percent occupancy of the facility's licensed bed capacity after
conversion)) as defined in RCW 74.46.431(14). If a contractor has
elected to bank licensed beds, the department shall use the facility's
new licensed bed capacity to recalculate minimum occupancy for rate
setting and revise the financing allowance component rate effective as
of the date the beds are banked. When beds are banked, the revised
prospective medicaid payment rate will be effective the first of the
month:
(a) In which the beds are banked when the beds are banked on the
first of the month; or
(b) Following the month in which beds are banked when the beds are
banked after the first of the month.
(5) The financing allowance rate allocation calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

Sec. 6 RCW 74.46.445 and 1999 c 353 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
If a contractor experiences an increase in state or county property
taxes as a result of new building construction, replacement building
construction, or substantial building additions ((that require the
acquisition of land)), then the department shall adjust the
contractor's prospective rates to cover the medicaid share of the tax
increase. The rate adjustments shall only apply to construction and
additions completed on or after July 1, 1997. The rate adjustments
authorized by this section are effective on the first day after July 1,
1999, on which the increased tax payment is due. Rate adjustments made
under this section are subject to all applicable cost limitations
contained in this chapter.

Sec. 7 RCW 74.46.506 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 10 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The direct care component rate allocation corresponds to the
provision of nursing care for one resident of a nursing facility for
one day, including direct care supplies. Therapy services and
supplies, which correspond to the therapy care component rate, shall be
excluded. The direct care component rate includes elements of case mix
determined consistent with the principles of this section and other
applicable provisions of this chapter.
(2) Beginning October 1, 1998, the department shall determine and
update quarterly for each nursing facility serving medicaid residents
a facility-specific per-resident day direct care component rate
allocation, to be effective on the first day of each calendar quarter.
In determining direct care component rates the department shall
utilize, as specified in this section, minimum data set resident
assessment data for each resident of the facility, as transmitted to,
and if necessary corrected by, the department in the resident
assessment instrument format approved by federal authorities for use in
this state.
(3) The department may question the accuracy of assessment data for
any resident and utilize corrected or substitute information, however
derived, in determining direct care component rates. The department is
authorized to impose civil fines and to take adverse rate actions
against a contractor, as specified by the department in rule, in order
to obtain compliance with resident assessment and data transmission
requirements and to ensure accuracy.
(4) Cost report data used in setting direct care component rate
allocations shall be 1996 ((and)), 1999, and 2003, for rate periods as
specified in RCW 74.46.431(4)(a).
(5) Beginning October 1, 1998, and annually thereafter beginning
July 1, 2005, the department shall rebase each nursing facility's
direct care component rate allocation as described in RCW 74.46.431,
adjust its direct care component rate allocation for economic trends
and conditions as described in RCW 74.46.431, and update its medicaid
average case mix index, consistent with the following:
(a) Reduce total direct care costs reported by each nursing
facility for the applicable cost report period specified in RCW
74.46.431(4)(a) to reflect any department adjustments, and to eliminate
reported resident therapy costs and adjustments, in order to derive the
facility's total allowable direct care cost;
(b) Divide each facility's total allowable direct care cost by its
adjusted resident days for the same report period((, increased if
necessary to a minimum occupancy of eighty-five percent; that is, the
greater of actual or imputed occupancy at eighty-five percent of
licensed beds,)) to derive the facility's allowable direct care cost
per resident day;
(c) Adjust the facility's per resident day direct care cost by the
applicable factor specified in RCW 74.46.431(4) (b) ((and)), (c), or
(d) to derive its adjusted allowable direct care cost per resident day;
(d) Divide each facility's adjusted allowable direct care cost per
resident day by the facility average case mix index for the applicable
quarters specified by RCW 74.46.501(7)(b) to derive the facility's
allowable direct care cost per case mix unit;
(e) Effective for July 1, 2001, rate setting, divide nursing
facilities into at least two and, if applicable, three peer groups:
Those located in nonurban counties; those located in high labor-cost
counties, if any; and those located in other urban counties;
(f) Array separately the allowable direct care cost per case mix
unit for all facilities in nonurban counties; for all facilities in
high labor-cost counties, if applicable; and for all facilities in
other urban counties, and determine the median allowable direct care
cost per case mix unit for each peer group;
(g) ((Except as provided in (i) of this subsection, from October 1,
1998, through June 30, 2000, determine each facility's quarterly direct
care component rate as follows:
(i) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is less
than eighty-five percent of the facility's peer group median
established under (f) of this subsection shall be assigned a cost per
case mix unit equal to eighty-five percent of the facility's peer group
median, and shall have a direct care component rate allocation equal to
the facility's assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by that
facility's medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter
specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);
(ii) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is greater
than one hundred fifteen percent of the peer group median established
under (f) of this subsection shall be assigned a cost per case mix unit
equal to one hundred fifteen percent of the peer group median, and
shall have a direct care component rate allocation equal to the
facility's assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by that
facility's medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter
specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);
(iii) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is
between eighty-five and one hundred fifteen percent of the peer group
median established under (f) of this subsection shall have a direct
care component rate allocation equal to the facility's allowable cost
per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid average case
mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);
(h) Except as provided in (i) of this subsection,)) From July 1,
2000, forward, and for all future rate setting, determine each
facility's quarterly direct care component rate as follows:
(i) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is less
than ninety percent of the facility's peer group median established
under (f) of this subsection shall be assigned a cost per case mix unit
equal to ninety percent of the facility's peer group median, and shall
have a direct care component rate allocation equal to the facility's
assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid
average case mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW
74.46.501(7)(c);
(ii) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is greater
than one hundred ten percent of the peer group median established under
(f) of this subsection shall be assigned a cost per case mix unit equal
to one hundred ten percent of the peer group median, and shall have a
direct care component rate allocation equal to the facility's assigned
cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid average
case mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW
74.46.501(7)(c);
(iii) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is
between ninety and one hundred ten percent of the peer group median
established under (f) of this subsection shall have a direct care
component rate allocation equal to the facility's allowable cost per
case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid average case mix
index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);
(((i)(i) Between October 1, 1998, and June 30, 2000, the department
shall compare each facility's direct care component rate allocation
calculated under (g) of this subsection with the facility's nursing
services component rate in effect on September 30, 1998, less therapy
costs, plus any exceptional care offsets as reported on the cost
report, adjusted for economic trends and conditions as provided in RCW
74.46.431. A facility shall receive the higher of the two rates.
(ii) Between July 1, 2000, and June 30, 2002, the department shall
compare each facility's direct care component rate allocation
calculated under (h) of this subsection with the facility's direct care
component rate in effect on June 30, 2000. A facility shall receive
the higher of the two rates. Between July 1, 2001, and June 30, 2002,
if during any quarter a facility whose rate paid under (h) of this
subsection is greater than either the direct care rate in effect on
June 30, 2000, or than that facility's allowable direct care cost per
case mix unit calculated in (d) of this subsection multiplied by that
facility's medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter
specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c), the facility shall be paid in that
and each subsequent quarter pursuant to (h) of this subsection and
shall not be entitled to the greater of the two rates.
(iii) Effective July 1, 2002, all direct care component rate
allocations shall be as determined under (h) of this subsection.))
(6) The direct care component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.
(7) Payments resulting from increases in direct care component
rates, granted under authority of RCW 74.46.508(1) for a facility's
exceptional care residents, shall be offset against the facility's
examined, allowable direct care costs, for each report year or partial
period such increases are paid. Such reductions in allowable direct
care costs shall be for rate setting, settlement, and other purposes
deemed appropriate by the department.
(8) Beginning July 1, 2005, and effective every year thereafter,
the department shall include liability and casualty insurance costs in
the direct care component rate. "Insurance costs" shall include the
costs of maintaining insurance coverage and/or membership in insurance
risk pools, or purchasing equity shares in risk retention groups.
(9) Effective July 1, 2005, and effective every year thereafter,
the department shall grant an insurance add-on rate to the direct care
component rate. To determine the insurance add-on rate to the direct
care component, the department shall:
(a) Divide each facility's total allowable insurance cost for the
preceding calendar year by its total adjusted resident days for the
most recent report period to derive the facility's allowable insurance
cost per-resident day;
(b) Array facilities' adjusted insurance cost per adjusted resident
day for each facility and determine the median allowable insurance cost
per-resident day; and
(c) Set each facility's insurance add-on rate at the lesser of:
(i) The facility's per-resident day adjusted insurance cost from
the applicable cost report period; or
(ii) One hundred ten percent of the median established under (b) of
this subsection.
(10) The computed insurance add-on rate shall be added to the per-resident day payment rate for the direct care component rate.

Sec. 8 RCW 74.46.511 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 11 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The therapy care component rate allocation corresponds to the
provision of medicaid one-on-one therapy provided by a qualified
therapist as defined in this chapter, including therapy supplies and
therapy consultation, for one day for one medicaid resident of a
nursing facility. The therapy care component rate allocation for
October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, shall be based on adjusted
therapy costs and days from calendar year 1996. The therapy component
rate allocation for July 1, 2001, through June 30, 2004, shall be based
on adjusted therapy costs and days from calendar year 1999. The
therapy component rate allocation for July 1, 2005, shall be based on
adjusted therapy costs and days from calendar year 2003. The therapy
care component rate shall be adjusted for economic trends and
conditions as specified in RCW 74.46.431(5)(b), and shall be determined
in accordance with this section.
(2) In rebasing, as provided in RCW 74.46.431(5)(a), the department
shall take from the cost reports of facilities the following reported
information:
(a) Direct one-on-one therapy charges for all residents by payer
including charges for supplies;
(b) The total units or modules of therapy care for all residents by
type of therapy provided, for example, speech or physical. A unit or
module of therapy care is considered to be fifteen minutes of one-on-one therapy provided by a qualified therapist or support personnel; and
(c) Therapy consulting expenses for all residents.
(3) The department shall determine for all residents the total cost
per unit of therapy for each type of therapy by dividing the total
adjusted one-on-one therapy expense for each type by the total units
provided for that therapy type.
(4) The department shall divide medicaid nursing facilities in this
state into two peer groups:
(a) Those facilities located within urban counties; and
(b) Those located within nonurban counties.
The department shall array the facilities in each peer group from
highest to lowest based on their total cost per unit of therapy for
each therapy type. The department shall determine the median total
cost per unit of therapy for each therapy type and add ten percent of
median total cost per unit of therapy. The cost per unit of therapy
for each therapy type at a nursing facility shall be the lesser of its
cost per unit of therapy for each therapy type or the median total cost
per unit plus ten percent for each therapy type for its peer group.
(5) The department shall calculate each nursing facility's therapy
care component rate allocation as follows:
(a) To determine the allowable total therapy cost for each therapy
type, the allowable cost per unit of therapy for each type of therapy
shall be multiplied by the total therapy units for each type of
therapy;
(b) The medicaid allowable one-on-one therapy expense shall be
calculated taking the allowable total therapy cost for each therapy
type times the medicaid percent of total therapy charges for each
therapy type;
(c) The medicaid allowable one-on-one therapy expense for each
therapy type shall be divided by total adjusted medicaid days to arrive
at the medicaid one-on-one therapy cost per patient day for each
therapy type;
(d) The medicaid one-on-one therapy cost per patient day for each
therapy type shall be multiplied by total adjusted patient days for all
residents to calculate the total allowable one-on-one therapy expense.
The lesser of the total allowable therapy consultant expense for the
therapy type or a reasonable percentage of allowable therapy consultant
expense for each therapy type, as established in rule by the
department, shall be added to the total allowable one-on-one therapy
expense to determine the allowable therapy cost for each therapy type;
(e) The allowable therapy cost for each therapy type shall be added
together, the sum of which shall be the total allowable therapy expense
for the nursing facility;
(f) The total allowable therapy expense will be divided by the
((greater of)) adjusted total patient days from the cost report on
which the therapy expenses were reported((, or patient days at eighty-
five percent occupancy of licensed beds)). The outcome shall be the
nursing facility's therapy care component rate allocation.
(6) The therapy care component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.
(7) The therapy care component rate shall be suspended for medicaid
residents in qualified nursing facilities designated by the department
who are receiving therapy paid by the department outside the facility
daily rate under RCW 74.46.508(2).

Sec. 9 RCW 74.46.521 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 13 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The operations component rate allocation corresponds to the
general operation of a nursing facility for one resident for one day,
including but not limited to management, administration, utilities,
office supplies, accounting and bookkeeping, minor building
maintenance, minor equipment repairs and replacements, and other
supplies and services, exclusive of direct care, therapy care, support
services, property, financing allowance, and variable return.
(2) Beginning October 1, 1998, and annually thereafter, the
department shall determine each medicaid nursing facility's operations
component rate allocation using cost report data specified by RCW
74.46.431(7)(a). ((Effective July 1, 2002, operations component rates
for all facilities except essential community providers shall be based
upon a minimum occupancy of ninety percent of licensed beds, and no
operations component rate shall be revised in response to beds banked
on or after May 25, 2001, under chapter 70.38 RCW.))
(3) To determine each facility's operations component rate the
department shall:
(a) Array facilities' adjusted general operations costs per
adjusted resident day for each facility from facilities' cost reports
from the applicable report year, for facilities located within urban
counties and for those located within nonurban counties and determine
the median adjusted cost for each peer group;
(b) Set each facility's operations component rate at the ((lower))
higher of:
(i) The facility's per resident day adjusted operations costs from
the applicable cost report period adjusted if necessary to a minimum
occupancy of eighty-five percent of licensed beds before July 1, 2002,
and ninety percent effective July 1, 2002; or
(ii) The adjusted median per resident day general operations cost
for that facility's peer group, urban counties or nonurban counties
plus ten percent; and
(c) Adjust each facility's operations component rate for economic
trends and conditions as provided in RCW 74.46.431(7)(b).
(4) The operations component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---