BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that aquatic invasive
species and freshwater aquatic algae are causing economic,
environmental, and public health problems that affect the citizens and
aquatic resources of our state. Many highly destructive species, such
as the zebra mussel, are currently not found in Washington's waters and
efforts should be made to prevent the introduction or spread of these
aquatic invasive species into our state waters. Preventing new
introductions is significantly less expensive and causes far less
ecological damage than trying to control new infestations.
The legislature also finds that freshwater algae, particularly
blue-green algae, are also seriously degrading the water quality and
recreational value of a number of our lakes. Blue-green algae can
produce toxins that inhibit recreational uses and pose a threat to
humans and pets.
It is therefore the intent of the legislature to clarify the roles
of the different state agencies involved in these issues in order to
address the threat of aquatic invasive species and the problem caused
by aquatic freshwater algae, and to provide a dedicated fund source to
prevent and control further impacts.

Sec. 2 RCW 88.02.050 and 2002 c 286 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Application for a vessel registration shall be made to the
department or its authorized agent in the manner and upon forms
prescribed by the department. The application shall state the name and
address of each owner of the vessel and such other information as may
be required by the department, shall be signed by at least one owner,
and shall be accompanied by a vessel registration fee of ten dollars
and fifty cents per year and the excise tax imposed under chapter 82.49
RCW. ((In addition, two))
(2) Five additional dollars must be collected annually from every
vessel registration application. These moneys must be distributed in
the following manner:
(a) Two dollars must be deposited into the derelict vessel removal
account established in RCW 79.100.100. If the department of natural
resources indicates that the balance of the derelict vessel removal
account reaches one million dollars as of March 1st of any year, the
collection of the two-dollar fee must be suspended for the following
fiscal year.
(b) One dollar and fifty cents must be deposited in the aquatic
invasive species prevention account created in section 3 of this act.
(c) One dollar must be deposited into the freshwater aquatic algae
control account created in section 4 of this act.
(d) Fifty cents must be deposited into the aquatic invasive species
enforcement account created in section 5 of this act.
(3) Any fees required for licensing agents under RCW 46.01.140
shall be in addition to the ten dollar and fifty cent annual
registration fee and the ((two-dollar derelict vessel)) five-dollar fee
created in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) Upon receipt of the application and the registration fee, the
department shall assign a registration number and issue a decal for
each vessel. The registration number and decal shall be issued and
affixed to the vessel in a manner prescribed by the department
consistent with the standard numbering system for vessels set forth in
volume 33, part 174, of the code of federal regulations. A valid decal
affixed as prescribed shall indicate compliance with the annual
registration requirements of this chapter.
(5) The vessel registrations and decals are valid for a period of
one year, except that the director of licensing may extend or diminish
vessel registration periods, and the decals therefor, for the purpose
of staggered renewal periods. For registration periods of more or less
than one year, the department may collect prorated annual registration
fees and excise taxes based upon the number of months in the
registration period. Vessel registrations are renewable every year in
a manner prescribed by the department upon payment of the vessel
registration fee, excise tax, and the derelict vessel fee. Upon
renewing a vessel registration, the department shall issue a new decal
to be affixed as prescribed by the department.
(6) When the department issues either a notice to renew a vessel
registration or a decal for a new or renewed vessel registration, it
shall also provide information on the location of marine oil recycling
tanks and sewage holding tank pumping stations. This information will
be provided to the department by the state parks and recreation
commission in a form ready for distribution. The form will be
developed and prepared by the state parks and recreation commission
with the cooperation of the department of ecology. The department, the
state parks and recreation commission, and the department of ecology
shall enter into a memorandum of agreement to implement this process.
(7) A person acquiring a vessel from a dealer or a vessel already
validly registered under this chapter shall, within fifteen days of the
acquisition or purchase of the vessel, apply to the department or its
authorized agent for transfer of the vessel registration, and the
application shall be accompanied by a transfer fee of one dollar.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The aquatic invasive species prevention account is created in
the state treasury. Moneys directed to the account from RCW 88.02.050
must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may
only be used as provided in this section. Moneys in the account may be
spent only after appropriation.
(2) Funds in the aquatic invasive species prevention account may be
appropriated to the department to develop an aquatic invasive species
prevention program for recreational watercraft. Funds must be expended
as follows:
(a) To inspect watercraft, watercraft trailers, and outboard motors
at selected boat launching sites;
(b) To educate general law enforcement officers on how to enforce
state laws relating to preventing the spread of aquatic invasive
species;
(c) To evaluate and survey the risk posed by marine recreational
watercraft in spreading aquatic invasive species into Washington state
waters;
(d) To evaluate the risk posed by float planes in spreading aquatic
invasive species into Washington state waters; and
(e) To implement an aquatic invasive species early detection and
rapid response plan.
(3) The department shall provide training to Washington state
patrol employees working at port of entry weigh stations on how to
inspect recreational watercraft for the presence of zebra mussels and
other aquatic invasive species. The department shall also
cooperatively work with the Washington state patrol to set up random
check stations to inspect watercraft at areas of high boating activity.
(4) The department shall submit a biennial report to the
appropriate legislative committees describing the actions taken to
implement this section along with suggestions on how to better fulfill
the intent of this act. The first report is due December 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.21A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The freshwater aquatic algae control account is created in the
state treasury. Moneys directed to the account from RCW 88.02.050 must
be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may only be
used as provided in this section. Moneys in the account may be spent
only after appropriation.
(2) Funds in the freshwater aquatic algae control account may be
appropriated to the department to develop a freshwater aquatic algae
control program. Funds must be expended as follows:
(a) As grants to cities, counties, tribes, special purpose
districts, and state agencies to manage excessive freshwater algae,
with priority for the treatment of lakes in which harmful algal blooms
have occurred within the past three years; and
(b) To provide technical assistance to applicants and the public
about aquatic algae control.
(3) The department shall submit a biennial report to the
appropriate legislative committees describing the actions taken to
implement this section along with suggestions on how to better fulfill
the intent of this act. The first report is due December 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The aquatic invasive species enforcement account is created in
the state treasury. Moneys directed to the account from RCW 88.02.050
must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may
only be used as provided in this section. Moneys in the account may be
spent only after appropriation.
(2) Funds in the aquatic invasive species enforcement account may
be appropriated to the Washington state patrol to develop an aquatic
invasive species enforcement program for recreational watercraft.
Funds must be expended as follows:
(a) To inspect recreational watercraft that are required to stop at
port of entry weigh stations managed by the Washington state patrol.
The watercraft must be inspected for the presence of zebra mussels and
other aquatic invasive species; and
(b) To establish random check stations, in conjunction with the
department of fish and wildlife, to inspect watercraft in areas of high
boating activity.
(3) The Washington state patrol shall submit a biennial report to
the appropriate legislative committees describing the actions taken to
implement this section along with suggestions on how to better fulfill
the intent of this act. The first report is due December 1, 2007.

--- END ---