BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) It is the intent of this act to reduce
the quantity of mercury released into the environment by:
(a) Removing mercury switches from end-of-life vehicles in the
state of Washington; and
(b) Creating a collection and recovery program for mercury switches
that have been removed from end-of-life vehicles in the state of
Washington.
(2) A memorandum of understanding, dated January 10, 2006, and
entered into jointly by the department of ecology, automotive recyclers
of Washington, and the end-of-life vehicle solutions corporation,
established a mercury switch assembly collection system. To the
maximum extent possible and in keeping with the requirements of this
chapter, elements of that memorandum of understanding must be utilized.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.95M.010 and 2003 c 260 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Automotive mercury switch" includes a convenience switch, such
as a switch for a trunk or hood light, and a mercury switch in antilock
brake systems.
(2) "Capture rate" means the quantity of mercury removed,
collected, or recovered, stated as a percentage of the total mercury
available from end-of-life vehicles, computed annually.
(3) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(((3))) (4) "Director" means the director of the department of
ecology.
(((4))) (5) "End-of-life vehicle" means any motor vehicle that is
sold, given, or otherwise conveyed to a motor vehicle recycler or scrap
recycling facility.
(6) "Health care facility" includes a hospital, nursing home,
extended care facility, long-term care facility, clinical or medical
laboratory, state or private health or mental institution, clinic,
physician's office, or health maintenance organization.
(((5))) (7) "Manufacturer" includes any person, firm, association,
partnership, corporation, governmental entity, organization, or joint
venture that:
(a) Produces a mercury-added product, other than a motor vehicle,
or an importer or domestic distributor of a mercury-added product
produced in a foreign country, other than a motor vehicle. In the case
of a multicomponent product containing mercury other than a motor
vehicle, the manufacturer is the last manufacturer to produce or
assemble the product. If the multicomponent product or mercury-added
product is produced in a foreign country, the manufacturer is the first
importer or domestic distributor;
(b) Is the last person in the production or assembly process of a
new motor vehicle that utilizes mercury switches, or in the case of an
imported vehicle, the importer or domestic distributor of the motor
vehicle.
(((6))) (8) "Mercury-added button-cell battery" means a button-cell
battery to which the manufacturer intentionally introduces mercury for
the operation of the battery.
(((7))) (9) "Mercury-added novelty" means a mercury-added product
intended mainly for personal or household enjoyment or adornment.
Mercury-added novelties include, but are not limited to, items intended
for use as practical jokes, figurines, adornments, toys, games, cards,
ornaments, yard statues and figures, candles, jewelry, holiday
decorations, items of apparel, and other similar products. Mercury-added novelty does not include games, toys, or products that require a
button-cell or lithium battery, liquid crystal display screens, or a
lamp that contains mercury.
(((8))) (10) "Mercury-added product" means a product, commodity, or
chemical, or a product with a component that contains mercury or a
mercury compound intentionally added to the product, commodity, or
chemical in order to provide a specific characteristic, appearance, or
quality, or to perform a specific function, or for any other reason.
Mercury-added products include, but are not limited to, mercury
thermometers, mercury thermostats, and mercury switches in motor
vehicles.
(((9))) (11) "Mercury antilock braking system sensor" means the
mercury-containing switch installed in a vehicle's antilock braking
system.
(12) "Mercury light switch assembly" means a convenience light
switch assembly that contains a mercury switch. A mercury light switch
assembly may include the housing, the mercury switch, a socket for a
light bulb, and other attached components such as wires and a mounting
bracket.
(13) "Mercury manometer" means a mercury-added product that is used
for measuring blood pressure.
(((10))) (14) "Mercury switch" means a mercury-containing capsule,
commonly known as a "bullet," that is part of a motor vehicle mercury
light switch assembly or part of an antilock braking system assembly.
(15) "Mercury thermometer" means a mercury-added product that is
used for measuring temperature.
(((11))) (16) "Motor vehicle" includes any passenger automobile,
van, or truck with a gross weight rating of less than twelve thousand
pounds.
(17) "Motor vehicle recycler" means any person or entity required
to be licensed under chapter 46.80 RCW and is engaged in the business
of acquiring or dismantling, or both acquiring and dismantling, motor
vehicles for the primary purpose of resale of their parts or materials.
(18) "Person" means any individual, corporation, company, firm,
partnership, association, trust, joint stock company or trust, venture,
or municipal, state, or federal government or agency, or any other
legal entity, however organized.
(19) "Retailer" means a retailer of a mercury-added product.
(20) "Scrap recycling facility" means a fixed location, where
machinery and equipment are utilized for processing and manufacturing
scrap metal into prepared grades and whose principal product is scrap
iron, scrap steel, or nonferrous metallic scrap for sale for remelting
purposes.
(21) "Vehicle crusher" means any person who engages in the business
of operating a fixed or transportable car crusher.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Manufacturers shall individually, or as part
of a group, develop a system to facilitate and fund the removal,
collection, and disposal or recycling of mercury switches before
end-of-life vehicles are crushed or shredded, as required by this
chapter.
(1)(a) The removal, collection, and disposal system must include,
at a minimum, the following elements:
(i) An education program to inform vehicle recyclers, scrap
recycling facilities, vehicle crushers, and other stakeholders about
the purposes of the program to facilitate their participation;
(ii) Information providing guidance as to which vehicles may
contain mercury switch assemblies, where they are located, and
recommended procedures for removing the mercury switch assemblies;
(iii) A goal of achieving an overall capture rate of at least
ninety percent of mercury light switch assemblies, consistent with the
principle that they must be removed unless they are not reasonably
accessible due to significant damage to the section of the vehicle
where the mercury light switch assemblies are located;
(iv) Performance measures will be used and reported by the
manufacturer or group of manufacturers to demonstrate that the system
is meeting the capture rate and other measures of program
effectiveness. The performance measures must include, but are not
limited to: The number of mercury light switch assemblies collected
from end-of-life vehicles and the number of vehicles processed for
recycling; the amount of mercury collected; the number of vehicles
containing mercury light switch assemblies; and identification of
barriers to implementation of the program, and steps to be taken to
address those barriers;
(v) A process to ensure that, upon request, the motor vehicle
recycler or scrap recycling facility provide documentation to the
department to show that the mercury light switch assemblies have been
removed. This process must ensure that the information is treated as
confidential business information, and will be released publicly only
in the aggregate;
(vi) A marking system to indicate the presence or absence of
mercury light switch assemblies in vehicles to be processed for
shredding or crushing;
(vii) Training of employees on how to identify vehicles containing
mercury light switch assemblies and how to remove, handle, and store
them, on the human health risks associated with mercury, and on spill
response;
(viii) A plan to collect and transport mercury light switch
assemblies and other mercury switches to disposal or recycling
facilities.
(b) Manufacturers shall, to the extent practicable, utilize the
existing end-of-life vehicle recycling infrastructure in order to
ensure that mercury light switch assemblies are removed and collected
in a safe and consistent manner and elements of the memorandum of
understanding must be utilized to the extent possible.
(c) Each manufacturer or any entity carrying out the
responsibilities for a group of manufacturers under this act shall
provide proof to the department that it is maintaining a minimum of
twenty-four million dollars of pollution liability insurance coverage
for the collection, transportation, recycling, or disposal of the
mercury from the mercury switches.
(2) The total cost for the removal, collection, and disposal or
recycling of mercury switches or mercury light switch assemblies must
be borne by the manufacturers who installed them in their vehicles.
Costs include, but are not limited to the following:
(a) A minimum of three dollars for each mercury switch, mercury
light switch assembly, or mercury antilock braking system sensor
assembly removed by and collected from a vehicle recycling facility
pursuant to this section as partial compensation for the labor and
other costs incurred by a vehicle recycler;
(b) A minimum of three dollars for each mercury switch, mercury
light switch assembly, or mercury antilock braking system sensor
assembly removed by and collected from a scrap recycling facility
pursuant to this section as partial compensation for the labor and
other costs incurred by a scrap recycler;
(c) One dollar for each mercury switch, mercury light switch
assembly, or mercury antilock braking system sensor assembly removed by
and collected from a vehicle recycler or scrap recycler pursuant to
this section as partial compensation to the department for costs
incurred in administering and enforcing provisions of this chapter;
(d) Training as described in subsection (1)(a)(vii) of this
section;
(e) Collection containers for mercury switches, mercury switch
assemblies, and mercury antilock braking system sensors to be
collected;
(f) Costs for the collection and transportation system to allow for
the periodic collection and replacement of filled containers;
(g) Engagement of a qualified hazardous waste management contractor
to carry out storage, recycling, or disposal of the mercury;
(h) An outreach program to encourage participation that includes,
but is not limited to, direct mailings, workshops, and site visits;
(i) Maintenance of all appropriate systems and procedures to
protect the environment from mercury contamination from mercury
switches removed and collected under this act;
(j) Any additional costs for documentation required of motor
vehicle recyclers, vehicle crushers, and scrap recycling facilities.
(3) Nothing in this section restricts the ability of a
manufacturer, importer, or domestic distributor from transporting
products through the state, or from storing products that contain
mercury switches in the state for later distribution outside the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Every reasonable effort must be made by
vehicle manufacturers to facilitate the removal of mercury light switch
assemblies from vehicles before they are crushed or shredded.
(2) It is unlawful to shred or crush vehicles that have not had
mercury light switch assemblies removed, except when the part is not
reasonably accessible due to significant damage to the section of the
vehicle where the mercury light switch assembly is located. To comply
with this section, vehicle crushers or shredders may rely on, as
reasonable evidence of removal, representations of certifications from
motor vehicle recyclers that mercury light switch assemblies have been
removed. Crushed vehicle hulks imported from out-of-state may be
shredded provided that the scrap recycling facilities have, to the best
of their abilities, ensured that their out-of-state suppliers have
removed mercury light switch assemblies.
(3) It is unlawful for any person to represent that mercury light
switch assemblies have been removed from a vehicle or vehicle hulk
being sold, given, or otherwise conveyed for recycling if the mercury
light switch assemblies have not been removed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Every manufacturer of motor vehicles
sold in this state shall, individually or as part of a group, submit a
plan to the department, within ninety days of the effective date of
this section, describing a program that meets the requirements
established in this act.
(2) The director shall approve or disapprove the entire plan.
(a) If the entire plan is approved, the manufacturers shall
implement the plan on July 1, 2006.
(b) If the entire plan is disapproved, the director shall inform
the manufacturers as to the reasons for the disapproval. The
manufacturers have ninety days to submit a new plan.
(c) The manufacturers are considered in violation of this chapter
if they fail to have an approved plan in place by October 1, 2006, and
are subject to the penalties in section 7 of this act.
(d) The director shall periodically review any plan approved under
this section and may require modifications to the plan as appropriate.
(e) The director shall make available to the public and to the
legislature reports required under this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A manufacturer subject to this chapter
shall, individually or as part of a group, report to the department
concerning the performance of the manufacturer's plan. The report must
include, but is not limited to: (1) A detailed description and
documentation of how the capture rate was achieved and how and where
the mercury was disposed or recycled; (2) a plan to implement
additional or alternative actions, if necessary, to improve the capture
rate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A violation of sections 3 through 6 of this
act is punishable by a civil penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars
per violation per day. Penalties collected under this section must be
deposited in the state toxics control account created in RCW
70.105D.070. The civil penalties in this section are in addition to
any other penalties authorized under other state or local laws
governing the use of mercury in motor vehicles.

Sec. 8 RCW 42.56.270 and 2005 c 274 s 407 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following financial, commercial, and proprietary information is
exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Valuable formulae, designs, drawings, computer source code or
object code, and research data obtained by any agency within five years
of the request for disclosure when disclosure would produce private
gain and public loss;
(2) Financial information supplied by or on behalf of a person,
firm, or corporation for the purpose of qualifying to submit a bid or
proposal for (a) a ferry system construction or repair contract as
required by RCW 47.60.680 through 47.60.750 or (b) highway construction
or improvement as required by RCW 47.28.070;
(3) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
private persons pertaining to export services provided under chapters
43.163 and 53.31 RCW, and by persons pertaining to export projects
under RCW 43.23.035;
(4) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
businesses or individuals during application for loans or program
services provided by chapters 43.163, 43.160, 43.330, and 43.168 RCW,
or during application for economic development loans or program
services provided by any local agency;
(5) Financial information, business plans, examination reports, and
any information produced or obtained in evaluating or examining a
business and industrial development corporation organized or seeking
certification under chapter 31.24 RCW;
(6) Financial and commercial information supplied to the state
investment board by any person when the information relates to the
investment of public trust or retirement funds and when disclosure
would result in loss to such funds or in private loss to the providers
of this information;
(7) Financial and valuable trade information under RCW 51.36.120;
(8) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the clean Washington
center in applications for, or delivery of, program services under
chapter 70.95H RCW;
(9) Financial and commercial information requested by the public
stadium authority from any person or organization that leases or uses
the stadium and exhibition center as defined in RCW 36.102.010;
(10) Financial information, including but not limited to account
numbers and values, and other identification numbers supplied by or on
behalf of a person, firm, corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, or other entity related to an application for a liquor
license, gambling license, or lottery retail license;
(11) Proprietary data, trade secrets, or other information that
relates to: (a) A vendor's unique methods of conducting business; (b)
data unique to the product or services of the vendor; or (c)
determining prices or rates to be charged for services, submitted by
any vendor to the department of social and health services for purposes
of the development, acquisition, or implementation of state purchased
health care as defined in RCW 41.05.011; ((and))
(12)(a) When supplied to and in the records of the department of
community, trade, and economic development:
(i) Financial and proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of community, trade, and economic
development pursuant to RCW 43.330.050(8) and 43.330.080(4); and
(ii) Financial or proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of community, trade, and economic
development or the office of the governor in connection with the
siting, recruitment, expansion, retention, or relocation of that
person's business and until a siting decision is made, identifying
information of any person supplying information under this subsection
and the locations being considered for siting, relocation, or expansion
of a business;
(b) When developed by the department of community, trade, and
economic development based on information as described in (a)(i) of
this subsection, any work product is not exempt from disclosure;
(c) For the purposes of this subsection, "siting decision" means
the decision to acquire or not to acquire a site;
(d) If there is no written contact for a period of sixty days to
the department of community, trade, and economic development from a
person connected with siting, recruitment, expansion, retention, or
relocation of that person's business, information described in (a)(ii)
of this subsection will be available to the public under this chapter;
and
(13) Records obtained from individual motor vehicle recyclers,
vehicle crushers, and scrap recycling facilities under section
3(1)(a)(v) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 and 3 through 7 of this act are
each added to chapter 70.95M RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Section 8 of this act takes effect July 1,
2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act expires January 1, 2025.

--- END ---