BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.32.220 and 2004 c 92 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For persons receiving compensation for temporary or permanent
total disability pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, such
compensation shall be reduced by an amount equal to the benefits
payable under the federal old-age, survivors, and disability insurance
act as now or hereafter amended not to exceed the amount of the
reduction established pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 424a. However, such
reduction shall not apply when the combined compensation provided
pursuant to this chapter and the federal old-age, survivors, and
disability insurance act is less than the total benefits to which the
federal reduction would apply, pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 424a. Where any
person described in this section refuses to authorize the release of
information concerning the amount of benefits payable under said
federal act the department's estimate of said amount shall be deemed to
be correct unless and until the actual amount is established and no
adjustment shall be made for any period of time covered by any such
refusal.
(2) Any reduction under subsection (1) of this section shall be
effective the month following the month in which the department or
self-insurer is notified by the federal social security administration
that the person is receiving disability benefits under the federal old-age, survivors, and disability insurance act: PROVIDED, That in the
event of an overpayment of benefits the department or self-insurer may
not recover more than the overpayments for the six months immediately
preceding the date the department or self-insurer notifies the worker
that an overpayment has occurred: PROVIDED FURTHER, That upon
determining that there has been an overpayment, the department or self-insurer shall immediately notify the person who received the
overpayment that he or she shall be required to make repayment pursuant
to this section and RCW 51.32.230.
(3) Recovery of any overpayment must be taken from future temporary
or permanent total disability benefits or permanent partial disability
benefits provided by this title. In the case of temporary or permanent
total disability benefits, the recovery shall not exceed twenty-five
percent of the monthly amount due from the department or self-insurer
or one-sixth of the total overpayment, whichever is the lesser.
(4) No reduction may be made unless the worker receives notice of
the reduction prior to the month in which the reduction is made.
(5) In no event shall the reduction reduce total benefits to less
than the greater amount the worker may be entitled to under this title
or the federal old-age, survivors, and disability insurance act.
(6) The director, pursuant to rules adopted in accordance with the
procedures provided in the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05
RCW, may exercise his or her discretion to waive, in whole or in part,
the amount of any overpayment where the recovery would be against
equity and good conscience.
(7) Subsection (1) of this section applies to:
(a) Workers under the age of sixty-two whose effective entitlement
to total disability compensation begins before January 2, 1983;
(b) Workers under the age of sixty-five whose effective entitlement
to total disability compensation begins after January 1, 1983; and
(c) Workers who will become sixty-five years of age on or after
June 10, 2004.
(8)(a) If the federal social security administration makes a
retroactive reduction in the federal social security disability benefit
entitlement of a worker for periods of temporary total, temporary
partial, or total permanent disability for which the department or
self-insurer also reduced the worker's benefit amounts under this
section, the department or self-insurer, as the case may be, shall make
adjustments in the calculation of benefits and pay the additional
benefits to the worker as appropriate. However, the department or
self-insurer shall not make changes in the calculation or pay
additional benefits unless the worker submits a written request, along
with documentation satisfactory to the director of an overpayment
assessment by the social security administration, to the department or
self-insurer, as the case may be.
(b) Additional benefits paid under this subsection:
(i) Are paid without interest and without regard to whether the
worker's claim under this title is closed; and
(ii) Do not affect the status or the date of the claim's closure.
(c) This subsection applies only to requests for adjustments that
are submitted before July 1, 2007, and does not apply to requests on
claims for which a determination on the request has been made and is
not subject to further appeal.
(d) By December 1, 2006, the department must report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature concerning the benefit
adjustments authorized in this subsection and must include information
about similar benefit adjustments, if any, authorized in other states
with social security disability benefit offset requirements. The
report must include recommendations on whether additional statutory
changes might be warranted in light of the actions of the federal
social security administration.

--- END ---