BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that Washington's community and technical
college system is among the most successful in the nation, enrolling
more than sixty percent of postsecondary students and geographically
dispersed across the state to offer maximum opportunity for residents
to pursue basic skills, academic transfer, work force training, and
personal enrichment.
(2) The legislature further finds that part-time and adjunct
faculty play a significant role in the success of the colleges,
teaching nearly half of the overall instructional workload.
(3) In 1996, the legislature directed the state board for community
and technical colleges to conduct a best practices audit on
compensation practices and working conditions for part-time faculty.
The best practices task force developed a ten-year plan to improve the
salaries, benefits, working conditions, and ratios of part-time to
full-time faculty in the college system. Among the goals of the plan
was to reach, at the end of ten years, pay equity for part-time
faculty. Although state investments have been made in the intervening
years, the goal has not been met.
(4) As the ten-year anniversary of the best practices task force
approaches, the legislature reaffirms its commitment to part-time
faculty at community and technical colleges and to the goals of the
best practices task force.
(5) In the 2005-07 biennial appropriations act and thereafter, the
legislature shall appropriate sufficient funds for allocation to the
community and technical colleges for the colleges to implement and
maintain one hundred percent pro rata pay for part-time faculty.
Salary schedules implemented under this section are subject to local
collective bargaining.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2005, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---