BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.03.250 and 1987 c 109 s 83 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person, municipal corporation, firm, irrigation district,
association, corporation, or water users' association hereafter
desiring to appropriate water for a beneficial use shall make an
application to the department for a permit to make such appropriation,
and shall not use or divert such waters until he or she has received a
permit from the department as in this chapter provided. The
construction of any ditch, canal or works, or performing any work in
connection with said construction or appropriation, or the use of any
waters, shall not be an appropriation of such water nor an act for the
purpose of appropriating water unless a permit to make said
appropriation has first been granted by the department((: PROVIDED,
That)).
(2) A temporary permit may be granted upon a proper showing made to
the department to be valid only during the pendency of such application
for a permit unless sooner revoked by the department((: PROVIDED,
FURTHER, That)).
(3) Nothing in this chapter ((contained)) shall be deemed to affect
RCW 90.40.010 through 90.40.080 except that the notice and certificate
((therein)) provided for in RCW 90.40.030 shall be addressed to the
department, and the department shall exercise the powers and perform
the duties prescribed by RCW 90.40.030.
(4) This section does not apply to rain barrels, cisterns, and
other similar facilities for capturing runoff from roofs, paved areas,
and other hard surfaces on a single residential, commercial, or
industrial property or public facility when used in accordance with
section 3 of this act.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.03.370 and 2003 c 329 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) All applications for reservoir permits are subject to the
provisions of RCW 90.03.250 through 90.03.320. But the party or
parties proposing to apply to a beneficial use the water stored in any
such reservoir shall also file an application for a permit, to be known
as the secondary permit, which shall be in compliance with the
provisions of RCW 90.03.250 through 90.03.320. Such secondary
application shall refer to such reservoir as its source of water supply
and shall show documentary evidence that an agreement has been entered
into with the owners of the reservoir for a permanent and sufficient
interest in said reservoir to impound enough water for the purposes set
forth in said application. When the beneficial use has been completed
and perfected under the secondary permit, the department shall take the
proof of the water users under such permit and the final certificate of
appropriation shall refer to both the ditch and works described in the
secondary permit and the reservoir described in the primary permit.
The department may accept for processing a single application form
covering both a proposed reservoir and a proposed secondary permit or
permits for use of water from that reservoir.
(b) The department shall expedite processing applications for the
following types of storage proposals:
(i) Development of storage facilities that will not require a new
water right for diversion or withdrawal of the water to be stored;
(ii) Adding or changing one or more purposes of use of stored
water;
(iii) Adding to the storage capacity of an existing storage
facility; and
(iv) Applications for secondary permits to secure use from existing
storage facilities.
(c) A secondary permit for the beneficial use of water shall not be
required for use of water stored in a reservoir where the water right
for the source of the stored water authorizes the beneficial use.
(2)(a) For the purposes of this section, "reservoir" includes, in
addition to any surface reservoir, any naturally occurring underground
geological formation where water is collected and stored for subsequent
use as part of an underground artificial storage and recovery project.
To qualify for issuance of a reservoir permit an underground geological
formation must meet standards for review and mitigation of adverse
impacts identified, for the following issues:
(i) Aquifer vulnerability and hydraulic continuity;
(ii) Potential impairment of existing water rights;
(iii) Geotechnical impacts and aquifer boundaries and
characteristics;
(iv) Chemical compatibility of surface waters and ground water;
(v) Recharge and recovery treatment requirements;
(vi) System operation;
(vii) Water rights and ownership of water stored for recovery; and
(viii) Environmental impacts.
(b) Standards for review and standards for mitigation of adverse
impacts for an underground artificial storage and recovery project
shall be established by the department by rule. Notwithstanding the
provisions of RCW 90.03.250 through 90.03.320, analysis of each
underground artificial storage and recovery project and each
underground geological formation for which an applicant seeks the
status of a reservoir shall be through applicant-initiated studies
reviewed by the department.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "underground artificial
storage and recovery project" means any project in which it is intended
to artificially store water in the ground through injection, surface
spreading and infiltration, or other department-approved method, and to
make subsequent use of the stored water. However, (a) this subsection
does not apply to irrigation return flow, or to operational and seepage
losses that occur during the irrigation of land, or to water that is
artificially stored due to the construction, operation, or maintenance
of an irrigation district project, or to projects involving water
reclaimed in accordance with chapter 90.46 RCW; and (b) RCW 90.44.130
applies to those instances of claimed artificial recharge occurring due
to the construction, operation, or maintenance of an irrigation
district project or operational and seepage losses that occur during
the irrigation of land, as well as other forms of claimed artificial
recharge already existing at the time a ground water subarea is
established.
(4) Nothing in chapter 98, Laws of 2000 changes the requirements of
existing law governing issuance of permits to appropriate or withdraw
the waters of the state.
(5) The department shall report to the legislature by December 31,
2001, on the standards for review and standards for mitigation
developed under subsection (3) of this section and on the status of any
applications that have been filed with the department for underground
artificial storage and recovery projects by that date.
(6) Where needed to ensure that existing storage capacity is
effectively and efficiently used to meet multiple purposes, the
department may authorize reservoirs to be filled more than once per
year or more than once per season of use.
(7) This section does not apply to facilities to recapture and
reuse return flow from irrigation operations serving a single farm
under an existing water right as long as the acreage irrigated is not
increased beyond the acreage allowed to be irrigated under the water
right.
(8) In addition to the facilities exempted under subsection (7) of
this section, this section does not apply to small irrigation
impoundments. For purposes of this section, "small irrigation
impoundments" means lined surface storage ponds less than ten acre feet
in volume used to impound irrigation water under an existing water
right where use of the impoundment: (a)(i) Facilitates efficient use
of water; or (ii) promotes compliance with an approved recovery plan
for endangered or threatened species; and (b) does not expand the
number of acres irrigated or the annual consumptive quantity of water
used. Such ponds must be lined unless a licensed engineer determines
that a liner is not needed to retain water in the pond and to prevent
ground water contamination. Although it may also be composed of other
materials, a properly maintained liner may be composed of bentonite.
Water remaining in a small irrigation impoundment at the end of an
irrigation season may be carried over for use in the next season.
However, the limitations of this subsection (8) apply. Development and
use of a small irrigation impoundment does not constitute a change or
amendment for purposes of RCW 90.03.380 or 90.44.055.
(9) Rain barrels, cisterns, and other similar facilities for
capturing runoff from roofs, paved areas, and other hard surfaces on a
single residential, commercial, or industrial property or public
facility are exempt from the reservoir and secondary permit
requirements of this chapter when used in accordance with section 3 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In order to qualify for the exemptions created in RCW 90.03.250
and 90.03.370, the owner of a rain barrel, cistern, or other similar
water storage facility that has a storage capacity of less than one
thousand gallons must intend to put the stored water to beneficial use
on the property where the rainwater was collected.
(2) In order to qualify for the exemptions created in RCW 90.03.250
and 90.03.370, the owner of a rain barrel, cistern, or other similar
water storage facility that has a storage capacity of greater than one
thousand gallons must intend to put the stored water to beneficial use
on the property where the rainwater was collected and manage the water
stored in the facility in compliance with rules developed by the
department under this section.
(3)(a) The department shall work with the representatives of a
broad group of interested parties, individuals with technical
expertise, and proponents of rainwater capture and use systems to adopt
rules, consistent with chapter 34.05 RCW, that allow for pilot areas to
use rainwater collection and use systems with a capacity greater than
one thousand gallons, including one pilot area where the use of
rainwater collection and use systems is a proposed means of
contributing to storm water runoff control and one pilot area located
on an island where ground water and surface water availability is
limited due to saltwater intrusion. The intent of the pilot areas is
to gauge the feasibility of adopting area-specific permits by rule and
the impact of rainwater storage and use facilities on the natural
hydrologic system.
(b) The department must take into consideration annual rainfall and
population density when selecting pilot areas. The department shall
also, when selecting the pilot rule areas, give preference to those
areas that can most benefit because of local hydrologic conditions and
to areas in which local watershed plans or similar efforts have
identified the use of rainwater collection systems as a source of
beneficial water supply.
(c) Upon completion of the pilot projects authorized by this
section, the department shall adopt permanent rules that govern the use
of rainwater storage and use facilities eligible for exemptions under
RCW 90.03.250 and 90.03.370.
(d) The pilot rules and any subsequent permanent rules adopted
under this section must establish procedures for making applications
for inclusion under the exemption, must specify the criteria under
which an application may qualify for the exemption, and must contain a
mechanism for the department to regulate the storage of water by
rainwater collection systems if necessary to prevent the impairment of
water rights senior to the rainwater project. The rules may also
specify conditions regarding the storage capacity of individual rain
collection systems, the times of the year when it is permissible to
store rainwater, and locations within the area in which rainwater
systems are and are not appropriate due to local hydrologic conditions
and potential interference with existing water rights.
(4) Rainwater collected under this exemption does not result in a
water right under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The department of ecology shall report to
the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than December
31, 2007, regarding the implementation of section 3 of this act. After
June 1, 2008, the department of ecology shall proceed with permanent
rule making to establish exemptions by rule for rainwater systems
consistent with section 3 of this act unless the legislature acts to
direct otherwise.

--- END ---