BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.21.766 and 2004 c 129 s 34 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever a regional fire protection service authority ((or the
legislative authority of any city or town)) determines that the fire
protection jurisdictions that are members of the authority ((or the
city or town or a substantial portion of the city or town is)) are not
adequately served by existing private ambulance service, the governing
board of the authority may by resolution((, or the legislative
authority of the city or town may by appropriate legislation,)) provide
for the establishment of a system of ambulance service to be operated
by the authority as a public utility of the city or town, or operated
by contract after a call for bids.
(2) The legislative authority of any city or town may establish an
ambulance service as defined by RCW 18.73.030. However, the
legislative authority of the city or town shall not provide for the
establishment of an ambulance service that would compete with any
existing private ambulance service, unless the legislative authority of
the city or town determines that the city or town, or a substantial
portion of the city or town, is not adequately served by an existing
private ambulance service, and the existing private ambulance service
cannot be encouraged to expand its service by contract entered into
between the parties. In determining the adequacy of an existing
private ambulance service, the legislative authority of the city or
town, shall request the department of health to determine whether the
existing private ambulance service is meeting existing objective
service standards, as set forth by the department of health in law, or
any rules adopted thereunder. If the department of health determines
that the existing private ambulance service is routinely failing to
meet department of health standards, the legislative authority of the
city or town may, by appropriate legislation, provide for the
establishment of ambulance service to be operated by the authority of
the city or town, or operated by contract after a call for bids.
(3) The legislative authority of the city or town may, by
appropriate legislation, adopt procedures to set and collect reasonable
fees for an ambulance service established under subsection 2 of this
section; however, such fees shall be set in accordance with subsection
(4) of this section.
(4)(a) The legislative authority of the city or town is authorized
to set rates and collect charges for ambulance service costs which may
include costs necessary to: Purchase and maintain ambulance equipment;
operate, maintain, and construct ambulance system facilities; and
provide adequate ambulance service staffing. Any capital costs shall
be allocated and charged in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles so that such costs are annualized based on
customary depreciation schedules.
(b) Beginning on the effective date of this act, the rate charged
for ambulance services, under (a) of this subsection, shall be:
(i) Uniform so that each physical property address located within
the geographic boundaries of the city or town, not otherwise exempt
from such charge by the legislative authority of the city or town, or
which the city or town is prohibited from taxing under the constitution
or laws of this state or of the United States, are billed the same
amount for ambulance services regardless of actual use of the service;
or
(ii) Billed to the individual using the ambulance service.
(5) Ambulance rates charged pursuant to this section shall not
constitute taxes or charges provided for under RCW 82.02.050 through
82.02.090, 35.21.768, or charges otherwise prohibited by law.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.21.768 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 24 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
The legislative authority of any city or town is authorized to
adopt ordinances ((for the levy and collection of excise taxes and/or))
for the imposition of ((an additional)) a tax for the act or privilege
of engaging in the ambulance business. Such business and occupation
tax shall be imposed in such amounts as fixed and determined by the
legislative authority.
((The excise taxes other than the business and occupation tax
authorized by this section shall be levied and collected from all
persons, businesses, and industries who are served and billed for said
ambulance service owned and operated or contracted for by the city or
town in such amounts as shall be fixed and determined by the
legislative authority of the city or town.))
All taxes authorized pursuant to this section shall be construed to
be taxes other than a retail sales tax defined in chapter 82.08 RCW and
a use tax defined in chapter 82.12 RCW, and the city or town shall
appropriate and use the proceeds derived from all taxes authorized by
this section only for the operation, maintenance and capital needs of
its municipally owned, operated, leased or contracted for ambulance
service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---