BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The public health system as defined in RCW 43.70.575 is
essential to fulfilling the state's constitutional responsibility to
protect the health and safety of its citizens.
(2) The population-based services provided by the public health
system are cost-effective and are critical in improving the value of
public investments in all types of health services and in controlling
health care costs.
(3) Our state public health system lacks the capacity to fulfill
its critical functions with respect to well understood health threats
such as impure air and water, unsanitary living conditions, unsafe
food, and inadequate rates of immunization.
(4) The public health system lacks the capacity to address the
emerging health threats of the 21st century including bioterrorism and
other emergencies, health disparities, the spread of drug-resistant
tuberculosis, HIV, SARS, West Nile virus, and other infectious
diseases, and the predictable increases of heart disease, cancer,
diabetes, and other diseases that will result from tobacco and other
drug addiction, poor diet, and inadequate exercise.
(5) According to the provisions of chapter 43.70 RCW the department
of health has developed a public health improvement plan, in
consultation with local health jurisdictions, the state board of
health, and other state agencies, health services providers, and
citizens concerned about public health.
(6) The public health improvement plan includes standards for all
elements of the public health system and provides a detailed accounting
of both performance and funding deficits in the current system,
suggesting ways in which additional funds could be used to improve that
system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) There is hereby established the public
health financing task force. Its members shall include one member from
each caucus from the committee on health and the principal fiscal
committee of the house of representatives and senate. In addition, one
representative of the office of the governor and one representative of
the department of health, one representative of the association of
counties, one representative of the association of local public health
officials, one representative of the state board of health, and other
public health partners as requested by the chairs shall also serve as
nonvoting members. The task force shall appoint an executive committee
not to exceed four members from among its voting members and may
appoint such subcommittees, advisory groups, or other bodies as it sees
fit. Staffing assistance shall be provided by the house of
representatives office of program research, senate committee services,
and the joint legislative audit and review committee. The department
of health and the office of the governor shall provide such staffing
assistance as may be reasonably required within their existing
resources.
(2) The task force shall recommend a source and level of dedicated
funding the legislature should provide for public health services. The
recommendation shall include methods to ensure that such funding does
not supplant existing federal, state, and local funds received by any
element of the public health system.
(3) The task force shall complete a report to the governor and the
legislature by July 1, 2006.

--- END ---