BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.10.010 and 1979 ex.s. c 182 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter the words and phrases in this section shall
have the designated meanings unless a different meaning is expressly
provided or the context otherwise clearly indicated.
(1) "Person" shall mean any individual, firm, partnership,
association, or corporation.
(2) "Snowmobile" shall mean any self-propelled vehicle capable of
traveling over snow or ice, which utilizes as its means of propulsion
an endless belt tread, or cleats, or any combination of these or other
similar means of contact with the surface upon which it is operated,
and which is steered wholly or in part by skis or sled type runners,
and which is not otherwise registered as, or subject to the motor
vehicle excise tax in the state of Washington.
(3) "Vintage snowmobile" means a snowmobile manufactured at least
thirty years ago.
(4) "All terrain vehicle" shall mean any self-propelled vehicle
other than a snowmobile, capable of cross-country travel on or
immediately over land, water, snow, ice, marsh, swampland, and other
natural terrain, including, but not limited to, four-wheel vehicles,
amphibious vehicles, ground effect or air cushion vehicles, and any
other means of land transportation deriving motive power from any
source other than muscle or wind; except any vehicle designed primarily
for travel on, over, or in the water, farm vehicles, or any military or
law enforcement vehicles.
(((4))) (5) "Owner" shall mean the person, other than a lienholder,
having the property in or title to a snowmobile or all terrain vehicle,
and entitled to the use or possession thereof.
(((5))) (6) "Operator" means each person who operates, or is in
physical control of, any snowmobile or all terrain vehicle.
(((6))) (7) "Public roadway" shall mean the entire width of the
right of way of any road or street designed and ordinarily used for
travel or parking of motor vehicles, which is controlled by a public
authority other than the Washington state department of transportation,
and which is open as a matter of right to the general public for
ordinary vehicular traffic.
(((7))) (8) "Highways" shall mean the entire width of the right of
way of all primary and secondary state highways, including all portions
of the interstate highway system.
(((8))) (9) "Dealer" means a person, partnership, association, or
corporation engaged in the business of selling snowmobiles or all
terrain vehicles at wholesale or retail in this state.
(((9))) (10) "Department" shall mean the department of licensing.
(((10))) (11) "Director" shall mean the director of the department
of licensing.
(((11))) (12) "Commission" shall mean the Washington state parks
and recreation commission.
(((12))) (13) "Hunt" shall mean any effort to kill, injure,
capture, or disturb a wild animal or wild bird.
(((13))) (14) "Committee" means the Washington state parks and
recreation commission snowmobile advisory committee.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.10.020 and 1982 c 17 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in this chapter, no person shall ((own,
transport, or)) operate any snowmobile within this state unless such
snowmobile has been registered in accordance with the provisions of
this chapter.
(2) A registration number shall be assigned, without payment of a
fee, to snowmobiles owned by the state of Washington or its political
subdivisions, and the assigned registration number shall be displayed
upon each snowmobile in such manner as provided by rules adopted by the
department.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.10.040 and 2002 c 352 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Application for registration shall be made to the department in
the manner and upon forms the department prescribes, and shall state
the name and address of each owner of the snowmobile to be registered,
and shall be signed by at least one such owner, and shall be
accompanied by an annual registration fee to be established by the
commission, after consultation with the committee and any statewide
snowmobile user groups. ((The commission shall increase the current
fee of twenty dollars by five dollars effective September 30, 2001, and
the commission shall increase the fee by another five dollars effective
September 30, 2002. After the fee increase effective September 30,
2002, the commission shall not increase the fee.))
(a) The annual registration fee for snowmobiles newer than thirty
years is thirty dollars. The annual registration fee for vintage
snowmobiles is twelve dollars. The department shall design, in
cooperation with the commission, a distinct registration decal which
shall be issued to vintage snowmobiles upon payment of the annual
registration fee.
(b) Upon receipt of the application and the application fee, the
snowmobile shall be registered and a registration number assigned,
which shall be affixed to the snowmobile in a manner provided in RCW
46.10.070.
(2) The registration provided in this section shall be valid for a
period of one year. At the end of the period of registration, every
owner of a snowmobile in this state shall renew his or her registration
in the manner the department prescribes, for an additional period of
one year, upon payment of the annual registration fee as determined by
the commission.
(3) Any person acquiring a snowmobile already validly registered
under the provisions of this chapter must, within ten days of the
acquisition or purchase of the snowmobile, make application to the
department for transfer of the registration, and the application shall
be accompanied by a transfer fee of five dollars.
(4) A snowmobile owned by a resident of another state or Canadian
province where registration is not required by law may be issued a
nonresident registration permit valid for not more than sixty days.
Application for the permit shall state the name and address of each
owner of the snowmobile to be registered and shall be signed by at
least one owner and shall be accompanied by a registration fee of five
dollars. The registration permit shall be carried on the vehicle at
all times during its operation in this state.
(5) The registration fees provided in this section shall be in lieu
of any personal property or excise tax heretofore imposed on
snowmobiles by this state or any political subdivision thereof, and no
city, county, or other municipality, and no state agency shall
hereafter impose any other registration or license fee on any
snowmobile in this state.
(6) The department shall make available a pair of uniform decals
consistent with the provisions of RCW 46.10.070. In addition to the
registration fee provided in this section the department shall charge
each applicant for registration the actual cost of the decal. The
department shall make available replacement decals for a fee equivalent
to the actual cost of the decals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act applies to registrations due or to
become due on October 1, 2005, and thereafter.

--- END ---