BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
LEGISLATIVE INTENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that it
is in the public interest of the people of the state of Washington to
encourage home ownership. To achieve this purpose, this act provides
a property tax homestead exemption to help offset the tax impact of
rising property values, and thus make home ownership more affordable to
low-income and middle-income households. It is the clear and
unambiguous intent of the legislature that such property as described
within this measure be exempt from taxation, as authorized by Article
VII, section 1 of the Washington state Constitution.

DEFINITIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
For the purposes of this section and section 2 of this act, the
following definitions apply unless the context clearly requires
otherwise:
(1) The term "residence" means a single-family dwelling unit
whether the unit is separate or part of a multiunit dwelling, including
the land on which the dwelling stands not to exceed one acre. The term
also includes a share ownership in a cooperative housing association,
corporation, or partnership if the person claiming exemption can
establish that his or her share represents the specific unit or portion
of the structure in which he or she resides. The term also includes a
single-family dwelling situated upon lands the fee of which is vested
in the United States or any instrumentality thereof including an Indian
tribe or in the state of Washington, and notwithstanding the provisions
of RCW 84.04.080 and 84.04.090, this residence shall be deemed real
property.
(2) The term "real property" also includes a mobile home which has
substantially lost its identity as a mobile unit by virtue of its being
fixed in location upon land owned or leased by the owner of the mobile
home and placed on a foundation (posts or blocks) with fixed pipe,
connections with sewer, water, or other utilities. A mobile home
located on land leased by the owner of the mobile home is subject, for
tax billing, payment, and collection purposes, only to the personal
property provisions of chapter 84.56 RCW and RCW 84.60.040.
(3) "Cotenant" means a person who resides with the person claiming
the exemption and who has an ownership interest in the residence.

QUALIFICATIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
A person is exempt from any legal obligation to pay a portion of
the amount of excess and regular real property taxes due and payable in
the year following the year in which a claim is filed, and thereafter,
in accordance with the following:
(1) The property taxes must have been imposed upon a residence
which was occupied by the person claiming the exemption as a principal
place of residence as of the time of filing. However, any person who
sells, transfers, or is displaced from his or her residence may
transfer his or her exemption status to a replacement residence, but no
claimant shall receive an exemption on more than one residence in any
year. Confinement of the person to a hospital or nursing home shall
not disqualify the claim of exemption if:
(a) The residence is temporarily unoccupied;
(b) The residence is occupied by a spouse or a person financially
dependent on the claimant for support; or
(c) The residence is rented for the purpose of paying nursing home
or hospital costs.
(2) The person claiming the exemption must have owned, at the time
of filing, in fee, as a life estate, or by contract purchase, the
residence on which the property taxes have been imposed or if the
person claiming the exemption lives in a cooperative housing
association, corporation, or partnership, the person must own a share
therein representing the unit or portion of the structure in which he
or she resides. For purposes of this subsection, a residence owned by
a marital community or owned by cotenants shall be deemed to be owned
by each spouse or cotenant, and any lease for life shall be deemed a
life estate.
(3) A qualifying residence under this section is exempt from all
excess property taxes on a value equal to twenty percent of the local
county's median property value, as of January 1st of the assessment
year. For each local taxing district, a qualifying residence is exempt
from regular property taxes on a value equal to the lower of twenty
percent of the local county's median property value as of January 1st
of the assessment year, or the maximum exemption that can be applied
uniformly within the district without resulting in a loss of revenues
due to the aggregate limits imposed by RCW 84.52.043 or other statute.
For the state levy, a qualifying residence is exempt from regular
property taxes on a value equal to twenty percent of the state's median
property value, as of January 1st of the assessment year.
(4) The department of revenue shall adopt rules that are necessary
and convenient to properly administer the provisions of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Subheadings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

--- END ---