BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
COMMUNITY REVITALIZATION FINANCING--GENERAL PROVISIONS
Sec. 101 RCW 39.89.010 and 2001 c 212 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is declared to be the public policy of the state of
Washington to promote and facilitate the orderly development and
economic stability of its communities. Local governments need the
ability to raise revenue to finance public improvements that are
designed to encourage economic growth and residential and commercial
development in geographic areas characterized by high levels of
unemployment and ((stagnate)) stagnant employment and income growth.
It is also the public policy of the state of Washington that
development and redevelopment investments be consistent with the growth
management act. The construction of necessary public improvements in
accordance with local ((economic development)) comprehensive plans will
encourage investment in ((job-producing)) private development to
accommodate residential growth, produce jobs, and expand the public tax
base.
(2) It is the purpose of this chapter:
(a) To encourage taxing districts to cooperate in the allocation of
future tax revenues that are used to finance public improvements
designed to encourage private development in selected areas, in
particular in those local governments that are located adjacent to
another state or international border and in those local jurisdictions
that contain blighted areas within urbanized areas;
(b) To assist those local governments that have a competitive
disadvantage in ((its)) their ability to attract business, private
investment, or commercial ((development)) or residential development,
due to blighted areas within their jurisdiction or due to ((its
location near)) their proximity to a state or international border;
((and))
(c) To prevent or arrest the decay of selected areas due to the
inability of existing financial methods to provide needed public
improvements, and to encourage private investment designed to promote
and facilitate the orderly redevelopment of selected areas;
(d) To encourage the growth of viable communities based on an
appropriate balance of residential and commercial development; and
(e) To promote the implementation of comprehensive plans developed
pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW.

Sec. 102 RCW 39.89.020 and 2001 c 212 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Assessed value of real property" means the valuation of
taxable real property as placed on the last completed assessment roll.
(2) "Blighted area" means the same as in RCW 35.81.015.
(3) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(4) "Excess excise taxes" means the same as in section 202 of this
act.
(5) "Increment area" means the geographic area from which taxes are
to be appropriated to finance public improvements authorized under this
chapter.
(6) "Increment value" means seventy-five percent of any increase in
the assessed value of real property in an increment area due to the
placement of new construction and improvements to property on the
assessment rolls after the increment area is created, where the new
construction or improvements occur entirely after the increment area is
created. "Increment value" does not include any increase in the
assessed value of real property representing new construction and
improvements to property occurring after their initial placement on the
assessment rolls, except that for new construction which represents
entire buildings, "increment value" includes seventy-five percent of
any increase in the assessed value of such new construction in the
years following its initial placement on the assessment rolls. There
is no increment value if the assessed value of real property in an
increment area has not increased due to new construction and
improvements to property occurring after the increment area is created.
(7) "Local government" means any city, town, county, port district,
or any combination thereof.
(((3))) (8) "Low-income housing" has the same meaning as "housing
units" within the context of RCW 43.185.050(2)(j).
(9) "Ordinance" means any appropriate method of taking legislative
action by a local government.
(((4))) (10) "Participating taxing authority" means a taxing
authority that has entered into a written agreement with a local
government for the use of community revitalization financing to the
extent of allocating excess excise taxes to the local government for
the purpose of financing all or a portion of the costs of designated
public improvements.
(11) "Participating taxing district" means a taxing district that
has entered into a written agreement with a local government for the
use of community revitalization financing to finance all or a portion
of the costs of designated public improvements.
(12) "Public improvements" means:
(a) Infrastructure improvements within the increment area that
include:
(i) Street and road construction and maintenance;
(ii) Water and sewer system construction and improvements;
(iii) Sidewalks and streetlights;
(iv) Parking, terminal, and dock facilities;
(v) Park and ride facilities of a transit authority;
(vi) Park facilities and recreational areas; and
(vii) Storm water and drainage management systems; and
(b) Expenditures for any of the following purposes:
(i) ((Providing environmental analysis, professional management,
planning, and promotion within the increment area, including the
management and promotion of retail trade activities in the increment
area;
(ii) Providing maintenance and security for common or public areas
in the increment area; or
(iii))) Historic preservation activities authorized under RCW
35.21.395; and
(ii) Facilities and improvements that support affordable housing as
defined in RCW 43.63A.510.
(((5))) (13) "Public improvement costs" means the costs of: (a)
Design, planning, acquisition including land acquisition, site
preparation including land clearing, construction, reconstruction,
rehabilitation, improvement, and installation of public improvements;
(b) demolishing, relocating, maintaining, and operating property
pending construction of public improvements; (c) relocating utilities
as a result of public improvements; (d) financing public improvements,
including interest during construction, legal and other professional
services, taxes, insurance, principal and interest costs on general
indebtedness issued to finance public improvements, and any necessary
reserves for general indebtedness; (e) assessments incurred in
revaluing real property for the purpose of determining the tax
allocation base value that are in excess of costs incurred by the
assessor in accordance with the revaluation plan under chapter 84.41
RCW, and the costs of apportioning the taxes and complying with this
chapter and other applicable law; and (f) administrative expenses and
feasibility studies reasonably necessary and related to these costs,
including related costs that may have been incurred before adoption of
the ordinance authorizing the public improvements and the use of
community revitalization financing to fund the costs of the public
improvements.
(((6))) (14) "Regular property taxes" means regular property taxes
as defined in RCW 84.04.140, except: (a) Regular property taxes levied
by port districts or public utility districts specifically for the
purpose of making required payments of principal and interest on
general indebtedness; ((and)) (b) regular property taxes levied by the
state for the support of the common schools under RCW 84.52.065; and
(c) regular property taxes levied under the authority of RCW 84.55.050
that are limited to a specific purpose as provided in RCW
84.55.050(3)(c). Regular property taxes do not include excess property
tax levies that are exempt from the aggregate limits for junior and
senior taxing districts as provided in RCW 84.52.043.
(((7))) (15) "Tax allocation base value" means the ((true and
fair)) assessed value of real property located within an increment area
for taxes ((imposed)) levied in the year in which the increment area is
created for collection in the following year, plus ((twenty-five)) one
hundred percent of any increase in the ((true and fair)) assessed value
of real property located within an increment area that is placed on the
assessment rolls after the increment area is created, less the
increment value.
(((8))) (16) "Tax allocation revenues" means those tax revenues
derived from the ((imposition of)) receipt of excess excise taxes and
from regular property taxes on the increment value and distributed to
finance public improvements.
(((9) "Increment area" means the geographic area from which taxes
are to be appropriated to finance public improvements authorized under
this chapter.
(10) "Increment value" means seventy-five percent of any increase
in the true and fair value of real property in an increment area that
is placed on the tax rolls after the increment area is created.
(11))) (17) "Taxing authority" means a governmental entity that
imposes a sales or use tax under chapter 82.14 RCW upon the occurrence
of any taxable event within a proposed or approved increment area.
(18) "Taxing ((districts)) district" means a governmental entity
that levies or has levied for it regular property taxes upon real
property located within a proposed or approved increment area.
(((12) "Value of taxable property" means the value of the taxable
property as defined in RCW 39.36.015.))
(19) "Urban growth area" has the same meaning as provided in
chapter 36.70A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 A new section is added to chapter 39.89
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2005, the designation of an increment area is
subject to the following limitations:
(a) The taxable real property within the increment area boundaries
may not exceed one billion dollars in assessed value;
(b) The average assessed value per square foot of taxable land
within the increment area boundaries may not exceed seventy dollars;
(c) An increment area is limited to contiguous tracts, lots,
pieces, or parcels of land;
(d) The boundaries may not be drawn to purposely exclude parcels
where economic growth is unlikely to occur; and
(e) The area must meet the definition of blighted area.
(2) For increment areas created on or after July 1, 2005, financing
under this chapter is subject to the following conditions:
(a) Funding must be used in order of the following priorities:
(i) First, to meet projected housing needs for the area as
identified in the local comprehensive plan;
(ii) Second, to address any imbalance between jobs and housing as
identified in the local comprehensive plan;
(iii) Third, to meet other local priorities, including economic
development;
(b) No funds may be used to relocate a business from outside the
increment area, but within this state, into the increment area;
(c)(i) No funds may be used to finance, design, acquire, construct,
equip, operate, maintain, remodel, repair, or reequip public facilities
funded with taxes collected under RCW 82.14.048;
(ii) Community revitalization financing funds may not be used to
displace other sources of funding that historically have been dedicated
to or allocated for public improvement costs;
(d)(i) Except as provided in (ii) of this subsection (2)(d) no
funds may be used for public improvements other than projects
identified within the capital facilities, utilities, housing, or
transportation element of a comprehensive plan required under chapter
36.70A RCW;
(ii) Funds may be used for public improvements that are historical
preservation activities as defined in RCW 39.89.020(12);
(e) No funds may be used to support projects where the primary
purpose is the development of commercial or office space, hotel or
convention centers, sports or entertainment complexes, industrial
parks, or retail or shopping centers; and
(f) Funds may be used only in areas where, absent the financing
available under this act, the proposed development or redevelopment
would not otherwise occur.
(3) For purposes of this section, "relocating a business" means the
closing of a business and the reopening of that business, or the
opening of a new business that engages in the same activities as the
previous business, in a different location within a one-year period,
when an individual or entity has an ownership interest in the business
at the time of closure and at the time of opening or reopening.
"Relocating a business" does not include the closing and reopening of
a business in a new location where the business has been acquired and
is under entirely new ownership at the new location, or the closing and
reopening of a business in a new location as a result of the exercise
of the power of eminent domain.

Sec. 104 RCW 39.89.030 and 2002 c 12 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A local government may finance public improvements using community
revitalization financing subject to the following conditions:
(1) The local government adopts an ordinance designating an
increment area within its boundaries and specifying the public
improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in part with the use
of community revitalization financing((;)).
(2) The public improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in
part using community revitalization financing are expected to encourage
private development within the increment area and to increase the fair
market value of real property within the increment area((;)).
(3) The local government has entered or expects to enter into a
contract with a private developer relating to the development of
private improvements within the increment area or has received a letter
of intent from a private developer relating to the developer's plans
for the development of private improvements within the increment area.
(4) Private development that is anticipated to occur within the
increment area, as a result of the public improvements, will be
consistent with the countywide planning policy adopted by the county
under RCW 36.70A.210 and the local government's comprehensive plan and
development regulations adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW((;
(4) Taxing districts, in the aggregate, that levy at least seventy-five percent of the regular property tax within which the increment
area is located approves the community revitalization financing of the
project under RCW 39.89.050(1); and
(5) In an increment area that includes any portion of a fire
protection district as defined in Title 52 RCW, the fire protection
district must agree to participate in the community revitalization
financing of the project under chapter 212, Laws of 2001, for the
project to proceed. Approval by the fire protection district shall be
considered as part of the required participation by taxing districts
under subsection (4) of this section)).
(5) The governing body of the local government must make a finding
that the public improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in
part using community revitalization financing are reasonably likely to:
(a) Improve the viability of existing communities that are based on
mixed-use development within the increment area;
(b) Increase private residential and commercial investment within
the increment area;
(c) Increase employment within the increment area; and
(d) Generate, over the period of time that repayments must be made
for bonds issued under the authority of RCW 39.89.080, tax allocation
revenues that are equal to or greater than the local contributions made
under this chapter.

Sec. 105 RCW 39.89.050 and 2001 c 212 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Before adopting an ordinance creating the increment area, a
local government must:
(((1))) (a) Obtain written agreement for the use of community
revitalization financing to finance all or a portion of the costs of
the designated public improvements from any taxing ((districts that, in
the aggregate, levy at least seventy-five percent of the regular
property tax on property within the increment area. A signed, written
agreement from taxing districts that in the aggregate levy at least
seventy-five percent of the regular property tax within the increment
area, constitutes concurrence by all taxing districts in the increment
area in the public improvement and participation in the public
improvement)) district that levies regular property taxes on real
property within the increment area, or from any taxing authority that
imposes a sales or use tax under chapter 82.14 RCW within the increment
area if the taxing district or taxing authority chooses to participate
in the public improvements to the extent of providing limited funding
under community revitalization financing authorized under this chapter.
The agreement must be authorized by the governing body of these
participating taxing districts ((that in the aggregate levy at least
seventy-five percent of the regular property tax on property within the
increment area)) and taxing authorities;
(((2))) (b) Estimate the impact of the increment area on small
business and low-income housing and develop a mitigation plan for
impacted businesses and housing.
(i) In analyzing the impact of the increment area, the local
government must develop:
(A) An inventory of existing low-income housing units, and
businesses and retail activity within the increment area;
(B) A reasonable estimate of the number of low-income housing
units, small businesses, and other commercial activity that may be
vulnerable to displacement inside the increment area;
(C) A reasonable estimate of projected net job growth and net
housing growth caused by creation of the increment area when compared
to the existing jobs or housing balance for the area; and
(D) A reasonable estimate of the impact of net housing growth on
the current housing price mix.
(ii) The mitigation plan must address the requirements in section
107 of this act; and
(c) Hold a public hearing on the proposed financing of the public
improvement in whole or in part with community revitalization financing
at least sixty days before passage of the ordinance establishing the
increment area. The public hearing may be held by either the governing
body of the local government, or a committee of the governing body that
includes at least a majority of the whole governing body.
(i) Notice of the public hearing must be published in a legal
newspaper of general circulation within the proposed increment area at
least ten days before the public hearing and posted in at least six
conspicuous public places located in the proposed increment area.
(ii) Notice must also be sent by United States mail to the property
owners, all identifiable community-based organizations with involvement
in the proposed increment area, and the business enterprises located
within the proposed increment area at least thirty days prior to the
hearing. In implementing provisions under this act, the local
governing body may also consult with community-based groups, business
organizations, including the local chamber of commerce, and the office
of minority and women's business enterprises to assist with providing
appropriate notice to business enterprises and property owners for whom
English is a second language.
(iii) Notices must describe the contemplated public improvements,
estimate the costs of the public improvements, describe the portion of
the costs of the public improvements to be borne by community
revitalization financing, describe any other sources of revenue to
finance the public improvements, describe the boundaries of the
proposed increment area, estimate the impact that the public
improvements will have on small businesses and low-income housing, and
estimate the period during which community revitalization financing is
contemplated to be used. ((The public hearing may be held by either
the governing body of the local government, or a committee of the
governing body that includes at least a majority of the whole governing
body; and
(3))) (iv) Notices must inform the public where to obtain the
analyses required in this section.
(2) To create an increment area, a local government must adopt an
ordinance establishing the increment area that:
(a) Describes the public improvements((,));
(b) Describes the boundaries of the increment area, subject to the
limitations in section 103 of this act;
(c) Estimates the cost of the public improvements and the portion
of these costs to be financed by community revitalization
financing((,));
(d) Estimates the time during which regular property taxes are to
be apportioned((,)) and, if applicable, excess excise taxes are to be
used to finance public improvement costs associated with the public
improvements financed in whole or in part by community revitalization
financing;
(e) Provides the date when the apportionment of the regular
property taxes and, if applicable, the use of excess excise taxes will
commence((,)); and
(f) Finds that the conditions of RCW 39.89.030 are met.
(3) Within one year of creation of an increment area, a local
government must amend its comprehensive plan adopted under chapter
36.70A RCW or any other applicable comprehensive plan, or land use plan
adopted by a city, town, or county.
(4) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Fiscal year" means the twelve-month period beginning July 1st
and ending the following June 30th.
(b) "Small business" has the same meaning as in RCW 19.85.020.

Sec. 106 RCW 39.89.060 and 2001 c 212 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
The local government shall:
(1) Publish notice in a legal newspaper of general circulation
within the increment area that describes the public improvement,
describes the boundaries of the increment area, and identifies the
location and times where the ordinance and other public information
concerning the public improvement may be inspected; and
(2) Deliver a certified copy of the ordinance to the county
treasurer, the county assessor, and the governing body of each
participating taxing district within which the increment area is
located.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 A new section is added to chapter 39.89
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A local government that uses community revitalization financing
under this chapter shall mitigate adverse impacts to small businesses
and low-income housing resulting from development or redevelopment that
is supported by the financing.
(2) Conditions requiring mitigation under this section include:
(a) The displacement of residents from ten or more inhabited
residential units within the increment area that results from public
improvements within the increment area;
(b) The displacement of small businesses or loss of other
commercial activity within the increment area that results from public
improvements within the increment area; or
(c) An increase or creation of a jobs/housing imbalance
inconsistent with a comprehensive plan adopted under chapter 36.70A
RCW.
(3) Whenever possible, the mitigation should be consistent with the
development or redevelopment goals of the public improvement project.
The local government shall:
(a) Guarantee no net loss of low-income housing units, while
retaining the range of prices and type of low-income units. This
commitment may be addressed using any combination of private or public
funding specifically allocated for the purpose of mitigating the
impact. If funds are specifically allocated for this purpose to the
housing trust fund authorized under chapter 43.185 RCW, local
governments may apply for matching funds to cover the cost of
mitigation. Any such local government match must supplement funds
spent for low-income housing within the jurisdiction, and may include,
but is not limited to, impact fees under chapter 36.70A RCW;
(b) Guarantee housing relocation assistance to all households (i)
with incomes at or below fifty percent of median income, adjusted for
household size, of the county in which the increment area is located,
and (ii) that have been displaced due to public improvements within the
increment area; and
(c) Provide adequate relocation or financial assistance, including
direct financial aid, to any business that has been displaced or forced
to close due to public improvements within the increment area.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 A new section is added to chapter 39.89
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Any person residing, owning real property, or owning a business
within a local government that has utilized community revitalization
financing under this act may commence a civil action in superior court
against a local government for the following:
(a) Expending revenues derived from community revitalization
financing, including the proceeds of bonds, for a purpose not
authorized under this act, or for activities outside of the increment
area's geographic boundaries;
(b) Failure to assess and mitigate impacts of the increment area as
provided in RCW 39.89.050(1)(b) and section 107 of this act;
(c) Failure to meet the procedural requirements under this act.
(2) If the court finds that the local government failed to
substantially comply with the requirements in this act, the court shall
order the local government to remedy the violation, and may award
equitable relief, damages, reimbursement for costs, and reasonable
attorney fees.

PART II
COMMUNITY REVITALIZATION FINANCING--USE OF TAX
ALLOCATION REVENUES TO PAY THE COSTS OF PUBLIC IMPROVEMENTS
Sec. 201 RCW 39.89.070 and 2001 c 212 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Commencing in the second calendar year following the passage of
the ordinance creating an increment area and authorizing the use of
community revitalization financing, the county treasurer shall
distribute receipts from regular taxes imposed on real property located
in the increment area as follows:
(a) Each participating taxing district and the local government
that created the increment area shall receive that portion of its
regular property taxes produced by the rate of tax levied by or for the
taxing district on the tax allocation base value for that community
revitalization financing project in the taxing district, or upon the
total assessed value of real property in the taxing district, whichever
is smaller; and
(b) The local government that created the increment area shall
receive an additional portion of the regular property taxes levied by
it and by or for each participating taxing district upon the increment
value within the increment area. However, if there is no increment
value, the local government shall not receive any additional regular
property taxes under this subsection (1)(b). The local government that
created the increment area may agree to receive less than the full
amount of ((this)) the additional portion of regular property taxes
under this subsection (1)(b) as long as bond debt service, reserve, and
other bond covenant requirements are satisfied, in which case the
balance of these tax receipts shall be allocated to the participating
taxing districts that ((imposed)) levied regular property taxes, or
have regular property taxes ((imposed)) levied for them, in the
increment area for collection that year in proportion to their regular
tax levy rates for collection that year. The local government may
request that the treasurer transfer this additional portion of the
property taxes to its designated agent. The portion of the tax
receipts distributed to the local government or its agent under this
subsection (1)(b) may only be expended to finance public improvement
costs associated with the public improvements financed in whole or in
part by community revitalization financing.
(2) The county assessor shall allocate ((twenty-five percent of any
increased real property value occurring in the increment area to the
tax allocation base value and seventy-five percent to the increment
value)) any increase in the assessed value of real property occurring
in the increment area to the increment value and tax allocation base
value as appropriate. This section does not authorize revaluations of
real property by the assessor for property taxation that are not made
in accordance with the assessor's revaluation plan under chapter 84.41
RCW or under other authorized revaluation procedures.
(3) The apportionment of increases in assessed valuation in an
increment area, and the associated distribution to the local government
of receipts from regular property taxes that are imposed on the
increment value, must cease when tax allocation revenues are no longer
necessary or obligated to pay the costs of the public improvements.
Any excess tax allocation revenues derived from regular property taxes
and earnings on ((the)) these tax allocation revenues, remaining at the
time the apportionment of tax receipts terminates, must be returned to
the county treasurer and distributed to the participating taxing
districts that imposed regular property taxes, or had regular property
taxes imposed for it, in the increment area for collection that year,
in proportion to the rates of their regular property tax levies for
collection that year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 A new section is added to chapter 39.89
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A local government that creates an increment area may use
annually any excess excise taxes received by it from taxable activity
within the increment area to finance public improvement costs
associated with the public improvements financed in whole or in part by
community revitalization financing. The use of excess excise taxes
must cease when tax allocation revenues are no longer necessary or
obligated to pay the costs of the public improvements. Any
participating taxing authority is authorized to allocate excess excise
taxes to the local government. The legislature declares that it is a
proper purpose of a local government or participating taxing authority
to allocate excess excise taxes for purposes of financing public
improvements under this chapter.
(2) A local government consisting solely of a port district may use
excess excise taxes as provided in this section only to the extent that
any participating taxing authority allocates excess excise taxes to the
local government.
(3) A local government consisting of a port district and any city,
town, or county may use excess excise taxes as provided in this section
only if:
(a) The city, town, or county realizes excess excise taxes from
taxable activity within the increment area; or
(b) Any participating taxing authority allocates excess excise
taxes to the local government.
(4) A local government shall provide the department accurate
information describing the geographical boundaries of the increment
area at least seventy-five days before the effective date of the
ordinance creating the increment area. The local government shall
ensure that the boundary information provided to the department is kept
current.
(5) The department shall provide each local government that has
provided boundary information to the department as provided in this
section with the necessary information to calculate excess excise
taxes.
(6) The department may adopt any rules under chapter 34.05 RCW it
considers necessary for the administration of this section.
(7) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Base year" means the first calendar year following the
creation of an increment area.
(b)(i) Except as provided in (b)(ii) of this subsection (7),
"excess excise taxes" means the amount of excise taxes received by the
local government during the measurement year from taxable activity
within the increment area over and above the amount of excise taxes
received by the local government during the base year from taxable
activity within the increment area. However, if a local government
creates an increment area and reasonably determines that no activity
subject to tax under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW occurred in the
twelve months immediately preceding the creation of the increment area
within the boundaries of the area that became the increment area,
"excess excise taxes" means the entire amount of excise taxes received
by the local government during a calendar year period beginning with
the calendar year immediately following the creation of the increment
area and continuing with each measurement year thereafter.
(ii) For increment areas created in calendar year 2005, "excess
excise taxes" means the amount of excise taxes received by the local
government during the measurement year from taxable activity within the
increment area over and above an amount equal to twelve multiplied by
the average monthly excise tax receipts of the local government during
the part of the year in which, pursuant to legislation enacted in
calendar year 2005, any retail sale is sourced to a location other than
that of the retail outlet at or from which delivery is made. If no
such legislation enacted, this subsection (7)(b)(ii) is null and void.
(c) "Excise taxes" means local retail sales and use taxes
authorized in RCW 82.14.030.
(d) "Measurement year" means a calendar year, beginning with the
calendar year following the base year and each calendar year
thereafter, that is used annually to measure the amount of excess
excise taxes required to be used to finance public improvement costs
associated with public improvements financed in whole or in part by
community revitalization financing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 A new section is added to chapter 39.89
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A local government shall provide a report of the use of
community revitalization financing to the department by March 1st of
each year. The report shall contain the following information:
(a) The amount of tax allocation revenues and local public sources
received by the local government during the preceding calendar year,
and a summary of how these revenues were expended;
(b) The number of low-income housing units, small businesses, and
other commercial activities that have been displaced inside the
increment area due to improvements undertaken with community
revitalization financing;
(c) The net job growth and net housing growth caused by creation of
the increment area when compared to the jobs or housing balance
existing in the area prior to the creation of the increment area;
(d) The impact of net housing growth on the current housing price
mix;
(e) The nature and amount of mitigation assistance provided
pursuant to section 107 of this act;
(f) The names of any businesses locating within the increment area
as a result of the public improvements undertaken by the local
government and financed in whole or in part with community
revitalization financing;
(g) The total number of permanent jobs created as a result of the
public improvements undertaken by the local government and financed in
whole or in part with community revitalization financing;
(h) The average wages and benefits received by all employees of
businesses locating within the increment area as a result of the public
improvements undertaken by the local government and financed in whole
or in part with community revitalization financing; and
(i) Declarations that the local government is in compliance with
RCW 39.89.030(5) and that the government is not currently out of
compliance with the requirements of chapter 36.70A RCW according to a
ruling by a growth management hearing board.
(2) The department shall make a report available to the public and
the legislature by June 1st of every fourth year, beginning in calendar
year 2009. The report shall include a list of public improvements
undertaken by local governments and financed in whole or in part with
community revitalization financing, and it shall also include a summary
of the information provided to the department by local governments
under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(b) "Tax allocation revenues" has the same meaning as in RCW
39.89.020.

PART III
BOND AUTHORIZATION
Sec. 301 RCW 39.89.080 and 2001 c 212 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A local government designating an increment area and
authorizing the use of community revitalization financing may incur
general indebtedness, and issue general obligation bonds, to finance
the public improvements and retire the indebtedness in whole or in part
from tax allocation revenues it receives, subject to the following
requirements:
(a) The ordinance adopted by the local government creating the
increment area and authorizing the use of community revitalization
financing indicates an intent to incur this indebtedness and the
maximum amount of this indebtedness that is contemplated; and
(b) The local government includes this statement of the intent in
all notices required by RCW 39.89.050.
(2) The general indebtedness incurred under subsection (1) of this
section may be payable from other tax revenues, the full faith and
credit of the local government, and nontax income, revenues, fees, and
rents from the public improvements, as well as contributions, grants,
and nontax money available to the local government for payment of costs
of the public improvements or associated debt service on the general
indebtedness.
(3) In addition to the requirements in subsection (1) of this
section, a local government designating an increment area and
authorizing the use of community revitalization financing may require
the nonpublic participant to provide adequate security to protect the
public investment in the public improvement within the increment area.
(4) Bonds issued under this section shall be authorized by
ordinance of the local governing body and may be issued in one or more
series and shall bear such date or dates, be payable upon demand or
mature at such time or times, bear interest at such rate or rates, be
in such denomination or denominations, be in such form either coupon or
registered as provided in RCW 39.46.030, carry such conversion or
registration privileges, have such rank or priority, be executed in
such manner, be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or
places, and be subject to such terms of redemption with or without
premium, be secured in such manner, and have such other
characteristics, as may be provided by such ordinance or trust
indenture or mortgage issued pursuant thereto.
(5) The local government may annually pay into a fund to be
established for the benefit of bonds issued under this section a fixed
proportion or a fixed amount of any tax allocation revenues derived
from property or business activity within the increment area containing
the public improvements funded by the bonds, such payment to continue
until all bonds payable from the fund are paid in full.
(6) In case any of the public officials of the local government
whose signatures appear on any bonds or any coupons issued under this
chapter shall cease to be such officials before the delivery of such
bonds, such signatures shall, nevertheless, be valid and sufficient for
all purposes, the same as if such officials had remained in office
until such delivery. Any provision of any law to the contrary
notwithstanding, any bonds issued under this chapter are fully
negotiable.
(7) Notwithstanding subsections (4) through (6) of this section,
bonds issued under this section may be issued and sold in accordance
with chapter 39.46 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 A new section is added to chapter 39.89
RCW to read as follows:
A local government that issues bonds under RCW 39.89.080 to finance
public improvements may pledge for the payment of such bonds all or
part of any tax allocation revenues derived from the public
improvements.

PART IV
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

--- END ---