BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.04.570 and 2003 c 111 s 155 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The election review staff of the office of the secretary of
state shall conduct a review of election-related policies, procedures,
and practices in an affected county or counties:
(i) If the unofficial returns of a primary or general election for
a position in the state legislature indicate that a mandatory recount
is likely for that position; or
(ii) If unofficial returns indicate a mandatory recount is likely
in a statewide election or an election for federal office.
Reviews conducted under (ii) of this subsection shall be performed
in as many selected counties as time and staffing permit. Reviews
conducted as a result of mandatory recounts shall be performed between
the time the unofficial returns are complete and the time the recount
is to take place, if possible.
(b) In addition to conducting reviews under (a) of this subsection,
the election review staff shall also conduct such a review in a county
((periodically)) at least once in each three-year period, in
conjunction with a county primary or special or general election, at
the direction of the secretary of state or at the request of the county
auditor. If staffing or budget levels do not permit a three-year
election cycle for reviews, then reviews must be done as often as
possible. If any resident of this state believes that an aspect of a
primary or election has been conducted inappropriately in a county, the
resident may file a complaint with the secretary of state. The
secretary shall consider such complaints in scheduling periodic reviews
under this section.
(c) Before an election review is conducted in a county, the
secretary of state shall provide the county auditor of the affected
county and the chair of the state central committee of each major
political party with notice that the review is to be conducted. When
a periodic review is to be conducted in a county at the direction of
the secretary of state under (b) of this subsection, the secretary
shall provide the affected county auditor not less than thirty days'
notice.
(2) Reviews shall be conducted in conformance with rules adopted
under RCW 29A.04.630. In performing a review in a county under this
chapter, the election review staff shall evaluate the policies and
procedures established for conducting the primary or election in the
county and the practices of those conducting it. As part of the
review, the election review staff shall issue to the county auditor and
the members of the county canvassing board a report of its findings and
recommendations regarding such policies, procedures, and practices. A
review conducted under this chapter shall not include any evaluation,
finding, or recommendation regarding the validity of the outcome of a
primary or election or the validity of any canvass of returns nor does
the election review staff have any jurisdiction to make such an
evaluation, finding, or recommendation under this title.
(3) The county auditor or the county canvassing board shall respond
to the review report in writing, listing the steps that will be taken
to correct any problems listed in the report. The secretary of state
shall visit the county before the next state primary or general
election to verify that the county has taken the steps they listed to
correct the problems noted in the report.
(4) The county auditor of the county in which a review is conducted
under this section or a member of the canvassing board of the county
may appeal the findings or recommendations of the election review staff
regarding the review by filing an appeal with the board created under
RCW 29A.04.510.

--- END ---