BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.08.010 and 2004 c 267 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter: "Information required for voter
registration" means the minimum information provided on a voter
registration application that is required by the county auditor in
order to place a voter registration applicant on the voter registration
rolls. This information includes ((the applicant's)):
(1) Name((, complete residence));
(2) Residential address((,));
(3) Date of birth((,));
(4) Washington state driver's license number, Washington state
identification card, or the last four digits of the applicant's Social
Security number((,));
(5) A signature attesting to the truth of the information provided
on the application((,)); and
(6) A check or indication in the box confirming the individual is
a United States citizen.
If the individual does not have a driver's license, state
identification card, or Social Security number, the registrant must be
issued a unique voter registration number ((and)) in order to be placed
on the voter registration rolls. All other information supplied is
ancillary and not to be used as grounds for not registering an
applicant to vote. Modification of the language of the official
Washington state voter registration form by the voter will not be
accepted and will cause the rejection of the registrant's application.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.08.030 and 2004 c 267 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this
chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Verification notice" means a notice sent by the county auditor
or secretary of state to a voter registration applicant and is used to
verify or collect information about the applicant in order to complete
the registration.
(2) "Acknowledgement notice" means a notice sent by nonforwardable
mail by the county auditor or secretary of state to a registered voter
to acknowledge a voter registration transaction, which can include
initial registration, transfer, or reactivation of an inactive
registration. An acknowledgement notice may be a voter registration
card.
(3) "Confirmation notice" means a notice sent to a registered voter
by first class forwardable mail at the address indicated on the voter's
permanent registration record and to any other address at which the
county auditor or secretary of state could reasonably expect mail to be
received by the voter in order to confirm the voter's residence
address. The confirmation notice must be designed ((so that the voter
may update his or her current residence address)) to include a postage
prepaid, preaddressed return form by which the registrant may verify
the address information.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.08.107 and 2004 c 267 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The secretary of state must review the information provided by
each voter registration applicant to ensure that ((either)) the
driver's license number, state identification card number, or the last
four digits of the social security number match the information
maintained by the Washington department of licensing or the social
security administration. If a match cannot be made, the secretary of
state or county auditor must correspond with the applicant to ((resolve
the discrepancy)) obtain from the applicant a copy of a current photo
identification, utility bill, bank statement, paycheck, or government
check or another government document that shows the applicant's name
and address.
(2) If the applicant fails to respond to any correspondence
required in this section to confirm information provided on a voter
registration application((,)) within ((thirty)) forty-five days, the
((secretary of state shall forward the application to the appropriate
county auditor for document storage)) applicant will not be registered
to vote.
(3) Only after the secretary of state has confirmed ((that an
applicant's driver's license number or the last four digits of the
applicant's social security number match existing records with the
Washington department of licensing or the social security
administration or determined that the applicant does not have either a
driver's license number or social security number)) the applicant's
identity, as required by subsection (1) of this section, may the
applicant be placed on the official list of registered voters.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.08.110 and 2004 c 267 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) On receipt of an application for voter registration, the county
auditor shall review the application to determine whether the
information supplied is complete. An application is considered
complete only if it contains the applicant's name, complete valid
residence address, date of birth, and signature attesting to the truth
of the information provided and an indication ((the license information
or social security number)) that the identifying documentation has been
confirmed by the secretary of state. If it is not complete, the
auditor shall promptly mail a verification notice of the deficiency to
the applicant. This verification notice shall require the applicant to
provide the missing information. If the verification notice is not
returned by the applicant or is returned as undeliverable ((the auditor
shall not place)), the name of the applicant shall not be placed on the
county voter list. If the applicant provides the required verified
information, the applicant shall be registered to vote as of the date
of mailing of the original voter registration application.
(2) In order to prevent duplicate registration records, all
complete voter registration applications must be screened against
existing voter registration records in the official statewide voter
registration list. If a match of an existing record is found in the
official list the record must be updated with the new information
provided on the application. If the new information indicates that the
voter has changed his or her county of residence, the application must
be forwarded to the voter's new county of residence for processing. If
the new information indicates that the voter remains in the same county
of residence or if the applicant is a new voter the application must be
processed by the county of residence.
(3) If the information required in subsection (1) of this section
is complete, the applicant is considered to be registered to vote as of
the original date of mailing or date of delivery, whichever is
applicable. The auditor shall record the appropriate precinct
identification, taxing district identification, and date of
registration on the voter's record in the state voter registration
list. Within forty-five days after the receipt of an application but
no later than seven days before the next primary, special election, or
general election, the auditor shall send to the applicant, by first
class mail, an acknowledgement notice identifying the registrant's
precinct and containing such other information as may be required by
the secretary of state. The postal service shall be instructed not to
forward a voter registration card to any other address and to return to
the auditor any card which is not deliverable. If the registrant has
indicated on the form that he or she is registered to vote within the
county but has provided a new address within the county that is for
voter registration purposes, the auditor shall transfer the voter's
registration.
(4) If an acknowledgement notice card is properly mailed as
required by this section to the address listed by the voter as being
the voter's mailing address and the notice is subsequently returned to
the auditor by the postal service as being undeliverable to the voter
at that address, the auditor shall promptly send the voter a
confirmation notice. The auditor shall place the voter's registration
on inactive status pending a response from the voter to the
confirmation notice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 29A.08 RCW
to read as follows:
No person registering to vote, who meets all the qualifications of
a registered voter in the state of Washington, shall be disqualified
because of a nontraditional address being used as a residence address.
Voters using such an address will be registered and assigned to a
precinct based on the location provided. Voters without a traditional
address will be registered at the county courthouse, city hall, or
other public building near the area that the voter considers his or her
residence. Registering at a nontraditional address will not disqualify
a voter from requesting ongoing absentee voter status if the voter
designates a valid mailing address.
For the purposes of this section, "nontraditional address" includes
shelters, parks, or other identifiable locations that the voter deems
to be his or her residence.

Sec. 6 RCW 29A.08.115 and 2004 c 267 s 108 are each amended to
read as follows:
A person or organization collecting voter registration application
forms must transmit the forms to the secretary of state or a
((designee)) county auditor at least once weekly. The registration
date on such forms will be the date they are received by the secretary
of state or county auditor.

Sec. 7 RCW 29A.08.145 and 2004 c 267 s 113 are each amended to
read as follows:
This section establishes a special procedure which an elector may
use to register to vote or transfer a voter registration by changing
his or her address during the period beginning after the closing of
registration for voting at the polls under RCW 29A.08.140 and ending on
the fifteenth day before a primary, special election, or general
election. A qualified elector in the state may register to vote or
change his or her registration address in person in the office of the
county auditor of the county in which the applicant resides, or at a
voter registration location specifically designated for this purpose by
the ((county auditor of the county in which the applicant resides))
secretary of state, and apply for an absentee ballot for that primary
or election. The auditor or registration assistant shall register that
individual in the manner provided in this chapter. The application for
an absentee ballot executed by the newly registered or transferred
voter for the primary or election that follows the execution of the
registration shall be promptly transmitted to the auditor with the
completed voter registration form.

Sec. 8 RCW 29A.08.210 and 2003 c 111 s 216 are each amended to
read as follows:
An applicant for voter registration shall complete an application
providing the following information concerning his or her
qualifications as a voter in this state:
(1) The address of the last former registration of the applicant as
a voter in the state;
(2) The applicant's full name;
(3) The applicant's date of birth;
(4) The address of the applicant's residence for voting purposes;
(5) The mailing address of the applicant if that address is not the
same as the address in subsection (4) of this section;
(6) The sex of the applicant;
(7) The applicant's Washington state driver's license number,
Washington state identification card number, or the last four digits of
the applicant's social security number;
(8) A check box and declaration confirming that the applicant is a
citizen of the United States;
(((8))) (9) The applicant's signature; and
(((9))) (10) Any other information that the secretary of state
determines is necessary to establish the identity of the applicant and
prevent duplicate or fraudulent voter registrations.
This information shall be recorded on a single registration form to
be prescribed by the secretary of state.
If the applicant fails to provide the information required for
voter registration, the auditor shall send the applicant a verification
notice. The auditor shall not register the applicant until the
required information is provided. If a verification notice is returned
as undeliverable or the applicant fails to respond to the notice within
forty-five days, the auditor shall not register the applicant to vote.
The following warning shall appear in a conspicuous place on the
voter registration form:

"If you knowingly provide false information on this voter
registration form or knowingly make a false declaration about your
qualifications for voter registration you will have committed a class
C felony that is punishable by imprisonment for up to five years, or by
a fine of up to ten thousand dollars, or both imprisonment and fine."

Sec. 9 RCW 29A.08.520 and 2004 c 267 s 126 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon receiving official notice of a person's conviction of a
felony in either state or federal court, if the convicted person is a
registered voter in the county, the county auditor shall cancel the
defendant's voter registration. Whenever a superior court issues a
certificate of discharge under RCW 9.94A.637, the county clerk shall
immediately notify the county auditor and the county auditor shall
immediately notify the secretary of state for the purpose of updating
the statewide voter registration data base. Whenever the indeterminate
sentence review board or the clemency and pardons board issues a
restoration of civil rights, they shall immediately notify the
secretary of state for the purpose of updating the statewide voter
registration data base. Additionally, the secretary of state in
conjunction with the department of corrections, the Washington state
patrol, the office of the administrator for the courts, and other
appropriate state agencies shall arrange for a periodic comparison of
a list of known felons with the statewide voter registration list. The
felon list must not include anyone whose conviction has been
invalidated or who has been convicted in another state and had their
voting rights restored in that state. If a person is found on ((the
department of corrections)) a felon list and the statewide voter
registration list, the secretary of state or county auditor shall
confirm the match through a date of birth comparison and cancel the
voter registration from the official state voter registration list.
The canceling authority shall send ((notice of the proposed
cancellation)) to the person at his or her last known voter
registration address a notice of the proposed cancellation and an
explanation of the requirements for restoring the right to vote.
(2) A certificate of discharge or an order restoring civil rights
may be used as proof that a felon has completed all sentencing
requirements resulting from the felony conviction for which the
certificate was issued.

Sec. 10 RCW 29A.08.651 and 2004 c 267 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office of the secretary of state shall create and maintain
a statewide voter registration data base. This data base must be a
single, uniform, official, centralized, interactive computerized
statewide voter registration list defined, maintained, and administered
at the state level that contains the name and registration information
of every legally registered voter in the state and assigns a unique
identifier to each legally registered voter in the state.
(2) The computerized list must serve as the single system for
storing and maintaining the official list of registered voters
throughout the state.
(3) The computerized list must contain the name and registration
information of every legally registered voter in the state.
(4) Under the computerized list, a unique identifier is assigned to
each legally registered voter in the state.
(5) The computerized list must be coordinated with other agency
data bases within the state, including but not limited to the
department of corrections, the department of licensing, ((and)) the
department of health, the Washington state patrol, and the office of
the administrator for the courts.
(6) Any election officer in the state, including any local election
officer, may obtain immediate electronic access to the information
contained in the computerized list.
(7) All voter registration information obtained by any local
election officer in the state must be electronically entered into the
computerized list on an expedited basis at the time the information is
provided to the local officer.
(8) The chief state election officer shall provide support, as may
be required, so that local election officers are able to enter
information as described in subsection (3) of this section.
(9) The computerized list serves as the official voter registration
list for the conduct of all elections.
(10) The secretary of state has data authority on all voter
registration data.
(11) The voter registration data base must be designed to
accomplish at a minimum, the following:
(a) Comply with the Help America Vote Act of 2002 (P.L. 107-252);
(b) Identify duplicate voter registrations;
(c) Identify suspected duplicate voters;
(d) Screen against the department of corrections, the Washington
state patrol, and other appropriate state agency data bases to aid in
the cancellation of voter registration of felons;
(e) Provide up-to-date signatures of voters for the purposes of
initiative signature checking;
(f) Provide for a comparison between the voter registration data
base and the department of licensing change of address data base;
(g) Provide online access for county auditors with the goal of real
time duplicate checking and update capabilities; and
(h) Provide for the cancellation of voter registration for persons
who have moved to other states and surrendered their Washington state
drivers' licenses.

Sec. 11 RCW 29A.08.775 and 2004 c 267 s 136 are each amended to
read as follows:
Only voters who appear on the official statewide voter registration
list are eligible to participate in elections. Each county shall
maintain a copy of that county's portion of the state list. The county
must ensure that data used for the production of poll lists and other
lists and mailings done in the administration of each election are
((drawn from)) the same as the official statewide voter registration
list.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 RCW 29A.08.155 (Payment for maintenance of
electronic records) and 2004 c 267 s 114 & 2003 c 111 s 215 are each
repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 This act takes effect January 1, 2006.

--- END ---