BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.48.010 and 2004 c 266 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Before January 1, 2008:
(a) With express authorization from the county legislative
authority, the county auditor may conduct all primary, special, and
general elections entirely by mail ballot. The county legislative
authority must give the county auditor at least ninety days' notice
before the first election to be conducted entirely by mail ballot. If
the county legislative authority and the county auditor decide to
return to a polling place election environment, the county legislative
authority must give the county auditor at least one hundred eighty
days' notice before the first election to be conducted using polling
places. Authorization under this subsection must apply to all primary,
special, and general elections conducted by the county auditor.
(b) The county auditor may designate any precinct having fewer than
two hundred active registered voters at the time of closing of voter
registration as provided in RCW 29A.08.140 as a mail ballot precinct.
((The county auditor shall notify each registered voter by mail that
for all future primaries and elections the voting in his or her
precinct will be by mail ballot only.)) Authorization from the county
legislative authority is not required to designate a precinct as a mail
ballot precinct under this subsection. In determining the number of
registered voters in a precinct for the purposes of this section,
persons who are ongoing absentee voters under RCW 29A.40.040 shall not
be counted. Nothing in this section may be construed as altering the
vote tallying requirements of RCW 29A.60.230.
(c) If the county legislative authority and county auditor
determine under (a) of this subsection, or if the county auditor
determines under (b) of this subsection, to return to a polling place
election environment, the auditor shall notify each registered voter,
by mail, of this and shall provide the address of the polling place to
be used.
(2) Effective January 1, 2008, all primary, special, and general
elections must be conducted entirely by mail ballot.
(3) Before changing a county or precinct from a polling place
election environment to an all-mail election environment, the county
auditor shall notify each affected registered voter by mail that for
all future primaries and elections the voting will be by mail ballot
only. The auditor shall mail each active voter a ballot at least
eighteen days before a primary, general election, or special election.
The auditor shall send each inactive voter either a ballot or an
application to receive a ballot at least eighteen days before a
primary, general election, or special election. The auditor shall
determine which of the two is to be sent. If the inactive voter
returns a voted ballot, the ballot shall be counted and the voter's
status restored to active. If the inactive voter completes and returns
an application, a ballot shall be sent and the voter's status restored
to active. The requirements regarding certification, reporting, and
the mailing of overseas and military ballots in RCW ((29.36.270))
29A.40.070 apply to elections conducted by mail ballot ((precincts)).
((If the precinct exceeds two hundred registered voters, or the
auditor determines to return to a polling place election environment,
the auditor shall notify each registered voter, by mail, of this and
shall provide the address of the polling place to be used.))
(4) All vote by mail elections must provide voting access to
individuals with disabilities as provided in chapter 29A.46 RCW.

--- END ---