BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I - CITY FIRE DEPARTMENTS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 The legislature intends to set standards
for addressing the reporting and accountability of substantially career
fire departments, and to specify performance measures applicable to
response time objectives for certain major services. The legislature
acknowledges the efforts of the international city/county management
association, the international association of fire chiefs, and the
national fire protection association for the organization and
deployment of resources for fire departments. The arrival of first
responders with automatic external defibrillator capability before the
onset of brain death, and the arrival of adequate fire suppression
resources before flash-over is a critical event during the mitigation
of an emergency, and is in the public's best interest. For these
reasons, this chapter contains performance measures, comparable to that
research, relating to the organization and deployment of fire
suppression operations, emergency medical operations, and special
operations by substantially career fire departments. This chapter does
not, and is not intended to, in any way modify or limit the authority
of cities and towns to set levels of service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Advanced life support" means functional provision of advanced
airway management, including intubation, advanced cardiac monitoring,
manual defibrillation, establishment and maintenance of intravenous
access, and drug therapy.
(2) "Aircraft rescue and fire fighting" means the fire fighting
actions taken to rescue persons and to control or extinguish fire
involving or adjacent to aircraft on the ground.
(3) "Brain death" as defined by the American heart association
means the irreversible death of brain cells that begins four to six
minutes after cardiac arrest.
(4) "City" means a first class city or a second class city that
provides fire protection services in a specified geographic area.
(5) "Fire department" means a city or town fire department
responsible for fire fighting actions, emergency medical services, and
other special operations in a specified geographic area. The
department must be a substantially career fire department, and not a
substantially volunteer fire department.
(6) "Fire suppression" means the activities involved in controlling
and extinguishing fires.
(7) "First responder" means provision of initial assessment and
basic first-aid intervention, including cardiac pulmonary resuscitation
and automatic external defibrillator capability.
(8) "Flash-over" as defined by national institute of standards and
technology means when all combustibles in a room burst into flame and
the fire spreads rapidly.
(9) "Marine rescue and fire fighting" means the fire fighting
actions taken to prevent, control, or extinguish fire involved in or
adjacent to a marine vessel and the rescue actions for occupants using
normal and emergency routes for egress.
(10) "Response time" means the time immediately following the
turnout time that begins when units are en route to the emergency
incident and ends when units arrive at the scene.
(11) "Special operations" means those emergency incidents to which
the fire department responds that require specific and advanced
training and specialized tools and equipment.
(12) "Town" means a town that provides fire protection services,
which may include fire fighting actions, emergency medical services,
and other special operations, in a specified geographic area.
(13) "Turnout time" means the time beginning when units receive
notification of the emergency to the beginning point of response time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 (1) Every city and town shall maintain a
written statement or policy that establishes the following:
(a) The existence of a fire department;
(b) Services that the fire department is required to provide;
(c) The basic organizational structure of the fire department;
(d) The expected number of fire department employees; and
(e) Functions that fire department employees are expected to
perform.
(2) Every city and town shall include service delivery objectives
in the written statement or policy required under subsection (1) of
this section. These objectives shall include specific response time
objectives for the following major service components, if appropriate:
(a) Fire suppression;
(b) Emergency medical services;
(c) Special operations;
(d) Aircraft rescue and fire fighting;
(e) Marine rescue and fire fighting; and
(f) Wild land fire fighting.
(3) Every city and town, in order to measure the ability to arrive
and begin mitigation operations before the critical events of brain
death or flash-over, shall establish time objectives for the following
measurements:
(a) Turnout time;
(b) Response time for the arrival of the first arriving engine
company at a fire suppression incident and response time for the
deployment of a full first alarm assignment at a fire suppression
incident;
(c) Response time for the arrival of a unit with first responder or
higher level capability at an emergency medical incident; and
(d) Response time for the arrival of an advanced life support unit
at an emergency medical incident, where this service is provided by the
fire department.
(4) Every city and town shall also establish a performance
objective of not less than ninety percent for the achievement of each
response time objective established under subsection (3) of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 (1) Every city and town shall evaluate its
level of service and deployment delivery and response time objectives
on an annual basis. The evaluations shall be based on data relating to
level of service, deployment, and the achievement of each response time
objective in each geographic area within the jurisdiction of the city
or town.
(2) Beginning in 2007, every city and town shall issue an annual
written report which shall be based on the annual evaluations required
by subsection (1) of this section.
(a) The annual report shall define the geographic areas and
circumstances in which the requirements of this standard are not being
met.
(b) The annual report shall explain the predictable consequences of
any deficiencies and address the steps that are necessary to achieve
compliance.

PART II - CODE CITY FIRE DEPARTMENTS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 The legislature intends to set standards
for addressing the reporting and accountability of substantially career
fire departments, and to specify performance measures applicable to
response time objectives for certain major services. The legislature
acknowledges the efforts of the international city/county management
association, the international association of fire chiefs, and the
national fire protection association for the organization and
deployment of resources for fire departments. The arrival of first
responders with automatic external defibrillator capability before the
onset of brain death, and the arrival of adequate fire suppression
resources before flash-over is a critical event during the mitigation
of an emergency, and is in the public's best interest. For these
reasons, this chapter contains performance measures, comparable to that
research, relating to the organization and deployment of fire
suppression operations, emergency medical operations, and special
operations by substantially career fire departments. This chapter does
not, and is not intended to, in any way modify or limit the authority
of code cities to set levels of service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Advanced life support" means functional provision of advanced
airway management, including intubation, advanced cardiac monitoring,
manual defibrillation, establishment and maintenance of intravenous
access, and drug therapy.
(2) "Aircraft rescue and fire fighting" means the fire fighting
actions taken to rescue persons and to control or extinguish fire
involving or adjacent to aircraft on the ground.
(3) "Brain death" as defined by the American heart association
means the irreversible death of brain cells that begins four to six
minutes after cardiac arrest.
(4) "Code city" means a code city that provides fire protection
services, which may include fire fighting actions, emergency medical
services, and other special operations, in a specified geographic area.
(5) "Fire department" means a code city fire department responsible
for fire fighting actions, emergency medical services, and other
special operations in a specified geographic area. The department must
be a substantially career fire department, and not a substantially
volunteer fire department.
(6) "Fire suppression" means the activities involved in controlling
and extinguishing fires.
(7) "First responder" means provision of initial assessment and
basic first-aid intervention, including cardiac pulmonary resuscitation
and automatic external defibrillator capability.
(8) "Flash-over" as defined by national institute of standards and
technology means when all combustibles in a room burst into flame and
the fire spreads rapidly.
(9) "Marine rescue and fire fighting" means the fire fighting
actions taken to prevent, control, or extinguish fire involved in or
adjacent to a marine vessel and the rescue actions for occupants using
normal and emergency routes for egress.
(10) "Response time" means the time immediately following the
turnout time that begins when units are en route to the emergency
incident and ends when units arrive at the scene.
(11) "Special operations" means those emergency incidents to which
the fire department responds that require specific and advanced
training and specialized tools and equipment.
(12) "Turnout time" means the time beginning when units receive
notification of the emergency to the beginning point of response time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 (1) Every code city shall maintain a
written statement or policy that establishes the following:
(a) The existence of a fire department;
(b) Services that the fire department is required to provide;
(c) The basic organizational structure of the fire department;
(d) The expected number of fire department employees; and
(e) Functions that fire department employees are expected to
perform.
(2) Every code city shall include service delivery objectives in
the written statement or policy required under subsection (1) of this
section. These objectives shall include specific response time
objectives for the following major service components, if appropriate:
(a) Fire suppression;
(b) Emergency medical services;
(c) Special operations;
(d) Aircraft rescue and fire fighting;
(e) Marine rescue and fire fighting; and
(f) Wild land fire fighting.
(3) Every code city, in order to measure the ability to arrive and
begin mitigation operations before the critical events of brain death
or flash-over, shall establish time objectives for the following
measurements:
(a) Turnout time;
(b) Response time for the arrival of the first arriving engine
company at a fire suppression incident and response time for the
deployment of a full first alarm assignment at a fire suppression
incident;
(c) Response time for the arrival of a unit with first responder or
higher level capability at an emergency medical incident; and
(d) Response time for the arrival of an advanced life support unit
at an emergency medical incident, where this service is provided by the
fire department.
(4) Every code city shall also establish a performance objective of
not less than ninety percent for the achievement of each response time
objective established under subsection (3) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 (1) Every code city shall evaluate its
level of service and deployment delivery and response time objectives
on an annual basis. The evaluations shall be based on data relating to
level of service, deployment, and the achievement of each response time
objective in each geographic area within the code city's jurisdiction.
(2) Beginning in 2007, every code city shall issue an annual
written report which shall be based on the annual evaluations required
by subsection (1) of this section.
(a) The annual report shall define the geographic areas and
circumstances in which the requirements of this standard are not being
met.
(b) The annual report shall explain the predictable consequences of
any deficiencies and address the steps that are necessary to achieve
compliance.

PART III - FIRE PROTECTION DISTRICTS AND
REGIONAL FIRE PROTECTION SERVICE AUTHORITIES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 The legislature intends to set standards
for addressing the reporting and accountability of substantially career
fire departments, and to specify performance measures applicable to
response time objectives for certain major services. The legislature
acknowledges the efforts of the international city/county management
association, the international association of fire chiefs, and the
national fire protection association for the organization and
deployment of resources for fire departments. The arrival of first
responders with automatic external defibrillator capability before the
onset of brain death, and the arrival of adequate fire suppression
resources before flash-over is a critical event during the mitigation
of an emergency, and is in the public's best interest. For these
reasons, this chapter contains performance measures, comparable to that
research, relating to the organization and deployment of fire
suppression operations, emergency medical operations, and special
operations by substantially career fire departments. This chapter does
not, and is not intended to, in any way modify or limit the authority
of fire protection districts and regional fire protection service
authorities to set levels of service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Advanced life support" means functional provision of advanced
airway management, including intubation, advanced cardiac monitoring,
manual defibrillation, establishment and maintenance of intravenous
access, and drug therapy.
(2) "Aircraft rescue and fire fighting" means the fire fighting
actions taken to rescue persons and to control or extinguish fire
involving or adjacent to aircraft on the ground.
(3) "Brain death" as defined by the American heart association
means the irreversible death of brain cells that begins four to six
minutes after cardiac arrest.
(4) "Fire department" means a fire protection district or a
regional fire protection service authority responsible for fire
fighting actions, emergency medical services, and other special
operations in a specified geographic area. The department must be a
substantially career fire department, and not a substantially volunteer
fire department.
(5) "Fire suppression" means the activities involved in controlling
and extinguishing fires.
(6) "First responder" means provision of initial assessment and
basic first-aid intervention, including cardiac pulmonary resuscitation
and automatic external defibrillator capability.
(7) "Flash-over" as defined by national institute of standards and
technology means when all combustibles in a room burst into flame and
the fire spreads rapidly.
(8) "Marine rescue and fire fighting" means the fire fighting
actions taken to prevent, control, or extinguish fire involved in or
adjacent to a marine vessel and the rescue actions for occupants using
normal and emergency routes for egress.
(9) "Response time" means the time immediately following the
turnout time that begins when units are en route to the emergency
incident and ends when units arrive at the scene.
(10) "Special operations" means those emergency incidents to which
the fire department responds that require specific and advanced
training and specialized tools and equipment.
(11) "Turnout time" means the time beginning when units receive
notification of the emergency to the beginning point of response time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 (1) Every fire protection district and
regional fire protection service authority shall maintain a written
statement or policy that establishes the following:
(a) The existence of a fire department;
(b) Services that the fire department is required to provide;
(c) The basic organizational structure of the fire department;
(d) The expected number of fire department employees; and
(e) Functions that fire department employees are expected to
perform.
(2) Every fire protection district and regional fire protection
service authority shall include service delivery objectives in the
written statement or policy required under subsection (1) of this
section. These objectives shall include specific response time
objectives for the following major service components, if appropriate:
(a) Fire suppression;
(b) Emergency medical services;
(c) Special operations;
(d) Aircraft rescue and fire fighting;
(e) Marine rescue and fire fighting; and
(f) Wild land fire fighting.
(3) Every fire protection district and regional fire protection
service authority, in order to measure the ability to arrive and begin
mitigation operations before the critical events of brain death or
flash-over, shall establish time objectives for the following
measurements:
(a) Turnout time;
(b) Response time for the arrival of the first arriving engine
company at a fire suppression incident and response time for the
deployment of a full first alarm assignment at a fire suppression
incident;
(c) Response time for the arrival of a unit with first responder or
higher level capability at an emergency medical incident; and
(d) Response time for the arrival of an advanced life support unit
at an emergency medical incident, where this service is provided by the
fire department.
(4) Every fire protection district and regional fire protection
service authority shall also establish a performance objective of not
less than ninety percent for the achievement of each response time
objective established under subsection (3) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 (1) Every fire protection district and
regional fire protection service authority shall evaluate its level of
service and deployment delivery and response time objectives on an
annual basis. The evaluations shall be based on data relating to level
of service, deployment, and the achievement of each response time
objective in each geographic area within the jurisdiction of the fire
protection district and regional fire protection service authority.
(2) Beginning in 2007, every fire protection district and regional
fire protection service authority shall issue an annual written report
which shall be based on the annual evaluations required by subsection
(1) of this section.
(a) The annual report shall define the geographic areas and
circumstances in which the requirements of this standard are not being
met.
(b) The annual report shall explain the predictable consequences of
any deficiencies and address the steps that are necessary to achieve
compliance.

PART IV - PORT DISTRICTS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 The legislature intends to set standards
for addressing the reporting and accountability of substantially career
fire departments, and to specify performance measures applicable to
response time objectives for certain major services. The legislature
acknowledges the efforts of the international city/county management
association, the international association of fire chiefs, and the
national fire protection association for the organization and
deployment of resources for fire departments. The arrival of first
responders with automatic external defibrillator capability before the
onset of brain death, and the arrival of adequate fire suppression
resources before flash-over is a critical event during the mitigation
of an emergency, and is in the public's best interest. For these
reasons, this chapter contains performance measures, comparable to that
research, relating to the organization and deployment of fire
suppression operations, emergency medical operations, and special
operations by substantially career fire departments. This chapter does
not, and is not intended to, in any way modify or limit the authority
of port districts to set levels of service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Advanced life support" means functional provision of advanced
airway management, including intubation, advanced cardiac monitoring,
manual defibrillation, establishment and maintenance of intravenous
access, and drug therapy.
(2) "Aircraft rescue and fire fighting" means the fire fighting
actions taken to rescue persons and to control or extinguish fire
involving or adjacent to aircraft on the ground.
(3) "Brain death" as defined by the American heart association
means the irreversible death of brain cells that begins four to six
minutes after cardiac arrest.
(4) "Fire department" means a port district fire department
responsible for fire fighting actions, emergency medical services, and
other special operations in a specified geographic area. The
department must be a substantially career fire department, and not a
substantially volunteer fire department.
(5) "Fire suppression" means the activities involved in controlling
and extinguishing fires.
(6) "First responder" means provision of initial assessment and
basic first-aid intervention, including cardiac pulmonary resuscitation
and automatic external defibrillator capability.
(7) "Flash-over" as defined by national institute of standards and
technology means when all combustibles in a room burst into flame and
the fire spreads rapidly.
(8) "Marine rescue and fire fighting" means the fire fighting
actions taken to prevent, control, or extinguish fire involved in or
adjacent to a marine vessel and the rescue actions for occupants using
normal and emergency routes for egress.
(9) "Port" means a port district that provides fire protection
services, which may include fire fighting actions, emergency medical
services, and other special operations, in a specified geographic area.
(10) "Response time" means the time immediately following the
turnout time that begins when units are en route to the emergency
incident and ends when units arrive at the scene.
(11) "Special operations" means those emergency incidents to which
the fire department responds that require specific and advanced
training and specialized tools and equipment.
(12) "Turnout time" means the time beginning when units receive
notification of the emergency to the beginning point of response time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 (1) Every port shall maintain a written
statement or policy that establishes the following:
(a) The existence of a fire department;
(b) Services that the fire department is required to provide;
(c) The basic organizational structure of the fire department;
(d) The expected number of fire department employees; and
(e) Functions that fire department employees are expected to
perform.
(2) Every port shall include service delivery objectives in the
written statement or policy required under subsection (1) of this
section. These objectives shall include specific response time
objectives for the following major service components, if appropriate:
(a) Fire suppression;
(b) Emergency medical services;
(c) Special operations;
(d) Aircraft rescue and fire fighting;
(e) Marine rescue and fire fighting; and
(f) Wild land fire fighting.
(3) Every port, in order to measure the ability to arrive and begin
mitigation operations before the critical events of brain death or
flash-over, shall establish time objectives for the following
measurements:
(a) Turnout time;
(b) Response time for the arrival of the first arriving engine
company at a fire suppression incident and response time for the
deployment of a full first alarm assignment at a fire suppression
incident;
(c) Response time for the arrival of a unit with first responder or
higher level capability at an emergency medical incident; and
(d) Response time for the arrival of an advanced life support unit
at an emergency medical incident, where this service is provided by the
fire department.
(4) Every port shall also establish a performance objective of not
less than ninety percent for the achievement of each response time
objective established under subsection (3) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 (1) Every port shall evaluate its level of
service and deployment delivery and response time objectives on an
annual basis. The evaluations shall be based on data relating to level
of service, deployment, and the achievement of each response time
objective in each geographic area within the port's jurisdiction.
(2) Beginning in 2007, every port shall issue an annual written
report which shall be based on the annual evaluations required by
subsection (1) of this section.
(a) The annual report shall define the geographic areas and
circumstances in which the requirements of this standard are not being
met.
(b) The annual report shall explain the predictable consequences of
any deficiencies and address the steps that are necessary to achieve
compliance.

PART V - MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 (1) Sections 101 through 104 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 35 RCW.
(2) Sections 201 through 204 of this act constitute a new chapter
in Title 35A RCW.
(3) Sections 301 through 304 of this act constitute a new chapter
in Title 52 RCW.
(4) Sections 401 through 404 of this act constitute a new chapter
in Title 53 RCW.

--- END ---