BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that many people visit
Washington state to watch orcas, the orca is a significant symbol for
the Native American culture, there are pods of orcas that migrate
annually through Puget Sound, and the orca is easily recognizable
because of its distinct markings. The legislature intends to promote
orca awareness and to encourage protection of the natural marine
habitat by designating the orca as the official marine mammal of the
state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The orca, Orcinus orca, is hereby designated as the official marine
mammal of the state of Washington.

--- END ---