BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that local governments
in the state of Washington face significant challenges in providing
services mandated by federal and state law, or desired by their
constituents. It is the intent of the legislature to provide ongoing
funding assistance to local governments to meet these challenges
without increasing the overall tax burden on the citizens of the state
of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The following sales and use taxes collected under chapters
82.08 and 82.12 RCW shall be deposited into the local government
assistance account created under subsection (3) of this section:
(a) 30.8 percent of taxes collected within a rural county with a
population less than one hundred thousand;
(b) 23.1 percent of taxes collected within a rural county with a
population of at least one hundred thousand, but less than two hundred
thousand;
(c) 15.4 percent of taxes collected within a rural county with a
population of at least two hundred thousand, but less than three
hundred thousand; and
(d) 15.4 percent of taxes collected within any county with a
population of at least four hundred thousand, but less than six hundred
thousand.
(2) "Rural county" for the purposes of this section shall have the
same meaning as in RCW 82.14.370.
(3) The local government assistance account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All taxes identified in subsection (1)
of this section shall be deposited into the account. The account is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for expenditures. The state treasurer shall
distribute monthly the money in the account as follows:
(a) One hundred percent of the money collected from taxable events
in the unincorporated areas of the county and fifteen percent of the
money collected from taxable events within any cities located within
the county shall be distributed to the county.
(b) Eighty-five percent of the money collected from taxable events
within the city shall be distributed to the city.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect August 1, 2005.

--- END ---