BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that excellent
teachers are the backbone of the state's education system. These
educators work tirelessly to give their students the academic skills
and knowledge necessary to be successful in life. They also exhibit a
passion for learning and a deep sense of caring for their students.
The legislature also finds that teachers spend four to six or more
years in college preparing to enter the classroom. Many teachers enter
the profession with master's degrees. In addition to having
baccalaureate or advanced degrees, by law new teachers and experienced
teachers from out-of-state are required to pass a basic skills test.
The legislature finds that the basic skills testing requirement is
duplicative, meaningless, a waste of time, a needless expense, and a
barrier to the recruitment of good educators.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.410.220 and 2002 c 92 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(((a) Beginning not later than September 1, 2001, the Washington
professional educator standards board shall make available and pilot a
means of assessing an applicant's knowledge in the basic skills. For
the purposes of this section, "basic skills" means the subjects of at
least reading, writing, and mathematics. Beginning September 1, 2002,
except as provided in (c) of this subsection and subsection (3) of this
section, passing this assessment shall be required for admission to
approved teacher preparation programs and for persons from out-of-state
applying for a Washington state residency teaching certificate.
(b) On an individual student basis, approved teacher preparation
programs may admit into their programs a candidate who has not achieved
the minimum basic skills assessment score established by the Washington
professional educator standards board. Individuals so admitted may not
receive residency certification without passing the basic skills
assessment under this section.
(c) The Washington professional educator standards board may
establish criteria to ensure that persons from out-of-state who are
applying for residency certification and persons applying to master's
degree level teacher preparation programs can demonstrate to the
board's satisfaction that they have the requisite basic skills based
upon having completed another basic skills assessment acceptable to the
Washington professional educator standards board or by some other
alternative approved by the Washington professional educator standards
board.
(2))) Beginning not later than September 1, 2002, the Washington
professional educator standards board shall provide for the initial
piloting and implementation of a means of assessing an applicant's
knowledge in the subjects for which the applicant has applied for an
endorsement to his or her residency or professional teaching
certificate. The assessment of subject knowledge shall not include
instructional methodology. Beginning September 1, 2005, passing this
assessment shall be required to receive an endorsement for
certification purposes.
(((3))) (2) The Washington professional educator standards board
may permit exceptions from the assessment requirements under
subsection((s)) (1) ((and (2))) of this section on a case-by-case
basis.
(((4))) (3) The Washington professional educator standards board
shall provide for reasonable accommodations for individuals who are
required to take the assessments in subsection (1) ((or (2))) of this
section if the individuals have learning or other disabilities.
(((5))) (4) With the exception of applicants exempt from the
requirements of subsection((s)) (1) ((and (2))) of this section, an
applicant must achieve a minimum assessment score or scores established
by the Washington professional educator standards board on each of the
assessments under subsection((s)) (1) ((and (2))) of this section.
(((6))) (5) The Washington professional educator standards board
and superintendent of public instruction, as determined by the
Washington professional educator standards board, may contract with one
or more third parties for:
(a) The development, purchase, administration, scoring, and
reporting of scores of the assessments established by the Washington
professional educator standards board under subsection((s)) (1) ((and
(2))) of this section;
(b) Related clerical and administrative activities; or
(c) Any combination of the purposes in this subsection.
(((7))) (6) Applicants for admission to a Washington teacher
preparation program and applicants for residency and professional
certificates who are required to successfully complete one or more of
the assessments under subsection((s)) (1) ((and (2))) of this section,
and who are charged a fee for the assessment by a third party
contracted with under subsection (((6))) (5) of this section, shall pay
the fee charged by the contractor directly to the contractor. Such
fees shall be reasonably related to the actual costs of the contractor
in providing the assessment.
(((8))) (7) The superintendent of public instruction is responsible
for supervision and providing support services to administer this
section.
(((9))) (8) The Washington professional educator standards board
shall collaboratively select or develop and implement the assessments
and minimum assessment scores required under this section with the
superintendent of public instruction and shall provide opportunities
for representatives of other interested educational organizations to
participate in the selection or development and implementation of such
assessments in a manner deemed appropriate by the Washington
professional educator standards board.
(((10))) (9) The Washington professional educator standards board
shall adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW that are reasonably necessary
for the effective and efficient implementation of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect August 1, 2005.

--- END ---