BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.74502 and 2001 c 35 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary of corrections, or an employee of the department
designated by the secretary, shall serve as the compact administrator
under article IV of RCW 9.94A.745, the interstate compact for adult
offender supervision. The legislature intends that the compact
administrator, representing the state on the interstate commission
created under article III of RCW 9.94A.745, will take an active role to
assure that the interstate compact operates to protect the safety of
the people and communities of the state.
(2) The compact administrator shall:
(a) Upon the approval of a petition from a compacting state to
transfer an adult offender to Washington, notify the local law
enforcement agency of the county where the offender intends to reside;
and
(b) Deny any petition for the transfer of an adult offender to
Washington from a compacting state if: (i) The county where the
offender intends to reside has already exceeded its fair share of such
offenders in the prior twenty-four months; (ii) the total number of
adult offenders transferring into the state that have been convicted of
an offense considered a most serious offense as defined in RCW
9.94A.030, whether in this state or elsewhere, exceeds the number it
has transferred to other states; or (iii) the total number of adult
offenders Washington has accepted supervision of exceeds the total
number it has transferred to other states.

--- END ---