BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.235.160 and 2004 c 54 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Free or reduced-price lunch" means a lunch served by a school
district participating in the national school lunch program to a
student qualifying for national school lunch program benefits based on
family size-income criteria.
(b) "School lunch program" means a meal program meeting the
requirements defined by the superintendent of public instruction under
subsection (((4))) (2)(b) of this section.
(c) "School breakfast program" means a program meeting federal
requirements defined in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1773.
(d) "Severe-need school" means a school that qualifies for a
severe-need school reimbursement rate from federal funds for school
breakfasts served to children from low-income families.
(e) "Summer food service program" means a meal or snack program
meeting the requirements defined by the superintendent of public
instruction under subsection (((5))) (4) of this section.
(2) School districts shall implement a school lunch program in each
public school in the district in which educational services are
provided to children in any of the grades kindergarten through four and
in which twenty-five percent or more of the enrolled students qualify
for a free or reduced-price lunch. In developing and implementing its
school lunch program, each school district may consult with an advisory
committee including school staff, community members, and others
appointed by the board of directors of the district.
(((3))) (a) Applications to determine free or reduced-price lunch
eligibility shall be distributed and collected for all households of
children in schools containing any of the grades kindergarten through
four and in which there are no United States department of agriculture
child nutrition programs. The applications that are collected must be
reviewed to determine eligibility for free or reduced-price lunches.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to require completion or
submission of the application by a parent or guardian.
(((4))) (b) Using the most current available school data on free
and reduced-price lunch eligibility, the superintendent of public
instruction shall adopt a schedule for implementation of school lunch
programs at each school required to offer such a program under
subsection (2) of this section as follows:
(((a))) (i) Schools not offering a school lunch program and in
which twenty-five percent or more of the enrolled students are eligible
for free or reduced-price lunch shall implement a school lunch program
not later than the second day of school in the 2005-06 school year and
in each school year thereafter.
(((b))) (ii) The superintendent shall establish minimum standards
defining the lunch meals to be served, and such standards must be
sufficient to qualify the meals for any available federal
reimbursement.
(((c))) (iii) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to
prevent a school from implementing a school lunch program earlier than
the school is required to do so.
(((5))) (3) Each school district shall implement a school breakfast
program in each school where more than forty percent of students
eligible to participate in the school lunch program qualify for free or
reduced-price meal reimbursement by the school year 2005-06. For the
second year before the implementation of the district's school
breakfast program, and for each subsequent school year, each school
district shall submit data enabling the superintendent of public
instruction to determine which schools within the district will qualify
for this requirement. Schools where lunch programs start after the
2003-04 school year, where forty percent of students qualify for free
or reduced-price meals, must begin school breakfast programs the second
year following the start of a lunch program.
(4) Each school district shall implement a summer food service
program in each public school in the district in which a summer program
of academic, enrichment, or remedial services is provided and in which
fifty percent or more of the children enrolled in the school qualify
for free or reduced-price lunch. However, the superintendent of public
instruction shall develop rules establishing criteria to permit an
exemption for a school that can demonstrate availability of an adequate
alternative summer feeding program. Sites providing meals should be
open to all children in the area, unless a compelling case can be made
to limit access to the program. The superintendent of public
instruction shall adopt a definition of compelling case and a schedule
for implementation as follows:
(a) Beginning the summer of 2005 if the school currently offers a
school breakfast or lunch program; or
(b) Beginning the summer following the school year during which a
school implements a school lunch program under subsection (((4)))
(2)(b) of this section.
(((6))) (5) Schools not offering a breakfast or lunch program may
meet the meal service requirements of subsections (2)(b) and (4) ((and
(5))) of this section through any of the following:
(a) Preparing the meals on-site;
(b) Receiving the meals from another school that participates in a
United States department of agriculture child nutrition program; or
(c) Contracting with a nonschool entity that is a licensed food
service establishment under RCW 69.07.010.
(((7))) (6) Requirements that school districts have a school lunch,
breakfast, or summer nutrition program under this section shall not
create or imply any state funding obligation for these costs. The
legislature does not intend to include these programs within the
state's obligation for basic education funding under Article IX of the
state Constitution.
(((8))) (7) The requirements in this section shall lapse if the
federal reimbursement for any school breakfasts, lunches, or summer
food service programs is eliminated.
(((9))) (8) School districts may be exempted from the requirements
of this section by showing good cause why they cannot comply with the
office of the superintendent of public instruction to the extent that
such exemption is not in conflict with federal or state law. The
process and criteria by which school districts are exempted shall be
developed by the office of the superintendent of public instruction in
consultation with representatives of school directors, school food
service, community-based organizations and the Washington state PTA.

Sec. 2 2004 c 54 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
The legislature recognizes that hunger and food insecurity are
serious problems in the state. Since the United States department of
agriculture began to collect data on hunger and food insecurity in
1995, Washington has been ranked each year within the top ((five)) ten
states with the highest levels of hunger. A significant number of
these households classified as hungry are families with children.
The legislature recognizes the correlation between adequate
nutrition and a child's development and school performance. This
problem can be greatly diminished through improved access to federal
nutrition programs.
The legislature also recognizes that improved access to federal
nutrition and assistance programs, such as the federal food stamp
program and child nutrition programs, can be a critical factor in
enabling recipients to gain the ability to support themselves and their
families. This is an important step towards self-sufficiency and
decreased long-term reliance on governmental assistance and will serve
to strengthen families in this state.

--- END ---