BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the medical risks
to the health of women as a result of obtaining an abortion makes it
necessary to clarify that only qualified health care personnel may
perform abortions or assist in performing abortions.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.02.110 and 1992 c 1 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
The state may not deny or interfere with a woman's right to choose
to have an abortion prior to viability of the fetus, or to protect her
life or health.
((A physician may terminate and a health care provider may assist
a physician in terminating a pregnancy as permitted by this section.))
A person who is not a health care provider may not perform an abortion.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.02.170 and 1992 c 1 s 8 are each amended to read as
follows:
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Viability" means the point in the pregnancy when, in the
judgment of the physician on the particular facts of the case before
such physician, there is a reasonable likelihood of the fetus's
sustained survival outside the uterus without the application of
extraordinary medical measures.
(2) "Abortion" means any medical treatment intended to induce the
termination of a pregnancy except for the purpose of producing a live
birth.
(3) "Pregnancy" means the reproductive process beginning with the
implantation of an embryo.
(4) "Physician" means a physician licensed to practice under
chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW in the state of Washington.
(5) "Health care provider" means a physician or ((a)) another
person ((acting under the general direction of a physician)) licensed
by this state under Title 18 RCW to provide health care services.
(6) "State" means the state of Washington and counties, cities,
towns, municipal corporations, and quasi-municipal corporations in the
state of Washington.
(7) "Private medical facility" means any medical facility that is
not owned or operated by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, morals, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes
effect immediately.

--- END ---