BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 31.45.060 and 2003 c 86 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A schedule of the fees and the charges for the cashing and
selling of checks, drafts, money orders, or other commercial paper
serving the same purpose shall be conspicuously and continuously posted
in every location licensed under this chapter. The licensee shall
provide to its customer a receipt for each transaction. The receipt
must include the name of the licensee, the type and amount of the
transaction, and the fee or fees charged for the transaction.
(2) Each licensee shall keep and maintain such business books,
accounts, and records as the director may require to fulfill the
purposes of this chapter, and shall provide the director with any data
required by the department for monitoring the business of check cashing
and selling in Washington state and reporting to the legislature.
Every licensee shall preserve such books, accounts, and records as
required in rule by the director for at least two years from the
completion of the transaction. Records may be maintained on an
electronic, magnetic, optical, or other storage media. However, the
licensee must maintain the necessary technology to permit access to the
records by the department for the period required under this chapter.
(3) A check, draft, or money order sold by a licensee shall be
drawn on an account of a licensee maintained in a federally insured
financial institution authorized to do business in the state of
Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 31.45 RCW
to read as follows:
The director shall annually provide a report to the legislature,
detailing statistics and trends of licensees, and including data
adequate to obtain an accurate understanding of the practices,
demographics, legal compliance, and profitability of all check cashers
and sellers licensed in Washington state. The report is due December
1st of each year, beginning in 2005.

--- END ---