BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Adverse action" has the same meaning as defined in the fair
credit reporting act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq. Adverse actions
include, but are not limited to the following:
(i) Cancellation, denial, or nonrenewal of homeowners' insurance
coverage;
(ii) Charging a higher insurance premium for homeowners' insurance
than would have been charged if the information from the consumer
reporting organization had been more favorable, whether the charge is
by any of the following:
(A) Application of a rating rule;
(B) Assignment to a rating tier that does not have the lowest
available rates; or
(C) Placement with an affiliate company that does not offer the
lowest rates available to the consumer within the affiliate group of
insurance companies; or
(iii) Any reduction, adverse, or unfavorable change in the terms of
coverage or amount of any homeowners' insurance due to information
received from a consumer reporting organization, including the
following:
(A) Coverage provided to the consumer is not as broad in scope as
coverage requested by the consumer but available to other insureds of
the insurer or any affiliate; or
(B) The consumer is not eligible for benefits such as dividends
that are available through affiliate insurers.
(b) "Affiliate" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
48.31B.005(1).
(c) "Consumer" means an individual policyholder or applicant for
insurance.
(d) "Consumer reporting organization" means an organization that
operates a data base, which is populated primarily by information
provided by insurance institutions.
(e) "Homeowners' insurance coverage" includes residential
homeowners', mobile homeowners', manufactured homeowners', condominium
owners', and renters' coverage.
(f) "Tier" means a category within a single insurer into which
insureds with substantially like insuring, risk or exposure factors,
and expense elements are placed for purposes of determining rate or
premium.
(2) When an insurer takes adverse action against an insured, the
insurer may consider the following only in combination with other
substantive underwriting factors: The fact that an individual has
previously inquired about the nature or scope of coverage under a
homeowners' insurance policy when:
(a) The information about this inquiry was received from the
insured's records or from a consumer reporting organization; and
(b) The inquiry did not result in the filing of a claim.

--- END ---