BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that prescription drug
errors occur because the pharmacist or nurse cannot read the
prescription from the physician or other provider with prescriptive
authority. The legislature further finds that legible prescriptions
can prevent these errors.

Sec. 2 RCW 69.41.010 and 2003 c 257 s 2 and 2003 c 140 s 11 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Administer" means the direct application of a legend drug
whether by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, to the
body of a patient or research subject by:
(a) A practitioner; or
(b) The patient or research subject at the direction of the
practitioner.
(2) "Community-based care settings" include: Community residential
programs for the developmentally disabled, certified by the department
of social and health services under chapter 71A.12 RCW; adult family
homes licensed under chapter 70.128 RCW; and boarding homes licensed
under chapter 18.20 RCW. Community-based care settings do not include
acute care or skilled nursing facilities.
(3) "Deliver" or "delivery" means the actual, constructive, or
attempted transfer from one person to another of a legend drug, whether
or not there is an agency relationship.
(4) "Department" means the department of health.
(5) "Dispense" means the interpretation of a prescription or order
for a legend drug and, pursuant to that prescription or order, the
proper selection, measuring, compounding, labeling, or packaging
necessary to prepare that prescription or order for delivery.
(6) "Dispenser" means a practitioner who dispenses.
(7) "Distribute" means to deliver other than by administering or
dispensing a legend drug.
(8) "Distributor" means a person who distributes.
(9) "Drug" means:
(a) Substances recognized as drugs in the official United States
pharmacopoeia, official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States,
or official national formulary, or any supplement to any of them;
(b) Substances intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation,
treatment, or prevention of disease in man or animals;
(c) Substances (other than food, minerals or vitamins) intended to
affect the structure or any function of the body of man or animals; and
(d) Substances intended for use as a component of any article
specified in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection. It does not include
devices or their components, parts, or accessories.
(10) "Electronic communication of prescription information" means
the communication of prescription information by computer, or the
transmission of an exact visual image of a prescription by facsimile,
or other electronic means for original prescription information or
prescription refill information for a legend drug between an authorized
practitioner and a pharmacy or the transfer of prescription information
for a legend drug from one pharmacy to another pharmacy.
(11) "In-home care settings" include an individual's place of
temporary and permanent residence, but does not include acute care or
skilled nursing facilities, and does not include community-based care
settings.
(12) "Legend drugs" means any drugs which are required by state law
or regulation of the state board of pharmacy to be dispensed on
prescription only or are restricted to use by practitioners only. A
prescription must be hand printed, typewritten, or electronically
generated.
(13) "Legible prescription" means a prescription or medication
order issued by a practitioner that is capable of being read and
understood by the pharmacist filling the prescription or the nurse or
other practitioner implementing the medication order.
(14) "Medication assistance" means assistance rendered by a
nonpractitioner to an individual residing in a community-based care
setting or in-home care setting to facilitate the individual's self-administration of a legend drug or controlled substance. It includes
reminding or coaching the individual, handing the medication container
to the individual, opening the individual's medication container, using
an enabler, or placing the medication in the individual's hand, and
such other means of medication assistance as defined by rule adopted by
the department. A nonpractitioner may help in the preparation of
legend drugs or controlled substances for self-administration where a
practitioner has determined and communicated orally or by written
direction that such medication preparation assistance is necessary and
appropriate. Medication assistance shall not include assistance with
intravenous medications or injectable medications, except prefilled
insulin syringes.
(15) "Person" means individual, corporation, government or
governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust,
partnership or association, or any other legal entity.
(16) "Practitioner" means:
(a) A physician under chapter 18.71 RCW, an osteopathic physician
or an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57 RCW, a
dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW, a podiatric physician and surgeon
under chapter 18.22 RCW, a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW, a
registered nurse, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or licensed
practical nurse under chapter 18.79 RCW, an optometrist under chapter
18.53 RCW who is certified by the optometry board under RCW 18.53.010,
an osteopathic physician assistant under chapter 18.57A RCW, a
physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW, a naturopath licensed
under chapter 18.36A RCW, a pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW, or,
when acting under the required supervision of a dentist licensed under
chapter 18.32 RCW, a dental hygienist licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;
(b) A pharmacy, hospital, or other institution licensed,
registered, or otherwise permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct
research with respect to, or to administer a legend drug in the course
of professional practice or research in this state; and
(c) A physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery or a
physician licensed to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery in any
state, or province of Canada, which shares a common border with the
state of Washington.
(17) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.

--- END ---