BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that professional
discipline is a critical function of ensuring quality health care for
the people of the state of Washington, and that an alternative
disciplinary process for some professions will strengthen that process.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.130.090 and 1993 c 367 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the disciplining authority determines, upon investigation,
that there is reason to believe a violation of RCW 18.130.180 has
occurred, a statement of charge or charges shall be prepared and served
upon the license holder or applicant at the earliest practical time.
The statement of charge or charges shall be accompanied by a notice
that the license holder or applicant may request a hearing to contest
the charge or charges.
(2) For license holders and applicants under chapter 18.71 or
18.71A RCW, the disciplining authority shall file the statement of
charges with the superior court in the county in which the license
holder provided the care or committed the act that is the subject of
the complaint. The license holder or applicant must file a request for
hearing with the superior court in which the statement of charges has
been filed within twenty days after being served the statement of
charges. If the twenty-day limit results in a hardship upon the
license holder or applicant, he or she may request for good cause an
extension not to exceed sixty additional days. If the superior court
finds that there is good cause, it shall grant the extension. The
failure to request a hearing constitutes a default, whereupon the
superior court may enter a decision on the basis of the facts available
to it. If a hearing is requested, the hearing shall be held pursuant
to section 4 of this act.
(3) For license holders and applicants not covered by subsection
(2) of this section, the license holder or applicant must file a
request for hearing with the disciplining authority within twenty days
after being served the statement of charges. If the twenty-day limit
results in a hardship upon the license holder or applicant, he or she
may request for good cause an extension not to exceed sixty additional
days. If the disciplining authority finds that there is good cause, it
shall grant the extension. The failure to request a hearing
constitutes a default, whereupon the disciplining authority may enter
a decision on the basis of the facts available to it.
(((2))) If a hearing is requested, the time of the hearing shall be
fixed by the disciplining authority as soon as convenient, but the
hearing shall not be held earlier than thirty days after service of the
charges upon the license holder or applicant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.130 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A complainant dissatisfied with the decision of the
disciplining authority regarding a license holder or applicant under
chapter 18.71 or 18.71A RCW may appeal that decision to the prosecuting
attorney in the county in which the license holder provided the care or
committed the act that is the subject of the complaint. If the
prosecuting attorney determines, upon investigation, that there is
reason to believe a violation of RCW 18.130.180 has occurred, a
statement of charge or charges shall be prepared and served upon the
license holder or applicant at the earliest practical time. The
statement of charge or charges shall be accompanied by a notice that
the license holder or applicant may request a hearing to contest the
charge or charges. The decision of the prosecuting attorney as to
filing charges is final and may not be appealed by the complainant or
disciplining authority in any forum.
(2) The prosecuting attorney shall file the statement of charges
with the superior court. The license holder or applicant must file a
request for hearing with the superior court in which the statement of
charges has been filed within twenty days after being served the
statement of charges. If the twenty-day limit results in a hardship
upon the license holder or applicant, he or she may request for good
cause an extension not to exceed sixty additional days. If the
superior court finds that there is good cause, it shall grant the
extension. The failure to request a hearing constitutes a default,
whereupon the superior court may enter a decision on the basis of the
facts available to it. If a hearing is requested, the hearing shall be
held pursuant to section 4 of this act.
(3) If the prosecuting attorney files a statement of charges, he or
she shall also serve as the disciplining authority as to the settlement
function in RCW 18.130.098. All settlements are subject to the
approval of the superior court in which the statement of charges was
filed pursuant to this section or RCW 18.130.090.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 18.130 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If a disciplinary authority under RCW 18.130.090 or a
prosecuting attorney under section 3 of this act files a statement of
charges in superior court, the superior court shall serve as the
disciplinary authority for purposes of RCW 18.130.160 and shall serve
as the hearing authority for purposes of RCW 18.130.170(1).
(2) The superior court shall hold hearings requested under RCW
18.130.090 or section 3 of this act in accordance with the civil and
related rules of the superior courts.
(3) The superior court shall grant an expedited hearing upon a
petition filed by:
(a) The disciplinary authority or county prosecutor on the grounds
of jeopardy to the health and safety of patients caused by delay; or
(b) The license holder on the grounds of undue prejudice caused by
delay.
(4) Appeals from the decision of the superior court are governed by
the court rules governing appeals in civil matters from the superior
courts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The supreme court may implement this act
through court rule.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect January 1, 2006.

--- END ---