BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.70.510 and 2004 c 145 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Health care institutions and medical facilities, other than
hospitals, that are licensed by the department, professional societies
or organizations, health care service contractors, health maintenance
organizations, health carriers approved pursuant to chapter 48.43 RCW,
and any other person or entity providing health care coverage under
chapter 48.42 RCW that is subject to the jurisdiction and regulation of
any state agency or any subdivision thereof may maintain a coordinated
quality improvement program for the improvement of the quality of
health care services rendered to patients and the identification and
prevention of medical malpractice as set forth in RCW 70.41.200.
(b) All such programs shall comply with the requirements of RCW
70.41.200(1) (a), (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), and (h) as modified to
reflect the structural organization of the institution, facility,
professional societies or organizations, health care service
contractors, health maintenance organizations, health carriers, or any
other person or entity providing health care coverage under chapter
48.42 RCW that is subject to the jurisdiction and regulation of any
state agency or any subdivision thereof, unless an alternative quality
improvement program substantially equivalent to RCW 70.41.200(1)(a) is
developed. All such programs, whether complying with the requirement
set forth in RCW 70.41.200(1)(a) or in the form of an alternative
program, must be approved by the department before the discovery
limitations provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section and the
exemption under RCW 42.17.310(1)(hh) and subsection (5) of this section
shall apply. In reviewing plans submitted by licensed entities that
are associated with physicians' offices, the department shall ensure
that the exemption under RCW 42.17.310(1)(hh) and the discovery
limitations of this section are applied only to information and
documents related specifically to quality improvement activities
undertaken by the licensed entity.
(2) Health care provider groups of five or more providers may
maintain a coordinated quality improvement program for the improvement
of the quality of health care services rendered to patients and the
identification and prevention of medical malpractice as set forth in
RCW 70.41.200. For purposes of this section, a health care provider
group may be a consortium of providers consisting of five or more
providers in total. All such programs shall comply with the
requirements of RCW 70.41.200(1) (a), (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), and (h)
as modified to reflect the structural organization of the health care
provider group. All such programs must be approved by the department
before the discovery limitations provided in subsections (3) and (4) of
this section and the exemption under RCW 42.17.310(1)(hh) and
subsection (5) of this section shall apply.
(3) Any person who, in substantial good faith, provides information
to further the purposes of the quality improvement and medical
malpractice prevention program or who, in substantial good faith,
participates on the quality improvement committee shall not be subject
to an action for civil damages or other relief as a result of such
activity. Any person or entity participating in a coordinated quality
improvement program that, in substantial good faith, shares information
or documents with one or more other programs, committees, or boards
under subsection (6) of this section is not subject to an action for
civil damages or other relief as a result of the activity or its
consequences. For the purposes of this section, sharing information is
presumed to be in substantial good faith. However, the presumption may
be rebutted upon a showing of clear, cogent, and convincing evidence
that the information shared was knowingly false or deliberately
misleading.
(4) Information and documents, including complaints and incident
reports, created specifically for, and collected, and maintained by a
quality improvement committee are not subject to discovery or
introduction into evidence in any civil action, and no person who was
in attendance at a meeting of such committee or who participated in the
creation, collection, or maintenance of information or documents
specifically for the committee shall be permitted or required to
testify in any civil action as to the content of such proceedings or
the documents and information prepared specifically for the committee.
This subsection does not preclude: (a) In any civil action, the
discovery of the identity of persons involved in the medical care that
is the basis of the civil action whose involvement was independent of
any quality improvement activity; (b) in any civil action, the
testimony of any person concerning the facts that form the basis for
the institution of such proceedings of which the person had personal
knowledge acquired independently of such proceedings; (c) in any civil
action by a health care provider regarding the restriction or
revocation of that individual's clinical or staff privileges,
introduction into evidence information collected and maintained by
quality improvement committees regarding such health care provider; (d)
in any civil action challenging the termination of a contract by a
state agency with any entity maintaining a coordinated quality
improvement program under this section if the termination was on the
basis of quality of care concerns, introduction into evidence of
information created, collected, or maintained by the quality
improvement committees of the subject entity, which may be under terms
of a protective order as specified by the court; (e) in any civil
action, disclosure of the fact that staff privileges were terminated or
restricted, including the specific restrictions imposed, if any and the
reasons for the restrictions; or (f) in any civil action, discovery and
introduction into evidence of the patient's medical records required by
rule of the department of health to be made regarding the care and
treatment received.
(5) Information and documents created specifically for, and
collected and maintained by a quality improvement committee are exempt
from disclosure under chapter 42.17 RCW.
(6) A coordinated quality improvement program may share information
and documents, including complaints and incident reports, created
specifically for, and collected and maintained by a quality improvement
committee or a peer review committee under RCW 4.24.250 with one or
more other coordinated quality improvement programs maintained in
accordance with this section or with RCW 70.41.200 or a peer review
committee under RCW 4.24.250, for the improvement of the quality of
health care services rendered to patients and the identification and
prevention of medical malpractice. The privacy protections of chapter
70.02 RCW and the federal health insurance portability and
accountability act of 1996 and its implementing regulations apply to
the sharing of individually identifiable patient information held by a
coordinated quality improvement program. Any rules necessary to
implement this section shall meet the requirements of applicable
federal and state privacy laws. Information and documents disclosed by
one coordinated quality improvement program to another coordinated
quality improvement program or a peer review committee under RCW
4.24.250 and any information and documents created or maintained as a
result of the sharing of information and documents shall not be subject
to the discovery process and confidentiality shall be respected as
required by subsection (4) of this section and RCW 4.24.250.
(7) The department of health shall adopt rules as are necessary to
implement this section.

--- END ---