BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.010 and 2004 c 153 s 406 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Selling price" includes "sales price." "Sales price" means
the total amount of consideration, except separately stated trade-in
property of like kind, including cash, credit, property, and services,
for which tangible personal property or services defined as a "retail
sale" under RCW 82.04.050 are sold, leased, or rented, valued in money,
whether received in money or otherwise. No deduction from the total
amount of consideration is allowed for the following: (a) The seller's
cost of the property sold; (b) the cost of materials used, labor or
service cost, interest, losses, all costs of transportation to the
seller, all taxes imposed on the seller, and any other expense of the
seller; (c) charges by the seller for any services necessary to
complete the sale, other than delivery and installation charges; (d)
delivery charges; (e) installation charges; and (f) the value of exempt
tangible personal property given to the purchaser where taxable and
exempt tangible personal property have been bundled together and sold
by the seller as a single product or piece of merchandise.
When tangible personal property is rented or leased under
circumstances that the consideration paid does not represent a
reasonable rental for the use of the articles so rented or leased, the
"selling price" shall be determined as nearly as possible according to
the value of such use at the places of use of similar products of like
quality and character under such rules as the department may prescribe.
"Selling price" or "sales price" does not include: Discounts,
including cash, term, or coupons that are not reimbursed by a third
party that are allowed by a seller and taken by a purchaser on a sale;
interest, financing, and carrying charges from credit extended on the
sale of tangible personal property or services, if the amount is
separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document
given to the purchaser; and any taxes legally imposed directly on the
consumer that are separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or
similar document given to the purchaser;
(2) "Seller" means every person, including the state and its
departments and institutions, making sales at retail or retail sales to
a buyer, purchaser, or consumer, whether as agent, broker, or
principal, except "seller" does not mean the state and its departments
and institutions when making sales to the state and its departments and
institutions;
(3) "Buyer," "purchaser," and "consumer" include, without limiting
the scope hereof, every individual, receiver, assignee, trustee in
bankruptcy, trust, estate, firm, copartnership, joint venture, club,
company, joint stock company, business trust, corporation, association,
society, or any group of individuals acting as a unit, whether mutual,
cooperative, fraternal, nonprofit, or otherwise, municipal corporation,
quasi municipal corporation, and also the state, its departments and
institutions and all political subdivisions thereof, irrespective of
the nature of the activities engaged in or functions performed, and
also the United States or any instrumentality thereof;
(4) "Delivery charges" means charges by the seller of personal
property or services for preparation and delivery to a location
designated by the purchaser of personal property or services including,
but not limited to, transportation, shipping, postage, handling,
crating, and packing;
(5) "Direct mail" means printed material delivered or distributed
by United States mail or other delivery service to a mass audience or
to addressees on a mailing list provided by the purchaser or at the
direction of the purchaser when the cost of the items are not billed
directly to the recipients. "Direct mail" includes tangible personal
property supplied directly or indirectly by the purchaser to the direct
mail seller for inclusion in the package containing the printed
material. "Direct mail" does not include multiple items of printed
material delivered to a single address;
(6) The meaning attributed in chapter 82.04 RCW to the terms "tax
year," "taxable year," "person," "company," "sale," "sale at retail,"
"retail sale," "sale at wholesale," "wholesale," "business," "engaging
in business," "cash discount," "successor," "consumer," "in this state"
and "within this state" shall apply equally to the provisions of this
chapter;
(((6))) (7) For the purposes of the taxes imposed under this
chapter and under chapter 82.12 RCW, "tangible personal property" means
personal property that can be seen, weighed, measured, felt, or
touched, or that is in any other manner perceptible to the senses.
Tangible personal property includes electricity, water, gas, steam, and
prewritten computer software.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax,
amounts derived from delivery charges made for the delivery of direct
mail if the charges are separately stated on an invoice or similar
billing document given to the purchaser.
(2) "Delivery charges" and "direct mail" have the same meanings as
in RCW 82.08.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to delivery charges
made for the delivery of direct mail if the charges are separately
stated on an invoice or similar billing document given to the
purchaser.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by this chapter does not apply to the value of
delivery charges made for the delivery of direct mail if the charges
are separately stated on an invoice or similar billing document given
to the purchaser.
(2) "Delivery charges" and "direct mail" have the same meanings as
in RCW 82.08.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---