BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.39A RCW
to read as follows:
For consumers who are medically needy, as defined in the social
security Title XIX state plan, and are receiving services through an
individual provider or a home care agency provider, if the provider is
not paid by the consumer in a timely fashion, the department of social
and health services shall pay the provider and take such steps as may
be necessary to collect the debt from the consumer.

--- END ---