BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.46.020 and 1999 c 1 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) ((Until January 1, 1999, every employer shall pay to each of
his or her employees who has reached the age of eighteen years wages at
a rate of not less than four dollars and ninety cents per hour.
(2) Beginning January 1, 1999, and until January 1, 2000, every
employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who has reached the
age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than five dollars and
seventy cents per hour.
(3))) Beginning January 1, 2000, and until January 1, 2001, every
employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who has reached the
age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than six dollars and
fifty cents per hour.
(((4))) (2)(a) Beginning on January 1, 2001, and each following
January 1st as set forth under (b) of this subsection, every employer
shall pay to each of his or her employees who has reached the age of
eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than the amount established
under (b) of this subsection.
(b) On September 30, 2000, and on each following September 30th,
the department of labor and industries shall calculate an adjusted
minimum wage rate to maintain employee purchasing power by increasing
the current year's minimum wage rate by the rate of inflation. The
adjusted minimum wage rate shall be calculated to the nearest cent
using the ((consumer price index for urban wage earners and clerical
workers, CPI-W, or a successor index, for the twelve months prior to
each September 1st as calculated by the United States department of
labor)) percentage change in the implicit price deflator for personal
consumption expenditures for the United States as published for the
most recent twelve-month period by the bureau of economic analysis of
the federal department of commerce in September of the same year in
which the department calculates the adjusted minimum wage rate. Each
adjusted minimum wage rate calculated under this subsection (((4)))
(2)(b) takes effect on the following January 1st.
(((5))) (3) The director shall by regulation establish the minimum
wage for employees under the age of eighteen years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---