BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that preserving a safe
and beneficial learning environment for all students requires the
establishment and enforcement of appropriate student discipline
policies. The legislature further finds that a school's culture and
climate determines the quality of interaction between staff, students,
and parents, and greatly affects the level of disciplinary activity
within a school. The legislature acknowledges that school district
boards of directors may find it necessary to employ school security
personnel or to rely upon school resource officers in order to preserve
a safe and beneficial learning environment within certain schools. The
legislature encourages schools and districts to consider school
discipline and security models in which counselors and
prevention/intervention specialists, along with school building
administrators and other school security personnel, if employed, and
school resource officers, if present, are trained and work as teams of
experts in diffusing anger, de-escalating conflict, and reducing
violent behavior within their schools.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.600
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this section apply throughout this section
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Physical restraint" means physical intervention or force used
to control a student, including the use of a restraint device.
(b) "Restraint device" means a device used to assist in controlling
a student including, but not limited to metal handcuffs, plastic ties,
ankle restraints, leather cuffs, other hospital-type restraints, pepper
spray, tasers, or batons.
(c) "School resource officer" means a commissioned law enforcement
officer who provides security and law enforcement services at one or
more public schools under the direction of a school building
administrator.
(d) "School security officer" means a person other than a
commissioned law enforcement officer who provides security services at
one or more public schools under the direction of a school building
administrator.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the use
of physical restraint in the public schools is limited to the use of
reasonable force under the following circumstances only:
(a) The person's behavior poses a threat of imminent, serious,
physical harm to self or to others; and
(b) Nonphysical interventions would not be effective in removing
the imminent threat of harm.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the use
of physical restraint in the common schools is prohibited in the
following circumstances:
(a) As a means of punishment; or
(b) As a disciplinary response to destruction of school property,
disruption of school or classroom order, noncompliance with a school
rule or staff directive, or communication of a verbal threat that does
not constitute a threat of imminent, serious, physical harm.
(4) This section does not prohibit:
(a) The use of physical restraint when such use is permitted or
required by and is consistent with a student's 504 plan or individual
education plan;
(b) The right of any individual to report to appropriate
authorities a crime committed by a student or other individual; or
(c) Commissioned law enforcement officers, including school
resource officers, or judicial authorities from exercising their
authority or executing their responsibilities, including the physical
detainment of a student or other person.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.400.110 and 1997 c 266 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
Within each school the school principal shall determine that
appropriate student discipline is established and enforced. In order
to assist the principal in carrying out the intent of this section, the
principal ((and)), the certificated employees, school security
officers, and school resource officers as defined in section 2 of this
act, in a school building shall confer at least annually in order to
develop and/or review building disciplinary standards and uniform
enforcement of those standards. Such building standards shall be
consistent with the provisions of RCW 28A.600.020(3).
School principals and certificated employees shall also confer
annually, to establish criteria for determining when certificated
employees must complete classes to improve classroom management skills.

--- END ---