BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Since their creation in 1989, the
research university branch campuses have significantly expanded access
to baccalaureate and graduate education for placebound students in
Washington's urban and metropolitan cities. Furthermore, the campuses
have contributed to community revitalization and economic development
in their regions. The campuses have met their overall mission through
the development of new degree programs and through collaboration with
community and technical colleges. These findings were confirmed by a
comprehensive review of the campuses by the Washington state institute
for public policy in 2002 and 2003, and reaffirmed through legislation
enacted in 2004 that directed four of the campuses to make
recommendations for their future evolution.
(2) The self-studies conducted by the University of Washington
Bothell, University of Washington Tacoma, Washington State University
Tri-Cities, and Washington State University Vancouver reflect
thoughtful and strategic planning and involved the input of numerous
students, faculty, community and business leaders, community colleges,
advisory committees, and board members. The higher education
coordinating board's careful review provides a statewide context for
the legislature to implement the next stage of the campuses.
(3) Concurrently, the higher education coordinating board has
developed a strategic master plan for higher education that sets a goal
of increasing the number of students who earn college degrees at all
levels: Associate, baccalaureate, and graduate. The strategic master
plan also sets a goal to increase the higher education system's
responsiveness to the state's economic needs.
(4) The legislature finds that to meet both of the master plan's
goals and to provide adequate educational opportunities for
Washington's citizens, additional access is needed to baccalaureate
degree programs. Expansion of the four campuses is one strategy for
achieving the desired outcomes of the master plan. Other strategies
must also be implemented through service delivery models that reflect
both regional demands and statewide priorities.
(5) Therefore, the legislature intends to increase baccalaureate
access and encourage economic development through overall expansion of
upper division capacity, continued development of two plus two programs
in some areas of the state, authorization of four-year university
programs in other areas of the state, and creation of new types of
baccalaureate programs on a pilot basis. These steps will make
significant progress toward achieving the master plan goals, but the
legislature will also continue to monitor the development of the higher
education system and evaluate what additional changes or expansion may
be necessary.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.45.014 and 2004 c 57 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The primary mission of the higher education branch campuses
created under this chapter remains to expand access to baccalaureate
and master's level graduate education in underserved urban areas of the
state in collaboration with community and technical colleges. The top
priority for each of the campuses is to expand courses and degree
programs for transfer and graduate students. New degree programs
should be driven by the educational needs and demands of students and
the community, as well as the economic development needs of local
businesses and employers.
(2) Branch campuses shall collaborate with the community and
technical colleges in their region to develop articulation agreements,
dual admissions policies, and other partnerships to ensure that branch
campuses serve as innovative models of a two plus two educational
system. Other possibilities for collaboration include but are not
limited to joint development of curricula and degree programs,
colocation of instruction, and arrangements to share faculty.
(3) In communities where a private postsecondary institution is
located, representatives of the private institution may be invited to
participate in the conversation about meeting the baccalaureate and
master's level graduate needs in underserved urban areas of the state.
(4) However, the legislature recognizes there are alternative
models for achieving this primary mission. Some campuses may have
additional missions in response to regional needs and demands. At
selected branch campuses, an innovative combination of instruction and
research targeted to support regional economic development may be
appropriate to meet the region's needs for both access and economic
viability. Other campuses should focus on becoming models of a two
plus two educational system through continuous improvement of
partnerships and agreements with community and technical colleges.
Still other campuses may be best suited to transition to a four-year
((comprehensive)) university or be removed from designation as a branch
campus entirely.
(5) ((It is the legislature's intent that each branch campus be
funded commensurate with its unique mission, the degree programs
offered, and the institutional combination of instruction and research,
but at a level less than a research university)) The legislature
recognizes that size, mix of degree programs, and proportion of lower
versus upper-division and graduate enrollments are factors that affect
costs at branch campuses. However over time, the legislature intends
that branch campuses be funded more similarly to regional universities.
(6) In consultation with the higher education coordinating board,
a branch campus may propose legislation to authorize practice-oriented
or professional doctoral programs if: (a) Unique research facilities
and equipment are located near the campus; or (b) the campus can
clearly demonstrate student and employer demand in the region that is
linked to regional economic development.
(7) It is not the legislature's intent to have each campus chart
its own future path without legislative guidance. Instead, the
legislature intends to consider carefully the mission and model of
education that best suits each campus and best meets the needs of
students, the community, and the region. The higher education
coordinating board shall monitor and evaluate the addition of lower
division students to the branch campuses and periodically report and
make recommendations to the higher education committees of the
legislature to ensure the campuses continue to follow the priorities
established under this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.45.020 and 1994 c 217 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The University of Washington is responsible for ensuring the
expansion of ((upper-division)) baccalaureate and graduate educational
programs in the central Puget Sound area under rules or guidelines
adopted by the higher education coordinating board. The University of
Washington shall meet that responsibility through the operation of at
least two branch campuses. One branch campus shall be located in the
Tacoma area. Another branch campus shall be collocated with Cascadia
Community College in the Bothell-Woodinville area.
(2) At the University of Washington Tacoma, a top priority is
expansion of upper division capacity for transfer students and graduate
capacity and programs. Beginning in the fall of 2006, the campus may
offer lower division courses linked to specific majors in fields not
addressed at local community colleges. The campus shall admit lower
division students through coadmission or coenrollment agreements with
a community college, or through direct transfer for students who have
accumulated approximately one year of credits. Direct admission of
freshmen and sophomores may proceed gradually and deliberately in
accordance with the campus plan submitted to the higher education
coordinating board in 2004.
(3) At the University of Washington Bothell, a top priority is
expansion of upper division capacity for transfer students and graduate
capacity and programs. The campus shall also seek additional
opportunities to collaborate with and maximize its collocation with
Cascadia Community College. Beginning in the fall of 2006, the campus
may offer lower division courses linked to specific majors in fields
not addressed at local community colleges. The campus may admit lower
division students through coadmission or coenrollment agreements with
a community college, or through direct transfer for students who have
accumulated approximately one year of credits. Direct admission of
freshmen and sophomores may proceed gradually and deliberately in
accordance with the campus plan submitted to the higher education
coordinating board in 2004.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.45.030 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 7 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Washington State University is responsible for providing
((upper-division)) baccalaureate and graduate level higher education
programs to the citizens of the Tri-Cities area, under rules or
guidelines adopted by the higher education coordinating board.
Washington State University shall meet that responsibility through the
operation of a branch campus in the Tri-Cities area. The branch campus
shall replace and supersede the Tri-Cities university center. All
land, facilities, equipment, and personnel of the Tri-Cities university
center shall be transferred from the University of Washington to
Washington State University.
(2) Washington State University Tri-Cities shall continue providing
innovative coadmission and coenrollment options with Columbia Basin
College, and expand its upper division capacity for transfer students
and graduate capacity and programs. The campus shall also seek
additional opportunities to collaborate with the Pacific Northwest
national laboratory. Beginning in the fall of 2006, the campus may
offer lower division courses linked to specific majors in fields not
addressed at local community colleges. The campus may admit lower
division students through coadmission or coenrollment agreements with
a community college, or through direct transfer for students who have
accumulated approximately one year of credits. Direct admission of
freshmen and sophomores for a bachelor's degree program in
biotechnology may proceed subject to approval by the higher education
coordinating board. The campus may not directly admit freshmen and
sophomores for degree programs other than biotechnology, however this
topic shall be the subject of further study and recommendations by the
higher education coordinating board.

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.45.040 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 7 s 5 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Washington State University is responsible for providing
((upper-division)) baccalaureate and graduate level higher education
programs to the citizens of the southwest Washington area, under rules
or guidelines adopted by the higher education coordinating board.
Washington State University shall meet that responsibility through the
operation of a branch campus in the southwest Washington area.
(2) Washington State University Vancouver shall expand upper
division capacity for transfer students and graduate capacity and
programs and continue to collaborate with local community colleges on
coadmission and coenrollment programs. In addition, beginning in the
fall of 2006, the campus may admit lower division students directly.
By simultaneously admitting freshmen and sophomores, increasing
transfer enrollment, coadmitting transfer students, and expanding
graduate and professional programs, the campus shall develop into a
four-year institution serving the southwest Washington region.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The college board shall select three pilot colleges to develop
and offer programs of study leading to an applied baccalaureate degree.
(2) Colleges may submit an application to become a pilot college
under this section. The college board shall review the applications
and select the pilot colleges using objective criteria, including:
(a) The college demonstrates the capacity to make a long-term
commitment of resources to build and sustain a high quality program;
(b) The college has or can readily engage faculty appropriately
qualified to develop and deliver a high quality curriculum at the
baccalaureate level;
(c) The college can demonstrate demand for the proposed program
from a sufficient number of students within its service area to make
the program cost-effective and feasible to operate;
(d) The college can demonstrate that employers demand the level of
technical training proposed within the program, making it cost-effective for students to seek the degree; and
(e) The proposed program fills a gap in options available for
students because it is not offered by a public four-year institution of
higher education in the college's geographic area.
(3) A college selected as a pilot college under this section may
develop the curriculum for and design and deliver courses leading to an
applied baccalaureate degree. However, degree programs developed under
this section are subject to approval by the college board under RCW
28B.50.090 and by the higher education coordinating board under RCW
28B.76.230 before a pilot college may enroll students in upper-division
courses. A pilot college may not enroll students in upper division
courses before the fall academic quarter of 2006.

Sec. 7 RCW 28B.50.020 and 1991 c 238 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
The purpose of this chapter is to provide for the dramatically
increasing number of students requiring high standards of education
either as a part of the continuing higher education program or for
occupational education and training, or for adult basic skills and
literacy education, by creating a new, independent system of community
and technical colleges which will:
(1) Offer an open door to every citizen, regardless of his or her
academic background or experience, at a cost normally within his or her
economic means;
(2) Ensure that each college district shall offer thoroughly
comprehensive educational, training and service programs to meet the
needs of both the communities and students served by combining high
standards of excellence in academic transfer courses; realistic and
practical courses in occupational education, both graded and ungraded;
community services of an educational, cultural, and recreational
nature; and adult education, including basic skills and general,
family, and work force literacy programs and services. However,
college districts containing only technical colleges shall maintain
programs solely for occupational education, basic skills, and literacy
purposes, and, for as long as a need exists, may continue those
programs, activities, and services offered by the technical colleges
during the twelve-month period preceding September 1, 1991;
(3) Provide for basic skills and literacy education, and
occupational education and technical training at technical colleges in
order to prepare students for careers in a competitive work force;
(4) Provide or coordinate related and supplemental instruction for
apprentices at community and technical colleges;
(5) Provide administration by state and local boards which will
avoid unnecessary duplication of facilities or programs; and which will
encourage efficiency in operation and creativity and imagination in
education, training and service to meet the needs of the community and
students;
(6) Allow for the growth, improvement, flexibility and modification
of the community colleges and their education, training and service
programs as future needs occur; and
(7) Establish firmly that, except on a pilot basis as provided
under section 6 of this act, community colleges are, for purposes of
academic training, two year institutions, and are an independent,
unique, and vital section of our state's higher education system,
separate from both the common school system and other institutions of
higher learning, and never to be considered for conversion into four-year liberal arts colleges.

Sec. 8 RCW 28B.50.030 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 33 are each
amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise, the
term:
(1) "System" shall mean the state system of community and technical
colleges, which shall be a system of higher education.
(2) "Board" shall mean the work force training and education
coordinating board.
(3) "College board" shall mean the state board for community and
technical colleges created by this chapter.
(4) "Director" shall mean the administrative director for the state
system of community and technical colleges.
(5) "District" shall mean any one of the community and technical
college districts created by this chapter.
(6) "Board of trustees" shall mean the local community and
technical college board of trustees established for each college
district within the state.
(7) "Occupational education" shall mean that education or training
that will prepare a student for employment that does not require a
baccalaureate degree, and education and training leading to an applied
baccalaureate degree.
(8) "K-12 system" shall mean the public school program including
kindergarten through the twelfth grade.
(9) "Common school board" shall mean a public school district board
of directors.
(10) "Community college" shall include those higher education
institutions that conduct education programs under RCW 28B.50.020.
(11) "Technical college" shall include those higher education
institutions with the sole mission of conducting occupational
education, basic skills, literacy programs, and offering on short
notice, when appropriate, programs that meet specific industry needs.
The programs of technical colleges shall include, but not be limited
to, continuous enrollment, competency-based instruction, industry-experienced faculty, curriculum integrating vocational and basic skills
education, and curriculum approved by representatives of employers and
labor. For purposes of this chapter, technical colleges shall include
Lake Washington Vocational-Technical Institute, Renton Vocational-Technical Institute, Bates Vocational-Technical Institute, Clover Park
Vocational Institute, and Bellingham Vocational-Technical Institute.
(12) "Adult education" shall mean all education or instruction,
including academic, vocational education or training, basic skills and
literacy training, and "occupational education" provided by public
educational institutions, including common school districts for persons
who are eighteen years of age and over or who hold a high school
diploma or certificate. However, "adult education" shall not include
academic education or instruction for persons under twenty-one years of
age who do not hold a high school degree or diploma and who are
attending a public high school for the sole purpose of obtaining a high
school diploma or certificate, nor shall "adult education" include
education or instruction provided by any four year public institution
of higher education.
(13) "Dislocated forest product worker" shall mean a forest
products worker who: (a)(i) Has been terminated or received notice of
termination from employment and is unlikely to return to employment in
the individual's principal occupation or previous industry because of
a diminishing demand for his or her skills in that occupation or
industry; or (ii) is self-employed and has been displaced from his or
her business because of the diminishing demand for the business'
services or goods; and (b) at the time of last separation from
employment, resided in or was employed in a rural natural resources
impact area.
(14) "Forest products worker" shall mean a worker in the forest
products industries affected by the reduction of forest fiber
enhancement, transportation, or production. The workers included
within this definition shall be determined by the employment security
department, but shall include workers employed in the industries
assigned the major group standard industrial classification codes "24"
and "26" and the industries involved in the harvesting and management
of logs, transportation of logs and wood products, processing of wood
products, and the manufacturing and distribution of wood processing and
logging equipment. The commissioner may adopt rules further
interpreting these definitions. For the purposes of this subsection,
"standard industrial classification code" means the code identified in
RCW 50.29.025(3).
(15) "Dislocated salmon fishing worker" means a finfish products
worker who: (a)(i) Has been terminated or received notice of
termination from employment and is unlikely to return to employment in
the individual's principal occupation or previous industry because of
a diminishing demand for his or her skills in that occupation or
industry; or (ii) is self-employed and has been displaced from his or
her business because of the diminishing demand for the business's
services or goods; and (b) at the time of last separation from
employment, resided in or was employed in a rural natural resources
impact area.
(16) "Salmon fishing worker" means a worker in the finfish industry
affected by 1994 or future salmon disasters. The workers included
within this definition shall be determined by the employment security
department, but shall include workers employed in the industries
involved in the commercial and recreational harvesting of finfish
including buying and processing finfish. The commissioner may adopt
rules further interpreting these definitions.
(17) "Rural natural resources impact area" means:
(a) A nonmetropolitan county, as defined by the 1990 decennial
census, that meets three of the five criteria set forth in subsection
(18) of this section;
(b) A nonmetropolitan county with a population of less than forty
thousand in the 1990 decennial census, that meets two of the five
criteria as set forth in subsection (18) of this section; or
(c) A nonurbanized area, as defined by the 1990 decennial census,
that is located in a metropolitan county that meets three of the five
criteria set forth in subsection (18) of this section.
(18) For the purposes of designating rural natural resources impact
areas, the following criteria shall be considered:
(a) A lumber and wood products employment location quotient at or
above the state average;
(b) A commercial salmon fishing employment location quotient at or
above the state average;
(c) Projected or actual direct lumber and wood products job losses
of one hundred positions or more;
(d) Projected or actual direct commercial salmon fishing job losses
of one hundred positions or more; and
(e) An unemployment rate twenty percent or more above the state
average. The counties that meet these criteria shall be determined by
the employment security department for the most recent year for which
data is available. For the purposes of administration of programs
under this chapter, the United States post office five-digit zip code
delivery areas will be used to determine residence status for
eligibility purposes. For the purpose of this definition, a zip code
delivery area of which any part is ten miles or more from an urbanized
area is considered nonurbanized. A zip code totally surrounded by zip
codes qualifying as nonurbanized under this definition is also
considered nonurbanized. The office of financial management shall make
available a zip code listing of the areas to all agencies and
organizations providing services under this chapter.
(19) "Applied baccalaureate degree" means a baccalaureate degree
awarded by a college under section 6 of this act for successful
completion of a program of study that is:
(a) Specifically designed for individuals who hold an associate of
applied science degree, or its equivalent, in order to maximize
application of their technical course credits toward the baccalaureate
degree; and
(b) Based on a curriculum that incorporates both theoretical and
applied knowledge and skills in a specific technical field.

Sec. 9 RCW 28B.50.140 and 2004 c 275 s 58 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each board of trustees:
(1) Shall operate all existing community and technical colleges in
its district;
(2) Shall create comprehensive programs of community and technical
college education and training and maintain an open-door policy in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 28B.50.090(3). However,
technical colleges, and college districts containing only technical
colleges, shall maintain programs solely for occupational education,
basic skills, and literacy purposes. For as long as a need exists,
technical colleges may continue those programs, activities, and
services they offered during the twelve-month period preceding
September 1, 1991;
(3) Shall employ for a period to be fixed by the board a college
president for each community and technical college and, may appoint a
president for the district, and fix their duties and compensation,
which may include elements other than salary. Compensation under this
subsection shall not affect but may supplement retirement, health care,
and other benefits that are otherwise applicable to the presidents as
state employees. The board shall also employ for a period to be fixed
by the board members of the faculty and such other administrative
officers and other employees as may be necessary or appropriate and fix
their salaries and duties. Compensation and salary increases under
this subsection shall not exceed the amount or percentage established
for those purposes in the state appropriations act by the legislature
as allocated to the board of trustees by the state board for community
and technical colleges. The state board for community and technical
colleges shall adopt rules defining the permissible elements of
compensation under this subsection;
(4) May establish, under the approval and direction of the college
board, new facilities as community needs and interests demand.
However, the authority of boards of trustees to purchase or lease major
off-campus facilities shall be subject to the approval of the higher
education coordinating board pursuant to RCW 28B.76.230;
(5) May establish or lease, operate, equip and maintain
dormitories, food service facilities, bookstores and other self-supporting facilities connected with the operation of the community and
technical college;
(6) May, with the approval of the college board, borrow money and
issue and sell revenue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness for the
construction, reconstruction, erection, equipping with permanent
fixtures, demolition and major alteration of buildings or other capital
assets, and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements,
improvements or appurtenances, for dormitories, food service
facilities, and other self-supporting facilities connected with the
operation of the community and technical college in accordance with the
provisions of RCW 28B.10.300 through 28B.10.330 where applicable;
(7) May establish fees and charges for the facilities authorized
hereunder, including reasonable rules and regulations for the
government thereof, not inconsistent with the rules ((and regulations))
of the college board; each board of trustees operating a community and
technical college may enter into agreements, subject to rules ((and
regulations)) of the college board, with owners of facilities to be
used for housing regarding the management, operation, and government of
such facilities, and any board entering into such an agreement may:
(a) Make rules ((and regulations)) for the government, management
and operation of such housing facilities deemed necessary or advisable;
and
(b) Employ necessary employees to govern, manage and operate the
same;
(8) May receive such gifts, grants, conveyances, devises and
bequests of real or personal property from private sources, as may be
made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, whenever the terms and
conditions thereof will aid in carrying out the community and technical
college programs as specified by law and the ((regulations)) rules of
the state college board; sell, lease or exchange, invest or expend the
same or the proceeds, rents, profits and income thereof according to
the terms and conditions thereof; and adopt ((regulations)) rules to
govern the receipt and expenditure of the proceeds, rents, profits and
income thereof;
(9) May establish and maintain night schools whenever in the
discretion of the board of trustees it is deemed advisable, and
authorize classrooms and other facilities to be used for summer or
night schools, or for public meetings and for any other uses consistent
with the use of such classrooms or facilities for community and
technical college purposes;
(10) May make rules ((and regulations)) for pedestrian and
vehicular traffic on property owned, operated, or maintained by the
district;
(11) Shall prescribe, with the assistance of the faculty, the
course of study in the various departments of the community and
technical college or colleges under its control, and publish such
catalogues and bulletins as may become necessary;
(12) May grant to every student, upon graduation or completion of
a course of study, a suitable diploma, ((nonbaccalaureate)) degree, or
certificate. Technical colleges shall offer only ((nonbaccalaureate))
technical degrees under the rules of the state board for community and
technical colleges that are appropriate to their work force education
and training mission. The primary purpose of ((this)) these degrees is
to lead the individual directly to employment in a specific occupation.
Technical colleges may not offer transfer degrees. Only pilot colleges
under section 6 of this act may award baccalaureate degrees. The
board, upon recommendation of the faculty, may also confer honorary
associate of arts degrees upon persons other than graduates of the
community college, in recognition of their learning or devotion to
education, literature, art, or science. No degree may be conferred in
consideration of the payment of money or the donation of any kind of
property;
(13) Shall enforce the rules ((and regulations)) prescribed by the
state board for community and technical colleges for the government of
community and technical colleges, students and teachers, and
((promulgate)) adopt such rules ((and regulations)) and perform all
other acts not inconsistent with law or rules ((and regulations)) of
the state board for community and technical colleges as the board of
trustees may in its discretion deem necessary or appropriate to the
administration of college districts: PROVIDED, That such rules ((and
regulations)) shall include, but not be limited to, rules ((and
regulations)) relating to housing, scholarships, conduct at the various
community and technical college facilities, and discipline: PROVIDED,
FURTHER, That the board of trustees may suspend or expel from community
and technical colleges students who refuse to obey any of the duly
((promulgated)) adopted rules ((and regulations));
(14) May, by written order filed in its office, delegate to the
president or district president any of the powers and duties vested in
or imposed upon it by this chapter. Such delegated powers and duties
may be exercised in the name of the district board;
(15) May perform such other activities consistent with this chapter
and not in conflict with the directives of the college board;
(16) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, may offer
educational services on a contractual basis other than the tuition and
fee basis set forth in chapter 28B.15 RCW for a special fee to private
or governmental entities, consistent with rules ((and regulations))
adopted by the state board for community and technical colleges:
PROVIDED, That the whole of such special fee shall go to the college
district and be not less than the full instructional costs of such
services including any salary increases authorized by the legislature
for community and technical college employees during the term of the
agreement: PROVIDED FURTHER, That enrollments generated hereunder
shall not be counted toward the official enrollment level of the
college district for state funding purposes;
(17) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, may offer
educational services on a contractual basis, charging tuition and fees
as set forth in chapter 28B.15 RCW, counting such enrollments for state
funding purposes, and may additionally charge a special supplemental
fee when necessary to cover the full instructional costs of such
services: PROVIDED, That such contracts shall be subject to review by
the state board for community and technical colleges and to such rules
as the state board may adopt for that purpose in order to assure that
the sum of the supplemental fee and the normal state funding shall not
exceed the projected total cost of offering the educational service:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That enrollments generated by courses offered on the
basis of contracts requiring payment of a share of the normal costs of
the course will be discounted to the percentage provided by the
college;
(18) Shall be authorized to pay dues to any association of trustees
that may be formed by the various boards of trustees; such association
may expend any or all of such funds to submit biennially, or more often
if necessary, to the governor and to the legislature, the
recommendations of the association regarding changes which would affect
the efficiency of such association;
(19) May participate in higher education centers and consortia that
involve any four-year public or independent college or university:
PROVIDED, That new degree programs or off-campus programs offered by a
four-year public or independent college or university in collaboration
with a community or technical college are subject to approval by the
higher education coordinating board under RCW 28B.76.230; and
(20) Shall perform any other duties and responsibilities imposed by
law or rule ((and regulation)) of the state board.

Sec. 10 RCW 28B.15.069 and 2003 c 232 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The building fee for each academic year shall be a percentage
of total tuition fees. This percentage shall be calculated by the
higher education coordinating board and be based on the actual
percentage the building fee is of total tuition for each tuition
category in the 1994-95 academic year, rounded up to the nearest half
percent.
(2) The governing boards of each institution of higher education,
except for the technical colleges, shall charge to and collect from
each student a services and activities fee. A governing board may
increase the existing fee annually, consistent with budgeting
procedures set forth in RCW 28B.15.045, by a percentage not to exceed
the annual percentage increase in student tuition fees for resident
undergraduate students: PROVIDED, That such percentage increase shall
not apply to that portion of the services and activities fee previously
committed to the repayment of bonded debt. These rate adjustments may
exceed the fiscal growth factor. For the 2003-04 academic year, the
services and activities fee shall be based upon the resident
undergraduate services and activities fee in 2002-03. The services and
activities fee committee provided for in RCW 28B.15.045 may initiate a
request to the governing board for a fee increase.
(3) Tuition and services and activities fees consistent with
subsection (2) of this section shall be set by the state board for
community and technical colleges for community college summer school
students unless the community college charges fees in accordance with
RCW 28B.15.515.
(4) Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, each governing
board of a community college may charge such fees for ungraded courses,
noncredit courses, community services courses, and self-supporting
courses as it, in its discretion, may determine, consistent with the
rules of the state board for community and technical colleges.
(5) The governing board of a college offering an applied
baccalaureate degree program under section 6 of this act may charge
tuition fees for those courses above the associate degree level at
rates consistent with rules adopted by the state board for community
and technical colleges, not to exceed tuition fee rates at the regional
universities.

Sec. 11 RCW 28B.76.230 and 2004 c 275 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall develop a comprehensive and ongoing assessment
process to analyze the need for additional degrees and programs,
additional off-campus centers and locations for degree programs, and
consolidation or elimination of programs by the four-year institutions.
(2) As part of the needs assessment process, the board shall
examine:
(a) Projections of student, employer, and community demand for
education and degrees, including liberal arts degrees, on a regional
and statewide basis;
(b) Current and projected degree programs and enrollment at public
and private institutions of higher education, by location and mode of
service delivery; and
(c) Data from the work force training and education coordinating
board and the state board for community and technical colleges on the
supply and demand for work force education and certificates and
associate degrees.
(3) Every two years the board shall produce, jointly with the state
board for community and technical colleges and the work force training
and education coordinating board, an assessment of the number and type
of higher education and training credentials required to match employer
demand for a skilled and educated work force. The assessment shall
include the number of forecasted net job openings at each level of
higher education and training and the number of credentials needed to
match the forecast of net job openings.
(4) The board shall determine whether certain major lines of study
or types of degrees, including applied degrees or research-oriented
degrees, shall be assigned uniquely to some institutions or
institutional sectors in order to create centers of excellence that
focus resources and expertise.
(5) The following activities are subject to approval by the board:
(a) New degree programs by a four-year institution;
(b) Creation of any off-campus program by a four-year institution;
(c) Purchase or lease of major off-campus facilities by a four-year
institution or a community or technical college;
(d) Creation of higher education centers and consortia; ((and))
(e) New degree programs and creation of off-campus programs by an
independent college or university in collaboration with a community or
technical college; and
(f) Applied baccalaureate degree programs developed by colleges
under section 6 of this act.
(6) Institutions seeking board approval under this section must
demonstrate that the proposal is justified by the needs assessment
developed under this section. Institutions must also demonstrate how
the proposals align with or implement the statewide strategic master
plan for higher education under RCW 28B.76.200.
(7) The board shall develop clear guidelines and objective
decision-making criteria regarding approval of proposals under this
section, which must include review and consultation with the
institution and other interested agencies and individuals.
(8) The board shall periodically recommend consolidation or
elimination of programs at the four-year institutions, based on the
needs assessment analysis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50
RCW to read as follows:
(1) One strategy to accomplish expansion of baccalaureate capacity
in underserved regions of the state is to allocate state funds for
student enrollment to a community and technical college and authorize
the college to enter into agreements with a regional university or
state college as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 or a branch campus under
chapter 28B.45 RCW, to offer baccalaureate degree programs.
(2) Subject to legislative appropriation for the purpose described
in this section, the college board shall select and allocate funds to
one community or technical college for the purpose of entering into an
agreement with one or more regional universities, branch campuses, or
the state college to offer baccalaureate degree programs on the college
campus.
(3) The college board shall select the community or technical
college based on analysis of gaps in service delivery, capacity, and
student and employer demand for programs. Before taking effect, the
agreement under this section must be approved by the higher education
coordinating board.
(4) Students enrolled in programs under this section are considered
students of the regional university, branch campus, or state college
for all purposes including tuition and reporting of state-funded
enrollments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) The legislature finds that access to
baccalaureate and graduate degree programs continues to be limited for
residents of North Snohomish, Island, and Skagit counties. Studies
conducted by the state board for community and technical colleges, the
higher education coordinating board, and the council of presidents
confirm that enrollment in higher education in this geographic region
lags enrollment in other parts of the state, particularly for upper
division courses leading to advanced degrees. The higher education
consortium created to serve the region has not been able to
successfully address the region's access needs. The university center
model of service delivery, centered on a community college campus with
a single point of accountability, has proven more effective in
developing degree programs and attracting students.
(2) Therefore the legislature intends to refocus the consortium by
assigning management and leadership responsibility for consortium
operations to Everett Community College. Everett Community College
shall collaborate with community and business leaders, other local
community colleges, the public four-year institutions of higher
education, and the higher education coordinating board to develop an
educational plan for the North Snohomish, Island, and Skagit county
region based on the university center model. The plan should provide
for projections of student enrollment demand, coordinated delivery of
lower and upper division courses, expanded availability of
baccalaureate degree programs and high demand degree and certificate
programs in the region, and a timeline and cost estimates for moving
the physical location of the consortium to the college campus. The
college shall submit preliminary recommendations to the higher
education and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 (1) The higher education coordinating board
shall define potential outcomes resulting from this act and develop
performance measures for those outcomes, including but not limited to
increased numbers of baccalaureate degrees awarded; expansion of upper
division and graduate capacity at the University of Washington Bothell
and Tacoma and Washington State University Tri-Cities and Vancouver;
enhanced regional access to baccalaureate programs; and creation and
award of applied baccalaureate degrees. The board shall provide a
progress report on the outcomes to the higher education committees of
the senate and the house of representatives by December 1, 2008.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2009.

--- END ---