BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that law enforcement
functions at state parks and lands are insufficient to adequately
protect the public and our natural resources. Threats to the safety of
the visiting public and public lands are not necessarily confined to
the boundaries of state parks and lands. State law does not expressly
grant or deny park rangers the authority to engage in law enforcement
activities outside of park and land boundaries. Further, the
legislature finds that, in many areas of the state, other state or
local law enforcement officers are either too far away or understaffed
to provide adequate support to on-site law enforcement professionals in
emergency situations. The legislature finds that a comprehensive
review of the role and responsibilities of law enforcement
professionals within and around state parks and lands is necessary to
ensure the value of state parks and natural resources is not
diminished.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The task force on state public
recreational lands and public safety is created. The task force shall
be comprised of eleven members appointed as follows:
(a) Two members of the house of representatives, one from each
major caucus, to be appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(b) Two members of the senate, one from each major caucus, to be
appointed by the president of the senate;
(c) The commissioner of public lands or his or her designee;
(d) The chair of the Washington state parks and recreation
commission or his or her designee;
(e) The chair of the Washington fish and wildlife commission or his
or her designee;
(f) Four members, to be appointed jointly by the speaker of the
house of representatives and the president of the senate, from
nominations submitted by the following organizations:
(i) One representative of the Washington association of sheriffs
and police chiefs;
(ii) One representative of the Washington state council of police
and sheriffs;
(iii) One representative park ranger who is an active member of the
recognized employee bargaining unit and who is employed by the
Washington state parks and recreation commission; and
(iv) One recognized employee representative of enforcement officers
with the department of natural resources.
(2) The task force members shall elect a chair and determine its
operating procedures. The task force shall be jointly staffed by the
office of program research and senate committee services as determined
by their respective staff directors.
(a) Legislative members of the task force shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(b) The compensable travel expenses as provided in (a) of this
subsection shall be paid jointly by the senate and the house of
representatives.
(3) This section expires January 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The task force shall conduct a comprehensive
review of law enforcement issues in and around state parks and lands,
including but not limited to:
(1) The extent to which illegal activity in and around state parks
and lands threatens public safety and natural resources; and
(2) The ability of the current state and local law enforcement to
respond to illegal activity on or near public recreational lands.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 By December 15, 2005, the task force shall
provide a final report of its recommendations, including any draft
legislation to implement the recommendations. The report shall be
submitted to the chief clerk of the house of representatives and the
secretary of the senate.

--- END ---