BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the participation
of the utilities and transportation commission or its staff in
settlement conferences that are not open to other parties undermines
the public faith in the commission and that it is in the public
interest to require the commission and its staff to ensure that such
settlement conferences are open to all parties appearing in the
proceeding. Further, it is the intent of the legislature that
nonsettling parties' due process rights be protected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 80.01 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Commission" means the utilities and transportation commission.
(2) "Commission staff" means the commission regulatory staff that
functions as a party in adjudicatory proceedings and performs
investigative, prosecutorial, and advocacy functions independently from
the commission functioning in its decision-making role.
(3) "Party" means a person who has complied with all requirements
for establishing and maintaining party status in a proceeding before
the commission, including applicants, complainants, petitioners,
respondents, intervenors, or protestants, according to the nature of
the proceeding and the nature of the parties.
(4) "Settlement" means an agreement among two or more parties to a
proceeding that is filed with the commission as a proposed resolution
of one or more issues.
(5) "Settlement conference" means a meeting called to discuss
resolution of issues in a proceeding. Examples of communications not
constituting settlement conferences include, but are not limited to,
communications primarily for the purpose of discovery, and
communications occurring before initiation of docketed proceedings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 80.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commission and commission staff may not participate in
settlement conferences in an adjudicative proceeding without prior
notification to other parties. Ten calendar days before a settlement
conference with a party, the commission staff shall notify the
administrative law judge and all parties on the master service list of
the proposed settlement conference and shall file, with the secretary,
a notice of the impending negotiation. If a prehearing conference has
not yet been held in the case, notice shall be sent to all persons who
regularly appear before the commission in similar adjudicative
proceedings.
(2) The notice shall contain a general description of the issues
and a certification that all appropriate persons and parties are being
notified. The administrative law judge assigned to the case shall
review the notice to ensure all persons who reasonably should have been
notified have been notified, and he or she may take any action
necessary to protect the rights of persons participating or desiring to
participate. The administrative law judge shall report the results of
the procedural review to the commission.
(3) Any party given notice under subsection (1) of this section may
attend a settlement conference. Additional notice of continuing
settlement conferences involving the same issue need only be provided
to parties attending the initial conference, or who have requested
continuing notice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 80.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a nonunanimous settlement has been presented to the
commission, the nonsettling parties retain the right to conduct
discovery, present evidence, a hearing, cross-examine witnesses, and
present arguments on all disputed material issues of fact and law. The
commission's final order shall be based upon substantial evidence in
the record and shall include findings and conclusions on all disputed
issues of fact, law, or discretion presented on the record.
(2) If a nonunanimous settlement or stipulation is presented to the
commission, the commission may not deny nonsettling parties the
procedural rights set forth in subsection (1) of this section by
dismissing them as parties or restricting their participation in the
proceeding.

--- END ---