BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.52.010 and 1998 c 7 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Agency" means any state board, commission, bureau, committee,
department, institution, division, or tribunal in the legislative,
executive, or judicial branch of state government. "Agency" includes
all elective offices, the state legislature, those institutions of
higher education created and supported by the state government, and
those courts that are parts of state government.
(2) "Head of agency" means the chief executive officer of an
agency. In the case of an agency headed by a commission, board,
committee, or other body consisting of more than one natural person,
agency head means the person or board authorized to appoint agency
employees and regulate their conduct.
(3) "Assist" means to act, or offer or agree to act, in such a way
as to help, aid, advise, furnish information to, or otherwise provide
assistance to another person, believing that the action is of help,
aid, advice, or assistance to the person and with intent so to assist
such person.
(4) "Beneficial interest" has the meaning ascribed to it under the
Washington case law. However, an ownership interest in a mutual fund
or similar investment pooling fund in which the owner has no management
powers does not constitute a beneficial interest in the entities in
which the fund or pool invests.
(5) "Compensation" means anything of economic value, however
designated, that is paid, loaned, granted, or transferred, or to be
paid, loaned, granted, or transferred for, or in consideration of,
personal services to any person.
(6) "Confidential information" means (a) specific information,
rather than generalized knowledge, that is not available to the general
public on request or (b) information made confidential by law.
(7) "Contract" or "grant" means an agreement between two or more
persons that creates an obligation to do or not to do a particular
thing. "Contract" or "grant" includes, but is not limited to, an
employment contract, a lease, a license, a purchase agreement, or a
sales agreement.
(8) "Ethics boards" means the commission on judicial conduct, the
legislative ethics board, and the executive ethics board.
(9) "Family" has the same meaning as "immediate family" in RCW
42.17.020.
(10) "Gift" means anything of economic value for which no
consideration is given. "Gift" does not include:
(a) Items from family members or friends where it is clear beyond
a reasonable doubt that the gift was not made as part of any design to
gain or maintain influence in the agency of which the recipient is an
officer or employee;
(b) Items related to the outside business of the recipient that are
customary and not related to the recipient's performance of official
duties;
(c) Items exchanged among officials and employees or a social event
hosted or sponsored by a state officer or state employee for coworkers;
(d) Payments by a governmental or nongovernmental entity of
reasonable expenses incurred in connection with a speech, presentation,
appearance, or trade mission made in an official capacity. As used in
this subsection, "reasonable expenses" are limited to travel, lodging,
and subsistence expenses incurred the day before through the day after
the event;
(e) Items a state officer or state employee is authorized by law to
accept;
(f) Payment of enrollment and course fees and reasonable travel
expenses attributable to attending seminars and educational programs
sponsored by a bona fide governmental or nonprofit professional,
educational, trade, or charitable association or institution. As used
in this subsection, "reasonable expenses" are limited to travel,
lodging, and subsistence expenses incurred the day before through the
day after the event;
(g) Items returned by the recipient to the donor within thirty days
of receipt or donated to a charitable organization within thirty days
of receipt;
(h) Campaign contributions reported under chapter 42.17 RCW;
(i) Discounts available to an individual as a member of an employee
group, occupation, or similar broad-based group; and
(j) Awards, prizes, scholarships, or other items provided in
recognition of academic or scientific achievement.
(11) "Honorarium" means money or thing of value offered to a state
officer or state employee for a speech, appearance, article, or similar
item or activity in connection with the state officer's or state
employee's official role.
(12) "Official duty" means those duties within the specific scope
of employment of the state officer or state employee as defined by the
officer's or employee's agency or by statute or the state Constitution.
(13) "Participate" means to participate in state action or a
proceeding personally and substantially as a state officer or state
employee, through approval, disapproval, decision, recommendation, the
rendering of advice, investigation, or otherwise but does not include
preparation, consideration, or enactment of legislation or the
performance of legislative duties.
(14) "Person" means any individual, partnership, association,
corporation, firm, institution, or other entity, whether or not
operated for profit.
(15) "Regulatory agency" means any state board, commission,
department, or officer, except those in the legislative or judicial
branches, authorized by law to conduct adjudicative proceedings, issue
permits or licenses, or to control or affect interests of identified
persons.
(16) "Responsibility" in connection with a transaction involving
the state, means the direct administrative or operating authority,
whether intermediate or final, and either exercisable alone or through
subordinates, effectively to approve, disapprove, or otherwise direct
state action in respect of such transaction.
(17) "State action" means any action on the part of an agency,
including, but not limited to:
(a) A decision, determination, finding, ruling, or order; and
(b) A grant, payment, award, license, contract, transaction,
sanction, or approval, or the denial thereof, or failure to act with
respect to a decision, determination, finding, ruling, or order.
(18) "State officer" means every person holding a position of
public trust in or under an executive, legislative, or judicial office
of the state. "State officer" includes judges of the superior court,
judges of the court of appeals, justices of the supreme court, members
of the legislature together with the secretary of the senate and the
chief clerk of the house of representatives, holders of elective
offices in the executive branch of state government, chief executive
officers of state agencies, members of boards, commissions, or
committees with authority over one or more state agencies or
institutions, and employees of the state who are engaged in
supervisory, policy-making, or policy-enforcing work. For the purposes
of this chapter, "state officer" also includes any person exercising or
undertaking to exercise the powers or functions of a state officer.
(19) "State employee" means an individual who is employed by an
agency in any branch of state government. For purposes of this
chapter, employees of the superior courts are not state officers or
state employees.
(20) "University" includes "state universities" and "regional
universities" as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 and also includes any
research or technology institute affiliated with a university,
including without limitation, the Spokane Intercollegiate Research and
Technology Institute and the Washington Technology Center.
(21) "University research employee" means a state officer or state
employee employed by a university, but only to the extent the state
officer or state employee is engaged in research, technology transfer,
approved consulting activities related to research and technology
transfer, or other incidental activities.
(22) "Thing of economic value," in addition to its ordinary
meaning, includes:
(a) A loan, property interest, interest in a contract or other
chose in action, and employment or another arrangement involving a
right to compensation;
(b) An option, irrespective of the conditions to the exercise of
the option; and
(c) A promise or undertaking for the present or future delivery or
procurement.
(((21))) (23)(a) "Transaction involving the state" means a
proceeding, application, submission, request for a ruling or other
determination, contract, claim, case, or other similar matter that the
state officer, state employee, or former state officer or state
employee in question believes, or has reason to believe:
(i) Is, or will be, the subject of state action; or
(ii) Is one to which the state is or will be a party; or
(iii) Is one in which the state has a direct and substantial
proprietary interest.
(b) "Transaction involving the state" does not include the
following: Preparation, consideration, or enactment of legislation,
including appropriation of moneys in a budget, or the performance of
legislative duties by an officer or employee; or a claim, case,
lawsuit, or similar matter if the officer or employee did not
participate in the underlying transaction involving the state that is
the basis for the claim, case, or lawsuit.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.52.030 and 1996 c 213 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No state officer or state employee, except as provided in
subsection((s)) (2) ((and (3))) of this section, may be beneficially
interested, directly or indirectly, in a contract, sale, lease,
purchase, or grant that may be made by, through, or is under the
supervision of the officer or employee, in whole or in part, or accept,
directly or indirectly, any compensation, gratuity, or reward from any
other person beneficially interested in the contract, sale, lease,
purchase, or grant.
(2) ((No officer or employee of an institution of higher education
or of the Spokane intercollegiate research and technology institute,
except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, may be
beneficially interested, directly or indirectly, in a contract or grant
that may be made by, through, or is under the supervision of the
officer or employee, in whole or in part, or accept, directly or
indirectly, any compensation, gratuity, or reward from any other person
beneficially interested in the contract or grant, unless the
institution of higher education or the Spokane intercollegiate research
and technology institute has in effect a written administrative process
to identify and manage, reduce, or eliminate conflicting interests with
respect to such transactions as adopted pursuant to the national
science investigator financial disclosure (GPM 510) 1995 and the public
health service regulations, 42 C.F.R. Part 50 and 45 C.F.R. Subtitle A
as each of those regulations existed on June 6, 1996, and the state
employee or state officer has complied with such policy.
(3))) No state officer or state employee may participate in a
transaction involving the state in his or her official capacity with a
person of which the officer or employee is an officer, agent, employee,
or member, or in which the officer or employee owns a beneficial
interest, except that an officer or employee of an institution of
higher education or the Spokane intercollegiate research and technology
institute may serve as an officer, agent, employee, or member, or on
the board of directors, board of trustees, advisory board, or committee
or review panel for any nonprofit institute, foundation, or fundraising
entity; and may serve as a member of an advisory board, committee, or
review panel for a governmental or other nonprofit entity.

Sec. 3 RCW 42.52.200 and 1994 c 154 s 120 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each agency may adopt rules consistent with law, for use within
the agency to protect against violations of this chapter.
(2) Each agency proposing to adopt rules under this section shall
forward the rules to the appropriate ethics board before they may take
effect. The board may submit comments to the agency regarding the
proposed rules.
(3) This section applies to universities only to the extent their
activities are not subject to section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 42.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Consistent with the state policy to encourage basic and applied
scientific research by the state's research universities as stated in
RCW 28B.140.005, each university may develop, adopt, and implement one
or more written administrative processes that shall, upon approval by
the governor, apply in place of the obligations imposed on universities
and university research employees under RCW 42.52.030, 42.52.040,
42.52.080, 42.52.110, 42.52.120, 42.52.130, 42.52.140, 42.52.150, and
42.52.160. The universities shall coordinate on the development of
administrative processes to ensure the processes are comparable. A
university research employee in compliance with the processes
authorized in this section shall be deemed to be in compliance with RCW
42.52.030, 42.52.040, 42.52.080, 42.52.110, 42.52.120, 42.52.130,
42.52.140, 42.52.150, and 42.52.160.
(2) The executive ethics board shall enforce activity subject to
the written approval processes under this section, as provided in RCW
42.52.360.

Sec. 5 RCW 42.52.360 and 1994 c 154 s 206 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The executive ethics board shall enforce this chapter and rules
adopted under it with respect to statewide elected officers and all
other officers and employees in the executive branch, boards and
commissions, and institutions of higher education.
(2) The executive ethics board shall enforce this chapter with
regard to the activities of university research employees as provided
in this subsection.
(a) With respect to compliance with RCW 42.52.030, 42.52.110,
42.52.130, 42.52.140, and 42.52.150, the administrative process shall
be consistent with and adhere to no less than the current standards in
regulations of the United States public health service and the office
of the secretary of the department of health and human services in
Title 42 C.F.R. Part 50, Subpart F relating to promotion of objectivity
in research.
(b) With respect to compliance with RCW 42.52.040, 42.52.080, and
42.52.120, the administrative process shall include a comprehensive
system for the disclosure, review, and approval of outside work
activities by university research employees while assuring that such
employees are fulfilling their employment obligations to the
university.
(c) With respect to compliance with RCW 42.52.160, the
administrative process shall include a reasonable determination by the
university of acceptable private uses having de minimis costs to the
university and a method for establishing fair and reasonable
reimbursement charges for private uses the costs of which are in excess
of de minimis.
(3) The executive ethics board shall:
(a) Develop educational materials and training;
(b) Adopt rules and policies governing the conduct of business by
the board, and adopt rules defining working hours for purposes of RCW
42.52.180 and where otherwise authorized under chapter 154, Laws of
1994;
(c) Issue advisory opinions;
(d) Investigate, hear, and determine complaints by any person or on
its own motion;
(e) Impose sanctions including reprimands and monetary penalties;
(f) Recommend to the appropriate authorities suspension, removal
from position, prosecution, or other appropriate remedy; and
(g) Establish criteria regarding the levels of civil penalties
appropriate for violations of this chapter and rules adopted under it.
(((3))) (4) The board may:
(a) Issue subpoenas for the attendance and testimony of witnesses
and the production of documentary evidence relating to any matter under
examination by the board or involved in any hearing;
(b) Administer oaths and affirmations;
(c) Examine witnesses; and
(d) Receive evidence.
(((4))) (5) Except as provided in section 4 of this act, the
executive ethics board may review and approve agency policies as
provided for in this chapter.
(((5))) (6) This section does not apply to state officers and state
employees of the judicial branch.

--- END ---