BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the board of governors created under section 4 of
this act.
(2) "Claim" means a demand for payment of a loss caused by medical
malpractice.
(a) Two or more claims arising out of a single injury or incident
of medical malpractice is one claim.
(b) A series of related incidents of medical malpractice is one
claim.
(3) "Claimant" means a person filing a claim against a health care
provider or health care facility.
(4) "Commissioner" means the insurance commissioner.
(5) "Department" means the department of health.
(6) "Health care facility" or "facility" means a clinic, diagnostic
center, hospital, laboratory, mental health center, nursing home,
office, surgical facility, treatment facility, or similar place where
a health care provider provides health care to patients.
(7) "Health care provider" or "provider" means a person regulated
under Title 18 RCW or chapter 70.127 RCW, to practice health or health-related services or otherwise practicing health care services in this
state consistent with state law; or an employee or agent of a person
described in this subsection, acting in the course and scope of his or
her employment.
(8) "Medical malpractice" means a negligent act, error, or omission
in providing or failing to provide professional health care services.
(9) "Program" means the supplemental malpractice insurance program
created under section 2 of this act.
(10) "Retained limit" means the dollar amount of loss retained by
a facility or provider. A provider or facility may finance claim
payments that fall within a retained limit by self-insuring or buying
insurance from an insuring entity. Under this chapter, the amount of
a retained limit means:
(a) If the facility or provider bought insurance from an insuring
entity, the higher of:
(i) The retained limits required under section 13 of this act; or
(ii) Alternative higher limits of underlying coverage purchased by
the facility or provider; or
(b) If a provider or facility self-insured medical malpractice
claims, the higher of:
(i) The retained limits required under section 13 of this act; or
(ii) Alternative higher retained limits selected by a facility or
provider as part of its risk financing program.
(11) "Tail coverage" means extended reporting period coverage.
(12) "Underlying insurance" means any liability insurance policy
that provides primary or excess liability insurance coverage for
medical malpractice claims.
(13) "Rate relief" means using appropriated funds to reduce the
premium of a high-risk provider or facility as identified by the board
under section 4 of this act.
(14) "High-risk provider or facility" is to be determined by the
board under section 5 of this act.
(15) "Premium discount" means premium reduction for providers or
facilities to be determined by the board under section 5 of this act.
(16) "Proven patient safety measures" includes programs,
activities, or training undertaken by providers or facilities to reduce
potential loss due to medical malpractice as defined in this section.
(17) "Patient safety discounts" means annual premium discounts for
providers or facilities under section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A supplemental malpractice insurance
program is created to provide an excess layer of liability coverage for
medical malpractice claims. Subject to subsection (2) of this section,
the program pays claims and related defense costs on behalf of a
covered health care facility or provider if the claim is first made
against the facility or provider:
(a) After 12:01 a.m. on January 1, 2005; or
(b) On or after the effective date of coverage under the program,
if later than 12:01 a.m. on January 1, 2005.
(2) The program shall not pay claims:
(a) That the board excludes from coverage when it establishes
coverage specifications under section 5(1)(b) of this act;
(b) That fall within the applicable retained limits, subject to
subsection (3) of this section;
(c) That exceed the limits of liability coverage purchased by the
facility or provider as described in section 15 of this act;
(d) That result from a provider or employee operating a motor
vehicle;
(e) That result from an intentional crime, as defined in RCW
7.69.020(1). This exclusion applies whether or not the criminal
conduct is the basis for a medical malpractice claim;
(f) Made against an employee of a covered provider or facility if
the employee:
(i) Acts outside the scope of his or her employment; or
(ii) Provides health care services without the collaboration,
direction, or supervision of a covered provider; or
(g) Made against a partnership or professional corporation
organized by health care providers, if the board determines that it is
not the primary purpose of the partnership or corporation to provide
the health care services. For the purposes of this subsection, if
fifty percent or more of the partners, owners, or shareholders are
health care providers, the board must determine that it is the entity's
primary purpose to provide health care services.
(3) If an aggregate limit of underlying insurance purchased from an
insuring entity is exhausted due to claim payments, the program shall
pay claims that fall within the retained limit. This subsection does
not:
(a) Increase the limits of liability provided by the program; or
(b) Apply to self-insurers qualified under section 11 of this act.
(4) The obligation of the program to pay related defense costs
under subsection (1) of this section ends when the program pays the
applicable limit of liability purchased by the facility or provider.
(5)(a) To obtain coverage under the program for a medical
malpractice claim, a facility or provider must provide documentation to
the program of the insurance or self-insurance program in effect at the
time the incident occurred and meet the other requirements of this
chapter.
(b) All medical malpractice liability insurance purchased by a
facility or provider that is applicable to a claim covered by the
program must be paid before the program provides coverage, even if the
insurance limits exceed the retained limits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The program has the general corporate
powers and authority granted under the laws of Washington state.
(2) The program is not an insurer as defined in RCW 48.01.050, and
is exempt from filing:
(a) Forms under RCW 48.18.100 and 48.18.103; and
(b) Rates, except as provided under section 19 of this act.
(3) The program is a separate and distinct legal entity. Liability
or a cause of action may not arise against the following for any acts
or omissions made in good faith while performing their duties under
this chapter:
(a) The program or any member of the board;
(b) The commissioner, any of the commissioner's staff, or any
authorized representative of the commissioner;
(c) The secretary of the department, any of the department's staff,
or any authorized representative of the secretary;
(d) Any person or entity, its agents or employees, reporting data
required by sections 22, 23, and 24 of this act.
(4) The program is not a state agency.
(a) The state is not liable for any debts or obligations of the
program.
(b) The legislature may appropriate money at its discretion for
deposit into the program.
(5) The program is exempt from payment of all fees and all taxes
levied by this state or any of its subdivisions, except taxes levied on
real or personal property.
(6) The program is not a member of the Washington insurance
guaranty association under chapter 48.32 RCW. The Washington insurance
guaranty association, Washington state, and any political subdivisions
of this state are not responsible for losses sustained by the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A board of governors shall oversee the
operations of the program. The management and operations of the
program are subject to the supervision and approval of the board.
(1) The commissioner and associations must appoint representatives
to the board within thirty days after:
(a) The effective date of this act; or
(b) A vacancy occurs on the board.
(2) The board must comprise:
(a) The commissioner or a designated representative employed by the
office of the insurance commissioner, who shall serve as chairperson of
the board;
(b) Three members of the public appointed by the commissioner for
staggered three-year terms;
(c) A person with relevant insurance or risk management experience
appointed by the commissioner for a three-year term;
(d) A person selected by the Washington state medical association;
and
(e) A person selected by the Washington state hospital association.
(3) The program may reimburse board members for their actual
expenses to attend meetings, subject to per diem rates and rules
established by the office of financial management.
(4) The program must reimburse the commissioner for any staff
services provided at the request of the board or the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The board must adopt a program plan of
operation within sixty days after the members are appointed. The plan
of operation must include:
(a) A schedule for meetings;
(b) Specifications for program coverage provisions, including but
not limited to:
(i) Types of claims that the program does not cover;
(ii) Limits of coverage available from the program;
(iii) Eligibility criteria for providers and facilities that want
to buy excess medical malpractice coverage from the program;
(iv) Circumstances under which a retroactive date is to be applied
for injuries that occurred before 12:01 a.m. on January 1, 2005; and
(v) Rules the program is to follow when it provides tail coverage;
(c) Rules requiring a specific duration of tail coverage that must
be offered by insuring entities and self-insurers who provide proof of
financial responsibility under section 11 of this act;
(d) Criteria under which the program may purchase reinsurance;
(e) A process that health care facilities and providers must follow
to buy coverage from the program;
(f) A process for billing and collecting annual premiums from
facilities and providers who buy coverage from the program;
(g) A process to determine which high-risk providers and facilities
may be eligible for rate relief and the amount of such relief if money
is appropriated under section 3(4)(b) of this act;
(h) A process to determine if a provider or facility has engaged in
a proven patient safety program and the amount of the annual premium
discount the provider or facility is to receive;
(i) A review process for providers and facilities receiving premium
discounts for proven patient safety programs to see if the providers
and facilities should maintain the premium discount;
(j) Review authority over the basic limits of coverage subject to
sections 13 and 15 of this act; and
(k) Any other administrative activities or procedures needed to
establish and operate the program.
(2) The plan of operation is subject to approval by the
commissioner before it takes effect.
(3) The board may amend the plan of operation as needed. All
amendments are subject to approval by the commissioner before they take
effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The board must appoint an administrator
to manage the program.
(2) The administrator may:
(a) Hire staff to operate the program; or
(b) Contract for all or part of the services needed to operate the
program.
(3) At least annually, each contractor must report to the board.
The report must provide information on all expenses incurred and all
subcontracting arrangements.
(4) The program must pay for all administrative and contracted
services, subject to review and approval of the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The program must charge an annual
premium to health care facilities and providers who decide to buy
excess medical malpractice liability coverage from the program. The
program must use this money to pay claims, administrative costs, and
other expenses of the program.
(2) In addition to authority granted under subsection (1) of this
section, the program may increase its surplus by issuing a capital
call. A capital call requires facilities and providers to pay a sum,
in addition to the annual premium, to be eligible to buy or renew
coverage from the program. If a facility or provider does not pay the
amount of a call, the program may not cancel coverage or deny benefits
of existing coverage that are in effect at the time of the capital
call. Before issuing a capital call, the program must:
(a) Notify the commissioner at least ninety days before the capital
call. This notice must state the:
(i) Specific purpose or purposes of the capital call and the amount
of money the program has budgeted for each stated purpose;
(ii) Total amount of money the program intends to raise by issuing
the capital call;
(iii) Analytical and factual basis used by the program to determine
a capital call is the best option available to the program for raising
capital; and
(iv) Alternative method or methods of raising capital the program
considered and the reasons the program rejected each alternative in
favor of the capital call;
(b) Provide any additional information that the commissioner
determines is useful or necessary in evaluating the merits of the
proposed capital call; and
(c) Receive approval of the commissioner for the capital call. The
commissioner may disapprove a capital call if he or she does not
believe it is in the best interest of the program, its participating
facilities and providers, or the citizens of the state of Washington.
In making this determination, the commissioner may consider:
(i) The financial health of the program and the impact on the
medical malpractice marketplace;
(ii) The possible use of other means to raise capital;
(iii) The frequency of previous capital calls by the program;
(iv) The effect of raising premiums instead of a capital call;
(v) The impact on state revenue; and
(vi) Any other factor the commissioner decides is relevant.
(3) All money collected by the program belongs to the program.
(4) The state investment board must:
(a) Manage the assets of the program;
(b) Invest program assets in a manner consistent with chapter 48.13
RCW; and
(c) Charge the program reasonable fees for services provided under
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The program must file an annual
statement with the commissioner by March 1st of each year. The
statement must contain information about the program's transactions,
financial condition, and operations during the past calendar year. The
commissioner may establish rules for the form and content of this
statement. The statement must:
(a) Be in the form and according to instructions adopted by the
national association of insurance commissioners for property and
casualty insurers; and
(b) Include any additional information requested by the
commissioner.
(2) The program must maintain its records according to the
accounting practices and procedures manual adopted by the national
association of insurance commissioners.
(3) The program must provide the commissioner with free access to
all the books, records, files, papers, and documents that relate to the
operation of the program. The commissioner may call, qualify, and
examine all persons having knowledge of the program's operations.
(4) The commissioner may enter and examine the operation and
experience of the program at any time.
(a) The commissioner must examine the transactions, financial
condition, and operations of the program at least once every three
years.
(b) The commissioner must conduct each examination using the
procedures prescribed for insurance companies in chapter 48.03 RCW.
The program must reimburse the commissioner for the cost of each
examination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) A health care facility is eligible to
buy coverage from the program if the facility is located in Washington
state, and:
(a) Is licensed by Washington state; or
(b) Ends business operations after January 1, 2005, and needs to
buy tail coverage. The facility must maintain financial responsibility
as required under section 11 of this act to buy tail coverage.
(2) A health care provider is eligible to buy coverage from the
program if:
(a) The provider is licensed by and maintains a principal place of
practice in Washington state;
(b) The provider's principal place of practice is Idaho or Oregon,
and:
(i) The provider is a resident of Washington state;
(ii) The provider is licensed in Washington state; and
(iii) The provider performs procedures in an Idaho or Oregon
facility. In this subsection, "Idaho or Oregon facility" means a
facility located in Idaho or Oregon that is an affiliate of a
corporation organized under the laws of Washington state and maintains:
(A) Its principal office in Washington state; and
(B) A facility in Washington state that is covered by the program;
(c) The provider retires or ceases business operations after
January 1, 2005, and needs to buy tail coverage. The provider must
maintain financial responsibility as required under section 11 of this
act to buy tail coverage; or
(d) The provider meets the description in section 10(2) of this
act, but practices his or her profession outside the scope of the
exclusion. Coverage under the program applies only to claims arising
out of the practice of medicine that is outside the scope of the
exclusion in section 10(2) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A health care facility or provider is not
eligible for coverage under the program if:
(1) The facility or provider:
(a) Has not provided proof of financial responsibility to the
program as required by section 11 of this act; or
(b) Does not meet the criteria established by the board to be
eligible for coverage by the program. Any facility or provider denied
coverage by the program may appeal the decision to the board;
(2) The provider is a federal employee or contractor covered under
the federal tort claims act and is acting within the scope of his or
her employment or contractual duties; or
(3) The health care facility is operated by state or federal
government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 To obtain coverage from the program, each
eligible health care facility or provider must provide the program with
proof of financial responsibility to pay medical malpractice claims
that fall within the retained limits. Financial responsibility must
include the facility or provider and all officers, agents, and
employees while acting in the course and scope of their employment with
the facility or provider. A facility or provider may establish proof
of financial responsibility by:
(1) Qualifying as a self-insurer under criteria established by the
board that result in financial responsibility equivalent to the
retained limits established in section 13 of this act; or
(2) Buying medical malpractice insurance in amounts equal to the
retained limits listed in section 13 of this act from an insuring
entity accepted by the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) Each insuring entity or self-insurer
that provides medical malpractice insurance to health care facilities
or providers in Washington state must offer limits of coverage equal to
those specified under section 13 of this act.
(2) Each insuring entity or self-insurer that provides
certification under section 13(1) of this act:
(a) Must provide medical malpractice tail coverage that meets the
criteria established by the board under section 5(1)(c) of this act;
(b) May not cancel or nonrenew coverage unless the facility or
provider is given written notice of:
(i) Fifteen days if coverage is canceled for nonpayment of
premiums; or
(ii) Ninety days if coverage is canceled or nonrenewed for any
reason other than nonpayment of premiums;
(c) Must provide the program with the same notice as required under
(b) of this subsection; and
(d) Must keep a copy of each notice issued under (c) of this
subsection for at least ten years from the date of mailing or delivery.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) If a health care facility or provider
buys insurance to establish proof of financial responsibility, the
insuring entity that provides underlying coverage must certify in
writing to the program that the facility or provider has medical
malpractice coverage with limits of liability as specified in this
section. The limits set forth in this section apply to any joint
liability of a provider and his or her corporation or partnership.
(2) The minimum retained limits of liability are:
(a) For health care providers:
(i) One million dollars per claim; and
(ii) Annual aggregate limits of three million dollars;
(b) For health care facilities:
(i) One million dollars per claim; and
(ii) Annual aggregate limits of three million dollars.
(3) The board, under section 5 of this act, shall review, after one
year, the basic limits of coverage offered, and after reviewing the
program's actuarial data and program participation, determine if the
basic limits of coverage should be adjusted.
(4) The program must establish alternative rates for facilities or
providers who elect to maintain higher retained limits.
(5)(a) Retained limits of liability apply only to claim payments.
Each insuring entity and self-insurer that provides certification under
subsection (1) of this section must pay defense costs as supplementary
payments.
(b) If a medical malpractice claim is large enough that the program
must make claim payments, the insuring entity or self-insurer and the
program shall share defense costs on a pro rata basis based on the
total amount of claim payments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Subject to the terms, conditions, and
exclusions of its contract with a facility or provider, an insuring
entity or self-insurer that provides certification under section 13(1)
of this act agrees to pay the following costs:
(1) Attorney fees and other costs incurred in the settlement or
defense of any claims; and
(2) Any settlement, arbitration award, or judgment imposed against
a facility or provider under this chapter up to the retained limits or
the limits of all available underlying insurance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 (1) Subject to exclusions established by
the board, the limitations established in section 2 of this act, and
the retained limits agreed to by the facility or provider, the program
shall pay all sums a covered facility or provider is legally obligated
to pay as damages up to the limits of liability purchased from the
program.
(2) The coverage limits under this subsection are excess of the
retained limits.
(a) The basic limits of excess liability coverage under the program
for a health care provider, including providers who provide services in
a partnership or as part of a professional corporation, are:
(i) One million dollars per claim; and
(ii) An annual aggregate limit of three million dollars.
(b) The basic limits of excess liability coverage for a health care
facility are:
(i) One million dollars per claim; and
(ii) An annual aggregate limit of three million dollars.
(3) The board, under section 5 of this act, shall review, after one
year, the basic limits of coverage offered, and after reviewing the
program's actuarial data and program participation, determine if the
basic limits of coverage should be adjusted.
(4) In addition to the basic limits described in subsection (2) of
this section, the program must offer higher limits of coverage to those
providers and facilities that are willing to pay additional premiums if
they meet eligibility criteria established by the board. The board
shall determine the limits of liability available through the program
based on the limits available in the voluntary medical malpractice
insurance market.
(5) Program coverage is always excess to the retained limits
provided by the facility or provider.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 From January 1, 2005, through December 31,
2005, the annual program premium billed to each participating facility
or provider shall be determined by the commissioner based on:
(1) An analysis of rates and rating plans used by medical
malpractice insurers;
(2) Claims experience for medical malpractice insurance; and
(3) Any other factors the commissioner determines are relevant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Beginning January 1, 2006, program premiums
charged to facilities and providers must be based on the rates and
rating plans adopted by the board and accepted by the commissioner
under section 19 of this act.
(1) The board must contract with an actuary experienced in
developing medical malpractice rates and rating plans to develop annual
funding estimates.
(2) By July 1st of each year, the actuary must submit to the board
the classifications, rates, and rating plan the program will use to
determine premiums for the next calendar year. The rates and rating
plan must consider:
(a) Past and prospective loss experience in Washington state for
experience periods acceptable to the commissioner. If data from
Washington state are not available or are not statistically credible,
the program may use loss experience from those states that are likely
to produce loss experience similar to that in Washington state;
(b) Past and prospective operating expenses;
(c) Past and prospective investment income;
(d) A contingency factor to protect the program from adverse loss
development; and
(e) All other relevant factors within and outside Washington state.
(3) The classifications, rates, and rating plan used to develop
premiums for individual facilities and providers must consider:
(a) Past and prospective loss and expense experience for different
types of medical care offered by participating facilities or providers,
including:
(i) The amount of surgery performed by a facility or provider; and
(ii) The risk of diagnostic and therapeutic services provided or
procedures performed;
(b) The bed capacity and occupancy rates in a health care facility;
(c) Differences in financial risk, if any, to the program if a
facility or provider is self-insured;
(d) The risk factors for providers who are semiretired or part-time
professionals;
(e) If appropriate, premium differentials for coverage that
includes a provision that allows a provider to reject a settlement
offered to a claimant by the program;
(f) If a health care provider is a partnership or professional
corporation, the risk factors and past and prospective loss and expense
experience of the partners and employees of that provider;
(g) If a provider's principal place of practice is Oregon or Idaho,
any differences in risk or expense to reflect the fact the provider's
practice is not located in Washington state;
(h) Higher retained limits selected by a facility or provider; and
(i) Higher limits of liability coverage purchased from the program
by a facility or provider.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 The rating plan used by the program must
include experience and schedule rating plans. The program must apply
these plans equitably to all facilities and providers.
(1) The experience rating plan:
(a) Must consider the past loss and loss adjustment expense
experience of a facility or an individual provider;
(b) May consider paid medical malpractice claims if the claims
result from negligence on the part of:
(i) A facility;
(ii) A health care provider; or
(iii) An employee of a facility or health care provider; and
(c) May consider medical malpractice claims:
(i) Paid on behalf of a facility or provider by the program, an
insuring entity, or a self-insurer; and
(ii) Paid on behalf of a facility or provider before or after the
program is established.
(2) The schedule rating plan must consider the effect of:
(a) Risk management programs based on evidence-based practices that
improve patient safety. Practices that have been identified and
recommended by governmental and private organizations, including:
(i) The federal agency for health quality and research;
(ii) The federal institute of medicine;
(iii) The joint commission on accreditation of health care
organizations;
(iv) The national quality forum; or
(v) Any other evidence-based program accepted by the board; and
(b) Other objective criteria approved by the board that is expected
to reduce either losses or expenses incurred by the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 (1) Before the rates and rating plans
described in sections 17 and 18 of this act become effective, the
commissioner's staff must independently evaluate the rates and rating
plan and agree that:
(a) The rates and rating plan will result in premiums that are not
excessive, inadequate, or unfairly discriminatory; and
(b) The annual funding estimate is actuarially sound.
(2) The program may collect the premiums that are in effect for the
previous year if the classifications, rates, and rating plan have not
been approved by the board and the commissioner by September 30th. If
new classifications, rates, and a rating plan are later approved, the
program must collect or refund the balance of the premium from the
provider or facility.
(a) To collect or refund the premium, the program may adjust any
outstanding semiannual or quarterly installment payments, if
applicable.
(b) To save administrative expenses, the program may decide not to
collect, refund, or adjust for nominal amounts of premium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 Each facility or provider must pay an
annual premium to buy excess medical malpractice coverage from the
program.
(1) Facilities or providers may pay program premiums annually, or
in semiannual or quarterly installments. Semiannual and quarterly
installments must include the prorated premium and a fee that covers
unearned interest or investment income and administrative costs
incurred because the facility or provider has decided to pay the
premium in installments.
(2) A facility or provider must pay premiums to their selected
insuring entity within thirty days of the billing date. If the
insuring entity does not receive the premium due within thirty days,
coverage under the program ends at 12:01 a.m. on the thirty-first day.
The program and the insuring entity are not required to provide
additional notice of cancellation for nonpayment of the premium.
(3) An insuring entity must bill and collect program premiums the
same way it collects premiums for underlying insurance or coverage
within the retained limit. The insuring entity must pay the premium to
the program within twenty days after receipt from a facility or
provider.
(4) If the insuring entity does not pay the premium to the program
on time:
(a) The commissioner may suspend the certificate of authority,
charter, or license of the insuring entity until the premium is paid;
(b) The insuring entity responsible for the delinquency is liable
for the premium due plus a penalty equal to ten percent of the amount
of the overdue premium.
(5) A self-insurer must pay the premium to the program within
thirty days after the program sends the self-insurer a premium bill.
If the program does not receive the premium due within thirty days,
coverage under the program ends at 12:01 a.m. on the thirty-first day.
The program is not required to provide additional notice of
cancellation for nonpayment of the premium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 A provider or facility, the program, an
insuring entity, or a self-insurer that provides medical malpractice
coverage may voluntarily make payments for medical expenses prior to
any determination of fault.
(1) These payments:
(a) Are not an admission of fault;
(b) Are not admissible as evidence of fault in a formal or informal
legal proceeding;
(c) Must be deducted from any judgment, settlement, or arbitration
award; and
(d) Are not to be repaid by the claimant regardless of the amount
of judgment, settlement, or award.
(2) This section does not restrict a right of contribution or
indemnity under the laws of Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 (1) Each insuring entity or self-insurer
that provides medical malpractice coverage to a facility or provider
covered by the program must notify the program if it establishes a loss
reserve for a claim that exceeds three hundred thousand dollars.
(2) Each facility or provider that is self-insured must notify the
program if a claim is made that exceeds three hundred thousand dollars.
(3) Notices required under subsections (1) and (2) of this section
must be sent by certified mail to the program within ten working days
after the date:
(a) The loss reserve is established; or
(b) The facility or provider is notified of the claim.
(4) Notices and all related communications and correspondence
provided under this section are confidential and are not available to
any person or any public or private agency.
(5) The program may elect to participate in the defense of a
facility or provider. If the program has the right but not the duty to
defend and decides to participate in the defense the program shall:
(a) Pay its expenses; and
(b) Not contribute to the expenses of the facility, provider,
insuring entity, or self-insurer until the applicable retained limit
has been paid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 (1) Beginning on March 1, 2005, every
insuring entity or self-insurer that provides medical malpractice
insurance to any facility or provider in Washington state must report
to the commissioner by the first of each month any claim related to
medical malpractice, if the claim resulted in a final:
(a) Judgment in any amount;
(b) Settlement in any amount; or
(c) Disposition of a medical malpractice claim resulting in no
indemnity payment on behalf of an insured.
(2) If a claim is not reported by an entity listed in subsection
(1) of this section, the facility or provider must report the claim to
the commissioner.
(a) Reports under this subsection must be filed with the
commissioner within thirty days after the claim is resolved.
(b) If a facility or provider violates the requirements of this
subsection, the facility or provider license is subject to a fine or
disciplinary action by the department.
(3) The reporting requirements under this section apply to all:
(a) Insuring entities and self-insurers; and
(b) Providers and facilities, regardless of whether they buy
coverage from the program.
(4) The commissioner may impose a fine of two hundred fifty dollars
per day per case against any insuring entity that violates the
requirements of this subsection. The total fine per case may not
exceed ten thousand dollars.
(5) The commissioner shall provide the department with electronic
access to all information received under this section related to
licensed facilities and providers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 The reports required under section 23 of
this act must contain the following data in a form prescribed by the
commissioner:
(1) The health care provider's name, address, provider professional
license number, and type of medical specialty for which the provider is
insured;
(2) The provider or facility policy number or numbers;
(3) The name of the facility, if any, and the location within the
facility where the injury occurred;
(4) The date of the loss;
(5) The date the claim was reported to the insuring entity, self-insurer, facility, or provider;
(6) The name and address of the claimant. This information is
confidential and exempt from public disclosure, but may be disclosed:
(a) Publicly, if the claimant provides written consent;
(b) To the department at any time; or
(c) To the commissioner at any time for purpose of identifying
multiple or duplicate claims arising out of the same occurrence;
(7) The date of suit, if filed;
(8) The claimant's age and sex;
(9) The names, and professional license numbers if applicable, of
all defendants involved in the claim;
(10) Specific information about the judgment or settlement
including:
(a) The date and amount of any judgment or settlement;
(b) Whether the settlement:
(i) Was the result of an arbitration, judgment, or mediation; and
(ii) Occurred before or after trial;
(c) An itemization of:
(i) Economic damages, such as incurred and anticipated medical
expenses and lost wages;
(ii) Noneconomic damages;
(iii) The loss adjustment expense paid to defense counsel; and
(iv) All other paid allocated loss adjustment expense;
(d) If there is no judgment or settlement:
(i) The date and reason for final disposition; and
(ii) The date the claim was closed; and
(e) Any other information required by the commissioner;
(11) A summary of the occurrence that created the claim, which must
include:
(a) The final diagnosis for which the patient sought or received
treatment, including the actual condition of the patient;
(b) A description of any misdiagnosis made by the provider of the
actual condition of the patient;
(c) The operation, diagnostic, or treatment procedure that caused
the injury;
(d) A description of the principal injury that led to the claim;
and
(e) The safety management steps the facility or provider has taken
to make similar occurrences or injuries less likely in the future; and
(12) Any other information required by the commissioner, by rule,
that helps the commissioner or department analyze and evaluate the
nature, causes, location, cost, and damages involved in medical
malpractice cases.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 The commissioner must prepare aggregate
statistical summaries of closed claims based on calendar year data
submitted under section 23 of this act.
(1) At a minimum, data must be sorted by calendar year and
calendar-accident year. The commissioner may also decide to display
data in other ways.
(2) The summaries must be available by March 31st of each year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 (1) Beginning in 2006, the commissioner
must prepare an annual report by June 30th that summarizes and analyzes
the closed claim reports for medical malpractice filed under section 23
of this act and the annual financial reports filed by insurers writing
medical malpractice insurance in this state. The report must include:
(a) An analysis of closed claim reports of prior years for which
data are collected and show:
(i) Trends in the frequency and severity of claims payments;
(ii) An itemization of economic and noneconomic damages;
(iii) The types of medical malpractice for which claims have been
paid; and
(iv) Any other information the commissioner determines illustrates
trends in closed claims;
(b) An analysis of the medical malpractice insurance market in
Washington state, including:
(i) An analysis of the financial reports of the insurers with a
combined market share of at least ninety percent of net written medical
malpractice premiums in Washington state for the prior calendar year;
(ii) A loss ratio analysis of medical malpractice insurance written
in Washington state; and
(iii) A profitability analysis of each insurer writing medical
malpractice insurance;
(c) A comparison of loss ratios and the profitability of medical
malpractice insurance in Washington state to other states based on
financial reports filed with the national association of insurance
commissioners and any other source of information the commissioner
deems relevant; and
(d) A summary of the rate filings for medical malpractice that have
been approved by the commissioner for the prior calendar year,
including an analysis of the trend of direct and incurred losses as
compared to prior years.
(2) The commissioner must post reports required by this section on
the internet no later than thirty days after they are due.
(3) The commissioner may adopt rules that require persons and
entities required to report under section 23 of this act to report data
related to:
(a) The frequency and severity of open claims for the reporting
period;
(b) The amounts reserved for incurred claims;
(c) Changes in reserves from the previous reporting period;
(d) Any other information that helps the commissioner monitor
losses and claims development in the Washington state medical
malpractice insurance market; and
(e) Any additional information requested by the department or the
board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 The commissioner may adopt all rules needed
to implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 Sections 1 through 27 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 48 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---