BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Despite laudable efforts by all levels of
government, private individuals, and charitable foundations to end
homelessness, the number of homeless persons in Washington is
unacceptably high and appears to be growing. The state's homeless
population, furthermore, includes a large number of families with
children, youth, and employed persons. The legislature further finds
that the fiscal and societal costs of homelessness are very high for
both the public and private sectors, and that ending homelessness is
both morally and economically imperative.
The legislature finds that there are many causes of homelessness,
including a shortage of family-wage jobs which undermines housing
affordability; a lack of an accessible and affordable health care
system available to all who suffer from physical and mental illnesses
and chemical and alcohol dependency; and a lack of education and job
skills necessary in the economy of the twenty-first century.
While the provision of housing and housing-related services to the
homeless should be administered at the local level to best address
specific community needs, the legislature recognizes the need for
systematic statewide data collection on homelessness in Washington,
including the number and geographic location of homeless persons. In
order to truly end homelessness, there must also be a clear assignment
of responsibilities, a clear statement of achievable and quantifiable
goals, systematic collection and rigorous evaluation of the data, a
search for and implementation through adequate resource allocation of
best practices, and systematic measurement of progress toward interim
goals and the ultimate goal of ending homelessness in Washington by
July 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This chapter may be known and cited as the
homeless housing act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 There is created within the department the
homeless housing program to develop and coordinate a statewide
strategic plan, and to create resources targeted to providing all
homeless individuals and families with decent permanent housing. The
department and all Washington county governments share the
responsibility for ending homelessness in the state of Washington
within ten years. The program will be developed and administered by
the department with advice and input from the affordable housing
advisory board established in RCW 43.185B.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(2) "Director" means the director of the department of community,
trade, and economic development.
(3) "Homeless person" means an individual living without permanent
shelter, including an individual living outside, in an emergency
shelter, and in a temporary housing program which may include a
transitional and supportive housing program if habitation time limits
exist.
(4) "Washington homeless census" means an annual statewide census
conducted as a collaborative effort by towns, cities, counties,
community-based organizations, and state agencies with the technical
support and coordination of the department, to count and collect data
on all homeless individuals in Washington.
(5) "Homeless housing account" means the state treasury account
receiving the state's portion of income from revenue from the sources
established by section 19 of this act.
(6) "Homeless housing grant program" means the vehicle by which
competitive grants are awarded by the department, utilizing moneys from
the homeless housing account, to local governments for programs
directly related to housing homeless individuals and families,
addressing the root causes of homelessness, preventing homelessness,
collecting data on homeless individuals, and other efforts directly
related to ending homelessness in Washington. State funds accessible
through the homeless housing grant program are to supplement the local
government's share of the revenue from the sources established by
section 19 of this act to support programs to end homelessness within
their boundaries.
(7) "Local government" means a county government in the state of
Washington. Should a city government affirmatively elect to join this
effort by accepting the responsibility for ending homelessness within
their borders through the operation of a homeless housing program
separate from that of the county, it is included in the definition of
"local government." All local government efforts must be incorporated
into the state strategic plan.
(8) "Housing continuum" means the progression of individuals along
a housing-focused situational continuum with homelessness at one end,
and homeownership at the other. Such a continuum could, for example,
range from homeless on the street, to homeless in a temporary shelter,
to participation in a transitional housing program, to residency in a
supportive housing environment, to acquisition and maintenance of a
subsidized apartment, to acquisition and maintenance of a nonsubsidized
apartment, to homeownership.
(9) "Local homeless housing advisory council" means a voluntary
local committee created to advise a local government on the creation of
a local homeless housing program strategic plan, participate in a
program evaluation within the service area, and report to the
department on the local area's progress toward meeting the goal of
ending homelessness.
(10) "Long-term private or public housing" and "permanent shelter"
mean subsidized and unsubsidized rental or owner-occupied housing in
which there is no established time limit for habitation.
(11) "Housing wage" is the amount a person working full time has to
earn to afford the fair market rent on a two bedroom unit while paying
no more than thirty percent of their income in rent. The housing wage
is published in the "out of reach" report compiled and distributed
annually by the national low income housing coalition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The homeless housing account is created in
the custody of the state treasurer. The department's portion of the
surcharge established in section 19 of this act must be deposited in
the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the
homeless housing grant program. Only the director or the director's
designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The department will allocate grant
moneys from the homeless housing account to finance in whole or in part
programs and projects to assist homeless individuals and families
access to adequate housing, prevent at-risk individuals from becoming
homeless, address the root causes of homelessness, track and report on
homeless-related data, and facilitate the movement of homeless or
formerly homeless individuals along the housing continuum toward more
stable and independent housing.
(2) Activities eligible for assistance from the homeless housing
account include, but are not limited to:
(a) Shelters and related services for the homeless, including
emergency shelters, overnight youth shelters, transitional housing, and
supportive housing;
(b) Participation in a basic rental assistance subsidy or voucher
program to be created by rule by the department;
(c) Emergency eviction prevention programs, including temporary
rental and mortgage payment subsidies to prevent homelessness;
(d) New construction, expansion, rehabilitation, or acquisition of
housing units specifically to be used to house homeless individuals and
families;
(e) Homeless supportive services directly related to assisting
families to acquire and retain stable housing;
(f) Rental deposit and security deposit assistance for individuals
and families moving into rental units;
(g) Outreach to homeless individuals and families;
(h) Homeless census data collection;
(i) Creation and ongoing management of voluntary local homeless
housing advisory councils;
(j) Administrative costs when such a grant will substantially
increase the recipient's access to housing funds other than those
available under this chapter; and
(k) Technical assistance, design, and finance services and
consultation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Only a local government is eligible to
receive a homeless housing grant from the homeless housing account.
The legislature specifically assigns responsibility to individual
county governments to end homelessness within their borders. All
counties receive revenue directly from sources established by this
chapter to accomplish this goal. All counties are also eligible to
apply for the state's portion of funding from sources established by
this chapter through the homeless housing grant program. Any city may
specifically assert responsibility for ending homelessness within its
borders if it so chooses, by forwarding a resolution to the board of
county commissioners stating its intention and its commitment to
operating a separate homeless housing program. Such cities will then
receive a portion of the county funds proportional to the need within
the city as identified by the Washington homeless survey. Cities may
also then apply separately and individually for homeless housing
program grants. Cities choosing to operate their own homeless housing
programs are thereby accepting the responsibility for ending
homelessness within its boundaries and are responsible for complying
with all of the same reporting requirements as counties.
Local governments applying for homeless housing funds may
subcontract with any other local government, nonprofit community-based
organization, or private entity for the execution of programs
contributing to the overall goal of ending homelessness within a
defined service area. All subcontracts shall be filed with the
department and shall have specific performance terms. While a local
government has the authority to subcontract with other entities, the
local government continues to maintain the ultimate responsibility for
ending homelessness within its borders.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A local government participating in the
homeless housing grant program must create a local homeless housing
advisory council consisting of representatives from among other
stakeholder groups. Advisory councilmembers could include
representatives from other governmental entities within the defined
area, nonprofit community or neighborhood-based organizations,
federally recognized Indian tribes in the state of Washington, local
housing authorities, representatives from the business community, work
force training entities, health care organizations, and regional or
statewide nonprofit housing assistance organizations. Councils must
also include a homeless or formerly homeless individual.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) During each calendar year in which
moneys from the homeless housing account are available for use by the
department for the homeless housing grant program, the department will
announce to all Washington counties, participating cities, and through
major media throughout the state, a grant application period of at
least ninety days' duration. This announcement will be made as often
as the director deems appropriate for proper utilization of resources.
The department shall then promptly grant as many applications as will
utilize available funds, less appropriate administrative costs of the
department as described in section 19 of this act. In awarding funds
under this chapter, the department shall strive for a geographic
distribution of the funds.
(2) The department will develop, with advice and input from the
affordable housing advisory board established in RCW 43.185B.020,
criteria to evaluate grant applications.
(3) The department may give preference to applications based on
some or all of the following criteria:
(a) The total homeless population in the applicant local government
service area, as reported by the most recent annual Washington homeless
census;
(b) Current local expenditures to provide housing for the homeless;
(c) Local government and private contributions pledged to the
program in the form of infrastructure improvements, and others;
(d) The current local expenditures to address the underlying causes
of homelessness;
(e) The degree of leveraging of other funds from local government
or private sources for the program for which funds are being requested,
to include recipient contributions to total project costs, including
allied contributions from other sources such as professional, craft and
trade services, and lender interest rate subsidies;
(f) Projects that demonstrate a strong probability of serving
homeless individuals or families for a period of at least twenty-five
years;
(g) Projects which demonstrate serving homeless populations with
the greatest needs, including projects that serve special needs
populations;
(h) The degree to which the applicant project represents a
collaboration between local governments, nonprofit community-based
organizations, local and state agencies, and the private sector;
(i) Projects which are consistent with the local and state homeless
housing program strategic plans;
(j) The experience and past performance of the local government in
operating similar programs;
(k) The prior performance of the local government in operating
programs funded by the homeless housing account;
(l) The operational capacity of the local government, including
fiscal capacity, staff capacity, and management structure;
(m) The qualifications of any nonprofit organization or other
entity with which the local government has subcontracted;
(n) The existence of a local homeless housing advisory council
representing private, public, and homeless or formerly homeless sectors
of the community;
(o) The existence of a current local homeless housing program
strategic plan which has been reviewed by the department;
(p) The existence of performance measures within the program's
evaluation plan to consist of the homeless housing grant program's
mandatory performance measures as defined in section 12 of this act,
additional mandatory homeless housing performance measures to be
defined by the department by rule, and specific local performance
measures, if applicable;
(q) The ability to track and report on outcomes related to the
mandatory homeless housing grant program performance measures and other
defined local performance measures;
(r) The cooperation of the local government in the annual
Washington homeless census project;
(s) The commitment of the local government and any subcontracting
local governments, nonprofit organizations, and for-profit entities to
employ a diverse work force and pay the Washington housing wage; and
(t) Other elements shown by the applicant to be directly related to
the goal and the department's state strategic plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The department will develop a consistent
statewide data gathering instrument to monitor the performance of grant
recipients in order to determine compliance with the terms and
conditions set forth in the grant application or required by the
department. The data gathering instrument shall allow the governor,
legislature, and other decision makers to monitor the progress of the
state and local governments in accomplishing the goals of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The department will provide technical
assistance to any county, or other participating local government
entity, which requests such assistance. Technical assistance
activities may include:
(1) Assisting local governments to identify appropriate parties to
participate on local homeless housing advisory councils;
(2) Assisting local governments to identify appropriate service
providers with which the local governments may subcontract for service
provision and development activities, when necessary;
(3) Assisting local governments to implement or expand homeless
census programs to meet homeless housing program requirements;
(4) Assisting in the identification of "best practices" from other
areas; and
(5) Assisting in identifying additional funding sources for
specific projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Six months after the first Washington
homeless census, the department shall prepare and present a ten-year
homeless housing program strategic plan which will outline statewide
goals and performance measures. This plan shall be updated annually
and will be annually reviewed and approved by the governor. The
department's updated plans will subsequently be released each June.
Local governments will base their local ten-year homeless housing
strategic plans upon the goals and program recommendations of the state
plan.
Mandatory homeless housing program performance measures are defined
in statute within this section. Additional mandatory performance
measures may be created by the department by rule. These mandatory
performance measures must be reflected in the department's homeless
housing strategic plan as well as in local strategic plans.
The department shall issue by rule mandatory homeless housing
program performance measures that shall apply to both the department
for statewide outcomes and local governments for local outcomes. The
performance measures may consist of, but are not limited to, the
following:
(1) By the end of year one a comprehensive census shall be
finalized and will report on all homeless individuals in the state of
Washington;
(2) By the end of year two, all individuals classified as homeless
in the first Washington homeless census will be housed in at least
temporary housing, which could include emergency shelters or other
indoor facilities;
(3) By the end of year four, twenty-five percent of all individuals
classified as homeless in all Washington homeless census counts since
the effective date of this act will be housed in long-term private or
public housing;
(4) By the end of year six, fifty percent of all individuals
classified as homeless in all Washington homeless census counts since
the effective date of this act will be housed in long-term private or
public housing;
(5) By the end of year eight, seventy-five percent of all
individuals classified as homeless in all Washington homeless census
counts since the effective date of this act will be housed in long-term
private or public housing; and
(6) By the end of year ten, and in each subsequent year, one
hundred percent of all individuals classified as homeless in all
Washington homeless census counts since the effective date of this act
will be housed in long-term private or public housing.
The department shall report annually to the governor and the
appropriate committees of the legislature an assessment of its
performance in addressing the statewide homeless problem, and the
performance of each county, and other participating local government
entities, in addressing local homeless housing issues.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The department shall establish a uniform
process for each county, and any other participating local government,
to report progress toward meeting goals relative to the mandatory
performance outcomes. At a minimum, progress towards goals and goals
achieved will be reported by each county, or other local government
entity, in its annual updated homeless housing strategic plan.
Each county, or other local government, shall prepare and present
a ten-year homeless housing plan for its jurisdictional area which will
be based upon the department's statewide ten-year plan. This local
plan shall be updated annually and submitted to the department for
approval. Local plans will be submitted to the department each August
for review and will be available to the public each October. All local
plans will include the mandatory homeless housing program performance
measures as provided in this chapter, additional performance measures
created by rule by the department, and may include specific local
performance measures determined by the local homeless housing advisory
councils.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The department shall issue rules related to
the interpretation and appropriate reporting of mandatory performance
measures detailed in this chapter, including rules regarding how a
homeless person's refusal to accept an offer of housing is to be
recorded and reported.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 The department will annually conduct a
Washington homeless census. The census will count all homeless
individuals living outdoors, in shelters, and in transitional housing.
The department will collaborate with existing local homeless census
projects where they exist. The department will work with local
governments and community organizations to implement census projects in
areas of the state not currently conducting an annual census.
All homeless census projects shall make every effort to collect
basic demographic information on each homeless individual, to include:
(1) Name;
(2) Gender;
(3) Birth date;
(4) Family status and next of kin notification information;
(5) Health and disability status;
(6) Veteran status;
(7) Current housing situation;
(8) Current location and contact information;
(9) Government subsidies currently being accessed;
(10) Substance abuse issues;
(11) Employment status;
(12) Annual income;
(13) Last address;
(14) Self-declared reason for homelessness;
(15) Education and training status;
(16) Additional information as determined by the department by
rule; and
(17) Additional information of interest to the local community.
The Washington homeless census will be conducted annually during
the month of January to coordinate with already existing homeless
census projects funded in part by the United States department of
housing and urban development, under the McKinney-Vento homeless
assistance program. Census projects may be eligible for additional
funding from the homeless housing grant program to improve the
collection and reporting of data in order to fulfill the additional
data collection requirements of the homeless housing program.
The department shall create a uniform method, as part of its
homeless management information system, created under RCW 43.63A.655,
by which individual county and city homeless census projects will
submit their data for statewide tabulation, analysis, and reporting.
The department shall make the annual statewide Washington homeless
census data available to the public by March of each year. This data,
and its analysis, will be included in the department's annual updated
homeless housing program strategic plan. Local governments will
utilize the data to update their local strategic plans.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 The department shall have the authority to
issue rules regarding the grant process, and the substance of eligible
programs and projects, consistent with this chapter. The department
shall consider the recommendations of the affordable housing advisory
board, local governments, and local homeless housing advisory councils
regarding how funds shall be used in their geographic areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 The affordable housing advisory board
established in RCW 43.185B.020 shall advise the director on homeless
housing needs in this state, operational aspects of the grant program
and revenue collection program established by this chapter, and
implementation of the policy and goals of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 The department shall issue rules to ensure
that the state's interest will be protected upon the development, use,
sale, or change of use of projects constructed, acquired, or financed
in whole or in part through the homeless housing grant program. These
policies may include, but are not limited to: (1) Requiring a share of
the appreciation in the project in proportion to the state's
contribution to the project, or (2) requiring a lump sum repayment of
the grant upon the sale or change of use of the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 A new section is added to chapter 36.22 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a
surcharge of ten dollars shall be charged by the county auditor for
each document recorded, which will be in addition to any other charge
allowed by law. The funds collected pursuant to this section are to be
distributed and used as follows:
(a) The auditor shall remit sixty percent to the county to be used
by the county, and any cities operating separate programs within the
county, for administrative costs and programs which directly accomplish
the goals of the local government's strategic plan to end homelessness.
(b) The auditor shall remit forty percent to the department of
community, trade, and economic development, one-eighth of which may be
used by the department for administration of the program established in
section 3 of this act. The remaining seven-eighths is to be
distributed by the department of community, trade, and economic
development through the homeless housing grant program.
(2) The surcharge imposed in this section does not apply to
assignments or substitutions of previously recorded deeds of trust.

Sec. 20 RCW 36.18.010 and 2002 c 294 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
County auditors or recording officers shall collect the following
fees for their official services:
For recording instruments, for the first page eight and one-half by
fourteen inches or less, five dollars; for each additional page eight
and one-half by fourteen inches or less, one dollar. The fee for
recording multiple transactions contained in one instrument will be
calculated for each transaction requiring separate indexing as required
under RCW 65.04.050 as follows: The fee for each title or transaction
is the same fee as the first page of any additional recorded document;
the fee for additional pages is the same fee as for any additional
pages for any recorded document; the fee for the additional pages may
be collected only once and may not be collected for each title or
transaction;
For preparing and certifying copies, for the first page eight and
one-half by fourteen inches or less, three dollars; for each additional
page eight and one-half by fourteen inches or less, one dollar;
For preparing noncertified copies, for each page eight and one-half
by fourteen inches or less, one dollar;
For administering an oath or taking an affidavit, with or without
seal, two dollars;
For issuing a marriage license, eight dollars, (this fee includes
taking necessary affidavits, filing returns, indexing, and transmittal
of a record of the marriage to the state registrar of vital statistics)
plus an additional five-dollar fee for use and support of the
prevention of child abuse and neglect activities to be transmitted
monthly to the state treasurer and deposited in the state general fund
plus an additional ten-dollar fee to be transmitted monthly to the
state treasurer and deposited in the state general fund. The
legislature intends to appropriate an amount at least equal to the
revenue generated by this fee for the purposes of the displaced
homemaker act, chapter 28B.04 RCW;
For searching records per hour, eight dollars;
For recording plats, fifty cents for each lot except cemetery plats
for which the charge shall be twenty-five cents per lot; also one
dollar for each acknowledgment, dedication, and description: PROVIDED,
That there shall be a minimum fee of twenty-five dollars per plat;
For recording of miscellaneous records not listed above, for the
first page eight and one-half by fourteen inches or less, five dollars;
for each additional page eight and one-half by fourteen inches or less,
one dollar;
For modernization and improvement of the recording and indexing
system, a surcharge as provided in RCW 36.22.170((.));
For recording an emergency nonstandard document as provided in RCW
65.04.047, fifty dollars, in addition to all other applicable recording
fees((.));
For recording instruments, a surcharge as provided in RCW
36.22.178;
For recording instruments, a surcharge as provided in section 19 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 This act takes effect August 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 Sections 1 through 18 and 21 through 23 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---