BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.190.010 and 2003 c 137 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Assist the transmission" means actions taken by a person to
provide substantial assistance or support which enables any person to
formulate, compose, send, originate, initiate, or transmit a commercial
electronic mail message or a commercial electronic text message when
the person providing the assistance knows or consciously avoids knowing
that the initiator of the commercial electronic mail message or the
commercial electronic text message is engaged, or intends to engage, in
any practice that violates the consumer protection act.
(2) "Commercial electronic mail message" means an electronic mail
message sent for the purpose of promoting real property, goods, or
services for sale or lease. It does not mean an electronic mail
message to which an interactive computer service provider has attached
an advertisement in exchange for free use of an electronic mail
account, when the sender has agreed to such an arrangement.
(3) "Commercial electronic text message" means an electronic text
message sent to promote real property, goods, or services for sale or
lease.
(4) "Electronic mail address" means a destination, commonly
expressed as a string of characters, to which electronic mail may be
sent or delivered.
(5) "Electronic mail message" means an electronic message sent to
an electronic mail address and a reference to an internet domain,
whether or not displayed, to which an electronic mail message can be
sent or delivered.
(6) "Electronic text message" means a text message sent to a
cellular telephone or pager equipped with short message service or any
similar capability, whether the message is initiated as a short message
service message or as an electronic mail message.
(((6))) (7) "Initiate the transmission" refers to the action by the
original sender of an electronic mail message or an electronic text
message, not to the action by any intervening interactive computer
service or wireless network that may handle or retransmit the message,
unless such intervening interactive computer service assists in the
transmission of an electronic mail message when it knows, or
consciously avoids knowing, that the person initiating the transmission
is engaged, or intends to engage, in any act or practice that violates
the consumer protection act.
(((7))) (8) "Interactive computer service" means any information
service, system, or access software provider that provides or enables
computer access by multiple users to a computer server, including
specifically a service or system that provides access to the internet
and such systems operated or services offered by libraries or
educational institutions.
(((8))) (9) "Internet" means collectively the myriad of computer
and telecommunications facilities, including equipment and operating
software, that comprise the interconnected world wide network of
networks that employ the transmission control protocol/internet
protocol, or any predecessor or successor protocols to such protocol,
to communicate information of all kinds by wire or radio.
(10) "Internet domain name" refers to a globally unique,
hierarchical reference to an internet host or service, assigned through
centralized internet naming authorities, comprising a series of
character strings separated by periods, with the right-most string
specifying the top of the hierarchy.
(((9))) (11) "Person" means a person, corporation, partnership, or
association.
(12) "Personally identifying information" means an individual's:
(a) Social security number; (b) driver's license number; (c) bank
account number; (d) credit or debit card number; (e) personal
identification number; (f) automated or electronic signature; (g)
unique biometric data; (h) account passwords; or (i) any other piece of
information that can be used to access an individual's financial
accounts or to obtain goods or services.
(13) "Web page" means a location, with respect to the world wide
web, that has a single uniform resource locator or other single
location with respect to the internet.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 19.190 RCW
to read as follows:
No person may solicit, request, or take any action to induce
another person to provide personally identifying information by means
of a web page, electronic mail message, or otherwise using the internet
by representing oneself, either directly or by implication, to be a
business or individual without the authority or approval of such
business or individual.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 19.190 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Damages to a consumer resulting from the practices prohibited
by this chapter are up to five hundred dollars per violation, or actual
damages, whichever is greater.
(2) A person engaged in the business of providing internet access
service to the public, an owner of a web page, or trademark owner who
is adversely affected by reason of a violation of section 2 of this
act, may bring an action against a person who violates section 2 of
this act to:
(a) Enjoin further violations of section 2 of this act; and
(b) Recover the greater of actual damages or five thousand dollars
per violation of section 2 of this act.
(3) In an action under subsection (2) of this section, a court may
increase the damages up to three times the damages allowed by
subsection (2) of this section if the defendant has engaged in a
pattern and practice of violating this section. The court may award
costs and reasonable attorneys' fees to a prevailing party.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 19.190 RCW
to read as follows:
It is a violation of the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86
RCW, to conspire with another person to engage in any act that violates
the provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 19.190 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that the practices covered by this chapter
are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of
applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation
of this chapter is not reasonable in relation to the development and
preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or
commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purpose of
applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 19.190 RCW
to read as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature that this chapter is a matter
of statewide concern. This chapter supersedes and preempts all rules,
regulations, codes, ordinances, and other laws adopted by a city,
county, city and county, municipality, or local agency regarding the
practices covered by this chapter and notices to consumers from
computer software providers regarding information collection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---