BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.176.020 and 2004 c 237 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Business incubator" means a facility that offers:
(a) Space for start-up and expanding firms;
(b) The shared use of equipment and work areas;
(c) Daily management support services essential to high-quality
commercial operations; and
(d) Technical assistance.
(2) "Entrepreneurial support program" means a program offering, on
an on-going basis, start-up or emerging businesses business-related
training and services as well as technical assistance including
operational development, business development, and financing.
(3) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(4) "Emerging business" means a business: (a) That is engaged in
activities related to the development of initial product or service
offerings, such as prototype development or establishment of initial
production or service processes; or (b) that is less than three years
old and during the previous fiscal year had gross revenues of no more
than two million dollars.
(5) "Qualified small business incubator" means an incubator that
is:
(a)(i) Designated as a nonprofit organization under section
501(c)(3) or (c)(6) of the internal revenue code, or (ii) consists of
a partnership between a designated nonprofit organization under section
501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code and a government or quasi-government agency; and
(b) ((Focused on developing small businesses in an economically
distressed or disadvantaged area; and
(c))) Structured around a sound business plan.
(6) "Start-up business" means a formal business venture that: (a)
Is involved in activities related to the development of initial product
or service offerings, such as prototype development or establishment of
initial production or service processes; (b) during the preceding
fiscal year had gross revenues of no more than two million dollars; (c)
is less than three years old; and (d) has fewer than twenty employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.176 RCW
to read as follows:
A competitive grant program is created in the department to assist
small business incubators and entrepreneurial support programs as
defined in RCW 43.176.020. To the extent funds are made available, the
competitive grants shall be allocated equally across the state to a
designated nonprofit organization under section 501(c)(3) or (c)(6) of
the internal revenue code or a governmental organization, including a
port district, to provide business-related training and services as
well as technical assistance to start-up or emerging businesses. In
administering the competitive grant program, the department shall
endeavor to equitably distribute the funds across the state.
(1) Ninety percent of the funds granted must be used by the
grantees to provide the kind of direct service or training to
businesses as described in RCW 43.176.020. Only up to ten percent of
the grant funds may be used by the grantees for organizational
administrative costs and overhead.
(2) To the extent funds are made available, grants shall be awarded
over a two-year period.
(3) Previous grantees are not prohibited from reapplying.
(4) The department shall establish an application process and the
appropriate forms. All applications shall include a work plan that
shall include, at a minimum, the types of businesses targeted for
assistance, the types of training, services, and technical assistance
that will be offered, and the performance measures to be applied.
(5) The grantee shall submit an annual report to the department.
(6) The department shall submit on a biennial basis, beginning
December 1, 2007, a report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature. The report shall include, at a minimum:
(a) The number of businesses served by industry;
(b) The types of services provided;
(c) The number of jobs retained as a result of the grant program;
(d) The number of jobs created as a result of the grant program;
and
(e) The names of the grantees and the amounts of the grants.
(7) The department may contract with the community economic
revitalization board to administer the competitive grant program.

--- END ---