BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.04.030 and 2004 c 65 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall supervise the providing of prompt and
efficient care and treatment, including care provided by physician
assistants governed by the provisions of chapters 18.57A and 18.71A
RCW, acting under a supervising physician, including chiropractic care,
and including care provided by licensed advanced registered nurse
practitioners, to workers injured during the course of their employment
at the least cost consistent with promptness and efficiency, without
discrimination or favoritism, and with as great uniformity as the
various and diverse surrounding circumstances and locations of
industries will permit and to that end shall, from time to time,
establish and adopt and supervise the administration of printed forms,
rules, regulations, and practices for the furnishing of such care and
treatment: PROVIDED, That the medical coverage decisions of the
department do not constitute a "rule" as used in RCW 34.05.010(16), nor
are such decisions subject to the rule-making provisions of chapter
34.05 RCW except that criteria for establishing medical coverage
decisions shall be adopted by rule after consultation with the workers'
compensation advisory committee established in RCW 51.04.110: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That the department may recommend to an injured worker
particular health care services and providers where specialized
treatment is indicated or where cost effective payment levels or rates
are obtained by the department: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the
department may enter into contracts for goods and services including,
but not limited to, durable medical equipment so long as statewide
access to quality service is maintained for injured workers.
(2)(a) The director shall, in consultation with interested persons,
establish and, in his or her discretion, periodically change as may be
necessary, and make available a fee schedule of the maximum charges to
be made by any physician, surgeon, chiropractor, hospital, druggist,
licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner, physicians' assistants
as defined in chapters 18.57A and 18.71A RCW, acting under a
supervising physician or other agency or person rendering services to
injured workers. The department shall coordinate with other state
purchasers of health care services to establish as much consistency and
uniformity in billing and coding practices as possible, taking into
account the unique requirements and differences between programs. If
the director establishes fees for services related to providing and
maintaining prosthetic devices that are separate from the services
unrelated to device maintenance, the director must take into account
the effect of the device's market price and the costs of billing for
future maintenance appointments on the provider's ultimate
reimbursement.
(b) No service covered under this title, including services
provided to injured workers, whether aliens or other injured workers,
who are not residing in the United States at the time of receiving the
services, shall be charged or paid at a rate or rates exceeding those
specified in ((such)) the fee schedule established under this
subsection, and no contract providing for greater fees shall be valid
as to the excess.
(c) The establishment of ((such)) a fee schedule, exclusive of
conversion factors, does not constitute "agency action" as used in RCW
34.05.010(3), nor does such a fee schedule constitute a "rule" as used
in RCW 34.05.010(16).
(3) The director or self-insurer, as the case may be, shall make a
record of the commencement of every disability and the termination
thereof and, when bills are rendered for the care and treatment of
injured workers, shall approve and pay those which conform to the
adopted rules, regulations, established fee schedules, and practices of
the director and may reject any bill or item thereof incurred in
violation of the principles laid down in this section or the rules,
regulations, or the established fee schedules and rules and regulations
adopted under it.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.04.030 and 1998 c 230 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall supervise the providing of prompt and
efficient care and treatment, including care provided by physician
assistants governed by the provisions of chapters 18.57A and 18.71A
RCW, acting under a supervising physician, and including chiropractic
care, to workers injured during the course of their employment at the
least cost consistent with promptness and efficiency, without
discrimination or favoritism, and with as great uniformity as the
various and diverse surrounding circumstances and locations of
industries will permit and to that end shall, from time to time,
establish and adopt and supervise the administration of printed forms,
rules, regulations, and practices for the furnishing of such care and
treatment: PROVIDED, That the medical coverage decisions of the
department do not constitute a "rule" as used in RCW 34.05.010(16), nor
are such decisions subject to the rule-making provisions of chapter
34.05 RCW except that criteria for establishing medical coverage
decisions shall be adopted by rule after consultation with the workers'
compensation advisory committee established in RCW 51.04.110: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That the department may recommend to an injured worker
particular health care services and providers where specialized
treatment is indicated or where cost effective payment levels or rates
are obtained by the department: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the
department may enter into contracts for goods and services including,
but not limited to, durable medical equipment so long as statewide
access to quality service is maintained for injured workers.
(2)(a) The director shall, in consultation with interested persons,
establish and, in his or her discretion, periodically change as may be
necessary, and make available a fee schedule of the maximum charges to
be made by any physician, surgeon, chiropractor, hospital, druggist,
physicians' assistants as defined in chapters 18.57A and 18.71A RCW,
acting under a supervising physician or other agency or person
rendering services to injured workers. The department shall coordinate
with other state purchasers of health care services to establish as
much consistency and uniformity in billing and coding practices as
possible, taking into account the unique requirements and differences
between programs. If the director establishes fees for services
related to providing and maintaining prosthetic devices that are
separate from the services unrelated to device maintenance, the
director must take into account the effect of the device's market price
and the costs of billing for future maintenance appointments on the
provider's ultimate reimbursement.
(b) No service covered under this title, including services
provided to injured workers, whether aliens or other injured workers,
who are not residing in the United States at the time of receiving the
services, shall be charged or paid at a rate or rates exceeding those
specified in ((such)) the fee schedule established under this
subsection, and no contract providing for greater fees shall be valid
as to the excess.
(c) The establishment of ((such)) a fee schedule, exclusive of
conversion factors, does not constitute "agency action" as used in RCW
34.05.010(3), nor does such a fee schedule constitute a "rule" as used
in RCW 34.05.010(16).
(3) The director or self-insurer, as the case may be, shall make a
record of the commencement of every disability and the termination
thereof and, when bills are rendered for the care and treatment of
injured workers, shall approve and pay those which conform to the
adopted rules, regulations, established fee schedules, and practices of
the director and may reject any bill or item thereof incurred in
violation of the principles laid down in this section or the rules,
regulations, or the established fee schedules and rules and regulations
adopted under it.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act expires June 30, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 2 of this act takes effect June 30,
2007.

--- END ---