BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that protecting the
public's health is essential and that the threat of potential pandemics
is ongoing and growing. The legislature also finds that the public
health system as defined in RCW 43.70.575 is essential to fulfilling
the state's responsibility to protect the health and safety of its
citizens. The legislature further finds that local public health
departments lack adequate resources even as their duties increase.
Rather than risk catastrophic loss of life, the legislature further
finds that local public health departments must immediately be given
the resources to effectively implement the specific public health
improvement standards concerning threats to our drinking water and food
supplies, communicable disease, and other first-responder duties unique
to local public health departments, pursuant to the requirements in RCW
43.70.520.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The sum of ten million dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2006, from the general fund to the department of health
for state funding the local public health standards adopted in the
public health services improvement plan pursuant to RCW 43.70.520(8).
The funds will support local public health departments' obligations
concerning health data and information that individuals and communities
can use; chronic and infectious disease surveillance; rapid response to
outbreaks of communicable disease; efforts to prevent and control
specific communicable diseases, such as tuberculosis, West Nile virus,
acquired immune deficiency syndrome, and influenza; and local public
health district programs to ensure the safety of drinking water and
food supplies.
(2) The sum of ten million dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2007,
from the general fund to the department of health for state funding the
local public health standards adopted in the public health services
improvement plan pursuant to RCW 43.70.520(8). The funds will support
local public health districts' obligations concerning health data and
information that individuals and communities can use; chronic and
infectious disease surveillance; rapid response to outbreaks of
communicable disease; efforts to prevent and control specific
communicable diseases, such as tuberculosis, West Nile virus, acquired
immune deficiency syndrome, and influenza; and local public health
district programs to ensure the safety of drinking water and food
supplies.

--- END ---