BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature declares that it is the
policy of the state of Washington to encourage and contribute to the
rehabilitation of felons and to assist them in the assumption of the
responsibilities of citizenship. The legislature recognizes that the
opportunity to secure employment or to pursue, practice, or engage in
a meaningful and profitable trade, occupation, vocation, profession, or
business is an essential ingredient to rehabilitation and the
assumption of the responsibilities of citizenship. To this end, it is
important for the offender to be able to respond to employment
inquiries according to RCW 9.94A.640(3) without fear of being
contradicted by a court file disclosing the vacated conviction.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.640 and 1987 c 486 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every offender who has been discharged under RCW 9.94A.637 may
apply to the sentencing court for a vacation of the offender's record
of conviction. If the court finds the offender meets the tests
prescribed in subsection (2) of this section, the court may clear the
record of conviction by: (a) Permitting the offender to withdraw the
offender's plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty; or (b) if
the offender has been convicted after a plea of not guilty, by the
court setting aside the verdict of guilty; and (c) by the court
dismissing the information or indictment against the offender.
(2) An offender may not have the record of conviction cleared if:
(a) There are any criminal charges against the offender pending in any
court of this state or another state, or in any federal court; (b) the
offense was a violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; (c) the
offense was a crime against persons as defined in RCW 43.43.830; (d)
the offender has been convicted of a new crime in this state, another
state, or federal court since the date of the offender's discharge
under RCW 9.94A.637; (e) the offense is a class B felony and less than
ten years have passed since the date the applicant was discharged under
RCW 9.94A.637; and (f) the offense was a class C felony and less than
five years have passed since the date the applicant was discharged
under RCW 9.94A.637.
(3) Once the court vacates a record of conviction under subsection
(1) of this section, the fact that the offender has been convicted of
the offense shall not be included in the offender's criminal history
for purposes of determining a sentence in any subsequent conviction,
and the offender shall be released from all penalties and disabilities
resulting from the offense. For all purposes, including responding to
questions on employment applications, an offender whose conviction has
been vacated may state that the offender has never been convicted of
that crime. Nothing in this section affects or prevents the use of an
offender's prior conviction in a later criminal prosecution.
(4) When a court vacates a record of conviction under this section,
the court may order the court clerk to seal the court file as provided
for under court rules, without requiring the offender to demonstrate
compelling circumstances. The order to seal the court file may allow
the deletion of the offender's name in the case index and the
substitution of the offender's name with his or her initials.

--- END ---