BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.105D.040 and 1997 c 406 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the
following persons are liable with respect to a facility:
(a) The owner or operator of the facility;
(b) Any person who owned or operated the facility at the time of
disposal or release of the hazardous substances;
(c) Any person who owned or possessed a hazardous substance and who
by contract, agreement, or otherwise arranged for disposal or treatment
of the hazardous substance at the facility, or arranged with a
transporter for transport for disposal or treatment of the hazardous
substances at the facility, or otherwise generated hazardous wastes
disposed of or treated at the facility;
(d) Any person (i) who accepts or accepted any hazardous substance
for transport to a disposal, treatment, or other facility selected by
such person from which there is a release or a threatened release for
which remedial action is required, unless such facility, at the time of
disposal or treatment, could legally receive such substance; or (ii)
who accepts a hazardous substance for transport to such a facility and
has reasonable grounds to believe that such facility is not operated in
accordance with chapter 70.105 RCW; and
(e) Any person who both sells a hazardous substance and is
responsible for written instructions for its use if (i) the substance
is used according to the instructions and (ii) the use constitutes a
release for which remedial action is required at the facility.
(2) Each person who is liable under this section is strictly
liable, jointly and severally, for all remedial action costs and for
all natural resource damages resulting from the releases or threatened
releases of hazardous substances. The attorney general, at the request
of the department, is empowered to recover all costs and damages from
persons liable therefor.
(3) The following persons are not liable under this section:
(a) Any person who can establish that the release or threatened
release of a hazardous substance for which the person would be
otherwise responsible was caused solely by:
(i) An act of God;
(ii) An act of war; or
(iii) An act or omission of a third party (including but not
limited to a trespasser) other than (A) an employee or agent of the
person asserting the defense, or (B) any person whose act or omission
occurs in connection with a contractual relationship existing, directly
or indirectly, with the person asserting this defense to liability.
This defense only applies where the person asserting the defense has
exercised the utmost care with respect to the hazardous substance, the
foreseeable acts or omissions of the third party, and the foreseeable
consequences of those acts or omissions;
(b) Any person who is an owner, past owner, or purchaser of a
facility and who can establish by a preponderance of the evidence that
at the time the facility was acquired by the person, the person had no
knowledge or reason to know that any hazardous substance, the release
or threatened release of which has resulted in or contributed to the
need for the remedial action, was released or disposed of on, in, or at
the facility. This subsection (b) is limited as follows:
(i) To establish that a person had no reason to know, the person
must have undertaken, at the time of acquisition, all appropriate
inquiry into the previous ownership and uses of the property,
consistent with good commercial or customary practice in an effort to
minimize liability. Any court interpreting this subsection (b) shall
take into account any specialized knowledge or experience on the part
of the person, the relationship of the purchase price to the value of
the property if uncontaminated, commonly known or reasonably
ascertainable information about the property, the obviousness of the
presence or likely presence of contamination at the property, and the
ability to detect such contamination by appropriate inspection;
(ii) The defense contained in this subsection (b) is not available
to any person who had actual knowledge of the release or threatened
release of a hazardous substance when the person owned the real
property and who subsequently transferred ownership of the property
without first disclosing such knowledge to the transferee;
(iii) The defense contained in this subsection (b) is not available
to any person who, by any act or omission, caused or contributed to the
release or threatened release of a hazardous substance at the facility;
(c) Any natural person who uses a hazardous substance lawfully and
without negligence for any personal or domestic purpose in or near a
dwelling or accessory structure when that person is: (i) A resident of
the dwelling; (ii) a person who, without compensation, assists the
resident in the use of the substance; or (iii) a person who is employed
by the resident, but who is not an independent contractor;
(d) Any person who, for the purpose of growing food crops, applies
pesticides or fertilizers without negligence and in accordance with all
applicable laws and regulations;
(e) Any person who was the former owner of a facility that is
residential in nature and was insured by the underground petroleum
storage tank insurance coverage provided in chapter 70.148 RCW at the
time that ownership in the facility was transferred. This subsection
(3)(e) only applies to liability for releases of heating oil, as that
term is defined in RCW 70.149.030, from underground storage tanks
located at the facility.
(4) There may be no settlement by the state with any person
potentially liable under this chapter except in accordance with this
section.
(a) The attorney general may agree to a settlement with any
potentially liable person only if the department finds, after public
notice and any required hearing, that the proposed settlement would
lead to a more expeditious cleanup of hazardous substances in
compliance with cleanup standards under RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) and with
any remedial orders issued by the department. Whenever practicable and
in the public interest, the attorney general may expedite such a
settlement with persons whose contribution is insignificant in amount
and toxicity. A hearing shall be required only if at least ten persons
request one or if the department determines a hearing is necessary.
(b) A settlement agreement under this section shall be entered as
a consent decree issued by a court of competent jurisdiction.
(c) A settlement agreement may contain a covenant not to sue only
of a scope commensurate with the settlement agreement in favor of any
person with whom the attorney general has settled under this section.
Any covenant not to sue shall contain a reopener clause which requires
the court to amend the covenant not to sue if factors not known at the
time of entry of the settlement agreement are discovered and present a
previously unknown threat to human health or the environment.
(d) A party who has resolved its liability to the state under this
section shall not be liable for claims for contribution regarding
matters addressed in the settlement. The settlement does not discharge
any of the other liable parties but it reduces the total potential
liability of the others to the state by the amount of the settlement.
(e) If the state has entered into a consent decree with an owner or
operator under this section, the state shall not enforce this chapter
against any owner or operator who is a successor in interest to the
settling party unless under the terms of the consent decree the state
could enforce against the settling party, if:
(i) The successor owner or operator is liable with respect to the
facility solely due to that person's ownership interest or operator
status acquired as a successor in interest to the owner or operator
with whom the state has entered into a consent decree; and
(ii) The stay of enforcement under this subsection does not apply
if the consent decree was based on circumstances unique to the settling
party that do not exist with regard to the successor in interest, such
as financial hardship. For consent decrees entered into before July
27, 1997, at the request of a settling party or a potential successor
owner or operator, the attorney general shall issue a written opinion
on whether a consent decree contains such unique circumstances. For
all other consent decrees, such unique circumstances shall be specified
in the consent decree.
(f) Any person who is not subject to enforcement by the state under
(e) of this subsection is not liable for claims for contribution
regarding matters addressed in the settlement.
(5)(a) In addition to the settlement authority provided under
subsection (4) of this section, the attorney general may agree to a
settlement with a person not currently liable for remedial action at a
facility who proposes to purchase, redevelop, or reuse the facility,
provided that:
(i) The settlement will yield substantial new resources to
facilitate cleanup;
(ii) The settlement will expedite remedial action consistent with
the rules adopted under this chapter; and
(iii) Based on available information, the department determines
that the redevelopment or reuse of the facility is not likely to
contribute to the existing release or threatened release, interfere
with remedial actions that may be needed at the site, or increase
health risks to persons at or in the vicinity of the site.
(b) The legislature recognizes that the state does not have
adequate resources to participate in all property transactions
involving contaminated property. The primary purpose of this
subsection (5) is to promote the cleanup and reuse of vacant or
abandoned commercial or industrial contaminated property. The attorney
general and the department may give priority to settlements that will
provide a substantial public benefit, including, but not limited to the
reuse of a vacant or abandoned manufacturing or industrial facility, or
the development of a facility by a governmental entity to address an
important public purpose.
(6) Nothing in this chapter affects or modifies in any way any
person's right to seek or obtain relief under other statutes or under
common law, including but not limited to damages for injury or loss
resulting from a release or threatened release of a hazardous
substance. No settlement by the department or remedial action ordered
by a court or the department affects any person's right to obtain a
remedy under common law or other statutes.

--- END ---