BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.149 RCW
to read as follows:
An owner or operator who has registered a heating oil tank for
coverage with the pollution liability insurance program is not liable
for a release from that tank if a subsequent eligible owner or operator
fails to register that tank for coverage with the program, regardless
of whether failure to register is intentional.

--- END ---