BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.148.120 and 1991 c 4 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature recognizes as a fundamental government purpose the
need to protect the environment and human health and safety. To that
end the state has enacted laws designed to limit and prevent
environmental damage and risk to public health and safety caused by
underground petroleum storage tank leaks. Because of the costs
associated with compliance with such laws and the high costs associated
with correcting past environmental damage, many owners and operators of
underground petroleum storage tanks have discontinued the use of or
have planned to discontinue the use of such tanks. As a consequence,
isolated communities face the loss of their source of motor vehicle
fuel and face the risk that the owner or operator will have
insufficient funds to take corrective action for pollution caused by
past leaks from the tanks. In particular, rural communities face the
risk that essential emergency, medical, fire and police services may be
disrupted through the diminution or elimination of local sellers of
petroleum products and by the closure of underground storage tanks
owned by local government entities serving these communities.
The legislature also recognizes as a fundamental government purpose
the need to preserve a minimum level of economic viability in rural
communities so that public revenues generated from economic activity
are sufficient to sustain necessary governmental functions. The
closing of local service stations adversely affects local economies by
reducing or eliminating reasonable access to fuel for agricultural,
commercial, recreational, and transportation needs.
The legislature intends to assist small communities within this
state by authorizing:
(1) Cities, towns, and counties to certify that a local private
owner or operator of an underground petroleum storage tank meets a
vital local government, public health or safety need thereby qualifying
the owner or operator for state financial assistance in complying with
environmental regulations and assistance in taking needed corrective
action for existing tank leaks; and
(2) Local government entities to obtain state financial assistance
to bring local government underground petroleum storage tanks into
compliance with environmental regulations and to take needed corrective
action for existing tank leaks.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.148.130 and 1991 c 4 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the conditions and limitations of RCW 70.148.120
through 70.148.170, the director shall establish and manage a program
for providing financial assistance to public and private owners and
operators of underground storage tanks who have been certified by the
governing body of the county, city, or town in which the tanks are
located as meeting a vital local government, public health or safety
need. In providing such financial assistance the director shall:
(a) Require owners and operators, including local government owners
and operators, to demonstrate serious financial hardship;
(b) Limit assistance to only that amount necessary to supplement
applicant financial resources;
(c) Limit assistance to no more than ((one)) two hundred ((fifty))
thousand dollars in value for any one underground storage tank site of
which amount no more than seventy-five thousand dollars in value may be
provided for corrective action; and
(d) Whenever practicable, provide assistance through the direct
payment of contractors and other professionals for labor, materials,
and other services.
(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in RCW 70.148.120 through
70.148.170, no grant of financial assistance may be used for any
purpose other than for corrective action and repair, replacement,
reconstruction, and improvement of underground storage tanks and tank
sites. If at any time prior to providing financial assistance or in
the course of providing such assistance, it appears to the director
that corrective action costs may exceed seventy-five thousand dollars,
the director may not provide further financial assistance until the
owner or operator has developed and implemented a corrective action
plan with the department of ecology.
(b) A grant of financial assistance may also be made to an owner or
operator that has discontinued using underground petroleum storage
tanks due to economic hardship. An owner or operator may receive a
grant up to two hundred thousand dollars per retailing location if:
(i) The property is located in an underserved rural area;
(ii) The property was previously used by a private owner or
operator to provide motor vehicle fuel; and
(iii) The property is at least ten miles from the nearest motor
vehicle fuel service station.
(3) When requests for financial assistance exceed available funds,
the director shall give preference to providing assistance first to
those underground storage tank sites which constitute the sole source
of petroleum products in remote rural communities.
(4) The director shall consult with the department of ecology in
approving financial assistance for corrective action to ensure
compliance with regulations governing underground petroleum storage
tanks and corrective action.
(5) The director shall approve or disapprove applications for
financial assistance within sixty days of receipt of a completed
application meeting the requirements of RCW 70.148.120 through
70.148.170. The certification by local government of an owner or
operator shall not preclude the director from disapproving an
application for financial assistance if the director finds that such
assistance would not meet the purposes of RCW 70.148.120 through
70.148.170.
(6) The director may adopt all rules necessary to implement the
financial assistance program and shall consult with the technical
advisory committee established under RCW 70.148.030 in developing such
rules and in reviewing applications for financial assistance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of one million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, may be expended from the pollution
liability insurance program trust account for the biennium year ending
July 1, 2007, to carry out the purposes of RCW 70.148.130(2)(b). The
director or director's designee shall administer the distribution of
these funds. A maximum of ten percent of the funds appropriated may be
used for administrative costs associated with the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 and 2 of this act expire June 1,
2007.

--- END ---