BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that emissions from
automobiles are a primary source of air quality degradation in the
state of Washington. The legislature further finds that motor vehicle
fuels, such as ethanol and biodiesel, that are blended with
agricultural products burn cleaner and result in cleaner air for the
densely populated urban areas of the state. Production of the crops
necessary to produce some of the cleaner burning blended fuels could
serve as an alternative market for Washington's farm families and
economically benefit the rural areas of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 19.112 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Unless otherwise provided under subsection (4) of this section,
all nondiesel motor fuels offered at retail sale in Washington must
contain at least ten percent ethanol by volume.
(2) Unless otherwise provided under subsection (4) of this section,
all diesel motor fuels offered at retail sale in Washington must
contain at least two percent biodiesel fuel by volume.
(3) Motor fuel producers may acquire the ethanol required to
satisfy the requirements of this section from any source authorized by
state or federal law.
(4) The director shall authorize the sale of motor fuels that do
not meet the requirements of this section if the director determines:
(a) That sufficient verifiable quantities of competitively priced
Washington-produced ethanol are not available to meet the minimum
requirements of this section; or
(b) Any other circumstances occur that would make compliance with
this section an undue hardship for the motor fuel manufacturer,
distributor, retailer, or consumer.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.112.010 and 1991 c 145 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Motor fuel" means any liquid product used for the generation
of power in an internal combustion engine used for the propulsion of a
motor vehicle upon the highways of this state. Motor fuels containing
ethanol may be marketed if either (a) the base motor fuel meets the
applicable standards before the addition of the ethanol or (b) the
resultant blend meets the applicable standards after the addition of
the ethanol.
(2) "Director" means the director of agriculture.
(3) "Biodiesel fuel" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.29A.135.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.12.955 and 2003 c 63 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of machinery and equipment, or to services rendered in respect to
installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving of eligible
machinery and equipment, or tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component of machinery and equipment used directly for
the retail sale of a biodiesel or alcohol fuel blend, or the
manufacture of ethanol.
(2) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of fuel delivery vehicles including repair parts and replacement
parts and to services rendered in respect to installing, repairing,
cleaning, altering, or improving the vehicles if at least seventy-five
percent of the fuel distributed by the vehicles is a biodiesel or
alcohol fuel blend.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the definitions in RCW
82.04.4334 and 82.08.955 apply.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2009.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.29A.135 and 2003 c 339 s 10 and 2003 c 261 s 10 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Alcohol fuel" means any alcohol made from a product other than
petroleum or natural gas, which is used alone or in combination with
gasoline or other petroleum products for use as a fuel for motor
vehicles, farm implements, and machines or implements of husbandry.
(b) "Biodiesel feedstock" means oil that is produced from an
agricultural crop for the sole purpose of ultimately producing
biodiesel fuel.
(c) "Biodiesel fuel" means a mono alkyl ester of long chain fatty
acids derived from vegetable oils or animal fats for use in
compression-ignition engines and that meets the requirements of the
American society of testing and materials specification D 6751 in
effect as of January 1, 2003.
(d) "Wood biomass fuel" means a pyrolytic liquid fuel or synthesis
gas-derived liquid fuel, used in internal combustion engines, and
produced from wood, forest, or field residue, or dedicated energy crops
that do not include wood pieces that have been treated with chemical
preservatives such as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper-chroma-arsenic.
(2)(a) All leasehold interests in buildings, machinery, equipment,
and other personal property which is used primarily for the
manufacturing of alcohol fuel, wood biomass fuel, ethanol, biodiesel
fuel, or biodiesel feedstock, the land upon which this property is
located, and land that is reasonably necessary in the manufacturing of
alcohol fuel, wood biomass fuel, ethanol, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel
feedstock, but not land necessary for growing of crops, which together
comprise a new manufacturing facility or an addition to an existing
manufacturing facility, are exempt from leasehold taxes for a period of
six years from the date on which the facility or the addition to the
existing facility becomes operational.
(b) For manufacturing facilities which produce products in addition
to alcohol fuel, wood biomass fuel, ethanol, biodiesel fuel, or
biodiesel feedstock, the amount of the leasehold tax exemption shall be
based upon the annual percentage of the total value of all products
manufactured that is the value of the alcohol fuel, wood biomass fuel,
ethanol, biodiesel fuel, and biodiesel feedstock manufactured.
(3) Claims for exemptions authorized by this section shall be filed
with the department of revenue on forms prescribed by the department of
revenue and furnished by the department of revenue. Once filed, the
exemption is valid for six years and shall not be renewed. The
department of revenue shall verify and approve claims as the department
of revenue determines to be justified and in accordance with this
section. No claims may be filed after December 31, 2009.
The department of revenue may promulgate such rules, pursuant to
chapter 34.05 RCW, as are necessary to properly administer this
section.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.08.955 and 2003 c 63 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
machinery and equipment, or to services rendered in respect to
constructing structures, installing, constructing, repairing, cleaning,
decorating, altering, or improving of structures or machinery and
equipment, or to sales of tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component of structures or machinery and equipment, if
the machinery, equipment, or structure is used directly for the retail
sale of a biodiesel or alcohol fuel blend, or for the manufacture of
ethanol. Structures and machinery and equipment that are used for the
retail sale of a biodiesel or alcohol fuel blend, or for the
manufacture of ethanol, and for other purposes are exempt only on the
portion used directly for the retail sale of a biodiesel or alcohol
fuel blend.
(2) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of fuel
delivery vehicles or to sales of or charges made for labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving the vehicles including repair parts and replacement parts if
at least seventy-five percent of the fuel distributed by the vehicles
is a biodiesel or alcohol fuel blend.
(3) A person taking the exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(4) For the purposes of this section, the definitions in RCW
82.04.4334 and this subsection apply.
(a) "Alcohol fuel blend" means fuel that contains at least eighty-five percent alcohol fuel by volume.
(b) "Biodiesel blend" means fuel that contains at least twenty
percent biodiesel fuel by volume.
(c) "Machinery and equipment" means industrial fixtures, devices,
and support facilities and tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component thereof, including repair parts and replacement
parts that are integral and necessary for the delivery of biodiesel or
alcohol fuel blends into the fuel tank of a motor vehicle.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2009.

Sec. 7 RCW 84.36.635 and 2003 c 261 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Alcohol fuel" means any alcohol made from a product other than
petroleum or natural gas, which is used alone or in combination with
gasoline or other petroleum products for use as a fuel for motor
vehicles, farm implements, and machines or implements of husbandry.
(b) "Biodiesel feedstock" means oil that is produced from an
agricultural crop for the sole purpose of ultimately producing
biodiesel fuel.
(c) "Biodiesel fuel" means a mono alkyl ester of long chain fatty
acids derived from vegetable oils or animal fats for use in
compression-ignition engines and that meets the requirements of the
American society of testing and materials specification D 6751 in
effect as of January 1, 2003.
(2)(a) All buildings, machinery, equipment, and other personal
property which is used primarily for the manufacturing of alcohol fuel,
ethanol, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock, the land upon which
this property is located, and land that is reasonably necessary in the
manufacturing of alcohol fuel, ethanol, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel
feedstock, but not land necessary for growing of crops, which together
comprise a new manufacturing facility or an addition to an existing
manufacturing facility, are exempt from property taxation for the six
assessment years following the date on which the facility or the
addition to the existing facility becomes operational.
(b) For manufacturing facilities which produce products in addition
to alcohol fuel, ethanol, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock, the
amount of the property tax exemption shall be based upon the annual
percentage of the total value of all products manufactured that is the
value of the alcohol fuel, ethanol, biodiesel fuel, and biodiesel
feedstock manufactured.
(3) Claims for exemptions authorized by this section shall be filed
with the county assessor on forms prescribed by the department of
revenue and furnished by the assessor. Once filed, the exemption is
valid for six years and shall not be renewed. The assessor shall
verify and approve claims as the assessor determines to be justified
and in accordance with this section. No claims may be filed after
December 31, 2009.
The department of revenue may ((promulgate)) adopt such rules,
pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, as necessary to properly administer this
section.

Sec. 8 RCW 82.04.260 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 4 and 2003 2nd
sp.s. c 1 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing:
(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into
soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola byproducts,
or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola byproduct
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;
(b) Seafood products which remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw
salted state at the completion of the manufacturing by that person; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the value of the products manufactured, multiplied by the
rate of 0.138 percent;
(c) By canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating
fresh fruits and vegetables, or selling at wholesale fresh fruits and
vegetables canned, preserved, frozen, processed, or dehydrated by the
seller and sold to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of
business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
products canned, preserved, frozen, processed, or dehydrated multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent. As proof of sale to a person who
transports in the ordinary course of business goods out of this state,
the seller shall annually provide a statement in a form prescribed by
the department and retain the statement as a business record;
(d) Dairy products that as of September 20, 2001, are identified in
21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135, including byproducts
from the manufacturing of the dairy products such as whey and casein;
or selling the same to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course
of business the goods out of state; as to such persons the tax imposed
shall be equal to the value of the products manufactured multiplied by
the rate of 0.138 percent. As proof of sale to a person who transports
in the ordinary course of business goods out of this state, the seller
shall annually provide a statement in a form prescribed by the
department and retain the statement as a business record;
(e) Alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock, as those
terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135, or ethanol; as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to the business shall be equal to the value
of alcohol fuel, ethanol, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. This subsection
(1)(e) expires July 1, 2009; and
(f) Alcohol fuel or wood biomass fuel, as those terms are defined
in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to
the business shall be equal to the value of alcohol fuel or wood
biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
peas split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association
engaging within this state in research and development, as to such
corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such
activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products
and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such
persons the tax imposed shall be equal to the gross proceeds derived
from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales, at retail or wholesale, of nuclear fuel assemblies
manufactured by that person, as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales
of the assemblies multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing nuclear fuel assemblies, as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
products manufactured multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to such activities shall be equal to the
gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of
0.275 percent.
(8) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an
international steamship agent, international customs house broker,
international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in
foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international
activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(9) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of
goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied
by the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to taxation under this
subsection shall be exempt from payment of taxes imposed by chapter
82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under
this subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to
the conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or
foreign commerce are defined as all activities of a labor, service or
transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or
from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or
similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or similar holding
or storage yard or area to await further movement in import or export
or may move to a consolidation freight station and be stuffed,
unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or
aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for
delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this
definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of
cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a
convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation
services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care,
custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo;
imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal
stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited
to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers,
trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship
hatch covers.
(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to
such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the gross income of the business, excluding any fees
imposed under chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3
percent.
If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities
both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to
this state shall be determined in accordance with the methods of
apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.
(11) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance
agent, insurance broker, or insurance solicitor licensed under chapter
48.17 RCW; as to such persons, the amount of the tax with respect to
such licensed activities shall be equal to the gross income of such
business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(12) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a
hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a
nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political
subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to
such activities shall be equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and 1.5
percent thereafter. The moneys collected under this subsection shall
be deposited in the health services account created under RCW
43.72.900.
(13)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging
within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial
airplanes, or components of such airplanes, as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business shall, in the case of
manufacturers, be equal to the value of the product manufactured, or in
the case of processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the
business, multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through the later of June
30, 2007, or the day preceding the date final assembly of a
superefficient airplane begins in Washington state, as determined under
RCW 82.32.550; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning on the later of July 1, 2007, or the
date final assembly of a superefficient airplane begins in Washington
state, as determined under RCW 82.32.550.
(b) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging within
this state in the business of making sales, at retail or wholesale, of
commercial airplanes, or components of such airplanes, manufactured by
that person, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the airplanes
or components multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through the later of June
30, 2007, or the day preceding the date final assembly of a
superefficient airplane begins in Washington state, as determined under
RCW 82.32.550; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning on the later of July 1, 2007, or the
date final assembly of a superefficient airplane begins in Washington
state, as determined under RCW 82.32.550.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (13), "commercial
airplane," "component," and "final assembly of a superefficient
airplane" have the meanings given in RCW 82.32.550.
(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person eligible for the tax rate under this subsection (13) must report
as required under RCW 82.32.545.
(e) This subsection (13) does not apply after the earlier of: July
1, 2024; or December 31, 2007, if assembly of a superefficient airplane
does not begin by December 31, 2007, as determined under RCW 82.32.550.

--- END ---