BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.32.120 and 2003 c 337 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislative authorities of the several counties shall:
(1) Provide for the erection and repairing of court houses, jails,
and other necessary public buildings for the use of the county;
(2) Lay out, discontinue, or alter county roads and highways within
their respective counties, and do all other necessary acts relating
thereto according to law, except within cities and towns which have
jurisdiction over the roads within their limits;
(3) License and fix the rates of ferriage; grant grocery and other
licenses authorized by law to be by them granted at fees set by the
legislative authorities which shall not exceed the costs of
administration and operation of such licensed activities;
(4) Fix the amount of county taxes to be assessed according to the
provisions of law, and cause the same to be collected as prescribed by
law;
(5) Allow all accounts legally chargeable against the county not
otherwise provided for, and audit the accounts of all officers having
the care, management, collection, or disbursement of any money
belonging to the county or appropriated to its benefit;
(6) Have the care of the county property and the management of the
county funds and business and in the name of the county prosecute and
defend all actions for and against the county, and such other powers as
are or may be conferred by law;
(7) Make and enforce, by appropriate resolutions or ordinances, all
such police and sanitary regulations as are not in conflict with state
law, and within the unincorporated area of the county may adopt by
reference Washington state statutes and recognized codes and/or
compilations printed in book form relating to the construction of
buildings, the installation of plumbing, the installation of electric
wiring, health, or other subjects, and may adopt such codes and/or
compilations or portions thereof, together with amendments thereto, or
additions thereto: PROVIDED, That except for Washington state
statutes, there shall be filed in the county auditor's office one copy
of such codes and compilations ten days prior to their adoption by
reference, and additional copies may also be filed in library or city
offices within the county as deemed necessary by the county legislative
authority: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no such regulation, code,
compilation, and/or statute shall be effective unless before its
adoption, a public hearing has been held thereon by the county
legislative authority of which at least ten days' notice has been
given. Any violation of such regulations, ordinances, codes,
compilations, and/or statutes or resolutions shall constitute a
misdemeanor or a civil violation subject to a monetary penalty:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That violation of a regulation, ordinance, code,
compilation, and/or statute relating to traffic including parking,
standing, stopping, and pedestrian offenses is a traffic infraction,
except that violation of a regulation, ordinance, code, compilation,
and/or statute equivalent to those provisions of Title 46 RCW set forth
in RCW 46.63.020 remains a misdemeanor. However, the punishment for
any criminal ordinance shall be the same as the punishment provided in
state law for the same crime and no act that is a state crime may be
made a civil violation. The notice must set out a copy of the proposed
regulations or summarize the content of each proposed regulation; or if
a code is adopted by reference the notice shall set forth the full
official title and a statement describing the general purpose of such
code. For purposes of this subsection, a summary shall mean a brief
description which succinctly describes the main points of the proposed
regulation. When the county publishes a summary, the publication shall
include a statement that the full text of the proposed regulation will
be mailed upon request. An inadvertent mistake or omission in
publishing the text or a summary of the content of a proposed
regulation shall not render the regulation invalid if it is adopted.
The notice shall also include the day, hour, and place of hearing and
must be given by publication in the newspaper in which legal notices of
the county are printed;
(8) Have power to compound and release in whole or in part any debt
due to the county when in their opinion the interest of their county
will not be prejudiced thereby, except in cases where they or any of
them are personally interested;
(9) Have power to administer oaths or affirmations necessary in the
discharge of their duties and commit for contempt any witness refusing
to testify before them with the same power as district judges;
(10) Have power to declare by ordinance what shall be deemed a
nuisance within the county, including but not limited to "litter" and
"potentially dangerous litter" as defined in RCW 70.93.030; to prevent,
remove, and abate a nuisance at the expense of the parties creating,
causing, or committing the nuisance; and to levy a special assessment
on the land or premises on which the nuisance is situated to defray the
cost, or to reimburse the county for the cost of abating it. This
assessment shall constitute a lien against the property which shall be
of equal rank with state, county, and municipal taxes;
(11) Have power to declare by ordinance what shall be deemed
nuisances within the county; to prevent, remove, and abate nuisances at
the expense of the parties creating, causing, or committing or
maintaining them; and to levy a special assessment on the land or
premises on which the nuisance is situated to defray the cost, or to
reimburse the county for the cost of abating it, and this assessment
shall constitute a lien against the property which shall be of equal
rank with state, county, and municipal taxes.

--- END ---