BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.96.060 and 2001 c 140 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every person convicted of ((a)) misdemeanor or gross
misdemeanor offenses who has completed all of the terms of the
sentences for the misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor offenses may apply
to the sentencing court for a vacation of the applicant's records of
conviction for the offenses. If the court finds the applicant meets
the tests prescribed in subsection (2) of this section, the court may
in its discretion vacate the records of conviction by: (a)(i)
Permitting the applicant to withdraw the applicant's plea of guilty and
to enter a plea of not guilty; or (ii) if the applicant has been
convicted after a plea of not guilty, the court setting aside the
verdicts of guilty; and (b) the court dismissing the informations,
indictments, complaints, or citations against the applicant and
vacating the judgments and sentences.
(2) An applicant may not have the record of conviction for a
misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor offense vacated if any one of the
following is present:
(a) There are any criminal charges against the applicant pending in
any court of this state or another state, or in any federal court;
(b) The offense was a violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030
or an attempt to commit a violent offense;
(c) The offense was a violation of RCW 46.61.502 (driving while
under the influence), 46.61.504 (actual physical control while under
the influence), or 9.91.020 (operating a railroad, etc. while
intoxicated);
(d) The offense was any misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor violation,
including attempt, of chapter 9.68 RCW (obscenity and pornography),
chapter 9.68A RCW (sexual exploitation of children), or chapter 9A.44
RCW (sex offenses);
(e) The applicant was convicted of a misdemeanor or gross
misdemeanor offense as defined in RCW 10.99.020, or the court
determines after a review of the court file that the offense was
committed by one family member or household member against another, or
the court, after considering the damage to person or property that
resulted in the conviction, any prior convictions for crimes defined in
RCW 10.99.020, or for comparable offenses in another state or in
federal court, and the totality of the records under review by the
court regarding the conviction being considered for vacation,
determines that the offense involved domestic violence, and any one of
the following factors exist:
(i) The applicant has not provided written notification of the
vacation petition to the prosecuting attorney's office that prosecuted
the offense for which vacation is sought, or has not provided that
notification to the court;
(ii) The applicant has previously had a conviction for domestic
violence. For purposes of this subsection, however, if the current
application is for more than one conviction that arose out of a single
incident, none of those convictions counts as a previous conviction;
(iii) The applicant has signed an affidavit under penalty of
perjury affirming that the applicant has not previously had a
conviction for a domestic violence offense, and a criminal history
check reveals that the applicant has had such a conviction; or
(iv) Less than five years have elapsed since the person completed
the terms of the original conditions of the sentence, including any
financial obligations and successful completion of any treatment
ordered as a condition of sentencing;
(f) For any offense other than those described in (e) of this
subsection, less than three years have passed since the person
completed the terms of the sentence, including any financial
obligations;
(g) The offender has been convicted of a new crime in this state,
another state, or federal court since the date of conviction and less
than three years have passed since the person completed the terms of
the sentence for the newer offense; or
(h) ((The applicant has ever had the record of another conviction
vacated; or
(i))) The applicant is currently restrained, or has been restrained
within five years prior to the vacation application, by a domestic
violence protection order, a no-contact order, an antiharassment order,
or a civil restraining order which restrains one party from contacting
the other party.
(3) Once the court vacates a record of conviction under subsection
(1) of this section, the person shall be released from all penalties
and disabilities resulting from the offense and the fact that the
person has been convicted of the offense shall not be included in the
person's criminal history for purposes of determining a sentence in any
subsequent conviction. For all purposes, including responding to
questions on employment or housing applications, a person whose
conviction has been vacated under subsection (1) of this section may
state that he or she has never been convicted of that crime. Nothing
in this section affects or prevents the use of an offender's prior
conviction in a later criminal prosecution.
(4) All costs incurred by the court and probation services shall be
paid by the person making the motion to vacate the record unless a
determination is made pursuant to chapter 10.101 RCW that the person
making the motion is indigent, at the time the motion is brought.
(5) The clerk of the court in which the vacation order is entered
shall immediately transmit the order vacating the conviction to the
Washington state patrol identification section and to the local police
agency, if any, which holds criminal history information for the person
who is the subject of the conviction. The Washington state patrol and
any such local police agency shall immediately update their records to
reflect the vacation of the conviction, and shall transmit the order
vacating the conviction to the federal bureau of investigation. A
conviction that has been vacated under this section may not be
disseminated or disclosed by the state patrol or local law enforcement
agency to any person, except other criminal justice enforcement
agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature respectfully requests the
judicial information system dissemination subcommittee to examine ways
that vacated misdemeanor and felony records can be better protected
from public disclosure, including the possibility of sealing records,
in order to permit individuals with vacated records to respond to
inquiries without fear of being contradicted by background checks that
reveal their vacated convictions.

--- END ---