BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 39.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The capital projects review board is created in the office of
financial management to provide ongoing oversight and evaluation of
public capital projects construction processes, including the impact of
contracting methods on project outcomes, and to advise the legislature
on policies related to major public works delivery methods.
(2)(a) The capital projects review board shall consist of the
following members appointed by the governor: One representative from
construction general contracting; one representative from the design
industries; two representatives from construction specialty
subcontracting; one representative from a construction trades labor
organization; one representative from a city; one representative from
a county; one representative from the office of minority and women's
business enterprises; one representative from a higher education
institution; one representative from the department of general
administration; and one representative of a domestic insurer authorized
to write surety bonds for contractors in Washington state. All
appointed members must be actively engaged in or authorized to use
alternative public works contracting procedures.
(b) One member shall be a member of the public hospital district
project review board, selected by that board, who shall be nonvoting.
(c) One member shall be a member of the school district project
review board, selected by that board, who shall be nonvoting.
(d) The executive officer of the review board, as named in
subsection (10) of this section, shall serve as a nonvoting member.
(e) The review board shall include two members of the house of
representatives, one from each major caucus, appointed by the speaker
of the house of representatives, and two members of the senate, one
from each major caucus, appointed by the president of the senate.
Legislative members are nonvoting.
(3) Members selected under subsection (2)(a) of this section shall
serve for terms of four years, with the terms expiring on June 30th on
the fourth year of the term. However, in the case of the initial
members, four members shall serve four-year terms, four members shall
serve three-year terms, and three members shall serve a two-year term,
with each of the terms expiring on June 30th of the applicable year.
Appointees may be reappointed to serve more than one term.
(4) The capital projects review board chair is selected from among
the appointed members by the majority vote of the voting members.
(5) The capital projects review board may adopt rules as necessary
to carry out the duties set forth in this act.
(6) Legislative members of the capital projects review board shall
be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120.
Nonlegislative members of the capital projects review board, including
any subcommittee members, except those representing an employer or
organization, shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(7) If a vacancy occurs of the appointive members of the board, the
governor shall fill the vacancy for the unexpired term. Members of the
board may be removed for malfeasance or misfeasance in office, upon
specific written charges by the governor, under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(8) The capital projects review board shall convene as soon as
practical after July 1, 2005, and may meet as often as necessary
thereafter.
(9) Capital projects review board members are expected to
consistently attend review board meetings. The chair of the capital
projects review board may ask the governor to remove any member who
misses more than two meetings in any calendar year without cause.
(10) The office of financial management shall employ a director of
the review board. The director shall be the executive officer of the
review board and shall administer the provisions of this act. The
office of financial management shall provide additional staff support
as may be required for the proper discharge of the function of the
capital projects review board.
(11) The capital projects review board may establish subcommittees
as it desires and may invite nonmembers of the capital projects review
board to serve as committee members.
(a) The school district project review board shall be a
subcommittee of the capital projects review board and shall approve
projects as outlined in RCW 39.10.115.
(b) The public hospital district project review board shall be a
subcommittee of the capital projects review board and shall approve
projects as outlined in RCW 39.10.117.
(12) The committee shall encourage participation from persons and
entities not represented on the capital projects review board.
(13) For purposes of this act, major capital projects are projects
estimated to cost over five million dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 39.10 RCW
to read as follows:
The capital projects review board has the following powers and
duties:
(1) Provide ongoing analysis and evaluation of the use of the
traditional public works procedures and alternative public works
contracting procedures authorized under this chapter and evaluate the
potential future use of other alternative contracting procedures;
(2) Ensure that consistent, reliable, and standardized project
information is gathered and used to analyze the impact of contracting
policies on the outcome of major capital projects. The review board
shall, in consultation with the office of financial management, develop
standardized statewide performance indicators and benchmarks for all
major capital projects. These measures should, at a minimum, allow
basic comparisons of project performance by type, scope, cost,
schedule, quality, and contracting procedure. To avoid unnecessary
duplication, use of these indicators and benchmarks should be
incorporated into, or derived from, existing state and local agency
reports to the greatest extent possible;
(3) Establish criteria that may be used to determine effective and
feasible use of alternative contracting procedures;
(4) Develop and recommend to the legislature qualification
standards for general contractors bidding on alternative public works
projects;
(5) Develop and recommend to the legislature policies to further
enhance the quality, efficiency, and accountability of major capital
construction projects through the use of traditional and alternative
delivery methods in Washington, and make recommendations regarding
expansion, continuation, elimination, or modification of the
alternative public works contracting methods;
(6) Public bodies using the alternative contracting procedures
authorized under this chapter shall provide any requested information
concerning implementation of projects under this chapter to the
committee in a timely manner, excepting any trade secrets or
proprietary information;
(7) Encourage the transfer of knowledge through formal or informal
mentoring opportunities and the development of model documents or
guidelines that incorporate lessons learned from previous state and
local projects; and
(8) Periodically assess the use of alternative dispute resolution
processes in public works projects to determine their effectiveness at
resolving conflicts and disputes before they reach litigation and, if
necessary, recommend to the legislature modifications of state policy.
The review board may work with public and private dispute resolution
organizations to inform agencies about effective methods of
incorporating dispute resolution mechanisms into their public works
projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2005, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---