BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.36.005 and 1996 c 54 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that:
(1) As the number of people in the state grows, wildlife management
techniques change, and wildlife habitat is altered, people will
encounter wildlife more frequently. As a result, conflicts between
humans and wildlife will also increase. Wildlife is a public resource
of significant value to the people of the state and the responsibility
to minimize and resolve these conflicts is shared by all citizens of
the state.
(2) In particular, the state recognizes the importance of
commercial agricultural and horticultural crop production, the state's
commercial livestock industry, and the value of healthy ((deer and
elk)) wildlife populations, which can damage ((such)) crops and
commercial livestock. The legislature further finds that damage
prevention is key to maintaining healthy ((deer and elk)) wildlife
populations, wildlife-related recreational opportunities, ((and))
commercially productive agricultural and horticultural crops, and a
thriving commercial livestock industry, and that the state,
participants in wildlife recreation, and private landowners and tenants
share the responsibility for damage prevention. Toward this end, the
legislature encourages landowners and tenants to contribute through
their land management practices to healthy wildlife populations and to
provide access for related recreation. It is in the best interests of
the state for the department ((of fish and wildlife)) to respond
quickly to wildlife damage complaints and to work with these landowners
and tenants to minimize and/or prevent damages and conflicts while
maintaining ((deer and elk)) wildlife populations for enjoyment by all
citizens of the state.
(3) A timely and simplified process for resolving claims for
damages caused by ((deer and elk)) wildlife for commercial agricultural
((or)), horticultural, or commercial livestock products is beneficial
to the claimant and the state.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.36.010 and 1996 c 54 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless otherwise specified,)) The ((following)) definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter((:)) unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Commercial livestock" means cattle, sheep, and horses held or
raised by a person for sale, trade, or barter, and from which the
person derives an annual income from the sales of the animals in excess
of ten thousand dollars.
(2) "Crop" means a commercially raised horticultural and/or
agricultural product and includes growing or harvested product but does
not include livestock. For the purposes of this chapter all parts of
horticultural trees shall be considered a crop and shall be eligible
for claims.
(((2))) (3) "Emergency" means an unforeseen circumstance beyond the
control of the landowner or tenant that presents a real and immediate
threat to crops, domestic animals, or fowl.
(((3))) (4) "Immediate family member" means spouse, brother,
sister, grandparent, parent, child, or grandchild.
(5) "Predatory wildlife" means bears and cougars.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.36.040 and 1996 c 54 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Pursuant to this section, the director or the director's
designee may distribute money appropriated to pay claims for damages to
crops caused by wild deer or elk in an amount of up to ten thousand
dollars per claim. Damages payable under this section are limited to
the value of such commercially raised horticultural or agricultural
crops, whether growing or harvested, and shall be paid only to the
owner of the crop at the time of damage, without assignment. Damages
shall not include damage to other real or personal property including
other vegetation or animals, damages caused by animals other than wild
deer or elk, lost profits, consequential damages, or any other damages
whatsoever. ((These damages))
(b) Pursuant to this section, the director or the director's
designee may distribute money appropriated to reimburse the owner of
commercial livestock that has been killed by predatory wildlife, or
injured by predatory wildlife to such a degree that the commercial
value of the commercial livestock has been diminished. Each individual
animal represents one claim, and each claim must be paid the fair
market value of the killed or injured animal as determined by the
director upon recommendation of the department of agriculture.
(c) Damage claim payments under this section shall comprise the
exclusive remedy for claims against the state for damages caused by
wildlife.
(2) The director may adopt rules for the form of affidavits or
proof to be provided in claims under this section. The director may
adopt rules to specify the time and method of assessing damage. The
burden of proving damages shall be on the claimant. Payment of claims
shall remain subject to the other conditions and limits of this
chapter.
(3) If funds are limited, payments of claims shall be prioritized
in the order that the claims are received. No claim may be processed
if:
(a) The claimant did not notify the department within ten days of
discovery of ((the)) damage to crops or within seventy-two hours of the
discovery of a predatory wildlife attack on commercial livestock. If
the claimant intends to take steps that prevent determination of
damages, such as harvest of damaged crops, then the claimant shall
notify the department as soon as reasonably possible after discovery so
that the department has an opportunity to document the damage and take
steps to prevent additional damage; or
(b) The claimant did not present a complete, written claim within
sixty days after the damage, or the last day of damaging if the damage
was of a continuing nature.
(4) The director or the director's designee may examine and assess
the damage upon notice. The department and claimant may agree to an
assessment of damages by a neutral person or persons knowledgeable in
horticultural ((or)), agricultural, or commercial livestock practices.
The department and claimant shall share equally in the costs of such
third party examination and assessment of damage.
(5) There shall be no payment for damages if:
(a) The crops are on lands leased from any public agency;
(b) The landowner or claimant failed to use or maintain applicable
damage prevention materials or methods furnished by the department, or
failed to comply with a wildlife damage prevention agreement under RCW
77.12.260;
(c) The director has expended all funds appropriated for payment of
such claims for the current fiscal year; or
(d) The damages are covered by insurance. The claimant shall
notify the department at the time of claim of insurance coverage in the
manner required by the director. Insurance coverage shall cover all
damages prior to any payment under this chapter.
(6) When there is a determination of claim by the director or the
director's designee pursuant to this section, the claimant has sixty
days to accept the claim or it is deemed rejected.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.36.050 and 1996 c 54 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
If the claimant does not accept the director's decision under RCW
77.36.040, or if the claim exceeds ten thousand dollars, then the claim
may be filed with the ((office of)) risk management division of the
office of financial management under RCW 4.92.040(5). The ((office
of)) risk management division shall recommend to the legislature
whether the claim should be paid. If the legislature approves the
claim, the director shall pay it from moneys appropriated for that
purpose. No funds shall be expended for damages under this chapter
except as appropriated by the legislature.

Sec. 5 RCW 77.36.060 and 1996 c 54 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director may refuse to consider and pay claims ((of)) for
damage to crops for persons who have posted the property against
hunting or who have not allowed public hunting during the season prior
to the occurrence of the damages.

Sec. 6 RCW 77.36.070 and 1996 c 54 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department may pay no more than one hundred twenty thousand
dollars per fiscal year from the ((wildlife)) general fund for claims
under RCW 77.36.040 and for assessment costs and compromise of claims.
Such money shall be used to pay animal damage claims only if the claim
meets the conditions of RCW 77.36.040 and, for crop claims only, the
damage occurred in a place where the opportunity to hunt was not
restricted or prohibited by a county, municipality, or other public
entity during the season prior to the occurrence of the damage.

Sec. 7 RCW 77.36.080 and 1996 c 54 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may pay no more than thirty thousand dollars per
fiscal year from the general fund for claims under RCW 77.36.040 and
for assessment costs and compromise of claims unless the legislature
declares an emergency. Such money shall be used to pay animal damage
claims only if the claim meets the conditions of RCW 77.36.040 and, for
crop claims only, the damage occurred in a place where the opportunity
to hunt was restricted or prohibited by a county, municipality, or
other public entity during the season prior to the occurrence of the
damage.
(2) The legislature may declare an emergency, defined for the
purposes of this section as any happening arising from weather, other
natural conditions, or fire that causes unusually great damage to
((commercially raised)) commercial livestock by predatory wildlife or
agricultural or horticultural crops by deer or elk. In an emergency,
the department may pay as much as may be subsequently appropriated, in
addition to the funds authorized under subsection (1) of this section,
for claims under RCW 77.36.040 and for assessment and compromise of
claims. Such money shall be used to pay animal damage claims only if
the claim meets the conditions of RCW 77.36.040 and the department has
expended all funds authorized under RCW 77.36.070 or subsection (1) of
this section.

--- END ---