BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.15.245 and 2001 c 253 s 31 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 77.12.240, 77.36.020,
77.36.030, or any other provisions of law, it is unlawful to take,
hunt, or attract black bear with the aid of bait.
(a) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the
killing of black bear with the aid of bait by employees or agents of
county, state, or federal agencies while acting in their official
capacities for the purpose of protecting livestock, domestic animals,
private property, or the public safety.
(b) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prevent the
establishment and operation of feeding stations for black bear in order
to prevent damage to commercial timberland.
(c) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the
director from issuing a permit or memorandum of understanding to a
public agency, university, or scientific or educational institution for
the use of bait to attract black bear for scientific purposes.
(d) As used in this subsection, "bait" means a substance placed,
exposed, deposited, distributed, scattered, or otherwise used for the
purpose of attracting black bears to an area where one or more persons
hunt or intend to hunt them.
(2) Notwithstanding RCW 77.12.240, 77.36.020, 77.36.030, or any
other provisions of law, it is unlawful to hunt or pursue black bear,
cougar, bobcat, or lynx with the aid of a dog or dogs.
(a) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the
killing of black bear, cougar, bobcat, or lynx with the aid of a dog or
dogs by employees or agents of county, state, or federal agencies while
acting in their official capacities for the purpose of protecting
livestock, domestic animals, private property, or the public safety.
A dog or dogs may be used by the owner or tenant of real property
consistent with a permit issued and conditioned by the director.
(b) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the
director from issuing a permit or memorandum of understanding to a
public agency, university, or scientific or educational institution for
the use of a dog or dogs for the pursuit, capture and relocation, of
black bear, cougar, bobcat, or lynx for scientific purposes.
(c) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the
director from issuing a permit or memorandum of understanding to a
public agency, university, or scientific or educational institution for
the use of a dog or dogs for the killing of black bear, cougar, or
bobcat, for the protection of a state and/or federally listed
threatened or endangered species.
(3)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, the
commission shall authorize the use of dogs only in selected areas
within a game management unit to address a public safety need presented
by one or more cougar. This authority may only be exercised after the
commission has determined that no other practical alternative to the
use of dogs exists, and after the commission has adopted rules
describing the conditions in which dogs may be used. Conditions that
may warrant the use of dogs within a game management unit include, but
are not limited to, confirmed cougar/human safety incidents, confirmed
cougar/livestock and cougar/pet depredations, and the number of cougar
capture attempts and relocations.
(b) The department shall post on their internet web site the known
details of all reported cougar/human, cougar/pet, or cougar/livestock
interactions within ten days of receiving the report. The posted
material must include, but is not limited to, the location and time of
all reported sightings, and the known details of any cougar/livestock
incidents.
(4) A person who violates subsection (1) or (2) of this section is
guilty of a gross misdemeanor. In addition to appropriate criminal
penalties, the department shall revoke the hunting license of a person
who violates subsection (1) or (2) of this section and order the
suspension of wildlife hunting privileges for a period of five years
following the revocation. Following a subsequent violation of
subsection (1) or (2) of this section by the same person, a hunting
license shall not be issued to the person at any time.

--- END ---