BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that assisting
recipients of the WorkFirst program and other individuals who are
seeking jobs with job training and job placement services is critical
to supporting the self-sufficiency of families as well as the economic
well-being of the state. Job training and placement services are
currently offered through multiple agencies and programs, each with
their own eligibility requirements and funding sources.
The legislature intends to improve the efficiency and effectiveness
of job training and placement services for recipients of the WorkFirst
program and other individuals who are seeking jobs by integrating the
delivery of those services in communities across the state.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.08A.280 and 1997 c 58 s 315 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that moving those eligible for assistance
to self-sustaining employment is a goal of the WorkFirst program. It
is the intent of WorkFirst to aid a participant's progress to self-sufficiency by allowing flexibility within the statewide program to
reflect community resources, the local characteristics of the labor
market, and the composition of the caseload. Program success will be
enhanced through effective coordination at regional and local levels,
involving employers, labor representatives, educators, community
leaders, local governments, and social service providers.
(2) The department, through its regional offices, shall collaborate
with employers, recipients, frontline workers, educational
institutions, labor, ((private industry councils)) local work force
investment boards, the work force training and education coordinating
board, community rehabilitation employment programs, employment and
training agencies, local governments, the employment security
department, and community action agencies to develop work programs that
are effective and work in their communities. For planning purposes,
the department shall collect and make accessible to regional offices
successful work program models from around the United States, including
the employment partnership program, apprenticeship programs,
microcredit, microenterprise, self-employment, and W-2 Wisconsin works.
Work programs shall incorporate local volunteer citizens in their
planning and implementation phases to ensure community relevance and
success.
(3) To reduce administrative costs and to ensure equal statewide
access to services, the department may develop contracts for statewide
welfare-to-work services. These statewide contracts shall support
regional flexibility and ensure that resources follow local labor
market opportunities and recipients' needs.
(4) The secretary shall establish WorkFirst service areas for
purposes of planning WorkFirst programs and for distributing WorkFirst
resources. Service areas shall reflect department regions.
(5) By July 31st of each odd-numbered year, a plan for the
WorkFirst program shall be developed for each region. The plan shall
be prepared in consultation with local and regional sources, adapting
the statewide WorkFirst program to achieve maximum effect for the
participants and the communities within which they reside. Local
consultation shall include to the greatest extent possible input from
local and regional planning bodies for social services and work force
development. The regional and local administrator shall consult with
employers of various sizes, labor representatives, training and
education providers, program participants, economic development
organizations, community organizations, tribes, and local governments
in the preparation of the service area plan.
(6) Regional plans shall specify how the job training and placement
services provided through the WorkFirst program and the job training
and placement services under P.L. 105-220, or its successor, are to be
integrated.
(7) The secretary has final authority in plan approval or
modification. Regional program implementation may deviate from the
statewide program if specified in a service area plan, as approved by
the secretary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28C.18 RCW
to read as follows:
The board shall include in its planning requirements for local work
force investment boards a requirement that local work force investment
boards specify how the job training and placement services under P.L.
105-220, or its successor, and the job training and placement services
provided through the WorkFirst program are to be integrated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) An incentive program is established in
the governor's office for integrating the delivery of job training and
placement services for recipients of the WorkFirst program and other
individuals who are seeking jobs.
(2) Local work force investment boards may apply, jointly with the
WorkFirst local planning area partnership and other partners in the
one-stop system, to receive funding under the incentive program. In
applying for funding, the local work force investment boards shall
clearly demonstrate the approach to integration of job training and
placement services that they will undertake.
(3) Funding awards under the incentive program shall be made to
local work force investment boards for periods of up to twenty-four
months. In making decisions concerning renewal of funding, which may
include adjustments in the level of funding, consideration shall be
given to the following criteria:
(a) Implementation of the identified integration approach; and
(b) Performance over a period of up to twenty-four months with
respect to the following outcomes for the population served, with
particular weight given to these outcomes for recipients of the
WorkFirst program: Rate of employment; credential completion rate; and
level of earnings.
(4) The governor shall provide funding for the incentive program
from WorkFirst program funds and work force investment act funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 and 4 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---