BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.58.185 and 1994 c 253 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In the case of an appeal involving a single family residence or
appurtenance to a single family residence, including a dock or pier
designed to serve a single family residence, or of appeals involving a
penalty of fifteen thousand dollars or less, the request for review may
be heard by a panel of three board members, at least one and not more
than two of whom shall be members of the pollution control hearings
board. Two members of the three must agree to issue a final decision
of the board.
(2) The board shall define by rule alternative processes to
expedite appeals, including those involving a single-family residence
or appurtenance to a single-family residence, including a dock or pier
designed to serve a single-family residence, or involving a penalty of
fifteen thousand dollars or less. These alternatives may include:
Mediation, upon agreement of all parties; submission of testimony by
affidavit; or other forms that may lead to less formal and faster
resolution of appeals.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.21B.305 and 1994 c 253 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
In an appeal that involves a penalty of ((five)) fifteen thousand
dollars or less, the appeal may be heard by one member of the board,
whose decision shall be the final decision of the board. The board
shall define by rule alternative procedures to expedite ((small))
appeals involving penalties of fifteen thousand dollars or less. These
alternatives may include: Mediation, upon agreement of all parties;
submission of testimony by affidavit; or other forms that may lead to
less formal and faster resolution of appeals.

--- END ---