BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.146.030 and 2004 c 277 s 909 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The water quality account is hereby created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be used only in a manner
consistent with this chapter. Moneys deposited in the account shall be
administered by the department of ecology and shall be subject to
legislative appropriation. Moneys placed in the account shall include
tax receipts as provided in RCW 82.24.027, 82.26.025, and 82.32.390,
principal and interest from the repayment of any loans granted pursuant
to this chapter, and any other moneys appropriated to the account by
the legislature.
(2) The department may use or permit the use of any moneys in the
account to make grants or loans to public bodies, including grants to
public bodies as cost-sharing moneys in any case where federal, local,
or other funds are made available on a cost-sharing basis, for water
pollution control facilities and activities, or for purposes of
assisting a public body to obtain an ownership interest in water
pollution control facilities and/or to defray a part of the payments
made by a public body to a service provider under a service agreement
entered into pursuant to RCW 70.150.060, within the purposes of this
chapter and for related administrative expenses. For the period July
1, 2003, to June 30, 2005, moneys in the account may be used to process
applications received by the department that seek to make changes to or
transfer existing water rights, for water conveyance projects, and for
grants and technical assistance to public bodies for watershed planning
under chapter 90.82 RCW.
(3) No more than three percent of the moneys deposited in the
account may be used by the department to pay for the administration of
the grant and loan program authorized by this chapter.
(((3))) (4) At least twenty-five percent of the moneys deposited
into the account for the centennial clean water act grant program
established in this section shall be allocated for freshwater systems
during the bienniums ending in 2007 and 2009. The priority for these
funds shall be establishment and implementation of a comprehensive lake
restoration and management program. These moneys may be used for
efforts related to: Lake restoration; improvement of lake water
quality; control of lake eutrophication; clearing, prevention, and
control of algae and harmful algal blooms in lakes; and eradication and
prevention of invasive plant and animal species in lakes.
(5) Beginning with the biennium ending June 30, 1997, the
department shall present a biennial progress report on the use of
moneys from the account to the chairs of the senate committee on ways
and means and the house of representatives committee on appropriations.
The first report is due June 30, 1996, and the report for each
succeeding biennium is due December 31 of the odd-numbered year. The
report shall consist of a list of each recipient, project description,
and amount of the grant, loan, or both.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.146 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of ecology shall prepare a report for the
appropriate committees of the legislature, by January 1, 2009, that
evaluates if there is a need and demand for continued funding of the
lake restoration and management program as provided in RCW 70.146.030.

--- END ---