BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends health care insurers
to have open pharmacy networks. Insurers must offer contractual
agreements to all pharmacies willing to meet applicable terms and
conditions of the policy contract. Insurers may not impose upon a
beneficiary a copay, deductible, coinsurance, or prescription quantity
limit that is not imposed upon all beneficiaries in the plan. Pharmacy
services are known to be a necessary component in the overall health
care system. Therefore, the legislature intends to promote access to
ensure the citizens of Washington state can easily obtain their
pharmacy services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Every health plan delivered, issued for
delivery, or renewed by a health carrier on and after January 1, 2006,
that provides for payment of all or a portion of prescription costs, or
reimbursement of prescription costs, must:
(1) Not limit the purchase of prescription medicines to specific
pharmacies;
(2) Not discriminate between different providers of pharmacy
services by requiring the payment of different copayments, coinsurance
levels, deductibles, or prescription quantity limits by the covered
pharmacy patient depending on the identity or nature of the provider of
pharmacy services;
(3) Not prohibit a qualified provider of pharmacy services from
becoming a provider under the policy if the applicant pharmacy
indicates a desire to be recognized as a provider and meets all the
applicable terms and conditions of the policy contract; and
(4) Offer a provider of pharmacy services the same terms and
conditions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 2 of this act does not apply to:
(1) A provider of pharmacy services if that provider cannot or will
not meet all of the applicable terms and conditions of the policy
contract; or
(2) A health maintenance organization that provides pharmaceutical
services through pharmacists it employs at pharmacies it owns. A
health maintenance organization is exempt in geographic areas in which
it owns the pharmacy or pharmacies, but is not exempt in other
geographic areas in which the health maintenance organization does not
provide pharmacy services through its own pharmacy and employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A health carrier, as defined in this
chapter, who violates section 2 of this act or a rule adopted under
that section may be subject to a penalty of not less than one thousand
dollars nor more than fifty thousand dollars for each violation,
payable to the health services account.
(2) A person may bring action against a carrier to recover damages
suffered as the result of a violation of section 2 of this act or a
rule adopted under that section. Proof of a violation constitutes
prima facie evidence of damages.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 2 through 4 of this act are each
added to chapter 48.43 RCW.

--- END ---