BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Washington's utilities have been historical leaders in
developing low-cost renewable hydroelectric energy, greatly benefiting
the state economy;
(2) Washington has a long tradition of energy policies that support
renewable resource development. These policies, which include
financial incentives, have stimulated economic development, encouraged
the development of renewable resources within the state, and protected
the environment;
(3) Continuing and expanding financial and other incentives will
stimulate the market for renewable energy technologies and renewable
resources, helping to diversify the energy resources used to serve
Washington's consumers while hedging against future fuel price risk;
(4) Fuel diversity, economic, and environmental benefits from
renewable resources accrue to the public at large, and therefore it is
the policy of the state of Washington to encourage consistent
development of these resources to meet the state's electric demand and
stabilize electricity prices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW
to read as follows:
Subject to the limitations of this section, beginning January 1,
2006, an electric utility may take a credit each fiscal year against
the tax imposed under this chapter.
(1) An electric utility subject to tax under this chapter is
eligible for a credit against the tax owed if the electric utility
contracts for the purchase of or generates a renewable resource for
distribution and sale to its retail customers.
(2) The credit is equal to 0.003 dollars per kilowatt hour times
the number of kilowatt hours of a renewable resource purchased or
generated by an electric utility and distributed to its retail
customers.
(3) If an electric utility purchases, or otherwise possesses and
retires renewable energy credits without purchasing the corresponding
renewable resource, the electric utility is eligible for a credit equal
to 0.001 dollars per kilowatt hour times the number of kilowatt hours
equivalent of the renewable energy credits.
(4) Credits under this section shall be allowed for a period not to
exceed ten years after the renewable resource generating facility from
which the renewable resource or renewable energy credit originates is
placed in commercial operation and shall only be prospectively applied
to renewable resources or renewable energy credits generated or
purchased after the effective date of this act.
(5) The department, after consultation with the utilities and
transportation commission in the case of investor-owned utilities and
the governing bodies of consumer-owned utilities, shall determine the
eligibility of individual projects for credits under this section.
(6) An electric utility shall not receive a tax credit under this
section when the utility also receives credit or funding for those same
renewable resources under a renewable resource standard established by
legislation in another state or if that facility has received funding
from a system benefit charge from another state.
(7) The application for credit shall be in a form and manner
prescribed by the department and may require certification, by the
utilities and transportation commission for investor-owned utilities
and by their governing bodies for consumer-owned utilities, that the
source of electricity meets the definition of a renewable resource
contained in this act.
(8) The following definitions apply throughout this section:
(a) "Commission" means the Washington state utilities and
transportation commission.
(b) "Consumer-owned utility" includes a municipal electric utility
formed under Title 35 RCW, a public utility district formed under Title
54 RCW, an irrigation district formed under chapter 87.03 RCW, a
cooperative formed under chapter 23.86 RCW, a mutual corporation or
association formed under chapter 24.06 RCW, a port district formed
under Title 53 RCW, or a water-sewer district formed under Title 57
RCW, that is engaged in the business of distributing electricity to one
or more retail electric customers in the state.
(c) "Electric utility" means a consumer-owned or investor-owned
utility.
(d) "Governing body" means the elected board of directors of a
corporation or the city council, commissioners, or other elected
decision-making board of any consumer-owned utility.
(e) "Investor-owned utility" means a corporation owned by investors
that meets the definition in RCW 80.40.010 and is engaged in
distributing electricity to more than one retail electric customer in
the state.
(f) "Pacific Northwest" has the same meaning as defined in section
3 of the Pacific Northwest electric power planning and conservation
act, P.L. 96-501 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 389a; 94 Stat. 2698).
(g) "Renewable energy credit" means a tradable certificate of
proof, not yet retired, of either one megawatt hour or one kilowatt
hour, as appropriate, corresponding to an equivalent amount of a
renewable resource that is: (i) Not powered by fresh water; and (ii)
qualified as a renewable energy credit from a renewable energy credit
program identified by the department of community, trade, and economic
development or the western governor's association.
(h) "Renewable resource" means electricity generated by an electric
generation facility or the expanded portion of an electric generation
facility that is located in the Pacific Northwest, where the facility
or expansion commences operation after July 1, 2005, and before July 1,
2015, and where the new or expanded electric generation facility is
fueled by: (i) Wind; (ii) solar energy; (iii) geothermal energy; (iv)
landfill gas; (v) biomass energy based on animal waste or solid organic
fuels from wood, forest, or field residues, or dedicated energy crops
that do not include wood pieces that have been treated with chemical
preservatives such as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic; (vi) wave or tidal power; (vii) gas from sewage treatment
facilities; or (viii) water that flows through hydroelectric generating
facilities in water supply pipes or irrigation pipes or canals that are
located in the state of Washington and that do not result in any new
water diversions.
(i) "System benefits charge" means a state legislative or
regulatory standard requiring electric utilities to invest a specified
portion of their annual retail revenues in renewable energy,
conservation and efficiency, or other designated public benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 On or before December 1, 2007, and every two
years thereafter, the department shall submit a report to the
legislature on the amount of incentives provided for renewable
resources, the amount of renewable resources produced by each type of
renewable resource generation facility, the name and location of each
generating facility, and the participating electric utilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---