BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 63.29.020 and 2004 c 168 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, all intangible
property, including any income or increment derived therefrom, less any
lawful charges, that is held, issued, or owing in the ordinary course
of the holder's business and has remained unclaimed by the owner for
more than three years after it became payable or distributable is
presumed abandoned.
(2) Property, with the exception of unredeemed Washington state
lottery tickets and unpresented winning parimutuel tickets, is payable
and distributable for the purpose of this chapter notwithstanding the
owner's failure to make demand or to present any instrument or document
required to receive payment.
(3) This chapter does not apply to claims drafts issued by
insurance companies representing offers to settle claims unliquidated
in amount or settled by subsequent drafts or other means.
(4) This chapter does not apply to property covered by chapter
63.26 RCW.
(5) This chapter does not apply to used clothing, umbrellas, bags,
luggage, or other used personal effects if such property is disposed of
by the holder as follows:
(a) In the case of personal effects of negligible value, the
property is destroyed; or
(b) The property is donated to a bona fide charity.
(6) This chapter does not apply to a gift certificate subject to
the prohibition against expiration dates under RCW 19.240.020 or to a
gift certificate subject to RCW 19.240.030 through 19.240.060.
However, this chapter applies to gift certificates presumed abandoned
under RCW 63.29.110.
(7) This chapter does not apply to excess proceeds held by
counties, cities, towns, and other municipal or quasi-municipal
corporations from foreclosures for delinquent property taxes,
assessments, or other liens.

Sec. 2 RCW 63.29.180 and 2003 c 237 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall cause a notice to be published not later
than November 1st, immediately following the report required by RCW
63.29.170 in a newspaper of general circulation ((in the county of))
within this state ((in which is located the last known address of any
person to be named in the notice. If no address is listed or the
address is outside this state, the notice must be published in the
county in which the holder of the property has its principal place of
business within this state)), which the department determines is most
likely to give notice to the apparent owner of the property.
(2) The published notice must be entitled "Notice ((of Names of
Persons Appearing)) to ((be)) Owners of ((Abandoned)) Unclaimed
Property" and contain((:
(a) The names in alphabetical order and last known address, if any,
of persons listed in the report and entitled to notice within the
county as specified in subsection (1) of this section; and
(b) A statement that information concerning the property and the
name and last known address of the holder may be obtained by any person
possessing an interest in the property by addressing an inquiry to the
department.
(3) The department is not required to publish in the notice any
items of seventy-five dollars or less unless the department considers
their publication to be in the public interest)) a summary explanation
of how owners may obtain information about unclaimed property reported
to the department.
(((4))) (3) Not later than September 1st, immediately following the
report required by RCW 63.29.170, the department shall mail a notice to
each person whose last known address is listed in the report and who
appears to be entitled to property with a value of more than seventy-five dollars presumed abandoned under this chapter and any beneficiary
of a life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract for whom
the department has a last known address.
(((5))) (4) The mailed notice must contain:
(a) A statement that, according to a report filed with the
department, property is being held to which the addressee appears
entitled; and
(b) The name ((and last known address)) of the person ((holding))
reporting the property and ((any necessary information regarding the
changes of name and last known address of the holder)) the type of
property described in the report.
(((6))) (5) This section is not applicable to sums payable on
travelers checks, money orders, and other written instruments presumed
abandoned under RCW 63.29.040.

Sec. 3 RCW 63.29.190 and 1993 c 498 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section, a person who is required to file a report under RCW 63.29.170
shall pay or deliver to the department all abandoned property required
to be reported at the time of filing the report.
(2) Counties, cities, towns, and other municipal and quasi-municipal corporations that hold funds representing warrants canceled
pursuant to RCW 36.22.100 and 39.56.040, uncashed checks, ((excess
proceeds from property tax and irrigation district foreclosures,)) and
property tax overpayments or refunds may retain the funds until the
owner notifies them and establishes ownership as provided in RCW
63.29.135. Counties, cities, towns, or other municipal or quasi-municipal corporations shall provide to the department a report of
property it is holding pursuant to this section. The report shall
identify the property and owner in the manner provided in RCW 63.29.170
and the department shall publish the information as provided in RCW
63.29.180.
(3) The contents of a safe deposit box or other safekeeping
repository presumed abandoned under RCW 63.29.160 and reported under
RCW 63.29.170 shall be paid or delivered to the department within six
months after the final date for filing the report required by RCW
63.29.170.
If the owner establishes the right to receive the abandoned
property to the satisfaction of the holder before the property has been
delivered or it appears that for some other reason the presumption of
abandonment is erroneous, the holder need not pay or deliver the
property to the department, and the property will no longer be presumed
abandoned. In that case, the holder shall file with the department a
verified written explanation of the proof of claim or of the error in
the presumption of abandonment.
(4) The holder of an interest under RCW 63.29.100 shall deliver a
duplicate certificate or other evidence of ownership if the holder does
not issue certificates of ownership to the department. Upon delivery
of a duplicate certificate to the department, the holder and any
transfer agent, registrar, or other person acting for or on behalf of
a holder in executing or delivering the duplicate certificate is
relieved of all liability of every kind in accordance with RCW
63.29.200 to every person, including any person acquiring the original
certificate or the duplicate of the certificate issued to the
department, for any losses or damages resulting to any person by the
issuance and delivery to the department of the duplicate certificate.

Sec. 4 RCW 63.29.220 and 1996 c 45 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2)((,)) and (3)((, and (6)))
of this section the department, within five years after the receipt of
abandoned property, shall sell it to the highest bidder at public sale
in whatever city in the state affords in the judgment of the department
the most favorable market for the property involved. The department
may decline the highest bid and reoffer the property for sale if in the
judgment of the department the bid is insufficient. If in the judgment
of the department the probable cost of sale exceeds the value of the
property, it need not be offered for sale. Any sale held under this
section must be preceded by a single publication of notice, at least
three weeks in advance of sale, in a newspaper of general circulation
in the county in which the property is to be sold.
(2) Securities listed on an established stock exchange must be sold
at prices prevailing at the time of sale on the exchange. Other
securities may be sold over the counter at prices prevailing at the
time of sale or by any other method the department considers advisable.
All securities may be sold over the counter at prices prevailing at the
time of the sale, or by any other method the department deems
advisable.
(3) Unless the department considers it to be in the best interest
of the state to do otherwise, all securities, other than those presumed
abandoned under RCW 63.29.100, delivered to the department must be held
for at least one year before being sold.
(4) Unless the department considers it to be in the best interest
of the state to do otherwise, all securities presumed abandoned under
RCW 63.29.100 and delivered to the department must be held for at least
three years before being sold. If the department sells any securities
delivered pursuant to RCW 63.29.100 before the expiration of the three-year period, any person making a claim pursuant to this chapter before
the end of the three-year period is entitled to either the proceeds of
the sale of the securities or the market value of the securities at the
time the claim is made, whichever amount is greater, less any deduction
for fees pursuant to RCW 63.29.230(2). A person making a claim under
this chapter after the expiration of this period is entitled to receive
either the securities delivered to the department by the holder, if
they still remain in the hands of the department, or the proceeds
received from sale, less any amounts deducted pursuant to RCW
63.29.230(2), but no person has any claim under this chapter against
the state, the holder, any transfer agent, registrar, or other person
acting for or on behalf of a holder for any appreciation in the value
of the property occurring after delivery by the holder to the
department.
(5) The purchaser of property at any sale conducted by the
department pursuant to this chapter takes the property free of all
claims of the owner or previous holder thereof and of all persons
claiming through or under them. The department shall execute all
documents necessary to complete the transfer of ownership.
(((6) The department shall not sell any stock or other intangible
ownership interest enrolled in a plan that provides for the automatic
reinvestment of dividends, distributions, or other sums payable as a
result of the interest.))

Sec. 5 RCW 63.29.280 and 1983 c 179 s 28 are each amended to read
as follows:
If the department determines after investigation that any property
delivered under this chapter has insubstantial commercial value, the
department may destroy or otherwise dispose of the property at any
time. No action or proceeding may be maintained against the state or
any officer or against the holder for or on account of any action taken
by the department pursuant to this section. ((Documents which are to
be destroyed shall be copied on film and retained for ten years.))
Original documents which the department has identified to be destroyed
and which have legal significance or historical interest may be
surrendered to the state historical museum or to the state library.

Sec. 6 RCW 63.29.350 and 1983 c 179 s 35 are each amended to read
as follows:
((It is unlawful for any person to seek or receive from any person
or contract with any person for any fee or compensation for locating or
purporting to locate any property which he knows has been reported or
paid or delivered to the department of revenue pursuant to this chapter
in excess of five percent of the value thereof returned to such owner.
Any person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall
be fined not less than the amount of the fee or charge he has sought or
received or contracted for, and not more than ten times such amount, or
imprisoned for not more than thirty days, or both.))
(1) An agreement by an owner, the primary purpose of which is to
locate, deliver, recover, or assist in the recovery of property that is
presumed abandoned, is void and unenforceable if it was entered into
during the period commencing on the date the property was presumed
abandoned and extending to a time that is twenty-four months after the
date the property is paid or delivered to the department. This
subsection does not apply to an owner's agreement with an attorney to
file a claim as to identified property or to contest the department's
denial of a claim.
(2) An agreement by an owner, the primary purpose of which is to
locate, deliver, recover, or assist in the recovery of property, is
enforceable only if the agreement is in writing, clearly sets forth the
nature of the property and the services to be rendered, is signed by
the apparent owner, and states the value of the property before and
after the fee, charge, or other compensation has been deducted.
(3) If an agreement covered by this section applies to mineral
proceeds and the agreement contains a provision to pay compensation
that includes a portion of the underlying minerals or any mineral
proceeds not then presumed abandoned, the provision is void and
unenforceable.
(4) An agreement covered by this section that provides for a fee,
charge, or other compensation that exceeds twenty percent of the value
of the property returned to the owner is unenforceable except by the
owner. An owner who has agreed to pay compensation in excess of twenty
percent of the value of the property returned to the owner, or the
department on behalf of the owner, may maintain an action to reduce the
compensation to an enforceable amount. The court may award reasonable
attorneys' fees to an owner who prevails in the action.
(5) This section does not preclude an owner from asserting that an
agreement covered by this section is invalid on grounds other than
excessive compensation.
(6) Any person who agrees to locate, deliver, recover, or assist in
the recovery of property pursuant to an agreement that is unenforceable
under this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not
less than the amount of the fee, charge, or other compensation he or
she has sought, received, or contracted for, and not more than ten
times the amount, or imprisoned for not more than thirty days, or both.

Sec. 7 RCW 63.29.380 and 1983 c 179 s 39 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any information or records required to be furnished to the
department of revenue as provided in this chapter shall be confidential
and shall not be disclosed to any person except the person who
furnished the same to the department of revenue, and except as provided
in RCW 63.29.180 ((and)), 63.29.230, section 8 of this act, or as may
be necessary in the proper administration of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 63.29 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may enter into contracts to provide private
investigators licensed under chapter 18.165 RCW with reported
information of apparent owners. This information may be provided
electronically or in another medium, in the discretion of the
department. Any contract shall provide terms and conditions the
department determines are necessary to safeguard the interests of
owners and to the proper administration of this chapter.
(2) The department shall develop a schedule of user fees for
information provided under this section for the purpose of distributing
and apportioning the full cost of providing the information and the
continued development of the program. Fees received by the department
under this section shall be deposited according to RCW 63.29.230.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 RCW 63.29.033 (Property presumed abandoned--State or subdivision is originator or issuer) and 1992 c 48 s 1 are
each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 6 through 8 of this act take
effect July 1, 2007.

--- END ---