BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.33.140 and 2003 c 170 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When land has been designated as forest land under RCW
84.33.130, a notation of the designation shall be made each year upon
the assessment and tax rolls. A copy of the notice of approval
together with the legal description or assessor's parcel numbers for
the land shall, at the expense of the applicant, be filed by the
assessor in the same manner as deeds are recorded.
(2) In preparing the assessment roll as of January 1, 2002, for
taxes payable in 2003 and each January 1st thereafter, the assessor
shall list each parcel of designated forest land at a value with
respect to the grade and class provided in this subsection and adjusted
as provided in subsection (3) of this section. The assessor shall
compute the assessed value of the land using the same assessment ratio
applied generally in computing the assessed value of other property in
the county. Values for the several grades of bare forest land shall be
as follows:

LAND
GRADE OPERABILITY
CLASS VALUES
PER ACRE

1 $234

1 2 229

3 217

4 157

1 198

2 2 190

3 183

4 132

1 154

3 2 149

3 148

4 113

1 117

4 2 114

3 113

4 86

1 85

5 2 78

3 77

4 52

1 43

6 2 39

3 39

4 37

1 21

7 2 21

3 20

4 20

8 1

(3) On or before December 31, 2001, the department shall adjust by
rule under chapter 34.05 RCW, the forest land values contained in
subsection (2) of this section in accordance with this subsection, and
shall certify the adjusted values to the assessor who will use these
values in preparing the assessment roll as of January 1, 2002. For the
adjustment to be made on or before December 31, 2001, for use in the
2002 assessment year, the department shall:
(a) Divide the aggregate value of all timber harvested within the
state between July 1, 1996, and June 30, 2001, by the aggregate harvest
volume for the same period, as determined from the harvester excise tax
returns filed with the department under RCW 84.33.074; and
(b) Divide the aggregate value of all timber harvested within the
state between July 1, 1995, and June 30, 2000, by the aggregate harvest
volume for the same period, as determined from the harvester excise tax
returns filed with the department under RCW 84.33.074; and
(c) Adjust the forest land values contained in subsection (2) of
this section by a percentage equal to one-half of the percentage change
in the average values of harvested timber reflected by comparing the
resultant values calculated under (a) and (b) of this subsection.
(4) For the adjustments to be made on or before December 31, 2002,
and each succeeding year thereafter, the same procedure described in
subsection (3) of this section shall be followed using harvester excise
tax returns filed under RCW 84.33.074. However, this adjustment shall
be made to the prior year's adjusted value, and the five-year periods
for calculating average harvested timber values shall be successively
one year more recent.
(5) Land graded, assessed, and valued as forest land shall continue
to be so graded, assessed, and valued until removal of designation by
the assessor upon the occurrence of any of the following:
(a) Receipt of notice from the owner to remove the designation;
(b) Sale or transfer to an ownership making the land exempt from ad
valorem taxation;
(c) Sale or transfer of all or a portion of the land to a new
owner, unless the new owner has signed a notice of forest land
designation continuance, except transfer to an owner who is an heir or
devisee of a deceased owner, shall not, by itself, result in removal of
designation. The signed notice of continuance shall be attached to the
real estate excise tax affidavit provided for in RCW 82.45.150. The
notice of continuance shall be on a form prepared by the department.
If the notice of continuance is not signed by the new owner and
attached to the real estate excise tax affidavit, all compensating
taxes calculated under subsection (11) of this section shall become due
and payable by the seller or transferor at time of sale. The auditor
shall not accept an instrument of conveyance regarding designated
forest land for filing or recording unless the new owner has signed the
notice of continuance or the compensating tax has been paid, as
evidenced by the real estate excise tax stamp affixed thereto by the
treasurer. The seller, transferor, or new owner may appeal the new
assessed valuation calculated under subsection (11) of this section to
the county board of equalization in accordance with the provisions of
RCW 84.40.038. Jurisdiction is hereby conferred on the county board of
equalization to hear these appeals;
(d) Determination by the assessor, after giving the owner written
notice and an opportunity to be heard, that:
(i) The land is no longer primarily devoted to and used for growing
and harvesting timber. However, land shall not be removed from
designation if a governmental agency, organization, or other recipient
identified in subsection (13) or (14) of this section as exempt from
the payment of compensating tax has manifested its intent in writing or
by other official action to acquire a property interest in the
designated forest land by means of a transaction that qualifies for an
exemption under subsection (13) or (14) of this section. The
governmental agency, organization, or recipient shall annually provide
the assessor of the county in which the land is located reasonable
evidence in writing of the intent to acquire the designated land as
long as the intent continues or within sixty days of a request by the
assessor. The assessor may not request this evidence more than once in
a calendar year;
(ii) The owner has failed to comply with a final administrative or
judicial order with respect to a violation of the restocking, forest
management, fire protection, insect and disease control, and forest
debris provisions of Title 76 RCW or any applicable rules under Title
76 RCW; or
(iii) Restocking has not occurred to the extent or within the time
specified in the application for designation of such land.
(6) Land shall not be removed from designation if there is a
governmental restriction that prohibits, in whole or in part, the owner
from harvesting timber from the owner's designated forest land. If
only a portion of the parcel is impacted by governmental restrictions
of this nature, the restrictions cannot be used as a basis to remove
the remainder of the forest land from designation under this chapter.
For the purposes of this section, "governmental restrictions" includes:
(a) Any law, regulation, rule, ordinance, program, or other action
adopted or taken by a federal, state, county, city, or other
governmental entity; or (b) the land's zoning or its presence within an
urban growth area designated under RCW 36.70A.110.
(7) The assessor shall have the option of requiring an owner of
forest land to file a timber management plan with the assessor upon the
occurrence of one of the following:
(a) An application for designation as forest land is submitted; or
(b) Designated forest land is sold or transferred and a notice of
continuance, described in subsection (5)(c) of this section, is signed.
(8) If land is removed from designation because of any of the
circumstances listed in subsection (5)(a) through (c) of this section,
the removal shall apply only to the land affected. If land is removed
from designation because of subsection (5)(d) of this section, the
removal shall apply only to the actual area of land that is no longer
primarily devoted to the growing and harvesting of timber, without
regard to any other land that may have been included in the application
and approved for designation, as long as the remaining designated
forest land meets the definition of forest land contained in RCW
84.33.035.
(9) Within thirty days after the removal of designation as forest
land, the assessor shall notify the owner in writing, setting forth the
reasons for the removal. The seller, transferor, or owner may appeal
the removal to the county board of equalization in accordance with the
provisions of RCW 84.40.038.
(10) Unless the removal is reversed on appeal a copy of the notice
of removal with a notation of the action, if any, upon appeal, together
with the legal description or assessor's parcel numbers for the land
removed from designation shall, at the expense of the applicant, be
filed by the assessor in the same manner as deeds are recorded and a
notation of removal from designation shall immediately be made upon the
assessment and tax rolls. The assessor shall revalue the land to be
removed with reference to its true and fair value as of January 1st of
the year of removal from designation. Both the assessed value before
and after the removal of designation shall be listed. Taxes based on
the value of the land as forest land shall be assessed and payable up
until the date of removal and taxes based on the true and fair value of
the land shall be assessed and payable from the date of removal from
designation.
(11) Except as provided in subsection (5)(c), (13), or (14) of this
section, a compensating tax shall be imposed on land removed from
designation as forest land. The compensating tax shall be due and
payable to the treasurer thirty days after the owner is notified of the
amount of this tax. As soon as possible after the land is removed from
designation, the assessor shall compute the amount of compensating tax
and mail a notice to the owner of the amount of compensating tax owed
and the date on which payment of this tax is due. The amount of
compensating tax shall be equal to the difference between the amount of
tax last levied on the land as designated forest land and an amount
equal to the new assessed value of the land multiplied by the dollar
rate of the last levy extended against the land, multiplied by a
number, in no event greater than nine, equal to the number of years for
which the land was designated as forest land, plus compensating taxes
on the land at forest land values up until the date of removal and the
prorated taxes on the land at true and fair value from the date of
removal to the end of the current tax year.
(12) Compensating tax, together with applicable interest thereon,
shall become a lien on the land which shall attach at the time the land
is removed from designation as forest land and shall have priority to
and shall be fully paid and satisfied before any recognizance,
mortgage, judgment, debt, obligation, or responsibility to or with
which the land may become charged or liable. The lien may be
foreclosed upon expiration of the same period after delinquency and in
the same manner provided by law for foreclosure of liens for delinquent
real property taxes as provided in RCW 84.64.050. Any compensating tax
unpaid on its due date shall thereupon become delinquent. From the
date of delinquency until paid, interest shall be charged at the same
rate applied by law to delinquent ad valorem property taxes.
(13) The compensating tax specified in subsection (11) of this
section shall not be imposed if the removal of designation under
subsection (5) of this section resulted solely from:
(a) Transfer to a government entity in exchange for other forest
land located within the state of Washington;
(b) A taking through the exercise of the power of eminent domain,
or sale or transfer to an entity having the power of eminent domain in
anticipation of the exercise of such power;
(c) A donation of fee title, development rights, or the right to
harvest timber, to a government agency or organization qualified under
RCW 84.34.210 and 64.04.130 for the purposes enumerated in those
sections, or the sale or transfer of fee title to a governmental entity
or a nonprofit nature conservancy corporation, as defined in RCW
64.04.130, exclusively for the protection and conservation of lands
recommended for state natural area preserve purposes by the natural
heritage council and natural heritage plan as defined in chapter 79.70
RCW. At such time as the land is not used for the purposes enumerated,
the compensating tax specified in subsection (11) of this section shall
be imposed upon the current owner;
(d) The sale or transfer of fee title to the parks and recreation
commission for park and recreation purposes;
(e) Official action by an agency of the state of Washington or by
the county or city within which the land is located that disallows the
present use of the land;
(f) The creation, sale, or transfer of forestry riparian easements
under RCW 76.13.120;
(g) The creation, sale, or transfer of a fee interest or a
conservation easement for the riparian open space program under RCW
76.09.040; or
(h) The sale or transfer of land within two years after the death
of the owner of at least a fifty percent interest in the land if the
land has been assessed and valued as classified forest land, designated
as forest land under this chapter, or classified under chapter 84.34
RCW continuously since 1993. The date of death shown on a death
certificate is the date used for the purposes of this subsection
(13)(h)((; or
(i) The sale or transfer of land after the death of the owner of at
least a fifty percent interest in the land if the land has been
assessed and valued as classified forest land, designated as forest
land under this chapter, or classified under chapter 84.34 RCW
continuously since 1993 and the sale or transfer takes place after July
22, 2001, and on or before July 22, 2003, and the death of the owner
occurred after January 1, 1991. The date of death shown on a death
certificate is the date used for the purposes of this subsection
(13)(i))).
(14) In a county with a population of more than one million
inhabitants, the compensating tax specified in subsection (11) of this
section shall not be imposed if the removal of designation as forest
land under subsection (5) of this section resulted solely from:
(a) An action described in subsection (13) of this section; or
(b) A transfer of a property interest to a government entity, or to
a nonprofit historic preservation corporation or nonprofit nature
conservancy corporation, as defined in RCW 64.04.130, to protect or
enhance public resources, or to preserve, maintain, improve, restore,
limit the future use of, or otherwise to conserve for public use or
enjoyment, the property interest being transferred. At such time as
the property interest is not used for the purposes enumerated, the
compensating tax shall be imposed upon the current owner.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.34.108 and 2003 c 170 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When land has once been classified under this chapter, a
notation of the classification shall be made each year upon the
assessment and tax rolls and the land shall be valued pursuant to RCW
84.34.060 or 84.34.065 until removal of all or a portion of the
classification by the assessor upon occurrence of any of the following:
(a) Receipt of notice from the owner to remove all or a portion of
the classification;
(b) Sale or transfer to an ownership, except a transfer that
resulted from a default in loan payments made to or secured by a
governmental agency that intends to or is required by law or regulation
to resell the property for the same use as before, making all or a
portion of the land exempt from ad valorem taxation;
(c) Sale or transfer of all or a portion of the land to a new
owner, unless the new owner has signed a notice of classification
continuance, except transfer to an owner who is an heir or devisee of
a deceased owner shall not, by itself, result in removal of
classification. The notice of continuance shall be on a form prepared
by the department. If the notice of continuance is not signed by the
new owner and attached to the real estate excise tax affidavit, all
additional taxes calculated pursuant to subsection (4) of this section
shall become due and payable by the seller or transferor at time of
sale. The auditor shall not accept an instrument of conveyance
regarding classified land for filing or recording unless the new owner
has signed the notice of continuance or the additional tax has been
paid, as evidenced by the real estate excise tax stamp affixed thereto
by the treasurer. The seller, transferor, or new owner may appeal the
new assessed valuation calculated under subsection (4) of this section
to the county board of equalization in accordance with the provisions
of RCW 84.40.038. Jurisdiction is hereby conferred on the county board
of equalization to hear these appeals;
(d) Determination by the assessor, after giving the owner written
notice and an opportunity to be heard, that all or a portion of the
land no longer meets the criteria for classification under this
chapter. The criteria for classification pursuant to this chapter
continue to apply after classification has been granted.
The granting authority, upon request of an assessor, shall provide
reasonable assistance to the assessor in making a determination whether
the land continues to meet the qualifications of RCW 84.34.020 (1) or
(3). The assistance shall be provided within thirty days of receipt of
the request.
(2) Land may not be removed from classification because of:
(a) The creation, sale, or transfer of forestry riparian easements
under RCW 76.13.120; or
(b) The creation, sale, or transfer of a fee interest or a
conservation easement for the riparian open space program under RCW
76.09.040.
(3) Within thirty days after such removal of all or a portion of
the land from current use classification, the assessor shall notify the
owner in writing, setting forth the reasons for the removal. The
seller, transferor, or owner may appeal the removal to the county board
of equalization in accordance with the provisions of RCW 84.40.038.
(4) Unless the removal is reversed on appeal, the assessor shall
revalue the affected land with reference to its true and fair value on
January 1st of the year of removal from classification. Both the
assessed valuation before and after the removal of classification shall
be listed and taxes shall be allocated according to that part of the
year to which each assessed valuation applies. Except as provided in
subsection (6) of this section, an additional tax, applicable interest,
and penalty shall be imposed which shall be due and payable to the
treasurer thirty days after the owner is notified of the amount of the
additional tax. As soon as possible, the assessor shall compute the
amount of additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty and the
treasurer shall mail notice to the owner of the amount thereof and the
date on which payment is due. The amount of the additional tax,
applicable interest, and penalty shall be determined as follows:
(a) The amount of additional tax shall be equal to the difference
between the property tax paid as "open space land", "farm and
agricultural land", or "timber land" and the amount of property tax
otherwise due and payable for the seven years last past had the land
not been so classified;
(b) The amount of applicable interest shall be equal to the
interest upon the amounts of the additional tax paid at the same
statutory rate charged on delinquent property taxes from the dates on
which the additional tax could have been paid without penalty if the
land had been assessed at a value without regard to this chapter;
(c) The amount of the penalty shall be as provided in RCW
84.34.080. The penalty shall not be imposed if the removal satisfies
the conditions of RCW 84.34.070.
(5) Additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty, shall become
a lien on the land which shall attach at the time the land is removed
from classification under this chapter and shall have priority to and
shall be fully paid and satisfied before any recognizance, mortgage,
judgment, debt, obligation or responsibility to or with which the land
may become charged or liable. This lien may be foreclosed upon
expiration of the same period after delinquency and in the same manner
provided by law for foreclosure of liens for delinquent real property
taxes as provided in RCW 84.64.050 now or as hereafter amended. Any
additional tax unpaid on its due date shall thereupon become
delinquent. From the date of delinquency until paid, interest shall be
charged at the same rate applied by law to delinquent ad valorem
property taxes.
(6) The additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty specified
in subsection (4) of this section shall not be imposed if the removal
of classification pursuant to subsection (1) of this section resulted
solely from:
(a) Transfer to a government entity in exchange for other land
located within the state of Washington;
(b)(i) A taking through the exercise of the power of eminent
domain, or (ii) sale or transfer to an entity having the power of
eminent domain in anticipation of the exercise of such power, said
entity having manifested its intent in writing or by other official
action;
(c) A natural disaster such as a flood, windstorm, earthquake, or
other such calamity rather than by virtue of the act of the landowner
changing the use of the property;
(d) Official action by an agency of the state of Washington or by
the county or city within which the land is located which disallows the
present use of the land;
(e) Transfer of land to a church when the land would qualify for
exemption pursuant to RCW 84.36.020;
(f) Acquisition of property interests by state agencies or agencies
or organizations qualified under RCW 84.34.210 and 64.04.130 for the
purposes enumerated in those sections. At such time as these property
interests are not used for the purposes enumerated in RCW 84.34.210 and
64.04.130 the additional tax specified in subsection (4) of this
section shall be imposed;
(g) Removal of land classified as farm and agricultural land under
RCW 84.34.020(2)(e);
(h) Removal of land from classification after enactment of a
statutory exemption that qualifies the land for exemption and receipt
of notice from the owner to remove the land from classification;
(i) The creation, sale, or transfer of forestry riparian easements
under RCW 76.13.120;
(j) The creation, sale, or transfer of a fee interest or a
conservation easement for the riparian open space program under RCW
76.09.040; or
(k) The sale or transfer of land within two years after the death
of the owner of at least a fifty percent interest in the land if the
land has been assessed and valued as classified forest land, designated
as forest land under chapter 84.33 RCW, or classified under this
chapter continuously since 1993. The date of death shown on a death
certificate is the date used for the purposes of this subsection
(6)(k)((; or
(l) The sale or transfer of land after the death of the owner of at
least a fifty percent interest in the land if the land has been
assessed and valued as classified forest land, designated as forest
land under chapter 84.33 RCW, or classified under this chapter
continuously since 1993 and the sale or transfer takes place after July
22, 2001, and on or before July 22, 2003, and the death of the owner
occurred after January 1, 1991. The date of death shown on a death
certificate is the date used for the purpose of this subsection
(6)(l))).

Sec. 3 RCW 84.52.010 and 2004 c 129 s 21 and 2004 c 80 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Except as is permitted under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes shall be
levied or voted in specific amounts.
The rate percent of all taxes for state and county purposes, and
purposes of taxing districts coextensive with the county, shall be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the
respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the
assessed valuation of the property of the county, as shown by the
completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent of all taxes
levied for purposes of taxing districts within any county shall be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the
respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the
assessed valuation of the property of the taxing districts
respectively.
When a county assessor finds that the aggregate rate of tax levy on
any property, that is subject to the limitations set forth in RCW
84.52.043 or 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations provided in either of
these sections, the assessor shall recompute and establish a
consolidated levy in the following manner:
(1) The full certified rates of tax levy for state, county, county
road district, and city or town purposes shall be extended on the tax
rolls in amounts not exceeding the limitations established by law;
however any state levy shall take precedence over all other levies and
shall not be reduced for any purpose other than that required by RCW
84.55.010. If, as a result of the levies imposed under RCW 84.52.135,
36.54.130, 84.52.069, 84.34.230, the portion of the levy by a
metropolitan park district that was protected under RCW 84.52.120, and
84.52.105, the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation exceeds one percent of the true
and fair value of any property, then these levies shall be reduced as
follows:
(a) The levy imposed by a county under RCW 84.52.135 must be
reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or must be eliminated;
(b) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by a ferry
district under RCW 36.54.130 must be reduced until the combined rate no
longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property
or must be eliminated;
(c) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the portion of the levy by a
metropolitan park district that is protected under RCW 84.52.120 shall
be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or shall be eliminated;
(d) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, then the levies imposed under RCW
84.34.230, 84.52.105, and any portion of the levy imposed under RCW
84.52.069 that is in excess of thirty cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis until the combined
rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property or shall be eliminated; and
(e) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, then the thirty cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value of tax levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 shall
be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or eliminated.
(2) The certified rates of tax levy subject to these limitations by
all junior taxing districts imposing taxes on such property shall be
reduced or eliminated as follows to bring the consolidated levy of
taxes on such property within the provisions of these limitations:
(a) First, the certified property tax levy rates of those junior
taxing districts authorized under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, 35.95A.100,
and 67.38.130 shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(b) Second, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of flood control
zone districts shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(c) Third, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of all other junior
taxing districts, other than fire protection districts, regional fire
protection service authorities, library districts, the first fifty cent
per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park
districts, and the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levies for public hospital districts, shall be reduced on a
pro rata basis or eliminated;
(d) Fourth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levies for metropolitan park districts created on or after
January 1, 2002, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(e) Fifth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized ((to
regional fire protection service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1) (b)
and (c) and)) for fire protection districts under RCW 52.16.140 and
52.16.160 and regional fire protection service authorities under RCW
52.26.140(1) (b) and (c) shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or
eliminated; and
(f) Sixth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized for
((regional fire protection service authorities under RCW
52.26.140(1)(a),)) fire protection districts under RCW 52.16.130,
regional fire protection service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1)(a),
library districts, metropolitan park districts created before January
1, 2002, under their first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levy, and public hospital districts under their first fifty
cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, shall be reduced
on a pro rata basis or eliminated.

Sec. 4 RCW 84.52.020 and 1994 c 81 s 85 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be the duty of the city council or other governing body of
every city, other than a city having a population of three hundred
thousand or more, the board of directors of school districts of the
first class, the superintendent of each educational service district
for each constituent second class school district, commissioners of
port districts, commissioners of metropolitan park districts, and of
all officials or boards of taxing districts within or coextensive with
any county required by law to certify to the county legislative
authority, for the purpose of levying district taxes, budgets or
estimates of the amounts to be raised by taxation on the assessed
valuation of the property in the city or district, through their chair
and clerk, or secretary, to make and file such certified budget or
estimates with the clerk of the county legislative authority on or
before the fifteenth day of November. However, if a statute specifies
a date other than the fifteenth day of November by which a taxing
district is required to file such information with the clerk of the
county legislative authority, the budget or estimates of the amounts to
be raised by taxation in the district shall be filed with the clerk on
or before the date in that statute, rather than the fifteenth of
November as provided in this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 84.52.054 and 1986 c 133 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The additional tax provided for in ((subparagraph (a) of the
seventeenth amendment to)) Article VII, section 2 of the state
Constitution ((as amended by Amendment 59 and as thereafter amended)),
and specifically authorized by RCW 84.52.052, ((as now or hereafter
amended, and RCW)) 84.52.053 ((and)), 84.52.0531, and 84.52.130 shall
be set forth in terms of dollars on the ballot of the proposition to be
submitted to the voters, together with an estimate of the dollar rate
of tax levy that will be required to produce the dollar amount; and the
county assessor, in spreading this tax upon the rolls, shall determine
the eventual dollar rate required to produce the amount of dollars so
voted upon, regardless of the estimate of dollar rate of tax levy
carried in said proposition. In the case of a school district or fire
protection district proposition for a particular period, the dollar
amount and the corresponding estimate of the dollar rate of tax levy
shall be set forth for each of the years in that period. The dollar
amount for each annual levy in the particular period may be equal or in
different amounts.

Sec. 6 RCW 84.52.070 and 1994 c 81 s 86 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be the duty of the county legislative authority of each
county, on or before the thirtieth day of November in each year, to
certify to the county assessor of the county the amount of taxes levied
upon the property in the county for county purposes, and the respective
amounts of taxes levied by the board for each taxing district, within
or coextensive with the county, for district purposes, and it shall be
the duty of the council of each city having a population of three
hundred thousand or more, and of the council of each town, and of all
officials or boards of taxing districts within or coextensive with the
county, authorized by law to levy taxes directly and not through the
county legislative authority, on or before the thirtieth day of
November in each year, to certify to the county assessor of the county
the amount of taxes levied upon the property within the city, town, or
district for city, town, or district purposes. However, the
certification required under this section shall be delayed if a statute
specifies a date other than the fifteenth day of November by which a
taxing district is required to file a budget or estimates of the
amounts to be raised by taxation in accordance with RCW 84.52.020. If
a levy amount is not certified to the county assessor by the thirtieth
day of November or by any other date statutorily specified, the county
assessor shall use no more than the certified levy amount for the
previous year for the taxing district: PROVIDED, That this shall not
apply to the state levy or when the assessor has not certified assessed
values as required by RCW 84.48.130 at least twelve working days prior
to November 30th.

Sec. 7 RCW 84.69.020 and 2002 c 168 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
On the order of the county treasurer, ad valorem taxes paid before
or after delinquency shall be refunded if they were:
(1) Paid more than once;
(2) Paid as a result of manifest error in description;
(3) Paid as a result of a clerical error in extending the tax
rolls;
(4) Paid as a result of other clerical errors in listing property;
(5) Paid with respect to improvements which did not exist on
assessment date;
(6) Paid under levies or statutes adjudicated to be illegal or
unconstitutional;
(7) Paid as a result of mistake, inadvertence, or lack of knowledge
by any person exempted from paying real property taxes or a portion
thereof pursuant to RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389, as now or
hereafter amended;
(8) Paid as a result of mistake, inadvertence, or lack of knowledge
by either a public official or employee or by any person with respect
to real property in which the person paying the same has no legal
interest;
(9) Paid on the basis of an assessed valuation which was appealed
to the county board of equalization and ordered reduced by the board;
(10) Paid on the basis of an assessed valuation which was appealed
to the state board of tax appeals and ordered reduced by the board:
PROVIDED, That the amount refunded under subsections (9) and (10) of
this section shall only be for the difference between the tax paid on
the basis of the appealed valuation and the tax payable on the
valuation adjusted in accordance with the board's order;
(11) Paid as a state property tax levied upon property, the
assessed value of which has been established by the state board of tax
appeals for the year of such levy: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the amount
refunded shall only be for the difference between the state property
tax paid and the amount of state property tax which would, when added
to all other property taxes within the one percent limitation of
Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution equal one percent of
the assessed value established by the board;
(12) Paid on the basis of an assessed valuation which was
adjudicated to be unlawful or excessive: PROVIDED, That the amount
refunded shall be for the difference between the amount of tax which
was paid on the basis of the valuation adjudged unlawful or excessive
and the amount of tax payable on the basis of the assessed valuation
determined as a result of the proceeding;
(13) Paid on property acquired under RCW 84.60.050, and canceled
under RCW 84.60.050(2);
(14) Paid on the basis of an assessed valuation that was reduced
under RCW 84.48.065; or
(15) Paid on the basis of an assessed valuation that was reduced
under RCW 84.40.039((; or
(16) Abated under RCW 84.70.010)).
No refunds under the provisions of this section shall be made
because of any error in determining the valuation of property, except
as authorized in subsections (9), (10), (11), and (12) of this section
nor may any refunds be made if a bona fide purchaser has acquired
rights that would preclude the assessment and collection of the
refunded tax from the property that should properly have been charged
with the tax. Any refunds made on delinquent taxes shall include the
proportionate amount of interest and penalties paid. However, refunds
as a result of an incorrect payment authorized under subsection (8) of
this section made by a third party payee shall not include refund
interest. The county treasurer may deduct from moneys collected for
the benefit of the state's levy, refunds of the state levy including
interest on the levy as provided by this section and chapter 84.68 RCW.
The county treasurer of each county shall make all refunds
determined to be authorized by this section, and by the first Monday in
February of each year, report to the county legislative authority a
list of all refunds made under this section during the previous year.
The list is to include the name of the person receiving the refund, the
amount of the refund, and the reason for the refund.

Sec. 8 RCW 84.70.010 and 2001 c 187 s 26 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If, on or before December 31 in any calendar year, any real or
personal property placed upon the assessment roll of that year is
destroyed in whole or in part, or is in an area that has been declared
a disaster area by the governor and has been reduced in value by more
than twenty percent as a result of a natural disaster, the true and
fair value of such property shall be reduced for that assessment year
by an amount determined by taking the true and fair value of such
taxable property before destruction or reduction in value and deduct
therefrom the true and fair value of the remaining property after
destruction or reduction in value.
(2) ((Taxes levied for collection in the year in which the true and
fair value has been reduced under subsection (1) of this section shall
be abated in whole or in part as provided in this subsection. The
amount of taxes to be abated shall be determined by first multiplying
the amount deducted from the true and fair value under subsection (1)
of this section by the rate of levy applicable to the property in the
tax year. Then divide the product by the number of days in the year
and multiply the quotient by the number of days remaining in the
calendar year after the date of the destruction or reduction in value
of the property. If taxes abated under this section have been paid,
the amount paid shall be refunded under RCW 84.69.020. For taxes
levied for collection in 1998 and 1999, this subsection (2) applies to
property that is destroyed in whole or in part, or is in an area that
has been declared a disaster area by the governor and has been reduced
in value by more than twenty percent as a result of a natural disaster.
For taxes levied for collection in 2000 through 2004, this subsection
(2) applies to property that is destroyed in whole or in part, or is in
an area that has been declared a federal disaster area and has been
reduced in value by more than twenty percent as a result of a natural
disaster. This subsection (2) does not apply to taxes levied for
collection in 2005 and thereafter.
(3))) No reduction in the true and fair value ((or abatements))
shall be made more than three years after the date of destruction or
reduction in value.
(((4))) (3) The assessor shall make such reduction on his or her
own motion; however, the taxpayer may make application for reduction on
forms prepared by the department and provided by the assessor. The
assessor shall notify the taxpayer of the amount of reduction.
(((5))) (4) If destroyed property is replaced prior to the
valuation dates contained in RCW 36.21.080 and 36.21.090, the total
taxable value for that assessment year shall not exceed the value as of
the appropriate valuation date in RCW 36.21.080 or 36.21.090, whichever
is appropriate.
(((6))) (5) The taxpayer may appeal the amount of reduction to the
county board of equalization in accordance with the provisions of RCW
84.40.038. The board shall reconvene, if necessary, to hear the
appeal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 84.55.012 (Reduction of property tax levy -- Setting amount
of future levies) and 1997 c 2 s 1 & 1995 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 2; and
(2) RCW 84.55.0121 (Reduction of property tax levy for collection
in 1998) and 1997 c 3 s 301.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2006 and thereafter.

--- END ---