BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 1.08.001 and 1967 ex.s. c 124 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is created a permanent statute law committee consisting of
((twelve lawyer)) nine members as follows: ((A lawyer member of the
legislature, ex officio, designated by the speaker of the house of
representatives with the concurrence of the president of the senate;
the chairman of the senate judiciary committee, ex officio, or a member
thereof who belongs to the same political party as the chairman, and
one other member thereof who belongs to the other major political
party, to be appointed by the chairman; the chairman of the house
judiciary committee, ex officio, or a member thereof who belongs to the
same political party as the chairman, and one other member thereof who
belongs to the other major political party, to be appointed by the
chairman; five lawyers))
(1) The secretary of the senate, ex officio;
(2) An attorney staff member of the senate appointed by the leader
of the second largest caucus of the senate;
(3) The chief clerk of the house of representatives, ex officio;
(4) An attorney staff member of the house of representatives
appointed by the leader of the second largest caucus of the house of
representatives;
(5) The staff director of the nonpartisan professional committee
staff of the senate, ex officio;
(6) The staff director of the nonpartisan professional committee
staff of the house of representatives, ex officio;
(7) A lawyer admitted to practice in this state, ((designated))
appointed by the board of governors of the Washington State Bar
Association;
(8) A judge of the supreme court or a lawyer who has been admitted
to practice in this state, ((recommended)) appointed by the chief
justice of the supreme court; and
(9) A lawyer staff member ((at large)) of the governor's office or
a state agency, appointed by the governor.
All such ((designations or)) initial appointments((,)) shall
((except as provided in RCW 1.08.003,)) be made ((as above provided
prior to April 1, 1959)) within thirty days of the effective date of
this act.

Sec. 2 RCW 1.08.003 and 1959 c 95 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
The term((s)) of the member((s designated)) of the committee
appointed by the State Bar Association, shall be for ((six)) two years.
((The term of the member recommended by the chief justice shall be at
the pleasure of the supreme court. The term of the governor's
appointee shall be four years. The term of the senate and house
judiciary committee members shall be two years, from April 1st
following the adjournment of the regular session of the legislature in
each odd-numbered year starting in 1955 and to and including the
thirty-first day of March in the succeeding odd-numbered year.))
The term of any ex officio member((, other than senate and house
judiciary committee members shall)) expires upon expiration of tenure
of the position by virtue of which he or she is a member of the
committee. The remaining members of the committee shall serve at the
pleasure of the appointing authority. Vacancies shall be filled by
designation, appointment, or ex officio in the same manner as for the
member so vacating, and if a vacancy results other than from expiration
of a term, the vacancy shall be filled for the unexpired term.
((Of the members to be designated by the Washington State Bar
Association, the term of one member shall expire March 31, 1959, the
terms of two members shall expire March 31, 1961, the terms of two
members shall expire March 31, 1963, and the term of one member shall
expire March 31, 1965: PROVIDED, That this 1959 amendment shall not
affect the present terms of present members.))

Sec. 3 RCW 1.08.005 and 1984 c 287 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
For attendance at meetings of the committee or in attending to such
other business of the committee as may be authorized thereby, each
((legislative)) member of the committee who is not otherwise employed
by the state shall ((receive the per diem and travel allowances
provided for such members by RCW 44.04.120, and each other member
shall)) be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 ((and)). All
members of the committee shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 4 RCW 1.08.007 and 1953 c 257 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The committee shall meet at the call of the senate judiciary
chairman as soon as feasible after April 1, 1953.)) The committee
shall from time to time elect a chairman from among its members((,))
and adopt rules to govern its procedures. Four members of the
committee shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any business
but no proceeding of the committee shall be valid unless carried by the
vote of a majority of the members present. The code reviser or a
member of his or her staff shall act as secretary of the committee.

Sec. 5 RCW 1.08.011 and 1951 c 157 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The committee shall((, as soon as practicable after April 1,
1951,)) employ on behalf of the state((,)) and from time to time fix
the compensation of a competent code reviser, with power to terminate
any such employment at any time((, subject to contract rights)). The
committee shall also employ on behalf of the state and fix the
compensation of such additional legal and clerical assistance to the
code reviser as may reasonably be required under this chapter. The
committee shall have general supervision and control over the functions
and performance of the code reviser.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---