BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the functions
served by private security companies and their employees provide
important safety for the public and that changes in regulating this
profession should be undertaken with a goal of promoting public safety.
Therefore, the department of licensing shall undertake a review, using
as a guide the requirements of chapter 18.118 RCW to the extent
appropriate, of the following:
(a) The need for annual postassignment training of private security
guards that covers review and practice of security guard skills taught
by department-certified trainers;
(b) Whether various levels of postassignment training may be
appropriate for private security guards employed in various types of
work, as listed in RCW 18.170.010(18), depending on their assigned
duties;
(c) The need for private security companies to maintain records of
postassignment training of private security guards and, if so, for what
period of time; and
(d) The need for civil penalties to enforce compliance with the
training requirements for private security guards.
(2) The department must report the results of the study and its
recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
January 1, 2007.

--- END ---