BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.08 RCW
to read as follows:
"Inflation" means the percentage change in the implicit price
deflator for personal consumption expenditures for the United States as
published for the most recent twelve-month period by the bureau of
economic analysis of the federal department of commerce in September of
the year before a July 1st determination.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.32.050 and 1995 c 199 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Where death results from the injury, the expenses of burial not
to exceed two hundred percent of the average monthly wage in the state
as defined in RCW 51.08.018 shall be paid.
(2)(a) Where death results from the injury, a surviving spouse of
a deceased worker eligible for benefits under this title shall receive
monthly for life or until remarriage payments according to the
following schedule:
(i) If there are no children of the deceased worker, sixty percent
of the wages of the deceased worker but not less than one hundred
eighty-five dollars;
(ii) If there is one child of the deceased worker and in the legal
custody of such spouse, sixty-two percent of the wages of the deceased
worker but not less than two hundred twenty-two dollars;
(iii) If there are two children of the deceased worker and in the
legal custody of such spouse, sixty-four percent of the wages of the
deceased worker but not less than two hundred fifty-three dollars;
(iv) If there are three children of the deceased worker and in the
legal custody of such spouse, sixty-six percent of the wages of the
deceased worker but not less than two hundred seventy-six dollars;
(v) If there are four children of the deceased worker and in the
legal custody of such spouse, sixty-eight percent of the wages of the
deceased worker but not less than two hundred ninety-nine dollars; or
(vi) If there are five or more children of the deceased worker and
in the legal custody of such spouse, seventy percent of the wages of
the deceased worker but not less than three hundred twenty-two dollars.
(b) Where the surviving spouse does not have legal custody of any
child or children of the deceased worker or where after the death of
the worker legal custody of such child or children passes from such
surviving spouse to another, any payment on account of such child or
children not in the legal custody of the surviving spouse shall be made
to the person or persons having legal custody of such child or
children. The amount of such payments shall be five percent of the
monthly benefits payable as a result of the worker's death for each
such child but such payments shall not exceed twenty-five percent.
Such payments on account of such child or children shall be subtracted
from the amount to which such surviving spouse would have been entitled
had such surviving spouse had legal custody of all of the children and
the surviving spouse shall receive the remainder after such payments on
account of such child or children have been subtracted. Such payments
on account of a child or children not in the legal custody of such
surviving spouse shall be apportioned equally among such children.
(c) Payments to the surviving spouse of the deceased worker shall
cease at the end of the month in which remarriage occurs: PROVIDED,
That a monthly payment shall be made to the child or children of the
deceased worker from the month following such remarriage in a sum equal
to five percent of the wages of the deceased worker for one child and
a sum equal to five percent for each additional child up to a maximum
of five such children. Payments to such child or children shall be
apportioned equally among such children. Such sum shall be in place of
any payments theretofore made for the benefit of or on account of any
such child or children. If the surviving spouse does not have legal
custody of any child or children of the deceased worker, or if after
the death of the worker, legal custody of such child or children passes
from such surviving spouse to another, any payment on account of such
child or children not in the legal custody of the surviving spouse
shall be made to the person or persons having legal custody of such
child or children.
(d) ((In no event shall)) (i) For claims with date of injury or
manifestation of occupational disease before July 1, 2005, the monthly
payments provided in subsection (2) of this section may not exceed the
applicable percentage of the average monthly wage in the state as
computed under RCW 51.08.018 as follows:

AFTER
PERCENTAGE

June 30, 1993 105%

June 30, 1994 110%

June 30, 1995 115%

June 30, 1996 120%

(ii) On July 1, 2005, and on each July 1st thereafter, the
department shall determine the maximum amount of the monthly payment
provided in this subsection for claims with date of injury or
manifestation of occupational disease in the twelve-month period
beginning on the date of the department's determination. The
department shall determine the maximum amount for the twelve-month
period beginning on July 1st of each year by adjusting the maximum
amount for the previous twelve-month period by the rate of inflation.
(e) In addition to the monthly payments provided for in subsection
(2)(a) through (c) of this section, a surviving spouse or child or
children of such worker if there is no surviving spouse, or dependent
parent or parents, if there is no surviving spouse or child or children
of any such deceased worker shall be forthwith paid a sum equal to one
hundred percent of the average monthly wage in the state as defined in
RCW 51.08.018, any such children, or parents to share and share alike
in said sum.
(f) Upon remarriage of a surviving spouse the monthly payments for
the child or children shall continue as provided in this section, but
the monthly payments to such surviving spouse shall cease at the end of
the month during which remarriage occurs. However, after September 8,
1975, an otherwise eligible surviving spouse of a worker who died at
any time prior to or after September 8, 1975, shall have an option of:
(i) Receiving, once and for all, a lump sum of twenty-four times
the monthly compensation rate in effect on the date of remarriage
allocable to the spouse for himself or herself pursuant to subsection
(2)(a)(i) of this section and subject to any modifications specified
under subsection (2)(d) of this section and RCW 51.32.075(((3))) (1)(c)
or fifty percent of the then remaining annuity value of his or her
pension, whichever is the lesser: PROVIDED, That if the injury
occurred prior to July 28, 1991, the remarriage benefit lump sum
available shall be as provided in the remarriage benefit schedules then
in effect; or
(ii) If a surviving spouse does not choose the option specified in
subsection (2)(f)(i) of this section to accept the lump sum payment,
the remarriage of the surviving spouse of a worker shall not bar him or
her from claiming the lump sum payment authorized in subsection
(2)(f)(i) of this section during the life of the remarriage, or shall
not prevent subsequent monthly payments to him or to her if the
remarriage has been terminated by death or has been dissolved or
annulled by valid court decree provided he or she has not previously
accepted the lump sum payment.
(g) If the surviving spouse during the remarriage should die
without having previously received the lump sum payment provided in
subsection (2)(f)(i) of this section, his or her estate shall be
entitled to receive the sum specified under subsection (2)(f)(i) of
this section or fifty percent of the then remaining annuity value of
his or her pension whichever is the lesser.
(h) The effective date of resumption of payments under subsection
(2)(f)(ii) of this section to a surviving spouse based upon termination
of a remarriage by death, annulment, or dissolution shall be the date
of the death or the date the judicial decree of annulment or
dissolution becomes final and when application for the payments has
been received.
(i) If it should be necessary to increase the reserves in the
reserve fund or to create a new pension reserve fund as a result of the
amendments in chapter 45, Laws of 1975-'76 2nd ex. sess., the amount of
such increase in pension reserve in any such case shall be transferred
to the reserve fund from the supplemental pension fund.
(3) If there is a child or children and no surviving spouse of the
deceased worker or the surviving spouse is not eligible for benefits
under this title, a sum equal to thirty-five percent of the wages of
the deceased worker shall be paid monthly for one child and a sum
equivalent to fifteen percent of such wage shall be paid monthly for
each additional child, the total of such sum to be divided among such
children, share and share alike((: PROVIDED, That)), subject to the
following:
(a) For claims with date of injury or manifestation of occupational
disease before July 1, 2005, benefits under this subsection or
subsection (4) of this section shall not exceed the lesser of sixty-five percent of the wages of the deceased worker at the time of his or
her death or the applicable percentage of the average monthly wage in
the state as defined in RCW 51.08.018, as follows:

AFTER
PERCENTAGE

June 30, 1993 105%

June 30, 1994 110%

June 30, 1995 115%

June 30, 1996 120%

(b) On July 1, 2005, and on each July 1st thereafter, the
department shall determine the maximum amount of the monthly payment
provided in this subsection for claims with date of injury or
manifestation of occupational disease in the twelve-month period
beginning on the date of the department's determination. The
department shall determine the maximum amount for the twelve-month
period beginning on July 1st of each year by adjusting the maximum
amount for the previous twelve-month period by the rate of inflation.
(4) In the event a surviving spouse receiving monthly payments
dies, the child or children of the deceased worker shall receive the
same payment as provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(5)(a) If the worker leaves no surviving spouse or child, but
leaves a dependent or dependents, a monthly payment shall be made to
each dependent as follows:
(i) For claims with date of injury or manifestation of occupational
disease before July 1, 2005, the monthly payment shall be equal to
fifty percent of the average monthly support actually received by such
dependent from the worker during the twelve months next preceding the
occurrence of the injury, but the total payment to all dependents in
any case shall not exceed the lesser of sixty-five percent of the wages
of the deceased worker at the time of his or her death or the
applicable percentage of the average monthly wage in the state as
defined in RCW 51.08.018 as follows:

AFTER
PERCENTAGE

June 30, 1993 105%

June 30, 1994 110%

June 30, 1995 115%

June 30, 1996 120%

(ii) On July 1, 2005, and on each July 1st thereafter, the
department shall determine the maximum amount of the monthly payment
provided in this subsection for claims with date of injury or
manifestation of occupational disease in the twelve-month period
beginning on the date of the department's determination. The
department shall determine the maximum amount for the twelve-month
period beginning on July 1st of each year by adjusting the maximum
amount for the previous twelve-month period by the rate of inflation.
(b) If any dependent is under the age of eighteen years at the time
of the occurrence of the injury, the payment to such dependent shall
cease when such dependent reaches the age of eighteen years except such
payments shall continue until the dependent reaches age twenty-three
while permanently enrolled at a full time course in an accredited
school. The payment to any dependent shall cease if and when, under
the same circumstances, the necessity creating the dependency would
have ceased if the injury had not happened.
(6) For claims filed prior to July 1, 1986, if the injured worker
dies during the period of permanent total disability, whatever the
cause of death, leaving a surviving spouse, or child, or children, the
surviving spouse or child or children shall receive benefits as if
death resulted from the injury as provided in subsections (2) through
(4) of this section. Upon remarriage or death of such surviving
spouse, the payments to such child or children shall be made as
provided in subsection (2) of this section when the surviving spouse of
a deceased worker remarries.
(7) For claims filed on or after July 1, 1986, every worker who
becomes eligible for permanent total disability benefits shall elect an
option as provided in RCW 51.32.067.

Sec. 3 RCW 51.32.060 and 1993 c 521 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When the supervisor of industrial insurance ((shall))
determines that permanent total disability results from the injury, the
worker shall receive monthly during the period of such disability:
(a) If married at the time of injury, sixty-five percent of his or
her wages but not less than two hundred fifteen dollars per month.
(b) If married with one child at the time of injury, sixty-seven
percent of his or her wages but not less than two hundred fifty-two
dollars per month.
(c) If married with two children at the time of injury, sixty-nine
percent of his or her wages but not less than two hundred eighty-three
dollars.
(d) If married with three children at the time of injury,
seventy-one percent of his or her wages but not less than three hundred
six dollars per month.
(e) If married with four children at the time of injury,
seventy-three percent of his or her wages but not less than three
hundred twenty-nine dollars per month.
(f) If married with five or more children at the time of injury,
seventy-five percent of his or her wages but not less than three
hundred fifty-two dollars per month.
(g) If unmarried at the time of the injury, sixty percent of his or
her wages but not less than one hundred eighty-five dollars per month.
(h) If unmarried with one child at the time of injury, sixty-two
percent of his or her wages but not less than two hundred twenty-two
dollars per month.
(i) If unmarried with two children at the time of injury,
sixty-four percent of his or her wages but not less than two hundred
fifty-three dollars per month.
(j) If unmarried with three children at the time of injury,
sixty-six percent of his or her wages but not less than two hundred
seventy-six dollars per month.
(k) If unmarried with four children at the time of injury,
sixty-eight percent of his or her wages but not less than two hundred
ninety-nine dollars per month.
(l) If unmarried with five or more children at the time of injury,
seventy percent of his or her wages but not less than three hundred
twenty-two dollars per month.
(2) For any period of time where both husband and wife are entitled
to compensation as temporarily or totally disabled workers, only that
spouse having the higher wages of the two shall be entitled to claim
their child or children for compensation purposes.
(3) In case of permanent total disability, if the character of the
injury is such as to render the worker so physically helpless as to
require the hiring of the services of an attendant, the department
shall make monthly payments to such attendant for such services as long
as such requirement continues, but such payments shall not obtain or be
operative while the worker is receiving care under or pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 51.36 RCW and RCW 51.04.105.
(4) Should any further accident result in the permanent total
disability of an injured worker, he or she shall receive the pension to
which he or she would be entitled, notwithstanding the payment of a
lump sum for his or her prior injury.
(5) ((In no event shall)) (a)(i) For claims filed before July 1,
2005, the monthly payments provided in this section may not exceed the
applicable percentage of the average monthly wage in the state as
computed under the provisions of RCW 51.08.018 as follows:

AFTER PERCENTAGE

June 30, 1993 105%

June 30, 1994 110%

June 30, 1995 115%

June 30, 1996 120%

(ii) On July 1, 2005, and on each July 1st thereafter, the
department shall determine the maximum amount of the monthly payment
provided in this section for claims with date of injury or
manifestation of occupational disease in the twelve-month period
beginning on the date of the department's determination. The
department shall determine the maximum amount for the twelve-month
period beginning on July 1st of each year by adjusting the maximum
amount for the previous twelve-month period by the rate of inflation.
(b) The limitations under this subsection shall not apply to the
payments provided for in subsection (3) of this section.
(6) In the case of new or reopened claims, if the supervisor of
industrial insurance determines that, at the time of filing or
reopening, the worker is voluntarily retired and is no longer attached
to the work force, benefits shall not be paid under this section.
(7) The benefits provided by this section are subject to
modification under RCW 51.32.067.

Sec. 4 RCW 51.32.072 and 1987 c 185 s 34 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, every surviving
spouse and every permanently totally disabled worker or temporarily
totally disabled worker, if such worker was unmarried at the time of
the worker's injury or was then married but the marriage was later
terminated by judicial action, receiving a pension or compensation for
temporary total disability under this title pursuant to compensation
schedules in effect prior to July 1, 1971, shall after July 1, 1975,
and before July 1, 2005, be paid fifty percent of the average monthly
wage in the state as computed under RCW 51.08.018 per month and an
amount equal to five percent of such average monthly wage per month to
such totally disabled worker if married at the time of the worker's
injury and the marriage was not later terminated by judicial action,
and an additional two percent of such average monthly wage for each
child of such totally disabled worker at the time of injury in the
legal custody of such totally disabled worker or such surviving spouse
up to a maximum of five such children. The monthly payments such
surviving spouse or totally disabled worker are receiving pursuant to
compensation schedules in effect prior to July 1, 1971 shall be
deducted from the monthly payments above specified.
(b) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, where such a
surviving spouse has remarried, or where any such child of such worker,
whether living or deceased, is not in the legal custody of such worker
or such surviving spouse there shall be paid for the benefit of and on
account of each such child a sum equal to two percent of such average
monthly wage up to a maximum of five such children in addition to any
payments theretofore paid under compensation schedules in effect prior
to July 1, 1971 for the benefit of and on account of each such child.
In the case of any child or children of a deceased worker not leaving
a surviving spouse or where the surviving spouse has later died, there
shall be paid for the benefit of and on account of each such child a
sum equal to two percent of such average monthly wage up to a maximum
of five such children in addition to any payments theretofore paid
under such schedules for the benefit of and on account of each such
child.
(2) On July 1, 2005, and on each July 1st thereafter, the
department shall determine the amounts of the monthly payments and the
additional payments for the injured worker's spouse or children
provided in this section and made in the twelve-month period beginning
on the date of the department's determination. The department shall
determine the amounts for the twelve-month period beginning on July 1st
of each year by adjusting the amounts for the previous twelve-month
period by the rate of inflation.
(3)(a) If the character of the injury or occupational disease is
such as to render the worker so physically helpless as to require the
hiring of the services of an attendant, the department shall make
monthly payments to such attendant for such services as long as such
requirement continues but such payments shall not obtain or be
operative while the worker is receiving care under or pursuant to the
provisions of this title except for care granted at the discretion of
the supervisor pursuant to RCW 51.36.010: PROVIDED, That such payments
shall not be considered compensation nor shall they be subject to any
limitation upon total compensation payments.
(b) No part of such additional payments shall be payable from the
accident fund.
(4) The director shall pay monthly from the supplemental pension
fund such an amount as will, when added to the compensation theretofore
paid under compensation schedules in effect prior to July 1, 1971,
equal the amounts hereinabove specified.
(5) In cases where money has been or shall be advanced to any such
person from the pension reserve, the additional amount to be paid under
this section shall be reduced by the amount of monthly pension which
was or is predicated upon such advanced portion of the pension reserve.

Sec. 5 RCW 51.32.075 and 1988 c 161 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, the compensation or
death benefits payable pursuant to the provisions of this chapter for
temporary total disability, permanent total disability, or death
arising out of injuries or occupational diseases shall be adjusted as
follows:
(((1)))(a) On July 1, 1982, there shall be an adjustment for those
whose right to compensation was established on or after July 1, 1971,
and before July 1, 1982. The adjustment shall be determined by
multiplying the amount of compensation to which they are entitled by a
fraction, the denominator of which shall be the average monthly wage in
the state under RCW 51.08.018 for the fiscal year in which such
person's right to compensation was established, and the numerator of
which shall be the average monthly wage in the state under RCW
51.08.018 on July 1, 1982.
(((2))) (b) In addition to the adjustment established by
((subsection (1))) (a) of this ((section)) subsection, there shall be
another adjustment on July 1, 1983, for those whose right to
compensation was established on or after July 1, 1971, and before July
1983, which shall be determined by multiplying the amount of
compensation to which they are entitled by a fraction, the denominator
of which shall be the average monthly wage in the state under RCW
51.08.018 for the fiscal year in which such person's right to
compensation was established, and the numerator of which shall be the
average monthly wage in the state under RCW 51.08.018 on July 1, 1983.
(((3))) (c) In addition to the adjustments under ((subsections (1)
and (2))) (a) and (b) of this ((section)) subsection, further
adjustments shall be made beginning on July 1, 1984, and on each July
1st thereafter for those whose right to compensation was established on
or after July 1, 1971. The adjustment shall be determined by
multiplying the amount of compensation to which they are entitled by a
fraction, the denominator of which shall be the average monthly wage in
the state under RCW 51.08.018 for the fiscal year in which such
person's right to compensation was established, and the numerator of
which shall be the average monthly wage in the state under RCW
51.08.018 on July 1st of the year in which the adjustment is being
made. The department or self-insurer shall adjust the resulting
compensation rate to the nearest whole cent, not to exceed the average
monthly wage in the state as computed under RCW 51.08.018.
(2) On July 1, 2005, and on each July 1st thereafter, the
department shall determine the amount of the annual adjustments
provided for in this section for payments made in the twelve-month
period beginning on the date of the department's determination. The
department shall determine the amount for the twelve-month period
beginning on July 1st of each year by adjusting the amount for the
previous twelve-month period by the rate of inflation.

Sec. 6 RCW 51.32.080 and 1993 c 520 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Until July 1, 1993, for the permanent partial disabilities
here specifically described, the injured worker shall receive
compensation as follows:

LOSS BY AMPUTATION

Of leg above the knee joint with short
thigh stump (3" or less below the
tuberosity of ischium) . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,000.00

Of leg at or above knee joint with
functional stump . . . . . . . . . . . . 48,600.00

Of leg below knee joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 43,200.00

Of leg at ankle (Syme) . . . . . . . . . . . . 37,800.00

Of foot at mid-metatarsals . . . . . . . . . . . . 18,900.00

Of great toe with resection of metatarsal
bone . . . . . . . . . . . . 11,340.00

Of great toe at metatarsophalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,804.00

Of great toe at interphalangeal joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,600.00

Of lesser toe (2nd to 5th) with resection of
metatarsal bone . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,140.00

Of lesser toe at metatarsophalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,016.00

Of lesser toe at proximal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,494.00

Of lesser toe at distal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 378.00

Of arm at or above the deltoid insertion or
by disarticulation at the shoulder . . . . . . . . . . . . 54,000.00

Of arm at any point from below the deltoid
insertion to below the elbow joint at
the insertion of the biceps tendon . . . . . . . . . . . . 51,300.00

Of arm at any point from below the elbow
joint distal to the insertion of the
biceps tendon to and including
mid-metacarpal amputation of the
hand . . . . . . . . . . . . 48,600.00

Of all fingers except the thumb at
metacarpophalangeal joints . . . . . . . . . . . . 29,160.00

Of thumb at metacarpophalangeal joint or
with resection of carpometacarpal
bone . . . . . . . . . . . . 19,440.00

Of thumb at interphalangeal joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 9,720.00

Of index finger at metacarpophalangeal
joint or with resection of metacarpal
bone . . . . . . . . . . . . 12,150.00

Of index finger at proximal
interphalangeal joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 9,720.00

Of index finger at distal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,346.00

Of middle finger at metacarpophalangeal
joint or with resection of metacarpal
bone . . . . . . . . . . . . 9,720.00

Of middle finger at proximal
interphalangeal joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,776.00

Of middle finger at distal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,374.00

Of ring finger at metacarpophalangeal
joint or with resection of metacarpal
bone . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,860.00

Of ring finger at proximal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,888.00

Of ring finger at distal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,430.00

Of little finger at metacarpophalangeal
joint or with resection of metacarpal
bone . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,430.00

Of little finger at proximal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,944.00

Of little finger at distal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 972.00

MISCELLANEOUS

Loss of one eye by enucleation . . . . . . . . . . . . 21,600.00

Loss of central visual acuity in one eye . . . . . . . . . . . . 18,000.00

Complete loss of hearing in both ears . . . . . . . . . . . . 43,200.00

Complete loss of hearing in one ear . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,200.00

(b) Beginning on July 1, 1993, compensation under this subsection
shall be computed as follows:
(i) Beginning on July 1, 1993, the compensation amounts for the
specified disabilities listed in (a) of this subsection shall be
increased by thirty-two percent; ((and))
(ii) Beginning on July 1, 1994, and ((each July 1 thereafter))
ending on June 30, 2005, the compensation amounts for the specified
disabilities listed in (a) of this subsection, as adjusted under (b)(i)
of this subsection, shall be readjusted to reflect the percentage
change in the consumer price index, calculated as follows: The index
for the calendar year preceding the year in which the July calculation
is made, to be known as "calendar year A," is divided by the index for
the calendar year preceding calendar year A, and the resulting ratio is
multiplied by the compensation amount in effect on June 30 immediately
preceding the July 1st on which the respective calculation is made.
For the purposes of this subsection, "index" means the same as the
definition in RCW 2.12.037(1); and
(iii) Beginning on July 1, 2005, and each July 1st thereafter, the
compensation amounts of the specified disabilities listed in (a) of
this subsection, as adjusted under (b)(ii) of this subsection, shall be
adjusted to account for inflation.
(2) Compensation for amputation of a member or part thereof at a
site other than those specified in subsection (1) of this section, and
for loss of central visual acuity and loss of hearing other than
complete, shall be in proportion to that which such other amputation or
partial loss of visual acuity or hearing most closely resembles and
approximates. Compensation shall be calculated based on the adjusted
schedule of compensation in effect for the respective time period as
prescribed in subsection (1) of this section.
(3)(a) Compensation for any other permanent partial disability not
involving amputation shall be in the proportion which the extent of
such other disability, called unspecified disability, shall bear to the
disabilities specified in subsection (1) of this section, which most
closely resembles and approximates in degree of disability such other
disability, and compensation for any other unspecified permanent
partial disability shall be in an amount as measured and compared to
total bodily impairment. To reduce litigation and establish more
certainty and uniformity in the rating of unspecified permanent partial
disabilities, the department shall enact rules having the force of law
classifying such disabilities in the proportion which the department
shall determine such disabilities reasonably bear to total bodily
impairment. In enacting such rules, the department shall give
consideration to, but need not necessarily adopt, any nationally
recognized medical standards or guides for determining various bodily
impairments.
(b) Until July 1, 1993, for purposes of calculating monetary
benefits under (a) of this subsection, the amount payable for total
bodily impairment shall be deemed to be ninety thousand dollars.
Beginning on July 1, 1993, for purposes of calculating monetary
benefits under (a) of this subsection, the amount payable for total
bodily impairment shall be adjusted as follows:
(i) Beginning on July 1, 1993, the amount payable for total bodily
impairment under this section shall be increased to one hundred
eighteen thousand eight hundred dollars; ((and))
(ii) Beginning on July 1, 1994, and ((each July 1 thereafter))
ending on June 30, 2005, the amount payable for total bodily impairment
prescribed in (b)(i) of this subsection shall be adjusted as provided
in subsection (1)(b)(ii) of this section; and
(iii) Beginning on July 1, 2005, and each July 1st thereafter, the
amount payable for total bodily impairment prescribed in (b)(i) of this
subsection shall be adjusted as provided in subsection (1)(b)(iii) of
this section.
(c) Until July 1, 1993, the total compensation for all unspecified
permanent partial disabilities resulting from the same injury shall not
exceed the sum of ninety thousand dollars. Beginning on July 1, 1993,
total compensation for all unspecified permanent partial disabilities
resulting from the same injury shall not exceed a sum calculated as
follows:
(i) Beginning on July 1, 1993, the sum shall be increased to one
hundred eighteen thousand eight hundred dollars; ((and))
(ii) Beginning on July 1, 1994, and ((each July 1 thereafter))
ending on June 30, 2005, the sum prescribed in (b)(i) of this
subsection shall be adjusted as provided in subsection (1)(b)(ii) of
this section; and
(iii) Beginning on July 1, 2005, and each July 1st thereafter, the
sum prescribed in (b)(i) of this subsection shall be adjusted as
provided in subsection (1)(b)(iii) of this section.
(4) If permanent partial disability compensation is followed by
permanent total disability compensation, any portion of the permanent
partial disability compensation which exceeds the amount that would
have been paid the injured worker if permanent total disability
compensation had been paid in the first instance, shall be deducted
from the pension reserve of such injured worker and his or her monthly
compensation payments shall be reduced accordingly.
(5) Should a worker receive an injury to a member or part of his or
her body already, from whatever cause, permanently partially disabled,
resulting in the amputation thereof or in an aggravation or increase in
such permanent partial disability but not resulting in the permanent
total disability of such worker, his or her compensation for such
partial disability shall be adjudged with regard to the previous
disability of the injured member or part and the degree or extent of
the aggravation or increase of disability thereof.
(6) When the compensation provided for in subsections (1) through
(3) of this section exceeds three times the average monthly wage in the
state as computed under the provisions of RCW 51.08.018, payment shall
be made in monthly payments in accordance with the schedule of
temporary total disability payments set forth in RCW 51.32.090 until
such compensation is paid to the injured worker in full, except that
the first monthly payment shall be in an amount equal to three times
the average monthly wage in the state as computed under the provisions
of RCW 51.08.018, and interest shall be paid at the rate of eight
percent on the unpaid balance of such compensation commencing with the
second monthly payment. However, upon application of the injured
worker or survivor the monthly payment may be converted, in whole or in
part, into a lump sum payment, in which event the monthly payment shall
cease in whole or in part. Such conversion may be made only upon
written application of the injured worker or survivor to the department
and shall rest in the discretion of the department depending upon the
merits of each individual application. Upon the death of a worker all
unpaid installments accrued shall be paid according to the payment
schedule established prior to the death of the worker to the widow or
widower, or if there is no widow or widower surviving, to the dependent
children of such claimant, and if there are no such dependent children,
then to such other dependents as defined by this title.
(7) Awards payable under this section are governed by the schedule
in effect on the date of injury.

Sec. 7 RCW 51.32.090 and 2004 c 65 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When the total disability is only temporary, the schedule of
payments contained in RCW 51.32.060 (1) and (2) shall apply, so long as
the total disability continues.
(2) Any compensation payable under this section for children not in
the custody of the injured worker as of the date of injury shall be
payable only to such person as actually is providing the support for
such child or children pursuant to the order of a court of record
providing for support of such child or children.
(3)(a) As soon as recovery is so complete that the present earning
power of the worker, at any kind of work, is restored to that existing
at the time of the occurrence of the injury, the payments shall cease.
If and so long as the present earning power is only partially restored,
the payments shall:
(i) For claims for injuries that occurred before May 7, 1993,
continue in the proportion which the new earning power shall bear to
the old; or
(ii) For claims for injuries occurring on or after May 7, 1993,
equal eighty percent of the actual difference between the worker's
present wages and earning power at the time of injury, but: (A) The
total of these payments and the worker's present wages may not exceed
one hundred fifty percent of the average monthly wage in the state as
computed under RCW 51.08.018; (B) the payments may not exceed one
hundred percent of the entitlement as computed under subsection (1) of
this section; and (C) the payments may not be less than the worker
would have received if (a)(i) of this subsection had been applicable to
the worker's claim.
(b) No compensation shall be payable under this subsection (3)
unless the loss of earning power shall exceed five percent.
(4)(a) Whenever the employer of injury requests that a worker who
is entitled to temporary total disability under this chapter be
certified by a physician or licensed advanced registered nurse
practitioner as able to perform available work other than his or her
usual work, the employer shall furnish to the physician or licensed
advanced registered nurse practitioner, with a copy to the worker, a
statement describing the work available with the employer of injury in
terms that will enable the physician or licensed advanced registered
nurse practitioner to relate the physical activities of the job to the
worker's disability. The physician or licensed advanced registered
nurse practitioner shall then determine whether the worker is
physically able to perform the work described. The worker's temporary
total disability payments shall continue until the worker is released
by his or her physician or licensed advanced registered nurse
practitioner for the work, and begins the work with the employer of
injury. If the work thereafter comes to an end before the worker's
recovery is sufficient in the judgment of his or her physician or
licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner to permit him or her to
return to his or her usual job, or to perform other available work
offered by the employer of injury, the worker's temporary total
disability payments shall be resumed. Should the available work
described, once undertaken by the worker, impede his or her recovery to
the extent that in the judgment of his or her physician or licensed
advanced registered nurse practitioner he or she should not continue to
work, the worker's temporary total disability payments shall be resumed
when the worker ceases such work.
(b) Once the worker returns to work under the terms of this
subsection (4), he or she shall not be assigned by the employer to work
other than the available work described without the worker's written
consent, or without prior review and approval by the worker's physician
or licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner.
(c) If the worker returns to work under this subsection (4), any
employee health and welfare benefits that the worker was receiving at
the time of injury shall continue or be resumed at the level provided
at the time of injury. Such benefits shall not be continued or resumed
if to do so is inconsistent with the terms of the benefit program, or
with the terms of the collective bargaining agreement currently in
force.
(d) In the event of any dispute as to the worker's ability to
perform the available work offered by the employer, the department
shall make the final determination.
(5) No worker shall receive compensation for or during the day on
which injury was received or the three days following the same, unless
his or her disability shall continue for a period of fourteen
consecutive calendar days from date of injury: PROVIDED, That attempts
to return to work in the first fourteen days following the injury shall
not serve to break the continuity of the period of disability if the
disability continues fourteen days after the injury occurs.
(6) Should a worker suffer a temporary total disability and should
his or her employer at the time of the injury continue to pay him or
her the wages which he or she was earning at the time of such injury,
such injured worker shall not receive any payment provided in
subsection (1) of this section during the period his or her employer
shall so pay such wages.
(7) ((In no event shall)) (a) For claims with date of injury or
manifestation of occupational disease before July 1, 2005, the monthly
payments provided in this section may not exceed the applicable
percentage of the average monthly wage in the state as computed under
the provisions of RCW 51.08.018 as follows:

AFTER PERCENTAGE

June 30, 1993 105%

June 30, 1994 110%

June 30, 1995 115%

June 30, 1996 120%

(b) On July 1, 2005, and on each July 1st thereafter, the
department shall determine the maximum amount of the monthly payments
provided in this section for claims with date of injury or
manifestation of occupational disease in the twelve-month period
beginning on the date of the department's determination. The
department shall determine the maximum amount for the twelve-month
period beginning on July 1st of each year by adjusting the maximum
amount for the previous twelve-month period by the rate of inflation.
(8) If the supervisor of industrial insurance determines that the
worker is voluntarily retired and is no longer attached to the work
force, benefits shall not be paid under this section.

Sec. 8 RCW 51.32.090 and 1993 c 521 s 3, 1993 c 299 s 1, and 1993
c 271 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) When the total disability is only temporary, the schedule of
payments contained in RCW 51.32.060 (1) and (2) shall apply, so long as
the total disability continues.
(2) Any compensation payable under this section for children not in
the custody of the injured worker as of the date of injury shall be
payable only to such person as actually is providing the support for
such child or children pursuant to the order of a court of record
providing for support of such child or children.
(3)(a) As soon as recovery is so complete that the present earning
power of the worker, at any kind of work, is restored to that existing
at the time of the occurrence of the injury, the payments shall cease.
If and so long as the present earning power is only partially restored,
the payments shall:
(i) For claims for injuries that occurred before May 7, 1993,
continue in the proportion which the new earning power shall bear to
the old; or
(ii) For claims for injuries occurring on or after May 7, 1993,
equal eighty percent of the actual difference between the worker's
present wages and earning power at the time of injury, but: (A) The
total of these payments and the worker's present wages may not exceed
one hundred fifty percent of the average monthly wage in the state as
computed under RCW 51.08.018; (B) the payments may not exceed one
hundred percent of the entitlement as computed under subsection (1) of
this section; and (C) the payments may not be less than the worker
would have received if (a)(i) of this subsection had been applicable to
the worker's claim.
(b) No compensation shall be payable under this subsection (3)
unless the loss of earning power shall exceed five percent.
(4)(a) Whenever the employer of injury requests that a worker who
is entitled to temporary total disability under this chapter be
certified by a physician as able to perform available work other than
his or her usual work, the employer shall furnish to the physician,
with a copy to the worker, a statement describing the work available
with the employer of injury in terms that will enable the physician to
relate the physical activities of the job to the worker's disability.
The physician shall then determine whether the worker is physically
able to perform the work described. The worker's temporary total
disability payments shall continue until the worker is released by his
or her physician for the work, and begins the work with the employer of
injury. If the work thereafter comes to an end before the worker's
recovery is sufficient in the judgment of his or her physician to
permit him or her to return to his or her usual job, or to perform
other available work offered by the employer of injury, the worker's
temporary total disability payments shall be resumed. Should the
available work described, once undertaken by the worker, impede his or
her recovery to the extent that in the judgment of his or her physician
he or she should not continue to work, the worker's temporary total
disability payments shall be resumed when the worker ceases such work.
(b) Once the worker returns to work under the terms of this
subsection (4), he or she shall not be assigned by the employer to work
other than the available work described without the worker's written
consent, or without prior review and approval by the worker's
physician.
(c) If the worker returns to work under this subsection (4), any
employee health and welfare benefits that the worker was receiving at
the time of injury shall continue or be resumed at the level provided
at the time of injury. Such benefits shall not be continued or resumed
if to do so is inconsistent with the terms of the benefit program, or
with the terms of the collective bargaining agreement currently in
force.
(d) In the event of any dispute as to the worker's ability to
perform the available work offered by the employer, the department
shall make the final determination.
(5) No worker shall receive compensation for or during the day on
which injury was received or the three days following the same, unless
his or her disability shall continue for a period of fourteen
consecutive calendar days from date of injury: PROVIDED, That attempts
to return to work in the first fourteen days following the injury shall
not serve to break the continuity of the period of disability if the
disability continues fourteen days after the injury occurs.
(6) Should a worker suffer a temporary total disability and should
his or her employer at the time of the injury continue to pay him or
her the wages which he or she was earning at the time of such injury,
such injured worker shall not receive any payment provided in
subsection (1) of this section during the period his or her employer
shall so pay such wages.
(7) ((In no event shall)) (a) For claims with date of injury or
manifestation of occupational disease before July 1, 2005, the monthly
payments provided in this section may not exceed the applicable
percentage of the average monthly wage in the state as computed under
the provisions of RCW 51.08.018 as follows:

AFTER
PERCENTAGE

June 30, 1993 105%

June 30, 1994 110%

June 30, 1995 115%

June 30, 1996 120%

(b) On July 1, 2005, and on each July 1st thereafter, the
department shall determine the maximum amount of the monthly payments
provided in this section for claims with date of injury or
manifestation of occupational disease in the twelve-month period
beginning on the date of the department's determination. The
department shall determine the maximum amount for the twelve-month
period beginning on July 1st of each year by adjusting the maximum
amount for the previous twelve-month period by the rate of inflation.
(8) If the supervisor of industrial insurance determines that the
worker is voluntarily retired and is no longer attached to the work
force, benefits shall not be paid under this section.

Sec. 9 RCW 51.36.020 and 1999 c 395 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When the injury to any worker is so serious as to require his
or her being taken from the place of injury to a place of treatment,
his or her employer shall, at the expense of the medical aid fund, or
self-insurer, as the case may be, furnish transportation to the nearest
place of proper treatment.
(2) Every worker whose injury results in the loss of one or more
limbs or eyes shall be provided with proper artificial substitutes and
every worker, who suffers an injury to an eye producing an error of
refraction, shall be once provided proper and properly equipped lenses
to correct such error of refraction and his or her disability rating
shall be based upon the loss of sight before correction.
(3) Every worker whose accident results in damage to or destruction
of an artificial limb, eye, or tooth, shall have same repaired or
replaced.
(4) Every worker whose hearing aid or eyeglasses or lenses are
damaged, destroyed, or lost as a result of an industrial accident shall
have the same restored or replaced. The department or self-insurer
shall be liable only for the cost of restoring damaged hearing aids or
eyeglasses to their condition at the time of the accident.
(5) All mechanical appliances necessary in the treatment of an
injured worker, such as braces, belts, casts, and crutches, shall be
provided and all mechanical appliances required as permanent equipment
after treatment has been completed shall continue to be provided or
replaced without regard to the date of injury or date treatment was
completed, notwithstanding any other provision of law.
(6) A worker, whose injury is of such short duration as to bring
him or her within the time limit provisions of RCW 51.32.090, shall
nevertheless receive during the omitted period medical, surgical, and
hospital care and service and transportation under the provisions of
this chapter.
(7) Whenever in the sole discretion of the supervisor it is
reasonable and necessary to provide residence modifications necessary
to meet the needs and requirements of the worker who has sustained
catastrophic injury, the department or self-insurer may be ordered to
pay an amount determined as follows:
(a) For requests for residence modifications received before July
1, 2005, the amount may not ((to)) exceed the state's average annual
wage for one year as determined under RCW 50.04.355((, as now existing
or hereafter amended,)) toward the cost of such modifications or
construction. ((Such))
(b) On July 1, 2005, and on each July 1st thereafter, the
department shall determine the maximum amount provided in this section
for requests for residence modifications received in the twelve-month
period beginning on the date of the department's determination. The
department shall determine the maximum amount for the twelve-month
period beginning on July 1st of each year by adjusting the maximum
amount for the previous twelve-month period by the rate of inflation.
Payment shall ((only)) be made under this subsection only for the
construction or modification of a residence in which the injured worker
resides. Only one residence of any worker may be modified or
constructed under this subsection, although the supervisor may order
more than one payment for any one home, up to the maximum amount
permitted by this section.
(8)(a) Whenever in the sole discretion of the supervisor it is
reasonable and necessary to modify a motor vehicle owned by a worker
who has become an amputee or becomes paralyzed because of an industrial
injury, the supervisor may pay or order a self-insurer to pay as
follows:
(i) For requests for motor vehicle modifications received before
July 1, 2005, up to fifty percent of the state's average annual wage
for one year, as determined under RCW 50.04.355((, to be paid by the
department or self-insurer)) toward the costs thereof.
(ii) On July 1, 2005, and on each July 1st thereafter, the
department shall determine the maximum amount provided in this section
for requests for motor vehicle modifications received in the twelve-month period beginning on the date of the department's determination.
The department shall determine the maximum amount for the twelve-month
period beginning on July 1st of each year by adjusting the maximum
amount for the previous twelve-month period by the rate of inflation.
(b) In the sole discretion of the supervisor after his or her
review, the amount paid under this subsection may be increased by no
more than four thousand dollars by written order of the supervisor.
(9) The benefits provided by subsections (7) and (8) of this
section are available to any otherwise eligible worker regardless of
the date of industrial injury.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Section 7 of this act expires June 30,
2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005, except for section 8 of this act which takes effect June
30, 2007.

--- END ---