BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall:
(a) Prepare financial statements on the state fund in accordance
with generally accepted accounting principles, including but not
limited to financial statements on the accident fund, the medical aid
fund, the supplemental pension fund, and the second injury fund.
Statements must be presented separately by fund and in the aggregate;
and
(b) Prepare financial information for the accident fund, medical
aid fund, and pension reserve fund based on statutory accounting
practices and principles promulgated by the national association of
insurance commissioners for the purpose of maintaining actuarial
solvency of these funds.
(2) Beginning in 2006, and, to avoid duplication, coordinated with
any audit that may be conducted under RCW 43.09.310, the state auditor
shall conduct annual audits of the state fund. As part of the audits
required under this section, the state auditor may contract with firms
qualified to perform all or part of the financial audit, as necessary.
(a) The firm or firms conducting the reviews shall be familiar with
the accounting standards applicable to the accounts under review and
shall have experience in workers' compensation reserving, discounting,
and rate making.
(b) The scope of the financial audit shall include, but is not
limited to:
(i) An opinion on whether the financial statements were prepared in
accordance with generally accepted accounting principles;
(ii) An assessment of the financial impact of the proposed rate
level on the actuarial solvency of the accident, medical aid, and
pension reserve funds, taking into consideration the risks inherent
with insurance and the effects of the actuarial assumptions, discount
rates, reserving, retrospective rating program, refunds, and individual
employer rate classes, as well as the standard accounting principles
used for insurance underwriting purposes; and
(iii) A statement of actuarial opinion on whether the loss and loss
adjustment expense reserves for the accident, medical aid, and pension
reserve funds were prepared in accordance with generally accepted
actuarial principles.
(c) The department shall cooperate with the state auditor in all
respects and shall permit the state auditor full access to all
information deemed necessary for a true and complete review.
(d) The cost of the audit shall be paid by the state fund under
separate contract.
(3) The state auditor shall issue an annual report to the governor,
the leaders of the majority and minority caucuses in the senate and the
house of representatives, the director of the office of financial
management, and the director of the department, on the results of the
financial audit and reviews, within six months of the end of the fiscal
year. The report may include recommendations.
(4) The audit report shall be available for public inspection.
(5) Within ninety days after the state auditor completes and
delivers to the appropriate authority an audit under subsection (2) of
this section, the director of the department shall notify the state
auditor in writing of the measures taken and proposed to be taken, if
any, to respond to the recommendations of the audit report. The state
auditor may extend the ninety-day period for good cause.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.09.310 and 1996 c 288 s 35 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the state
auditor shall annually audit the statewide combined financial
statements prepared by the office of financial management and make
post-audits of state agencies. Post-audits of state agencies shall be
made at such periodic intervals as is determined by the state auditor.
Audits of combined financial statements shall include determinations as
to the validity and accuracy of accounting methods, procedures and
standards utilized in their preparation, as well as the accuracy of the
financial statements themselves. A report shall be made of each such
audit and post-audit upon completion thereof, and one copy shall be
transmitted to the governor, one to the director of financial
management, one to the state agency audited, one to the joint
legislative audit and review committee, one each to the standing
committees on ways and means of the house and senate, one to the chief
clerk of the house, one to the secretary of the senate, and at least
one shall be kept on file in the office of the state auditor. A copy
of any report containing findings of noncompliance with state law shall
be transmitted to the attorney general.
(2) Audits of the department must be coordinated with the audits
required under section 1 of this act to avoid duplication of audits.

--- END ---