BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that with the creation
of the world trade organization and the development of world markets,
international trade agreements have begun to impact states and their
economies. For the first time, states are included in agreements
covering procurement by government entities. Moreover, the number of
regional and bilateral agreements being negotiated by the federal
government has increased under the 2002 trade promotion authority.
The legislature further finds that it is the role of the
legislature to authorize the state's participation and the terms
thereof in international trade agreements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW
to read as follows:
In order for the state to commit to participate in an international
trade agreement, the legislature must pass enabling legislation,
establishing the parties to the agreement, the agencies included, and
the extent of the state's participation.
(1) The legislature may enact prospective enabling legislation,
establishing the terms and authorizing the governor to communicate the
terms to the United States trade representative.
(2) The governor may condition the state's assent to a trade
agreement upon the ratification of the legislature. The ratification
must be done in the first regular session following the signing of the
agreement by the United States and the other nations. If Washington's
agreement is not ratified by the end of the first regular session
following the agreement's signing, the governor's assent is null and
void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.06 RCW
to read as follows:
The governor may not commit Washington to international trade
agreements absent legislative-enabling legislation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act applies to international trade
agreements that are signed after the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---