BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.16.350 and 1998 c 147 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any civil action for damages that is based upon alleged
professional negligence, that is for an injury or condition occurring
as a result of health care which is provided after June 25, 1976, and
that is brought against((:
(1))) a person or entity identified in subsection (2) of this
section, shall be commenced:
(a) By the later of three years from the act or omission, or one
year from the time the patient or his or her representative discovered
or reasonably should have discovered that the injury or condition was
caused by the act or omission; and
(b) Notwithstanding (a) of this subsection, no later than eight
years after the act or omission, except if the action involves an
injury to a minor, and the minor's parent or guardian knew that the
injury or condition was caused by the act or omission and failed to
bring the cause of action on behalf of the minor, the action shall be
commenced no later than three years from the date the minor reaches the
age of eighteen.
(2) Persons or entities against whom an action is brought under
subsection (1) of this section include:
(a) A person licensed by this state to provide health care or
related services, including, but not limited to, a physician,
osteopathic physician, dentist, nurse, optometrist, podiatric physician
and surgeon, chiropractor, physical therapist, psychologist,
pharmacist, optician, physician's assistant, osteopathic physician's
assistant, nurse practitioner, or physician's trained mobile intensive
care paramedic, including, in the event such person is deceased, his or
her estate or personal representative;
(((2))) (b) An employee or agent of a person described in (a) of
this subsection (((1) of this section)), acting in the course and scope
of his or her employment, including, in the event such employee or
agent is deceased, his or her estate or personal representative; or
(((3))) (c) An entity, whether or not incorporated, facility, or
institution employing one or more persons described in (a) of this
subsection (((1) of this section)), including, but not limited to, a
hospital, clinic, health maintenance organization, or nursing home; or
an officer, director, employee, or agent thereof acting in the course
and scope of his or her employment, including, in the event such
officer, director, employee, or agent is deceased, his or her estate or
personal representative((;
based upon alleged professional negligence shall be commenced within
three years of the act or omission alleged to have caused the injury or
condition, or one year of the time the patient or his representative
discovered or reasonably should have discovered that the injury or
condition was caused by said act or omission, whichever period expires
later, except that in no event shall an action be commenced more than
eight years after said act or omission: PROVIDED, That)).
(3) The time for commencement of an action is tolled upon proof of
fraud, intentional concealment, or the presence of a foreign body not
intended to have a therapeutic or diagnostic purpose or effect, until
the date the patient or the patient's representative has actual
knowledge of the act of fraud or concealment, or of the presence of the
foreign body; the patient or the patient's representative has one year
from the date of the actual knowledge in which to commence a civil
action for damages.
(4)(a)(i) For purposes of this section, ((notwithstanding RCW
4.16.190,)) the knowledge of a custodial parent or guardian shall be
imputed to a person under the age of eighteen years, and such imputed
knowledge shall operate to bar the claim of such minor to the same
extent that the claim of an adult would be barred under this section.
Any action not commenced in accordance with this section shall be
barred.
(ii) This subsection (4)(a) shall not apply to bar the claim of a
minor under the circumstance provided in subsection (1)(b) of this
section.
(b) For purposes of this section, with respect to care provided
after June 25, 1976, and before August 1, 1986, the knowledge of a
custodial parent or guardian shall be imputed as of April 29, 1987, to
persons under the age of eighteen years.
(5) This section does not apply to a civil action based on
intentional conduct brought against those individuals or entities
specified in this section by a person for recovery of damages for
injury occurring as a result of childhood sexual abuse as defined in
RCW 4.16.340(5).

Sec. 2 RCW 4.16.190 and 1993 c 232 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless otherwise provided in this section, if a person entitled
to bring an action mentioned in this chapter, except for a penalty or
forfeiture, or against a sheriff or other officer, for an escape, be at
the time the cause of action accrued either under the age of eighteen
years, or incompetent or disabled to such a degree that he or she
cannot understand the nature of the proceedings, such incompetency or
disability as determined according to chapter 11.88 RCW, or imprisoned
on a criminal charge prior to sentencing, the time of such disability
shall not be a part of the time limited for the commencement of action.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section with respect to a person under
the age of eighteen years does not apply to the time limited for the
commencement of an action under RCW 4.16.350.

--- END ---