BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
In any action under this chapter, each party shall presumptively be
entitled to only two independent experts on an issue, except upon a
showing of good cause. The court, upon a showing of good cause, shall
allow additional experts on an issue to be called as the court deems
appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
In an action under this chapter, all parties shall submit a
pretrial expert report pursuant to time frames provided in court rules.
The expert report must disclose the identity of all expert witnesses
and state the nature of the opinions the expert witnesses will present
as testimony at trial. Further depositions of these expert witnesses
is prohibited. The testimony that an expert witness may present at
trial is limited in nature to the opinions disclosed to the court as
part of the pretrial expert report. The legislature respectfully
requests that the supreme court adopt rules to implement the provisions
of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In an action against an individual health care provider under
this chapter for personal injury or wrongful death in which the injury
is alleged to have been caused by an act or omission that violates the
accepted standard of care, the plaintiff must file a certificate of
merit at the time of commencing the action. If the action is commenced
within forty-five days of the expiration of the applicable statute of
limitations, the plaintiff must file the certificate of merit within
forty-five days of commencing the action.
(2) The certificate of merit must be executed by a health care
provider who meets the qualifications of an expert under this chapter.
If there is more than one defendant in the action, the person
commencing the action must file a certificate of merit for each
defendant.
(3) The certificate of merit must contain a statement that the
person executing the certificate of merit believes, based on the
information known at the time of executing the certificate of merit,
that there is a reasonable probability that the defendant's conduct did
not follow the accepted standard of care required to be exercised by
the defendant.
(4) Upon motion of the plaintiff, the court may grant an additional
period of time to file the certificate of merit, not to exceed ninety
days, if the court finds there is good cause for the extension.
(5)(a) Failure to file a certificate of merit that complies with
the requirements of this section is grounds for dismissal of the case.
(b) If a case is dismissed for failure to file a certificate of
merit that complies with the requirements of this section, the filing
of the claim against the health care provider shall not be used against
the health care provider in professional liability insurance rate
setting, personal credit history, or professional licensing and
credentialing.

--- END ---