BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 7.70.100 and 1993 c 492 s 419 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No action based upon a health care provider's professional
negligence may be commenced unless the defendant has been given at
least ninety days' notice of the intention to commence the action. If
the notice is served within ninety days of the expiration of the
applicable statute of limitations, the time for the commencement of the
action must be extended ninety days from the service of the notice.
(2) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section are not
applicable with respect to any defendant whose name is unknown to the
plaintiff at the time of filing the complaint and who is identified
therein by a fictitious name or to any defendant who cannot be found
within the state after a due and diligent search.
(3) After the filing of the ninety-day presuit notice, and before
a superior court trial, all causes of action, whether based in tort,
contract, or otherwise, for damages arising from injury occurring as a
result of health care provided after July 1, 1993, shall be subject to
mandatory mediation prior to trial except as provided in subsection (6)
of this section.
(((2))) (4) The supreme court shall by rule adopt procedures to
implement mandatory mediation of actions under this chapter. The rules
shall require mandatory mediation without exception unless subsection
(6) of this section applies. The rules on mandatory mediation shall
address, at a minimum:
(a) Procedures for the appointment of, and qualifications of,
mediators. A mediator shall have experience or expertise related to
actions arising from injury occurring as a result of health care, and
be a member of the state bar association who has been admitted to the
bar for a minimum of five years or who is a retired judge. The parties
may stipulate to a nonlawyer mediator. The court may prescribe
additional qualifications of mediators;
(b) Appropriate limits on the amount or manner of compensation of
mediators;
(c) The number of days following the filing of a claim under this
chapter within which a mediator must be selected;
(d) The method by which a mediator is selected. The rule shall
provide for designation of a mediator by the superior court if the
parties are unable to agree upon a mediator;
(e) The number of days following the selection of a mediator within
which a mediation conference must be held; and
(f) ((A means by which mediation of an action under this chapter
may be waived by a mediator who has determined that the claim is not
appropriate for mediation; and
(g))) Any other matters deemed necessary by the court.
(((3))) (5) Mediators shall not impose discovery schedules upon the
parties.
(6) The mandatory mediation requirement of subsection (4) of this
section does not apply to an action subject to mandatory arbitration
under chapter 7.06 RCW, to an action in which the parties have agreed,
subsequent to the arisal of the claim, to submit the claim to
arbitration under chapter 7.04 RCW, or to an action in which the
parties have entered into an agreement, subsequent to the arisal of the
claim, to submit the claim to any other form of alternative dispute
resolution process.
(7) The legislature respectfully requests that the supreme court by
rule also adopt procedures for the parties to certify to the court the
manner of mediation, arbitration, or other form of alternative dispute
resolution used by the parties to comply with this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In an action under this chapter where a party has made an offer
of settlement that complies with the provisions of subsection (2) of
this section, the court may, in its discretion, award reasonable
attorneys' fees and statutory costs to a prevailing party. In making
the determination of whether or not reasonable attorneys' fees should
be awarded to a prevailing party, the court may consider:
(a) Whether the party who rejected or failed to accept the offer of
settlement was substantially justified in bringing the case to trial;
(b) The extent to which additional relevant and material facts or
information became known after the offer was rejected or not accepted;
(c) Whether the offer of settlement was made in good faith;
(d) The closeness of questions of fact and law at issue in the
case;
(e) Whether a party engaged in conduct that unduly or unreasonably
delayed the resolution of the proceeding;
(f) Whether the circumstances make an award unjust; and
(g) Any other factor the court deems appropriate under the
circumstances of the case.
(2) An offer of settlement must be made in writing and served on
the opposing party at least fifteen days before trial and not before
thirty days after the completion of the service and filing of the
summons and complaint. The offer must remain open for a period of not
less than ten days.
(3) An offer of settlement shall not be filed with the court or
communicated to the trier of fact until after judgment in the case, at
which point a copy of the offer of settlement shall be filed with the
court for the purpose of allowing the court to determine whether an
award of reasonable attorneys' fees is appropriate under the
circumstances of the case.
(4) If the court determines that an award of reasonable attorneys'
fees to a prevailing party is appropriate under this section, the court
shall consider the factors in RCW 7.70.070 in determining the amount of
reasonable attorneys' fees to be awarded. The award of reasonable
attorneys' fees shall be limited to attorneys' fees incurred from the
date of commencement of the trial.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "prevailing party" means a
party who makes an offer of settlement that is either rejected or not
accepted by the opposing party, and who improves his or her position at
trial relative to his or her offer of settlement.

--- END ---