BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purpose of this chapter is to protect
Washington farm workers from highly toxic pesticides in the workplace.
The legislature finds that:
(1) Certain pesticides dispersed in Washington workplaces are
highly toxic even in small amounts. Exposure to these pesticides may
result in severe illness and may cause long-lasting effects;
(2) There are less toxic substitutes for many highly toxic
pesticides;
(3) Principles of workplace safety support the substitution of less
toxic materials or alternative practices, where available, in order to
protect workers from exposure to highly toxic substances; and
(4) Principles of workplace safety should be applied to the
handling and dispersed use of highly toxic pesticides by requiring
substitution of less toxic substances or alternative practices, where
available, and by promoting the development of alternative substances
or practices in cases where they are not currently available.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1)(a) "Category one highly toxic pesticide" means a pesticide
determined by the director to:
(i) Have an inhalation LD-50 of 0.2 milligrams per liter or less
for a period of one hour;
(ii) Have a dermal LD-50 of two hundred milligrams per kilogram or
less;
(iii) Have an oral LD-50 of fifty milligrams per kilogram or less;
(iv) Be corrosive to the eyes, or cause corneal opacity not
reversible within seven days; or
(v) Be corrosive to the skin.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, the director may rely upon the
determination by another state or federal agency that a pesticide meets
the toxicity criteria described in this subsection.
(2)(a) "Category two highly toxic pesticide" means an
organophosphate or N-methyl-carbamate pesticide determined by the
director to:
(i) Have an inhalation LD-50 of greater than 0.2 milligrams per
liter and up to two milligrams per liter for a period of one hour;
(ii) Have a dermal LD-50 of greater than two hundred milligrams per
kilogram and up to two thousand milligrams per kilogram;
(iii) Have an oral LD-50 of greater than fifty milligrams per
kilogram and up to five hundred milligrams per kilogram; or
(iv) Cause severe irritation to the eyes or skin seventy-two hours
after application.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, the director may rely upon the
determination by another state or federal agency that a pesticide meets
the toxicity criteria described in this subsection.
(3) "Closed system" means a procedure for removing a pesticide from
its original container, rinsing the emptied container, and transferring
the pesticide product, mixtures and dilutions and rinse solution
through connecting hoses, pipes, and couplings that are sufficiently
tight to prevent exposure of a person to the pesticide or rinse
solution, or through water soluble packets.
(4) "Director" means the director of the department of labor and
industries.
(5) "Dispersed use" means the intentional application of a highly
toxic pesticide by aircraft, power blast equipment, sprayer, or other
means to disseminate the pesticide in the workplace.
(6) "Labor-intensive crop" means a crop requiring substantial hand
labor for planting, thinning, cultivating, pruning, harvesting, or
other agricultural activities. "Labor-intensive crops" include but are
not limited to apples, cherries, peaches, berries, hops, grapes,
asparagus, pears, plums, nectarines, onions, cucumbers, cauliflower,
and squash. By virtue of mechanization, crops such as, but not limited
to, wheat, oats, and barley are excluded unless substantial hand labor
is used.
(7) "LD-50" means a median lethal dose or concentration.
(8) "Pesticide" means, but is not limited to:
(a) A substance or mixture of substances intended to prevent,
destroy, control, repel, or mitigate insects, rodents, snails, slugs,
fungi, weeds, and other forms of plant or animal life or virus, except
a virus on or in a living person or animal, that is normally considered
to be a pest or that the director may declare to be a pest;
(b) A substance or mixture of substances intended to be used as a
plant regulator, defoliant, or desiccant; or
(c) A spray adjuvant.
(9) "Severe economic hardship" means economic circumstances that
create a serious threat to the existence or competitive structure of
the industry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The director shall provide for restrictions
on the use of highly toxic pesticides identified under this chapter in
accordance with RCW 49.17.050(4). The restrictions must ensure, using
the best available evidence, that no employee will suffer material
impairment of health or functional capacity even if the employee has
regular exposure to these pesticides during his or her working life.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Except as provided in sections 5 and 9 of
this act, no employer, or employee or agent of the employer, may
disperse the following pesticides in a labor-intensive crop:
(1) Category one highly toxic pesticides after January 1, 2008;
(2) Category two highly toxic pesticides after January 1, 2010; and
(3) Highly toxic pesticides identified under section 6 of this act
after January 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The director may authorize the dispersed
use of a highly toxic pesticide on a labor-intensive crop if the
director finds by rule after a public hearing in accordance with RCW
34.05.325 that prohibition of the dispersed use of a highly toxic
pesticide is likely to cause severe economic hardship to a substantial
portion of the affected industry, and that no feasible alternative
substances or practices are available.
(2) If the director authorizes an extension of the dispersed use of
a highly toxic pesticide, the director shall impose additional
mitigation measures or limit the time period of such extension in order
to protect agricultural workers.
(3) If the director authorizes an extension of the dispersed use of
a highly toxic pesticide, the director shall immediately notify
appropriate research institutions and programs of the state, including
the University of Washington and Washington State University, in order
to facilitate research into alternative substances and practices.
(4) This section expires January 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) By January 1, 2007, the director shall
review agricultural pesticides used on labor-intensive crops in
Washington state and develop a list of highly toxic pesticides that
should be restricted under section 4(3) of this act because of the
acute, chronic, or subchronic health hazards they pose. The list shall
include, at a minimum, all pesticide products containing known, likely,
or probable carcinogens, reproductive toxicants, or developmental
toxicants, as active ingredients.
(2) The director may rely upon the determination by another state
or federal agency that a pesticide meets the toxicity criteria
described in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 When new pesticides are registered for use
in the state of Washington, the director shall determine whether they
are highly toxic pesticides under this chapter, and shall prohibit the
use of such pesticides on labor-intensive crops pursuant to this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) After January 1, 2006, no agricultural
employer shall allow any employee to transfer, mix, or load a pesticide
designated as a category one or category two highly toxic pesticide, if
the pesticide is in liquid form or diluted liquid mixes derived from
dry pesticides, except through a closed system.
(2) After January 1, 2006, no employer shall allow employees to
plant, thin, prune, harvest, cultivate, or perform other hand labor on
labor-intensive crops treated with highly toxic pesticides unless the
employer provides the employees with gloves that meet requirements
established in rule by the director to limit pesticide exposure among
employees performing hand labor in labor-intensive crops.
(3) After January 1, 2006, the director shall adopt by rule any
mitigation measures in addition to those required in subsections (1)
and (2) of this section, if the director determines such measures are
necessary and feasible under section 3 of this act before such use is
terminated in accordance with section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 An institution of higher education that is
otherwise authorized to use highly toxic pesticides may use these
materials for research purposes only.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 49 RCW.

--- END ---