BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.46.090 and 2002 c 114 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A citizen advisory committee must be created for any project
developed under this chapter that imposes toll charges for use of a
transportation facility. The governor shall appoint nine members to
the committee, all of whom must be permanent residents of the affected
project area((, as that term is used in RCW 47.46.030)) as defined for
each project. Members of the committee shall serve without
compensation.
(2) The citizen advisory committee shall serve in an advisory
capacity to the commission on all matters related to the imposition of
tolls((. Members of the committee shall serve without compensation))
including, but not limited to, (a) the feasibility of providing
discounts to frequent users, senior citizens, or students; and (b) the
tradeoff of lower tolls versus the early retirement of debt.
(3) No toll charge may be imposed or modified unless the citizen
advisory committee has been given at least twenty days to review and
comment on any proposed toll charge schedule. In setting toll rates,
the commission shall give consideration to any recommendations of the
citizen advisory committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.46 RCW
to read as follows:
The Tacoma Narrows bridge citizen advisory committee is hereby
created as directed under RCW 47.46.090. The advisory committee
members shall be appointed proportionately, to the extent practicable,
from those areas from which the majority of the trips originate on the
bridge according to the latest traffic analysis by the department.

--- END ---