BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to all other license fees, passenger cars, travel
trailers, and motor homes are assessed a transportation improvement fee
of one and one-half cents per vehicle pound based on the empty scale
weight. In addition, vehicles licensed under RCW 46.16.070 weighing
less than ten thousand pounds are assessed a transportation improvement
fee of one and one-half cents per pound based on the empty scale
weight.
(2) The department of licensing shall collect the fee annually.
The department will rely on the vehicle empty scale weights as provided
by the manufacturers, or other sources defined by the department, to
determine the weight of each vehicle type. The department shall adopt
rules to handle vehicles without manufacturer empty scale weights, such
as home-built vehicles.
(3) Two-thirds of the revenue will be used by the state exclusively
for transportation purposes. Ninety percent of the state's share of
the revenue must be deposited into the state's motor vehicle account to
be used for highway purposes. Ten percent of the revenue must be
deposited into the state's multimodal transportation account to be used
for multimodal transportation capital purposes. The remainder will be
divided equally between counties and cities for transportation needs
and distributed monthly by the state treasurer. A particular county's
distribution will be based on the number of vehicles registered in that
county as a percentage of the state's total registrations, and a
particular city's distribution will be based on its population as a
percentage of the state's total population living within incorporated
areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to vehicle registrations
due or to become due on April 1, 2007, and thereafter.

--- END ---