BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.04.215 and 1997 c 229 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Ignition interlock device" means breath alcohol analyzing ignition
equipment((,)) or other biological or technical device certified by the
state patrol((,)) and designed to prevent a motor vehicle from being
operated by a person who has consumed an alcoholic beverage((, and
"other biological or technical device" means any device meeting the
standards of the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration or the
state patrol, designed to prevent the operation of a motor vehicle by
a person who is impaired by alcohol or drugs)). The state patrol
shall by rule provide standards for the certification, installation,
repair, and removal of the devices.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.750 and 1994 c 275 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person who is restricted to the use of a vehicle equipped
with an ignition interlock device and who tampers with the device or
directs, authorizes, or requests another to tamper with the device, in
order to circumvent the device by modifying, detaching, disconnecting,
or otherwise disabling it, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(2) A person who knowingly assists another person who is restricted
to the use of a vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock ((or other
biological or technical)) device to circumvent the device or to start
and operate that vehicle in violation of a court order is guilty of a
gross misdemeanor. The provisions of this ((section)) subsection do
not apply if the starting of a motor vehicle, or the request to start
a motor vehicle, equipped with an ignition interlock ((or other
biological or technical)) device is done for the purpose of safety or
mechanical repair of the device or the vehicle and the person subject
to the court order does not operate the vehicle.

--- END ---