BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to charges made
for labor and services rendered by any person in respect to the
constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of voter-approved
facilities, or to sales of tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component of the buildings or other structures during the
course of the constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving voter-approved facilities.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "voter-approved facility"
means buildings or other structures financed by voter-approved bond
retirement tax levies under Article VII, section 2(b) of the state
Constitution and RCW 84.52.056.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use
of tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or component
of a voter-approved facility, as defined in section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect August 1, 2005.

--- END ---