BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.18 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature reaffirms that the purposes of the department of
labor and industries' retrospective rating program are to substantially
improve worker safety, accident prevention, and worker outcomes. The
legislature finds that certain aspects of the program are inconsistent
with these purposes and, therefore, do not create the incentives
necessary to ensure that workers are not significantly less likely to
be injured.
The legislature finds that retrospective rating groups granted the
privilege of participating in the retrospective rating program must
agree to terms and conditions of program participation that are
reasonably related to achieving these purposes. These terms and
conditions shall include, but not be limited to, requiring that refunds
be distributed to employers, and ensuring that employers in the
retrospective rating groups are substantially similar considering their
risk classifications.
The legislature declares that immediate changes are necessary to
ensure that retrospective rating groups focus on safety, and
consequently, to preserve the health and safety of Washington workers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 51.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) With respect to refunds made by the department to a sponsor of
a retrospective rating group on or after the effective date of this
section:
(a) The sponsoring entity must distribute the full amount of the
refund to the members of the retrospective rating group within one
hundred eighty days of the final adjustment for the corresponding
coverage period except as provided in (c) and (d) of this subsection.
(b) The sponsoring entity must distribute the refund to the members
by sending checks imprinted with the sponsoring entity's name directly
to the member's last known address by certified mail, return receipt
requested.
(c) A sponsoring entity may elect not to distribute any part of a
refund to a member who is in arrears for enrollment fees or other
payments required to participate in the retrospective rating group, so
long as any part not distributed to the member in arrears is
distributed to members not in arrears within one hundred eighty days of
the final adjustment for the corresponding coverage period.
(d) A sponsoring entity may use any part of a refund to pay the
department any part or all of any penalties owed for any active
coverage period.
(2) The department shall periodically inspect and review records of
sponsoring entities to assure compliance with the requirements of this
section.
(3) If a sponsoring entity violates the requirements of this
section, the department may disqualify the sponsoring entity from
further participation in the retrospective rating program.

Sec. 3 RCW 51.16.035 and 1999 c 7 s 8 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) The department shall classify all occupations or industries in
accordance with their degree of hazard and fix therefor basic rates of
premium which shall be the lowest necessary to maintain actuarial
solvency of the accident and medical aid funds in accordance with
recognized insurance principles. The department shall formulate and
adopt rules and regulations governing the method of premium calculation
and collection and providing for a rating system consistent with
recognized principles of workers' compensation insurance which shall be
designed to stimulate and encourage accident prevention and to
facilitate collection. The department may annually, or at such other
times as it deems necessary to maintain solvency of the funds, readjust
rates in accordance with the rating system to become effective on such
dates as the department may designate.
(2) In providing a retrospective rating plan under RCW 51.18.010,
the department may consider each individual retrospective rating group
as a single employing entity for purposes of ((dividends or premium
discounts)) refunds.

Sec. 4 RCW 51.18.020 and 1999 c 7 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
Prior to allowing ((initial entrance into)) enrollment or
reenrollment in the state's retrospective rating plan, the department
shall review each ((proposed)) retrospective rating group applying to
enroll or reenroll in the plan to ensure that the following criteria
are met:
(1) The entity sponsoring the retrospective rating group must have
been in existence for at least four years;
(2) The entity must be exempt from federal income tax;
(3) The entity sponsoring the retrospective rating group must exist
primarily for a purpose other than that of obtaining or offering
insurance coverage or insurance related services, including sponsoring
a retrospective rating group;
(((3))) (4) The entity sponsoring the retrospective rating group
must have a written workplace safety and accident prevention plan in
place for the proposed retrospective rating group and must propose
methods by which the retrospective rating group will cooperate with
department claims management activities;
(((4))) (5) All employers in the retrospective rating group must be
members of the sponsoring entity;
(((5))) (6) All employers in the retrospective rating group must
have an industrial insurance account in good standing with the
department;
(((6))) (7) Fifty percent of the original employers in the
retrospective rating group must have been members of the sponsoring
entity for one year prior to the group's entrance into the
retrospective rating plan;
(((7))) (8) The retrospective rating group must be composed of
employers who are substantially similar considering the services or
activities performed by the employees of those employers;
(((8))) (9) The initial premium level for the retrospective rating
group must be at least one million five hundred thousand dollars and
shall be based on the standard premium of the proposed group members'
most current previous coverage period; and
(((9))) (10) The formation and operation of the retrospective
rating group must seek to substantially improve workplace safety and
accident prevention for the employers in the group.

Sec. 5 RCW 51.18.040 and 1999 c 7 s 5 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) In order to ensure that all retrospective rating groups are
made up of employers who are substantially similar, ((considering the
services or activities performed by the employees of those employers,))
the sponsoring entity of a retrospective rating group shall select a
single, broad industry or business category for each retrospective
rating group. ((Once an industry or business category is selected, the
department shall allow all risk classifications reasonably related to
that business or industry category into that retrospective rating
group.))
(2) The following broad industry and business categories shall be
used by the sponsoring entity and the department in establishing
retrospective rating groups:
(a) Agriculture and related services;
(b) Automotive, truck and boat manufacturing, sales, repair, and
related services;
(c) Construction and related services;
(d) Distillation, chemical production, food, and related services;
(e) Facilities or property management, maintenance, and related
services;
(f) Government, utilities, schools, health care, and related
services;
(g) Health care, pharmaceutical, laboratories, and related
services;
(h) Logging, wood products manufacturing, and related services;
(i) Manufacturing, processing, mining, quarrying, and related
services;
(j) Retail stores, wholesale stores, professional services, and
related services;
(k) Temporary help and related services; and
(l) Transportation, recycling, warehousing, facility maintenance,
and related services.
(3) The industry and business categories in subsection (2) of this
section are not exclusive. In response to significant changes in
marketplace demographics or the discovery of unique business or
industry categories, the department may, by rule, include additional
broad industry or business category selections. The department may, by
rule, remove an industry covered within an industry or business
category in the event that the business or industry is no longer found
within this state.
(4) ((Given the broad nature of the industry and business
categories in subsection (2) of this section, the risk classification
or classifications assigned to an individual employer may appropriately
fall into multiple business or industry categories.
(5) In order to simplify administration and keep the administrative
costs associated with devising a different classification system for a
retrospective rating plan to a minimum, the state's retrospective
rating plan shall follow the same classification procedure established
by the department to assign workers' compensation insurance
classifications to an employer.
(6))) (a) With respect to any coverage period, employers who have
been a member of an existing, approved retrospective rating group prior
to July 25, 1999, may continue in that group even if they are not
substantially similar to the industry or business category selected
pursuant to ((subsection (1) of this)) section 5(1), chapter 7, Laws of
1999.
((However, new)) (b)(i) With respect to any coverage period
beginning before January 1, 2007, employers who were proposed for
addition to a retrospective rating group on or after July 25, 1999, and
before the effective date of this section, and who have been a member
of a retrospective rating group prior to the effective date of this
section, must fall within the ((selected)) industry or business
category selected pursuant to section 5(1), chapter 7, Laws of 1999.
(ii) With respect to any coverage period beginning on or after
January 1, 2007, an employer who was proposed for addition to a
retrospective rating group on or after July 25, 1999, and before the
effective date of this section, and who has been a member of a
retrospective rating group before the effective date of this section,
must report more than fifty percent of its hours in one or more risk
classifications in the retrospective rating group's business or
industry category. If the employer reports more than fifty percent of
its hours in risk classifications not in any group's business or
industry category, the department shall approve the employer's
participation in the retrospective rating group composed of the most
similar employers.
(c) With respect to any coverage period beginning on or after the
effective date of this section, employers who are proposed for addition
to a retrospective rating group on or after the effective date of this
section must report more than fifty percent of its hours in one or more
risk classifications in the retrospective rating group's business or
industry category. If the employer reports more than fifty percent of
its hours in risk classifications not in any group's business or
industry category, the department shall approve the employer's
participation in the retrospective rating group composed of the most
similar employers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 51.18 RCW
to read as follows:
The director may adopt rules to carry out the purposes of this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---