BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In order to safeguard human health, safety,
and property, and to promote public welfare, any person in either a
public or private capacity using the title of registered interior
designer is required to submit evidence that he or she is qualified
under the provisions of section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(2) "Registered interior designer" means a person registered under
this chapter who is a registered design professional qualified by
education, experience, and examination.
(3) "Registration" means the certificate of registration issued by
the department to an interior designer under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The director may:
(1) Employ administrative, clerical, and investigative staff as
necessary to administer and enforce this chapter;
(2) Establish fees for applications, examinations, and renewals in
accordance with chapter 43.24 RCW;
(3) Issue certificates of registration to applicants who meet the
requirements of this chapter; and
(4) Exercise rule-making authority to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) An applicant may qualify for
registration as a registered interior designer if the applicant pays
any applicable fee established by the department and shows to the
satisfaction of the department that the applicant:
(a)(i) Has a current certificate number issued by the national
council for interior design qualification; and
(ii) Has six years' combined work experience and formal education
in interior design from an accredited degree program. At a minimum,
there must be two years of formal education in interior design. The
curriculum for formal education in interior design should encompass:
Manual and computer-aided design, two and three-dimensional design,
design and composition fundamentals, color theory, building systems,
material, finishes and specifications, codes and ordinances,
presentation skills, and business practices and management. Hours of
experience must be distributed among six competency areas:
Programming, schematic design, design development, contract documents,
contract administration, and professional practice; or
(b) Has provided the department, by July 1, 2007, with proof of
fifteen years of work experience as an interior designer and two years
of formal education in interior design.
(2) The department may also grant registration by reciprocity. An
applicant applying to the department for registration by reciprocity
must furnish satisfactory evidence that the applicant holds both a:
(a) Valid registration or license issued by another registration
authority recognized by the department, where the qualifications for
registration or licensure are substantially equivalent to those
required by this chapter on the date of original registration or
licensure with the other registration authority; and
(b) Current certificate number issued by the national council for
interior design qualification.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The department shall grant a certificate of
registration to an applicant who meets the requirements of section 4 of
this act beginning July 1, 2006. After July 1, 2007, a person may not
use the title "registered interior designer" in this state or any other
title, designation, sign, card, or device indicating that the person is
a registered interior designer unless he or she is registered under
this chapter. Every holder of a certificate of registration under this
chapter must display it in a conspicuous place in the holder's
principal office, place of business, or employment. No corporation,
firm, partnership, or association may be granted a certificate of
registration under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The renewal date for certificates of
registration shall be set by the department. A registered interior
designer who fails to pay the renewal fee within thirty days of the due
date shall pay all delinquent renewal fees, plus a penalty equal to
one-third of the renewal fee. A registered interior designer who fails
to pay a renewal fee for a period of five years may be reinstated under
such circumstances as the department determines.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 An interior designer registered under this
chapter must complete ten hours of continuing education instruction
every two years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The department may issue a new certificate
of registration to replace a lost, destroyed, or mutilated certificate.
The director must charge a fee as determined by RCW 43.24.086 for the
issuance of the new certificate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The uniform regulation of business and
professions act, chapter 18.235 RCW, governs the issuance and denial of
certificates of registration and the discipline of registrants under
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) All fees and fines collected under the
provisions of this chapter must be paid into the interior designers
account created in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The interior designers account is created in the custody of
the state treasurer. All receipts from fees and fines collected under
this chapter must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the
account may be used only to carry out the duties required for the
operation and enforcement of this chapter. Only the director of
licensing or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from
the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) This chapter does not affect or prevent
the practice of architecture under chapter 18.08 RCW or engineering
under chapter 18.43 RCW.
(2) This chapter does not prevent any individual from offering or
providing interior design services provided they do not use the title
"registered interior designer."
(3) This chapter does not prevent any individual from using the
term "interior designer."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act may be known and cited as the
registered interior designer professionals act of 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 12 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

--- END ---