BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning with vehicle registrations that are due or become due
July 1, 2005, and thereafter, at the time of initial vehicle
registration or upon periodic replacement of license plates under RCW
46.16.233, the registered owner shall pay and the department shall
collect an additional fee of three dollars for each license plate
issued, to assist in funding traffic safety education. The department
shall transmit the fee to the state treasurer for deposit into the
public safety and education account. The amount so deposited may be
used only for reducing the cost of traffic safety education courses
under chapter 28A.220 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The office of the superintendent of public
instruction will report by July 1, 2006, to the transportation
committees of the legislature regarding the expenditure of the funds
collected through the fee created in section 1 of this act. The report
will include, but not be limited to, information regarding: (1) The
number of students in each school district that applied for
scholarships to driver training schools licensed under chapter 46.82
RCW, (2) the number of students in each school district that received
scholarships to driver training schools licensed under chapter 46.82
RCW, (3) the dollar amount of the scholarship offered in each school
district, (4) the percentage of students in each school district that
enrolled in a school district-provided traffic safety education course,
and (5) the number of students that enrolled in driver training schools
licensed under chapter 46.82 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.220.040 and 2000 c 115 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each school district shall be reimbursed from funds
appropriated for traffic safety education.
(((a))) (2) The state superintendent shall determine the per-pupil
reimbursement amount for the traffic safety education course to be
funded by the state. The superintendent shall deduct an amount not
more than five percent of the fees collected under section 1 of this
act for administrative expenses incurred in determining the allocation
of those funds. Each school district offering an approved standard
traffic safety education course shall be reimbursed ((or granted)) an
amount up to the level established by the superintendent of public
instruction as may be appropriated. Each school district will offer to
students the option of either enrolling in a school district-provided
traffic safety education course or receiving a scholarship of an
equivalent amount to enroll in any drivers' school licensed under
chapter 46.82 RCW, based on available funds received under section 1 of
this act.
(((b))) (3) The state superintendent may provide per-pupil
reimbursements to school districts only where all the traffic educators
have satisfied the continuing education requirement of RCW
28A.220.030(4).
(((2))) (4) The board of directors of any school district or
combination of school districts may establish a traffic safety
education fee, which fee when imposed shall be required to be paid by
any duly enrolled student in any such school district prior to or while
enrolled in a traffic safety education course. In accordance with
funding received under section 1 of this act, the board shall set a
reduced fee for students qualified to receive school lunches on a
reduced-cost or free basis. Traffic safety education fees collected by
a school district shall be deposited with the county treasurer to the
credit of such school district, to be used to pay costs of the traffic
safety education course.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---