BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
At the time of initial vehicle registration or upon periodic
replacement of license plates under RCW 46.16.233, the registered owner
shall pay and the department shall collect an additional fee of one
dollar to assist in funding traffic safety education for low-income
students. The department shall transmit the fee to the state treasurer
for deposit in the public safety and education account, and the amount
so deposited may be used only for reducing the cost of traffic safety
education courses under chapter 28A.220 RCW for students qualified to
receive school lunches on a reduced-cost or free basis.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.220.040 and 2000 c 115 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each school district shall be reimbursed from funds
appropriated for traffic safety education.
(a) The state superintendent shall determine the per-pupil
reimbursement amount for the traffic safety education course to be
funded by the state. The superintendent shall deduct an amount not
more than five percent of the fees collected under section 1 of this
act for administrative expenses incurred in determining the allocation
of those funds. Each school district offering an approved standard
traffic safety education course shall be reimbursed or granted an
amount up to the level established by the superintendent of public
instruction as may be appropriated.
(b) The state superintendent may provide per-pupil reimbursements
to school districts only where all the traffic educators have satisfied
the continuing education requirement of RCW 28A.220.030(4).
(2) The board of directors of any school district or combination of
school districts may establish a traffic safety education fee, which
fee when imposed shall be required to be paid by any duly enrolled
student in any such school district prior to or while enrolled in a
traffic safety education course. In accordance with funding received
under section 1 of this act, the board shall set a reduced fee for
students qualified to receive school lunches on a reduced-cost or free
basis. Traffic safety education fees collected by a school district
shall be deposited with the county treasurer to the credit of such
school district, to be used to pay costs of the traffic safety
education course.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---