BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that Hood Canal is
a marine water of the state in significant peril. The legislature also
finds that low dissolved oxygen concentrations have occurred in Hood
Canal for many years and that these conditions have created a serious
environmental health concern. The legislature further finds that
substantial fish kills have occurred in Hood Canal in recent years, and
scientists and others report significant changes in marine species
behavior in Hood Canal.
(2) The legislature finds that the factors contributing to Hood
Canal's low dissolved oxygen problems are complex and that
investigation is needed to understand both the problem and its
potential solutions. The legislature also finds that a historical
perspective is important in understanding Hood Canal's problems. The
legislature recognizes the tribal elders and other long-term residents
of the Hood Canal area are a great source of knowledge regarding the
history of Hood Canal. The legislature finds these tribal elders and
others may provide critical insight into the history, impacts, and
potential causes of the low dissolved oxygen concentrations occurring
in Hood Canal.
(3) The legislature intends to initiate a process for university
students to interview tribal elders and others who have knowledge of
the history of conditions along Hood Canal to collect information
regarding the history and impacts of Hood Canal's low dissolved oxygen
concentrations. The legislature further intends that these interviews
and the information learned be preserved as part of the state's oral
history program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.40 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Evergreen State College shall administer and conduct a
program to record and document oral histories of tribal elders of the
tribes in the area surrounding Hood Canal and other long-term residents
of the Hood Canal area who have similar knowledge of the history of the
conditions along Hood Canal. The purpose of these interviews is to
collect information and perspectives regarding the history of the
conditions along Hood Canal, including but not limited to reports of
fish kills, changes in marine species behavior, fishing and harvesting
histories, and other conditions related to the environmental health of
Hood Canal. The Evergreen State College shall have college students
interview and record the oral histories specified in this section. The
Evergreen State College shall consult with the appropriate tribal
cultural and historical departments regarding the interviews of tribal
elders under this program.
(2) The Evergreen State College shall offer the tribes in the area
surrounding Hood Canal an opportunity to review the documents,
information, photographs, or other materials collected through the oral
history program established in subsection (1) of this section to
determine whether any relate to the location of tribal archaeological
sites. Any documents, information, photographs, or other materials
identified by a tribe as relating to tribal archaeological sites
according to this subsection are exempt from public disclosure pursuant
to RCW 42.17.310(1)(k); however, The Evergreen State College shall
provide the documents, information, photographs, or other materials
exempt from disclosure under RCW 42.17.310(1)(k) to the tribe for its
own archival purposes.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the tapes
and tape transcripts shall be indexed and made available for research
and reference through the state archives.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
transcripts, together with current and historical photographs, may be
published for distribution to libraries and for sale to the general
public.
(5) The Evergreen State College may retain no more than five
percent of any funding provided for the program established in
subsection (1) of this section for costs associated with administering
and conducting the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires July 1, 2008.

--- END ---