BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.4452 and 2004 c 2 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for each person whose research and development spending during
the year in which the credit is claimed exceeds 0.92 percent of the
person's taxable amount during the same calendar year.
(2) The credit shall be calculated as follows: (a) Determine the
greater of the amount of qualified research and development
expenditures of a person or eighty percent of amounts received by a
person other than a public educational or research institution in
compensation for the conduct of qualified research and development; (b)
subtract 0.92 percent of the person's taxable amount from the amount
determined under (a) of this subsection; (c) multiply the amount
determined under (b) of this subsection by the rate provided in RCW
82.04.260(3) in the case of a nonprofit corporation or nonprofit
association engaging within this state in research and development, and
the person's average tax rate for every other person.
(3) Any person entitled to the credit provided in subsection (2) of
this section as a result of qualified research and development
conducted under contract may assign all or any portion of the credit to
the person contracting for the performance of the qualified research
and development.
(4) The credit, including any credit assigned to a person under
subsection (3) of this section, shall be taken against taxes due for
the same calendar year in which the qualified research and development
expenditures are incurred. The credit, including any credit assigned
to a person under subsection (3) of this section, for each calendar
year shall not exceed the lesser of two million dollars or the amount
of tax otherwise due under this chapter for the calendar year.
(5) Any person taking the credit, including any credit assigned to
a person under subsection (3) of this section, whose research and
development spending during the calendar year in which the credit is
claimed fails to exceed 0.92 percent of the person's taxable amount
during the same calendar year shall be liable for payment of the
additional taxes represented by the amount of credit taken together
with interest, but not penalties. Interest shall be due at the rate
provided for delinquent excise taxes retroactively to the date the
credit was taken until the taxes are paid. Any credit assigned to a
person under subsection (3) of this section that is disallowed as a
result of this section may be taken by the person who performed the
qualified research and development subject to the limitations set forth
in subsection (4) of this section.
(6) A pharmaceutical manufacturing company shall not claim credit
under this section if: (a) The company has reduced sales to retail
pharmacies in Canada within the twelve months prior to the effective
date of this act or at any time after the effective date of this act,
pursuant to a company policy issued in response to the direct and
indirect sales of company products to residents of the United States by
retail pharmacies in Canada; or (b) the average retail price of the
company's products in the United States exceeds the average retail
price of the company's products in Canada by at least ten percent, for
the twelve months prior to the effective date of this act or for any
three-month period after the effective date of this act. A
pharmaceutical manufacturing company shall submit an affidavit, as part
of the annual survey under subsection (8) of this section, stating that
the company is not disqualified from the credit under this subsection.
(7) Any person claiming the credit, and any person assigning a
credit as provided in subsection (3) of this section, shall file an
annual report in a form prescribed by the department which shall
include the amount of the credit claimed, the qualified research and
development expenditures during the calendar year for which the credit
is claimed, and the taxable amount during the calendar year for which
the credit is claimed, and such additional information as the
department may prescribe. The report is due by March 31st following
any year a credit is taken.
(((7))) (8)(a) The legislature finds that accountability and
effectiveness are important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to
make policy choices regarding the best use of limited state resources
the legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(b) A person claiming the credit shall agree to complete an annual
survey. The annual survey is in addition to the annual report due
under subsection (((6))) (7) of this section. The survey is due by
March 31st following any year in which a credit is taken. The survey
shall include the amount of the tax credit taken, the number of new
products or research projects by general classification, and the number
of trademarks, patents, and copyrights associated with the research and
development activities for which a credit was taken. The survey shall
also include the following information for employment positions in
Washington:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(c) The department may request additional information necessary to
measure the results of the tax credit program, to be submitted at the
same time as the survey.
(d) All information collected under this subsection, except the
amount of the tax credit taken, is deemed taxpayer information under
RCW 82.32.330 and is not disclosable. Information on the amount of tax
credit taken is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW
82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request except that
persons taking less than ten thousand dollars of credit during the
period covered by the survey may request the department to treat the
tax credit amount as confidential under RCW 82.32.330.
(e) If a person fails to complete the survey required under this
subsection by the due date, the person entitled to the credit provided
in subsection (2) of this section is not eligible to take or assign the
credit provided in subsection (2) of this section in the year the
person failed to complete the survey.
(((8))) (9) The department shall use the information from
subsection (((7))) (8) of this section to prepare summary descriptive
statistics by category. No fewer than three taxpayers shall be
included in any category. The department shall report these statistics
to the legislature each year by September 1st.
(((9))) (10) The department shall use the information from
subsection (((7))) (8) of this section to study the tax credit program
authorized under this section. The department shall report to the
legislature by December 1, 2009, and December 1, 2013. The reports
shall measure the effect of the program on job creation, the number of
jobs created for Washington residents, company growth, the introduction
of new products, the diversification of the state's economy, growth in
research and development investment, the movement of firms or the
consolidation of firms' operations into the state, and such other
factors as the department selects.
(((10))) (11) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Average tax rate" means a person's total tax under this
chapter for the reporting period divided by the taxpayer's total
taxable income under this chapter for the reporting period.
(b) "Pharmaceutical manufacturing company" means an entity that is
engaged in the production, preparation, propagation, compounding,
conversion, or processing of prescription drugs, either directly or
indirectly by extraction from substances of natural origin, or
independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of
extraction and chemical synthesis, or any entity engaged in the
packaging, repackaging, labeling, relabeling, or distribution of
prescription drugs. This term does not include pharmacists licensed
under chapter 18.64 RCW, or pharmacy operations of any integrated
delivery system undertaken for the benefit of patients obtaining care
through that system.
(c) "Qualified research and development expenditures" means
operating expenses, including wages, compensation of a proprietor or a
partner in a partnership as determined under rules adopted by the
department, benefits, supplies, and computer expenses, directly
incurred in qualified research and development by a person claiming the
credit provided in this section. The term does not include amounts
paid to a person other than a public educational or research
institution to conduct qualified research and development. Nor does
the term include capital costs and overhead, such as expenses for land,
structures, or depreciable property.
(((c))) (d) "Qualified research and development" shall have the
same meaning as in RCW 82.63.010.
(((d))) (e) "Research and development spending" means qualified
research and development expenditures plus eighty percent of amounts
paid to a person other than a public educational or research
institution to conduct qualified research and development.
(((e))) (f) "Taxable amount" means the taxable amount subject to
the tax imposed in this chapter required to be reported on the person's
combined excise tax returns during the year in which the credit is
claimed, less any taxable amount for which a credit is allowed under
RCW 82.04.440.
(((11))) (12) This section expires January 1, 2015.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.63.010 and 2004 c 2 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Advanced computing" means technologies used in the designing
and developing of computing hardware and software, including
innovations in designing the full spectrum of hardware from hand-held
calculators to super computers, and peripheral equipment.
(2) "Advanced materials" means materials with engineered properties
created through the development of specialized processing and synthesis
technology, including ceramics, high value-added metals, electronic
materials, composites, polymers, and biomaterials.
(3) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under
this chapter.
(4) "Biotechnology" means the application of technologies, such as
recombinant DNA techniques, biochemistry, molecular and cellular
biology, genetics and genetic engineering, cell fusion techniques, and
new bioprocesses, using living organisms, or parts of organisms, to
produce or modify products, to improve plants or animals, to develop
microorganisms for specific uses, to identify targets for small
molecule pharmaceutical development, or to transform biological systems
into useful processes and products or to develop microorganisms for
specific uses.
(5) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(6) "Electronic device technology" means technologies involving
microelectronics; semiconductors; electronic equipment and
instrumentation; radio frequency, microwave, and millimeter
electronics; optical and optic-electrical devices; and data and digital
communications and imaging devices.
(7) "Eligible investment project" means an investment project which
either initiates a new operation, or expands or diversifies a current
operation by expanding, renovating, or equipping an existing facility.
The lessor or owner of the qualified building is not eligible for a
deferral unless:
(a) The underlying ownership of the buildings, machinery, and
equipment vests exclusively in the same person; or
(b)(i) The lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic
benefit of the deferral to the lessee;
(ii) The lessee that receives the economic benefit of the deferral
agrees in writing with the department to complete the annual survey
required under RCW 82.63.020(2); and
(iii) The economic benefit of the deferral passed to the lessee is
no less than the amount of tax deferred by the lessor and is evidenced
by written documentation of any type of payment, credit, or other
financial arrangement between the lessor or owner of the qualified
building and the lessee.
(8) "Environmental technology" means assessment and prevention of
threats or damage to human health or the environment, environmental
cleanup, and the development of alternative energy sources.
(9) "Investment project" means an investment in qualified buildings
or qualified machinery and equipment, including labor and services
rendered in the planning, installation, and construction or improvement
of the project.
(10) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030 and includes
state universities as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.
(11) "Pharmaceutical manufacturing company" has the same meaning as
provided in RCW 82.04.4452.
(12) "Pilot scale manufacturing" means design, construction, and
testing of preproduction prototypes and models in the fields of
biotechnology, advanced computing, electronic device technology,
advanced materials, and environmental technology other than for
commercial sale. As used in this subsection, "commercial sale"
excludes sales of prototypes or sales for market testing if the total
gross receipts from such sales of the product, service, or process do
not exceed one million dollars.
(((12))) (13) "Qualified buildings" means construction of new
structures, and expansion or renovation of existing structures for the
purpose of increasing floor space or production capacity used for pilot
scale manufacturing or qualified research and development, including
plant offices and other facilities that are an essential or an integral
part of a structure used for pilot scale manufacturing or qualified
research and development. If a building is used partly for pilot scale
manufacturing or qualified research and development, and partly for
other purposes, the applicable tax deferral shall be determined by
apportionment of the costs of construction under rules adopted by the
department.
(((13))) (14) "Qualified machinery and equipment" means fixtures,
equipment, and support facilities that are an integral and necessary
part of a pilot scale manufacturing or qualified research and
development operation. "Qualified machinery and equipment" includes:
Computers; software; data processing equipment; laboratory equipment,
instrumentation, and other devices used in a process of experimentation
to develop a new or improved pilot model, plant process, product,
formula, invention, or similar property; manufacturing components such
as belts, pulleys, shafts, and moving parts; molds, tools, and dies;
vats, tanks, and fermenters; operating structures; and all other
equipment used to control, monitor, or operate the machinery. For
purposes of this chapter, qualified machinery and equipment must be
either new to the taxing jurisdiction of the state or new to the
certificate holder, except that used machinery and equipment may be
treated as qualified machinery and equipment if the certificate holder
either brings the machinery and equipment into Washington or makes a
retail purchase of the machinery and equipment in Washington or
elsewhere.
(((14))) (15) "Qualified research and development" means research
and development performed within this state in the fields of advanced
computing, advanced materials, biotechnology, electronic device
technology, and environmental technology.
(((15))) (16) "Recipient" means a person receiving a tax deferral
under this chapter.
(((16))) (17) "Research and development" means activities performed
to discover technological information, and technical and nonroutine
activities concerned with translating technological information into
new or improved products, processes, techniques, formulas, inventions,
or software. The term includes exploration of a new use for an
existing drug, device, or biological product if the new use requires
separate licensing by the federal food and drug administration under
chapter 21, C.F.R., as amended. The term does not include adaptation
or duplication of existing products where the products are not
substantially improved by application of the technology, nor does the
term include surveys and studies, social science and humanities
research, market research or testing, quality control, sale promotion
and service, computer software developed for internal use, and research
in areas such as improved style, taste, and seasonal design.
(((17))) (18)(a) "Initiation of construction" means the date that
a building permit is issued under the building code adopted under RCW
19.27.031 for:
(i) Construction of the qualified building, if the underlying
ownership of the building vests exclusively with the person receiving
the economic benefit of the deferral;
(ii) Construction of the qualified building, if the economic
benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in
subsection (7) of this section; or
(iii) Tenant improvements for a qualified building, if the economic
benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in
subsection (7) of this section.
(b) "Initiation of construction" does not include soil testing,
site clearing and grading, site preparation, or any other related
activities that are initiated before the issuance of a building permit
for the construction of the foundation of the building.
(c) If the investment project is a phased project, "initiation of
construction" shall apply separately to each phase.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.63.020 and 2004 c 2 s 4 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Application for deferral of taxes under this chapter must be
made before initiation of construction of, or acquisition of equipment
or machinery for the investment project. The application shall be made
to the department in a form and manner prescribed by the department.
The application shall contain information regarding the location of the
investment project, the applicant's average employment in the state for
the prior year, estimated or actual new employment related to the
project, estimated or actual wages of employees related to the project,
estimated or actual costs, time schedules for completion and operation,
and other information required by the department. The application
shall also contain an affidavit, if the applicant is a pharmaceutical
manufacturing company, stating that: (a) The applicant has not reduced
sales to retail pharmacies in Canada within the twelve months prior to
the effective date of this act, pursuant to a company policy issued in
response to the direct and indirect sales of company products to
residents of the United States by retail pharmacies in Canada; or (b)
the average retail price of the applicant's products in the United
States exceeds the average retail price of the applicant's products in
Canada by at least ten percent, for the twelve months prior to the
effective date of this act. The department shall rule on the
application within sixty days.
(2)(a) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness
are important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources the
legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(b) Applicants for deferral of taxes under this chapter shall agree
to complete an annual survey. If the economic benefits of the deferral
are passed to a lessee as provided in RCW 82.63.010(7), the lessee
shall agree to complete the annual survey and the applicant is not
required to complete the annual survey. The survey is due by March
31st of the year following the calendar year in which the investment
project is certified by the department as having been operationally
complete and the seven succeeding calendar years. The survey shall
include the amount of tax deferred, the number of new products or
research projects by general classification, and the number of
trademarks, patents, and copyrights associated with activities at the
investment project. The survey shall also include the following
information for employment positions in Washington:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(c) The department may request additional information necessary to
measure the results of the deferral program, to be submitted at the
same time as the survey.
(d) All information collected under this subsection, except the
amount of the tax deferral taken, is deemed taxpayer information under
RCW 82.32.330 and is not disclosable. Information on the amount of tax
deferral taken is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW
82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request.
(3) The department shall use the information from this section to
prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No fewer than
three taxpayers shall be included in any category. The department
shall report these statistics to the legislature each year by September
1st.
(4) The department shall use the information to study the tax
deferral program authorized under this chapter. The department shall
report to the legislature by December 1, 2009, and December 1, 2013.
The reports shall measure the effect of the program on job creation,
the number of jobs created for Washington residents, company growth,
the introduction of new products, the diversification of the state's
economy, growth in research and development investment, the movement of
firms or the consolidation of firms' operations into the state, and
such other factors as the department selects.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.63.030 and 2004 c 2 s 5 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
department shall issue a sales and use tax deferral certificate for
state and local sales and use taxes due under chapters 82.08, 82.12,
and 82.14 RCW on each eligible investment project.
(2) No certificate may be issued for an investment project that has
already received a deferral under chapter 82.60 or 82.61 RCW or this
chapter, except that an investment project for qualified research and
development that has already received a deferral may also receive an
additional deferral certificate for adapting the investment project for
use in pilot scale manufacturing.
(3) No certificate shall be issued for an investment project if:
(a) The applicant is a pharmaceutical manufacturing company that has
reduced sales to retail pharmacies in Canada within the twelve months
prior to the effective date of this act, pursuant to a company policy
issued in response to the direct and indirect sales of company products
to residents of the United States by retail pharmacies in Canada; or
(b) the average retail price of the applicant's products in the United
States exceeds the average retail price of the applicant's products in
Canada by at least ten percent, for the twelve months prior to the
effective date of this act.
(4) This section shall expire January 1, 2015.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.63.045 and 2004 c 2 s 6 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, taxes
deferred under this chapter need not be repaid.
(2)(a) If, on the basis of survey under RCW 82.63.020 or other
information, the department finds that an investment project is used
for purposes other than qualified research and development or pilot
scale manufacturing at any time during the calendar year in which the
investment project is certified by the department as having been
operationally completed, or at any time during any of the seven
succeeding calendar years, a portion of deferred taxes shall be
immediately due according to the following schedule:

Year in which use occurs % of deferred taxes due

1 100%

2 87.5%

3 75%

4 62.5%

5 50%

6 37.5%

7 25%

8 12.5%

(b) If a recipient of the deferral fails to complete the annual
survey required under RCW 82.63.020 by the date due, 12.5 percent of
the deferred tax shall be immediately due. If the economic benefits of
the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in RCW 82.63.010(7),
the lessee shall be responsible for payment to the extent the lessee
has received the economic benefit.
(c) If an investment project is used for purposes other than
qualified research and development or pilot scale manufacturing at any
time during the calendar year in which the investment project is
certified as having been operationally complete and the recipient of
the deferral fails to complete the annual survey due under RCW
82.63.020, the portion of deferred taxes immediately due is the amount
on the schedule in (a) of this subsection. If the economic benefits of
the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in RCW 82.63.010(7),
the lessee shall be responsible for payment to the extent the lessee
has received the economic benefit.
(d) A portion of deferred taxes shall be immediately due and
payable according to the schedule in (a) of this subsection if the
department finds that a pharmaceutical manufacturing company that is a
recipient has: (i) Reduced sales to retail pharmacies in Canada, after
the effective date of this act, pursuant to a company policy issued in
response to the direct and indirect sales of company products to
residents of the United States by retail pharmacies in Canada; or (ii)
products sold in the United States with an average retail price that is
at least ten percent greater than the average retail price of the
recipient's products sold in Canada, for any three-month period after
the effective date of this act.
(3) The department shall assess interest at the rate provided for
delinquent taxes, but not penalties, retroactively to the date of
deferral. The debt for deferred taxes will not be extinguished by
insolvency or other failure of the recipient. Transfer of ownership
does not terminate the deferral. The deferral is transferred, subject
to the successor meeting the eligibility requirements of this chapter,
for the remaining periods of the deferral.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, deferred taxes
on the following need not be repaid:
(a) Machinery and equipment, and sales of or charges made for labor
and services, which at the time of purchase would have qualified for
exemption under RCW 82.08.02565; and
(b) Machinery and equipment which at the time of first use would
have qualified for exemption under RCW 82.12.02565.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---