BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.33A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "pharmaceutical manufacturing
company" means an entity that is engaged in the production,
preparation, propagation, compounding, conversion, or processing of
prescription drugs, either directly or indirectly, by extraction from
substances of natural origin, or independently by means of chemical
synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis, or
any entity engaged in the packaging, repackaging, labeling, relabeling,
or distribution of prescription drugs. This term does not include
pharmacists licensed under this chapter, or pharmacy operations of any
integrated delivery system undertaken for the benefit of patients
obtaining care through that system.
(2) The state investment board may not invest in a pharmaceutical
manufacturing company that:
(a) Restricts the supply of one or more prescription drugs to
Canada in response to the reimportation of a prescription drug into the
United States; or
(b) Sells any of their prescription drugs in the United States at
a rate that is more than ten percent higher than the price they charge
in Canada.

--- END ---