BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that cleaning products
are necessary for creating and maintaining sanitary conditions in state
facilities and workplaces. However, chemicals contained in cleaning
products can be released to the environment during normal use by
evaporation of volatile components or by leaving residue on cleaned
surfaces. Choosing less hazardous cleaning products for use in our
workplaces and our facilities and taking steps to reduce exposure can
minimize harmful impacts to office and custodial workers, improve
indoor air quality, and reduce water and ambient air pollution.
Purchasing and appropriate use of products that perform well and that
have positive environmental attributes such as biodegradability, low
toxicity, low volatile organic compound content, reduced packaging, and
low life cycle energy use can reduce the environmental impact of
routine cleaning activities while also ensuring cleaning effectiveness.
Therefore, the legislature finds that the adoption of practices to
select, procure, and use environmentally preferred products will
benefit the environment and the health and safety of workers and
visitors to state facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) All state agencies shall procure and use
cleaning products having properties that minimize potential impacts to
human health and the environment consistent with maintenance of the
effectiveness of these products for the protection of public health and
safety. For purposes of this act, "state agency" means any office,
department, division, bureau, board, commission, or other agency of the
state of Washington or of any subdivision thereof.
(2) The department of general administration, in consultation with
the department of health and the department of ecology, shall provide
consultation and guidance to state agencies to:
(a) Select and procure products and use practices that reduce or
minimize the risks of harmful effects to employees, custodial workers,
visitors, and other building occupants and to the environment;
(b) Promote adoption of practices endorsed by this chapter;
(c) Recognize state agencies that adopt and implement
environmentally beneficial facility and workplace management policies
and practices;
(d) Encourage contractors supplying goods and services to state
agencies to select and procure such products; and
(e) Encourage lessors and building managers who provide leased
space to state agencies to select and procure such products.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) When procuring cleaning products, state
agencies shall purchase environmentally preferred products or document
the reasons for selecting alternative products. Such products shall
conform to guidance for environmentally preferred purchasing of
cleaning products that may be provided under section 2 of this act, or
shall be products that have been identified by the department of
general administration as compliant with this chapter and made
available through a central purchasing contract.
(2) A state agency that procures or uses alternative products shall
prepare a report listing those products, including the reasons for the
selection, and submit the report electronically to the department of
general administration biennially. The report shall be available to
employees and the general public on the department of general
administration's web site. A state agency that procured and used only
environmentally preferred cleaning products during the biennium is not
required to submit the report.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Local governments and school districts are
encouraged to review their purchasing and use of cleaning products and
select those having properties that minimize potential impacts to human
health and the environment consistent with section 2 of this act. The
department of general administration shall encourage local governments
and school districts that are members of the department of general
administration's state purchasing cooperative to achieve the goals of
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 State agencies shall transition to cleaning
products having properties that minimize potential impacts to human
health and the environment within six months of the effective date of
this act in a manner that avoids waste of existing inventories,
accommodates establishment of supply chains for new products, enables
the training of personnel in appropriate work practices, and allows the
phase out of products and practices inconsistent with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---