BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.19.050 and 2003 c 120 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The litter tax imposed in this chapter does not apply to:
(1) The manufacture or sale of products for use and consumption
outside the state;
(2) The value of products or gross proceeds of the sales exempt
from tax under RCW 82.04.330;
(3) The sale of products for resale by a qualified grocery
distribution cooperative to customer-owners of the grocery distribution
cooperative. For the purposes of this section, "qualified grocery
distribution cooperative" and "customer-owner" have the meanings given
in RCW 82.04.298; ((or))
(4) The sale of food or beverages by retailers that are sold solely
for immediate consumption indoors ((on)) at the seller's ((premises))
place of business or at a deck or patio at the seller's place of
business, or indoors at an eating area that is contiguous to the
seller's place of business; or
(5)(a) The sale of prepared food or beverages by caterers where the
food or beverages are to be served for immediate consumption in or on
individual nonsingle use containers at premises occupied or controlled
by the customer.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Prepared food" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
82.08.0293.
(ii) "Nonsingle use container" means a receptacle for holding a
single individual's food or beverage that is designed to be used more
than once. Nonsingle use containers do not include pizza delivery bags
and similar insulated containers that do not directly contact the food.
Nonsingle use containers do not include plastic or paper plates or
other containers that are disposable.
(iii) "Caterer" means a person contracted to prepare food where the
final cooking or serving occurs at a location selected by the customer.

--- END ---