BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing:
(a) Perishable meat products, by slaughtering, breaking, or
processing, if the finished product is a perishable meat product; as to
such persons the tax imposed shall be equal to the value of the
perishable meat products so manufactured, or in the case of a processor
for hire the gross proceeds from such activities, multiplied by the
rate of 0.138 percent;
(b) Meat products, by dehydration, curing, smoking, or any
combination of dehydration, curing, and smoking, if the finished meat
products are not canned; as to such persons the tax imposed shall be
equal to the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the
rate of 0.138 percent;
(c) Hides, tallow, meat meal, and other similar meat by-products,
if such products are derived in part from animals and manufactured in
a rendering plant licensed under chapter 16.68 RCW; as to such persons
the tax imposed shall be equal to the value of products manufactured
multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
selling at wholesale:
(a) Perishable meat products; as to such persons the tax imposed
shall be equal to the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent;
(b) Meat products that have been manufactured by that person by
dehydration, curing, smoking, or any combination of dehydration,
curing, and smoking, if the finished meat products are not canned; as
to such persons the tax imposed shall be equal to the gross proceeds
derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;
(c) Hides, tallow, meat meal, and other similar meat by-products if
such products are derived in part from animals and manufactured by the
seller in a rendering plant; as to such persons the tax imposed shall
be equal to the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by
the rate of 0.138 percent.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section:
(a) "Animal" means all members of the animal kingdom except humans,
fish, and insects.
(b) "Carcass" means all or any parts, including viscera, of a
slaughtered animal.
(c) "Hide" means any unprocessed animal pelt or skin.
(d) "Fish" means any water-breathing animal, including shellfish.
(e) "Meat products" means products comprised exclusively of animal
carcass, except that meat products includes products such as sausage
and jerky that may contain water; salt; sugar; seasonings; nitrates;
nitrites; acids; binders and extenders; synthetic casings; flavorings
such as soy sauce, liquid smoke, and vinegar; and similar substances.
"Meat products" includes only products that are intended for human
consumption as food or animal consumption as feed. "Meat products"
does not include products containing breading, cheese, rice, beans,
fruits, vegetables, cream, mushrooms, tomato paste, and similar
ingredients.
(f) "Perishable" means having a high risk of spoilage within thirty
days of manufacture without any refrigeration or freezing.
(g) "Rendering plant" means any place of business or location where
dead animals or any part or portion thereof, or packing house refuse,
are processed for the purpose of obtaining the hide, skin, grease
residue, or any other by-product whatsoever.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.260 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 4 and 2003 2nd
sp.s. c 1 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing:
(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into
soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola byproducts,
or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola byproduct
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;
(b) Seafood products which remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw
salted state at the completion of the manufacturing by that person; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the value of the products manufactured, multiplied by the
rate of 0.138 percent;
(c) By canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating
fresh fruits and vegetables, or selling at wholesale fresh fruits and
vegetables canned, preserved, frozen, processed, or dehydrated by the
seller and sold to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of
business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
products canned, preserved, frozen, processed, or dehydrated multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent. As proof of sale to a person who
transports in the ordinary course of business goods out of this state,
the seller shall annually provide a statement in a form prescribed by
the department and retain the statement as a business record;
(d) Dairy products that as of September 20, 2001, are identified in
21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135, including byproducts
from the manufacturing of the dairy products such as whey and casein;
or selling the same to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course
of business the goods out of state; as to such persons the tax imposed
shall be equal to the value of the products manufactured multiplied by
the rate of 0.138 percent. As proof of sale to a person who transports
in the ordinary course of business goods out of this state, the seller
shall annually provide a statement in a form prescribed by the
department and retain the statement as a business record;
(e) Until July 1, 2009, alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel
feedstock, as those terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to the business shall be equal
to the value of alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent((. This
subsection (1)(e) expires July 1, 2009)); and
(f) Alcohol fuel or wood biomass fuel, as those terms are defined
in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to
the business shall be equal to the value of alcohol fuel or wood
biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
peas split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association
engaging within this state in research and development, as to such
corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such
activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(4) ((Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products
and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such
persons the tax imposed shall be equal to the gross proceeds derived
from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(5))) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of making sales, at retail or wholesale, of nuclear fuel assemblies
manufactured by that person, as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales
of the assemblies multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(((6))) (5) Upon every person engaging within this state in the
business of manufacturing nuclear fuel assemblies, as to such persons
the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the
value of the products manufactured multiplied by the rate of 0.275
percent.
(((7))) (6) Upon every person engaging within this state in the
business of acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to such activities shall be
equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by
the rate of 0.275 percent.
(((8))) (7) Upon every person engaging within this state in
business as an international steamship agent, international customs
house broker, international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo
charter broker in foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo
agent; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to only
international activities shall be equal to the gross income derived
from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(((9))) (8) Upon every person engaging within this state in the
business of stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the
movement of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign
commerce; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the gross proceeds derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to
taxation under this subsection shall be exempt from payment of taxes
imposed by chapter 82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject
to taxation under this subsection. Stevedoring and associated
activities pertinent to the conduct of goods and commodities in
waterborne interstate or foreign commerce are defined as all activities
of a labor, service or transportation nature whereby cargo may be
loaded or unloaded to or from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or
under a wharf, pier, or similar structure; cargo may be moved to a
warehouse or similar holding or storage yard or area to await further
movement in import or export or may move to a consolidation freight
station and be stuffed, unstuffed, containerized, separated or
otherwise segregated or aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode
of transportation for delivery to its consignee. Specific activities
included in this definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading,
unloading, moving of cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the
consignee or a convenient place for further movement to export mode;
documentation services in connection with the receipt, delivery,
checking, care, custody and control of cargo required in the transfer
of cargo; imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee;
terminal stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not
limited to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers,
trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship
hatch covers.
(((10))) (9) Upon every person engaging within this state in the
business of disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010;
as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business
shall be equal to the gross income of the business, excluding any fees
imposed under chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3
percent.
If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities
both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to
this state shall be determined in accordance with the methods of
apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.
(((11))) (10) Upon every person engaging within this state as an
insurance agent, insurance broker, or insurance solicitor licensed
under chapter 48.17 RCW; as to such persons, the amount of the tax with
respect to such licensed activities shall be equal to the gross income
of such business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(((12))) (11) Upon every person engaging within this state in
business as a hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is
operated as a nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its
political subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with
respect to such activities shall be equal to the gross income of the
business multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995,
and 1.5 percent thereafter. The moneys collected under this subsection
shall be deposited in the health services account created under RCW
43.72.900.
(((13))) (12)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person
engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial
airplanes, or components of such airplanes, as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business shall, in the case of
manufacturers, be equal to the value of the product manufactured, or in
the case of processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the
business, multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through the later of June
30, 2007, or the day preceding the date final assembly of a
superefficient airplane begins in Washington state, as determined under
RCW 82.32.550; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning on the later of July 1, 2007, or the
date final assembly of a superefficient airplane begins in Washington
state, as determined under RCW 82.32.550.
(b) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging within
this state in the business of making sales, at retail or wholesale, of
commercial airplanes, or components of such airplanes, manufactured by
that person, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the airplanes
or components multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through the later of June
30, 2007, or the day preceding the date final assembly of a
superefficient airplane begins in Washington state, as determined under
RCW 82.32.550; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning on the later of July 1, 2007, or the
date final assembly of a superefficient airplane begins in Washington
state, as determined under RCW 82.32.550.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (((13))) (12), "commercial
airplane," "component," and "final assembly of a superefficient
airplane" have the meanings given in RCW 82.32.550.
(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person eligible for the tax rate under this subsection (((13))) (12)
must report as required under RCW 82.32.545.
(e) This subsection (((13))) (12) does not apply after the earlier
of: July 1, 2024; or December 31, 2007, if assembly of a
superefficient airplane does not begin by December 31, 2007, as
determined under RCW 82.32.550.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.04.250 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 2 s 1 and 2003 1st
sp.s. c 1 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person, except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260
(((5))) (4) or (((13))) (12), 82.04.272, or subsection (2) or (3) of
this section; engaging within this state in the business of making
sales at retail, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to
such business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the
business, multiplied by the rate of 0.471 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax imposed under
chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or
82.08.0263 except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, except
persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260(((13))) (12) as to such persons,
the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the
gross proceeds of sales of the business, multiplied by the rate of
0.484 percent.
(3) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax imposed under
chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or
82.08.0263, that is classified by the federal aviation administration
as a FAR part 145 certificated repair station with airframe and
instrument ratings and limited ratings for nondestructive testing,
radio, Class 3 Accessory, and specialized services, as to such persons,
the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the
gross proceeds of sales of the business, multiplied by the rate of .275
percent.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.04.250 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 2 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person, except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260
(((5))) (4) or (((13))) (12), 82.04.272, or subsection (2) of this
section; engaging within this state in the business of making sales at
retail, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the business,
multiplied by the rate of 0.471 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax imposed under
chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or
82.08.0263, except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260(((13))) (12), as
to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the business, multiplied by
the rate of 0.484 percent.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.32.545 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 16 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness are
important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources the
legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(2)(a) A person who reports taxes under RCW 82.04.260(((13))) (12)
or who claims an exemption or credit under RCW 82.04.4461, 82.08.980,
82.12.980, 82.29A.137, 84.36.655, and 82.04.4463 shall make an annual
report to the department detailing employment, wages, and employer-provided health and retirement benefits per job at the manufacturing
site. The report shall not include names of employees. The report
shall also detail employment by the total number of full-time, part-time, and temporary positions. The first report filed under this
subsection shall include employment, wage, and benefit information for
the twelve-month period immediately before first use of a preferential
tax rate under RCW 82.04.260(((13))) (12), or tax exemption or credit
under RCW 82.04.4461, 82.08.980, 82.12.980, 82.29A.137, 84.36.655, and
82.04.4463. The report is due by March 31st following any year in
which a preferential tax rate under RCW 82.04.260(((13))) (12) is used,
or tax exemption or credit under RCW 82.04.4461, 82.08.980, 82.12.980,
82.29A.137, 84.36.655, and 82.04.4463 is taken. This information is
not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may
be disclosed to the public upon request.
(b) If a person fails to submit an annual report under (a) of this
subsection by the due date of the report, the department shall declare
the amount of taxes exempted or credited, or reduced in the case of the
preferential business and occupation tax rate, for that year to be
immediately due and payable. Excise taxes payable under this
subsection are subject to interest but not penalties, as provided under
this chapter. This information is not subject to the confidentiality
provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon
request.
(3) By November 1, 2010, and by November 1, 2023, the fiscal
committees of the house of representatives and the senate, in
consultation with the department, shall report to the legislature on
the effectiveness of chapter 1, Laws of 2003 2nd sp. sess. in regard to
keeping Washington competitive. The report shall measure the effect of
chapter 1, Laws of 2003 2nd sp. sess. on job retention, net jobs
created for Washington residents, company growth, diversification of
the state's economy, cluster dynamics, and other factors as the
committees select. The reports shall include a discussion of
principles to apply in evaluating whether the legislature should
reenact any or all of the tax preferences in chapter 1, Laws of 2003
2nd sp. sess.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.32.550 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 17 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Chapter 1, Laws of 2003 2nd sp. sess. takes effect on the
first day of the month in which the governor and a manufacturer of
commercial airplanes sign a memorandum of agreement regarding an
affirmative final decision to site a significant commercial airplane
final assembly facility in Washington state. The department shall
provide notice of the effective date of chapter 1, Laws of 2003 2nd sp.
sess. to affected taxpayers, the legislature, and others as deemed
appropriate by the department.
(b) Chapter 1, Laws of 2003 2nd sp. sess. is contingent upon the
siting of a significant commercial airplane final assembly facility in
the state of Washington. If a memorandum of agreement under subsection
(1) of this section is not signed by June 30, 2005, chapter 1, Laws of
2003 2nd sp. sess. is null and void.
(c)(i) The department shall make a determination regarding the date
final assembly of a superefficient airplane begins in Washington state.
The rates in RCW 82.04.260(((13))) (12) (a)(ii) and (b)(ii) take effect
the first day of the month such assembly begins, or July 1, 2007,
whichever is later. The department shall provide notice of the
effective date of such rates to affected taxpayers, the legislature,
and others as deemed appropriate by the department.
(ii) If on December 31, 2007, final assembly of a superefficient
airplane has not begun in Washington state, the department shall
provide notice of such to affected taxpayers, the legislature, and
others as deemed appropriate by the department.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Commercial airplane" has its ordinary meaning, which is an
airplane certified by the federal aviation administration for
transporting persons or property, and any military derivative of such
an airplane.
(b) "Component" means a part or system certified by the federal
aviation administration for installation or assembly into a commercial
airplane.
(c) "Final assembly of a superefficient airplane" means the
activity of assembling an airplane from components parts necessary for
its mechanical operation such that the finished commercial airplane is
ready to deliver to the ultimate consumer.
(d) "Significant commercial airplane final assembly facility" means
a location with the capacity to produce at least thirty-six
superefficient airplanes a year.
(e) "Siting" means a final decision by a manufacturer to locate a
significant commercial airplane final assembly facility in Washington
state.
(f) "Superefficient airplane" means a twin aisle airplane that
carries between two hundred and three hundred fifty passengers, with a
range of more than seven thousand two hundred nautical miles, a
cruising speed of approximately mach .85, and that uses fifteen to
twenty percent less fuel than other similar airplanes on the market.

Sec. 7 RCW 48.14.080 and 1998 c 312 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As to insurers, other than title insurers and taxpayers under RCW
48.14.0201, the taxes imposed by this title shall be in lieu of all
other taxes, except taxes on real and tangible personal property,
excise taxes on the sale, purchase or use of such property, and the tax
imposed in RCW 82.04.260(((12))) (11).

Sec. 8 RCW 82.04.440 and 2004 c 174 s 5 and 2004 c 24 s 7 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Every person engaged in activities ((which are within the
purview of the provisions of two or more of sections)) that are
subject to tax under two or more provisions of RCW 82.04.230 to
82.04.298, inclusive, shall be taxable under each ((paragraph))
provision applicable to ((the)) those activities ((engaged in)).
(2) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.2909(2), 82.04.250, 82.04.270,
((or)) 82.04.260 (4) or (((13))) (12), or section 1(2) of this act,
with respect to selling products in this state shall be allowed a
credit against those taxes for any (a) manufacturing taxes paid with
respect to the manufacturing of products so sold in this state, and/or
(b) extracting taxes paid with respect to the extracting of products so
sold in this state or ingredients of products so sold in this state.
Extracting taxes taken as credit under subsection (3) of this section
may also be taken under this subsection, if otherwise allowable under
this subsection. The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax
liability arising under this chapter with respect to the sale of those
products.
(3) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.240 or 82.04.260(1)(b) shall be
allowed a credit against those taxes for any extracting taxes paid with
respect to extracting the ingredients of the products so manufactured
in this state. The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax
liability arising under this chapter with respect to the manufacturing
of those products.
(4) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.230, 82.04.240, 82.04.2909(1),
((or)) 82.04.260 (1), (2), (((4), (6), or (13))) (5), or (12), or
section 1(1) of this act, with respect to extracting or manufacturing
products in this state shall be allowed a credit against those taxes
for any (i) gross receipts taxes paid to another state with respect to
the sales of the products so extracted or manufactured in this state,
(ii) manufacturing taxes paid with respect to the manufacturing of
products using ingredients so extracted in this state, or (iii)
manufacturing taxes paid with respect to manufacturing activities
completed in another state for products so manufactured in this state.
The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax liability arising
under this chapter with respect to the extraction or manufacturing of
those products.
(5) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Gross receipts tax" means a tax:
(i) Which is imposed on or measured by the gross volume of
business, in terms of gross receipts or in other terms, and in the
determination of which the deductions allowed would not constitute the
tax an income tax or value added tax; and
(ii) Which is also not, pursuant to law or custom, separately
stated from the sales price.
(b) "State" means (i) the state of Washington, (ii) a state of the
United States other than Washington, or any political subdivision of
such other state, (iii) the District of Columbia, and (iv) any foreign
country or political subdivision thereof.
(c) "Manufacturing tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the
act or privilege of engaging in business as a manufacturer, and
includes (i) the taxes imposed in RCW 82.04.240, 82.04.2909(1), ((and))
82.04.260 (1), (2), (((4), and (13))) (5), and (12), and section 1(1)
of this act, and (ii) similar gross receipts taxes paid to other
states.
(d) "Extracting tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the act
or privilege of engaging in business as an extractor, and includes the
tax imposed in RCW 82.04.230 and similar gross receipts taxes paid to
other states.
(e) "Business", "manufacturer", "extractor", and other terms used
in this section have the meanings given in RCW 82.04.020 through
82.04.212, notwithstanding the use of those terms in the context of
describing taxes imposed by other states.

Sec. 9 RCW 82.04.298 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 9 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The amount of tax with respect to a qualified grocery
distribution cooperative's sales of groceries or related goods for
resale, excluding items subject to tax under ((RCW 82.04.260(4)))
section 1 of this act, to customer-owners of the grocery distribution
cooperative is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the grocery
distribution cooperative multiplied by the rate of one and one-half
percent.
(2) A qualified grocery distribution cooperative is allowed a
deduction from the gross proceeds of sales of groceries or related
goods for resale, excluding items subject to tax under ((RCW
82.04.260(4))) section 1 of this act, to customer-owners of the grocery
distribution cooperative that is equal to the portion of the gross
proceeds of sales for resale that represents the actual cost of the
merchandise sold by the grocery distribution cooperative to customer-owners.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Grocery distribution cooperative" means an entity that sells
groceries and related items to customer-owners of the grocery
distribution cooperative and has customer-owners, in the aggregate, who
own a majority of the outstanding ownership interests of the grocery
distribution cooperative or of the entity controlling the grocery
distribution cooperative. "Grocery distribution cooperative" includes
an entity that controls a grocery distribution cooperative.
(b) "Qualified grocery distribution cooperative" means a grocery
distribution cooperative that has been determined by a court of record
of the state of Washington to be not engaged in wholesaling or making
sales at wholesale, within the meaning of RCW 82.04.270 or any similar
provision of a municipal ordinance that imposes a tax on gross
receipts, gross proceeds of sales, or gross income, with respect to
purchases made by customer-owners, and subsequently changes its form of
doing business to make sales at wholesale of groceries or related items
to its customer-owners.
(c) "Customer-owner" means a person who has an ownership interest
in a grocery distribution cooperative and purchases groceries and
related items at wholesale from that grocery distribution cooperative.
(d) "Controlling" means holding fifty percent or more of the voting
interests of an entity and having at least equal power to direct or
cause the direction of the management and policies of the entity,
whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract, or
otherwise.

Sec. 10 RCW 82.04.290 and 2004 c 174 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
providing international investment management services, as to such
persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal
to the gross income or gross proceeds of sales of the business
multiplied by a rate of 0.275 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in any business
activity other than or in addition to those enumerated in RCW
82.04.230, 82.04.240, 82.04.250, 82.04.255, 82.04.260, 82.04.270,
82.04.298, 82.04.2905, 82.04.280, 82.04.2907, 82.04.272, 82.04.2906,
((and)) 82.04.2908, and section 1 of this act, and subsection (1) of
this section; as to such persons the amount of tax on account of such
activities shall be equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by the rate of 1.5 percent.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section includes, among others, and
without limiting the scope hereof (whether or not title to materials
used in the performance of such business passes to another by
accession, confusion or other than by outright sale), persons engaged
in the business of rendering any type of service which does not
constitute a "sale at retail" or a "sale at wholesale." The value of
advertising, demonstration, and promotional supplies and materials
furnished to an agent by his principal or supplier to be used for
informational, educational and promotional purposes shall not be
considered a part of the agent's remuneration or commission and shall
not be subject to taxation under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Section 3 of this act expires July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Section 4 of this act takes effect July 1,
2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 3 and 5 through 10 of
this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, and take effect immediately.

--- END ---