BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
establish an effective program for the recycling of waste tires. The
legislature finds that it is in the best interests of all citizens for
waste tires to be recycled safely and efficiently, for the hauling and
recycling of waste tires to be properly regulated, and for waste tires
to not become a financial burden upon taxpayers.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.95.510 and 1989 c 431 s 92 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is levied a one dollar per tire fee on the retail sale of
new replacement vehicle tires for a period of five years, beginning
((October 1, 1989)) July 1, 2005. The fee imposed in this section
shall be paid by the buyer to the seller, and each seller shall collect
from the buyer the full amount of the fee. The fee collected from the
buyer by the seller less the ten percent amount retained by the seller
as provided in RCW 70.95.535 shall be paid to the department of revenue
in accordance with RCW 82.32.045. All other applicable provisions of
chapter 82.32 RCW have full force and application with respect to the
fee imposed under this section. The department of revenue shall
administer this section.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "new replacement vehicle
tires" means tires that are newly manufactured for vehicle purposes and
used tires available for resale and does not include retreaded vehicle
tires.
(3) Of the one dollar fee imposed in subsection (1) of this
section, twenty-three cents must be deposited into the motor vehicle
account and must be used by the department of transportation for road
maintenance.
(4) The department of revenue may deduct two cents from the funds
collected under subsection (1) of this section for the purpose of
administering and collecting the fee from the sale of new replacement
tire retailers. The department of revenue shall incorporate into the
agency's regular audit cycle a reconciliation of the number of tires
sold and the amount of revenue collected for businesses selling retail
replacement tires at retail. The department of revenue shall collect
on the business excise tax return from the businesses selling
replacement tires:
(a) Information on the number of tires sold; and
(b) The fee levied in this section.
(5) The remaining sixty-five cents of the fee must be deposited
into the vehicle tire recycling account as follows:
(a) Fifteen cents into a segregated subaccount of the vehicle tire
recycling account for distribution to counties; and
(b) Fifty cents for use by the department for purposes specified in
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.95 RCW
to read as follows:
The vehicle tire recycling account is created in the state
treasury. Receipts from tire fees must be deposited into the account
in accordance with RCW 70.95.510. Moneys in the account may be spent
only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may only be
used for purposes specified by RCW 70.95.535.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.95.530 and 1988 c 250 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Moneys in the vehicle tire recycling account may be
appropriated to the department of ecology for the following purposes:
(((1))) (a) To provide for funding to state and local governments
for the removal of discarded vehicle tires from unauthorized tire dump
sites; and
(((2))) (b) To accomplish the other purposes of RCW
70.95.020(((5))) (6)((; and
(3) To fund the study authorized in section 2, chapter 250, Laws of
1988)).
(2) In spending funds in the account under this section, the
department of ecology shall identify communities with the most severe
problems with waste tires and provide funds first to those communities
to remove accumulations of waste tires.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.95.535 and 1989 c 431 s 93 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every person engaged in making retail sales of new replacement
vehicle tires in this state shall retain ten percent of the collected
one dollar fee. The moneys retained may be used for costs associated
with the proper management of the waste vehicle tires by the retailer.
(2) The department will distribute the funds in the segregated
subaccount of the vehicle tire recycling account as follows:
(a) Two-thirds for grants to county governments for cleanup of
waste tires. The department shall give priority to proposals that
involve partnerships with permitted recycling companies; and
(b) One-third to county public health departments for enforcement
programs.
(3) The department ((of ecology)) will administer the remaining
funds for the purposes specified in RCW 70.95.020(((5))) (6) including,
but not limited to:
(a) ((Making grants to local governments for pilot demonstration
projects for on-site shredding and recycling of tires from unauthorized
dump sites;
(b) Grants to local government for enforcement programs;
(c) Implementation of a public information and education program to
include posters, signs, and informational materials to be distributed
to retail tire sales and tire service outlets;
(d) Product marketing studies for recycled tires and alternatives
to land disposal)) Preparing a statewide, prioritized list of waste
tire piles and a plan for their removal. The department shall work
with the appropriate county departments to locate and identify unlawful
waste tire piles. The statewide, prioritized list of waste tire piles
and plan for removal must be completed by January 1, 2006; and
(b) Subject to the requirements provided in subsection (4) of this
section, removing discarded vehicle tires from unauthorized tire dump
sites based on the prioritized, statewide list.
(4) Before spending funds from the vehicle tire recycling account
for the removal or cleanup of unlawfully disposed tires, the department
must ensure that all legal remedies and cost recovery efforts available
against the owner of the unlawfully disposed tires, or the property on
which the unlawful tire piles are located, have been exhausted. The
department should assist local jurisdictions, where appropriate, with
enforcement actions against individuals unlawfully disposing of tires.
(5) The department shall report annually to the appropriate
committees of the legislature regarding: The status of removal of
unauthorized waste tire piles identified in the statewide, prioritized
list; the recovery of costs from liable parties; the amounts, purposes,
and recipients of grants awarded to local governments each fiscal year;
the amount of tires sold at retail and the revenue collected; and
financial status of the vehicle tire recycling account.

Sec. 6 RCW 70.95.555 and 1988 c 250 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person engaged in the business of transporting or storing waste
tires shall be licensed by the department of licensing. To obtain a
license, each applicant must:
(1) Provide assurances that the applicant is in compliance with
this chapter and the rules regarding waste tire storage and
transportation; ((and))
(2) Accept liability for and authorize the department to recover
any costs incurred in any cleanup of waste tires transported or newly
stored after the effective date of this section;
(3) Post a bond in ((the sum of ten thousand dollars)) an amount to
be determined by the department sufficient to cover the liability for
the cost of cleanup of the transported or stored waste tires, in favor
of the state of Washington. In lieu of the bond, the applicant may
submit financial assurances acceptable to the department;
(4) Be registered in the state of Washington as a business and be
in compliance with all state laws, rules, and local ordinances;
(5) Have a federal identification number and be in compliance with
all applicable federal codes and regulations; and
(6) Report annually to the department the amount of tires
transported and their disposition. Failure to report shall result in
revocation of the license.

Sec. 7 RCW 70.95.560 and 1989 c 431 s 95 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person who transports or stores waste tires without a
license in violation of RCW 70.95.555 shall be guilty of a gross
misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished under RCW
9A.20.021(2).
(2) Any person who transports or stores waste tires without a
license in violation of RCW 70.95.555 is liable for the costs of
cleanup of any and all waste tires transported or stored.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 70.95 RCW
to read as follows:
No person or business, having legally transferred possession of
waste tires to a license transporter or storer of waste tires or to a
permitted recycler, has any further liability related to the waste
tires legally transferred.

Sec. 9 RCW 70.95.903 and 1989 c 431 s 32 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing in this chapter shall prevent a permitted or properly
exempted recycling company or nonprofit entity from collecting and
transporting recyclable materials from a buy-back center, drop-box, or
from a commercial or industrial generator of recyclable materials, or
upon agreement with a permitted or properly exempted solid waste
collection company.
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as prohibiting a
commercial or industrial generator of commercial recyclable materials
from selling, conveying, or arranging for transportation of such
material to a permitted or properly exempted recycler for reuse or
reclamation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---