BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the quality of
education for children who are deaf or hard of hearing and the
expectations for those children's achievement should be equivalent to
those for children throughout the state. The legislature also finds
that deaf and hard of hearing children can benefit greatly if they are
taught by an educator who is trained to understand the learning and
communication issues the children face. Educators who received teacher
training in a program for the deaf and hard of hearing are sensitive to
the needs of deaf and hard of hearing students and are able to provide
appropriate strategies to assist students in reacting to and
interacting with their environment. The legislature intends to assist
school districts in their efforts to attract teachers who are
especially trained to work with deaf and hard of hearing students by
directing the state board of education to establish a certification
endorsement for teachers of the deaf and hard of hearing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
The state board of education, with advice from the professional
educator standards board, shall develop certification endorsement
requirements for teachers of deaf and hard of hearing students. The
endorsement shall be focused on the specific skills and knowledge
necessary to serve the education and communication needs of deaf and
hard of hearing students. In establishing rules for the endorsement of
teachers who will be working almost exclusively with students who are
deaf or hard of hearing, the state board of education shall consider
applicants to have met state endorsement requirements if they possess
a baccalaureate or master's degree in deaf education from a teacher
training program approved by the council on education of the deaf.

--- END ---