BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 44.39.010 and 2001 c 214 s 30 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is hereby created the joint committee on energy supply ((of
the legislature of the state of Washington)) and energy conservation.

Sec. 2 RCW 44.39.070 and 2002 c 192 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The committee shall meet and function at the following times:
(a) At least once per year or at anytime upon the call of the chair to
receive information related to the state or regional energy supply
situation; (b) during a condition of energy supply alert or energy
emergency; and (c) upon the call of the chair, in response to
gubernatorial action to terminate such a condition. Upon the
declaration by the governor of a condition of energy supply alert or
energy emergency, the committee ((on energy supply)) shall meet to
receive any plans proposed by the governor for programs, controls,
standards, and priorities for the production, allocation, and
consumption of energy during any current or anticipated condition of
energy supply alert or energy emergency, any proposed plans for the
suspension or modification of existing rules of the Washington
Administrative Code, and any other relevant matters the governor deems
desirable. The committee shall review such plans and matters and shall
transmit its recommendations to the governor for review. The committee
may review any voluntary programs or local or regional programs for the
production, allocation, or consumption of energy which have been
submitted to the committee.
(2) The committee shall receive any request from the governor for
the approval of a declaration of a condition of energy emergency as
provided in RCW 43.21G.040 as now or hereafter amended and shall either
approve or disapprove such request.
(3) During a condition of energy supply alert, the committee shall:
(a) Receive any request from the governor for an extension of the
condition of energy supply alert for an additional period of time not
to exceed ninety consecutive days and the findings upon which such
request is based; (b) receive any request from the governor for
subsequent extensions of the condition of energy supply alert for an
additional period of time not to exceed one hundred twenty consecutive
days and the findings upon which such a request is based; and (c)
either approve or disapprove the requested extensions. When approving
a request, the committee may specify a longer period than requested, up
to ninety days for initial extensions and one hundred twenty days for
additional extensions.
(4) During a condition of energy emergency the committee shall:
(a) Receive any request from the governor for an extension of the
condition of energy emergency for an additional period of time not to
exceed forty-five consecutive days and the finding upon which any such
request is based; (b) receive any request from the governor for
subsequent extensions of the condition of energy emergency for an
additional period of time not to exceed sixty consecutive days and the
findings upon which such a request is based; and (c) either approve or
disapprove the requested extensions. When approving a request, the
committee may specify a longer period than requested, up to forty-five
days for initial extensions and sixty days for additional extensions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 44.39 RCW
to read as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to utilize lessons learned from
efforts to conserve energy usage in single state buildings or complexes
and extend conservation measures across all levels of government.
Implementing conservation measures across all levels of government will
create actual energy conservation savings, maintenance and cost savings
to state and local governments, and savings to the state economy, which
depends on affordable, realizable electricity to retain jobs. The
legislature intends that conservation measures be implemented across
all levels of government and that the savings created from implementing
conservation measures be retained to produce more efficient government
operation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 44.39 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply for the purposes of this act
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Committee" means the joint committee on energy supply and
energy conservation.
(2) "Conservation" means reduced energy consumption or energy cost,
or increased efficiency in the use of energy, and activities, measures,
or equipment designed to achieve such results.
(3) "Consumer-owned utility" includes a municipal electric utility
formed under Title 35 RCW, a public utility district formed under Title
54 RCW, an irrigation district formed under chapter 87.03 RCW, a
cooperative formed under chapter 23.86 RCW, a mutual corporation or
association formed under chapter 24.06 RCW, a port district formed
under Title 53 RCW, or a water-sewer district formed under Title 57
RCW, that is engaged in the business of distributing electricity to one
or more retail electric customers in the state.
(4) "Department" means the department of general administration.
(5) "Electric utility" means an investor-owned or a consumer-owned
utility.
(6) "Energy audit" has the meaning provided in RCW 43.19.670.
(7) "Investor-owned utility" means a corporation owned by investors
that meets the definition in RCW 80.04.010 and is engaged in
distributing electricity to more than one retail electric customer in
the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 44.39 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the committee's existing duties under RCW
44.39.070, the committee shall review and identify conservation
measures that can be implemented by all levels of state and local
government using performance bonding and contract financing to generate
energy conservation.
(2) The committee shall:
(a) Review information acquired through energy audits conducted
under chapter 43.19 RCW or through separate energy audits, conducted by
the department under section 6 of this act, of state and local-owned
facilities;
(b) Review reports from the department regarding requests for
proposals to identify conservation measures that may be implemented by
all levels of state and local government across a single electric
utility's service territory, costs to implement those conservation
measures, and proposed contractors to carry out conservation measures;
(c) Review and approve contractors selected by the department to
carry out conservation measures identified by the committee; and
(d) Request the department to report to the committee on the
progress of the implementation of conservation measures in a single
electric utility's service territory.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
To administer the implementation of conservation measures
identified by the joint committee on energy supply and energy
conservation under section 5 of this act, the department shall:
(1) Conduct energy audits of state and local-owned facilities, if
necessary;
(2) Provide technically qualified personnel, at a fee, to assist
with contracting for implementation of conservation measures; and
(3) Collect information regarding local government implementation
of conservation measures under section 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Local governments may implement conservation measures
identified by the joint committee on energy supply and energy
conservation under section 5 of this act.
(2) Local governments that implement conservation measures
identified by the joint committee on energy supply and energy
conservation under section 5 of this act shall report to the department
on the progress of those projects.
(3) Local governments that do not implement conservation measures
identified by the joint committee on energy supply and energy
conservation under section 5 of this act shall report this information
to the department.
(4) The department shall prepare a report summarizing local
governments that implement conservation measures identified by the
joint committee on energy supply and energy conservation under section
5 of this act and the local governments that do not implement
conservation measures identified by the joint committee on energy
supply and energy conservation under section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Financing to implement conservation measures identified by the
joint committee on energy supply and energy conservation under section
5 of this act, including fees charged by the department under section
6 of this act, shall be carried out with bonds issued by the Washington
economic development finance authority under chapter 43.163 RCW.
(2) To administer the financing for conservation measures
identified by the joint committee on energy supply and energy
conservation under section 5 of this act, the department shall:
(a) Provide technical assistance to secure funding through the
issuance of bonds issued by the Washington economic development finance
authority;
(b) Identify an amount equal to the difference between the cost of
energy consumed by state and local governments before conservation
measures are implemented and the cost of energy consumed by state and
local governments after conservation measures are implemented to be
collected and applied towards the bonds issued by the Washington
economic development finance authority.

--- END ---