BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 79.96 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall conduct a study to determine if changes to the
geoduck populations in Hood Canal have occurred over time. The
department's study shall compare prior population surveys with current
surveys conducted as part of this study. The study shall incorporate
geoduck beds representative of the northern, central, and southern
areas of Hood Canal. No later than January 1, 2006, the department
shall submit a report describing the study results to the appropriate
committees of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 79.96 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall conduct a study to assess the relationship
between the Hood Canal's geoduck population levels and environmental
conditions, including dissolved oxygen concentrations. To conduct this
study, the department shall establish geoduck index stations near the
department of ecology's Hood Canal water sampling stations. The index
stations shall include stations representative of the northern,
central, and southern areas of Hood Canal. No later than December 1,
2007, the department shall submit a report describing the study results
to the appropriate committees of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 79.96 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall conduct a study to establish an age profile
and analyze the shell oxidation rate of Hood Canal geoduck. To conduct
this study, the department shall establish sampling stations
representative of the northern, central, and southern areas of Hood
Canal. No later than December 1, 2007, the department shall submit a
report describing the study results to the appropriate committees of
the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act expire July
1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2005, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---