BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.34.037 and 1992 c 69 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section,
applications for classification or reclassification under RCW
84.34.020(1) shall be made to the county legislative authority. An
application made for classification or reclassification of land under
RCW 84.34.020(1) (b) and (c) which is in an area subject to a
comprehensive plan shall be acted upon in the same manner in which an
amendment to the comprehensive plan is processed. Application made for
classification of land which is in an area not subject to a
comprehensive plan shall be acted upon after a public hearing and after
notice of the hearing shall have been given by one publication in a
newspaper of general circulation in the area at least ten days before
the hearing((: PROVIDED, That)). Applications for classification of
land in an incorporated area shall be acted upon by a granting
authority composed of three members of the county legislative body and
three members of the city legislative body in which the land is
located, except as provided in subsection (6) of this section.
(2) In determining whether an application made for classification
or reclassification under RCW 84.34.020(1) (b) and (c) should be
approved or disapproved, the granting authority may take cognizance of
the benefits to the general welfare of preserving the current use of
the property which is the subject of application, and shall consider:
(a) The resulting revenue loss or tax shift;
(b) Whether granting the application for land applying under RCW
84.34.020(1)(b) will (i) conserve or enhance natural, cultural, or
scenic resources, (ii) protect streams, stream corridors, wetlands,
natural shorelines and aquifers, (iii) protect soil resources and
unique or critical wildlife and native plant habitat, (iv) promote
conservation principles by example or by offering educational
opportunities, (v) enhance the value of abutting or neighboring parks,
forests, wildlife preserves, nature reservations, sanctuaries, or other
open spaces, (vi) enhance recreation opportunities, (vii) preserve
historic and archaeological sites, (viii) preserve visual quality along
highway, road, and street corridors or scenic vistas, (ix) affect any
other factors relevant in weighing benefits to the general welfare of
preserving the current use of the property; and
(c) Whether granting the application for land applying under RCW
84.34.020(1)(c) will (i) either preserve land previously classified
under RCW 84.34.020(2) or preserve land that is traditional farmland
and not classified under chapter 84.33 or 84.34 RCW, (ii) preserve land
with a potential for returning to commercial agriculture, and (iii)
affect any other factors relevant in weighing benefits to the general
welfare of preserving the current use of property.
(3) If a public benefit rating system is adopted under RCW
84.34.055, the county legislative authority shall rate property for
which application for classification has been made under RCW
84.34.020(1) (b) and (c) according to the public benefit rating system
in determining whether an application should be approved or
disapproved, but when such a system is adopted, open space properties
then classified under this chapter which do not qualify under the
system shall not be removed from classification but may be rated
according to the public benefit rating system.
(4) The granting authority may approve the application with respect
to only part of the land which is the subject of the application. If
any part of the application is denied, the applicant may withdraw the
entire application. The granting authority in approving in part or
whole an application for land classified or reclassified pursuant to
RCW 84.34.020(1) may also require that certain conditions be met,
including but not limited to the granting of easements. As a condition
of granting open space classification, the ((legislative body))
granting authority may not require public access on land classified
under RCW 84.34.020(1)(b)(iii) for the purpose of promoting
conservation of wetlands.
(5) The granting or denial of the application for current use
classification or reclassification is a legislative determination and
shall be reviewable only for arbitrary and capricious actions.
(6)(a) Applications for classification or reclassification under
RCW 84.34.020(1) (b) or (c) may also be submitted to a hearing examiner
for approval or rejection in accordance with this subsection.
(b) A county legislative authority or county and city legislative
authority may adopt a hearing examiner system to make the determination
under (a) of this subsection.
(c) If a hearing examiner system is adopted, the county must
specify by ordinance the procedures of the examiner process, including
procedures for appealing the examiner's decision. A final decision by
the examiner shall be accepted as final unless clear and convincing
evidence indicates an erroneous decision by the examiner.
(d) Each final decision of a hearing examiner shall be in writing
and shall include findings and conclusions that support the decision.
The findings and conclusions shall be based on the same criteria,
including the criteria in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, that
the granting authority would use. A final decision of the hearing
examiner shall be rendered within ten working days following conclusion
of all testimony and hearings, unless a longer period is mutually
agreed to by the applicant and the examiner.

--- END ---