BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Washington has a strong entrepreneurial
culture within its urban areas, however, the rural communities have not
enjoyed comparable economic growth and vitality. In addition,
Washington leads the nation not only in business creation, but it is
also one of the top states for business failures. New businesses have
a better chance of survival if they receive early stage technical
assistance and adequate access to capital.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The office of entrepreneurial development is established in the
department of community, trade, and economic development. The purpose
of the office of entrepreneurial development is to focus on developing
and coordinating programs that assist in creating entrepreneurial
activity. The office will:
(a) Work with secondary and higher education institutions, small
business development centers, small business incubators, nonprofit
organizations, federally recognized Indian tribes and tribal
organizations, and state and federal agencies to provide education,
training, and technical assistance that increases entrepreneurial
literacy, skills, and experiences;
(b) Work with state and federal agencies, commercial banks and
other lending institutions, federally recognized Indian tribes and
tribal organizations, community development financial institutions, and
nonprofit organizations to provide training and outreach to increase
entrepreneurs access to funding;
(c) Work with small business incubators, chambers of commerce,
federally recognized Indian tribes and tribal organizations, local
community action centers, ports, public utility districts, and economic
development councils to help create an entrepreneurial culture, which
may include community asset mapping, leadership training, and the use
of industry cluster strategies;
(d) Convene work groups of rural community stakeholders to identify
policies that are barriers to entrepreneurship;
(e) Work with the rural development councils on business and
project development by conducting assessments of communities to
determine what a community requires for development and to develop
strategies to assist the community in developing. The department and
the rural development councils shall submit an initial report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature with policy recommendations
by December 1, 2005; and
(f) Have the authority to convene a partnership of appropriate
state agencies and stakeholders to implement the strategic regional and
community plans.
(2) Until July 1, 2010, the focus of the office of entrepreneurial
development will be on the rural communities of Washington. Beginning
July 1, 2010, the office shall perform its obligations under this
section for businesses located throughout the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The sum of two hundred thousand dollars,
or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the
general fund to the department of community, trade, and economic
development for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2006, to carry out the
purposes of this act.
(2) The sum of two hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as
may be necessary, is appropriated from the general fund to the
department of community, trade, and economic development for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2007, to carry out the purposes of this act.

--- END ---