BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that publicly
funded projects often benefit local communities, but they can also
result in adverse economic impacts on local businesses and citizens.
The legislature finds that these impacts are not generally identified,
quantified, or assessed in project siting decisions. Further, the
legislature finds that individual businesses, citizens, and communities
should not bear an inequitable burden of siting public projects and
that appropriate mitigation should be provided. Therefore, the
legislature finds that during the design and development of public
project proposals, the economic impacts to local businesses, citizens,
and communities must be analyzed and addressed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 For the purposes of this chapter, the
following definitions apply:
(1) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(2) "Major project" means proposals for publicly funded projects
that are in excess of one million dollars.
(3) "Responsible official" means the designated official
representing the governmental entity proposing the major project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Prior to submitting permit applications
for major projects covered under this chapter, the responsible official
must make a threshold determination about whether the major project may
create a probable significant, adverse economic impact. An economic
impact statement shall be prepared on major projects having a probable
significant, adverse economic impact. The economic impact statement
may be combined with the recommendation or report on the project's
proposal or issued as a separate document.
(2) In developing an economic impact statement, all branches of
government of this state, including state agencies, municipal and
public corporations, and counties shall:
(a) Include in every major project proposal, a detailed statement
regarding:
(i) The economic impact of the proposed major project;
(ii) Any adverse economic effects which cannot be avoided should
the major project be completed; and
(iii) Alternatives to the proposed major project;
(b) Identify and develop methods and procedures, in consultation
with the department of revenue and the department of community, trade,
and economic development, which will ensure that appropriate economic
and financial indicators are given appropriate consideration in
decision making;
(c) Consult with and obtain the comments of any public agency with
special expertise regarding any economic impact involved, prior to
completing any detailed statement;
(d) Study, develop, and describe appropriate alternatives to
recommended courses of action in any proposal.
(3) An economic impact statement is only required to analyze those
probable adverse economic impacts which are significant. Beneficial
economic impacts may also be discussed. The responsible official shall
consult with agencies and the public to identify such impacts and limit
the scope of an economic impact statement. These impacts may include,
but are not limited to:
(a) The economic impacts on the regional or local economy such as
the impact of the major project on development, tax revenues and public
expenditures, employment opportunities, accessibility, and retail
sales. Where substantial impacts on the economic viability of affected
municipalities are likely to occur, they should also be discussed
together with a summary of any efforts undertaken and agreements
reached for using the transportation investment to support both public
and private economic development plans. To the extent possible, this
discussion should rely upon results of coordination with and views of
affected state, county, and city officials.
(b) The impacts on the economic vitality of existing highway-related businesses and the resultant impact, if any, on the local
economy. For example, the loss of business or employment resulting
from building an alternative in a new location bypassing a local
community.
(c) The impacts of the proposed action on established business
districts, and any opportunities to minimize or reduce these impacts by
the public or private sectors.
(4) Where appropriate, analysis under this chapter may be combined
with environmental analysis performed under chapter 43.21C RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A major purpose of this act is to
combine economic considerations with public decisions, therefore any
appeal brought under this chapter must be linked to a major project
proposal.
(a) Appeals under this chapter shall be linked to decisions
regarding the major project and its accompanying environmental
determinations under chapter 43.21C RCW.
(b) Appeals of economic determinations made or lacking under this
chapter shall be commenced within the time required to appeal decisions
regarding project review. These appeals include, but are not limited
to:
(i) A determination of significance;
(ii) The adequacy of a determination of
significance/nonsignificance or of a final economic impact statement;
(iii) Procedural issues in making the determination; and
(iv) Substantive determinations in the decision.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The department shall adopt rules to
provide uniform procedures and guidelines to all branches of government
including state agencies, political subdivisions, public and municipal
corporations, and counties. The rule authorized in this section
includes, but is not limited to, the following:
(a) Criteria and procedures applicable to the determination of when
a major action has a probable significant, adverse economic impact for
which a detailed statement must be prepared under section 2 of this
act;
(b) Procedures for the preparation of detailed statements and other
economic analysis documents, including but not limited to, rules for
timing of economic review, obtaining comments, data, and other
information, and providing for and determining areas of public
participation which include the scope and review of draft economic
impact statements;
(c) The scope of coverage and contents of detailed statements
assuring that statements are simple, uniform, and as short as
practicable; statements are required to analyze only reasonable
alternatives and probable adverse economic impacts which are
significant, and may analyze beneficial impacts;
(d) Public notification procedures for actions taken and documents
prepared;
(e) The time limits within which the governmental entity
responsible for the major action shall comply with the provisions of
this act; and
(f) The implementation of the substantive policies and procedural
requirements, including appeals under this chapter.
(2) Rules adopted must provide for the coordination of economic
review with environmental review under chapter 43.21C RCW. The
department shall consult with the department of ecology on this aspect
of the rule.
(3) In exercising its powers, functions, and duties under this
section, the department may:
(a) Consult with the state agencies and with representatives of
science, industry, agriculture, labor, conservation organizations,
state and local governments, and other groups, as it deems advisable;
and
(b) Utilize, to the fullest extent possible, the services,
facilities, and information, including statistical information of
public and private agencies, organizations, and individuals, in order
to avoid duplication of effort and expense, overlap, or conflict with
similar activities authorized by law and performed by established
agencies.
(4) Rules adopted under this section are subject to the provisions
of chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act are each
added to chapter 43.31 RCW.

--- END ---