BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29A.60 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning with the 2005 general election, the secretary of state
shall make available on its web site the election results of all state
measures submitted to the voters. The voting results of measures must
be made available, at a minimum, by each legislative district and must
be posted on the web site for five years.

--- END ---