BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Credit card" means a card, plate, booklet, credit card number,
credit card account number, or other identifying symbol, instrument, or
device that can be used to pay for, or to obtain, credit, goods, or
services.
(b) "Financial institution" means a bank, trust company, mutual
savings bank, savings and loan association, or credit union authorized
to do business and accept deposits in this state under state law.
(2) A financial institution may not mail an unsolicited credit card
that may be activated by a phone call to a prospective borrower. This
section does not prohibit a financial institution from soliciting
applications for credit cards from a prospective borrower. This
section does not prohibit a financial institution from mailing a credit
card to a prospective borrower who has asked in writing for the credit
card.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act constitutes a new
chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---