BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.10.020 and 2003 c 352 s 1, 2003 c 301 s 2, and 2003
c 300 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Alternative public works contracting procedure" means the
design-build and the general contractor/construction manager
contracting procedures authorized in RCW 39.10.051 and 39.10.061,
respectively.
(2) "Public body" means the state department of general
administration; the University of Washington; Washington State
University; Western Washington University; Central Washington
University; Eastern Washington University; The Evergreen State College;
every city with a population greater than seventy thousand and any
public authority chartered by such city under RCW 35.21.730 through
35.21.755 and specifically authorized as provided in RCW 39.10.120(4);
every county with a population greater than four hundred fifty
thousand; every port district with total revenues greater than fifteen
million dollars per year; every public hospital district with total
revenues greater than fifteen million dollars per year utilizing the
design-build procedure authorized by RCW 39.10.051 and every public
hospital district, regardless of total revenues, proposing projects
that are considered and approved by the public hospital district
project review board under RCW 39.10.117; every public utility district
with revenues from energy sales greater than twenty-three million
dollars per year; those school districts proposing projects that are
considered and approved by the school district project review board
under RCW 39.10.115; and the state ferry system.
(3) "Public works project" means any work for a public body within
the definition of the term public work in RCW 39.04.010.
(4) "Job order contract" means a contract between a public body or
any school district and a registered or licensed contractor in which
the contractor agrees to a fixed period, indefinite quantity delivery
order contract which provides for the use of negotiated, definitive
work orders for public works as defined in RCW 39.04.010.
(5) "Job order contractor" means a registered or licensed
contractor awarded a job order contract.
(6) "Unit price book" means a book containing specific prices,
based on generally accepted industry standards and information, where
available, for various items of work to be performed by the job order
contractor. The prices may include: All the costs of materials;
labor; equipment; overhead, including bonding costs; and profit for
performing the items of work. The unit prices for labor must be at the
rates in effect at the time the individual work order is issued.
(7) "Work order" means an order issued for a definite scope of work
to be performed pursuant to a job order contract.

--- END ---