BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature has and continues to
recognize the vital importance of economic development to the health
and prosperity of Washington state as indicated in RCW 43.160.010,
43.155.070(4)(g), 43.163.005, and 43.168.010. The legislature finds
that current economic development programs and funding, which are
primarily low-interest loan programs, can be enhanced by creating a
grant program to assist local governments with public infrastructure
projects that directly stimulate community and economic development by
supporting the creation of new jobs or the retention of existing jobs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.155 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The job development fund program is created. In administering
the job development fund, the board shall establish a competitive
process to request and prioritize proposals for public infrastructure
projects, the primary objective of which is to stimulate community and
economic development through development or redevelopment of an area.
For the purposes of this act, "public infrastructure projects" has the
same meaning as "public facilities" as defined in RCW 43.160.020(11).
(2) The board shall conduct a statewide request for project
applications from political subdivisions or federally recognized Indian
tribes in partnership with a political subdivision. The board shall
develop criteria on which to evaluate and rank applications, and shall
develop performance and evaluation criteria to review how well
successful applicants met the community and economic development
objectives stated in their applications. Among the priorities for
ranking projects, the board shall include consideration of:
(a) The relative benefits provided to the community by the jobs the
project would create, including, but not limited to: (i) The total
number of jobs; (ii) the total number of full-time, family wage jobs;
(iii) the unemployment rate in the area; and (iv) the increase in
employment in comparison to total community population;
(b) The present level of economic activity in the community and the
existing local financial capacity to increase economic activity in the
community;
(c) The rate of return of the state's investment, that includes the
expected increase in state and local tax revenues associated with the
project;
(d) The lack of another timely source of funding available to
finance the project which would likely prevent the proposed community
or economic development, absent the financing available under this act;
(e) The ability of the project to improve the viability of existing
business entities in the project area; and
(f) Whether or not the project is a partnership of multiple
jurisdictions.
(3) At a minimum, applicants shall demonstrate that the requested
assistance will directly stimulate community and economic development
by facilitating the creation of new jobs or the retention of existing
jobs. The evaluation and ranking process shall also include an
examination of existing assets that applicants may apply to projects.
(4) The board shall not provide financial assistance if the funds
will not be used within the jurisdiction or jurisdictions of the local
government deemed in need of the community or economic development.
(5) The board shall not provide financial assistance for any
project for which evidence exists that the project would result in a
development or expansion that would displace existing jobs in any other
community in the state.
(6) By September 1, 2010, the joint legislative audit and review
committee shall submit a report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature. The report, at a minimum, should evaluate the
effectiveness of the job development fund grant program, including a
project by project review. The report should include information
regarding the criteria and performance measures used, whether the
performance measures were met, and how the funds were used.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.155 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the 2005-2007 biennium, the board may solicit and rank
applications to the job development fund as provided in section 2(2) of
this act, and need not submit the list for approval to the legislature,
to the extent funding is included in the 2005-2007 capital budget for
purposes of this section and to the extent the legislature has not
specified otherwise in the appropriation.
(2)(a) Beginning with the 2007-2009 biennium, the board may not
sign contracts or otherwise financially obligate job development funds
until the legislature has approved a specific list of projects.
Beginning with the 2007-2009 biennium and thereafter, the board shall
submit a prioritized list of recommended projects to the governor and
the legislature. The legislature may remove projects from the list
recommended by the board.
The legislature may not change the prioritization of projects
recommended for funding by the board. For purposes of the job
development fund's biennial capital budget request, the board shall
request fifty million dollars per biennium. The total amount of the
board's recommended state funding for projects on a biennial job
development fund project list submitted by the board may not exceed
seventy percent of the biennial budget request. The board may provide
an additional alternate job development fund project list up to ten
million dollars. The list shall include a description of each project,
the amount of recommended state funding, and documentation of nonstate
funds to be used for the project. The board shall also describe the
expected community or economic development benefits for each of the
recommended projects in its budget request.
(b) The remaining funds not expended or obligated under (a) of this
subsection may be expended or obligated by the governor, with the
approval of the board, for projects not on the list approved by the
legislature if:
(i) The application was submitted for consideration in the board's
biennial application solicitation and ranking process, meets the
criteria developed pursuant to section 2(2) of this act, but
circumstances have subsequently changed that make the project more
urgent and more highly ranked;
(ii)(A) The application was submitted after the board's biennial
application deadline through no fault of the applicant; (B) the
application meets the criteria developed pursuant to section 2(2) of
this act; and (C) the applicant cannot wait for the next biennial
application period due to exigent or emergency circumstances; or
(iii)(A) Through no fault of the applicant, the project was not
proposed in time for consideration in the board's biennial application
solicitation; (B) the project meets the criteria developed pursuant to
section 2(2) of this act; and (C) the project cannot wait for the next
biennial application period due to exigent or emergency circumstances.
(c) When funds are expended or obligated pursuant to (b) of this
subsection, the governor shall inform the speaker and minority leader
of the house of representatives, and the president, majority leader,
and minority leader of the senate in writing within ten business days
of expending or obligating the funds.
(3) The maximum grant from the job development fund for any one
project is ten million dollars. Grant assistance from the job
development fund may not exceed thirty-three percent of the total cost
of the project. The nonstate portion of the total project cost may
include cash, the value of real property when acquired solely for the
purpose of the project, and in-kind contributions.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.155.050 and 2001 c 131 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The public works assistance account is hereby established in the
state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance
account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature
or from any other lawful source. Money in the public works assistance
account shall be used to make loans and to give financial guarantees to
local governments for public works projects. Moneys in the account may
also be appropriated to provide for state match requirements under
federal law for projects and activities conducted and financed by the
board under the drinking water assistance account. Not more than
fifteen percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the
public works board from this account may be expended or obligated for
preconstruction loans, emergency loans, or loans for capital facility
planning under this chapter; of this amount, not more than ten percent
of the biennial capital budget appropriation may be expended for
emergency loans and not more than one percent of the biennial capital
budget appropriation may be expended for capital facility planning
loans. Beginning July 1, 2007, fifty million dollars from the public
works assistance account will be appropriated each biennium for the job
development fund program grants and administrative expenses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall conduct an inventory of all state public infrastructure
programs and funds. The inventory shall identify: The public
infrastructure state programs and funds and the purposes each serve;
how the program or fund is implemented; the types of public
infrastructure projects supported by the program or fund; the dollar
amount of the projects funded by each program or fund; the balance of
a fund, if applicable; and the geographic distribution of projects
supported by a program or fund. Where applicable, the inventory shall
identify overlaps or gaps in types of public infrastructure projects
supported through state programs or funds. Where appropriate, the
inventory shall evaluate the return on investment for economic
development infrastructure programs. The inventory shall be delivered
to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act shall expire June 30, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---