BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Asthma is a dangerous disease that is growing in prevalence in
Washington state. An estimated five hundred thousand residents of the
state suffer from asthma. Since 1995, asthma has claimed more than
five hundred lives, caused more than twenty-five thousand
hospitalizations with costs of more than one hundred twelve million
dollars, and resulted in seven million five hundred thousand missed
school days. School nurses have identified over four thousand children
with life-threatening asthma in the state's schools.
(2) While asthma is found among all populations, its prevalence
disproportionately affects low-income and minority populations.
Untreated asthma affects worker productivity and results in unnecessary
absences from work. In many cases, asthma triggers present in
substandard housing and poorly ventilated workplaces contribute
directly to asthma.
(3) Although research continues into the causes and cures for
asthma, national consensus has been reached on treatment guidelines.
People with asthma who are being treated in accordance with these
guidelines are far more likely to control the disease than those who
are not being treated and therefore are less likely to experience
debilitating or life-threatening asthma episodes, less likely to be
hospitalized, and less likely to need to curtail normal school or work
activities. With treatment, most people with asthma are able to live
normal, active lives.
(4) Up to one-third of the people with asthma have not had their
disease diagnosed. Among those with diagnosed asthma, thirty to fifty
percent are not receiving medicines that are needed to control the
disease, and approximately eighty percent of diagnosed asthmatics are
not getting yearly spirometry measurements that are a key element in
monitoring the disease.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.27.190 and 1996 c 186 s 501 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Not later than January 1, 1991, the state building code
council, in consultation with the department of community, trade, and
economic development, shall establish interim requirements for the
maintenance of indoor air quality in newly constructed residential
buildings. In establishing the interim requirements, the council shall
take into consideration differences in heating fuels and heating system
types. These requirements shall be in effect July 1, 1991, through
June 30, 1993.
(b) The interim requirements for new electrically space heated
residential buildings shall include ventilation standards which provide
for mechanical ventilation in areas of the residence where water vapor
or cooking odors are produced. The ventilation shall be exhausted to
the outside of the structure. The ventilation standards shall further
provide for the capacity to supply outside air to each bedroom and the
main living area through dedicated supply air inlet locations in walls,
or in an equivalent manner. At least one exhaust fan in the home shall
be controlled by a dehumidistat or clock timer to ensure that
sufficient whole house ventilation is regularly provided as needed.
(c)(i) For new single family residences with electric space heating
systems, zero lot line homes, each unit in a duplex, and each attached
housing unit in a planned unit development, the ventilation standards
shall include fifty cubic feet per minute of effective installed
ventilation capacity in each bathroom and one hundred cubic feet per
minute of effective installed ventilation capacity in each kitchen.
(ii) For other new residential units with electric space heating
systems the ventilation standards may be satisfied by the installation
of two exhaust fans with a combined effective installed ventilation
capacity of two hundred cubic feet per minute.
(iii) Effective installed ventilation capacity means the capability
to deliver the specified ventilation rates for the actual design of the
ventilation system. Natural ventilation and infiltration shall not be
considered acceptable substitutes for mechanical ventilation.
(d) For new residential buildings that are space heated with other
than electric space heating systems, the interim standards shall be
designed to result in indoor air quality equivalent to that achieved
with the interim ventilation standards for electric space heated homes.
(e) The interim requirements for all newly constructed residential
buildings shall include standards for indoor air quality pollutant
source control, including the following requirements: All structural
panel components of the residence shall comply with appropriate
standards for the emission of formaldehyde; the back-drafting of
combustion by-products from combustion appliances shall be minimized
through the use of dampers, vents, outside combustion air sources, or
other appropriate technologies; and, in areas of the state where
monitored data indicate action is necessary to inhibit indoor radon gas
concentrations from exceeding appropriate health standards, entry of
radon gas into homes shall be minimized through appropriate foundation
construction measures. Standards for heating and ventilation systems
shall be developed that minimize the presence of common asthma triggers
such as dust mites and animal dander in recirculated air.
(2) No later than January 1, 1993, the state building code council,
in consultation with the department of community, trade, and economic
development, shall establish final requirements for the maintenance of
indoor air quality in newly constructed residences to be in effect
beginning July 1, 1993. For new electrically space heated residential
buildings, these requirements shall maintain indoor air quality
equivalent to that provided by the mechanical ventilation and indoor
air pollutant source control requirements included in the February 7,
1989, Bonneville power administration record of decision for the
environmental impact statement on new energy efficient homes programs
(DOE/EIS-0127F) built with electric space heating. In residential
units other than single family, zero lot line, duplexes, and attached
housing units in planned unit developments, ventilation requirements
may be satisfied by the installation of two exhaust fans with a
combined effective installed ventilation capacity of two hundred cubic
feet per minute. For new residential buildings that are space heated
with other than electric space heating systems, the standards shall be
designed to result in indoor air quality equivalent to that achieved
with the ventilation and source control standards for electric space
heated homes. In establishing the final requirements, the council
shall take into consideration differences in heating fuels and heating
system types.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.210
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction and the secretary of
the department of health shall develop a uniform policy for all school
districts providing for the in-service training for school staff on
symptoms, treatment, and monitoring of students with asthma and on the
additional observations that may be needed in different situations that
may arise during the school day and during school-sponsored events.
The policy shall include the standards and skills that must be in place
for in-service training of school staff.
(2) All school districts shall adopt policies regarding asthma
rescue procedures and asthma prevention policies for each school within
the district.
(3) All school districts must require that each public elementary
school and secondary school grant to any student in the school
authorization for the self-administration of medication to treat that
student's asthma or anaphylaxis, if:
(a) A health care practitioner prescribed the medication for use by
the student during school hours and instructed the student in the
correct and responsible use of the medication;
(b) The student has demonstrated to the health care practitioner,
or the practitioner's designee, and the school nurse, if available, the
skill level necessary to use the medication and any device that is
necessary to administer the medication as prescribed;
(c) The health care practitioner formulates a written treatment
plan for managing asthma or anaphylaxis episodes of the student and for
medication use by the student during school hours; and
(d) The student's parent or guardian has completed and submitted to
the school any written documentation required by the school, including
the treatment plan formulated under (c) of this subsection and other
documents related to liability.
(4) An authorization granted under subsection (3) of this section
must allow the student involved to possess and use his or her
medication:
(a) While in school;
(b) While at a school-sponsored activity, such as a sporting event;
and
(c) In transit to or from school or school-sponsored activities.
(5) An authorization granted under subsection (3) of this section:
(a) Must be effective only for the same school and school year for
which it is granted; and
(b) Must be renewed by the parent or guardian each subsequent
school year in accordance with this subsection.
(6) School districts must require that backup medication, if
provided by a student's parent or guardian, be kept at a student's
school in a location to which the student has immediate access in the
event of an asthma or anaphylaxis emergency.
(7) School districts must require that information described in
subsection (3)(c) and (d) of this section be kept on file at the
student's school in a location easily accessible in the event of an
asthma or anaphylaxis emergency.
(8) Nothing in this section creates a cause of action or in any
other way increases or diminishes the liability of any person under any
other law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The authority shall coordinate among state agencies and health
plans delivering state purchased health services for including asthma
management, including development of individual asthma management
plans, among the disease management programs that are encouraged by the
authority.
(2) The administrator shall establish a common asthma registry
process for all providers of health care services purchased by the
state.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.05.013 and 2003 c 276 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The authority shall coordinate state agency efforts to develop
and implement uniform policies across state purchased health care
programs that will ensure prudent, cost-effective health services
purchasing, maximize efficiencies in administration of state purchased
health care programs, improve the quality of care provided through
state purchased health care programs, and reduce administrative burdens
on health care providers participating in state purchased health care
programs. The policies adopted should be based, to the extent
possible, upon the best available scientific and medical evidence and
shall endeavor to address:
(a) Methods of formal assessment, such as health technology
assessment. Consideration of the best available scientific evidence
does not preclude consideration of experimental or investigational
treatment or services under a clinical investigation approved by an
institutional review board;
(b) Monitoring of health outcomes, adverse events, quality, and
cost-effectiveness of health services;
(c) Development of a common definition of medical necessity; and
(d) Exploration of common strategies for disease management and
demand management programs, including asthma, diabetes, heart disease,
and similar common chronic diseases. Strategies to be explored include
individual asthma management plans.
(2) The administrator may invite health care provider
organizations, carriers, other health care purchasers, and consumers to
participate in efforts undertaken under this section.
(3) For the purposes of this section "best available scientific and
medical evidence" means the best available external clinical evidence
derived from systematic research.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that asthma imposes a significant health risk
and tremendous financial burden on the citizens and government of the
state of Washington, and that access to the medically accepted
standards of care for asthma, its treatment and supplies, and self-management training and education is crucial to prevent or delay the
short and long-term complications of asthma and its attendant costs.
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Person with asthma" means a person diagnosed by a health care
provider as having asthma; and
(b) "Health care provider" means a health care provider as defined
in RCW 48.43.005.
(2) All state-purchased health care purchased or renewed after
January 1, 2006, shall provide benefits for at least the following
services and supplies for persons with asthma:
(a) For state-purchased health care that includes coverage for
pharmacy services, appropriate and medically necessary equipment and
supplies, as prescribed by a health care provider, that includes but is
not limited to asthma controller medicines, asthma rescue medicines,
peak flow meters, spacers, covering for mattresses and pillows for
sensitive populations, and smoking cessation services and medications
for persons with asthma or others living in the same household, as
prescribed by a health care provider;
(b) For all state-purchased health care, outpatient self-management
training and education, including development of an asthma plan and
services of a certified asthma educator, as ordered by the health care
provider. Asthma outpatient self-management training and education may
be provided only by certified asthma educators. Nothing in this
section prevents the health care service contractor from restricting
patients to seeing only health care providers who have signed
participating provider agreements with the health care service
contractor or an insuring entity under contract with the health care
service contractor.
(3) Coverage required under this section may be subject to
customary cost-sharing provisions established for all other similar
services or supplies within a policy.
(4) Health care coverage may not be reduced or eliminated due to
this section.
(5) Services required under this section shall be covered when
deemed medically necessary by the medical director, or his or her
designee or licensed health care provider with the appropriate training
and education in the pathophysiology, treatment, and education required
for asthma management, and is subject to any referral and formulary
requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 48.44 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that asthma imposes a significant health risk
and tremendous financial burden on the citizens and government of the
state of Washington, and that access to the medically accepted
standards of care for asthma, its treatment and supplies, and self-management training and education is crucial to prevent or delay the
short and long-term complications of asthma and its attendant costs.
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Person with asthma" means a person diagnosed by a health care
provider as having asthma; and
(b) "Health care provider" means a health care provider as defined
in RCW 48.43.005.
(2) All health benefit plans offered by health care service
contractors, issued or renewed after January 1, 2006, shall provide
benefits for at least the following services and supplies for persons
with asthma:
(a) For health benefit plans that include coverage for pharmacy
services, appropriate and medically necessary equipment and supplies,
as prescribed by a health care provider, that includes but is not
limited to asthma controller medicines, asthma rescue medicines, peak
flow meters, spacers, covering for mattresses and pillows for sensitive
populations, and smoking cessation services and medications for persons
with asthma or others living in the same household, as prescribed by a
health care provider;
(b) For all health benefit plans, outpatient self-management
training and education, including development of an asthma plan and
services of a certified asthma educator, as ordered by the health care
provider. Asthma outpatient self-management training and education may
be provided only by certified asthma educators. Nothing in this
section prevents the health care service contractor from restricting
patients to seeing only health care providers who have signed
participating provider agreements with the health care service
contractor or an insuring entity under contract with the health care
service contractor.
(3) Coverage required under this section may be subject to
customary cost-sharing provisions established for all other similar
services or supplies within a policy.
(4) Health care coverage may not be reduced or eliminated due to
this section.
(5) Services required under this section shall be covered when
deemed medically necessary by the medical director, or his or her
designee or licensed health care provider with the appropriate training
and education in the pathophysiology, treatment, and education required
for asthma management, and is subject to any referral and formulary
requirements.
(6) The health care service contractor need not include the
coverage required in this section in a group contract offered to an
employer or other group that offers to its eligible enrollees a self-insured health plan not subject to mandated benefits status under this
title that does not offer coverage similar to that mandated under this
section.
(7) This section does not apply to the health benefit plans that
provide benefits identical to the schedule of services covered by the
basic health plan, as required by RCW 48.44.022 and 48.44.023.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 48.46 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that asthma imposes a significant health risk
and tremendous financial burden on the citizens and government of the
state of Washington, and that access to the medically accepted
standards of care for asthma, its treatment and supplies, and self-management training and education is crucial to prevent or delay the
short and long-term complications of asthma and its attendant costs.
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Person with asthma" means a person diagnosed by a health care
provider as having asthma; and
(b) "Health care provider" means a health care provider as defined
in RCW 48.43.005.
(2) All health benefit plans offered by health maintenance
organizations, issued or renewed after January 1, 2006, shall provide
benefits for at least the following services and supplies for persons
with asthma:
(a) For health benefit plans that include coverage for pharmacy
services, appropriate and medically necessary equipment and supplies,
as prescribed by a health care provider, that includes but is not
limited to asthma controller medicines, asthma rescue medicines, peak
flow meters, spacers, covering for mattresses and pillows for sensitive
populations, and smoking cessation services and medications for persons
with asthma or others living in the same household, as prescribed by a
health care provider;
(b) For all health benefit plans, outpatient self-management
training and education, including development of an asthma plan and
services of a certified asthma educator, as ordered by the health care
provider. Asthma outpatient self-management training and education may
be provided only by certified asthma educators. Nothing in this
section prevents the health care service contractor from restricting
patients to seeing only health care providers who have signed
participating provider agreements with the health care service
contractor or an insuring entity under contract with the health care
service contractor.
(3) Coverage required under this section may be subject to
customary cost-sharing provisions established for all other similar
services or supplies within a policy.
(4) Health care coverage may not be reduced or eliminated due to
this section.
(5) Services required under this section shall be covered when
deemed medically necessary by the medical director, or his or her
designee or licensed health care provider with the appropriate training
and education in the pathophysiology, treatment, and education required
for asthma management, and is subject to any referral and formulary
requirements.
(6) The health maintenance organization need not include the
coverage required in this section in a group contract offered to an
employer or other group that offers to its eligible enrollees a self-insured health plan not subject to mandated benefits status under this
title that does not offer coverage similar to that mandated under this
section.
(7) This section does not apply to the health benefit plans that
provide benefits identical to the schedule of services covered by the
basic health plan, as required by RCW 48.44.022 and 48.44.023.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of health shall collect data as authorized by RCW
43.70.050 regarding the prevalence of asthma, identify variations in
practices of treatment of asthma, identify populations with
disproportionate prevalence, and describe successful strategies for
diagnosis, prevention, and treatment of asthma.

Sec. 10 RCW 74.09.520 and 2004 c 141 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The term "medical assistance" may include the following care
and services: (a) Inpatient hospital services; (b) outpatient hospital
services; (c) other laboratory and x-ray services; (d) nursing facility
services; (e) physicians' services, which shall include prescribed
medication and instruction on birth control devices; (f) medical care,
or any other type of remedial care as may be established by the
secretary; (g) home health care services; (h) private duty nursing
services; (i) dental services; (j) physical and occupational therapy
and related services; (k) prescribed drugs, dentures, and prosthetic
devices; and eyeglasses prescribed by a physician skilled in diseases
of the eye or by an optometrist, whichever the individual may select;
(l) personal care services, as provided in this section; (m) hospice
services; (n) other diagnostic, screening, preventive, and
rehabilitative services; ((and)) (o) asthma-related community health
services; and (p) like services when furnished to a child by a school
district in a manner consistent with the requirements of this chapter.
For the purposes of this section, the department may not cut off any
prescription medications, oxygen supplies, respiratory services, or
other life-sustaining medical services or supplies.
"Medical assistance," notwithstanding any other provision of law,
shall not include routine foot care, or dental services delivered by
any health care provider, that are not mandated by Title XIX of the
social security act unless there is a specific appropriation for these
services.
(2) The department shall amend the state plan for medical
assistance under Title XIX of the federal social security act to
include personal care services, as defined in 42 C.F.R. 440.170(f), in
the categorically needy program.
(3) The department shall adopt, amend, or rescind such
administrative rules as are necessary to ensure that Title XIX personal
care services are provided to eligible persons in conformance with
federal regulations.
(a) These administrative rules shall include financial eligibility
indexed according to the requirements of the social security act
providing for medicaid eligibility.
(b) The rules shall require clients be assessed as having a medical
condition requiring assistance with personal care tasks. Plans of care
for clients requiring health-related consultation for assessment and
service planning may be reviewed by a nurse.
(c) The department shall determine by rule which clients have a
health-related assessment or service planning need requiring registered
nurse consultation or review. This definition may include clients that
meet indicators or protocols for review, consultation, or visit.
(4) The department shall design and implement a means to assess the
level of functional disability of persons eligible for personal care
services under this section. The personal care services benefit shall
be provided to the extent funding is available according to the
assessed level of functional disability. Any reductions in services
made necessary for funding reasons should be accomplished in a manner
that assures that priority for maintaining services is given to persons
with the greatest need as determined by the assessment of functional
disability.
(5) Effective July 1, 1989, the department shall offer hospice
services in accordance with available funds.
(6) For Title XIX personal care services administered by aging and
disability services administration of the department, the department
shall contract with area agencies on aging:
(a) To provide case management services to individuals receiving
Title XIX personal care services in their own home; and
(b) To reassess and reauthorize Title XIX personal care services or
other home and community services as defined in RCW 74.39A.009 in home
or in other settings for individuals consistent with the intent of this
section:
(i) Who have been initially authorized by the department to receive
Title XIX personal care services or other home and community services
as defined in RCW 74.39A.009; and
(ii) Who, at the time of reassessment and reauthorization, are
receiving such services in their own home.
(7) In the event that an area agency on aging is unwilling to enter
into or satisfactorily fulfill a contract or an individual consumer's
need for case management services will be met through an alternative
delivery system, the department is authorized to:
(a) Obtain the services through competitive bid; and
(b) Provide the services directly until a qualified contractor can
be found.

--- END ---