BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.28.040 and 1977 ex.s. c 199 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
((If change of circumstances warrants an increase or rearrangement
of compensation, like application shall be made therefor.)) Where the
worker's application to reopen a claim has been granted under RCW
51.32.160, compensation and other benefits if in order shall be allowed
for periods of time up to sixty days prior to the receipt of such
application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---