BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 27.24.062 and 1992 c 62 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Two or more counties each with a population of from eight thousand
to less than one hundred twenty-five thousand at the time of creation
of the regional law library may, by agreement of the respective law
library boards of trustees as described in RCW 27.24.020(2), create a
regional law library and establish and maintain one principal law
library at such location as the regional board of trustees may
determine will best suit the needs of the users: PROVIDED, HOWEVER,
That there shall be at all times a law library in such size as the
board of trustees may determine necessary to be located at the
courthouse where each superior court is located.

Sec. 2 RCW 27.24.020 and 1992 c 62 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless a regional law library is created pursuant to RCW
27.24.062, every county with a population of three hundred thousand or
more must have a board of law library trustees consisting of five
members to be constituted as follows: The chairman of the county
legislative authority is an ex officio trustee, the judges of the
superior court of the county shall choose two of their number to be
trustees, and the members of the county bar association shall choose
two members of the bar of the county to be trustees.
(2) Unless a regional law library is created pursuant to RCW
27.24.062, every county with a population of eight thousand or more but
less than three hundred thousand must have a board of law library
trustees consisting of five members to be constituted as follows: The
chairman of the county legislative authority is an ex officio trustee,
the judges of the superior court of the county shall choose one of
their number to be a trustee, and the members of the county bar
association shall choose three members of the county to be trustees.
If there is no county bar association, then the lawyers of the county
shall choose three of their number to be trustees.
(3) If a county has a population of less than eight thousand, then
the provisions contained in RCW 27.24.068 shall apply to the
establishment and operation of the county law library.
(4) If a regional law library is created pursuant to RCW 27.24.062,
then it shall be governed by one board of trustees. The board shall
consist of the following representatives from each county: The judges
of the superior court of the county shall choose one of their number to
be a trustee, the county legislative authority shall choose one of
their number to be a trustee, and the members of the county bar
association shall choose one member of the bar of the county to be a
trustee. If there is no county bar association, then the lawyers of
the county shall choose one of their number to be a trustee.
(5) The term of office of a member of the board who is a judge is
for as long as he or she continues to be a judge, and the term of a
member who is from the bar is four years. Vacancies shall be filled as
they occur and in the manner directed in this section. The office of
trustee shall be without salary or other compensation. The board shall
elect one of their number president and the librarian shall act as
secretary, except that in counties with a population of eight thousand
or more but less than three hundred thousand, the board shall elect one
of their number to act as secretary if no librarian is appointed.
Meetings shall be held at least once per year, and if more often, then
at such times as may be prescribed by rule.

--- END ---