BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
COMMUNITY REVITALIZATION FINANCING--GENERAL PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 The legislature recognizes that the state
as a whole benefits from investment in public infrastructure because it
promotes community and economic development. Public investment
stimulates business activity and helps create jobs; stimulates the
redevelopment of brownfields and blighted areas in the inner city;
lowers the cost of housing; and promotes efficient land use. The
legislature finds that these activities generate revenue for the state
and that it is in the public interest to invest in these projects
through a credit against the state sales and use tax to those local
governments that can demonstrate the expected returns to the state.

Sec. 102 RCW 39.89.020 and 2001 c 212 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Assessed value of real property" means the valuation of
taxable real property as placed on the last completed assessment roll.
(2) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(3) "Increment area" means the geographic area from which taxes are
to be appropriated to finance public improvements authorized under this
chapter.
(4) "Increment value" means seventy-five percent of any increase in
the assessed value of real property in an increment area due to the
placement of new construction and improvements to property on the
assessment rolls after the increment area is created, where the new
construction or improvements occur entirely after the increment area is
created. "Increment value" does not include any increase in the
assessed value of real property representing new construction and
improvements to property occurring after their initial placement on the
assessment rolls, except that for new construction which represents
entire buildings increment value includes seventy-five percent of any
increase in the assessed value of such new construction in the years
following its initial placement on the assessment rolls. There is no
increment value if the assessed value of real property in an increment
area has not increased due to new construction and improvements to
property occurring after the increment area is created.
(5) "Local government" means any city, town, county, port district,
or any combination thereof.
(((3))) (6) "Ordinance" means any appropriate method of taking
legislative action by a local government.
(((4))) (7) "Participating taxing authority" means a taxing
authority that has entered into a written agreement with a local
government for the use of community revitalization financing to the
extent of allocating excess excise taxes to the local government for
the purpose of financing all or a portion of the costs of designated
public improvements.
(8) "Participating taxing district" means all taxing districts
levying regular property taxes on real property within an increment
area, where a local government has obtained written agreement for the
use of community revitalization financing to finance all or a portion
of the costs of designated public improvements as provided in RCW
39.89.030(8). However, a fire protection district is not a
participating taxing district unless it has entered into a signed,
written agreement with a local government to provide limited funding
under community revitalization financing as provided in RCW
39.89.030(8)(a).
(9) "Public improvements" means:
(a) Infrastructure improvements within the increment area that
include:
(i) Street and road construction and maintenance;
(ii) Water and sewer system construction and improvements;
(iii) Sidewalks and streetlights;
(iv) Parking, terminal, and dock facilities;
(v) Park and ride facilities of a transit authority;
(vi) Park facilities and recreational areas; and
(vii) Storm water and drainage management systems; and
(b) Expenditures for any of the following purposes:
(i) Providing environmental analysis, professional management,
planning, and promotion within the increment area, including the
management and promotion of retail trade activities in the increment
area;
(ii) Providing maintenance and security for common or public areas
in the increment area; or
(iii) Historic preservation activities authorized under RCW
35.21.395.
(((5))) (10) "Public improvement costs" means the costs of: (a)
Design, planning, acquisition, including land acquisition, site
preparation including land clearing, construction, reconstruction,
rehabilitation, improvement, and installation of public improvements;
(b) demolishing, relocating, maintaining, and operating property
pending construction of public improvements; (c) relocating utilities
as a result of public improvements; (d) financing public improvements,
including interest during construction, legal and other professional
services, taxes, insurance, principal and interest costs on general
indebtedness issued to finance public improvements, and any necessary
reserves for general indebtedness; (e) assessments incurred in
revaluing real property for the purpose of determining the tax
allocation base value that are in excess of costs incurred by the
assessor in accordance with the revaluation plan under chapter 84.41
RCW, and the costs of apportioning the taxes and complying with this
chapter and other applicable law; and (f) administrative expenses and
feasibility studies reasonably necessary and related to these costs,
including related costs that may have been incurred before adoption of
the ordinance authorizing the public improvements and the use of
community revitalization financing to fund the costs of the public
improvements.
(((6))) (11) "Regular property taxes" means regular property taxes
as defined in RCW 84.04.140, except: (a) Regular property taxes levied
by port districts or public utility districts specifically for the
purpose of making required payments of principal and interest on
general indebtedness; ((and)) (b) regular property taxes levied by the
state for the support of the common schools under RCW 84.52.065; and
(c) regular property taxes levied under the authority of RCW 84.55.050
that are limited to a specific purpose as provided in RCW
84.55.050(3)(c). Regular property taxes do not include excess property
tax levies that are exempt from the aggregate limits for junior and
senior taxing districts as provided in RCW 84.52.043.
(((7))) (12) "Tax allocation base value" means the ((true and
fair)) assessed value of real property located within an increment area
for taxes ((imposed)) levied in the year in which the increment area is
created for collection in the following year, plus ((twenty-five)) one
hundred percent of any increase in the ((true and fair)) assessed value
of real property located within an increment area that is placed on the
assessment rolls after the increment area is created, less the
increment value.
(((8))) (13) "Tax allocation revenues" means those tax revenues
derived from the ((imposition of)) receipt of excess excise taxes under
section 202 of this act and from regular property taxes levied on the
increment value and distributed to finance public improvements.
(((9) "Increment area" means the geographic area from which taxes
are to be appropriated to finance public improvements authorized under
this chapter.
(10) "Increment value" means seventy-five percent of any increase
in the true and fair value of real property in an increment area that
is placed on the tax rolls after the increment area is created.
(11))) (14) "Taxing authority" means a governmental entity that
imposes a sales or use tax under chapter 82.14 RCW upon the occurrence
of any taxable event within a proposed or approved increment area.
(15) "Taxing district((s))" means a governmental entity that levies
or has levied for it regular property taxes upon real property located
within a proposed or approved increment area.
(((12) "Value of taxable property" means the value of the taxable
property as defined in RCW 39.36.015.))

Sec. 103 RCW 39.89.030 and 2002 c 12 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A local government may finance public improvements using community
revitalization financing subject to the following conditions:
(1) The local government adopts an ordinance designating an
increment area within its boundaries and specifying the public
improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in part with the use
of community revitalization financing. An increment area shall be
geographically restricted to the location of the public improvement and
adjacent locations that the local government finds to have a high
likelihood of receiving direct positive business and economic impacts
due to the public improvement, such as a neighborhood or a block. An
increment area shall not encompass any one political jurisdiction in
its entirety;
(2) The public improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in
part using community revitalization financing are expected to encourage
private development within the increment area and to increase the fair
market value of real property within the increment area;
(3) The local government has entered or expects to enter into a
contract with a private developer relating to the development of
private improvements within the increment area or has received a letter
of intent from a private developer relating to the developer's plans
for the development of private improvements within the increment area;
(4) Private development that is anticipated to occur within the
increment area, as a result of the public improvements, will be
consistent with the countywide planning policy adopted by the county
under RCW 36.70A.210 and the local government's comprehensive plan and
development regulations adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW;
(((4) Taxing districts, in the aggregate, that levy at least
seventy-five percent of the regular property tax within which the
increment area is located approves the community revitalization
financing of the project under RCW 39.89.050(1); and
(5) In an increment area that includes any portion of a fire
protection district as defined in Title 52 RCW, the fire protection
district must agree to participate in the community revitalization
financing of the project under chapter 212, Laws of 2001, for the
project to proceed. Approval by the fire protection district shall be
considered as part of the required participation by taxing districts
under subsection (4) of this section)) (5) The local government may not
use community revitalization financing to finance the costs associated
with the financing, design, acquisition, construction, equipping,
operating, maintaining, remodeling, repairing, and reequipping of
public facilities funded with taxes collected under RCW 82.14.048;
(6) The governing body of the local government must make a finding
that community revitalization financing: (a) Will not be used for the
purpose of relocating a business from outside the increment area, but
within this state, into the increment area; (b) will improve the
viability of existing business entities within the increment area; and
(c) will be used exclusively in areas within the jurisdiction of the
local government deemed in need of economic development and/or
redevelopment, and absent the financing available under this act the
proposed economic development and/or redevelopment would more than
likely not occur;
(7) The governing body of the local government finds that the
public improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in part using
community revitalization financing are reasonably likely to:
(a) Increase private investment within the increment area;
(b) Increase employment within the increment area; and
(c) Generate, over the period of time that the local sales and use
tax will be imposed under section 301 of this act, state and local
property, sales, and use tax revenues that are equal to or greater than
the respective state and local contributions made under this chapter;
(8) The local government obtains written agreement for the use of
community revitalization financing to finance all or a portion of the
costs of the designated public improvements from taxing districts that
in the aggregate levy at least sixty percent of the regular property
taxes on property within the increment area. The agreement must be
authorized by the governing body of taxing districts that in the
aggregate levy at least sixty percent of the regular property taxes on
property within the increment area.
(a) A signed, written agreement from taxing districts that in the
aggregate levy at least sixty percent of the regular property taxes
within the increment area constitutes concurrence by all taxing
districts in the increment area in the public improvements and
participation in the public improvements to the extent of providing
limited funding under community revitalization financing authorized
under this chapter. However, a fire protection district shall not be
deemed to participate in the public improvements unless it has provided
written notice to the local government of its decision to provide
limited funding under community revitalization financing.
(b) For purposes of this subsection (8), "regular property taxes"
means regular property taxes defined in RCW 84.04.140, except: (i)
Regular property taxes levied by the state; and (ii) regular property
taxes levied by a fire protection district if the fire protection
district has not entered into a signed, written agreement with a local
government to provide limited funding under community revitalization
financing as provided in (a) of this subsection.

Sec. 104 RCW 39.89.050 and 2001 c 212 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Before adopting an ordinance creating the increment area, a
local government must:
(((1))) (a) Obtain written agreement for the use of community
revitalization financing to finance all or a portion of the costs of
the designated public improvements from taxing districts ((that, in the
aggregate, levy at least seventy-five percent of the regular property
tax on property within the increment area. A signed, written agreement
from taxing districts that in the aggregate levy at least seventy-five
percent of the regular property tax within the increment area,
constitutes concurrence by all taxing districts in the increment area
in the public improvement and participation in the public improvement
to the extent of providing limited funding under community
revitalization financing authorized under this chapter. The agreement
must be authorized by the governing body of taxing districts that in
the aggregate levy at least seventy-five percent of the regular
property tax on property within the increment area)) as provided in RCW
39.89.030(8); and
(((2))) (b) Hold a public hearing on the proposed financing of the
public improvement in whole or in part with community revitalization
financing.

(i) Notice of the public hearing must be published in a legal
newspaper of general circulation within the proposed increment area at
least ten days before the public hearing and posted in at least six
conspicuous public places located in the proposed increment area.
(ii) Notice must also be sent by United States mail to the property
owners and the business enterprises located within the proposed
increment area at least thirty days prior to the hearing. In
implementing provisions under this act, the local governing body may
also consult with business organizations, including the local chamber
of commerce, and the office of minority and women's business
enterprises to assist with providing appropriate notice to business
enterprises and property owners for whom English is a second language.
(iii) Notices must describe the contemplated public improvements,
estimate the costs of the public improvements, describe the portion of
the costs of the public improvements to be borne by community
revitalization financing, describe any other sources of revenue to
finance the public improvements, describe the boundaries of the
proposed increment area, and estimate the period during which community
revitalization financing is contemplated to be used. The public
hearing may be held by either the governing body of the local
government, or a committee of the governing body that includes at least
a majority of the whole governing body((; and)).
(((3))) (2) In order to create an increment area, a local
government must adopt an ordinance establishing the increment area
that:
(a) Describes the public improvements((,));
(b) Describes the boundaries of the increment area((,));
(c) Estimates the cost of the public improvements and the portion
of these costs to be financed by community revitalization
financing((,));
(d) Estimates the time during which regular property taxes are to
be apportioned((,)) and, if applicable, excess excise taxes are to be
used to finance public improvement costs associated with the public
improvements financed in whole or in part by community revitalization
financing;
(e) Estimates the average amount of tax revenue to be received in
all fiscal years through the imposition of a sales and use tax under
section 301 of this act;
(f) Provides the date when the apportionment of the regular
property taxes and, if applicable, the use of excess excise taxes will
commence((,)); and
(g) Finds that the conditions of RCW 39.89.030 are met.
(3) For purposes of this section, "fiscal year" means the year
beginning July 1st and ending the following June 30th.

Sec. 105 RCW 39.89.060 and 2001 c 212 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
The local government shall:
(1) Publish notice in a legal newspaper of general circulation
within the increment area that describes the public improvement,
describes the boundaries of the increment area, and identifies the
location and times where the ordinance and other public information
concerning the public improvement may be inspected; and
(2) Deliver a certified copy of the ordinance to the county
treasurer, the county assessor, and the governing body of each
participating taxing district within which the increment area is
located.

PART II
COMMUNITY REVITALIZATION FINANCING
USE OF TAX ALLOCATION REVENUES TO PAY THE COSTS OF PUBLIC IMPROVEMENTS
Sec. 201 RCW 39.89.070 and 2001 c 212 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Commencing in the second calendar year following the passage of
the ordinance creating an increment area and authorizing the use of
community revitalization financing, the county treasurer shall
distribute receipts from regular taxes imposed on real property located
in the increment area as follows:
(a) Each participating taxing district and the local government
that created the increment area shall receive that portion of its
regular property taxes produced by the rate of tax levied by or for the
taxing district on the tax allocation base value for that community
revitalization financing project in the taxing district, or upon the
total assessed value of real property in the taxing district, whichever
is smaller; and
(b) The local government that created the increment area shall
receive an additional portion of the regular property taxes levied by
it and by or for each participating taxing district upon the increment
value within the increment area. However, if there is no increment
value, the local government shall not receive any additional regular
property taxes under this subsection (1)(b). The local government that
created the increment area may agree to receive less than the full
amount of ((this)) the additional portion of regular property taxes
under this subsection (1)(b) as long as bond debt service, reserve, and
other bond covenant requirements are satisfied, in which case the
balance of these tax receipts shall be allocated to the participating
taxing districts that ((imposed)) levied regular property taxes, or
have regular property taxes ((imposed)) levied for them, in the
increment area for collection that year in proportion to their regular
tax levy rates for collection that year. The local government may
request that the treasurer transfer this additional portion of the
property taxes to its designated agent. The portion of the tax
receipts distributed to the local government or its agent under this
subsection (1)(b) may only be expended to finance public improvement
costs associated with the public improvements financed in whole or in
part by community revitalization financing.
(2) The county assessor shall allocate ((twenty-five percent of any
increased real property value occurring in the increment area to the
tax allocation base value and seventy-five percent to the increment
value)) any increase in the assessed value of real property occurring
in the increment area to the increment value and tax allocation base
value as appropriate. This section does not authorize revaluations of
real property by the assessor for property taxation that are not made
in accordance with the assessor's revaluation plan under chapter 84.41
RCW or under other authorized revaluation procedures.
(3) The apportionment of increases in assessed valuation in an
increment area, and the associated distribution to the local government
of receipts from regular property taxes that are imposed on the
increment value, must cease when tax allocation revenues are no longer
necessary or obligated to pay the costs of the public improvements.
Any excess tax allocation revenues derived from regular property taxes
and earnings on ((the)) such tax allocation revenues, remaining at the
time the apportionment of tax receipts terminates, must be returned to
the county treasurer and distributed to the participating taxing
districts that imposed regular property taxes, or had regular property
taxes imposed for it, in the increment area for collection that year,
in proportion to the rates of their regular property tax levies for
collection that year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 A new section is added to chapter 39.89
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A local government that creates an increment area and has
received approval from the department under section 303 of this act to
impose the local option sales and use tax authorized in section 301 of
this act may use annually any excess excise taxes received by it from
taxable activity within the increment area to finance public
improvement costs associated with the public improvements financed in
whole or in part by community revitalization financing. The use of
excess excise taxes must cease when tax allocation revenues are no
longer necessary or obligated to pay the costs of the public
improvements. Any participating taxing authority is authorized to
allocate excess excise taxes to the local government as long as the
local government has received approval from the department under
section 303 of this act to impose the local option sales and use tax
authorized in section 301 of this act. The legislature declares that
it is a proper purpose of a local government or participating taxing
authority to allocate excess excise taxes for purposes of financing
public improvements under this chapter.
(2) A local government consisting solely of a port district may use
excess excise taxes as provided in this section only to the extent that
any participating taxing authority allocates excess excise taxes to the
local government.
(3) A local government consisting of a port district and any city,
town, or county may use excess excise taxes as provided in this section
only if:
(a) The city, town, or county realizes excess excise taxes from
taxable activity within the increment area; or
(b) Any participating taxing authority allocates excess excise
taxes to the local government.
(4) A local government shall provide the department accurate
information describing the geographical boundaries of the increment
area at least seventy-five days before the effective date of the
ordinance creating the increment area. The local government shall
ensure that the boundary information provided to the department is kept
current.
(5) The department shall provide each local government that has
provided boundary information to the department as provided in this
section and that has received approval from the department under
section 303 of this act to impose the local option sales and use tax
authorized in section 301 of this act with the necessary information to
calculate excess excise taxes.
(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Base year" means the first calendar year following the
creation of an increment area.
(b) "Excess excise taxes" means the amount of excise taxes received
by the local government during the measurement year from taxable
activity within the increment area over and above the amount of excise
taxes received by the local government during the base year from
taxable activity within the increment area. However, if a local
government creates an increment area and reasonably determines that no
activity subject to tax under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW occurred in
the twelve months immediately preceding the creation of the increment
area within the boundaries of the area that became the increment area,
"excess excise taxes" means the entire amount of excise taxes received
by the local government during a calendar year period beginning with
the calendar year immediately following the creation of the increment
area and continuing with each measurement year thereafter.
(c) "Excise taxes" means local retail sales and use taxes
authorized in RCW 82.14.030.
(d) "Measurement year" means a calendar year, beginning with the
calendar year following the base year and each calendar year
thereafter, that is used annually to measure the amount of excess
excise taxes required to be used to finance public improvement costs
associated with public improvements financed in whole or in part by
community revitalization financing.

PART III
COMMUNITY REVITALIZATION FINANCING--STATE CONTRIBUTION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 A new section is added to chapter 82.14
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A city, town, or county that creates an increment area and
finances public improvements pursuant to chapter 39.89 RCW may impose
a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter and
subject to the criteria set forth in this section. Except as provided
in this section, the tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by
law and shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the
state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any
taxable event within the taxing jurisdiction of the city, town, or
county. The rate of tax shall not exceed the rate provided in RCW
82.08.020(1) in the case of a sales tax or the rate provided in RCW
82.12.020(5) in the case of a use tax, less the aggregate rates of any
other taxes imposed on the same events that are credited against the
state taxes imposed under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW.
(2) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be
deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or
paid over to the department under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The
department shall perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the
city, town, or county at no cost to the city, town, or county.
(3) No tax may be imposed under this section before July 1, 2007.
Before imposing a tax under this section, the city, town, or county
shall first have received tax allocation revenues derived from either
regular property taxes or excess excise taxes, or both, during the
preceding calendar year. The tax imposed under this section shall
expire when the bonds issued under the authority of chapter 39.89 RCW
are retired, but not more than twenty-five years after the tax is first
imposed.
(4) An ordinance adopted by the legislative authority of a city,
town, or county imposing a tax under this section shall provide that:
(a) The tax shall first be imposed on the first day of a fiscal
year.
(b) The amount of tax received by the local government in any
fiscal year shall not exceed the amount of the state contribution;
(c) The tax shall cease to be imposed for the remainder of any
fiscal year in which either:
(i) The amount of tax receipts totals the amount of the state
contribution;
(ii) The amount of tax receipts totals the amount of "local public
sources," as that term is used in section 302 of this act, dedicated in
the previous calendar year to finance public improvements authorized
under chapter 39.89 RCW; or
(iii) The amount of revenue from taxes imposed under this section
by all cities, towns, and counties totals the annual state credit limit
as provided in section 303(3) of this act;
(d) The tax shall be reimposed, should it cease to be imposed for
any of the reasons provided in (c) of this subsection, at the beginning
of the next fiscal year, subject to the restrictions in this section;
and
(e) Any revenue generated by the tax in excess of the amounts
specified in (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection shall belong to the
state of Washington.
(5) If both a county and a city or town impose a tax under this
section, the tax imposed by the city, town, or county shall be credited
as follows:
(a) If the county has created an increment area before the city or
town, the tax imposed by the county shall be credited against the tax
imposed by the city or town, the purpose of such credit is to give
priority to the county tax; and
(b) If the city or town has created an increment area before the
county, the tax imposed by the city or town shall be credited against
the tax imposed by the county, the purpose of such credit is to give
priority to the city or town tax.
(6) The department shall determine the amount of tax receipts
attributable to each city, town, and county imposing a sales and use
tax under this section and shall advise a city, town, or county when it
must cease imposing the tax for the remainder of the fiscal year as
provided in subsection (4)(c) of this section. Determinations by the
department of the amount of taxes attributable to a city, town, or
county are final and shall not be used to challenge the validity of any
tax imposed under this section. The department shall remit any tax
receipts in excess of the amounts specified in subsection (4)(a), (b),
and (c) of this section to the state treasurer who shall deposit the
moneys in the general fund.
(7) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Base year" means the first calendar year following the
creation of an increment area.
(b) "Excess state excise taxes" means the amount of excise taxes
received by the state during the measurement year from taxable activity
within the increment area over and above the amount of excise taxes
received by the state during the base year from taxable activity within
the increment area. However, if a local government creates an
increment area and reasonably determines that no activity subject to
tax under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW occurred in the twelve months
immediately preceding the creation of the increment area within the
boundaries of the area that became the increment area, "excess state
excise taxes" means the entire amount of excise taxes received by the
state during a calendar year period beginning with the calendar year
immediately following the creation of the increment area and continuing
with each measurement year thereafter.
(c) "Excise taxes" means the state retail sales and use taxes
imposed under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW.
(d) "Fiscal year" has the same meaning as in RCW 39.89.050(3).
(e) "Increment area" has the same meaning as in RCW 39.89.020.
(f) "Measurement year" means a calendar year, beginning with the
calendar year following the base year and each calendar year
thereafter, that is used annually to measure the amount of excess
excise taxes required to be used to finance public improvement costs
associated with public improvements financed in whole or in part by
community revitalization financing.
(g) "State contribution" means the lesser of one million dollars or
an amount equal to:
(i) State property tax allocation revenues received by the state
during the preceding calendar year; and
(ii) Excess state excise taxes received by the state during the
preceding calendar year.
(h) "State property tax allocation revenues" means those tax
revenues derived from the imposition of property taxes levied by the
state for the support of common schools under RCW 84.52.065 on the
increment value as defined in RCW 39.89.020.
(i) "Tax allocation revenues" has the same meaning as in RCW
39.89.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 A new section is added to chapter 82.14
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Moneys collected from the taxes imposed under section 301 of
this act shall be used only for the purpose of principal and interest
payments on bonds issued under the authority of RCW 39.89.080 and must
be matched with an amount from local public sources dedicated through
December 31st of the previous calendar year to finance public
improvements authorized under chapter 39.89 RCW. Such local public
sources include but are not limited to private monetary contributions
and tax allocation revenues. Local public sources are dedicated to
finance public improvements if they are actually expended to pay public
improvement costs or are required by law or an agreement to be used
exclusively to pay public improvement costs.
(2) A local government shall inform the department by the first day
of March of the amount of:
(a) Local public sources dedicated in the preceding calendar year
to finance public improvements authorized under chapter 39.89 RCW; and
(b) Tax allocation revenues derived in the preceding calendar year
from the imposition of regular property taxes on the increment value
and distributed to finance public improvements. Upon request of a
local government, the county assessor shall assist the local government
in determining the amount of tax allocation revenues derived in the
preceding calendar year and distributed to finance public improvements.
(3) If a local government fails to comply with subsection (2) of
this section, no tax may be imposed under section 301 of this act in
the subsequent fiscal year.
(4) A local government shall provide a report to the department by
March 1st of each year. The report shall contain the following
information:
(a) The amount of tax allocation revenues, taxes under section 301
of this act, and local public sources received by the local government
during the preceding calendar year, and a summary of how these revenues
were expended;
(b) The names of any businesses locating within the increment area
as a result of the public improvements undertaken by the local
government and financed in whole or in part with community
revitalization financing;
(c) The total number of permanent jobs created as a result of the
public improvements undertaken by the local government and financed in
whole or in part with community revitalization financing;
(d) The average wages and benefits received by all employees of
businesses locating within the increment area as a result of the public
improvements undertaken by the local government and financed in whole
or in part with community revitalization financing; and
(e) That the local government is in compliance with RCW
39.89.030(6)(c).
(5) The department shall make a report available to the public and
the legislature by June 1st of each year. The report shall include a
list of public improvements undertaken by local governments and
financed in whole or in part with community revitalization financing,
and it shall also include a summary of the information provided to the
department by local governments under subsection (4) of this section.
(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Public improvement costs" has the same meaning as in RCW
39.89.020.
(b) "Tax allocation revenues" has the same meaning as in RCW
39.89.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) As a condition to imposing a sales and use tax under section
301 of this act, a city, town, or county must apply to the department
at least seventy-five days before the effective date of any such tax.
The application shall be in a form and manner prescribed by the
department and shall include but is not limited to information
establishing that the applicant is eligible to impose such a tax, the
anticipated effective date for imposing the tax, the estimated number
of years that the tax will be imposed, and the estimated amount of tax
revenue to be received in each fiscal year that the tax will be
imposed. For purposes of this section, "fiscal year" means the year
beginning July 1st and ending the following June 30th. The department
shall make available forms to be used for this purpose. As part of the
application, a city, town, or county must provide to the department a
copy of the ordinance creating the increment area as required in RCW
39.89.050. The department shall rule on completed applications within
sixty days of receipt. The department may begin accepting and
approving applications August 1, 2005. No new applications shall be
considered by the department after the thirtieth day of September of
the third year following the year in which the first application was
received by the department.
(2) The authority to impose the local option sales and use taxes
under section 301 of this act is on a first-come basis. Priority for
collecting the taxes authorized under section 301 of this act among
approved applicants shall be based on the date that the approved
application was received by the department. As a part of the approval
of applications under this section, the department shall approve the
amount of tax under section 301 of this act that an applicant may
impose. The amount of tax approved by the department shall not exceed
the lesser of five million dollars or the average amount of tax revenue
that the applicant estimates that it will receive in all fiscal years
through the imposition of a sales and use tax under section 301 of this
act. A city, town, or county shall not receive, in any fiscal year,
more revenues from taxes imposed under section 301 of this act than the
amount approved by the department. The department shall not approve
the receipt of more credit against the state sales and use tax than is
authorized under subsection (3) of this section.
(3) The amount of credit against the state sales and use tax is
limited as follows:
(a) Except as provided in this subsection (3), no more than twenty
million dollars of credit against the state sales and use tax may be
received by all cities, towns, and counties imposing a tax under
section 301 of this act.
(b) During the fiscal years beginning July 1, 2008, through June
30, 2011, and for each subsequent fiscal year, the total amount of
credit against the state sales and use tax that may be received by all
cities, towns, and counties imposing a tax under section 301 of this
act shall be increased as follows:
(i) In the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2008, the limit in (a) of
this subsection shall be increased by the same percentage as the
percentage increase in the assessed value of all taxable property
within this state from calendar year 2005 through calendar year 2006,
as determined by the department;
(ii) In the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2009, the limit in (a) of
this subsection shall be increased by the same percentage as the
percentage increase in the assessed value of all taxable property
within this state from calendar year 2005 through calendar year 2007,
as determined by the department;
(iii) In the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2010, and for each
subsequent fiscal year, the limit in (a) of this subsection shall be
increased by the same percentage as the percentage increase in the
assessed value of all taxable property within this state from calendar
year 2005 through calendar year 2008, as determined by the department.
(4) The credit against the state sales and use tax shall be
available to any city, town, or county imposing a tax under section 301
of this act only as long as the city, town, or county has outstanding
indebtedness under RCW 39.89.080.
(5) The department may adopt any rules under chapter 34.05 RCW it
considers necessary for the administration of sections 202 through 303
of this act.

PART IV
BOND AUTHORIZATION
Sec. 401 RCW 39.89.080 and 2001 c 212 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A local government designating an increment area and
authorizing the use of community revitalization financing may incur
general indebtedness, and issue general obligation bonds, to finance
the public improvements and retire the indebtedness in whole or in part
from tax allocation revenues it receives, subject to the following
requirements:
(a) The ordinance adopted by the local government creating the
increment area and authorizing the use of community revitalization
financing indicates an intent to incur this indebtedness and the
maximum amount of this indebtedness that is contemplated; and
(b) The local government includes this statement of the intent in
all notices required by RCW 39.89.050.
(2) The general indebtedness incurred under subsection (1) of this
section may be payable from other tax revenues, the full faith and
credit of the local government, and nontax income, revenues, fees, and
rents from the public improvements, as well as contributions, grants,
and nontax money available to the local government for payment of costs
of the public improvements or associated debt service on the general
indebtedness.
(3) In addition to the requirements in subsection (1) of this
section, a local government designating an increment area and
authorizing the use of community revitalization financing may require
the nonpublic participant to provide adequate security to protect the
public investment in the public improvement within the increment area.
(4) Bonds issued under this section shall be authorized by
ordinance of the local governing body and may be issued in one or more
series and shall bear such date or dates, be payable upon demand or
mature at such time or times, bear interest at such rate or rates, be
in such denomination or denominations, be in such form either coupon or
registered as provided in RCW 39.46.030, carry such conversion or
registration privileges, have such rank or priority, be executed in
such manner, be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or
places, and be subject to such terms of redemption with or without
premium, be secured in such manner, and have such other
characteristics, as may be provided by such ordinance or trust
indenture or mortgage issued pursuant thereto.
(5) The local government may annually pay into a fund to be
established for the benefit of bonds issued under this section a fixed
proportion or a fixed amount of any tax allocation revenues derived
from property or business activity within the increment area containing
the public improvements funded by the bonds, such payment to continue
until all bonds payable from the fund are paid in full. The local
government may also annually pay into the fund established in this
section a fixed proportion or a fixed amount of any revenues derived
from taxes imposed under section 301 of this act, such payment to
continue until all bonds payable from the fund are paid in full.
Revenues derived from taxes imposed under section 301 of this act are
subject to the use restriction in section 302 of this act.
(6) In case any of the public officials of the local government
whose signatures appear on any bonds or any coupons issued under this
chapter shall cease to be such officials before the delivery of such
bonds, such signatures shall, nevertheless, be valid and sufficient for
all purposes, the same as if such officials had remained in office
until such delivery. Any provision of any law to the contrary
notwithstanding, any bonds issued under this chapter are fully
negotiable.
(7) Notwithstanding subsections (4) through (6) of this section,
bonds issued under this section may be issued and sold in accordance
with chapter 39.46 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 A new section is added to chapter 39.89
RCW to read as follows:
A local government that issues bonds under RCW 39.89.080 to finance
public improvements may pledge for the payment of such bonds all or
part of any tax allocation revenues derived from the public
improvements. The local government may also pledge all or part of any
revenues derived from taxes imposed under section 301 of this act and
held in connection with the public improvements. All of such tax
revenues are subject to the use restriction in section 302 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 A new section is added to chapter 39.89
RCW to read as follows:
The bonds issued by a local government under RCW 39.89.080 to
finance public improvements shall not constitute an obligation of the
state of Washington, either general or special.

PART V
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 Part headings used in this act do not
constitute any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 Nothing in this act shall be construed to
give port districts the authority to impose a sales or use tax under
chapter 82.14 RCW.

--- END ---