BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Disclosable information" means public information that (a) is
not exempt from disclosure under chapter 42.17 RCW; and (b) does not
pertain to an ongoing investigation.
(2) "Fraud" means acts and practices of fraud in programs
administered by a government entity, including criminal or
administrative misconduct by staff, clients, or vendors.
(3) "Fraud unit" means a fraud or investigation unit, division, or
service created within the employment security department, the
department of labor and industries, and except for the medicaid fraud
unit, the department of social and health services, to review state
programs and activities.
(4) "Government entity" means a state agency, department, office,
officer, board commission, bureau, division, institution, or
institution of higher education. This includes individual state
agencies and programs, as well as those programs and activities that
cross agency lines. State government includes all elective offices in
the executive branch of government.
(5) "Office" means the office of inspector general.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The office of inspector general is created
within the office of the governor in order to create an independent
unit to:
(1) Conduct and supervise investigations relating to allegations of
fraud; and
(2) Inform the governor and the legislature about vulnerabilities
and deficiencies relating to the detection and prevention of fraud as
may be discovered as a result of completed investigations conducted or
coordinated by the office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The inspector general is the head of the
office and is appointed by the governor on the basis of integrity and
demonstrated ability in law enforcement management, public
administration, and investigations. The appointment of the inspector
general is subject to the confirmation of the senate. The inspector
general shall report directly to the governor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The inspector general shall:
(a) Conduct, supervise, and coordinate fraud investigations and
provide policy direction as it relates to program integrity and fraud;
(b) Review proposed legislation and rules relating to the detection
and prevention of fraud in programs reviewed by fraud units, and make
recommendations for improvement;
(c) Recommend policies for, and conduct, supervise, and coordinate,
relationships between fraud units and federal, state, and local
governmental agencies, and nongovernmental entities, with respect to:
(i) Matters relating to the prevention and detection of fraud in
programs and operations reviewed by fraud units; or
(ii) The identification and prosecution of participants in the
fraud; and
(d) Provide reports to the governor and the legislature in
accordance with section 6 of this act, concerning the detection and
prevention of fraud, and to make recommendations for improvement of the
activities.
(2) In carrying out the duties and responsibilities established in
this chapter, the inspector general must refer all investigations in
which the inspector general has found substantial evidence supporting
a finding of a violation of federal or state criminal law to the
appropriate prosecuting authority for possible criminal prosecution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The office of inspector general has the
authority to apply for and execute all warrants and serve process of
law issued by the courts in enforcing the provisions of this chapter.
(2) The office of the inspector general has the full authority to
administer oaths and take testimony thereunder, to issue subpoenas
requiring the attendance of witnesses before the office, together with
all books, memoranda, papers, and other documents, articles, or
instruments, and to compel the disclosure by such witnesses of all
facts known to them relative to the matters under investigation.
(3) Subpoenas issued in adjudicative proceedings are governed by
RCW 34.05.588(1).
(4) Subpoenas issued in the conduct of investigations required or
authorized by other statutory provisions or necessary in the
enforcement of other statutory provisions are governed by RCW
34.05.588(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The inspector general must submit a
report summarizing the activities of the office to the appropriate
committees of the senate and house of representatives by November 30,
2005, by November 30, 2006, and by November of every even-numbered year
thereafter. The report shall contain only disclosable information,
including:
(a) A description of significant fraud, and of vulnerabilities or
deficiencies relating to the prevention and detection of fraud,
discovered as a result of investigations completed during the reporting
period;
(b) A description of corrective action taken by government entities
regarding fraud discovered as a result of investigations conducted by
the office;
(c) Recommendations for improving the activities of the office with
respect to the vulnerabilities or deficiencies identified under (a) of
this subsection;
(d) An identification of each significant recommendation described
in the previous reports on which corrective action has or has not been
completed; and
(e) A summary of matters referred to prosecution authorities during
the reporting period and the charges filed and convictions entered
during the reporting period that have resulted from referrals by the
office.
(2) The inspector general must forward a draft of the report to any
government entity identified in the report not less than twenty days
before the date that the report is to be issued.
(3) The governor must make copies of the report available to the
public upon request and at a reasonable cost at the same time the
report of the inspector general is provided to legislative committees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 In carrying out the provisions of this
chapter, the inspector general may:
(1) Request information or assistance as is necessary for carrying
out the duties and responsibilities in this chapter from a federal,
state, or local governmental agency or unit of a governmental agency;
(2) Issue subpoenas for witnesses, documents, information, and
other data necessary in the furtherance of an investigation conducted
by the office. Before issuing subpoenas to a government entity, the
inspector general must make a reasonable request to the government
entity for documents and information in possession of the government
entity;
(3) Administer oaths and take testimony, when appropriate in the
performance of the duties and responsibilities in this chapter, unless
otherwise prohibited by law;
(4) To the extent and in the amount as may be provided by
appropriation, select, appoint, and employ personnel as may be
necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter;
(5) To the extent and in the amount as may be provided by
appropriation, enter into contracts and other arrangements for audits,
studies, analyses, and other services with public agencies and with
private persons, and make the payments necessary to carry out the
provisions of this chapter, subject to compliance with civil service
laws, collective bargaining agreements, and other applicable law; and
(6) To the extent and in the amount as may be provided by
appropriation, purchase or lease facilities, equipment, and supplies
necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) In carrying out the provisions of this
chapter, the inspector general shall have prompt access to all
individuals, records, electronic data, reports, audits, reviews,
documents, and other materials available to a government entity that
relate to operations of the office that is not otherwise prohibited
from disclosure to the inspector general.
(2) Whenever information or assistance requested under subsection
(1) of this section is, in the judgment of the inspector general,
unreasonably refused or not provided, the inspector general must report
the circumstances to the governor immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) All powers, duties, and functions of the
fraud units are transferred to the office of the inspector general.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the fraud units
pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be
delivered to the custody of the office of the inspector general. All
cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other
tangible property employed by the fraud units in carrying out the
powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be made available to
the office of the inspector general. All funds, credits, or other
assets held in connection with the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be assigned to the office of the inspector general.
(b) Any appropriations made to the fraud units for carrying out the
powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on the effective date
of this section, be transferred and credited to the office of the
inspector general.
(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any
personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment,
or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers
and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the
director of financial management shall make a determination as to the
proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the fraud units engaged in performing the
powers, functions, and duties transferred are transferred to the
jurisdiction of the office of the inspector general, however they may
remain physically located within the department from which they were
transferred. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the
state civil service law, are assigned to the office of the inspector
general to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly,
without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be
appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing
state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the fraud units
pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be
continued and acted upon by the office of the inspector general. All
existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall
be performed by the office of the inspector general.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the fraud units shall not affect the validity of any act performed
before the effective date of this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the personnel
resources board as provided by law.

Sec. 10 RCW 49.60.210 and 1992 c 118 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is an unfair practice for any employer, employment agency,
labor union, or other person to discharge, expel, or otherwise
discriminate against any person because he or she has opposed any
practices forbidden by this chapter, or because he or she has filed a
charge, testified, or assisted in any proceeding under this chapter.
(2) It is an unfair practice for a government agency or government
manager or supervisor to retaliate against a whistleblower as defined
in chapter 42.40 RCW.
(3) It is an unfair practice for any employer, employment agency,
labor union, government agency, government manager, or government
supervisor to discharge, expel, discriminate, or otherwise retaliate
against an individual assisting with an office of inspector general
investigation under chapter 43.-- RCW (sections 1 through 9 of this
act), unless the individual has made willful disregard for the truth.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---