BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.28.010 and 2004 c 65 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever any accident occurs to any worker it shall be the duty
of such worker or someone in his or her behalf to forthwith report such
accident to his or her employer, superintendent, or supervisor in
charge of the work, and of the employer to at once report such accident
and the injury resulting therefrom to the department pursuant to RCW
51.28.025 where the worker has received treatment from a physician or
a licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner, has been
hospitalized, disabled from work, or has died as the apparent result of
such accident and injury.
(2) Upon receipt of such notice of accident, the department shall
immediately forward to the worker or his or her beneficiaries or
dependents notification, in nontechnical language, of their rights
under this title. The notice must specify the worker's right to
receive health services from a physician or a licensed advanced
registered nurse practitioner of the worker's choice under RCW
51.36.010, including chiropractic services under RCW 51.36.015, and
must list the types of providers authorized to provide these services.
(3) The director may impose a fine of up to fifty dollars on a
worker who fails to report an accident under subsection (1) of this
section. Fines collected under this subsection must be deposited into
the supplemental pension fund.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.28.010 and 2001 c 231 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever any accident occurs to any worker it shall be the duty
of such worker or someone in his or her behalf to forthwith report such
accident to his or her employer, superintendent, or supervisor in
charge of the work, and of the employer to at once report such accident
and the injury resulting therefrom to the department pursuant to RCW
51.28.025 where the worker has received treatment from a physician, has
been hospitalized, disabled from work, or has died as the apparent
result of such accident and injury.
(2) Upon receipt of such notice of accident, the department shall
immediately forward to the worker or his or her beneficiaries or
dependents notification, in nontechnical language, of their rights
under this title. The notice must specify the worker's right to
receive health services from a physician of the worker's choice under
RCW 51.36.010, including chiropractic services under RCW 51.36.015, and
must list the types of providers authorized to provide these services.
(3) The director may impose a fine of up to fifty dollars on a
worker who fails to report an accident under subsection (1) of this
section. Fines collected under this subsection must be deposited into
the supplemental pension fund.

Sec. 3 RCW 51.28.020 and 2004 c 65 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Where a worker is entitled to compensation under this title
he or she shall file with the department or his or her self-insured
employer, as the case may be, his or her application for such, together
with the certificate of the physician or licensed advanced registered
nurse practitioner who attended him or her. An application form
developed by the department shall include a notice specifying the
worker's right to receive health services from a physician or licensed
advanced registered nurse practitioner of the worker's choice under RCW
51.36.010, including chiropractic services under RCW 51.36.015, and
listing the types of providers authorized to provide these services.
(b) The physician or licensed advanced registered nurse
practitioner who attended the injured worker shall inform the injured
worker of his or her rights under this title and lend all necessary
assistance in making this application for compensation and such proof
of other matters as required by the rules of the department without
charge to the worker. The department shall provide physicians with a
manual which outlines the procedures to be followed in applications for
compensation involving occupational diseases, and which describes
claimants' rights and responsibilities related to occupational disease
claims.
(c) The worker must inform the physician or licensed advanced
registered nurse practitioner of his or her employer.
(d) As part of the process of informing the injured worker of his
or her rights, the physician must inform the injured worker that he or
she must report the accident to the employer. The physician will make
a reasonable attempt to contact the employer and notify the worker that
the claim may be delayed if the employer is not notified.
(2) If application for compensation is made to a self-insured
employer, he or she shall forthwith send a copy of the application to
the department.

Sec. 4 RCW 51.28.020 and 2001 c 231 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Where a worker is entitled to compensation under this title
he or she shall file with the department or his or her self-insured
employer, as the case may be, his or her application for such, together
with the certificate of the physician who attended him or her. An
application form developed by the department shall include a notice
specifying the worker's right to receive health services from a
physician of the worker's choice under RCW 51.36.010, including
chiropractic services under RCW 51.36.015, and listing the types of
providers authorized to provide these services.
(b) The physician who attended the injured worker shall inform the
injured worker of his or her rights under this title and lend all
necessary assistance in making this application for compensation and
such proof of other matters as required by the rules of the department
without charge to the worker. The department shall provide physicians
with a manual which outlines the procedures to be followed in
applications for compensation involving occupational diseases, and
which describes claimants' rights and responsibilities related to
occupational disease claims.
(c) The worker must inform the physician or licensed advanced
registered nurse practitioner of his or her employer.
(d) As part of the process of informing the injured worker of his
or her rights, the physician must inform the injured worker that he or
she must report the accident to the employer. The physician will make
a reasonable attempt to contact the employer and notify the worker that
the claim may be delayed if the employer is not notified.
(2) If application for compensation is made to a self-insured
employer, he or she shall forthwith send a copy of the application to
the department.

Sec. 5 RCW 51.28.025 and 2004 c 65 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever an employer has notice or knowledge of an injury or
occupational disease sustained by any worker in his or her employment
who has received treatment from a physician or a licensed advanced
registered nurse practitioner, has been hospitalized, disabled from
work or has died as the apparent result of such injury or occupational
disease, the employer shall immediately report the same to the
department on forms prescribed by it. The report shall include:
(a) The name, address, and business of the employer;
(b) The name, address, and occupation of the worker;
(c) The date, time, cause, and nature of the injury or occupational
disease;
(d) Whether the injury or occupational disease arose in the course
of the injured worker's employment;
(e) All available information pertaining to the nature of the
injury or occupational disease including but not limited to any visible
signs, any complaints of the worker, any time lost from work, and the
observable effect on the worker's bodily functions, so far as is known;
and
(f) Such other pertinent information as the department may
prescribe by regulation.
(2) Failure or refusal to file the report required by subsection
(1) shall subject the offending employer to a penalty determined by the
director but not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars for each offense,
to be collected in a civil action in the name of the department and
paid into the supplemental pension fund.
(3) The department will not make a determination on the validity of
a state fund claim until the worker, employer, and treatment provider
have had a reasonable opportunity to submit a completed accident
report.

Sec. 6 RCW 51.28.025 and 1987 c 185 s 32 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever an employer has notice or knowledge of an injury or
occupational disease sustained by any worker in his or her employment
who has received treatment from a physician, has been hospitalized,
disabled from work or has died as the apparent result of such injury or
occupational disease, the employer shall immediately report the same to
the department on forms prescribed by it. The report shall include:
(a) The name, address, and business of the employer;
(b) The name, address, and occupation of the worker;
(c) The date, time, cause, and nature of the injury or occupational
disease;
(d) Whether the injury or occupational disease arose in the course
of the injured worker's employment;
(e) All available information pertaining to the nature of the
injury or occupational disease including but not limited to any visible
signs, any complaints of the worker, any time lost from work, and the
observable effect on the worker's bodily functions, so far as is known;
and
(f) Such other pertinent information as the department may
prescribe by regulation.
(2) Failure or refusal to file the report required by subsection
(1) shall subject the offending employer to a penalty determined by the
director but not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars for each offense,
to be collected in a civil action in the name of the department and
paid into the supplemental pension fund.
(3) The department will not make a determination on the validity of
a state fund claim until the worker, employer, and treatment provider
have had a reasonable opportunity to submit a completed accident
report.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1, 3, and 5 of this act expire June
30, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 2, 4, and 6 of this act take effect
June 30, 2007.

--- END ---