BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.04.311 and 2004 c 271 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
Nominating primaries for general elections to be held in November,
and the election of precinct committee officers, must be held on the
third Tuesday of the preceding ((September)) May or on the seventh
Tuesday immediately preceding such general election, whichever occurs
first.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.24.040 and 2003 c 111 s 604 are each amended to
read as follows:
A candidate may file his or her declaration of candidacy for an
office by electronic means on a system specifically designed and
authorized by a filing officer to accept filings.
(1) Filings that are received electronically must capture all
information specified in RCW ((29A.24.030)) 29A.24.031 (1) through (4).
(2) Electronic filing may begin at 9:00 a.m. the fourth Monday in
((July)) March and continue through 4:00 p.m. the following Friday.
(3) In case of special filing periods established in this chapter,
electronic filings may be accepted beginning at 9:00 a.m. on the first
day of the special filing period through 4:00 p.m. the last day of the
special filing period.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.24.050 and 2003 c 111 s 605 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except where otherwise provided by this title, declarations of
candidacy for the following offices shall be filed during regular
business hours with the filing officer no earlier than the fourth
Monday in ((July)) March and no later than the following Friday in the
year in which the office is scheduled to be voted upon:
(1) Offices that are scheduled to be voted upon for full terms or
both full terms and short terms at, or in conjunction with, a state
general election; and
(2) Offices where a vacancy, other than a short term, exists that
has not been filled by election and for which an election to fill the
vacancy is required in conjunction with the next state general
election.
This section supersedes all other statutes that provide for a
different filing period for these offices.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.52.011 and 2004 c 271 s 172 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever it shall be necessary to hold a special election in an
odd-numbered year to fill an unexpired term of any office which is
scheduled to be voted upon for a full term in an even-numbered year, no
((September)) primary election shall be held in the odd-numbered year
if, after the last day allowed for candidates to withdraw, either of
the following circumstances exist:
(1) No more than one candidate of each qualified political party
has filed a declaration of candidacy for the same partisan office to be
filled; or
(2) No more than two candidates have filed a declaration of
candidacy for a single nonpartisan office to be filled.
In either event, the officer with whom the declarations of
candidacy were filed shall immediately notify all candidates concerned
and the names of the candidates that would have been printed upon the
((September)) primary ballot, but for the provisions of this section,
shall be printed as nominees for the positions sought upon the November
general election ballot.

Sec. 5 RCW 42.17.080 and 2002 c 75 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) On the day the treasurer is designated, each candidate or
political committee shall file with the commission and the county
auditor or elections officer of the county in which the candidate
resides, or in the case of a political committee, the county in which
the treasurer resides, in addition to any statement of organization
required under RCW 42.17.040 or 42.17.050, a report of all
contributions received and expenditures made prior to that date, if
any.
(2) At the following intervals each treasurer shall file with the
commission and the county auditor or elections officer of the county in
which the candidate resides, or in the case of a political committee,
the county in which the committee maintains its office or headquarters,
and if there is no office or headquarters then in the county in which
the treasurer resides, a report containing the information required by
RCW 42.17.090:
(a) On the twenty-first day and the seventh day immediately
preceding the date on which the election is held; and
(b) On the tenth day of the first month after the election((:
PROVIDED, That this report shall not be required following a primary
election from:
(i) A candidate whose name will appear on the subsequent general
election ballot; or
(ii) Any continuing political committee)); and
(c) On the tenth day of each month in which no other reports are
required to be filed under this section: PROVIDED, That such report
shall only be filed if the committee has received a contribution or
made an expenditure in the preceding calendar month and either the
total contributions received or total expenditures made since the last
such report exceed two hundred dollars.
When there is no outstanding debt or obligation, and the campaign
fund is closed, and the campaign is concluded in all respects, and in
the case of a political committee, the committee has ceased to function
and has dissolved, the treasurer shall file a final report. Upon
submitting a final report, the duties of the treasurer shall cease and
there shall be no obligation to make any further reports.
The report filed twenty-one days before the election shall report
all contributions received and expenditures made as of the end of the
fifth business day before the date of the report. The report filed
seven days before the election shall report all contributions received
and expenditures made as of the end of the one business day before the
date of the report. Reports filed on the tenth day of the month shall
report all contributions received and expenditures made from the
closing date of the last report filed through the last day of the month
preceding the date of the current report.
(3) For the period beginning the first day of the fourth month
preceding the date on which the special or general election is held and
ending on the date of that election, each Monday the treasurer shall
file with the commission and the appropriate county elections officer
a report of each bank deposit made during the previous seven calendar
days. The report shall contain the name of each person contributing
the funds so deposited and the amount contributed by each person.
However, contributions of no more than twenty-five dollars in the
aggregate from any one person may be deposited without identifying the
contributor. A copy of the report shall be retained by the treasurer
for his or her records. In the event of deposits made by a deputy
treasurer, the copy shall be forwarded to the treasurer for his or her
records. Each report shall be certified as correct by the treasurer or
deputy treasurer making the deposit.
(4) If a city requires that candidates or committees for city
offices file reports with a city agency, the candidate or treasurer so
filing need not also file the report with the county auditor or
elections officer.
(5) The treasurer or candidate shall maintain books of account
accurately reflecting all contributions and expenditures on a current
basis within five business days of receipt or expenditure. During the
eight days immediately preceding the date of the election the books of
account shall be kept current within one business day. As specified in
the committee's statement of organization filed under RCW 42.17.040,
the books of account must be open for public inspection as follows:
(a) For at least two consecutive hours between 8:00 a.m. and 8:00
p.m. on the eighth day immediately before the election, except when it
is a legal holiday, in which case on the seventh day immediately before
the election, at the principal headquarters or, if there is no
headquarters, at the address of the treasurer or such other place as
may be authorized by the commission; and
(b) By appointment for inspections to be conducted at the
designated place for inspections between 8:00 a.m. and 8:00 p.m. on any
other day from the seventh day through the day immediately before the
election, other than Saturday, Sunday, or a legal holiday. It is a
violation of this chapter for a candidate or political committee to
refuse to allow and keep an appointment for an inspection to be
conducted during these authorized times and days in the week prior to
the election. The appointment must be allowed at an authorized time
and day for such inspections that is within twenty-four hours of the
time and day that is requested for the inspection.
(6) The treasurer or candidate shall preserve books of account,
bills, receipts, and all other financial records of the campaign or
political committee for not less than five calendar years following the
year during which the transaction occurred.
(7) All reports filed pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this
section shall be certified as correct by the candidate and the
treasurer.
(8) Copies of all reports filed pursuant to this section shall be
readily available for public inspection for at least two consecutive
hours Monday through Friday, excluding legal holidays, between 8:00
a.m. and 8:00 p.m., as specified in the committee's statement of
organization filed pursuant to RCW 42.17.040, at the principal
headquarters or, if there is no headquarters, at the address of the
treasurer or such other place as may be authorized by the commission.
(9) After January 1, 2002, a report that is filed with the
commission electronically need not also be filed with the county
auditor or elections officer.
(10) The commission shall adopt administrative rules establishing
requirements for filer participation in any system designed and
implemented by the commission for the electronic filing of reports.

Sec. 6 RCW 42.17.710 and 2003 c 164 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((During the period beginning on the thirtieth day before the
date a regular legislative session convenes and continuing thirty days
past the date of final adjournment, and during the period beginning on
the date a special legislative session convenes and continuing through
the date that session adjourns,)) No state official or a person
employed by or acting on behalf of a state official or state legislator
may solicit or accept contributions to a public office fund, to a
candidate or authorized committee, or to retire a campaign debt during
the following periods:
(a) Beginning December 24th before a legislative session convenes
in an even-numbered year and continuing through the date of adjournment
of that session; and
(b) Beginning December 24th before a legislative session convenes
in an odd-numbered year in which a special election shall occur and
continuing through the sixtieth day of that session.
(2) This section does not apply to activities authorized in RCW
43.07.370.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 RCW 29A.04.158 (September primary) and 2004
c 271 s 187 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act takes effect January 1, 2006.

--- END ---