BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.82.300 and 2002 c 258 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
This section applies to all cities and counties.
(1) Joint housing authorities are hereby authorized when the
legislative authorities of one or more counties and the legislative
authorities of any city or cities within any of those counties or in
another county or counties have authorized such joint housing authority
by ordinance.
(2) The ordinances enacted by the legislative authorities creating
the joint housing authority shall prescribe the number of
commissioners, the method for their appointment and length of their
terms, the election of officers, and the method for removal of
commissioners.
(3) The ordinances enacted by the legislative authorities creating
the joint housing authority shall prescribe the allocation of all costs
of the joint housing authority and any other matters necessary for the
operation of the joint housing authority.
(4) A joint housing authority shall have all the powers as
prescribed by this chapter for any housing authority. The area of
operation of a joint housing authority shall be the combined areas,
defined by RCW 35.82.020(6), of the housing authorities created in each
city and county authorizing the joint housing authority.
(5) The provisions of RCW 35.82.040 and 35.82.060 shall not apply
to a joint housing authority created pursuant to this section.
(6) The ordinances enacted by the legislative authorities creating
the joint housing authority shall prescribe the procedure for
dissolution or deactivation of a joint housing authority and any other
matters necessary to effectuate the dissolution or deactivation of a
joint housing authority, including distribution of the assets,
liabilities, and obligations of a joint housing authority to the
original activating governing bodies for the limited purposes of
winding up the affairs of a deactivated joint housing authority or
transferring assets, obligations, or liabilities to the housing
authority of a city, town, or county.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.82.320 and 1987 c 275 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A housing authority or joint housing authority created under this
chapter and activated by a resolution or ordinance by the governing
body of a city, town, or county may be deactivated by a resolution or
ordinance by ((the)) any city, town, or county that created the housing
authority or joint housing authority. The findings listed in RCW
35.82.030 to activate the housing authority or joint housing authority
shall be considered prior to deactivating the housing authority.
However, a city, town, or county is authorized to deactivate a joint
housing authority based on additional considerations of the local needs
of the city, town, or county. For the ((sole)) limited purposes of
winding up the affairs of a deactivated housing authority or
transferring the assets, liabilities, and obligations of a joint
housing authority to the housing authority of a city, town, or county,
the governing body of ((the)) a city, town, or county may exercise any
power granted to a housing authority under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35.82 RCW
to read as follows:
A city, town, or county must include in any ordinance or resolution
authorizing a deactivation under the terms of RCW 35.82.320 adequate
provisions to assure the payment of financial obligations incurred by
the housing authority or joint housing authority and existing and in
good standing at the time of passage of the ordinance or resolution.

--- END ---