BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In 2001, the legislature enacted Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5372, which authorized the governor to enter
into cigarette contracts with fourteen Indian tribes. In subsequent
sessions, the legislature increased to twenty-one the number of tribes
with whom the governor may negotiate under the terms of RCW 43.06.460.
The legislature finds that this effort has been effective, as measured
by the success of the existing agreements.
The legislature further finds the agreements resolved decades of
conflict between the state and tribes over the sale of contraband
cigarettes to non-Indians; benefited the tribes through tribal tax
revenues; benefited the state because cigarettes are stamped and taxed;
enhanced public health because access to low-priced cigarettes is
reduced; improved law and order; and reduced the competitive advantage
gained through the sale of tax-free cigarettes.
The 2001 legislation and its later amendments did not encompass the
Puyallup Tribe of Indians within its scope due to the very different
nature of the cigarette trade on the Puyallup Indian reservation. The
legislature therefore intends to address the special circumstances on
the Puyallup Indian reservation by recognizing the substantial
distinctions and enacting legislation authorizing a cigarette tax
agreement with the tribe that differs from the contracts entered into
under RCW 43.06.460. Section 2 of this act provides the governor
authority to enter into an agreement and sets forth the general
framework for the agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.06 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The governor may enter into a cigarette tax agreement with the
Puyallup Tribe of Indians concerning the sale of cigarettes, subject to
the limitations in this section. The legislature intends to address
the uniqueness of the Puyallup Indian reservation and its selling
environment through pricing and compliance strategies, rather than
through the imposition of equivalent taxes. It is the legislature's
intent (a) that an increase in prices through a flat tax will reduce
much of the competitive advantage that has historically existed due to
the discrepancy in the difference between state and tribal taxes, and
(b) that the tribal retailers can remain in business under the changed
circumstances. The governor may delegate the authority to negotiate a
cigarette tax agreement with the Puyallup Tribe to the department of
revenue. The department of revenue shall consult with the liquor
control board during the negotiations.
(2) Any agreement must require the tribe to impose a tax of eleven
dollars and seventy-five cents on each carton of cigarettes, with ten
packs a carton and twenty cigarettes per pack being the industry
standard. This tax shall be prorated for cartons and packs that are
nonstandard. This tribal tax is in lieu of the combined state and
local sales and use taxes, and state cigarette taxes, and as such these
state taxes are not imposed during the term of the agreement on any
transaction governed by the agreement. The tribal tax shall increase
or decrease by the same dollar amount as any increase or decrease in
the state cigarette tax.
(3) The agreement must include a provision requiring the tribe to
transmit thirty percent of the tribal tax revenue on all cigarette
sales to the state. The funds shall be transmitted to the state
treasurer on a quarterly basis for deposit by the state treasurer into
the general fund. The remaining tribal tax revenue must be used for
essential government services, as that term is defined in RCW
43.06.455.
(4) The agreement is limited to retail sales in which Indian
retailers make delivery and physical transfer of possession of the
cigarettes from the seller to the buyer within Indian country, and are
not in regard to transactions by non-Indian retailers. In addition,
agreements shall provide that retailers shall not sell or give, or
permit to be sold or given, cigarettes to any person under the age of
eighteen years.
(5)(a) The agreement must include a provision to price and sell the
cigarettes so that the retail selling price is not less than the price
paid by the retailer for the cigarettes.
(b) The tribal tax is in addition to the retail selling price.
(c) The agreement must include a provision to assure the price paid
to the retailer includes the tribal tax, as evidenced by the tribe's
cigarette stamp.
(d) If the tribe is acting as a wholesaler to tribal retailers, the
retail selling price must not be less than the price the tribe paid for
such cigarettes plus the tribal tax, as evidenced by the tribe's
cigarette stamp.
(6)(a) The agreement must include provisions regarding enforcement
and compliance by the tribe in regard to enrolled tribal members who
sell cigarettes and shall describe the individual and joint
responsibilities of the tribe, the department of revenue, and the
liquor control board.
(b) The agreement must include provisions for tax administration
and compliance, such as transport and notice requirements, inspection
procedures, stamping requirements, recordkeeping, and audit
requirements.
(c) The agreement must include provisions for sharing of
information among the tribe, the department of revenue, and the liquor
control board.
(7) The agreement must provide that all cigarettes possessed or
sold by a tribal retailer shall bear a tribal cigarette stamp obtained
by wholesalers from a bank or other suitable stamp vendor and applied
to the cigarettes. Tribal stamps must have serial numbers or some
other discrete identification so that each stamp can be traced to its
source.
(8) The agreement must provide that retailers shall purchase
cigarettes only from wholesalers or manufacturers licensed to do
business in the state of Washington.
(9) The agreement must be for a renewable period of no more than
eight years.
(10) The agreement must include provisions to resolve disputes
using a nonjudicial process, such as mediation, and shall include a
dispute resolution protocol. The protocol shall include a procedure
for notifying the other party that a violation has occurred, a
procedure for establishing whether a violation has in fact occurred, an
opportunity to correct such violation, and a provision providing for
termination of the agreement should the violation fail to be resolved
through this process, such termination subject to mediation should the
terms of the agreement so allow. An agreement must provide for
termination of the agreement if resolution of a dispute does not occur
within twenty-four months from the time notification of a violation has
occurred. Intervening violations do not extend this time period.
(11) The agreement may not include any provisions that impact the
state's share of the master settlement agreement, and as such this
agreement does not authorize negotiation regarding a redistribution of
the state's proceeds under the master settlement agreement.
(12) Information received by the state or open to state review
under the terms of an agreement is subject to RCW 82.32.330.
(13) It is the intent of the legislature that the liquor control
board and the department of revenue continue the division of duties and
shared authority under chapter 82.24 RCW.
(14) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Indian country" has the same meaning as in chapter 82.24 RCW.
(b) "Indian retailer" or "retailer" means (i) a retailer wholly
owned and operated by an Indian tribe or (ii) a business wholly owned
and operated by an enrolled tribal member and licensed by the tribe.
(c) "Indian tribe" or "tribe" means the Puyallup Tribe of Indians,
which is a federally recognized Indian tribe located within the
geographical boundaries of the state of Washington.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.08.0316 and 2001 c 235 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
cigarettes by an Indian retailer during the effective period of a
cigarette tax contract subject to RCW 43.06.455 or a cigarette tax
agreement under section 2 of this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.12.0316 and 2001 c 235 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the
use of cigarettes sold by an Indian retailer during the effective
period of a cigarette tax contract subject to RCW 43.06.455 or a
cigarette tax agreement under section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 82.24 RCW
to read as follows:
The taxes imposed by this chapter do not apply to the sale, use,
consumption, handling, possession, or distribution of cigarettes by an
Indian retailer during the effective period of a cigarette tax
agreement under section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) On January 5, 2005, it was announced
that a cigarette tax agreement had been reached between the state of
Washington and the Puyallup Indian Tribe. Before being signed by the
governor, the legislature must provide authorization to the governor to
sign such an agreement. Because the state and the Puyallup Indian
Tribe have reached an agreement in principle, time for implementation
is of the essence.
(2) This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the
public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and
its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---