BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that:
(a) In 1998, the joint legislative audit and review committee, in
its performance audit of the Washington industrial insurance system,
reported that one of the most significant causes for delayed benefit
payments to workers and lack of employer involvement in claims was the
manner in which claims were reported. Under this system of reporting,
the worker generally reports the injury to a physician who, in turn,
reports the injury to the department.
(b) The performance audit further reported that adopting a system
in which the employee reports to the employer and the employer reports
to the department would speed the first payment of benefits to the
worker and involve the employer, from the beginning of the claim, in
assisting in the management of the claim, including returning the
worker to work.
(c) The performance audit also recognized that there would be
instances in which workers would be reluctant to report injuries to
employers and that, therefore, the system of physician reporting should
be retained as an alternative, and employer reporting should be tested
on a widespread basis.
(2)(a) The department of labor and industries shall develop and
implement an initiative to encourage the reporting of industrial
injuries by the worker to his or her employer and by the employer to
the department. Under this initiative, the department must take steps
to educate workers and employers about the benefits and importance of
prompt reporting of injuries.
(b) By December 1, 2006, the department of labor and industries
shall develop and make statutory recommendations for an alternative
system of reporting injuries under which the worker would report to the
employer and the employer would report to the department. Upon passage
of such legislation, the department shall immediately begin an
educational effort to promote this method of reporting.
(3)(a) The department must conduct a study of:
(i) Claims that are not reported promptly, including but not
limited to a review of the circumstances of such claims, the type of
injuries involved in such claims, and the reasons for the failure to
report such claims promptly;
(ii) The effect of the educational initiative required under
subsection (2)(a) of this section on whether the number of claims
reported to employers increased, whether there was a reduction in
delays in benefit payments, and whether there was an improvement in
employer involvement in assisting with claims management and an
increase in appropriate return-to-work and better outcomes for injured
workers and employers; and
(iii) The results of the efforts of the centers of occupational
health education in early reporting and early notification of
employers, and the general lessons that can be drawn from these results
for the larger workers' compensation program.
(b) By December 1, 2006, the department must report on the results
of the study to the appropriate committees of the legislature.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.28.020 and 2004 c 65 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Where a worker is entitled to compensation under this title
he or she shall file with the department or his or her self-insured
employer, as the case may be, his or her application for such, together
with the certificate of the physician or licensed advanced registered
nurse practitioner who attended him or her. An application form
developed by the department shall include a notice specifying the
worker's right to receive health services from a physician or licensed
advanced registered nurse practitioner of the worker's choice under RCW
51.36.010, including chiropractic services under RCW 51.36.015, and
listing the types of providers authorized to provide these services.
(b) The physician or licensed advanced registered nurse
practitioner who attended the injured worker shall inform the injured
worker of his or her rights under this title and lend all necessary
assistance in making this application for compensation and such proof
of other matters as required by the rules of the department without
charge to the worker. The department shall provide physicians with a
manual which outlines the procedures to be followed in applications for
compensation involving occupational diseases, and which describes
claimants' rights and responsibilities related to occupational disease
claims.
(2) If the application ((for compensation)) required by this
section is:
(a) Filed on behalf of the worker by the physician or licensed
advanced registered nurse practitioner who attended the worker, the
physician or licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner may
transmit the application to the department electronically using
facsimile mail;
(b) Made to the department and the employer has not received a copy
of the application, the department shall immediately send a copy of the
application to the employer; or
(c) Made to a self-insured employer, ((he or she)) the employer
shall forthwith send a copy of the application to the department.

Sec. 3 RCW 51.28.020 and 2001 c 231 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Where a worker is entitled to compensation under this title
he or she shall file with the department or his or her self-insured
employer, as the case may be, his or her application for such, together
with the certificate of the physician who attended him or her. An
application form developed by the department shall include a notice
specifying the worker's right to receive health services from a
physician of the worker's choice under RCW 51.36.010, including
chiropractic services under RCW 51.36.015, and listing the types of
providers authorized to provide these services.
(b) The physician who attended the injured worker shall inform the
injured worker of his or her rights under this title and lend all
necessary assistance in making this application for compensation and
such proof of other matters as required by the rules of the department
without charge to the worker. The department shall provide physicians
with a manual which outlines the procedures to be followed in
applications for compensation involving occupational diseases, and
which describes claimants' rights and responsibilities related to
occupational disease claims.
(2) If the application ((for compensation)) required by this
section is:
(a) Filed on behalf of the worker by the physician who attended the
worker, the physician may transmit the application to the department
electronically using facsimile mail;
(b) Made to the department and the employer has not received a copy
of the application, the department shall immediately send a copy of the
application to the employer; or
(c) Made to a self-insured employer, ((he or she)) the employer
shall forthwith send a copy of the application to the department.

Sec. 4 RCW 51.28.080 and 1985 c 338 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An employer shall be promptly notified by the department when:
(a) The department has received an application for compensation
under this title. If the employer is a state fund employer, the
department shall instruct the employer to submit a report of accident
form and provide a telephone number for assistance in the reporting
process; and
(b) It has determined that a worker of that employer is entitled to
compensation under RCW 51.32.090.
(2) Notification shall include, in nontechnical language, an
explanation of the employer's rights under this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 2 of this act expires June 30, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 3 of this act takes effect June 30,
2007.

--- END ---