BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.46.091 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 16 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) By July 1st of each year, each nursing facility operator shall
file a report with the department of social and health services listing
the patient days and the gross income for the prior calendar year for
each nursing facility that he or she operates.
(2) By August 1, 2003, the department of social and health services
shall submit for approval to the federal department of health and human
services a request for a waiver pursuant to 42 C.F.R. 433.68. The
waiver shall identify the nursing facilities that the department
proposes to exempt from the quality maintenance fee. Those facilities
shall include at least:
(a) Nursing facilities operated by any agency of the state of
Washington;
(b) Nursing facilities operated by a public hospital district; and
(c) As many nursing facilities with no or disproportionately low
numbers of medicaid-funded residents as, within the judgment of the
department, may be exempted from the fee pursuant to 42 C.F.R. 433.68.
(3) By August 1, 2005, the department of social and health services
shall submit for approval to the federal department of health and human
services a waiver amendment pursuant to 42 C.F.R. 433.68. The
amendment shall, within the judgment of the department, attempt to
designate nursing facilities identified as institutions for mental
disease with state-funded contracts as exempt from the quality
maintenance fee.
(4) The department of social and health services shall notify the
department of revenue and the nursing facility operator of the nursing
facilities that would be exempted from the quality maintenance fee
pursuant to the waiver request submitted to the federal department of
health and human services. The nursing facilities included in the
waiver request may withhold payment of the fee pending final action by
the federal government on the request for waiver.
(((4))) (5) If the request for waiver is approved, the department
of social and health services shall notify the department of revenue
and the nursing facility operator that no quality maintenance fee is
due from the facility. If the request for waiver is denied, nursing
facility operators who have withheld payment of the fee shall pay all
such fees as have been withheld. No interest or penalties shall be due
upon such withheld payments for the period during which final federal
action was pending.
(((5))) (6) The department of social and health services shall take
whatever action is necessary to continue the waiver from the federal
government.
(((6))) (7) The department of social and health services may adopt
such rules, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, as necessary to
provide for effective administration of this section and RCW 74.46.535.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act applies retroactively
to July 1, 2003, unless the federal department of health and human
services disapproves the department of social and health services'
amended waiver request.

--- END ---