BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.84.370 and 1995 c 347 s 718 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter,
reasonable attorneys' fees and costs shall be awarded to the prevailing
party or substantially prevailing party on appeal before the court of
appeals or the supreme court of a decision by a county, city, or town
to issue, condition, or deny a development permit involving a site-specific rezone, zoning, plat, conditional use, variance, shoreline
permit, building permit, site plan, or similar land use approval or
decision. The court shall award and determine the amount of reasonable
attorneys' fees and costs under this section if:
(a) The prevailing party on appeal was the prevailing or
substantially prevailing party before the county, city, or town, or in
a decision involving a substantial development permit under chapter
90.58 RCW, the prevailing party on appeal was the prevailing party or
the substantially prevailing party before the ((shoreline[s]))
shorelines hearings board; and
(b) The prevailing party on appeal was the prevailing party or
substantially prevailing party in all prior judicial proceedings.
(2) In addition to the prevailing party under subsection (1) of
this section, the county, city, or town whose decision is on appeal is
considered a prevailing party if its decision is upheld at superior
court and on appeal.
(3) Reasonable attorneys' fees and costs shall be awarded to the
prevailing or substantially prevailing state agency, county, city, or
town on appeal before the superior court, court of appeals, or supreme
court of a decision made by the state agency, county, city, or town:
(a) According to chapter 43.21C RCW; or
(b) Regarding the designation and protection of critical areas
according to RCW 36.70A.170 and 36.70A.172.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to appeals of state agency,
county, city, or town decisions filed with the superior court, court of
appeals, or supreme court on and after August 1, 2005.

--- END ---