BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A county or city with a population fewer than fifteen thousand
that receives a notice pursuant to 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1365(b) may receive
assistance from the department in responding to a notice filed pursuant
to 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1365(b) and defending against an action filed
pursuant to 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1365. The department shall provide, without
charge to the county or city submitting a request under this section,
any or all of the following assistance:
(a) Educational information related to the requirements of the
federal clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1365;
(b) Educational and technical information regarding measures to
achieve compliance with the requirements of the federal clean water
act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1365;
(c) Review of the county's or city's activities and programs
associated with the allegations in the notice filed pursuant to 33
U.S.C. Sec. 1365(b) to determine potential compliance issues and to
identify measures to achieve compliance; and
(d) Technical assistance, research, or other assistance and
information related to responding to the notice filed pursuant to 33
U.S.C. Sec. 1365(b) and defending against an action filed pursuant to
33 U.S.C. Sec. 1365.
(2) A county or city with a population fewer than fifteen thousand
that receives a notice pursuant to 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1365(b) may receive
legal defense assistance from the attorney general in responding to a
notice filed pursuant to 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1365(b) and defending against
an action filed pursuant to 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1365. The attorney general
shall provide, without charge to the county or city submitting a
request under this section, any or all of the following assistance:
(a) Legal review of the notice filed pursuant to 33 U.S.C. Sec.
1365(b), with analysis of the allegations in the notice and a
preliminary analysis of the relative merits of those allegations;
(b) Legal research and drafting assistance; and
(c) Legal representation and defense in responding to the notice
filed pursuant to 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1365(b) and defending against an
action filed pursuant to 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1365.
(3) The department and the office of the attorney general shall
respond promptly to any requests for assistance submitted according to
subsection (1) or (2) of this section.

--- END ---