BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purpose of this act is to reaffirm that
state law related to the lawful taking of fish, shellfish, and wildlife
under Title 77 RCW and rules adopted under Title 77 RCW preempt local
ordinances purportedly enacted to control noise associated with the
discharge of a firearm.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.15.212 and 2000 c 107 s 238 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any person who is damaged by any act prohibited in RCW
77.15.210 may bring a civil action to enjoin further violations, and
recover damages sustained, including a reasonable attorneys' fee. The
trial court may increase the award of damages to an amount not to
exceed three times the damages sustained. A party seeking civil
damages under this section may recover upon proof of a violation by a
preponderance of the evidence.
(2) When the civil action authorized in subsection (1) of this
section is against a city, county, or other municipality for
obstructing the lawful taking of fish, shellfish, or wildlife under the
color of RCW 9.41.300(2)(a) that is lawfully allowed under this title
and the rules adopted by the department under this title, the trial
court may, in addition to the remedies allowed under subsection (1) of
this section, levy a civil penalty of one thousand dollars for each day
of violation for each plaintiff in a suit or class.
(3) The state of Washington may bring a civil action to enjoin
violations of this section.

--- END ---