BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.18 RCW
to read as follows:
The use of a person's credit history or credit score as a factor in
underwriting, renewal, cancellation, and premium decisions by insurers
for personal insurance is prohibited in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 48.18.545 (Underwriting restrictions that apply to personal
insurance -- Credit history or insurance score -- Rules) and 2002 c 360 s
1; and
(2) RCW 48.19.035 (Making of rates -- Definitions -- Personal
insurance -- Use of credit history or insurance scores -- Rules) and 2004
c 86 s 1 & 2002 c 360 s 2.

--- END ---