BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 53.54 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The citizen's committee on aircraft noise abatement is
established to advise the Port of Seattle, as well as appropriate
state, local, and federal agencies, regarding the operation of aircraft
noise abatement programs authorized under this chapter regarding the
Seattle-Tacoma International Airport. The committee shall serve as an
advisory committee to the Port of Seattle on matters relating to the
policies, administration, procedures, and funding of aircraft noise
abatement programs. The port shall consult with and provide periodic
reports to the committee on matters related to the port's aircraft
noise abatement program, including but not limited to program policies,
procedures, administration, and funding.
(2) The committee shall have a total of eleven members who either
reside in areas impacted by the noise from Seattle-Tacoma International
Airport or who represent governmental entities having jurisdiction
within the impacted areas. The appointments shall be made by the
governor and the appointees shall serve staggered three-year terms.
The committee membership shall consist of: (a) Three members
consisting of officials from three cities within the impacted areas;
(b) one King county official; and (c) seven citizen members who reside
in the impacted areas. All members of the committee may participate
fully in the committee's meetings and activities and shall timely
receive all notices and information related to committee business and
decisions.
(3) The port shall seek recommendations and comments from the
committee regarding the port's aircraft noise abatement program. The
port shall also provide the committee with sixty days' advance notice
of any proposed changes in the policies, procedures, or administration
of its aircraft noise abatement program, and shall consider the
recommendations and comments of the committee with respect to such
proposed changes. In the event the port does not follow the
recommendations of the committee, the port shall provide the committee
with a written explanation stating the reasoning behind, and the
factual basis for, the decision to not follow such recommendations.
(4) At the request of the committee, the governing body of the port
shall meet with the committee not less than three times per calendar
year, at intervals to be determined by the committee.
(5) The port shall fully and timely respond to requests for
information that are submitted by the committee.
(6) Under this section, "impacted areas" has the same meaning as
defined under RCW 53.54.020.
(7) The committee established in this section constitutes a class
one group under RCW 43.03.220. Expenses for this group, including
staff support, shall be provided by the department of community, trade,
and economic development.

--- END ---