BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 53.54.030 and 1993 c 150 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter, in developing a remedial program,
the port commission may utilize one or more of the following programs:
(1) Acquisition of property or property rights within the impacted
area, which shall be deemed necessary to accomplish a port purpose.
The port district may purchase such property or property rights by time
payment notwithstanding the time limitations provided for in RCW
53.08.010. The port district may mortgage or otherwise pledge any such
properties acquired to secure such transactions. The port district may
assume any outstanding mortgages.
(2) Transaction assistance programs, including assistance with real
estate fees and mortgage assistance, and other neighborhood remedial
programs as compensation for impacts due to aircraft noise and noise
associated conditions. Any such programs shall be in connection with
properties located within an impacted area and shall be provided upon
terms and conditions as the port district shall determine appropriate.
(3) Programs of soundproofing structures located within an impacted
area. Such programs may be executed without regard to the ownership((,
provided the owner waives damages and conveys an easement for the
operation of aircraft, and for noise and noise associated conditions
therewith, to the port district)) of the structure. The port district
shall not require that a property owner either convey an easement for
the operation of aircraft, or waive potential damage claims for noise
and noise-associated conditions, as a condition precedent to
participation in the soundproofing program authorized under this
section.
(4) Mortgage insurance of private owners of lands or improvements
within such noise impacted area where such private owners are unable to
obtain mortgage insurance solely because of noise impact. In this
regard, the port district may establish reasonable regulations and may
impose reasonable conditions and charges upon the granting of such
mortgage insurance: PROVIDED, That such fees and charges shall at no
time exceed fees established for federal mortgage insurance programs
for like service.
(5) An individual property may be provided benefits by the port
district under each of the programs described in subsections (1)
through (4) of this section. However, an individual property may not
be provided benefits under any one of these programs more than once,
unless the property is subjected to increased aircraft noise or
differing aircraft noise impacts that would have afforded different
levels of mitigation, even if the property owner had waived all damages
and conveyed a full and unrestricted easement.
(6) Management of all lands, easements, or development rights
acquired, including but not limited to the following:
(a) Rental of any or all lands or structures acquired;
(b) Redevelopment of any such lands for any economic use consistent
with airport operations, local zoning and the state environmental
policy;
(c) Sale of such properties for cash or for time payment and
subjection of such property to mortgage or other security transaction:
PROVIDED, That any such sale shall reserve to the port district by
covenant an unconditional right of easement for the operation of all
aircraft and for all noise or noise conditions associated therewith.
(7) A property shall be considered within the impacted area if any
part thereof is within the impacted area.

--- END ---