BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there exists in
many of the most populous counties of the state a patchwork of small
islands of urban unincorporated territory which are the direct result
of past annexation and incorporation activity. These small areas
present significant service inefficiencies for counties; difficulty in
annexing these areas poses a barrier to achieving growth management
planning goals of the surrounding or adjacent city or town. It is the
intent of the legislature to grant cities and towns the unilateral
authority to annex by ordinance small urban unincorporated islands that
exist within their territories.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The legislative body of a city or town planning under
chapter 36.70A RCW as of June 30, 1994, may by ordinance annex
territory to the city or town if there is, within the city or town,
unincorporated territory containing residential property owners within
the same county and within the same urban growth area designated under
RCW 36.70A.110 as the city or town containing less than two hundred
fifty acres and having at least sixty percent of the boundaries of such
area contiguous to the city or town.
(b) The ordinance shall describe the boundaries of the area to be
annexed, state the number of voters residing therein as nearly as may
be, and set a date for public hearing on such ordinance for annexation.
Notice of the hearing shall be given by publication of the ordinance at
least once a week for two weeks prior to the date of the hearing, in
one or more newspapers of general circulation within the city or town
and one or more newspapers of general circulation within the area to be
annexed.
(2) For purposes of this section, territory bounded by a river,
lake, or other body of water is considered contiguous to a city or town
that is also bounded by same river, lake, or other body of water.
(3) Annexation under this section shall not be subject to
referendum and shall be exempt from the boundary review board process
and requirements set forth in chapter 36.93 RCW.
(4) Any territory to be annexed through an ordinance adopted under
this section is annexed and becomes a part of the city or town upon the
date fixed in the ordinance of annexation, which date may not be fewer
than thirty days after adoption of the ordinance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35A.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The legislative body of a code city may by ordinance annex
territory containing residential property owners to the city if there
is within the city unincorporated territory containing less than two
hundred fifty acres and having at least sixty percent of the boundaries
of such area contiguous to the city or town.
(b) The ordinance shall describe the boundaries of the area to be
annexed, state the number of voters residing therein as nearly as may
be, and set a date for public hearing on such ordinance for annexation.
Notice of the hearing shall be given by publication of the ordinance at
least once a week for two weeks prior to the date of the hearing, in
one or more newspapers of general circulation within the city and one
or more newspapers of general circulation within the area to be
annexed.
(2) For purposes of this section, territory bounded by a river,
lake, or other body of water is considered contiguous to a city that is
also bounded by same river, lake, or other body of water.
(3) Annexation under this section shall not be subject to
referendum and shall be exempt from the boundary review board process
and requirements set forth in chapter 36.93 RCW.
(4) Any territory to be annexed through an ordinance adopted under
this section is annexed and becomes a part of the city or town upon the
date fixed in the ordinance of annexation, which date may not be fewer
than thirty days after adoption of the ordinance.

Sec. 4 RCW 36.93.105 and 1999 c 153 s 46 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following actions shall not be subject to potential review by
a boundary review board:
(1) Annexations of territory to a water-sewer district pursuant to
RCW 36.94.410 through 36.94.440;
(2) Revisions of city or town boundaries pursuant to RCW 35.21.790
or 35A.21.210;
(3) Adjustments to city or town boundaries pursuant to RCW
35.13.340; ((and))
(4) Adjustments to city and town boundaries pursuant to RCW
35.13.300 through 35.13.330;
(5) Annexations of territory to a city or town pursuant to section
2 or 3 of this act.

Sec. 5 RCW 35.13.182 and 1998 c 286 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative body of a city or town planning under chapter
36.70A RCW as of June 30, 1994, may resolve to annex territory to the
city or town if there is, within the city or town, unincorporated
territory containing residential property owners within the same county
and within the same urban growth area designated under RCW 36.70A.110
as the city or town((:
(a) Containing less than one hundred acres and having at least
eighty percent of the boundaries of such area contiguous to the city or
town; or
(b))) of any size and having at least ((eighty)) sixty percent of
the boundaries of the area contiguous to the city if the area existed
before June 30, 1994.
(2) The resolution shall describe the boundaries of the area to be
annexed, state the number of voters residing in the area as nearly as
may be, and set a date for a public hearing on the resolution for
annexation. Notice of the hearing shall be given by publication of the
resolution at least once a week for two weeks before the date of the
hearing in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the
city or town and one or more newspapers of general circulation within
the area to be annexed.
(3) For purposes of ((subsection (1)(b) of)) this section,
territory bounded by a river, lake, or other body of water is
considered contiguous to a city that is also bounded by the same river,
lake, or other body of water.

Sec. 6 RCW 35A.14.295 and 1997 c 429 s 36 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislative body of a code city may resolve to annex
territory containing residential property owners to the city if there
is within the city, unincorporated territory((:
(a) Containing less than one hundred acres and having at least
eighty percent of the boundaries of such area contiguous to the code
city; or
(b))) of any size and having at least ((eighty)) sixty percent of
the boundaries of such area contiguous to the city if such area existed
before June 30, 1994, and is within the same county and within the same
urban growth area designated under RCW 36.70A.110, and the city was
planning under chapter 36.70A RCW as of June 30, 1994.
(2) The resolution shall describe the boundaries of the area to be
annexed, state the number of voters residing therein as nearly as may
be, and set a date for a public hearing on such resolution for
annexation. Notice of the hearing shall be given by publication of the
resolution at least once a week for two weeks prior to the date of the
hearing, in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the
code city and one or more newspapers of general circulation within the
area to be annexed.
(3) For purposes of ((subsection (1)(b) of)) this section,
territory bounded by a river, lake, or other body of water is
considered contiguous to a city that is also bounded by the same river,
lake, or other body of water.

--- END ---