BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.18.170 and 2000 c 86 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever an obligor parent who has been ordered to provide
health insurance coverage for a dependent child fails to provide such
coverage or lets it lapse, the department or the obligee may seek
enforcement of the coverage order as provided under this section.
(2)(a) If the obligor parent's order to provide health insurance
coverage contains language notifying the obligor that failure to
provide such coverage or proof that such coverage is unavailable may
result in direct enforcement of the order and orders payments through,
or has been submitted to, the Washington state support registry for
enforcement, then the department may, without further notice to the
obligor, send a notice of enrollment to the obligor's employer or
union. The notice shall be served:
(i) By regular mail;
(ii) In the manner prescribed for the service of a summons in a
civil action;
(iii) By certified mail, return receipt requested; or
(iv) By electronic means if there is an agreement between the
secretary of the department and the person, firm, corporation,
association, political subdivision, department of the state, or agency,
subdivision, or instrumentality of the United States to accept service
by electronic means.
(b) The notice shall require the employer or union to enroll the
child in the health insurance plan as provided in subsection (3) of
this section.
(c) The returned answer to the division of child support by the
employer constitutes proof of service of the notice of enrollment in
the case where the notice was served by regular mail.
(d) The division of child support may use uniform interstate forms
adopted by the United States department of health and human services to
take insurance enrollment actions under this section.
(e) If the obligor parent's order to provide health insurance
coverage does not order payments through, and has not been submitted
to, the Washington state support registry for enforcement:
(i) The obligee may, without further notice to the obligor send a
certified copy of the order requiring health insurance coverage to the
obligor's employer or union by certified mail, return receipt
requested; and
(ii) The obligee shall attach a notarized statement to the order
declaring that the order is the latest order addressing coverage
entered by the court and require the employer or union to enroll the
child in the health insurance plan as provided in subsection (3) of
this section.
(3) Upon receipt of an order that provides for health insurance
coverage, or a notice of enrollment:
(a) The obligor's employer or union shall answer the party who sent
the order or notice within twenty days and confirm that the child:
(i) Has been enrolled in the health insurance plan;
(ii) Will be enrolled; or
(iii) Cannot be covered, stating the reasons why such coverage
cannot be provided;
(b) The employer or union shall withhold any required premium from
the obligor's income or wages;
(c) If more than one plan is offered by the employer or union, and
each plan may be extended to cover the child, then the child shall be
enrolled in the obligor's plan. If the obligor's plan does not provide
coverage which is accessible to the child, the child shall be enrolled
in the least expensive plan otherwise available to the obligor parent;
(d) The employer or union shall provide information about the name
of the health insurance coverage provider or issuer and the extent of
coverage available to the obligee or the department and shall make
available any necessary claim forms or enrollment membership cards.
(4) If the order for coverage contains no language notifying the
obligor that failure to provide health insurance coverage or proof that
such coverage is unavailable may result in direct enforcement of the
order, the department or the obligee may serve a written notice of
intent to enforce the order on the obligor by certified mail, return
receipt requested, or by personal service. If the obligor fails to
provide written proof that such coverage has been obtained or applied
for or fails to provide proof that such coverage is unavailable within
twenty days of service of the notice, the department or the obligee may
proceed to enforce the order directly as provided in subsection (2) of
this section.
(5) If the obligor ordered to provide health insurance coverage
elects to provide coverage that will not be accessible to the child
because of geographic or other limitations when accessible coverage is
otherwise available, the department or the obligee may serve a written
notice of intent to purchase health insurance coverage on the obligor
by certified mail, return receipt requested. The notice shall also
specify the type and cost of coverage.
(6) If the department serves a notice under subsection (5) of this
section the obligor shall, within twenty days of the date of service:
(a) File an application for an adjudicative proceeding; or
(b) Provide written proof to the department that the obligor has
either applied for, or obtained, coverage accessible to the child.
(7) If the obligee serves a notice under subsection (5) of this
section, within twenty days of the date of service the obligor shall
provide written proof to the obligee that the obligor has either
applied for, or obtained, coverage accessible to the child.
(8) If the obligor fails to respond to a notice served under
subsection (5) of this section to the party who served the notice, the
party who served the notice may purchase the health insurance coverage
specified in the notice directly. The amount of the monthly premium
shall be added to the support debt and be collectible without further
notice. The amount of the monthly premium may be collected or accrued
until the obligor provides proof of the required coverage.
(9) The signature of the obligee or of a department employee shall
be a valid authorization to the coverage provider or issuer for
purposes of processing a payment to the child's health services
provider. An order for health insurance coverage shall operate as an
assignment of all benefit rights to the obligee or to the child's
health services provider, and in any claim against the coverage
provider or issuer, the obligee or the obligee's assignee shall be
subrogated to the rights of the obligor. Notwithstanding the
provisions of this section regarding assignment of benefits, this
section shall not require a health care service contractor authorized
under chapter 48.44 RCW or a health maintenance organization authorized
under chapter 48.46 RCW to deviate from their contractual provisions
and restrictions regarding reimbursement for covered services. If the
coverage is terminated, the employer shall mail a notice of termination
to the department or the obligee at the obligee's last known address
within thirty days of the termination date.
(10) This section shall not be construed to limit the right of the
obligor or the obligee to bring an action in superior court at any time
to enforce, modify, or clarify the original support order.
(11) Where a child does not reside in the issuer's service area, an
issuer shall cover no less than urgent and emergent care. Where the
issuer offers broader coverage, whether by policy or reciprocal
agreement, the issuer shall provide such coverage to any child
otherwise covered that does not reside in the issuer's service area.
(12) If an obligor fails to pay his or her portion of any
deductible required under the health insurance coverage or fails to pay
his or her portion of medical expenses incurred in excess of the
coverage provided under the plan, the ((department or the)) obligee may
enforce collection of the obligor's portion of the deductible or the
additional medical expenses through a wage assignment order. If the
obligee requests that the department enforce collection of the
deductible or the additional medical expenses, the department must
collect the amount owed through a wage assignment order. The amount of
the deductible or additional medical expenses shall be added to the
support debt and be collectible without further notice if the obligor's
share of the amount of the deductible or additional expenses is reduced
to a sum certain in a court order.

--- END ---