BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there were over
forty-six thousand reports of persons missing nationwide and over five
hundred missing persons in the state of Washington.
The legislature has learned that the federal bureau of
investigation has a data base where law enforcement can send DNA
(deoxyribonucleic acid) testing samples of unidentified remains and
have it analyzed. The federal bureau of investigation also accepts DNA
samples that are known to come from a missing person in the hopes to
match those records with those remains that are found in the future.
The legislature further finds that there is a poor record nationwide in
regards to persons submitting DNA samples of a known missing person to
the federal bureau of investigation or a local crime lab in a timely
manner before the evidence disappears. There is much work to be done
in the areas of unidentified remains and missing persons in helping
families to put closure to the loss of a loved one.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 68.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a person reported missing has not been found and criminal
activity is suspected to be the basis of the victim being missing, the
sheriff, chief of police, county coroner, or county medical examiner,
or other law enforcement authority initiating and conducting the
investigation for the missing person shall, within forty-eight hours of
suspecting the criminal activity immediately file a report, collect DNA
samples from the known missing person, and ask the missing person's
family or next of kin to give written consent to contact the dentist or
dentists of the missing person and request the person's dental records.
(2) No later than forty-eight hours after collecting the DNA
evidence and after conferring with the county coroner or medical
examiner, the sheriff, chief of police, or other law enforcement
authority shall submit the missing person's report, the DNA samples
taken, and the missing person's dental records to the state patrol
identification, child abuse, vulnerable adult abuse, and criminal
history section on forms supplied by the state patrol for such purpose.
(3) The state patrol identification, child abuse, vulnerable adult
abuse, and criminal history section shall store the evidence collected
from the known missing person in a missing person data base. The
missing person data base shall be a separate and distinct data base
from the other DNA data bases maintained by the agency.
(4) The state patrol identification, child abuse, vulnerable adult
abuse, and criminal history section shall forward copies of the DNA
samples and dental records to the federal bureau of investigation
within seventy-two hours upon receipt of the evidence of the known
missing person.

Sec. 3 RCW 68.50.320 and 2001 c 223 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
When a person reported missing has not been found within thirty
days of the report, the sheriff, chief of police, county coroner or
county medical examiner, or other law enforcement authority initiating
and conducting the investigation for the missing person shall ask the
missing person's family or next of kin to give written consent to
contact the dentist or dentists of the missing person and request the
person's dental records.
When a person reported missing has not been found within thirty
days, the sheriff, chief of police, or other law enforcement authority
initiating and conducting the investigation for the missing person
shall confer with the county coroner or medical examiner prior to the
preparation of a missing person's report. After conferring with the
coroner or medical examiner, the sheriff, chief of police, or other law
enforcement authority shall submit a missing person's report and the
dental records received under this section to the dental identification
system of the state patrol identification, child abuse, vulnerable
adult abuse, and criminal history section on forms supplied by the
state patrol for such purpose.
In cases where criminal activity is suspected, the state patrol
shall immediately submit the DNA samples and the dental records in the
missing person data base and shall forward copies of the DNA samples
and dental records to the federal bureau of investigation within
seventy-two hours upon receipt of the evidence of the known missing
person.
When a person reported missing has been found, the sheriff, chief
of police, coroner or medical examiner, or other law enforcement
authority shall report such information to the state patrol.
The dental identification system shall maintain a file of
information regarding persons reported to it as missing. The file
shall contain the information referred to in this section and such
other information as the state patrol finds relevant to assist in the
location of a missing person.
The files of the dental identification system shall, upon request,
be made available to law enforcement agencies attempting to locate
missing persons.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
Any biological sample taken from a known missing person pursuant to
section 2 of this act shall be forwarded to the federal bureau of
investigation within seventy-two hours upon receipt of the DNA samples.

--- END ---