BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.46 RCW
to read as follows:
A raffle conducted by employees of a state agency, as "agency" is
defined in RCW 42.52.010, does not constitute any form of gambling or
a lottery subject to this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter
when conducted as follows:
(1) Gross revenues from such a raffle do not exceed three thousand
dollars;
(2) Tickets to such a raffle are sold only to, and winners are
determined only from among, the employees of the agency; and
(3) All revenue less prizes and expenses received from such a
raffle are devoted to purposes authorized under section 2 of this act
for charitable and nonprofit organizations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 42.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When soliciting gifts, grants, or donations solely to support
the charitable activities of state employees conducted pursuant to
section 1 of this act, the state officers and state employees are
presumed not to be in violation of the solicitation and receipt of gift
provisions in RCW 42.52.140.
(2) For purposes of this section, activities are deemed to be
charitable if the activities are devoted to the purposes authorized
under RCW 9.46.0209 for charitable and nonprofit organizations listed
in that section, or are in support of the activities of those
charitable or nonprofit organizations.

--- END ---