BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.160.050 and 1990 c 177 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) All certificate of competency holders that desire to
continue in the fire protection sprinkler business shall annually,
prior to January 1, secure from the state director of fire protection
a renewal certificate of competency upon payment of the fee as
prescribed by the state director of fire protection. Application for
renewal shall be upon a form prescribed by the state director of fire
protection and the certificate holder shall furnish the information
required by the director.
(b) Failure of any certificate of competency holder to secure his
or her renewal certificate of competency within sixty days after the
due date shall constitute sufficient cause for the state director of
fire protection to suspend the certificate of competency.
(c) The state director of fire protection may, upon the receipt of
payment of all delinquent fees including a late charge, restore a
certificate of competency that has been suspended for failure to pay
the renewal fee.
(d) A certificate of competency holder may voluntarily surrender
his or her certificate of competency to the state director of fire
protection and be relieved of the annual renewal fee. After
surrendering the certificate of competency, he or she shall not be
known as a certificate of competency holder and shall desist from the
practice thereof. Within two years from the time of surrender of the
certificate of competency, he or she may again qualify for a
certificate of competency, without examination, by the payment of the
required fee. If two or more years have elapsed, he or she shall
return to the status of a new applicant.
(2)(a) All licensed fire protection sprinkler system contractors
desiring to continue to be licensed shall annually, prior to January 1,
secure from the state director of fire protection a renewal license
upon payment of the fee as prescribed by the state director of fire
protection. Application for renewal shall be upon a form prescribed by
the state director of fire protection and the license holder shall
furnish the information required by the director.
(b) Failure of any license holder to secure his or her renewal
license within sixty days after the due date shall constitute
sufficient cause for the state director of fire protection to suspend
the license.
(c) The state director of fire protection may, upon the receipt of
payment of all delinquent fees including a late charge, restore a
license that has been suspended for failure to pay the renewal fee.
(3) The initial certificate of competency or license fee shall be
prorated based upon the portion of the year such certificate of
competency or license is in effect, prior to renewal on January 1.
(4) The fire protection contractor license fund is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from license and
certificate fees and charges or from the money generated by the rules
and regulations promulgated under this chapter shall be deposited into
the fund. Expenditures from the fund may be used only for purposes
authorized under this chapter and for providing assistance in
identifying fire sprinkler system components that have been subject to
either a recall or voluntary replacement program by a manufacturer of
fire sprinkler products, a nationally recognized testing laboratory, or
the federal consumer product safety commission. Assistance shall
include, but is not limited to, aiding in the identification of
recalled components, information sharing strategies aimed at ensuring
the consumer is made aware of recalls and voluntary replacement
programs, and providing training and assistance to local fire
authorities, the fire sprinkler industry, and the public. Only the
state director of fire protection or the director's designee may
authorize expenditures from the fund. The fund is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required
for expenditures.

--- END ---