BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No action for damages for injury occurring as a result of
health care may be commenced against any health care provider unless
the claimant (a) has given the health care provider at least ninety
days' written notice of intent to file a claim, which includes a
request to meet and discuss the claim, and (b) after the health care
provider responds to the request to meet, has made an appointment to
meet, and has met or has had a designated nonlawyer representative
meet, with the health care provider or the health care provider's
designated nonlawyer representative to discuss the nature and basis of
the claim and the health care provider's response.
(2) The claimant shall serve the written notice required under
subsection (1) of this section on the health care provider by
registered mail, return receipt requested, to the health care
provider's professional business address or residential address.
(3) The written notice required under subsection (1) of this
section must be signed by the claimant and contain at least the
following:
(a) A description of the claimed injury or damage;
(b) A description of the conduct and circumstances alleged to have
brought about the claimed injury or damage;
(c) The names of all persons involved, if known;
(d) The names of all health care providers the claimant is
notifying under this section in relation to the claim;
(e) A request to meet with the health care provider or the health
care provider's designated nonlawyer representative to discuss the
claim; and
(f) The address and telephone number where the claimant may be
reached.
With respect to the content of the notice of intent, this section
shall be liberally construed so that substantial compliance shall be
deemed satisfactory.
(4) If the notice of intent required under subsection (1) of this
section is served within ninety days before the expiration of the
applicable statute of limitations, the time for commencement of the
action shall be extended ninety days from the service of notice.
(5) Any health care provider who receives a notice of intent to
file a claim pursuant to this section shall, within twenty days of
receipt of the notice of intent, respond to the request to meet by
contacting, or having someone from the health care provider's office
contact, the claimant to schedule the date, time, and place for the
claimant, the claimant's designated nonlawyer representative, or both
to meet with the health care provider, the health care provider's
designated nonlawyer representative, or both. The contact may be made
either by telephone or by certified mail, return receipt requested.
Unless otherwise mutually agreed between the health care provider and
the claimant, the meeting shall be scheduled to take place during
normal business hours at the health care provider's professional
business address on a date no later than seventy-five days after
receipt of the notice of intent.
(6) If contact with the claimant to schedule the meeting is made by
telephone, the health care provider shall provide the claimant, by
certified mail, return receipt requested, written confirmation of the
date, time, and place of the scheduled meeting and, if the meeting will
be with, or will include, the health care provider's designated
nonlawyer representative, the name of that representative. If the
claimant intends to have a designated nonlawyer representative attend
the meeting with, or on behalf of, the claimant, the claimant shall,
within ten days of receipt of the written confirmation, notify the
health care provider by certified mail, return receipt requested, of
the name of that representative.
(7) If contact with the claimant to schedule the meeting is not
made by telephone, the health care provider shall, within twenty days
of receipt of the notice of intent, send the claimant by certified
mail, return receipt requested, a response to the request to meet that
contains at least five different dates and times that the health care
provider, the health care provider's designated nonlawyer
representative, if any, or both, can meet with the claimant. The
written response shall also state the professional business address of
the health care provider where the meeting will take place and, if the
meeting will be with, or will include, the health care provider's
designated nonlawyer representative, the name of that representative.
The dates proposed in the written response shall be dates that fall
between the fiftieth day and the seventy-fifth day after the notice of
intent was received. No later than ten days following receipt of such
written response, the claimant shall notify the health care provider in
writing, by certified mail, return receipt requested, which of the
dates proposed by the health care provider the claimant selects for the
meeting to take place, and if a designated nonlawyer representative
will be attending the meeting with, or on behalf of, the claimant, the
name of that representative.
(8) Lawyers, or agents, employees, or consultants of lawyers, for
the claimant or the health care provider shall not attend the meeting
required by this section. However, the claimant may designate a family
member or other nonlawyer representative to attend the meeting with, or
on behalf of, the claimant, and the health care provider may designate
a nonlawyer representative to attend the meeting with, or on behalf of,
the health care provider. A claimant or a health care provider who
chooses to have a designated nonlawyer representative attend the
meeting, shall provide advance notification of that intent in
accordance with the provisions of subsections (6) and (7) of this
section.
(9) Any statements made by, and any discussions had between, the
claimant and the health care provider or the health care provider's
designated representative pursuant to this section, and any records
made of any such statements or discussions, shall not be subject to
discovery or introduction into evidence in any judicial or
administrative proceeding, and no person who was in attendance at any
meeting held pursuant to this section shall be permitted or required to
testify as to the content of any statements made or discussions had, or
any records of any such statements or discussions, at any such meeting.
A notice of intent to file a claim and any response thereto also shall
not be subject to discovery or introduction into evidence in any
judicial or administrative proceeding except as needed to demonstrate
compliance or noncompliance with the provisions of this section.
(10) The provisions of this section do not apply with respect to
any defendant whose name is unknown to the plaintiff at the time of
filing the complaint and who is identified in the complaint by a
fictitious name.
(11) Any action for damages for injury occurring as a result of
health care against a health care provider that is filed by a claimant
who has failed to serve the health care provider with the notice of
intent to file a claim, or who has failed to make an appointment to
meet, as required by subsection (1) of this section, or who has failed
to attend the meeting scheduled pursuant to subsection (6) or (7) of
this section, shall be barred.
(12) If a health care provider who receives a notice of claim
pursuant to this section fails to respond to the request to meet as
required by subsection (5) of this section, or fails to attend, or have
a designated nonlawyer representative attend, the meeting scheduled
pursuant to subsection (6) or (7) of this section, then the failure of
the claimant to meet with the health care provider to discuss the claim
shall not constitute a bar to the commencement of an action for injury
occurring as a result of health care against that health care provider.
(13) For purposes of this section, "claimant" means either (a) the
patient receiving the health care upon which the claim is based; or (b)
if the patient is incompetent, the person or persons authorized to
consent to health care on behalf of the patient pursuant to RCW
7.70.065; or (c) if the patient is deceased, the person or persons
entitled to bring a wrongful death or survival action.

--- END ---