BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The department of transportation is directed
to conduct a study of the feasibility of offering discounts on tolls
for crossing the Tacoma Narrows Bridge. The study will include, but
not be limited to, the impact on toll revenue due to discounts for
frequent users, students, senior citizens, and low-income families.
The study will be delivered to the transportation committees of the
house of representatives and senate by June 30, 2006.

--- END ---