BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.85.011 and 1994 c 249 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that administrative rules adopted by state
agencies can have a disproportionate impact on the state's small
businesses, particularly those providing housing, because of the size
of those businesses and the regulations imposed upon them. This
disproportionate impact reduces competition, innovation, employment,
and new employment opportunities, and threatens the very existence of
some small businesses. Further, because most providers of housing are
small businesses, this disproportionate impact upon them significantly
reduces the availability of housing to Washington residents,
particularly those with lower incomes and middle incomes. The
legislature therefore enacts the Regulatory Fairness Act with the
intent of reducing the disproportionate impact of state administrative
rules on small business and housing.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.85.020 and 2003 c 166 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply through this chapter.
(1) "Housing" means residential housing that is rented or owned by
a person or household.
(2) "Housing impact statement" means a statement meeting the
requirements of RCW 19.85.040 prepared by a state agency pursuant to
RCW 19.85.030.
(3) "Industry" means all of the businesses in this state in any one
four-digit standard industrial classification as published by the
United States department of commerce. However, if the use of a four-digit standard industrial classification would result in the release of
data that would violate state confidentiality laws, "industry" means
all businesses in a three-digit standard industrial classification.
(4) "Provider of housing" means a business that engages, in whole
or in any part, in the development and building of housing.
(5) "Significant adverse impact on housing" means causing an
increase of five percent or more on the cost on housing, or on the cost
of a component of housing.
(6) "Small business" means any business entity, including a sole
proprietorship, corporation, partnership, or other legal entity, that
is owned and operated independently from all other businesses, and that
has fifty or fewer employees.
(((2))) (7) "Small business economic impact statement" means a
statement meeting the requirements of RCW 19.85.040 prepared by a state
agency pursuant to RCW 19.85.030.
(((3) "Industry" means all of the businesses in this state in any
one four-digit standard industrial classification as published by the
United States department of commerce. However, if the use of a four-digit standard industrial classification would result in the release of
data that would violate state confidentiality laws, "industry" means
all businesses in a three-digit standard industrial classification.))

Sec. 3 RCW 19.85.025 and 1997 c 409 s 212 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Unless an agency receives a written objection to the expedited
repeal of a rule, this chapter does not apply to a rule proposed for
expedited repeal pursuant to RCW ((34.05.354)) 34.05.353. If an agency
receives a written objection to expedited repeal of the rule, this
chapter applies to the rule-making proceeding.
(2) This chapter does not apply to a rule proposed for expedited
adoption under RCW ((34.05.230 (1) through (8))) 34.05.353, unless a
written objection is timely filed with the agency and the objection is
not withdrawn.
(3) This chapter does not apply to the adoption of a rule described
in RCW 34.05.310(4).
(4) An agency is not required to prepare a separate small business
economic impact statement or a housing impact statement under RCW
19.85.040 if it prepared an analysis under RCW 34.05.328 that meets the
requirements of a small business economic impact statement or a housing
impact statement, respectively, and if the agency reduced the costs
imposed by the rule on small business or the significant adverse impact
on housing to the extent required by RCW 19.85.030(((3))) (2). The
portion of the analysis that meets the requirements of RCW 19.85.040
shall be filed with the code reviser and provided to any person
requesting it in lieu of a separate small business economic impact
statement or housing impact statement.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.85.030 and 2000 c 171 s 60 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In the adoption of a rule under chapter 34.05 RCW, an agency
shall prepare:
(a) A small business economic impact statement: (((a)))(i) If the
proposed rule will impose more than minor costs on businesses in an
industry; or (((b)))(ii) if requested to do so by a majority vote of
the joint administrative rules review committee within forty-five days
of receiving the notice of proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320; or
(b) A housing impact statement if the proposed rule will have a
significant adverse impact on housing. However, if the agency has
completed the pilot rule process as defined by RCW 34.05.313 before
filing the notice of a proposed rule, the agency is not required to
prepare a small business economic impact statement or a housing impact
statement.
An agency shall prepare the small business economic impact
statement or housing impact statement in accordance with RCW 19.85.040,
and file it with the code reviser along with the notice required under
RCW 34.05.320. An agency shall file a statement prepared at the
request of the joint administrative rules review committee with the
code reviser upon its completion before the adoption of the rule. An
agency shall provide a copy of the small business economic impact
statement or housing impact statement to any person requesting it.
If a housing impact statement is required to be prepared, it may be
included as a component of a small business economic impact statement.
(2) The governor's housing advisory board, in consultation with the
homebuilding industry, shall develop guidelines to assist agencies in
determining whether a proposed rule will create a significant adverse
impact on housing, and therefore require preparation of a housing
impact statement. The department of community, trade, and economic
development may review an agency determination that a proposed rule
will not have such an impact, and shall advise the joint administrative
rules review committee on disputes involving agency determinations
under this section.
(3) Based upon the extent of disproportionate impact on small
business or the extent of the significant adverse impact on housing
identified in the statement prepared under RCW 19.85.040, the agency
shall, where legal and feasible in meeting the stated objectives of the
statutes upon which the rule is based, reduce the costs imposed by the
rule on small businesses or reduce the significant adverse impact on
housing. Methods to reduce the costs on small businesses or reduce the
significant adverse impact on housing may include:
(a) Reducing, modifying, or eliminating substantive regulatory
requirements;
(b) Simplifying, reducing, or eliminating recordkeeping and
reporting requirements;
(c) Reducing the frequency of inspections;
(d) Delaying compliance timetables;
(e) Reducing or modifying fine schedules for noncompliance; or
(f) Any other mitigation techniques.

Sec. 5 RCW 19.85.040 and 1995 c 403 s 403 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A small business economic impact statement and housing impact
statement must include a brief description of the reporting, record
keeping, and other compliance requirements of the proposed rule, and
the kinds of professional services that a small business or provider of
housing is likely to need in order to comply with such requirements.
It shall analyze the costs of compliance for businesses or providers of
housing required to comply with the proposed rule adopted pursuant to
RCW 34.05.320, including costs of equipment, supplies, labor,
financing, and increased administrative costs. It shall consider,
based on input received, whether compliance with the rule will cause
businesses or providers of housing to lose sales or revenue. To
determine whether the proposed rule will have a disproportionate impact
on small businesses or the affordability of housing, the impact
statement must compare the cost of compliance for small business or
providers of housing with the cost of compliance for the ten percent of
businesses or providers of housing that are the largest businesses or
providers of housing required to comply with the proposed rules using
one or more of the following as a basis for comparing costs:
(a) Cost per employee;
(b) Cost per hour of labor; ((or))
(c) Cost per one hundred dollars of sales; or
(d) Cost per unit of housing.
(2) ((A small business economic)) An impact statement must also
include:
(a) A statement of the steps taken by the agency to reduce the
costs of the rule on small businesses or providers of housing as
required by RCW 19.85.030(3), or reasonable justification for not doing
so, addressing the options listed in RCW 19.85.030(3);
(b) A description of how the agency will involve small businesses
or providers of housing in the development of the rule; and
(c) A list of industries that will be required to comply with the
rule. However, this subsection (2)(c) shall not be construed to
preclude application of the rule to any business or industry to which
it would otherwise apply.
(3) To obtain information for purposes of this section, an agency
may survey a representative sample of affected businesses or trade
associations and should, whenever possible, appoint a committee under
RCW 34.05.310(2) to assist in the accurate assessment of the costs of
a proposed rule, and the means to reduce the costs imposed on small
business or providers of housing.

Sec. 6 RCW 19.85.050 and 1989 c 175 s 74 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Within one year after June 10, 1982, each agency shall publish
and deliver to the office of financial management and to all persons
who make requests of the agency for a copy of a plan to periodically
review all rules then in effect and which have been issued by the
agency which have an economic impact on more than twenty percent of all
industries or ten percent of the businesses in any one industry. Such
plan may be amended by the agency at any time by publishing a revision
to the review plan and delivering such revised plan to the office of
financial management and to all persons who make requests of the agency
for the plan. The purpose of the review is to determine whether such
rules should be continued without change or should be amended or
rescinded, consistent with the stated objectives of applicable
statutes, to minimize the economic impact on small businesses and
providers of housing as described by this chapter. The plan shall
provide for the review of all such agency rules in effect on June 10,
1982, within ten years of that date.
(2) In reviewing rules to minimize any significant economic impact
of the rule on small businesses and any significant adverse impact on
housing as described by this chapter, and in a manner consistent with
the stated objectives of applicable statutes, the agency shall consider
the following factors:
(a) The continued need for the rule;
(b) The nature of complaints or comments received concerning the
rule from the public;
(c) The complexity of the rule;
(d) The extent to which the rule overlaps, duplicates, or conflicts
with other state or federal rules, and, to the extent feasible, with
local governmental rules; and
(e) The degree to which technology, economic conditions, or other
factors have changed in the subject area affected by the rule.
(3) Each year each agency shall publish a list of rules which are
to be reviewed pursuant to this section during the next twelve months
and deliver a copy of the list to the office of financial management
and all persons who make requests of the agency for the list. The list
shall include a brief description of the legal basis for each rule as
described by RCW 34.05.360, and shall invite public comment upon the
rule.

Sec. 7 RCW 19.85.070 and 1992 c 197 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
When any rule is proposed for which a small business economic
impact statement or a housing impact statement is required, the
adopting agency shall provide notice to small businesses or providers
of housing of the proposed rule through any of the following:
(1) Direct notification of known interested small businesses,
providers of housing, or trade organizations affected by the proposed
rule; or
(2) Providing information of the proposed rule making to
publications likely to be obtained by small businesses or providers of
housing of the types affected by the proposed rule.

--- END ---