BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Vision is one of the primary senses used in the early learning
process;
(2) Vision problems affecting preschool and school-age children can
impact a child's ability to learn;
(3) Economically disadvantaged children have less access to health
care and therefore, may have a proportionally greater likelihood of
having undiagnosed vision problems that may affect their ability to
learn;
(4) Vision problems in young children can be misinterpreted as
neurodevelopmental delay or as learning disabilities; and
(5) Current screening for visual acuity at distance is insufficient
to detect all vision defects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.210
RCW to read as follows:
(1) For a child who is diagnosed with a learning disability after
September 1, 2006, a parent or guardian shall provide to school health
personnel proof that the child has received a comprehensive eye
examination performed by a licensed optometrist or ophthalmologist
chosen by the child's parent or guardian. Consideration should be
given to testing binocular vision, accommodation, and convergence.
Proof of a comprehensive eye examination having been performed within
the previous twelve months of the diagnosis of a learning disability is
sufficient under this section.
(2) Schools and school districts shall inform parents of the eye
examination required under this section and shall, to the extent
practical, assist parents of children who do not have access to
adequate insurance coverage by providing information regarding
resources for eye examinations.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall collect and
disseminate to school districts information regarding resources for
low-cost or no-cost comprehensive eye examinations, including contact
information for the optometric physicians of Washington and the
Washington academy of eye physicians and surgeons.

--- END ---