BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A county legislative authority may request
inclusion in the cougar control pilot project authorized by chapter
264, Laws of 2004 after taking the following actions:
(1) Adopting a resolution that requests inclusion in the pilot
project;
(2) Documenting the need to participate in the pilot project by
identifying the number of cougar/human encounters and livestock and pet
depredations; and
(3) Demonstrating that existing cougar depredation permits, public
safety cougar hunts, or other existing wildlife management tools have
not been sufficient to deal with cougar incidents in the county.

--- END ---