BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of
motor vehicles that are designed and constructed specifically to
provide emergency services other than law enforcement services,
including medical-aid vehicles, ambulances, and fire engines, that are
sold to a local government.
(2) A local government taking the exemption under this section must
keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under
this section. The exemption is available only when the buyer provides
the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The seller shall retain a copy of the
certificate for the seller's files.
(3) For the purposes of this section and section 2 of this act, the
following definitions apply:
(a) "Local government" means any rural county or any city, town,
public hospital district, fire protection district, regional fire
protection service authority, or emergency medical service district,
located primarily within a rural county.
(b) "Rural county" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
82.14.370.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply with respect to
the use of motor vehicles that are designed and constructed
specifically to provide emergency services other than law enforcement
services, including medical-aid vehicles, ambulances, and fire engines,
by a local government.
(2) The definitions in section 1 of this act apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---