BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A credit is allowed against the tax due under this chapter for
an employer that offers a high deductible health plan in conjunction
with contributions to employee health savings accounts. The credit is
equal to fifty dollars per employee per month in the reporting period.
(2) No application is necessary for the credit. The person must
keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under
this section. This information includes:
(a) Employment records for the previous four years;
(b) Copies of the health insurance certificate provided to the
employees; and
(c) Documentation that evidences contributions to health savings
accounts.
(3) No refunds shall be granted for credits under this section, but
credits may be carried over to subsequent years until used.
(4) For the purpose of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Employee" means a person working in a full-time position
covered under a high deductible health plan.
(b) "Health savings account" and "high deductible health plan" have
the same meanings as provided in 26 U.S.C. Sec. 223.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---