BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.70.150 and 2001 c 253 s 58 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A sea urchin dive fishery license is required to take sea
urchins for commercial purposes. A sea urchin dive fishery license
authorizes the use of only one diver in the water at any time during
sea urchin harvest operations. If the same vessel has been designated
on two sea urchin dive fishery licenses, two divers may be in the
water. A natural person may not hold more than two sea urchin dive
fishery licenses.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the
director shall issue no new sea urchin dive fishery licenses. For
licenses issued for the year 2000 and thereafter, the director shall
renew existing licenses only to a natural person who held the license
at the end of the previous year. If a sea urchin dive fishery license
is not held by a natural person as of December 31, 1999, it is not
renewable. However, if the license is not held because of revocation
or suspension of licensing privileges, the director shall renew the
license in the name of a natural person at the end of the revocation or
suspension if the license holder applies for renewal of the license
before the end of the year in which the revocation or suspension ends.
(3) Where a licensee failed to obtain the license during the
previous year because of a license suspension or revocation by the
director or the court, the licensee may qualify for a license by
establishing that the person held such a license during the last year
in which the person was eligible.
(4) Surcharges as provided for in this section shall be collected
and deposited into the sea urchin dive fishery account hereby created
in the custody of the state treasurer. Only the director or the
director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The
sea urchin dive fishery account is subject to allotment procedures
under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
expenditures. Expenditures from the account shall only be used to
retire sea urchin licenses until the number of licenses is reduced to
twenty-five, and thereafter shall only be used for sea urchin
management and enforcement.
(a) A surcharge of one hundred dollars shall be charged with each
sea urchin dive fishery license renewal for licenses issued in 2000
through ((2005)) 2010.
(b) For licenses issued for the year 2000 and thereafter, a
surcharge shall be charged on the sea urchin dive fishery license for
designating an alternate operator. The surcharge shall be as follows:
Five hundred dollars for the first year or each of the first two
consecutive years after 1999 that any alternate operator is designated
and two thousand five hundred dollars each year thereafter that any
alternate operator is designated.
(5) Sea urchin dive fishery licenses are transferable. After
December 31, 1999, there is a surcharge to transfer a sea urchin dive
fishery license. The surcharge is five hundred dollars for the first
transfer of a license valid for calendar year 2000, and two thousand
five hundred dollars for any subsequent transfer, whether occurring in
the year 2000 or thereafter. Notwithstanding this subsection, a one-time transfer exempt from surcharge applies for a transfer from the
natural person licensed on January 1, 2000, to that person's spouse or
child.
(6) If fewer than twenty-five natural persons are eligible for sea
urchin dive fishery licenses, the director may accept applications for
new licenses. The additional licenses may not cause more than twenty-five natural persons to be eligible for a sea urchin dive fishery
license. New licenses issued under this section shall be distributed
according to rules of the department that recover the value of such
licensed privilege.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.70.190 and 2001 c 253 s 59 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A sea cucumber dive fishery license is required to take sea
cucumbers for commercial purposes. A sea cucumber dive fishery license
authorizes the use of only one diver in the water at any time during
sea cucumber harvest operations. If the same vessel has been
designated on two sea cucumber dive fishery licenses, two divers may be
in the water. A natural person may not hold more than two sea cucumber
dive fishery licenses.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the
director shall issue no new sea cucumber dive fishery licenses. For
licenses issued for the year 2000 and thereafter, the director shall
renew existing licenses only to a natural person who held the license
at the end of the previous year. If a sea cucumber dive fishery
license is not held by a natural person as of December 31, 1999, it is
not renewable. However, if the license is not held because of
revocation or suspension of licensing privileges, the director shall
renew the license in the name of a natural person at the end of the
revocation or suspension if the license holder applies for renewal of
the license before the end of the year in which the revocation or
suspension ends.
(3) Where a licensee failed to obtain the license during either of
the previous two years because of a license suspension by the director
or the court, the licensee may qualify for a license by establishing
that the person held such a license during the last year in which the
person was eligible.
(4) Surcharges as provided for in this section shall be collected
and deposited into the sea cucumber dive fishery account hereby created
in the custody of the state treasurer. Only the director or the
director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The
sea cucumber dive fishery account is subject to allotment procedures
under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
expenditures. Expenditures from the account shall only be used to
retire sea cucumber licenses until the number of licenses is reduced to
twenty-five, and thereafter shall only be used for sea cucumber
management and enforcement.
(a) A surcharge of one hundred dollars shall be charged with each
sea cucumber dive fishery license renewal for licenses issued in 2000
through ((2005)) 2010.
(b) For licenses issued for the year 2000 and thereafter, a
surcharge shall be charged on the sea cucumber dive fishery license for
designating an alternate operator. The surcharge shall be as follows:
Five hundred dollars for the first year or each of the first two
consecutive years after 1999 that any alternate operator is designated
and two thousand five hundred dollars each year thereafter that any
alternate operator is designated.
(5) Sea cucumber dive fishery licenses are transferable. After
December 31, 1999, there is a surcharge to transfer a sea cucumber dive
fishery license. The surcharge is five hundred dollars for the first
transfer of a license valid for calendar year 2000 and two thousand
five hundred dollars for any subsequent transfer whether occurring in
the year 2000 or thereafter. Notwithstanding this subsection, a one-time transfer exempt from surcharge applies for a transfer from the
natural person licensed on January 1, 2000, to that person's spouse or
child.
(6) If fewer than twenty-five persons are eligible for sea cucumber
dive fishery licenses, the director may accept applications for new
licenses. The additional licenses may not cause more than twenty-five
natural persons to be eligible for a sea cucumber dive fishery license.
New licenses issued under this section shall be distributed according
to rules of the department that recover the value of such licensed
privilege.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.27.020 and 2001 c 320 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to all other taxes, licenses, or fees provided by
law there is established an excise tax on the commercial possession of
enhanced food fish as provided in this chapter. The tax is levied upon
and shall be collected from the owner of the enhanced food fish whose
possession constitutes the taxable event. The taxable event is the
first possession in Washington by an owner after the enhanced food fish
has been landed. Processing and handling of enhanced food fish by a
person who is not the owner is not a taxable event to the processor or
handler.
(2) A person in possession of enhanced food fish and liable to this
tax may deduct from the price paid to the person from which the
enhanced food fish (except oysters) are purchased an amount equal to a
tax at one-half the rate levied in this section upon these products.
(3) The measure of the tax is the value of the enhanced food fish
at the point of landing.
(4) The tax shall be equal to the measure of the tax multiplied by
the rates for enhanced food fish as follows:
(a) Chinook, coho, and chum salmon and anadromous game fish: Five
and twenty-five one-hundredths percent;
(b) Pink and sockeye salmon: Three and fifteen one-hundredths
percent;
(c) Other food fish and shellfish, except oysters, sea urchins, and
sea cucumbers: Two and one-tenth percent;
(d) Oysters: Eight one-hundredths of one percent;
(e) Sea urchins: Four and six-tenths percent through December 31,
((2005)) 2010, and two and one-tenth percent thereafter; and
(f) Sea cucumbers: Four and six-tenths percent through December
31, ((2005)) 2010, and two and one-tenth percent thereafter.
(5) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW
82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (4) of this
section.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.27.070 and 2003 c 39 s 46 are each amended to read
as follows:
All taxes collected by the department of revenue under this chapter
shall be deposited in the state general fund except for the excise tax
on anadromous game fish, which shall be deposited in the wildlife fund,
and, during the period January 1, 2000, to December 31, ((2005)) 2010,
twenty-five forty-sixths of the revenues derived from the excise tax on
sea urchins collected under RCW 82.27.020 shall be deposited into the
sea urchin dive fishery account created in RCW 77.70.150, and twenty-five forty-sixths of the revenues derived from the excise tax on sea
cucumbers collected under RCW 82.27.020 shall be deposited into the sea
cucumber dive fishery account created in RCW 77.70.190.

--- END ---