BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that first-time home
buyers in Washington state have been priced out of the housing market
in many counties. The legislature finds that many organizations,
including local governments, have recognized the affordable housing
crisis for first-time home buyers. The legislature finds that, for
example, as reported in King county's benchmark growth report, "buying
a first home remains extremely difficult for those under one hundred
twenty percent of median income." The legislature further finds that
impact fees contribute to the high cost of housing in many Washington
counties, and that eliminating these fees will reduce housing prices.
The legislature intends to make housing more affordable for first-time
home buyers in counties where housing is currently not affordable for
first-time home buyers. The legislature intends to do this by
eliminating impact fees in counties where the first-time buyer housing
affordability index demonstrates that housing is not affordable for
first-time home buyers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As used in this chapter, "first-time buyer housing
affordability index" means the index determined by the Washington
center for real estate research that measures the ability of a typical
renter household to afford the purchase of a typical starter home by
assuming: (a) The household will purchase a home priced at eighty-five
percent of area median with a ten percent down payment; (b) the home
mortgage loan is for a term of thirty years at the prevailing average
fixed rate of interest; (c) the potential first-time home buyer earns
seventy percent of the area median household income and twenty-five
percent of household income can be used for principal and interest
payments.
(2) For purposes of this chapter, a first-time buyer housing
affordability index of: (a) One hundred indicates that a household of
the defined income can afford a home of the defined price; (b) less
than one hundred indicates that a household of the defined income
cannot afford a home of the defined price without spending more than
twenty-five percent of their income on mortgage payments; and (c)
greater than one hundred indicates that a household of the defined
income can afford a home of the defined price while spending less than
twenty-five percent of their income on mortgage payments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In any county in which the first-time buyer housing
affordability index, as defined in section 2 of this act and as
determined by the Washington center for real estate research at
Washington State University, is less than one hundred for three
quarters in any given year, the county and cities located within the
county shall not collect impact fees under this chapter for the
following two years.
(2) The year-long period measured by the Washington center for real
estate research under subsection (1) of this section shall begin and
end in the third quarter of the calendar year. The time period for
which the ability to collect impact fees under this chapter is
suspended under subsection (1) of this section begins January 1st of
the year following the determination by the Washington center for real
estate research.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.02.100 and 1992 c 219 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person required to pay a fee pursuant to RCW 43.21C.060 for
system improvements shall not be required to pay an impact fee under
RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090 for those same system improvements.
(2) A county prohibited from imposing a fee for system improvements
under section 3 of this act may not impose a fee under RCW 43.21C.060
for those same system improvements.
(3) A county prohibited from imposing a fee for system improvements
under section 3 of this act may not require a dedication of land under
RCW 58.17.110 for those same system improvements.

--- END ---