BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends that athletic
programs authorized under RCW 28B.10.703 reflect positively upon the
colleges or universities of which they are part. Academic excellence,
the integrity of honest competition, and the health of student-athletes, must not be subordinated to the pursuit of athletic success.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Student-athlete" means an individual who engages in, is
eligible to engage in, or may be eligible in the future to engage in,
any intercollegiate athletic program.
(b) "Team medical professional" means any medical professional with
prescription-writing authority who meets the definition of practitioner
under RCW 69.41.010 and who student-athletes have access to through an
intercollegiate athletic program.
(2) Intercollegiate athletic programs must formally contract with
team medical professionals. The contract must include provisions
stating that: (a) The athletic program will accept liability for the
actions of team medical professionals relative to student-athletes; and
(b) the duty of the team medical professional to safeguard the health
of a student-athlete trumps any considerations of athletic or team
success. Before a contract may be signed, the team medical
professional must submit to a criminal background check and a review of
his or her medical malpractice history by an assistant attorney general
assigned to the college or university.
(3) Team medical professionals may not directly dispense any
prescription pharmaceuticals to student-athletes for a course of
treatment that lasts longer than one day. A student-athlete must fill
a prescription written by a team medical professional through a
pharmacy licensed under chapter 18.64 RCW.
(4) At least once a month, without identifying student-athletes, a
team medical professional must issue to the athletic director of the
college or university a report detailing all prescriptions for Schedule
II drugs under RCW 69.50.206 written by the team medical professional
for that reporting period.
(5) A team medical professional may not prescribe Schedule II drugs
under RCW 69.50.206 to a student-athlete for a course of treatment that
lasts longer than two weeks, unless the team medical professional
consults with another medical professional who works outside the
athletic program and who agrees that the prescription is necessary.
The agreement must be made in writing and included with the report
required in subsection (4) of this section.

--- END ---