BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.62.020 and 1986 c 116 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
Application for tax credits under this chapter must be made
((before)) within ninety consecutive days after the actual hiring of
qualified employment positions. The application shall be made to the
department in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The
application shall contain information regarding the location of the
business project, the applicant's average employment, if any, at the
facility for the prior year, estimated or actual new employment related
to the project, estimated or actual wages of employees related to the
project, estimated or actual costs, time schedules for completion and
operation, and other information required by the department. The
department shall rule on the application within sixty days.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2006.

--- END ---