BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purpose of this act is to define
workplace bullying, encourage employers to voluntarily enact policies
to eliminate workplace bullying, and conduct further study of the
impacts on society related to workplace bullying.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Nothing in this act creates a legal right or
cause of action. Nothing in this act denies or alters any existing
legal right or cause of action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) For the purposes of this act, workplace
bullying is conduct that: (a) A reasonable person would find hostile
or offensive and unrelated to an employer's legitimate business
interests; and (b) causes physical or psychological harm to the
employee.
(2) Workplace bullying includes but is not limited to:
(a) Repeated infliction of verbal abuse such as the use of
derogatory remarks, insults, and epithets;
(b) Verbal or physical conduct that a reasonable person would find
threatening, intimidating, or humiliating;
(c) The gratuitous sabotage or undermining of an employee's work
performance; and
(d) A single act of workplace bullying that is especially severe
and egregious.
(3) The legislature encourages employers to develop and implement:
(a) Educational programs designed to address workplace bullying; and
(b) codes of conduct and internal enforcement processes that
specifically address workplace bullying.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The sum of forty thousand dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the general fund
to the employment security department for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2006, to carry out the purposes of this act by conducting a study
of workplace bullying, including but not limited to the incidence,
frequency, scope, and effect of abusive work environments. The
employment security department shall present the results of the study
to the legislature by December 1, 2005.

--- END ---