BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.01.012 and 2002 c 5 s 101 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature to establish policy goals
for the planning, operation, performance of, and investment in, the
state's transportation system. The policy goals shall ((consist of,
but not be limited to, the following benchmark categories,)) be
consistent with the benchmark categories adopted by the state's Blue
Ribbon Commission on Transportation on November 30, 2000. In addition
to improving safety, public investments in transportation shall support
achievement of these and other priority goals:
((No interstate highways, state routes, and local arterials shall
be in poor condition; no bridges shall be structurally deficient, and
safety retrofits shall be performed on those state bridges at the
highest seismic risk levels; traffic congestion on urban state highways
shall be significantly reduced and be no worse than the national mean;
delay per driver shall be significantly reduced and no worse than the
national mean; per capita vehicle miles traveled shall be maintained at
2000 levels; the nonauto share of commuter trips shall be increased in
urban areas; administrative costs as a percentage of transportation
spending shall achieve the most efficient quartile nationally; and the
state's public transit agencies shall achieve the median cost per
vehicle revenue hour of peer transit agencies, adjusting for the
regional cost-of-living.))
(a) Maintaining the existing system. The state's transportation
system, including interstate highways, state routes, bridges, and local
arterials, shall be maintained and preserved at an optimal percentage
life-cycle rating;
(b) Managing the existing system. The performance of the state's
transportation system shall be measured, and transportation agencies
will manage to achieve levels of service that improve system
performance over time for all transportation users; and
(c) Investing in the system. Capacity investment decisions
relating to the state's transportation system shall optimize
performance for multiple modes of use and be based on differential
performance standards for off-peak and peak hours.
(2) These policy goals shall be the basis for establishment of
detailed and measurable performance benchmarks.
(3) It is the intent of the legislature that the transportation
commission, its successor entity, or any other citizen oversight panel
created by the legislature, shall establish performance measures to
ensure transportation system performance meets the goals established in
subsection (1) of this section at local, regional, and state government
levels, and the transportation commission should work with appropriate
government entities to accomplish this.
(4) It is further the intent of the legislature that the
transportation commission, or its successor entity, will include in its
biennial budget submission to the legislature the percentage life-cycle
ratings, transportation service levels, and performance standards
funded by the proposed budget. In adopting the final budget, the
legislature will make such changes to those standards as it feels
necessary to balance the transportation needs and economic capabilities
of the state and document the resulting changes to the budget findings.

--- END ---