BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of
replacement parts for, or services rendered in respect to, machinery
and equipment used by a farmer, if the machinery and equipment is
designed for the purpose of growing, raising, or producing agricultural
products.
(2) The person taking the exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(3) For the purposes of this section and section 2 of this act, the
following definitions apply:
(a) "Farmer" and "agricultural products" have the same meaning as
provided in RCW 82.04.213.
(b) "Services" means labor for repairs, maintenance, or the
replacement of parts, for machinery and equipment used by a farmer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of replacement parts for, or services rendered in respect to,
machinery and equipment used by a farmer, if the machinery and
equipment is designed for the purpose of growing, raising, or producing
agricultural products.
(2) The definitions in section 1 of this act apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---