BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that there is a
backlog of people waiting to participate in the hunter education
training program created in RCW 77.32.155. The purpose of this act is
to require the department of fish and wildlife to expand the program so
as to reduce the current backlog, and provide adequate space for new
participants in the future.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.32 RCW
to read as follows:
The department is directed to increase the number of courses
providing the hunter education training program created in RCW
77.32.155. The department must reduce the current backlog of
applicants waiting to take the training program, and provide for a
stable supply of training program courses in order to avoid future
backlogs.

--- END ---