BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The association of Washington generals is organized as a
private, nonprofit, nonpartisan, corporation in accordance with chapter
24.03 RCW and this section.
(2) The purpose of the association of Washington generals is to:
(a) Provide the state a means of extending formal recognition for
an individual's outstanding services to the state; and
(b) Bring together those individuals to serve the state as
ambassadors of trade, tourism, and international goodwill.
(3) The association of Washington generals may conduct activities
in support of their mission, including but not limited to:
(a) Establishing selection criteria for selecting Washington
generals;
(b) Operating a statewide essay competition;
(c) Training Washington generals as ambassadors of the state of
Washington, nationally and internationally; and
(d) Promoting Washington generals as ambassadors of the state of
Washington.
(4) The association of Washington generals is governed by a board
of directors. The board is composed of the governor, lieutenant
governor, and the secretary of state, who serve as ex officio,
nonvoting members, and other officers and members as the association of
Washington generals designates. The board shall:
(a) Review nominations for and be responsible for the selection of
Washington generals; and
(b) Establish the title of honorary Washington general to honor
worthy individuals from outside the state of Washington.
(5) The lieutenant governor's office may provide technical and
financial assistance for the association of Washington generals.
(6) The legislature may make appropriations in support of the
Washington generals subject to the availability of funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW
to read as follows:
The association of Washington generals may use the image of the
Washington state flag to promote the mission of the organization as set
forth under section 1 of this act. The association retains any revenue
generated by the use of the image.

--- END ---