BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state is home
to an extensive trail network that accommodates a physically active and
demographically diverse public. An important community resource, this
network of trails provides pathways through which people can experience
our unique wilderness lands. The legislature further finds that
nonprofit organizations play a vital role in building and maintaining
Washington's hiking trail network. The legislature declares that it is
in the public interest to encourage these nonprofit organizations
through the provision of tax relief. The tax relief provided by this
act reduces the tax burden on nonprofit organizations that build and
maintain trails and increases the impact and effectiveness of trail
building and maintenance activities provided by these organizations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to amounts received by nonprofit
organizations, as defined in subsection (2) of this section, from the
United States or any of its instrumentalities, the state of Washington
or any of its municipal corporations or political subdivisions, or from
another nonprofit organization for the constructing or reconstructing
of trails or trail maintenance activities.
(2) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Nonprofit organization" means an organization exempt from tax
under section 501(c)(3) or (4) of the federal internal revenue code (26
U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) or (4)).
(b) "Trail maintenance activities" include removing plants or tree
limbs encroaching on the trailway; restoring tread, including the
removal of slough from a trail, returning a trail to its proper width,
removing organic matter, removing protruding roots and rocks, restoring
the outslope of a trail, and removing berms from the outside edge of a
trail; constructing, repairing, or improving raised trail structures
such as turnpikes or puncheon; clearing ditches, drain-dips, and
culverts, constructing, installing, repairing, and improving drainage
structures such as culverts, drain-dips, waterbars, and check-dams;
clearing puncheon, turnpikes, curb logs, and bridges of dirt and
plants; blocking off social trails; rerouting trails; postexcavation
cleanup; naturalizing abandoned trails, removing trash near trailheads;
and recruiting volunteers, educating and training the volunteers in
techniques of trail maintenance, and supervising and monitoring the
volunteers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of
or charge made for: (a) Labor and services rendered in respect to the
construction or reconstruction of trails or to trail maintenance
activities provided by a nonprofit organization; or (b) tangible
personal property incorporated as ingredients or components of trails
during the construction or reconstruction of trails or performance of
trail maintenance services, if the sales or charges are made by or to
a nonprofit organization.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "trail maintenance
activities" and "nonprofit organization" have the same meaning as
provided in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of: (a) Labor and services rendered in respect to the construction
or reconstruction of trails or to trail maintenance activities if such
labor and services are provided by a nonprofit organization; or (b)
tangible personal property incorporated as ingredients or components of
trails during the construction or reconstruction of trails or
performance of trail maintenance services by a nonprofit organization.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "trail maintenance
activities" and "nonprofit organization" have the same meaning as
provided in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---