BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that insurance fraud
is inimical to public safety, welfare, and order within the state of
Washington. Insurance fraud increases insurance premiums, to the
detriment of individual policyholders, small businesses, large
corporations, and governmental entities. All Washingtonians ultimately
bear the societal burdens and costs caused by those who commit
insurance fraud.
The insurance commissioner and the attorney general, together,
shall study the extent of insurance fraud in Washington and the current
laws which are in place to combat insurance fraud. In studying this
issue, consideration should also be given to the experiences and
approaches taken by other states in fighting fraud. Recommendations
should address, among other things: What changes in law are necessary
to more effectively fight insurance fraud; whether Washington should
establish a dedicated insurance fraud bureau; where such a bureau
should be located; the resources which would be necessary to establish
such a bureau; and the potential sources of funding.
In the conduct of this study, the insurance commissioner and the
attorney general shall consult with insurance carriers; insurance
agents and brokers; public and independent adjusters; the association
of Washington business; the Washington state bar association; the
Washington state medical association; the American civil liberties
union; Columbia legal services; the Washington association of sheriffs
and police chiefs; the Washington state patrol; the state department of
health; the state department of labor and industries; and
representatives of local governments.
The insurance commissioner and the attorney general shall report
the results of this study to the legislature not later than December 1,
2005.

--- END ---