BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.95.420 and 2002 c 174 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, before the
expiration of the minimum term, as part of the end of sentence review
process under RCW 72.09.340, 72.09.345, and where appropriate,
72.09.370, the department shall conduct, and the offender shall
participate in, an examination of the offender, incorporating
methodologies that are recognized by experts in the prediction of
sexual dangerousness, ((and)) including a prediction of the probability
that the offender will engage in sex offenses if released, and a
determination of whether the offender has a congenital or acquired
condition affecting the emotional or volitional capacity which
predisposes the offender to the commission of criminal sexual acts in
a degree constituting such offender a menace to the health and safety
of others.
(b) The board may contract for an additional, independent
examination, subject to the standards in this section.
(c) If at the time the sentence is imposed by the superior court
the offender's minimum term has expired or will expire within one
hundred twenty days of the sentencing hearing, the department shall
conduct, within ninety days of the offender's arrival at a department
of corrections facility, and the offender shall participate in, an
examination of the offender, incorporating methodologies that are
recognized by experts in the prediction of sexual dangerousness,
((and)) including a prediction of the probability that the offender
will engage in sex offenses if released, and a determination of whether
the offender has a congenital or acquired condition affecting the
emotional or volitional capacity which predisposes the offender to the
commission of criminal sexual acts in a degree constituting such
offender a menace to the health and safety of others.
(2) The board shall impose the conditions and instructions provided
for in RCW 9.94A.720. The board shall consider the department's
recommendations and may impose conditions in addition to those
recommended by the department. The board may impose or modify
conditions of community custody following notice to the offender.
(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, no later than
ninety days before expiration of the minimum term, but after the board
receives the results from the end of sentence review process and the
recommendations for additional or modified conditions of community
custody from the department, the board shall conduct a hearing to
determine whether it is more likely than not that the offender will
engage in sex offenses if released on conditions to be set by the
board. The board may consider an offender's failure to participate in
an evaluation under subsection (1) of this section in determining
whether to release the offender. The board shall order the offender
released, under such affirmative and other conditions as the board
determines appropriate, unless the board determines by a preponderance
of the evidence that, despite such conditions, it is more likely than
not that the offender will commit sex offenses if released. If the
board does not order the offender released, the board shall establish
a new minimum term, not to exceed an additional two years.
(b) If at the time the offender's minimum term has expired or will
expire within one hundred twenty days of the offender's arrival at a
department of correction's facility, then no later than one hundred
twenty days after the offender's arrival at a department of corrections
facility, but after the board receives the results from the end of
sentence review process and the recommendations for additional or
modified conditions of community custody from the department, the board
shall conduct a hearing to determine whether it is more likely than not
that the offender will engage in sex offenses if released on conditions
to be set by the board. The board may consider an offender's failure
to participate in an evaluation under subsection (1) of this section in
determining whether to release the offender. The board shall order the
offender released, under such affirmative and other conditions as the
board determines appropriate, unless the board determines by a
preponderance of the evidence that, despite such conditions, it is more
likely than not that the offender will commit sex offenses if released.
If the board does not order the offender released, the board shall
establish a new minimum term, not to exceed an additional two years.

--- END ---