BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.08 RCW
to read as follows:
A local board of health operating under this chapter must include
the mayor of the participating city and the county executive of the
participating county. The mayor and the county executive shall
alternately serve as chair of the local board of health.

--- END ---