BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that harmful algal
blooms can create serious environmental consequences for this state.
The legislature recognizes harmful algal blooms occur in fresh water,
marine water, and estuarine environments when certain algae grow
rapidly. The legislature finds harmful algal blooms can threaten
aquatic habitat and other aquatic organisms by depleting oxygen,
blocking sunlight, and degrading water quality.
(2) The legislature finds harmful algal blooms pose significant
health risks for animals and humans in this state. The legislature
recognizes that the algae in harmful algal blooms may release toxins
impacting both animal and human health. The legislature finds various
neurological, gastrointestinal, and other health problems may arise in
animals and humans from exposure to water with harmful algal blooms.
The legislature also finds that significant, potentially life-threatening health problems are associated with eating shellfish or
seafood contaminated with toxins from harmful algal blooms.
(3) The legislature recognizes that the federal centers for disease
control and prevention investigate the health effects of harmful algal
blooms and identify possible health effects of several types of harmful
algal blooms. Specifically, the legislature recognizes the federal
centers for disease control and prevention warn that:
(a) Persons drinking or swimming in water with high concentrations
of cyanobacteria, also known as blue-green algae, or its toxins may
experience gastroenteritis, skin irritation, allergic responses, or
liver damage;
(b) Persons eating shellfish with toxins from harmful marine algae,
associated with red tides, may experience neurological symptoms, and
susceptible persons who inhale these toxins may experience asthma
attacks; and
(c) Fish and marine mammals may be harmed or killed from exposure
to harmful marine algae.
(4) The legislature finds that animals and humans are vulnerable to
dangers associated with harmful algal blooms in this state. The
legislature recognizes that harmful algal blooms have occurred in
recent years in Washington's marine and fresh water environments. The
legislature recognizes that a harmful algal bloom of pseudonitzschia in
September 2004 was located fifteen miles off the northwest coast of
Washington and stretched across thirty miles. The legislature also
recognizes that Steilacoom Lake's repeated harmful algal blooms of
cyanobacteria in the last decade led to the local health department's
posting of public health warnings and are linked to the deaths of at
least two family pets.
(5) The legislature finds that immediate action is necessary to
address the significant public health threat associated with harmful
algal blooms in the state's lakes. The legislature finds that the
state's current approach to treating harmful algal blooms in lakes has
not proven effective to mitigate the dramatic risks to humans and
animals living near or recreating on the state's lakes. The
legislature therefore finds that the state must immediately pursue an
aggressive program to prevent or control harmful algal blooms in lakes.
The legislature further finds this program must address the causes of
harmful algal blooms in lakes and identify effective treatments and
actions to combat the deleterious effects of harmful algal blooms in
lakes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department is the lead agency for the prevention and
control of harmful algal blooms in lakes. The department's
responsibilities as the lead agency include, but are not limited to:
(a) Coordination of the prevention and control program, including
memorandums of understanding, contracts, and agreements with local,
state, federal, and tribal governmental entities and private parties;
(b) Preparation of a statewide harmful algae management plan for
the state's lakes developed in cooperation with local, state, federal,
and tribal governments, private landowners, and concerned citizens.
The plan shall prioritize areas for control. Nothing in this
subsection prohibits the department from taking action to prevent or
control harmful algal blooms in a particular area of the state in
accordance with a plan previously prepared by the state while preparing
the statewide plan; and
(c) Directing on-the-ground control efforts that include, but are
not limited to: Control work and contracts; harmful algae surveys;
collection and maintenance of harmful algae location data; purchasing
equipment, goods, and services; survey of threatened and endangered
species; site-specific environmental information and documents; and
evaluation of the effectiveness of control efforts.
(2) The department shall issue or approve water quality permits for
use by federal, state, or local government agencies, licensed
applicators, and private parties for the prevention and control of
harmful algal blooms. The department shall develop and implement an
expedited general permit process for treatments to prevent and control
harmful algal blooms in lakes. The department may not utilize the
permit authority in this subsection to otherwise condition or burden
efforts to prevent or control harmful algal blooms.
(3) The department shall submit a report on the harmful algal bloom
prevention and control program to the appropriate standing committees
of the house of representatives and the senate no later than December
15th of each year through 2010. The annual report must describe the:
(a) Progress of the program;
(b) Lakes and number of acres treated by various methods of
control;
(c) Funds spent; and
(d) Recommendations, if any, for legislative or regulatory changes
to facilitate harmful algal bloom prevention and control in lakes.
(4) The department may grant funds to other state agencies, local
governments, and nonprofit corporations for the prevention or control
of harmful algal blooms in lakes and may use those moneys itself. The
department may match private funds for prevention or control programs
on private property on a fifty-fifty matching basis. The accounting
and supervision of the funds at the local level must be conducted by
the department.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.48.447 and 1999 c 255 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of ecology shall update the final supplemental
environmental impact statement completed in 1992 for the aquatic plant
management program to reflect new information on herbicides evaluated
in 1992 and new, commercially available herbicides. The department
shall maintain the currency of the information on herbicides and
evaluate new herbicides as they become commercially available.
(2) For the ((1999)) 2005 treatment season, the department shall
((permit)) prepare a risk assessment to be completed by May 15,
((1999)) 2005, ((municipal)) for experimental ((application))
treatments of ((herbicides such as hydrothol 191 for)) calcium
hydroxide and carbon dioxide to form calcium carbonate as a mechanism
to address phosphorus concentrations and algae control in lakes
((managed under chapter 90.24 RCW. If experimental use is determined
to be ineffective, then the department shall within fourteen days
consult with other state, federal, and local agencies and interested
parties, and may permit the use of copper sulfate. The Washington
institute for public policy shall contract for a study on the lake-wide
effectiveness of any herbicide used under this subsection. Prior to
issuing the contract for the study, the institute for public policy
shall determine the parameters of the study in consultation with
licensed applicators who have recent experience treating the lake and
with the nonprofit corporation that participated in centennial clean
water fund phase one lake management studies for the lake. The
parameters must include measurement of the lake-wide effectiveness of
the application of the herbicide in maintaining beneficial uses of the
lake, including any uses designated under state or federal water
quality standards. The effectiveness of the application shall be
determined by objective criteria such as turbidity of the water, the
effectiveness in killing algae, any harm to fish or wildlife, any risk
to human health, or other criteria developed by the institute. The
results of the study shall be reported to the appropriate legislative
committees by December 1, 1999. A general fund appropriation in the
amount of $35,000 is provided to the Washington institute for public
policy for fiscal year 1999 for the study required under this
subsection)) in which harmful algal blooms have occurred within the
past three years. The department shall also prepare risk assessments
for other experimental treatments proposed to address phosphorus
concentrations and algae control in lakes in which harmful algal blooms
have occurred within the past three years.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.146.030 and 2004 c 277 s 909 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The water quality account is hereby created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be used only in a manner
consistent with this chapter. Moneys deposited in the account shall be
administered by the department of ecology and shall be subject to
legislative appropriation. Moneys placed in the account shall include
tax receipts as provided in RCW 82.24.027, 82.26.025, and 82.32.390,
principal and interest from the repayment of any loans granted pursuant
to this chapter, and any other moneys appropriated to the account by
the legislature.
(2) The department may use or permit the use of any moneys in the
account to make grants or loans to public bodies, including grants to
public bodies as cost-sharing moneys in any case where federal, local,
or other funds are made available on a cost-sharing basis, for water
pollution control facilities and activities, or for purposes of
assisting a public body to obtain an ownership interest in water
pollution control facilities and/or to defray a part of the payments
made by a public body to a service provider under a service agreement
entered into pursuant to RCW 70.150.060, within the purposes of this
chapter and for related administrative expenses. For the period July
1, 2003, to June 30, 2005, moneys in the account may be used to process
applications received by the department that seek to make changes to or
transfer existing water rights, for water conveyance projects, and for
grants and technical assistance to public bodies for watershed planning
under chapter 90.82 RCW. No more than three percent of the moneys
deposited in the account may be used by the department to pay for the
administration of the grant and loan program authorized by this
chapter.
(3) Ten percent of the moneys deposited into the water quality
account must be allocated for program activities that control and
prevent harmful algal blooms in lakes and to award grants to state
agencies, local governments, nonprofit corporations, firms, or any
other entity for the control and prevention of harmful algal blooms in
lakes. Grant funds may match private funds on an equal basis.
(4) Beginning with the biennium ending June 30, 1997, the
department shall present a biennial progress report on the use of
moneys from the account to the chairs of the senate committee on ways
and means and the house of representatives committee on appropriations.
The first report is due June 30, 1996, and the report for each
succeeding biennium is due December 31 of the odd-numbered year. The
report shall consist of a list of each recipient, project description,
and amount of the grant, loan, or both.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---