BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.34.108 and 2003 c 170 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When land has once been classified under this chapter, a
notation of the classification shall be made each year upon the
assessment and tax rolls and the land shall be valued pursuant to RCW
84.34.060 or 84.34.065 until removal of all or a portion of the
classification by the assessor upon occurrence of any of the following:
(a) Receipt of notice from the owner to remove all or a portion of
the classification;
(b) Sale or transfer to an ownership, except a transfer that
resulted from a default in loan payments made to or secured by a
governmental agency that intends to or is required by law or regulation
to resell the property for the same use as before, making all or a
portion of the land exempt from ad valorem taxation;
(c) Sale or transfer of all or a portion of the land to a new
owner, unless the new owner has signed a notice of classification
continuance, except transfer to an owner who is an heir or devisee of
a deceased owner shall not, by itself, result in removal of
classification. The notice of continuance shall be on a form prepared
by the department. If the notice of continuance is not signed by the
new owner and attached to the real estate excise tax affidavit, all
additional taxes calculated pursuant to subsection (4) of this section
shall become due and payable by the seller or transferor at time of
sale. The auditor shall not accept an instrument of conveyance
regarding classified land for filing or recording unless the new owner
has signed the notice of continuance or the additional tax has been
paid, as evidenced by the real estate excise tax stamp affixed thereto
by the treasurer. The seller, transferor, or new owner may appeal the
new assessed valuation calculated under subsection (4) of this section
to the county board of equalization in accordance with the provisions
of RCW 84.40.038. Jurisdiction is hereby conferred on the county board
of equalization to hear these appeals;
(d) Determination by the assessor, after giving the owner written
notice and an opportunity to be heard, that all or a portion of the
land no longer meets the criteria for classification under this
chapter. The criteria for classification pursuant to this chapter
continue to apply after classification has been granted.
The granting authority, upon request of an assessor, shall provide
reasonable assistance to the assessor in making a determination whether
the land continues to meet the qualifications of RCW 84.34.020 (1) or
(3). The assistance shall be provided within thirty days of receipt of
the request.
(2) Land may not be removed from classification because of:
(a) The creation, sale, or transfer of forestry riparian easements
under RCW 76.13.120; or
(b) The creation, sale, or transfer of a fee interest or a
conservation easement for the riparian open space program under RCW
76.09.040.
(3) Within thirty days after such removal of all or a portion of
the land from current use classification, the assessor shall notify the
owner in writing, setting forth the reasons for the removal. The
seller, transferor, or owner may appeal the removal to the county board
of equalization in accordance with the provisions of RCW 84.40.038.
(4) Unless the removal is reversed on appeal, the assessor shall
revalue the affected land with reference to its true and fair value on
January 1st of the year of removal from classification. Both the
assessed valuation before and after the removal of classification shall
be listed and taxes shall be allocated according to that part of the
year to which each assessed valuation applies. Except as provided in
subsection (6) of this section, an additional tax((,)) and applicable
interest((, and penalty)) shall be imposed which shall be due and
payable to the treasurer thirty days after the owner is notified of the
amount of the additional tax. As soon as possible, the assessor shall
compute the amount of additional tax((,)) and applicable interest((,
and penalty)) and the treasurer shall mail notice to the owner of the
amount thereof and the date on which payment is due. The amount of the
additional tax((,)) and applicable interest((, and penalty)) shall be
determined as follows:
(a) The amount of additional tax shall be equal to the difference
between the property tax paid as "open space land", "farm and
agricultural land", or "timber land" and the amount of property tax
otherwise due and payable for the seven years last past had the land
not been so classified or, for land classified as "farm and
agricultural land" for the last ten years, the difference between the
property tax paid as "farm and agricultural land" and the amount of
property tax otherwise due and payable for the three years last past
had the land not been so classified; and
(b) The amount of applicable interest shall be equal to the
interest upon the amounts of the additional tax paid at the same
statutory rate charged on delinquent property taxes from the dates on
which the additional tax could have been paid without penalty if the
land had been assessed at a value without regard to this chapter((;
(c) The amount of the penalty shall be as provided in RCW
84.34.080. The penalty shall not be imposed if the removal satisfies
the conditions of RCW 84.34.070)).
(5) Additional tax((,)) and applicable interest((, and penalty,))
shall become a lien on the land which shall attach at the time the land
is removed from classification under this chapter and shall have
priority to and shall be fully paid and satisfied before any
recognizance, mortgage, judgment, debt, obligation or responsibility to
or with which the land may become charged or liable. This lien may be
foreclosed upon expiration of the same period after delinquency and in
the same manner provided by law for foreclosure of liens for delinquent
real property taxes as provided in RCW 84.64.050 now or as hereafter
amended. Any additional tax unpaid on its due date shall thereupon
become delinquent. From the date of delinquency until paid, interest
shall be charged at the same rate applied by law to delinquent ad
valorem property taxes.
(6) The additional tax((,)) and applicable interest((, and
penalty)) specified in subsection (4) of this section shall not be
imposed if the removal of classification pursuant to subsection (1) of
this section resulted solely from:
(a) Transfer to a government entity in exchange for other land
located within the state of Washington;
(b)(i) A taking through the exercise of the power of eminent
domain, or (ii) sale or transfer to an entity having the power of
eminent domain in anticipation of the exercise of such power, said
entity having manifested its intent in writing or by other official
action;
(c) A natural disaster such as a flood, windstorm, earthquake, or
other such calamity rather than by virtue of the act of the landowner
changing the use of the property;
(d) Official action by an agency of the state of Washington or by
the county or city within which the land is located which disallows the
present use of the land;
(e) Transfer of land to a church when the land would qualify for
exemption pursuant to RCW 84.36.020;
(f) Acquisition of property interests by state agencies or agencies
or organizations qualified under RCW 84.34.210 and 64.04.130 for the
purposes enumerated in those sections. At such time as these property
interests are not used for the purposes enumerated in RCW 84.34.210 and
64.04.130 the additional tax specified in subsection (4) of this
section shall be imposed;
(g) Removal of land classified as farm and agricultural land under
RCW 84.34.020(2)(e);
(h) Removal of land from classification after enactment of a
statutory exemption that qualifies the land for exemption and receipt
of notice from the owner to remove the land from classification;
(i) The creation, sale, or transfer of forestry riparian easements
under RCW 76.13.120;
(j) The creation, sale, or transfer of a fee interest or a
conservation easement for the riparian open space program under RCW
76.09.040; or
(k) The sale or transfer of land within two years after the death
of the owner of at least a fifty percent interest in the land if the
land has been assessed and valued as classified forest land, designated
as forest land under chapter 84.33 RCW, or classified under this
chapter continuously since 1993. The date of death shown on a death
certificate is the date used for the purposes of this subsection
(6)(k)((; or
(l) The sale or transfer of land after the death of the owner of at
least a fifty percent interest in the land if the land has been
assessed and valued as classified forest land, designated as forest
land under chapter 84.33 RCW, or classified under this chapter
continuously since 1993 and the sale or transfer takes place after July
22, 2001, and on or before July 22, 2003, and the death of the owner
occurred after January 1, 1991. The date of death shown on a death
certificate is the date used for the purpose of this subsection
(6)(l))).

Sec. 2 RCW 84.34.055 and 1994 c 264 s 76 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The county legislative authority may direct the county planning
commission to set open space priorities and adopt, after a public
hearing, an open space plan and public benefit rating system for the
county. The plan shall consist of criteria for determining eligibility
of lands, the process for establishing a public benefit rating system,
and an assessed valuation schedule. The assessed valuation schedule
shall be developed by the county assessor and shall be a percentage of
market value based upon the public benefit rating system. The open
space plan, the public benefit rating system, and the assessed
valuations schedule shall not be effective until approved by the county
legislative authority after at least one public hearing: PROVIDED,
That any county which has complied with the procedural requisites of
chapter 393, Laws of 1985, prior to July 28, 1985, need not repeat
those procedures in order to adopt an open space plan pursuant to
chapter 393, Laws of 1985.
(2) In adopting an open space plan, recognized sources shall be
used unless the county does its own survey of important open space
priorities or features, or both. Recognized sources include but are
not limited to the natural heritage data base; the state office of
historic preservation; the interagency committee for outdoor recreation
inventory of dry accretion beach and shoreline features; state,
national, county, or city registers of historic places; the shoreline
master program; or studies by the parks and recreation commission and
by the departments of fish and wildlife and natural resources.
Features and sites may be verified by an outside expert in the field
and approved by the appropriate state or local agency to be sent to the
county legislative authority for final approval as open space.
(3) When the county open space plan is adopted, owners of open
space lands then classified under this chapter shall be notified in the
same manner as is provided in RCW 84.40.045 of their new assessed
value. These lands may be removed from classification, upon request of
owner, ((without penalty)) within thirty days of notification of value
without the additional tax or interest under RCW 84.34.108.
(4) The open space plan and public benefit rating system under this
section may be adopted for taxes payable in 1986 and thereafter.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.34.070 and 1992 c 69 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When land has once been classified under this chapter, it shall
remain under such classification and shall not be applied to other use
except as provided by subsection (2) of this section ((for at least ten
years from the date of classification)) and shall continue under such
classification until and unless withdrawn from classification after
notice of request for withdrawal shall be made by the owner. ((During
any year after eight years of the initial ten-year classification
period have elapsed,)) Notice of request for withdrawal of all or a
portion of the land may be given by the owner to the assessor or
assessors of the county or counties in which such land is situated. In
the event that a portion of a parcel is ((removed)) withdrawn from
classification, the remaining portion must meet the same requirements
as did the entire parcel when such land was originally granted
classification pursuant to this chapter unless the remaining parcel has
different income criteria. Within seven days the assessor shall
transmit one copy of such notice to the legislative body which
originally approved the application. The assessor or assessors, as the
case may be, shall((, when two assessment years have elapsed following
the date of receipt of such notice,)) withdraw such land from such
classification and the land shall be subject to the additional tax and
applicable interest due under RCW 84.34.108. Agreement to tax
according to use shall not be considered to be a contract and can be
abrogated at any time by the legislature in which event no additional
tax or penalty shall be imposed.
(2) The following reclassifications are not considered withdrawals
or removals and are not subject to additional tax under RCW 84.34.108:
(a) Reclassification between lands under RCW 84.34.020 (2) and (3);
(b) Reclassification of land classified under RCW 84.34.020 (2) or
(3) or chapter 84.33 RCW to open space land under RCW 84.34.020(1);
(c) Reclassification of land classified under RCW 84.34.020 (2) or
(3) to forest land classified under chapter 84.33 RCW; and
(d) Reclassification of land classified as open space land under
RCW 84.34.020(1)(c) and reclassified to farm and agricultural land
under RCW 84.34.020(2) if the land had been previously classified as
farm and agricultural land under RCW 84.34.020(2).
(3) Applications for reclassification shall be subject to
applicable provisions of RCW 84.34.037, 84.34.035, 84.34.041, and
chapter 84.33 RCW.
(4) The income criteria for land classified under RCW 84.34.020(2)
(b) and (c) may be deferred for land being reclassified from land
classified under RCW 84.34.020 (1)(c) or (3), or chapter 84.33 RCW into
RCW 84.34.020(2) (b) or (c) for a period of up to five years from the
date of reclassification.

Sec. 4 RCW 84.34.080 and 1999 sp.s. c 4 s 705 are each amended to
read as follows:
When land which has been classified under this chapter as open
space land, farm and agricultural land, or timber land is applied to
some other use, ((except through compliance with RCW 84.34.070, or))
except as a result solely from any one of the conditions listed in RCW
84.34.108(6), the owner shall within sixty days notify the county
assessor of such change in use and additional real property tax shall
be imposed upon such land in an amount equal to ((the sum of the
following:
(1))) the total amount of the additional tax and applicable
interest due under RCW 84.34.108((; plus
(2) A penalty amounting to twenty percent of the amount determined
in subsection (1) of this section)).

Sec. 5 RCW 84.34.090 and 1970 ex.s. c 87 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
The additional tax ((and penalties, if any,)) provided by RCW
((84.34.070 and)) 84.34.080 shall be extended on the tax roll and shall
be, together with the interest thereon, a lien on the land to which
such tax applies as of January 1st of the year for which such
additional tax is imposed. Such lien shall have priority as provided
in chapter 84.60 RCW: PROVIDED, That for purposes of all periods of
limitation of actions specified in Title 84 RCW, the year in which the
tax became payable shall be as specified in RCW 84.34.100.

Sec. 6 RCW 84.34.100 and 1980 c 134 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The additional tax((, penalties, and/or)) and interest provided by
RCW ((84.34.070 and)) 84.34.080 shall be payable in full thirty days
after the date which the treasurer's statement therefor is rendered.
Such additional tax when collected shall be distributed by the county
treasurer in the same manner in which current taxes applicable to the
subject land are distributed.

Sec. 7 RCW 84.34.150 and 1998 c 311 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
Land classified under the provisions of chapter 84.34 RCW prior to
July 16, 1973, which meets the criteria for classification under this
chapter, is hereby reclassified under this chapter. This change in
classification shall be made without additional tax, applicable
interest, ((penalty,)) or other requirements, but subsequent to such
reclassification, the land shall be fully subject to this chapter. A
condition imposed by a granting authority prior to July 16, 1973, upon
land classified pursuant to RCW 84.34.020 (1) or (3) shall remain in
effect during the period of classification.

Sec. 8 RCW 84.34.155 and 1992 c 69 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
Land classified under the provisions of RCW 84.34.020 (2) or (3)
which meets the definition of forest land under the provisions of
chapter 84.33 RCW, upon request for such change made by the owner to
the granting authority, shall be reclassified by the assessor under the
provisions of chapter 84.33 RCW. This change in classification shall
be made without additional tax, applicable interest, ((penalty,)) or
other requirements set forth in chapter 84.34 RCW: PROVIDED, That
subsequent to such reclassification, the land shall be fully subject to
the provisions of chapter 84.33 RCW, as now or hereafter amended.

--- END ---