BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The future of Washington forests review
council is established. The purpose of the council is to: (1) Gather
data necessary to understanding the economic, recreational, and
environmental contributions of the forest products industry and
secondary manufacturing sectors in Washington and the trends that will
influence the industry in the future; (2) gather data necessary to
understand the trends and dynamics commercial and residential
development play in the conversion of Washington's forests; and (3)
develop recommendations for policy changes that will contribute to
maintaining the economic stability and growth of the forest products
industry in Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The future of Washington forests review
council is composed of the following members: The governor, the
lieutenant governor, and the commissioner of public lands.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The future of Washington forests review
council is directed and authorized, subject to funding in the omnibus
appropriations act, to commission the following studies:
(1) An update of the 1992 timber supply study for Washington state
that was done by the University of Washington. The update must be
conducted using the same fundamental processes, methodology, and
assumptions as the 1992 study, and using the same data gathering
methodology as the original study. The department of natural resources
is directed to fully cooperate with the update process and provide the
data from the recently completed sustained yield calculation process.
The council is directed to assemble a team of public and private forest
inventory and analysis specialists to develop the specific work plan
for the timber supply update and work with the vendor to ensure that
the data and analysis are collected in the appropriate fashion.
(2) An independent assessment of the economic contribution of the
forest products industry, and secondary manufacturing sectors, to the
state of Washington. This assessment will also examine some of the
macroeconomic trends likely to affect the industry in the future.
(3) A comparison of the competitive position of Washington's forest
products industry with other leading forest products states, or
regions, of the United States. This evaluation should compare the
relative tax burden for growing and harvesting timber between the
states or regions, the relative cost of adhering to regulations, and
identify the competitive advantages of each state or region. The
council is directed to assemble a team of public and private sector
experts and economists to fully develop the work plan and work with the
vendor to ensure the data and analysis are of high quality.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The future of Washington forests review
council may form one or more technical advisory committees to assist
the council in assembling and understanding recently completed studies
or analysis that will assist the council in accomplishing its task.
Examples include, but are not limited to, the legislative task force on
forest health, the joint legislative audit and review committee study
on forest fire fighting costs, the forest practices board's
environmental impact statement for changes in forest practices under
forest and fish, the board of natural resources' environmental impact
statement for the department of natural resources' sustained yield
level, and the recently completed economic analysis of the Oregon
forest sector contributions and potential by the Oregon forest
resources institute. The council may also form a technical advisory
committee to provide input on issues that arise during the course of
their review.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The future of Washington forests review
council shall review all of the information gathered in sections 2
through 4 of this act. The council will summarize the current and
potential roles of nonfederal forests, and their contributions to
Washington state's economy, quality of life, recreation, environmental
quality, and rural vitality over the next fifty years. Based on this
review, the council shall develop recommendations on: (1) Policy
changes that would enhance the competitive position of Washington's
forest products industry in Washington; (2) policy changes that would,
to the extent possible, ensure that a productive forest land base
continues to be managed for forest products, recreation, and
environmental and other public benefits into the future; and (3) policy
changes that would enhance the recreational opportunities on working
forest lands in Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The future of Washington forests review
council must be staffed by the governor's office, the office of
financial management, and the department of natural resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The sum of one hundred thousand dollars,
or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2006, from the general fund to the governor's
office for the purposes of this act.
(2) The sum of one hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as
may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2007, from the general fund to the governor's office for the purposes
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act expires July 1, 2007.

--- END ---