BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that over time,
numerous tuition waiver statutes have been enacted that allow the
state's institutions of higher education to waive all or a portion of
tuition for certain eligible students. The legislature finds further
that the compilation of waiver statutes may create the unintended
consequences of confusion or competition in their application. The
legislature also finds that insofar as tuition waivers have a fiscal
impact to the state general fund and to the institutions of higher
education, it is in the best interests of the state to undertake a
periodic review of tuition waiver statutes in order to examine whether
the various waivers are still consistent with the state's priorities in
serving its citizens.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The higher education coordinating board
shall review the current waivers at the state's institutions of higher
education and develop recommendations for prioritization of waiver
authority. The board shall report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2006, on recommendations for prioritization,
including repeal, consolidation, standardization, or other changes to
current statutes.

--- END ---