BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
By January 15, 2006, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, as part of any feasibility study of options for the
alternative assessments under RCW 28A.655.061(11), shall review the
course requirements and assessments in one or more representative
career and technical programs that lead to industry certification to
determine the alignment of the courses and assessments with the
essential academic learning requirements measured in the high school
Washington assessment of student learning. The purpose of the review
is to determine if the certifications can be used as evidence that a
student has met the standards measured by the Washington assessment of
student learning. The review also shall evaluate the statewide
availability and use of the certifications. As part of the review, the
superintendent shall make a determination of the extent to which the
certifications are comparable in rigor to the reading, writing,
mathematics, or science Washington assessments of student learning, and
whether they should be used as alternative assessments. The
superintendent also shall develop a process for reviewing additional
industry certification programs after the initial review.

--- END ---