BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Advisory committee" means the advisory committee on genetic
counseling established in section 5 of this act.
(2) "Department" means the department of health.
(3) "Person" means an individual, family, or health care provider.
(4) "Practice of genetic counseling" means a communication process,
conducted by one or more appropriately trained individuals, that
includes:
(a) Estimating the likelihood of occurrence or recurrence of a
birth defect or of any potentially inherited or genetically influenced
condition. This assessment may involve:
(i) Obtaining and analyzing a complete health history of the person
and family;
(ii) Reviewing pertinent medical records;
(iii) Evaluating the risks from exposure to possible mutagens or
teratogens;
(iv) Ordering laboratory tests or recommending other evaluations to
diagnose a condition or determine the carrier status of one or more
family members;
(b) Helping the individual, family, health care provider, or
public:
(i) Appreciate the medical, psychological, and social implications
of a disorder, including its features, variability, usual course, and
management options;
(ii) Learn how genetic factors contribute to the disorder and
affect the chance for recurrence of the condition in other family
members;
(iii) Understand available options for coping with, preventing, or
reducing the chance of occurrence or recurrence of a condition;
(iv) Select the most appropriate, accurate, and cost-effective
methods of diagnosis;
(v) Understand genetic or prenatal tests, coordinate testing for
inherited disorders, and interpret complex genetic test results; and
(c) Facilitating an individual's or family's:
(i) Exploration of the perception of risk and burden associated
with the disorder;
(ii) Decision making regarding testing or medical interventions
consistent with their beliefs, goals, needs, resources, cultural,
ethical, and moral views;
(iii) Adjustment and adaptation to the condition or their genetic
risk by addressing needs for psychological, social, and medical
support.
(5) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 In addition to any other authority, the
secretary has the authority to:
(1) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to implement this
chapter;
(2) Establish all licensing, examination, and renewal fees in
accordance with RCW 43.70.250;
(3) Establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this
chapter;
(4) Issue licenses to applicants who have met the education,
training, and examination requirements for obtaining a license and to
deny a license to applicants who do not meet the requirements;
(5) Hire clerical, administrative, investigative, and other staff
as needed to implement this chapter to serve as examiners for any
practical examinations;
(6) Determine minimum education requirements and evaluate and
designate those educational programs from which graduation will be
accepted as proof of eligibility to take a qualifying examination for
applicants for obtaining a license;
(7) Establish practice parameters consistent with the practice of
genetic counseling as defined in section 1 of this act and considering
developments in the field, with the advice and recommendations of the
advisory committee;
(8) Prepare, grade, and administer, or determine the nature of, and
supervise the grading and administration of examinations for obtaining
a license;
(9) Determine whether alternative methods of training are
equivalent to formal education, and establish forms, procedures, and
criteria for evaluation of an applicant's alternative training to
determine the applicant's eligibility to take any qualifying
examination;
(10) Determine which states have licensing requirements equivalent
to those of this state, and issue licenses to applicants licensed in
those states without examination;
(11) Define and approve any experience requirement for licensing;
(12) Adopt rules implementing a continuing competency program;
(13) Maintain the official department record of all applicants and
license holders; and
(14) Establish by rule the procedures for an appeal of an
examination failure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Nothing in this chapter shall be construed
to prohibit or restrict:
(1) An individual who holds a credential issued by this state,
other than as a genetic counselor, to engage in the competent practice
of that occupation or profession without obtaining an additional
credential from the state. The individual may not use the title
genetic counselor unless licensed as such in this state;
(2) The practice of genetic counseling by a person who is employed
by the government of the United States while engaged in the performance
of duties prescribed by the laws of the United States;
(3) The practice of genetic counseling by a person who is a regular
student in an educational program approved by the secretary, and whose
performance of services is pursuant to a regular course of instruction
or assignments from an instructor and under the general supervision of
the instructor; or
(4) The infrequent and irregular practice of genetic counseling by
any provider who only provides occasional services in the state in his
or her capacity as an employee of an organization from outside the
state provided that the provider holds a license in another state or
territory in which he or she resides or has met alternative
requirements established by the secretary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The secretary shall issue a license to any
applicant who demonstrates to the satisfaction of the secretary that
the applicant meets the following requirements:
(1) Graduation from a master's or doctorate program in genetic
counseling or medical genetics approved by the secretary;
(2) Successful completion of any clinical experience requirements
established by the secretary; and
(3) Successful completion of an examination administered or
approved by the secretary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The advisory committee on genetic
counseling is established. The committee consists of five members who
are licensed to practice genetic counseling appointed by the secretary.
Initial terms of the members must be staggered and then are three-year
terms. The advisory committee shall meet at the times and places
designated by the secretary. Each member of an advisory committee
shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as authorized in RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060. In addition, members of the committee shall be
compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 when engaged in the
authorized business of the advisory committee.
(2) The department may seek the advice and assistance of the
advisory committee in administering this chapter, including:
(a) Advice and recommendations regarding the establishment or
implementation of rules related to the administration of this chapter;
(b) Advice and recommendations regarding developments in the
practice of genetic counseling;
(c) Advice, recommendations, and consultation regarding case
disposition guidelines and priorities related to unprofessional conduct
cases regarding the practice of genetic counseling;
(d) Assistance and consultation of individual committee members as
needed in the review, analysis, and disposition of reports of
unprofessional conduct and consumer complaints; and
(e) Assistance and recommendations regarding any continuing
competency program administered under the provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The date and location of examinations
must be established by the secretary. Applicants who have been found
by the secretary to meet the other requirements for obtaining a license
must be scheduled for the next examination following the filing of the
application. The secretary shall establish by rule the examination
application deadline.
(2) The secretary or the secretary's designees shall examine each
applicant, by means determined most effective, on subjects appropriate
to the scope of practice, as applicable. The examinations must be
limited to the purpose of determining whether the applicant possesses
the minimum skill and knowledge necessary to practice competently.
(3) The examination papers, all grading of the papers, and the
grading of any practical work shall be preserved for a period of not
less than one year after the secretary has made and published the
decisions. All examinations must be conducted under fair and wholly
impartial methods.
(4) Any applicant failing to make the required grade in the first
examination may take up to three subsequent examinations as the
applicant desires upon prepaying a fee determined by the secretary
under RCW 43.70.250 for each subsequent examination. Upon failing four
examinations, the secretary may invalidate the original application and
require remedial education before the person may take future
examinations.
(5) The secretary may approve an examination prepared or
administered by a private testing agency or association of licensing
agencies for use by an applicant in meeting the credentialing
requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Applications for licensing must be submitted
on forms provided by the secretary. The secretary may require any
information and documentation that reasonably relates to the need to
determine whether the applicant meets the criteria for licensing
provided for in this chapter and chapter 18.130 RCW. Each applicant
shall pay a fee determined by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250. The
fee must accompany the application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The secretary shall establish by rule the
requirements and fees for renewal of a license. Failure to renew the
license invalidates the license and all privileges granted by the
license. If a license has lapsed for a period longer than three years,
the person shall demonstrate competence to the satisfaction of the
secretary by completing continuing competency requirements or meeting
other standards determined by the secretary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The secretary may grant a provisional
license to a person who has met all of the requirements for obtaining
a license except for the successful completion of an examination. A
provisional license must be renewed annually. A provisional license
holder may only practice genetic counseling under the supervision of
either a licensed genetic counselor, a physician licensed under chapter
18.71 RCW, or osteopathic physician licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW
with a current certification in clinical genetics issued by an
organization approved by the secretary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 An applicant holding a license in another
state may be licensed to practice in this state without examination if
the secretary determines that the licensing standards of the other
state are substantially equivalent to the licensing standards of this
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A person not licensed with the secretary to
practice genetic counseling may not represent himself or herself as a
"genetic counselor," "licensed genetic counselor," "gene counselor,"
"genetic consultant," "genetic associate," or other letters, words,
signs, numbers, or insignia indicating or implying that he or she is
licensed to practice genetic counseling.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The uniform disciplinary act, chapter
18.130 RCW, governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of a
license, and the discipline of persons licensed under this chapter.
The secretary shall be the disciplining authority under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 12 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

Sec. 14 RCW 18.130.040 and 2004 c 38 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter applies only to the secretary and the boards and
commissions having jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed
under the chapters specified in this section. This chapter does not
apply to any business or profession not licensed under the chapters
specified in this section.
(2)(a) The secretary has authority under this chapter in relation
to the following professions:
(i) Dispensing opticians licensed and designated apprentices under
chapter 18.34 RCW;
(ii) Naturopaths licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW;
(iii) Midwives licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW;
(iv) Ocularists licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;
(v) Massage operators and businesses licensed under chapter 18.108
RCW;
(vi) Dental hygienists licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;
(vii) Acupuncturists licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW;
(viii) Radiologic technologists certified and X-ray technicians
registered under chapter 18.84 RCW;
(ix) Respiratory care practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89
RCW;
(x) Persons registered under chapter 18.19 RCW;
(xi) Persons licensed as mental health counselors, marriage and
family therapists, and social workers under chapter 18.225 RCW;
(xii) Persons registered as nursing pool operators under chapter
18.52C RCW;
(xiii) Nursing assistants registered or certified under chapter
18.88A RCW;
(xiv) Health care assistants certified under chapter 18.135 RCW;
(xv) Dietitians and nutritionists certified under chapter 18.138
RCW;
(xvi) Chemical dependency professionals certified under chapter
18.205 RCW;
(xvii) Sex offender treatment providers and certified affiliate sex
offender treatment providers certified under chapter 18.155 RCW;
(xviii) Persons licensed and certified under chapter 18.73 RCW or
RCW 18.71.205;
(xix) Denturists licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW;
(xx) Orthotists and prosthetists licensed under chapter 18.200 RCW;
(xxi) Surgical technologists registered under chapter 18.215 RCW;
((and))
(xxii) Recreational therapists;
(xxiii) Genetic counselors licensed under chapter 18.-- RCW
(sections 1 through 12 of this act).
(b) The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter
are as follows:
(i) The podiatric medical board as established in chapter 18.22
RCW;
(ii) The chiropractic quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.25 RCW;
(iii) The dental quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.32 RCW;
(iv) The board of hearing and speech as established in chapter
18.35 RCW;
(v) The board of examiners for nursing home administrators as
established in chapter 18.52 RCW;
(vi) The optometry board as established in chapter 18.54 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapter 18.53 RCW;
(vii) The board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as established
in chapter 18.57 RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.57 and
18.57A RCW;
(viii) The board of pharmacy as established in chapter 18.64 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW;
(ix) The medical quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.71 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW;
(x) The board of physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74
RCW;
(xi) The board of occupational therapy practice as established in
chapter 18.59 RCW;
(xii) The nursing care quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.79 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
that chapter;
(xiii) The examining board of psychology and its disciplinary
committee as established in chapter 18.83 RCW; and
(xiv) The veterinary board of governors as established in chapter
18.92 RCW.
(3) In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the
disciplining authority has the authority to grant or deny licenses
based on the conditions and criteria established in this chapter and
the chapters specified in subsection (2) of this section. This chapter
also governs any investigation, hearing, or proceeding relating to
denial of licensure or issuance of a license conditioned on the
applicant's compliance with an order entered pursuant to RCW 18.130.160
by the disciplining authority.
(4) All disciplining authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure
substantially consistent application of this chapter, the Uniform
Disciplinary Act, among the disciplining authorities listed in
subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 This act takes effect August 1, 2006.

--- END ---