BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The legislative authority of a county, city, or town may fix
and impose an annual vehicle fee, not to exceed: (i) Twenty dollars
per vehicle between January 1, 2006, and January 1, 2010; (ii) twenty-five dollars per vehicle between January 1, 2010, and January 1, 2015;
and (iii) thirty dollars per vehicle for all fees imposed after
December 31, 2014. This fee applies to each vehicle that is subject to
license fees under RCW 46.16.0621 and for each vehicle that is subject
to RCW 46.16.070 with an unladen weight of ten thousand pounds or less,
that is determined by the department of licensing to be registered
within the boundaries of the county, city, or town imposing the fee.
(b) The following vehicles registered within the county or city
boundaries are exempt under this act: (i) Farm equipment as defined in
RCW 46.04.181; (ii) vehicles licensed under RCW 46.16.374; and (iii)
small trailers with an empty scale weight under one thousand pounds.
(2) A city or town may not impose a fee that, if combined with the
county fee, exceeds the amount authorized under subsection (1) of this
section. If a county imposes or increases a fee under this section
that, if combined with the fee imposed by a city or town exceeds the
amount authorized under subsection (1) of this section, the city or
town fee shall be reduced or eliminated so the combined vehicle fee
does not exceed the amount authorized under subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) The department of licensing shall administer and annually
collect the fee at the time of registration renewal. A county, city,
or town imposing the fee, or initiating an exemption process, shall
enter into a contract with the department of licensing. The contract
must contain provisions that fully recover the costs to the department
of licensing for collection and administration of the fee.
(4) If the fee collected under this section is countywide, the fee
will be allocated to the county based on the number of registered
vehicles registered in the unincorporated county, and a particular city
or town's distribution will be based on the number of registered
vehicles within each city or town.
(5) The county, city, or town imposing this fee, or initiating an
exemption process, shall delay the effective date at least six months
from the date the ordinance is enacted, and the fee will be effective
upon the registration date as provided by the department of licensing,
to allow the department of licensing to implement administration and
collection or exemption from the fee.
(6) The legislative authority of a county or city or town may
develop and initiate an exemption process for the registered owners of
vehicles residing within the boundaries of the county, city, or town:
(a) Who are sixty-two years old or older at the time payment of the fee
is due and whose household income for the previous calendar year is
less than an amount prescribed by the county, city, or town legislative
authority; or (b) who have a physical disability.
(7) The proceeds of this fee shall be used strictly for
transportation purposes in accordance with RCW 82.80.070.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The legislative authority of a county, city, or town may fix
and impose an annual roadway improvement fee of one and one-half cents
per vehicle pound based on the vehicle empty scale weight for each
vehicle that is subject to license fees under RCW 46.16.0621 and for
each vehicle that is subject to RCW 46.16.070 with an unladen weight of
ten thousand pounds or less, that is determined by the department of
licensing to be registered within the boundaries of the county, city,
or town imposing the fee.
(b) The following vehicles registered within the county or city
boundaries are exempt under this act: (i) Farm equipment as defined in
RCW 46.04.181; (ii) vehicles licensed under RCW 46.16.374; and (iii)
small trailers with an empty scale weight under one thousand pounds.
(2) The city or town may not impose a fee that, if combined with
the county fee, exceeds one and one-half cents per vehicle pound based
on the empty scale weight. If a county imposes or increases a fee
under this section that, if combined with the fee imposed by a city or
town exceeds one and one-half cents, the city or town fee shall be
reduced or eliminated as needed so that in no city or town does the
combined fee exceed one and one-half cents.
(3) The department of licensing shall administer and collect the
fee annually at the time of license registration renewal. The
department shall rely on the vehicle empty scale weights as provided by
vehicle manufacturers, or other sources defined by the department to
determine the weight of each vehicle type. The department shall adopt
rules to handle vehicles without manufacturer empty scale weights, such
as home-built vehicles.
(4) A county, city, or town imposing an annual roadway improvement
fee of one and one-half cents per vehicle pound on vehicle weight, or
initiating an exemption process, shall enter into a contract with the
department of licensing. The contract must contain provisions that
fully recover the costs to the department of licensing for collection
and administration of the fee. The department shall remit remaining
proceeds to the custody of the state treasurer for monthly distribution
under RCW 82.80.080.
(5) The county, city, or town imposing the fee, or initiating an
exemption process, shall delay the effective date at least six months
from the date the ordinance is enacted, and the fee will be effective
upon the registration date as provided by the department of licensing,
to allow the department of licensing to implement administration and
collection or exemption from the fee.
(6) If the fee collected under this section is countywide, the fee
will be allocated to the county based on the number of registered
vehicles registered in the unincorporated county, and a particular city
or town's distribution will be based on the number of registered
vehicles within each city or town.
(7) The legislative authority of a county, city, or town may
develop and initiate an exemption process of the fee for the registered
owners of vehicles residing within the boundaries of the county, city,
or town: (a) Who are sixty-two years old or older at the time payment
of the fee is due and whose household income for the previous calendar
year is less than an amount prescribed by the county, city, or town
legislative authority; or (b) who have a physical disability.
(8) The proceeds of this fee shall be used strictly for
transportation purposes in accordance with RCW 82.80.070.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.80.010 and 2003 c 350 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Distributor" means every person who imports, refines,
manufactures, produces, or compounds motor vehicle fuel and special
fuel as defined in RCW 82.36.010 and 82.38.020, respectively, and sells
or distributes the fuel into a county;
(b) "Person" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.030.
(2) Subject to the conditions of this section, any county may levy,
by approval of its legislative body and a majority of the registered
voters of the county voting on the proposition at a general or special
election, additional excise taxes equal to ((ten)) twenty percent of
the statewide motor vehicle fuel tax rate under RCW 82.36.025 on each
gallon of motor vehicle fuel as defined in RCW 82.36.010 and on each
gallon of special fuel as defined in RCW 82.38.020 sold within the
boundaries of the county. Vehicles paying an annual license fee under
RCW 82.38.075 are exempt from the county fuel excise tax. An election
held under this section must be held not more than twelve months before
the date on which the proposed tax is to be levied. The ballot setting
forth the proposition shall state the tax rate that is proposed. The
county's authority to levy additional excise taxes under this section
includes the incorporated and unincorporated areas of the county. The
additional excise taxes are subject to the same exceptions and rights
of refund as applicable to other motor vehicle fuel and special fuel
excise taxes levied under chapters 82.36 and 82.38 RCW. The proposed
tax shall not be levied less than one month from the date the election
results are certified by the county election officer. The commencement
date for the levy of any tax under this section shall be the first day
of January, April, July, or October.
(3) The local option motor vehicle fuel tax on each gallon of motor
vehicle fuel and on each gallon of special fuel is imposed upon the
distributor of the fuel.
(4) A taxable event for the purposes of this section occurs upon
the first distribution of the fuel within the boundaries of a county to
a retail outlet, bulk fuel user, or ultimate user of the fuel.
(5) All administrative provisions in chapters 82.01, 82.03, and
82.32 RCW, insofar as they are applicable, apply to local option fuel
taxes imposed under this section.
(6) Before the effective date of the imposition of the fuel taxes
under this section, a county shall contract with the department of
revenue for the administration and collection of the taxes. The
contract must provide that a percentage amount, not to exceed one
percent of the taxes imposed under this section, will be deposited into
the local tax administration account created in the custody of the
state treasurer. The department of revenue may spend money from this
account, upon appropriation, for the administration of the local taxes
imposed under this section.
(7) The state treasurer shall distribute monthly to the levying
county and cities contained therein the proceeds of the additional
excise taxes collected under this section, after the deductions for
payments and expenditures as provided in RCW 46.68.090(1) (a) and (b)
and under the conditions and limitations provided in RCW 82.80.080.
(8) The proceeds of the additional excise taxes levied under this
section shall be used strictly for transportation purposes in
accordance with RCW 82.80.070.
(9) A county may not levy the tax under this section if they are
levying the tax in RCW 82.80.110 or if they are a member of a regional
transportation investment district levying the tax in RCW 82.80.120.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The legislature of the state of Washington
finds:
(1) The maintenance and preservation of the streets and urban
transportation systems in urban areas is essential for the protection
of the public health and safety, particularly for residents and
businesses served within such areas. Providing for adequate, reliable
access for residents and business street users served by such streets
and transportation systems requires a means to preserve and maintain
such facilities and, where necessary, to rehabilitate and reconstruct
them.
(2) The adverse impacts of failing to keep up maintenance of
streets and transportation systems in urban areas are greatest upon the
street users located in such areas. These impacts include increased
traffic congestion, decreased air quality, vehicle damage, accident
frequency, and decreased street access service for residents and
businesses in such areas, as well as decreased access for such street
users to public transportation service and fire, police, and emergency
medical vehicles. Likewise, the advantages of well-maintained and
preserved streets and transportation system facilities in urban areas
accrue to people and businesses located in such areas by providing
better transportation system service access, lower insurance rates,
increased property values, and better fire, police, and emergency
medical vehicle access.
(3) Pavement surfaces and structure in urban areas are subjected to
much heavier use and higher maintenance needs than rural areas. When
pavement is not properly maintained, the deterioration process
accelerates exponentially and the expense and amount of work to restore
the pavement likewise increases, creating a downward spiral of
increasing pavement deterioration and higher costs to correct the
consequences. Absent proper street preservation and maintenance
practices, a point of no further maintenance is quickly reached, where
the pavement condition has deteriorated to the point that the expense
of restoration is no longer cost-effective.
(4) When streets are not properly preserved and maintained, it also
becomes less cost-effective to divert funds for more extensive repairs
because such funds would then not be available for less deteriorated
streets, causing those streets to slip into a higher repair cost
category, ultimately at a greater net cost to the system. These
problems are matters of great concern to the state legislature.
(5) Objective means based upon sound engineering principles are
available to identify pavement conditions and distressed pavement
areas. This is done through a pavement condition assessment process
that uses a pavement management scoring system. Scoring may be based
on factors such as in field examination, surface or subsurface
examinations, testing, and other measurements. A pavement assessment
condition score may be developed for given areas of pavement or entire
roadway sections, ranging from a value of 100 for new paving to 0 for
a completely deteriorated pavement structure. Alternative scoring
systems relying on an overall condition index may also be used, based
on sound engineering principles.
(6) Pavement assessment condition scoring identifies four general
categories of pavement maintenance and repair needs, based upon the
level of remedial work needed to restore the structure: Preventive
maintenance, resurfacing needed, pavement rehabilitation needed, and
full pavement reconstruction required. Each level requires a
progressively greater cost per mile to remedy. Each city or town
should formulate these levels and appropriate responses in accord with
differing local needs. The legislature finds this pavement management
system reliable and based on sound engineering principles.
(7) Residences and businesses accessing the right-of-way enjoy
different average levels of benefit from a transportation system. Such
benefits can be classified based on different property uses.
Residential and business street users likewise contribute differing
average burden levels and contribute to street deterioration, based on
property use classifications. A street utility mechanism considering
such differences to determine user fees offers a means to assess a fair
proportionate share of the cost of street maintenance and related
transportation facility needs.
(8) Other operational factors of transportation systems in urban
areas also contribute to enhanced pavement degradation. These include
the need to maintain properly maintained and placed traffic signals,
street lighting, traffic signs and markers, striping, street sweeping,
street ice and snow control, guardrails, barriers, roadway vegetation,
channelization devices, and parking enforcement to encourage reduced
congestion and better traffic circulation.
(9) Increasing deterioration and degradation of streets and related
transportation facilities in distressed or poorly maintained pavement
areas poses an immediate threat to the health, safety, and welfare of
the citizens of this state and its residents and businesses using those
streets.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The purpose of this act is to protect
the public health and safety by regulating urban streets and
transportation systems, to provide for a street utility service for
street preservation, maintenance, rehabilitation, and reconstruction
and related urban transportation system needs of residential and
business street users within a street utility service area, to provide
a means to identify such areas, and to provide for street utility
service charges reasonably proportionate to a street user's allocable
share of street utility services.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision, nothing in this act or
action taken under its authority may be construed to create or increase
any municipal liability to any particular person or entity, or to
increase or enhance any municipal common law duty of care relating to
the public right-of-way or the maintenance and repair thereof.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The definitions in this section apply
throughout sections 4 through 13 of this act unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Business" means any organization, including without limitation
private firms, proprietors, corporations, partnerships, for-profit and
nonprofit organizations, public sector organizations, and government.
(2) "Sound engineering principles" means principles or learning
reasonably accepted within the civil engineering or traffic engineering
profession, including the Washington state department of transportation
extended method in paving distress ratings, the Washington state
department of transportation pavement distress manual, the Washington
state department of transportation local agency pavement management
guide, materials developed by the Institute of Transportation
Engineers, including materials differentiating types of property uses
and correlating property use and the expected number of automobile and
pedestrian trips over a specified time interval generated by such use,
and other studies, manuals, or materials shown to be reliable and based
on good engineering practice as may be developed by professional
engineering staff or consultants.
(3) "Street" means the traveled portion of the street right-of-way
including bridges, gutters, curbs, shoulders, sidewalks, pedestrian
walkways, and bikeways. "Street" also includes barrier-free access
such as for wheelchairs and strollers and Americans with disabilities
act design features.
(4) "Street maintenance" means activities that keep streets in good
operating condition or that enhance public safety relating to street
use, including, but not limited to, preservation, resurfacing, pothole
filling, striping or restriping, street lights, traffic control
devices, vegetation maintenance, and proper drainage facilities.
(5) "Street utility" means a municipally owned and operated utility
service, created in accordance with sections 4 through 13 of this act.
(6) "Street utility service area" means an area in which street
utility services are provided and user fees are charged, established in
accord with the provisions of sections 4 through 13 of this act.
Sections 4 through 13 of this act create no authority for any city or
town to assess a street utility user fee outside its jurisdictional
limits.
(7) "Transportation system" means infrastructure of a city or town
used for public travel and the street user needs of residences and
businesses located within the street utility service area. It includes
streets, street lighting, traffic control devices and signals, traffic
signs and markers, striping, parking enforcement, and proper drainage
facilities associated with impervious paved surfaces.
(8) "User fees" means street utility user fees for street utility
services in accord with sections 4 through 13 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The legislative authority of a city or town
may by ordinance create a street utility service area or areas up to
the entire limits of said city or town. A city or town may elect to
own, maintain, operate, and preserve its streets and urban
transportation system as a separate street utility, and may levy
periodic charges for use of the streets in an annual amount of up to
fifty percent of the actual costs for maintenance, operation, and
preservation of facilities as permitted by sections 4 through 13 of
this act. All street utility user fees shall be deposited in a special
fund or account dedicated to such permissible uses under sections 4
through 13 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The legislative body of a city or town
shall conduct a public hearing prior to the formation of a street
utility. Notice of the hearing shall include information about the
street utility service area or areas, a general operational plan for
services to be provided by the street utility, an initial proposed rate
structure, and any other items deemed pertinent. Said notice shall be
published at least five days before the hearing in a newspaper of
general circulation within the proposed street utility service area.
The hearing may be continued to other times, dates, and places
announced at the hearing without further publication. A record of the
hearing shall be maintained. At the hearing, the city or town
legislative body shall review the proposal and consider objections and
comments from any interested party and may modify the proposal in
response thereto, as well as any information, opinion polls, or other
material relevant to the question presented.
(2) After the hearing, the city or town legislative body may adopt
an ordinance creating a street utility service area or areas, together
with the utility user fees to support said utility, with findings in
accord with this section, and consistent with sections 4 through 13 of
this act.
(3) An ordinance creating a street utility shall include
substantially the following items, except where local needs may
require:
(a) A description of the condition of the pavement areas in the
street utility service area, based on field investigations, pavement
assessment condition scores, or other criteria;
(b) A general plan, as necessary, to preserve, maintain,
rehabilitate, or reconstruct the pavement area and to remediate poorly
maintained pavement areas, considering sound engineering principles,
and prevent the growth and development of such areas. The general plan
shall include a timetable and summary of the purposes of expenditures
or projects to be included, projected revenues from user fees, and
other sources;
(c) A description of the street utility service area;
(d) The establishment of a separate fund or account for all moneys
collected from user fees, which amounts shall be held solely and
separately to be used for the purposes listed in the ordinance;
(e) A user fee schedule consistent with section 9 of this act,
supported by sound engineering principles as reflected in the record,
setting forth amounts to be charged to residential and business street
users located in the street utility service area;
(f) A description of the proposed uses for the fees consistent with
section 9 of this act if not included in the general plan;
(g) Any other factors deemed relevant; and
(h) A finding that the creation of a street utility is in the
public interest.
(4) An ordinance establishing a street utility may include a
provision for a street utility advisory committee to advise the city or
town from time to time regarding questions about administration of the
street utility, guided by sound engineering principles. The street
utility advisory committee shall be appointed by the mayor and
confirmed by the city or town legislative body. Committee membership
may include paving contractors, civil engineers, citizens, and
professional traffic engineering staff and other persons with special
training or expertise relevant to the issues presented.
(5) Such ordinance shall further provide for a means of an
administrative appeal by interested persons of disputed billings or
user fee classifications or other matters deemed proper, including
appropriate procedures as the legislative body may determine. The
appealing party has the burden of proof. The judicial review standard
of such decisions is arbitrary and capricious.
(6) After formation, the legislative body determines what further
hearings are necessary in adopting or adjusting user fees, scope of
services, and other utility operations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) A city or town legislative body may
establish user fees within the street utility service area for
residential and business users located in such service area. User fees
shall be expressed as a dollar amount per household unit or type of
business. User fees may be assessed no more frequently than monthly,
nor less frequently than annually. Fees set for users other than
households shall be expressed in equivalents of household units or as
specified by ordinance.
(2) In classifying user fee rates, a city or town legislative body
may in its discretion consider the following factors:
(a) A cost component for the street utility's ongoing base level
operation and maintenance; variations in capacity access demands by
transportation system users within the street utility service area;
(b) The estimated average daily number of vehicle trips generated
by specific types of property occupancies or uses. In making this
estimation, the legislative body may consider a correlation between
each type of property use and the estimated number of automobile and
pedestrian trips that each use generates. Such correlation may include
use of trip generation data and information developed in accord with
sound engineering principles. Estimated vehicle trips by trucks
weighing over twenty-six thousand pounds shall not be factored into the
proposed fee schedule or the rate applied to a specific business;
(c) Location of users; differences in costs of service; the
proximity of a user fee class to arterial streets and relative benefits
derived therefrom; differences in costs of maintenance, operation,
repair, or reconstruction; different character of the service furnished
various users; times of use; the achievement of traffic reduction;
capital contributions made to the transportation system, including but
not limited to limited improvement district assessments; special
assessments for transportation system related improvements; and any
other matters which present a reasonable difference as a ground for
distinction. User fees shall not include any exemption or credit for
the payment of any tax;
(d) User fees may reflect a reduction or exemption for designated
classes consistent with Article VIII, section 7 of the state
Constitution;
(e) There may be provision for user fee reduction through
mitigation, which may include a ten percent reduction that may be
allowed for residential users participating in regular carpool or
vanpool arrangements or for commercial users offering carpool or
vanpool programs approved under such provisions as may be further
established by ordinance;
(f) Residents or businesses may apply for a user fee discount upon
a showing that they do not generate equivalent trips, on the average,
to abutting parcels. This might apply to where a residence or business
does not directly abut the right-of-way, or for other reasons;
(g) All user fees shall be uniform for the same class of persons
receiving services provided or imposing burdens on a transportation
system.
(3) User fees shall not be in excess of the amount authorized by
the ordinance. No fees shall be imposed on vacant parcels prior to
development for occupancy or use. A city or town may use connection or
consumption of other utility services such as water, sewer, or solid
waste collection as a basis to establish occupancy or use.
(4) Where a party demonstrates on an individual basis that it
neither enjoys a benefit from street use nor creates a burden on street
use, no street utility user fees shall be charged, but this shall not
prevent the legislative body from otherwise adopting a street utility
rate schedule in accord with sections 4 through 13 of this act.
(5) Refunds on collected user fees are not required for any period
before the time a written appeal is received from a party claiming by
the refund a city or town under procedures it may establish therefore.
(6) User fees may not be computed on the basis of an ad valorem
charge on the underlying real property or improvements. User fees
authorized under this section are not in lieu of impact or mitigation
fees otherwise permitted by law.
(7) Street user fees established pursuant to sections 4 through 13
of this act do not constitute taxes nor are they charges provided for
under RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090, growth impact fees, or RCW
39.92.010 through 39.92.901, transportation fees, or charges otherwise
prohibited by law.
(8) A city or town may provide or contract to provide billing and
collection services of the street utility user fees as a part of other
utility services provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Street utility service user fee revenues
may fund only:
(1) Street maintenance, preservation, rehabilitation, or
reconstruction;
(2) Other operational factors of transportation systems in urban
areas including traffic signals placement and maintenance, street
lighting, traffic signs and markers, striping, street sweeping, street
ice and snow control, guardrails, barriers, roadway vegetation,
channelization devices, and parking enforcement to encourage reduced
congestion and better traffic circulation;
(3) Transportation system needs and expenses of doing business as
a utility, consistent with the adopted transportation and land use
plans of the jurisdiction expending the funds, and consistent with any
applicable and adopted regional transportation plan for metropolitan
planning areas;
(4) The preparation of a street utility operations and maintenance
plan, street arterial plan adopted under RCW 36.70A.070(6), or other
transportation planning process required or permitted by law to
protect, preserve, and rehabilitate public rights-of-way;
(5) The costs of monitoring permitted funding needs as may be
required or recommended for compliance with applicable standards and
rules;
(6) The costs of:
(a) Ongoing implementation of a plan or plans developed under
subsection (4) of this section;
(b) Enforcing compliance with standards and rules relating to the
quality and quantity of street, highway, or related pavement facility
construction and maintenance;
(7) Street maintenance practices to improve air quality and dust
control; and
(8) Creation of a prudent reserve fund for permissible uses and to
repay bonds or other evidences of indebtedness issued to pay costs for
which street utility service revenues may be used.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) A city or town establishing a street
utility in accord with sections 4 through 13 of this act shall have a
lien for any delinquent user fees for street utility service, including
any delinquency charges or interest, which shall attach to the street
user's premises for which services were rendered, where at least two
months have passed since a user fee has been billed as delinquent or
past due to the premises served and at least two billing notices have
been mailed to the premises explaining that a lien may be placed for
any delinquencies.
(2) The lien may be foreclosed in the manner provided for sewerage
service in chapter 35.67 RCW together with any other utility services
provided by the city or town. Failure to record the lien does not
affect its validity, but no party without actual or constructive notice
shall be held responsible for payment thereof.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The city or town legislative body may
dissolve a street utility by ordinance upon a finding that the
dissolution is in the public interest. In such event, all unexpended
funds shall be held in trust to be expended only for purposes permitted
under sections 4 through 13 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) A city or town electing to establish a
street utility under sections 4 through 13 of this act may also finance
permitted street utility uses through any other means permitted by law,
which shall include local improvement districts, utility local
improvement districts, or with proceeds from general obligation bonds
and revenue bonds payable from the charges issued in accordance with
chapter 35.41, 35.92, or 39.46 RCW, or any combination thereof. The
city or town may use, in addition to the user fees authorized in this
act, funds from any other federal, state, or local public or private
sources.
(2) Nothing in sections 4 through 13 of this act or action taken
under its authority shall diminish any other general or specific
municipal regulatory or funding powers now or hereafter otherwise
permitted by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The provisions of this act shall be
liberally construed to accomplish the intended purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

Sec. 16 RCW 82.80.070 and 2002 c 56 s 413 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The proceeds collected pursuant to the exercise of the local
option authority of RCW 82.80.010, 82.80.020, and 82.80.030((, and
82.80.050)) (hereafter called "local option transportation revenues")
shall be used for transportation purposes only, including but not
limited to the following: The operation and preservation of roads,
streets, and other transportation improvements; new construction,
reconstruction, and expansion of city streets, county roads, and state
highways and other transportation improvements; development and
implementation of public transportation and high-capacity transit
improvements and programs; and planning, design, and acquisition of
right of way and sites for such transportation purposes. The proceeds
collected from excise taxes on the sale, distribution, or use of motor
vehicle fuel and special fuel under RCW 82.80.010 shall be used
exclusively for "highway purposes" as that term is construed in Article
II, section 40 of the state Constitution.
(2) The local option transportation revenues shall be expended for
transportation uses consistent with the adopted transportation and land
use plans of the jurisdiction expending the funds and consistent with
any applicable and adopted regional transportation plan for
metropolitan planning areas.
(3) Each local government with a population greater than eight
thousand that levies or expends local option transportation funds, is
also required to develop and adopt a specific transportation program
that contains the following elements:
(a) The program shall identify the geographic boundaries of the
entire area or areas within which local option transportation revenues
will be levied and expended.
(b) The program shall be based on an adopted transportation plan
for the geographic areas covered and shall identify the proposed
operation and construction of transportation improvements and services
in the designated plan area intended to be funded in whole or in part
by local option transportation revenues and shall identify the annual
costs applicable to the program.
(c) The program shall indicate how the local transportation plan is
coordinated with applicable transportation plans for the region and for
adjacent jurisdictions.
(d) The program shall include at least a six-year funding plan,
updated annually, identifying the specific public and private sources
and amounts of revenue necessary to fund the program. The program
shall include a proposed schedule for construction of projects and
expenditure of revenues. The funding plan shall consider the
additional local tax revenue estimated to be generated by new
development within the plan area if all or a portion of the additional
revenue is proposed to be earmarked as future appropriations for
transportation improvements in the program.
(4) Local governments with a population greater than eight thousand
exercising the authority for local option transportation funds shall
periodically review and update their transportation program to ensure
that it is consistent with applicable local and regional transportation
and land use plans and within the means of estimated public and private
revenue available.
(5) In the case of expenditure for new or expanded transportation
facilities, improvements, and services, priorities in the use of local
option transportation revenues shall be identified in the
transportation program and expenditures shall be made based upon the
following criteria, which are stated in descending order of weight to
be attributed:
(a) First, the project serves a multijurisdictional function;
(b) Second, it is necessitated by existing or reasonably
foreseeable congestion;
(c) Third, it has the greatest person-carrying capacity;
(d) Fourth, it is partially funded by other government funds, such
as from the state transportation improvement board, or by private
sector contributions, such as those from the local transportation act,
chapter 39.92 RCW; and
(e) Fifth, it meets such other criteria as the local government
determines is appropriate.
(6) It is the intent of the legislature that as a condition of
levying, receiving, and expending local option transportation revenues,
no local government agency use the revenues to replace, divert, or loan
any revenues currently being used for transportation purposes to
nontransportation purposes. The association of Washington cities and
the Washington state association of counties, in consultation with the
legislative transportation committee, shall study the issue of
nondiversion and make recommendations to the legislative transportation
committee for language implementing the intent of this section by
December 1, ((1990)) 2006.
(7) Local governments are encouraged to enter into interlocal
agreements to jointly develop and adopt with other local governments
the transportation programs required by this section for the purpose of
accomplishing regional transportation planning and development.
(8) Local governments may use all or a part of the local option
transportation revenues for the amortization of local government
general obligation and revenue bonds issued for transportation purposes
consistent with the requirements of this section.
(9) Subsections (1) through (8) of this section do not apply to a
regional transportation investment district imposing a tax or fee under
the local option authority of this chapter. Proceeds collected under
the exercise of local option authority under this chapter by a district
must be used in accordance with chapter 36.120 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 82.80.040 (Street utility -- Establishment) and 1991 c 141 s
1;
(2) RCW 82.80.050 (Street utility -- Charges, credits) and 2000 c 103
s 21 & 1991 c 141 s 2; and
(3) RCW 82.80.060 (Use of other proceeds by utility) and 1991 c 141
s 3.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Sections 4 through 13 of this act are each
added to chapter 35.77 RCW and codified with the subchapter heading of
"Street Utility."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 (1) Sections 1 through 3 of this act take
effect January 1, 2006.
(2) Sections 4 through 18 of this act take effect August 1, 2005.

--- END ---