BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.48.010 and 2004 c 266 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
((The county auditor may designate any precinct having fewer than
two hundred active registered voters at the time of closing of voter
registration as provided in RCW 29A.08.140 as a mail ballot precinct.
The county auditor shall notify each registered voter by mail that for
all future primaries and elections the voting in his or her precinct
will be by mail ballot only. In determining the number of registered
voters in a precinct for the purposes of this section, persons who are
ongoing absentee voters under RCW 29A.40.040 shall not be counted.
Nothing in this section may be construed as altering the vote tallying
requirements of RCW 29A.60.230.))
(1) Effective January 1, 2008, all primary, special, and general
elections shall be conducted entirely by mail ballot.
(2) Before January 1, 2008, the county auditor may conduct all
primary, special, and general elections entirely by mail ballot.
(3) The county auditor shall notify each registered voter by mail
that for all future primaries and elections the voting will be by mail
ballot only. The auditor shall mail each active voter a ballot at
least eighteen days before a primary, general election, or special
election. The auditor shall send each inactive voter either a ballot
or an application to receive a ballot at least eighteen days before a
primary, general election, or special election. The auditor shall
determine which of the two is to be sent. If the inactive voter
returns a voted ballot, the ballot shall be counted and the voter's
status restored to active. If the inactive voter completes and returns
an application, a ballot shall be sent and the voter's status restored
to active. The requirements regarding certification, reporting, and
the mailing of overseas and military ballots in RCW ((29.36.270))
29A.40.070 apply to elections conducted by mail ballot ((precincts)).
((If the precinct exceeds two hundred registered voters, or the
auditor determines to return to a polling place election environment,
the auditor shall notify each registered voter, by mail, of this and
shall provide the address of the polling place to be used.))
(4) All vote by mail elections shall provide disability access
voting as provided in chapter 29A.46 RCW.

--- END ---