BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
A city or town in which a water-sewer district operates works,
plants, or facilities for the distribution and sale of water or sewer
services has the power to levy and collect from the district a tax on
the gross revenues derived by the district from the sale of water or
sewer services within the city or town, exclusive of the revenues
derived from the sale of water or sewer services for purposes of
resale. The tax when levied shall be a debt of the district, and may
be collected as such. The district has the power to add the amount of
tax to the rates or charges it makes for water or sewer services sold
within the limits of the city or town.

--- END ---