BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.44.105 and 2002 c 254 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Violation of any of the provisions of this chapter is a traffic
infraction, and upon the first finding thereof shall be assessed a
basic penalty of not less than fifty dollars; and upon a second finding
thereof shall be assessed a basic penalty of not less than seventy-five
dollars; and upon a third or subsequent finding shall be assessed a
basic penalty of not less than one hundred dollars.
(2) In addition to the penalties imposed in subsection (1) of this
section, any person violating RCW 46.44.041, 46.44.042, 46.44.047,
46.44.090, 46.44.091, or 46.44.095 shall be assessed a penalty for each
pound overweight, as follows:
(a) One pound through four thousand pounds overweight is three
cents for each pound;
(b) Four thousand one pounds through ten thousand pounds overweight
is one hundred twenty dollars plus twelve cents per pound for each
additional pound over four thousand pounds overweight;
(c) Ten thousand one pounds through fifteen thousand pounds
overweight is eight hundred forty dollars plus sixteen cents per pound
for each additional pound over ten thousand pounds overweight;
(d) Fifteen thousand one pounds through twenty thousand pounds
overweight is one thousand six hundred forty dollars plus twenty cents
per pound for each additional pound over fifteen thousand pounds
overweight;
(e) Twenty thousand one pounds and more is two thousand six hundred
forty dollars plus thirty cents per pound for each additional pound
over twenty thousand pounds overweight.
(3) In addition to the penalties imposed in subsections (1) and (2)
of this section, a countywide port district responsible for the
construction of a third runway at any airport owned and operated by a
countywide port district with a county population greater than one
million five hundred thousand shall be assessed a penalty for each
pound overweight of any trucks supporting the construction, as follows:
(a) One pound through four thousand pounds overweight is one dollar
for each pound;
(b) Four thousand one pounds through ten thousand pounds overweight
is five hundred dollars plus one dollar and fifty cents per pound for
each additional pound over four thousand pounds overweight;
(c) Ten thousand one pounds through fifteen thousand pounds
overweight is three thousand dollars plus two dollars per pound for
each additional pound over ten thousand pounds overweight;
(d) Fifteen thousand one pounds through twenty thousand pounds
overweight is six thousand dollars plus two dollars and fifty cents per
pound for each additional pound over fifteen thousand pounds
overweight;
(e) Twenty thousand one pounds and more is nine thousand dollars
plus three dollars per pound for each additional pound over twenty
thousand pounds overweight.
(4) Upon a first violation in any calendar year, the court may
suspend the penalty for five hundred pounds of excess weight for each
axle on any vehicle or combination of vehicles, not to exceed a two
thousand pound suspension. In no case may the basic penalty assessed
in subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section ((or the additional
penalty assessed in subsection (2) of this section)), except as
provided for the first violation, be suspended.
(((3))) (5) Whenever any vehicle or combination of vehicles is
involved in two violations of RCW 46.44.041, 46.44.042, 46.44.047,
46.44.090, 46.44.091, or 46.44.095 during any twelve-month period, the
court may suspend the certificate of license registration of the
vehicle or combination of vehicles for not less than thirty days. Upon
a third or succeeding violation in any twelve-month period, the court
shall suspend the certificate of license registration for not less than
thirty days. Whenever the certificate of license registration is
suspended, the court shall secure such certificate and immediately
forward the same to the director with information concerning the
suspension.
(((4))) (6) Any person found to have violated any posted
limitations of a highway or section of highway shall be assessed a
monetary penalty of not less than one hundred and fifty dollars, and
the court shall in addition thereto upon second violation within a
twelve-month period involving the same power unit, suspend the
certificate of license registration for not less than thirty days.
(((5))) (7) It is unlawful for the driver of a vehicle to fail or
refuse to stop and submit the vehicle and load to a weighing, or to
fail or refuse, when directed by an officer upon a weighing of the
vehicle to stop the vehicle and otherwise comply with the provisions of
this section. It is unlawful for a driver of a commercial motor
vehicle as defined in RCW 46.32.005, other than the driver of a bus as
defined in RCW 46.32.005(2) or a vehicle with a gross vehicle or
combination weight not over sixteen thousand pounds and not
transporting hazardous materials in accordance with RCW 46.32.005(3),
to fail or refuse to stop at a weighing station when proper traffic
control signs indicate scales are open. However, unladen tow trucks
regardless of weight and farm vehicles carrying farm produce with a
gross vehicle or combination weight not over twenty-six thousand pounds
may fail or refuse to stop at a weighing station when proper traffic
control signs indicate scales are open.
Any police officer is authorized to require the driver of any
vehicle or combination of vehicles to stop and submit to a weighing
either by means of a portable or stationary scale and may require that
the vehicle be driven to the nearest public scale. Whenever a police
officer, upon weighing a vehicle and load, determines that the weight
is unlawful, the officer may require the driver to stop the vehicle in
a suitable location and remain standing until such portion of the load
is removed as may be necessary to reduce the gross weight of the
vehicle to the limit permitted by law. If the vehicle is loaded with
grain or other perishable commodities, the driver shall be permitted to
proceed without removing any of the load, unless the gross weight of
the vehicle and load exceeds by more than ten percent the limit
permitted by this chapter. The owner or operator of the vehicle shall
care for all materials unloaded at the risk of the owner or operator.
Any vehicle whose driver or owner represents that the vehicle is
disabled or otherwise unable to proceed to a weighing location shall
have its load sealed or otherwise marked by any police officer. The
owner or driver shall be directed that upon completion of repairs, the
vehicle shall submit to weighing with the load and markings and/or seal
intact and undisturbed. Failure to report for weighing, appearing for
weighing with the seal broken or the markings disturbed, or removal of
any cargo prior to weighing is unlawful. Any person so convicted shall
be fined one thousand dollars, and in addition the certificate of
license registration shall be suspended for not less than thirty days.
(((6))) (8) Any other provision of law to the contrary
notwithstanding, district courts having venue have concurrent
jurisdiction with the superior courts for the imposition of any
penalties authorized under this section.
(((7))) (9) For the purpose of determining additional penalties as
provided by subsection (2) of this section, "overweight" means the
poundage in excess of the maximum allowable gross weight or axle/axle
grouping weight prescribed by RCW 46.44.041, 46.44.042, 46.44.047,
46.44.091, and 46.44.095.
(((8))) (10) The penalties provided in subsections (1) ((and (2)))
through (3) of this section shall be remitted as provided in chapter
3.62 RCW or RCW 10.82.070. For the purpose of computing the basic
penalties and additional penalties to be imposed under subsections (1)
((and (2))) through (3) of this section, the convictions shall be on
the same vehicle or combination of vehicles within a twelve-month
period under the same ownership.
(((9))) (11) Any state patrol officer or any weight control officer
who finds any person operating a vehicle or a combination of vehicles
in violation of the conditions of a permit issued under RCW 46.44.047,
46.44.090, and 46.44.095 may confiscate the permit and forward it to
the state department of transportation which may return it to the
permittee or revoke, cancel, or suspend it without refund. The
department of transportation shall keep a record of all action taken
upon permits so confiscated, and if a permit is returned to the
permittee the action taken by the department of transportation shall be
endorsed thereon. Any permittee whose permit is suspended or revoked
may upon request receive a hearing before the department of
transportation or person designated by that department. After the
hearing the department of transportation may reinstate any permit or
revise its previous action.
Every permit issued as provided for in this chapter shall be
carried in the vehicle or combination of vehicles to which it refers
and shall be open to inspection by any law enforcement officer or
authorized agent of any authority granting such a permit.
Upon the third finding within a calendar year of a violation of the
requirements and conditions of a permit issued under RCW 46.44.095, the
permit shall be canceled, and the canceled permit shall be immediately
transmitted by the court or the arresting officer to the department of
transportation. The vehicle covered by the canceled permit is not
eligible for a new permit for a period of thirty days.
(((10))) (12) For the purposes of determining gross weights the
actual scale weight taken by the arresting officer is prima facie
evidence of the total gross weight.
(((11))) (13) It is a traffic infraction to direct the loading of
a vehicle with knowledge that it violates the requirements in RCW
46.44.041, 46.44.042, 46.44.047, 46.44.090, 46.44.091, or 46.44.095 and
that it is to be operated on the public highways of this state.
(((12))) (14) The chief of the state patrol, with the advice of the
department, may adopt reasonable rules to aid in the enforcement of
this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.61.655 and 1990 c 250 s 56 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No vehicle shall be driven or moved on any public highway
unless such vehicle is so constructed or loaded as to prevent any of
its load from dropping, sifting, leaking, or otherwise escaping
therefrom, except that sand may be dropped for the purpose of securing
traction. Any person operating a vehicle from which any glass or
objects have fallen or escaped, which would constitute an obstruction
or injure a vehicle or otherwise endanger travel upon such public
highway shall immediately cause the public highway to be cleaned of all
such glass or objects and shall pay any costs therefor.
(2) No person may operate on any public highway any vehicle with
any load unless the load and such covering as required thereon by
subsection (3) of this section is securely fastened to prevent the
covering or load from becoming loose, detached, or in any manner a
hazard to other users of the highway.
(3) Any vehicle operating on a paved public highway with a load of
dirt, sand, or gravel susceptible to being dropped, spilled, leaked, or
otherwise escaping therefrom shall be covered so as to prevent
spillage. Covering of such loads is not required if six inches of
freeboard is maintained within the bed.
(4) Any vehicle with deposits of mud, rocks, or other debris on the
vehicle's body, fenders, frame, undercarriage, wheels, or tires shall
be cleaned of such material before the operation of the vehicle on a
paved public highway.
(5) The state patrol may make necessary rules to carry into effect
the provisions of this section, applying such provisions to specific
conditions and loads and prescribing means, methods, and practices to
effectuate such provisions.
(6) In addition to the penalty imposed under RCW 46.63.110, a
countywide port district responsible for the construction of a third
runway at any airport owned and operated by a countywide port district
with a county population greater than one million five hundred thousand
shall be assessed an additional penalty of three hundred dollars per
truck for any truck supporting the construction of the project that
violates this section.
(7) Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit a public
maintenance vehicle from dropping sand on a highway to enhance
traction, or sprinkling water or other substances to clean or maintain
a highway.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The chief of the Washington state patrol shall assign five
full-time officers from the agency's commercial vehicle division to
work solely to enforce the size, weight, and load laws under this
chapter with respect to truck operators supporting the construction of
a third runway at any airport owned and operated by a county-wide port
district with a county population greater than one million five hundred
thousand.
(2) The Washington state patrol's costs for the five full-time
officers from the agency's commercial vehicle division shall be
reimbursed by the same countywide port district responsible for the
construction of a third runway at any airport owned and operated by a
countywide port district with a county population greater than one
million five hundred thousand.

--- END ---