BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.01.020 and 1947 c 79 s .01.02 are each amended to
read as follows:
All insurance and insurance transactions in this state, or
affecting subjects located wholly or in part or to be performed within
this state, and all persons having to do therewith are governed by this
code. This code does not apply to private ambulance services that
solicit membership subscriptions, accept membership applications,
charge membership fees, and furnish prepaid or discounted ambulance
services, including both ground and air ambulance services, to
subscription members and designated members of their household.

--- END ---