BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that Washington lags behind the country
and peer states in production of bachelor's and graduate degrees in the
fields needed to invent new technologies, attract new businesses and
new industries to the state, and spur economic development and job
growth. According to an analysis of data compiled by the national
center for education statistics for 2001:
(a) Washington ties for last place among nine peer states in the
number of college graduates in engineering per one hundred thousand in
population;
(b) Despite the presence of two major research universities,
Washington is tied for sixth place among nine peer states in the number
of college graduates in biological and life sciences per one hundred
thousand population;
(c) Washington's ratio of doctoral degrees to bachelor's degrees
falls far below all peer states, particularly in the critical areas of
science and engineering where research and development by staff with
advanced expertise is crucial for innovation and product design.
(2) The legislature further finds that a key contributing factor to
Washington's low production of high-demand degrees is the practice of
funding student enrollment at universities based on an average cost per
student, despite clear evidence that junior and senior-level courses in
engineering and the hard sciences cost thirty to forty percent above
the average, while junior and senior-level courses in fields such as
business and social sciences cost thirty to forty percent below the
average at the state's two research universities.
(3) Therefore the legislature intends to establish a goal to
increase course enrollment in engineering, technology, computer
science, hard sciences such as chemistry and physics, and mathematics
in order to double the number of degrees awarded in these high-demand
fields per one hundred thousand population by the year 2015. The
legislature further intends to accomplish this goal by increasing per-student funding for enrollment in high-demand fields by twenty-five
percent, while decreasing per-student funding for enrollment in other
fields by twenty-five percent.

--- END ---