BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature, through the creation of
the apple award, to honor and reward students in Washington's public
elementary schools who have shown significant improvement in their
school's results on the Washington assessment of student learning.
(2) The apple award program is created to honor and reward public
elementary schools that have the greatest combined average increase in
the percentage of students meeting the fourth grade reading,
mathematics, and writing standards on the Washington assessment of
student learning each school year. The program shall be administered
by the state board of education.
(3) Each school that receives an apple award shall be provided with
a twenty-five thousand dollar grant to be used for capital construction
purposes that have been selected by students in the school and approved
by the district's school directors. The funds may be used exclusively
for capital construction projects on school property or on other public
property in the community, city, or county in which the school is
located.

--- END ---