BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.12.102 and 2002 c 279 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An owner who has made a bona fide sale or transfer of a vehicle
and has delivered possession of it to a purchaser shall not by reason
of any of the provisions of this title be deemed the owner of the
vehicle so as to be subject to civil liability or criminal liability
for the operation of the vehicle thereafter by another person when the
owner has also fulfilled both of the following requirements:
(a) When the owner has made proper endorsement and delivery of the
certificate of ownership and has delivered the certificate of
registration as provided in this chapter;
(b) When the owner has delivered to the department either a
properly filed report of sale that includes all of the information
required in RCW 46.12.101(1) and is delivered to the department within
five days of the sale of the vehicle excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and
state and federal holidays, or appropriate documents for registration
of the vehicle pursuant to the sale or transfer.
(2) An owner who has made a bona fide sale or transfer of a
vehicle, has delivered possession of it to a purchaser, and has
fulfilled the requirements of subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section
is relieved of liability and liability is transferred to the purchaser
of the vehicle, for any traffic violation under this title, whether
designated as a traffic infraction or classified as a criminal offense,
that occurs after the date of the sale or transfer that is based on the
vehicle's identification, including, but not limited to, parking
infractions, high-occupancy toll lane violations, and violations
recorded by automated traffic safety cameras.
(3) When a registered tow truck operator submits an abandoned
vehicle report to the department for a vehicle sold at an abandoned
vehicle auction, any previous owner is relieved of civil or criminal
liability for the operation of the vehicle from the date of sale
thereafter, and liability is transferred to the purchaser of the
vehicle as listed on the abandoned vehicle report.

--- END ---