BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.09.004 and 1987 c 460 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Temporary parenting plan" means a plan for parenting of the
child pending final resolution of any action for dissolution of
marriage, declaration of invalidity, or legal separation which is
incorporated in a temporary order.
(2) "Permanent parenting plan" means a plan for parenting the
child, including allocation of parenting functions, which plan is
incorporated in any final decree or decree of modification in an action
for dissolution of marriage, declaration of invalidity, or legal
separation.
(3) "Parenting functions" means those aspects of the parent-child
relationship in which the parent makes decisions and performs functions
necessary for the care and growth of the child. Parenting functions
include:
(a) Maintaining a loving, stable, consistent, and nurturing
relationship with the child;
(b) Attending to the daily needs of the child, such as feeding,
clothing, physical care and grooming, supervision, health care, and day
care, and engaging in other activities which are appropriate to the
developmental level of the child and that are within the social and
economic circumstances of the particular family;
(c) Attending to adequate education for the child, including
remedial or other education essential to the best interests of the
child;
(d) Assisting the child in developing and maintaining appropriate
interpersonal relationships, including those with grandparents in
recognition that such relationships are recognized to be in the best
interests of the child;
(e) Exercising appropriate judgment regarding the child's welfare,
consistent with the child's developmental level and the family's social
and economic circumstances; and
(f) Providing for the financial support of the child.
(4) "Grandparent" means a person who is the parent of a child's
father or mother, who is related to the child by blood, in whole or by
half, adoption, or marriage.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.09.240 and 1996 c 177 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((A person other than a parent may petition the court for
visitation with a child at any time or may intervene in a pending
dissolution, legal separation, or modification of parenting plan
proceeding.)) A person other than a parent or grandparent may not
petition for visitation under this section unless the child's parent or
parents have commenced an action under this chapter.
(2) A grandparent may petition the court for visitation with a
child one time regardless of whether there is a pending dissolution,
legal separation, or modification of parenting plan proceeding.
(a) Any grandparent filing a subsequent petition must prove, in a
threshold hearing, that a substantial change of circumstances has
occurred. If the court finds good cause to allow grandparents to file
more than one time, the court shall allow the filing and consider the
petition.
(b) A death or incapacitation of a parent occurring subsequent to
any petition is a substantial change in circumstances, permitting the
grandparent to file an additional petition requesting visitation with
the child for each death or incapacitation.
(3) A petition for visitation with a child by a person other than
a parent must be filed in the county in which the child resides.
(((3))) (4) A petition for visitation or a motion to intervene
pursuant to this section shall be dismissed unless the petitioner or
intervenor can demonstrate by clear and convincing evidence that a
significant relationship exists with the child with whom visitation is
sought. If the petition or motion is dismissed for failure to
establish the existence of a significant relationship, the petitioner
or intervenor shall be ordered to pay reasonable attorney's fees and
costs to the parent, parents, other custodian, or representative of the
child who responds to this petition or motion.
(((4))) (5) The court may order visitation between the petitioner
or intervenor and the child between whom a significant relationship
exists upon a finding supported by the evidence that the visitation is
in the child's best interests.
(((5)(a) Visitation with a grandparent shall be presumed to be in
the child's best interests when a significant relationship has been
shown to exist. This presumption may be rebutted by a preponderance of
evidence showing that visitation would endanger the child's physical,
mental, or emotional health.
(b))) (6) In order to give deference to the decisions of a fit
parent in any proceeding under this subsection, the court must give
some weight to the parents' own determination regarding visitation with
the child.
(7) If the court finds that reasonable visitation by a grandparent
would be in the child's best interest except for the hostilities that
exist between the grandparent and one or both of the parents or person
with whom the child lives, the court may set the matter for mediation
under RCW 26.09.015.
(((6))) (8) The court ((may)) shall consider the following
nonexclusive factors when making a determination of the child's best
interests:
(a) The love, affection, and strength of the relationship between
the child and the petitioner;
(b) The length and quality of the prior relationship between the
child and the grandparent, the role performed by the grandparent, and
the emotional ties that existed between the child and the grandparent;
(c) The relationship between each of the child's parents or the
person with whom the child is residing and the petitioner;
(((c))) (d) The nature and reason for either parent's objection to
granting the petitioner visitation;
(((d))) (e) The effect that granting visitation will have on the
relationship between the child and the child's parents or the person
with whom the child is residing;
(((e))) (f) The residential time sharing arrangements between the
parents;
(((f))) (g) The good faith of the petitioner;
(((g))) (h) Any criminal history or history of physical, emotional,
or sexual abuse or neglect by the petitioner; ((and
(h))) (i) The child's reasonable preference, if the court considers
the child to be of sufficient age to express a preference; and
(j) Any other factor relevant to the child's best interest.
(((7))) (9) The restrictions of RCW 26.09.191 that apply to parents
shall be applied to a petitioner or intervenor who is not a parent.
The nature and extent of visitation, subject to these restrictions, is
in the discretion of the court.
(((8))) (10) The court may order an investigation and report
concerning the proposed visitation or may appoint a guardian ad litem
as provided in RCW 26.09.220.
(((9))) (11) Visitation granted pursuant to this section shall be
incorporated into the parenting plan for the child.
(((10))) (12) The court may modify or terminate visitation rights
granted pursuant to this section in any subsequent modification action
upon a showing that the visitation is no longer in the best interest of
the child.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---