BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.16.310 and 2002 c 323 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, all
claims or causes of action as set forth in RCW 4.16.300 shall accrue,
and the applicable statute of limitation shall begin to run only during
the period within six years after substantial completion of
construction, or during the period within six years after the
termination of the services enumerated in RCW 4.16.300, whichever is
later. The phrase "substantial completion of construction" shall mean
the state of completion reached when an improvement upon real property
may be used or occupied for its intended use. Any cause of action
which has not accrued within six years after such substantial
completion of construction, or within six years after such termination
of services, whichever is later, shall be barred: PROVIDED, That this
limitation shall not be asserted as a defense by any owner, tenant or
other person in possession and control of the improvement at the time
such cause of action accrues. The limitations prescribed in this
section apply to all claims or causes of action as set forth in RCW
4.16.300 brought in the name or for the benefit of the state which are
made or commenced after June 11, 1986.
(2) If a written notice is filed under RCW 64.50.020 within the
time prescribed for the filing of an action under this chapter, the
period of time during which the filing of an action is barred under RCW
64.50.020 plus sixty days shall not be a part of the period limited for
the commencement of an action, nor for the application of this section.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to actions that
involve residential construction and are based on willful misconduct or
fraudulent concealment.

Sec. 2 RCW 4.16.326 and 2003 c 80 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Persons engaged in any activity defined in RCW 4.16.300 may be
excused, in whole or in part, from any obligation, damage, loss, or
liability for those defined activities under the principles of
comparative fault for the following affirmative defenses:
(a) To the extent it is caused by an unforeseen act of nature that
caused, prevented, or precluded the activities defined in RCW 4.16.300
from meeting the applicable building codes, regulations, and ordinances
in effect at the commencement of construction. For purposes of this
section an "unforeseen act of nature" means any weather condition,
earthquake, or manmade event such as war, terrorism, or vandalism;
(b) To the extent it is caused by a homeowner's unreasonable
failure to minimize or prevent those damages in a timely manner,
including the failure of the homeowner to allow reasonable and timely
access for inspections and repairs under this section. This includes
the failure to give timely notice to the builder after discovery of a
violation, but does not include damages due to the untimely or
inadequate response of a builder to the homeowner's claim;
(c) To the extent it is caused by the homeowner or his or her
agent, employee, subcontractor, independent contractor, or consultant
by virtue of their failure to follow the builder's or manufacturer's
maintenance recommendations, or commonly accepted homeowner maintenance
obligations. In order to rely upon this defense as it relates to a
builder's recommended maintenance schedule, the builder shall show that
the homeowner had written notice of the schedule, the schedule was
reasonable at the time it was issued, and the homeowner failed to
substantially comply with the written schedule;
(d) To the extent it is caused by the homeowner or his or her
agent's or an independent third party's alterations, ordinary wear and
tear, misuse, abuse, or neglect, or by the structure's use for
something other than its intended purpose;
(e) As to a particular violation for which the builder has obtained
a valid release;
(f) To the extent that the builder's repair corrected the alleged
violation or defect;
(g) To the extent that a cause of action does not accrue within the
statute of repose pursuant to RCW 4.16.310 or that an actionable cause
as set forth in RCW 4.16.300 is not filed within the applicable statute
of limitations. Except as provided in RCW 4.16.310(3), in contract
actions the applicable contract statute of limitations expires,
regardless of discovery, six years after substantial completion of
construction, or during the period within six years after the
termination of the services enumerated in RCW 4.16.300, whichever is
later;
(h) As to any causes of action to which this section does not
apply, all applicable affirmative defenses are preserved.
(2) This section does not apply to any civil action in tort
alleging personal injury or wrongful death to a person or persons
resulting from a construction defect.

--- END ---