BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) It is the legislature's intent to
provide funding for counties for planning, implementing, and
maintaining digital geographic information systems for use by counties
in administering the ad valorem property tax system of the state, and
for related purposes as authorized by this chapter.
(2) The legislature finds that the use of digital geographic
information systems provides an efficient means for counties to prepare
and possess parcel maps as described under RCW 84.40.160 for lands
within the counties of the state, and to continually update these maps
to reflect transfers, acquisitions, conveyances, and other events that
change the boundary of parcels.
(3) The legislature finds that digital geographic information
systems provide efficient and effective means to map and geographically
analyze data created and compiled in meeting the requirements of
Washington's planning enabling act and growth management act.
(4) The legislature finds that digital geographic information
systems provide capabilities to store and analyze information that
improves the health, welfare, and security of the citizens of the state
of Washington by providing accurate property information, parcel maps,
and addresses for emergency services response and other public safety
needs.
(5) The legislature finds that due to the numerous users of
property information, and the many entities that rely on the accuracy
and timeliness of the information provided by geographic information
systems, it is in the best interest of the citizens of the state to
provide a means for counties to fund these systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of any county may impose an
additional excise tax on each sale of real property in the county at a
rate not to exceed one-eighth of one percent of the selling price. The
proceeds of the tax shall be used exclusively for planning,
implementing, and maintaining geographic information systems for use in
administering the ad valorem property tax system of the state, and for
related purposes as authorized by this chapter.
(2) The taxes imposed under this subsection shall be imposed in the
same manner and on the same occurrences, and are subject to the same
conditions, as the taxes under chapter 82.45 RCW.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Geographic information system" means an orderly method of
capturing, storing, checking, integrating, manipulating, analyzing, and
displaying spatially referenced land information and land records.
(b) "Land records" means maps, documents, computer files, and any
other information storage medium in which land information is recorded.
(c) "Land information" means any physical, legal, economic, or
environmental information or characteristics concerning land, water,
ground water, subsurface resources, or air in this state. "Land
information" includes information relating to topography, soil, soil
erosion, geology, minerals, vegetation, land cover, wildlife,
associated natural resources, land ownership, land use, land use
controls and restrictions, judicial boundaries, tax assessment, land
value, land survey records and references, geodetic control networks,
aerial photographs, maps, planimetric data, remote sensing data,
historic and prehistoric data, and economic projections.

--- END ---