BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.660 and 2002 c 290 s 20 and 2002 c 175 s 10 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) An offender is eligible for the special drug offender
sentencing alternative if:
(a) The offender is convicted of a felony that is not a violent
offense or sex offense and the violation does not involve a sentence
enhancement under RCW 9.94A.533 (3) or (4);
(b) The offender has no current or prior convictions for a sex
offense at any time or violent offense within ten years before
conviction of the current offense, in this state, another state, or the
United States;
(c) For a violation of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act under
chapter 69.50 RCW or a criminal solicitation to commit such a violation
under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the offense involved only a small quantity of
the particular controlled substance as determined by the judge upon
consideration of such factors as the weight, purity, packaging, sale
price, and street value of the controlled substance; ((and))
(d) The offender has not been found by the United States attorney
general to be subject to a deportation detainer or order and does not
become subject to a deportation order during the period of the
sentence; and
(e) The standard sentence range for the current offense is greater
than one year.
(2) A motion for a sentence under this section may be made by the
court, the offender, or the state. If ((the standard sentence range is
greater than one year and)) the sentencing court determines that the
offender is eligible for this alternative ((and that)), the court may
order an examination of the offender. The examination shall, at a
minimum, address the following issues:
(a) Whether the offender suffers from drug addiction;
(b) Whether the addiction is such that there is a probability that
criminal behavior will occur in the future;
(c) Whether effective treatment for the offender's addiction is
available from a provider that has been licensed or certified by the
division of alcohol and substance abuse of the department of social and
health services; and
(d) Whether the offender and the community will benefit from the
use of the alternative((, the judge may)).
(3) The examination report must contain:
(a) Information on the issues required to be addressed in
subsection (2) of this section; and
(b) A proposed treatment plan that must, at a minimum, contain:
(i) A proposed treatment provider that has been licensed or
certified by the division of alcohol and substance abuse of the
department of social and health services;
(ii) The recommended frequency and length of treatment, including
both residential chemical dependency treatment and treatment in the
community;
(iii) A proposed monitoring plan, including any requirements
regarding living conditions, lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by
family members and others; and
(iv) Recommended crime-related prohibitions and affirmative
conditions.
(4) After receipt of the examination report, if the court
determines that a sentence under this section is appropriate, the court
shall waive imposition of a sentence within the standard sentence range
and impose a sentence ((that must include)) consisting of either a
prison-based alternative under subsection (5) of this section or a
community-based alternative under subsection (6) of this section.
(5) The prison-based alternative shall include:
(a) A period of total confinement in a state facility for one-half
of the midpoint of the standard sentence range. During incarceration
in the state facility, offenders sentenced under this subsection shall
undergo a comprehensive substance abuse assessment and receive, within
available resources, treatment services appropriate for the offender.
The treatment services shall be designed by the division of alcohol and
substance abuse of the department of social and health services, in
cooperation with the department of corrections((.));
((The court shall also impose:
(a))) (b) The remainder of the midpoint of the standard range as a
term of community custody which must include appropriate substance
abuse treatment in a program that has been approved by the division of
alcohol and substance abuse of the department of social and health
services. If the department finds that conditions have been willfully
violated, the offender may be reclassified to serve the remaining
balance of the original sentence. An offender who fails to complete
the program or who is administratively terminated from the program
shall be reclassified to serve the unexpired term of his or her
sentence as ordered by the sentencing court;
(((b))) (c) Crime-related prohibitions including a condition not to
use illegal controlled substances;
(((c))) (d) A requirement to submit to urinalysis or other testing
to monitor that status; and
(((d))) (e) A term of community custody pursuant to RCW 9.94A.715
to be imposed upon failure to complete or administrative termination
from the special drug offender sentencing alternative program.
(6) The community-based alternative shall include:
(a) A term of community custody equal to one-half of the midpoint
of the standard sentence range or two years, whichever is greater. If
the court imposes a term of community custody, the department shall,
within available resources, make chemical dependency assessment and
treatment services available to the offender during the term of
community custody. The court shall impose, as conditions of community
custody, treatment and other conditions as proposed in the plan under
subsection (3)(b) of this section. The department may impose
conditions and sanctions as authorized in RCW 9.94A.715 (2), (3), (6),
and (7), 9.94A.737, and 9.94A.740. The court shall schedule a
treatment termination hearing for three months before the expiration of
the term of community custody;
(b) Before the treatment termination hearing, the treatment
provider and the department shall submit written reports to the court
and parties regarding the offender's compliance with treatment and
monitoring requirements, and recommendations regarding termination from
treatment. At the hearing, the court may:
(i) Authorize the department to terminate the offender's community
custody status on the expiration date determined under (a) of this
subsection; or
(ii) Continue the hearing to a date before the expiration date of
community custody, with or without modifying the conditions of
community custody; or
(iii) Impose a term of total confinement equal to one-half the
midpoint of the standard sentence range, followed by a term of
community custody under RCW 9.94A.715;
(c) If the court imposes a term of total confinement under (b)(iii)
of this subsection, the department shall, within available resources,
make chemical dependency assessment and treatment services available to
the offender during the terms of total confinement and community
custody.
(7) If the court imposes a sentence under this section, the court
may prohibit the offender from using alcohol or controlled substances
and may require that the monitoring for controlled substances be
conducted by the department or by a treatment alternatives to street
crime program or a comparable court or agency-referred program. The
offender may be required to pay thirty dollars per month while on
community custody to offset the cost of monitoring. In addition, the
court ((shall)) may impose ((three or more)) any of the following
conditions:
(((i))) (a) Devote time to a specific employment or training;
(((ii))) (b) Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and
notify the court or the community corrections officer before any change
in the offender's address or employment;
(((iii))) (c) Report as directed to a community corrections
officer;
(((iv))) (d) Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations;
(((v))) (e) Perform community restitution work;
(((vi))) (f) Stay out of areas designated by the sentencing court;
(((vii))) (g) Such other conditions as the court may require such
as affirmative conditions.
(((3))) (8)(a) The court may bring any offender sentenced under
this section back into court at any time on its own initiative to
evaluate the offender's progress in treatment or to determine if any
violations of the conditions of the sentence have occurred.
(b) If the offender is brought back to court, the court may modify
the terms of the community custody or impose sanctions under (c) of
this subsection.
(c) The court may order the offender to serve a term of total
confinement within the standard range of the offender's current offense
at any time during the period of community custody if the offender
violates the conditions of the sentence or if the offender is failing
to make satisfactory progress in treatment.
(d) An offender ordered to serve a term of total confinement under
(c) of this subsection shall receive credit for any time previously
served under this section.
(9) If ((the)) an offender ((violates any of the sentence
conditions in subsection (2) of this section or)) sentenced to the
prison-based alternative under subsection (5) of this section is found
by the United States attorney general to be subject to a deportation
order, a ((violation)) hearing shall be held by the department unless
waived by the offender((.
(a) If the department finds that conditions have been willfully
violated, the offender may be reclassified to serve the remaining
balance of the original sentence.
(b))), and, if the department finds that the offender is subject to
a valid deportation order, the department may administratively
terminate the offender from the program and reclassify the offender to
serve the remaining balance of the original sentence.
(((4) The department shall determine the rules for calculating the
value of a day fine based on the offender's income and reasonable
obligations which the offender has for the support of the offender and
any dependents. These rules shall be developed in consultation with
the administrator for the courts, the office of financial management,
and the commission.
(5))) (10) An offender ((who fails to complete the special drug
offender sentencing alternative program or who is administratively
terminated from the program shall be reclassified to serve the
unexpired term of his or her sentence as ordered by the sentencing
court and)) sentenced under this section shall be subject to all rules
relating to earned release time with respect to any period served in
total confinement. ((An offender who violates any conditions of
supervision as defined by the department shall be sanctioned.
Sanctions may include, but are not limited to, reclassifying the
offender to serve the unexpired term of his or her sentence as ordered
by the sentencing court. If an offender is reclassified to serve the
unexpired term of his or her sentence, the offender shall be subject to
all rules relating to earned release time.))
(11) Costs of examinations and preparing treatment plans under
subsections (2) and (3) of this section may be paid from funds provided
to a county from the criminal justice treatment account under RCW
70.96A.350.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to sentences imposed on or
after the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect October 1, 2005.

--- END ---