BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 31.45.073 and 2003 c 86 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No licensee may engage in the business of making small loans
without first obtaining a small loan endorsement to its license from
the director in accordance with this chapter. An endorsement will be
required for each location where a licensee engages in the business of
making small loans, but a small loan endorsement may authorize a
licensee to make small loans at a location different than the licensed
locations where it cashes or sells checks. A licensee may have more
than one endorsement.
(2) The termination date of a small loan may not exceed the
origination date of that same small loan by more than forty-five days,
including weekends and holidays, unless the term of the loan is
extended by agreement of both the borrower and the licensee and no
additional fee or interest is charged. The maximum principal amount of
any small loan, or the outstanding principal balances of all small
loans made by a licensee to a single borrower at any one time, may not
exceed ((seven)) five hundred dollars.
(3) A licensee that has obtained the required small loan
endorsement may charge interest or fees for small loans not to exceed
in the aggregate ((fifteen)) ten percent of the ((first five hundred
dollars of)) principal up to a maximum of twenty-five dollars. ((If
the principal exceeds five hundred dollars, a licensee may charge
interest or fees not to exceed in the aggregate ten percent of that
portion of the principal in excess of five hundred dollars.)) If a
licensee makes more than one loan to a single borrower, ((and)) the
aggregated principal of all loans made to that borrower ((exceeds)) may
not exceed five hundred dollars at any one time((, the licensee may
charge interest or fees not to exceed in the aggregate ten percent on
that portion of the aggregated principal of all loans at any one time
that is in excess of five hundred dollars)). The director may
determine by rule which fees, if any, are not subject to the interest
or fee limitations described in this section. It is a violation of
this chapter for any licensee to knowingly loan to a single borrower at
any one time, in a single loan or in the aggregate, more than the
maximum principal amount described in this section.
(4) In connection with making a small loan, a licensee may advance
moneys on the security of a postdated check. The licensee may not
accept any other property, title to property, or other evidence of
ownership of property as collateral for a small loan. The licensee may
accept only one postdated check per loan as security for the loan. A
licensee may permit a borrower to redeem a postdated check with a
payment of cash or the equivalent of cash. The licensee may disburse
the proceeds of a small loan in cash, in the form of a check, or in the
form of the electronic equivalent of cash or a check.
(5) No person may at any time cash or advance any moneys on a
postdated check or draft in excess of the amount of goods or services
purchased without first obtaining a small loan endorsement to a check
casher or check seller license.

--- END ---