BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 31.45 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The director shall implement a common data base with real-time
access through an internet connection for licensees who make small
loans. The data base must allow the licensees and the department of
financial institutions to verify whether any small loans are
outstanding for a particular person.
(2)(a) Licensees shall submit required data before entering into a
small loan or payment plan. The data elements must include:
(i) The prospective borrower's name;
(ii) The prospective borrower's social security number or
employment authorization alien number;
(iii) The prospective borrower's address;
(iv) The prospective borrower's driver's license number or other
identification required by the licensee;
(v) The amount of the transaction;
(vi) The date of the transaction;
(vii) The date that the transaction is closed; and
(viii) Additional information as is required by the director by
rule.
(b) The data shall be in a format established by the director by
rule.
(3) The director may impose a fee not to exceed one dollar per
transaction when data is required to be submitted by a licensee under
subsection (2) of this section.
(4) A licensee may rely on the information contained in the data
base as accurate and is not subject to any administrative penalty or
civil liability as a result of relying on inaccurate information
contained in the data base.
(5) Identifying information contained in the data base is
confidential and exempt from public disclosure. The information may
only be accessed by licensees to verify whether any small loans are
outstanding for a particular person and by the department for the
purpose of enforcing this section.
(6) The director may adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 31.45.070 and 2003 c 86 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No licensee may engage in a loan business or the negotiation of
loans or the discounting of notes, bills of exchange, checks, or other
evidences of debt on the same premises where a check cashing or selling
business is conducted, unless the licensee:
(a) Is conducting the activities of pawnbroker as defined in RCW
19.60.010;
(b) Is a properly licensed consumer loan company under chapter
31.04 RCW;
(c) Is conducting other lending activity permitted in the state of
Washington; or
(d) Has a small loan endorsement.
(2) Except as otherwise permitted in this chapter, no licensee may
at any time cash or advance any moneys on a postdated check or draft.
However, a licensee may cash a check payable on the first banking day
following the date of cashing if:
(a) The check is drawn by the United States, the state of
Washington, or any political subdivision of the state, or by any
department or agency of the state or its subdivisions; or
(b) The check is a payroll check drawn by an employer to the order
of its employee in payment for services performed by the employee.
(3) Except as otherwise permitted in this chapter, no licensee may
agree to hold a check or draft for later deposit. A licensee shall
deposit all checks and drafts cashed by the licensee as soon as
practicable.
(4) A licensee must access the data base established in section 1
of this act and verify the number of outstanding small loans and
payment plans with an outstanding principal balance made to the
borrower. A licensee may not make a small loan to a borrower unless
the borrower has fewer than:
(a) Four small loans with outstanding principal balances with any
one licensee or all licensees combined;
(b) Four payment plans with outstanding balances with any one
licensee or all licensees combined; or
(c) A combination of four:
(i) Small loans with outstanding principal balances; and
(ii) Payment plans with outstanding balances with any one licensee
or all licensees combined.
(5) No licensee may issue or cause to be issued any check, draft,
or money order, or other commercial paper serving the same purpose,
that is drawn upon the trust account of a licensee without concurrently
receiving the full principal amount, in cash, or by check, draft, or
money order from a third party believed to be valid.
(((5))) (6) No licensee may advertise, print, display, publish,
distribute, or broadcast or cause or permit to be advertised, printed,
displayed, published, distributed, or broadcast, any statement or
representation that is false, misleading, or deceptive, or that omits
material information, or that refers to the supervision of the licensee
by the state of Washington or any department or official of the state.
(((6))) (7) Each licensee shall comply with all applicable federal
statutes governing currency transaction reporting.

Sec. 3 RCW 42.17.31911 and 1997 c 258 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Examination reports and information obtained by the department of
financial institutions from banks under RCW 30.04.075, from savings
banks under RCW 32.04.220, from savings and loan associations under RCW
33.04.110, from credit unions under RCW 31.12.565, from check cashers
and sellers under RCW 31.45.030(3) and section 1 of this act, and from
securities brokers and investment advisers under RCW 21.20.100 are
confidential and privileged information and not subject to public
disclosure under this chapter.

--- END ---