BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.95.020 and 2004 c 275 s 59 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Academic year" means the regular nine-month, three-quarter, or
two-semester period annually occurring between ((July 1st and June
30th)) August 1st and July 31st.
(2) "Account" means the Washington advanced college tuition payment
program account established for the deposit of all money received by
the board from eligible purchasers and interest earnings on investments
of funds in the account, as well as for all expenditures on behalf of
eligible beneficiaries for the redemption of tuition units and for the
development of any authorized college savings program pursuant to RCW
28B.95.150.
(3) "Board" means the higher education coordinating board as
defined in chapter 28B.76 RCW.
(4) "Committee on advanced tuition payment" or "committee" means a
committee of the following members: The state treasurer, the director
of the office of financial management, the executive director of the
higher education coordinating board, or their designees, and two
members to be appointed by the governor, one representing program
participants and one private business representative with marketing,
public relations, or financial expertise.
(5) "Governing body" means the committee empowered by the
legislature to administer the Washington advanced college tuition
payment program.
(6) "Contractual obligation" means a legally binding contract of
the state with the purchaser and the beneficiary establishing that
purchases of tuition units will be worth the same number of tuition
units at the time of redemption as they were worth at the time of the
purchase.
(7) "Eligible beneficiary" means the person for whom the tuition
unit will be redeemed for attendance at an institution of higher
education. The beneficiary is that person named by the purchaser at
the time that a tuition unit contract is accepted by the governing
body. ((With the exception of tuition unit contracts purchased by))
Qualified organizations, as allowed under section 529 of the federal
internal revenue code, purchasing tuition unit contracts as future
scholarships((, the beneficiary must reside in the state of Washington
or otherwise be a resident of the state of Washington at the time the
tuition unit contract is accepted by the governing body)) need not
designate a beneficiary at the time of purchase.
(8) "Eligible purchaser" means an individual or organization that
has entered into a tuition unit contract with the governing body for
the purchase of tuition units for an eligible beneficiary.
(9) "Full-time tuition charges" means resident tuition charges at
a state institution of higher education for enrollments between ten
credits and eighteen credit hours per academic term.
(10) "Institution of higher education" means an institution that
offers education beyond the secondary level and is recognized by the
internal revenue service under chapter 529 of the internal revenue
code.
(11) "Investment board" means the state investment board as defined
in chapter 43.33A RCW.
(12) "State institution of higher education" means institutions of
higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.
(13) "Tuition and fees" means undergraduate tuition and services
and activities fees as defined in RCW 28B.15.020 and 28B.15.041 rounded
to the nearest whole dollar. ((The maximum tuition and fees charges
recognized for beneficiaries enrolled in a state technical college
shall be equal to the tuition and fees for the community college
system.)) For purposes of this chapter, services and activities fees
do not include fees charged for the payment of bonds heretofore or
hereafter issued for, or other indebtedness incurred to pay, all or
part of the cost of acquiring, constructing, or installing any lands,
buildings, or facilities.
(14) "Tuition unit contract" means a contract between an eligible
purchaser and the governing body, or a successor agency appointed for
administration of this chapter, for the purchase of tuition units for
a specified beneficiary that may be redeemed at a later date for an
equal number of tuition units.
(15) "Unit purchase price" means the minimum cost to purchase one
tuition unit for an eligible beneficiary. Generally, the minimum
purchase price is one percent of the undergraduate ((weighted average))
tuition and fees for the current year, rounded to the nearest whole
dollar, adjusted for the costs of administration and adjusted to ensure
the actuarial soundness of the account. The analysis for price setting
shall also include, but not be limited to consideration of past and
projected patterns of tuition increases, program liability, past and
projected investment returns, and the need for a prudent stabilization
reserve.
(((16) "Weighted average tuition" shall be calculated as the sum of
the undergraduate tuition and services and activities fees for each
four-year state institution of higher education, multiplied by the
respective full-time equivalent student enrollment at each institution
divided by the sum total of undergraduate full-time equivalent student
enrollments of all four-year state institutions of higher education,
rounded to the nearest whole dollar.
(17) "Weighted average tuition unit" is the value of the weighted
average tuition and fees divided by one hundred. The weighted average
is the basis upon which tuition benefits may be calculated as the basis
for any refunds provided from the program.))

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.95.030 and 2000 c 14 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington advanced college tuition payment program shall
be administered by the committee on advanced tuition payment which
shall be chaired by the executive director of the board. The committee
shall be supported by staff of the board.
(2)(a) The Washington advanced college tuition payment program
shall consist of the sale of tuition units, which may be redeemed by
the beneficiary at a future date for an equal number of tuition units
regardless of any increase in the price of tuition, that may have
occurred in the interval.
(b) Each purchase shall be worth a specific number of or fraction
of tuition units at each state institution of higher education as
determined by the governing body.
(c) The number of tuition units necessary to pay for a full year's,
full-time undergraduate tuition and fee charges at a state institution
of higher education shall be set by the governing body at the time a
purchaser enters into a tuition unit contract.
(d) The governing body may limit the number of tuition units
purchased by any one purchaser or on behalf of any one beneficiary,
however, no limit may be imposed that is less than that necessary to
achieve four years of full-time, undergraduate tuition charges at a
state institution of higher education. The governing body also may, at
its discretion, limit the number of participants, if needed, to ensure
the actuarial soundness and integrity of the program.
(e) While the Washington advanced college tuition payment program
is designed to help all citizens of the state of Washington, the
governing body may determine residency requirements for eligible
purchasers and eligible beneficiaries to ensure the actuarial soundness
and integrity of the program.
(3)(a) No tuition unit may be redeemed until two years after the
purchase of the unit. Units may be redeemed for enrollment at any
institution of higher education that is recognized by the internal
revenue service under chapter 529 of the internal revenue code.
(b) Units redeemed at a nonstate institution of higher education or
for graduate enrollment shall be redeemed at the rate for state public
institutions in effect at the time of redemption.
(4) The governing body shall determine the conditions under which
the tuition benefit may be transferred to another family member. In
permitting such transfers, the governing body may not allow the tuition
benefit to be bought, sold, bartered, or otherwise exchanged for goods
and services by either the beneficiary or the purchaser.
(5) The governing body shall administer the Washington advanced
college tuition payment program in a manner reasonably designed to be
actuarially sound, such that the assets of the trust will be sufficient
to defray the obligations of the trust including the costs of
administration. The governing body may, at its discretion, discount
the minimum purchase price for certain kinds of purchases such as those
from families with young children, as long as the actuarial soundness
of the account is not jeopardized.
(6) The governing body shall annually determine current value of a
tuition unit ((and the value of the weighted average tuition unit)).
(7) The governing body shall promote, advertise, and publicize the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program.
(8) In addition to any other powers conferred by this chapter, the
governing body may:
(a) Impose reasonable limits on the number of tuition units or
units that may be used in any one year;
(b) Determine and set any time limits, if necessary, for the use of
benefits under this chapter;
(c) Impose and collect administrative fees and charges in
connection with any transaction under this chapter;
(d) Appoint and use advisory committees as needed to provide
program direction and guidance;
(e) Formulate and adopt all other policies and rules necessary for
the efficient administration of the program;
(f) Consider the addition of an advanced payment program for room
and board contracts and also consider a college savings program;
(g) Purchase insurance from insurers licensed to do business in the
state, to provide for coverage against any loss in connection with the
account's property, assets, or activities or to further insure the
value of the tuition units;
(h) Make, execute, and deliver contracts, conveyances, and other
instruments necessary to the exercise and discharge of its powers and
duties under this chapter;
(i) Contract for the provision for all or part of the services
necessary for the management and operation of the program with other
state or nonstate entities authorized to do business in the state;
(j) Contract for other services or for goods needed by the
governing body in the conduct of its business under this chapter;
(k) Contract with financial consultants, actuaries, auditors, and
other consultants as necessary to carry out its responsibilities under
this chapter;
(l) Solicit and accept cash donations and grants from any person,
governmental agency, private business, or organization; and
(m) Perform all acts necessary and proper to carry out the duties
and responsibilities of this program under this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.95.090 and 1997 c 289 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In the event that the state determines that the program is not
financially feasible, or for any other reason, the state may declare
the discontinuance of the program. At the time of such declaration,
the governing body will cease to accept any further tuition unit
contracts or purchases.
(2) The remaining tuition units for all beneficiaries who have
either enrolled in higher education or who are within four years of
graduation from a secondary school shall be honored until such tuition
units have been exhausted, or for ten fiscal years from the date that
the program has been discontinued, whichever comes first. All other
contract holders shall receive a refund equal to the value of the
current ((weighted average)) tuition units in effect at the time that
the program was declared discontinued.
(3) At the end of the ten-year period, any tuition units remaining
unused by currently active beneficiaries enrolled in higher education
shall be refunded at the value of the current ((weighted average))
tuition unit in effect at the end of that ten-year period.
(4) At the end of the ten-year period, all other funds remaining in
the account not needed to make refunds or to pay for administrative
costs shall be deposited to the state general fund.
(5) The governing body may make refunds under other exceptional
circumstances as it deems fit, however, no tuition units may be honored
after the end of the tenth fiscal year following the declaration of
discontinuance of the program.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.95.110 and 2001 c 184 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The intent of the Washington advanced college tuition payment
program is to redeem tuition units for attendance at an institution of
higher education. Refunds shall be issued under specific conditions
that may include the following:
(a) Certification that the beneficiary, who is eighteen years of
age or older, will not attend an institution of higher education, will
result in a refund not to exceed the current ((weighted average tuition
and fees)) value, as determined by the governing body, in effect at the
time of such certification minus a penalty at the rate established by
the ((internal revenue service under chapter [section] 529 of the
internal revenue code. No more than one hundred tuition units may be
refunded per year to any individual making this certification))
governing body. The refund shall be made no sooner than ninety days
after such certification, less any administrative processing fees
assessed by the governing body;
(b) If there is certification of the death or disability of the
beneficiary, the refund shall be equal to one hundred percent of any
remaining unused tuition units at the current value, as determined by
the governing body, at the time that such certification is submitted to
the governing body, less any administrative processing fees assessed by
the governing body;
(c) If there is certification by the student of graduation or
program completion, the refund shall be as great as one hundred percent
of any remaining unused tuition units at the current value, as
determined by the governing body, at the time that such certification
is submitted to the governing body, less any administrative processing
fees assessed by the governing body. The governing body may, at its
discretion, impose a penalty if needed to comply with federal tax
rules;
(d) If there is certification of other tuition and fee
scholarships, which will cover the cost of tuition for the eligible
beneficiary. The refund shall be equal to one hundred percent of the
current value of tuition units, as determined by the governing body, in
effect at the time of the refund request, less any administrative
processing fees assessed by the governing body. The refund under this
subsection may not exceed the value of the scholarship;
(e) Incorrect or misleading information provided by the purchaser
or beneficiaries may result in a refund of the purchaser's investment,
less any administrative processing fees assessed by the governing body.
The value of the refund will not exceed the actual dollar value of the
purchaser's contributions; and
(f) The governing body may determine other circumstances qualifying
for refunds of remaining unused tuition units and may determine the
value of that refund.
(2) With the exception of subsection (1)(b), (e), and (f) of this
section no refunds may be made before the units have been held for two
years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28B.95 RCW
to read as follows:
In regard to bankruptcy filings and enforcement of judgments under
Title 6 RCW, tuition units purchased more than two years prior to the
date of filing or judgment will be considered excluded personal assets.

Sec. 6 RCW 6.15.010 and 2002 c 265 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 6.15.050, the following personal property
shall be exempt from execution, attachment, and garnishment:
(1) All wearing apparel of every individual and family, but not to
exceed one thousand dollars in value in furs, jewelry, and personal
ornaments for any individual.
(2) All private libraries of every individual, but not to exceed
fifteen hundred dollars in value, and all family pictures and
keepsakes.
(3) To each individual or, as to community property of spouses
maintaining a single household as against a creditor of the community,
to the community:
(a) The individual's or community's household goods, appliances,
furniture, and home and yard equipment, not to exceed two thousand
seven hundred dollars in value for the individual or five thousand four
hundred dollars for the community, said amount to include provisions
and fuel for the comfortable maintenance of the individual or
community;
(b) Other personal property, except personal earnings as provided
under RCW 6.15.050(1), not to exceed two thousand dollars in value, of
which not more than two hundred dollars in value may consist of cash,
and of which not more than two hundred dollars in value may consist of
bank accounts, savings and loan accounts, stocks, bonds, or other
securities;
(c) For an individual, a motor vehicle used for personal
transportation, not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars or for
a community two motor vehicles used for personal transportation, not to
exceed five thousand dollars in aggregate value;
(d) Any past due, current, or future child support paid or owed to
the debtor, which can be traced;
(e) All professionally prescribed health aids for the debtor or a
dependent of the debtor; and
(f) To any individual, the right to or proceeds of a payment not to
exceed sixteen thousand one hundred fifty dollars on account of
personal bodily injury, not including pain and suffering or
compensation for actual pecuniary loss, of the debtor or an individual
of whom the debtor is a dependent; or the right to or proceeds of a
payment in compensation of loss of future earnings of the debtor or an
individual of whom the debtor is or was a dependent, to the extent
reasonably necessary for the support of the debtor and any dependent of
the debtor. The exemption under this subsection (3)(f) does not apply
to the right of the state of Washington, or any agent or assignee of
the state, as a lienholder or subrogee under RCW 43.20B.060.
(4) To each qualified individual, one of the following exemptions:
(a) To a farmer, farm trucks, farm stock, farm tools, farm
equipment, supplies and seed, not to exceed five thousand dollars in
value;
(b) To a physician, surgeon, attorney, clergyman, or other
professional person, the individual's library, office furniture, office
equipment and supplies, not to exceed five thousand dollars in value;
(c) To any other individual, the tools and instruments and
materials used to carry on his or her trade for the support of himself
or herself or family, not to exceed five thousand dollars in value.
For purposes of this section, "value" means the reasonable market
value of the debtor's interest in an article or item at the time it is
selected for exemption, exclusive of all liens and encumbrances
thereon.
(5) Tuition units, under chapter 28B.95 RCW, purchased more than
two years prior to the date of a bankruptcy filing or court judgment.

--- END ---