BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.88A.020 and 1994 c 219 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The office of financial management shall, in cooperation with
appropriate legislative committees and legislative staff, establish a
procedure for the provision of fiscal notes on the expected impact of
bills and resolutions which increase or decrease or tend to increase or
decrease state government revenues or expenditures. Such fiscal notes
shall indicate by fiscal year the impact for the remainder of the
biennium in which the bill or resolution will first take effect as well
as a cumulative forecast of the fiscal impact for the succeeding four
fiscal years. Fiscal notes shall separately identify the fiscal
impacts on the operating and capital budgets. Estimates of fiscal
impacts shall be calculated using the procedures contained in the
fiscal note instructions issued by the office of financial management.
(2) In establishing the fiscal impact called for pursuant to this
chapter, the office of financial management shall coordinate the
development of fiscal notes with all state agencies affected.
(3) For fiscal notes on bills making tax law changes, the
department of revenue shall estimate the direct impact a tax law change
will have on revenue, as well as expected changes in taxpayer behavior
and overall economic activity, including expected changes in the level
of employment and state expenditures that would occur due to a tax law
change.

--- END ---