BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that population growth
in many areas of the state requires new, improved, or additional
infrastructure to accommodate growth. The legislature further finds
that the needed infrastructure identified in the capital facilities
elements of comprehensive plans adopted by counties and cities far
exceed the existing funding available to county, city, or state
agencies responsible for constructing or operating the needed
infrastructure and that current programs available for local government
infrastructure assistance are oversubscribed. The legislature
therefore establishes the growth management infrastructure account to
assist counties and cities in financing and constructing those
infrastructure projects needed to accommodate growth, as identified in
the capital facilities elements of growth management plans.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
For the purposes of this section and sections 3 and 4 of this act,
the following definitions apply:
(1) "Basic service" means that level of service necessary to meet
only the minimum level of service sufficient to accommodate growth,
specifically:
(a) For bridge and road projects, a level of service category "c"
on a scale of "a" to "f";
(b) For domestic water projects, a level of service necessary to
meet the minimum standards for water systems as set by the department
of health;
(c) For sanitary sewer, storm water, and solid waste/recycling
projects, a level of service necessary to meet the minimum standards as
established by the department of ecology or the department of health.
If no such standards exist, the board shall establish such standards;
and
(d) In no case will project landscaping be considered a minimum
level of service.
(2) "Board" means the public works board created in RCW 43.155.030.
(3) "Financial assistance" means loans or loan guarantees.
(4) "General purpose local government" means counties, cities, and
towns.
(5) "Growth infrastructure projects" means the costs of
acquisition, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, and
improvement of those bridges, roads, and domestic water, sanitary
sewer, storm sewer, and solid waste/recycling projects necessary to
meet the requirements of this chapter.
(6) "Special purpose local government" means all local governments
as defined in RCW 43.155.020, except counties, cities, and towns.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The growth management infrastructure account is created in the
state treasury. Moneys may be placed in the account from the proceeds
of bonds when authorized by the legislature or from any other lawful
source. The board shall use appropriated moneys from the account to
provide financial assistance to qualifying local governments for
capital costs directly related to providing basic service for growth
infrastructure projects necessary to accommodate residential,
commercial, and industrial growth. Funds necessary to support the
board's cost in administering sections 2 through 5 of this act shall be
appropriated from the account.
(2) The board, established in chapter 43.155 RCW, shall manage
appropriated funds from the account. The board shall have all
responsibilities granted to it under RCW 43.155.040, 43.155.080, and
43.155.090 in carrying out the purposes of this section.
(3) Existing debt or financial obligations of local governments
shall not be refinanced under this chapter unless refinancing existing
debt or financial obligations will enable the use of other funds, in
like amounts, for growth infrastructure projects. Each local
government applicant shall provide documentation of attempts to secure
additional local or other sources of funding for projects for which
financial assistance is sought under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
To qualify for financial assistance local governments must meet the
following standards:
(1) For general purpose local governments:
(a) Be in compliance with the provisions of this chapter;
(b) Demonstrate that the growth infrastructure project is necessary
to attract or accommodate the planned population and employment growth;
(c) Demonstrate that the comprehensive land use plan, the zoning
designations, the development regulations, and the capital facilities
plan are sufficient to accommodate projected growth; and
(d) Other criteria, including a commitment to maintain the growth
related infrastructure, that the board deems necessary to carry out the
purposes of this chapter.
(2) For special purpose local governments:
(a) Demonstrate that the local government has a capital facilities
plan meeting standards established by the board;
(b) Demonstrate that the growth infrastructure project is necessary
to attract or accommodate the planned population and employment growth;
(c) Demonstrate that the capital facilities plan is compatible with
the comprehensive land use plan, zoning designations, and the
development regulations of the overlying general purpose local
government or governments; and
(d) Other criteria, including a commitment to maintain the growth
related infrastructure, that the board deems necessary to carry out the
purposes of section 3 of this act and this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Nothing in sections 3 and 4 of this act
precludes the local government from using local funds in combination
with financial assistance provided under sections 3 and 4 of this act
to construct a project in excess of the minimum level financed under
this act.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.84.092 and 2003 c 361 s 602, 2003 c 324 s 1, 2003
c 150 s 2, and 2003 c 48 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking
water assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the election account, the
emergency reserve fund, The Evergreen State College capital projects
account, the federal forest revolving account, the growth management
infrastructure account, the health services account, the public health
services account, the health system capacity account, the personal
health services account, the state higher education construction
account, the higher education construction account, the highway
infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account,
the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the perpetual
surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement
system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan
revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health
supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puyallup
tribal settlement account, the regional transportation investment
district account, the resource management cost account, the site
closure account, the special wildlife account, the state employees'
insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the
state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the
Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system
plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and
plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco
settlement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the
tuition recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond
retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the
volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account, the
Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the
state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.84.092 and 2004 c 242 s 60 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking
water assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the election account, the
emergency reserve fund, The Evergreen State College capital projects
account, the federal forest revolving account, the growth management
infrastructure account, the health services account, the public health
services account, the health system capacity account, the personal
health services account, the state higher education construction
account, the higher education construction account, the highway
infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account,
the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the perpetual
surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement
system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan
revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health
supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puyallup
tribal settlement account, the regional transportation investment
district account, the resource management cost account, the site
closure account, the special wildlife account, the state employees'
insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the
state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the
Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system
plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and
plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco
settlement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the
tuition recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond
retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the
volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account, the
Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety
employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the
state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Section 6 of this act expires July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Section 7 of this act takes effect July 1,
2006.

--- END ---