BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that safe, decent, and
affordable housing is a basic human need that is of vital importance to
the health, safety, and welfare of the residents of the state. The
legislature recognizes that many of Washington's low-income residents
have difficulty obtaining or securing such accommodations.
The legislature finds also that existing state and federal programs
and funding are insufficient to meet the needs of qualifying low-income
residents seeking to obtain or to continue residing in safe, decent,
and affordable housing. For many low-income persons, this assistance
is critical in determining whether a family or individual will inhabit
a housing unit satisfying basic needs or whether such persons will be
subjected to the uncertainties and limitations of substandard dwellings
or homelessness.
The legislature, therefore, intends to establish the Washington
rental assistance program, a new tenant-based emergency and longer-term
rental assistance program, without eliminating or reducing existing
state or federal housing programs or funds for such programs, whereby
qualifying low-income families and individuals may receive such
assistance in accordance with legislative directives. The legislature
intends for this new program to be complementary and harmonious with
ongoing state and federal housing assistance programs currently
operating in Washington. The program is intended to be a
public/private partnership with rental assistance used principally in
the private rental market. The program is not intended to eliminate or
otherwise reduce state or federal housing assistance programs and funds
available to qualifying persons, but rather to provide tenant-based
rental assistance to those eligible for, but not receiving, such
assistance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Administering agency" means the agency designated by the
county to administer the Washington rental assistance program.
Organizations eligible for designation as an administering agency
include local community action agencies, local housing authorities, and
other local, nonprofit organizations with experience within the past
two years of operating tenant-based rental assistance programs.
(2) "Community action agency" means a nonprofit private or public
organization established under the economic opportunity act of 1964.
(3) "County" means a corporate body having the corporate powers set
forth in chapter 36.01 RCW. For the purposes of administering the
Washington rental assistance program, a county may be either
metropolitan or nonmetropolitan. Metropolitan counties are designated
by the federal office of management and budget and are included within
standard metropolitan statistical areas. Nonmetropolitan counties are
not included within standard metropolitan statistical areas.
(4) "Fair market rent" means the rent, including the cost of
utilities, except telephone, as established by the United States
department of housing and urban development for units of varying sizes,
as determined by number of bedrooms, that must be paid in the housing
market area to rent privately owned, existing, decent, safe, and
sanitary rental housing of a modest, nonluxury nature with suitable
amenities. The unit size utilized by the recipient will be determined
by existing local administrative practice.
(5) "Housing authority" means any of the public corporations
created by chapter 35.82 RCW.
(6) "Income" means money earned from work, including wages, tips,
gratuities, and income from the operation of a business, and money
received from other sources such as social security, supplemental
security income, worker's compensation, unemployment benefits, tribal
revenue sharing, dividends, interest, child support, alimony, friends,
and relatives. Support or maintenance furnished in cash or in kind by
any party, including rent or discounted rent, shall constitute income,
except as set forth in this subsection. "Income" does not include food
stamps, prescription drug discounts, medicare, medicare transitional
assistance, free food or clothing, and income earned by children under
eighteen.
(7) "Landlord" means the owner, lessor, or sublessor of a dwelling
unit or the property on which a dwelling unit or manufactured or mobile
home pad is located. "Landlord" also includes any person designated by
the owner, lessor, or sublessor as his or her representative.
(8) "Local preference" means the population, group, or subgroup
with defining characteristics identified by an administering agency,
through a public process, to receive priority service or accommodation.
Preferences may include, but are not limited to, victims of domestic
violence, individuals with terminal illness, and homeless families
participating in a program of community and therapeutic support.
(9) "Performance outcome assessment" means an assessment of an
organization's performance, including but not limited to measures of
productivity, effectiveness, quality, and timeliness. The department
shall have authority and responsibility for conducting performance
outcome assessments.
(10) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(11) "Recipient" means any individual or household with a gross
annual income of less than forty percent of the annual median income of
the county of residence and who receives tenant-based rental assistance
under the Washington rental assistance program.
(12) "Rent reasonableness" means that the maximum contract rent for
any unit to be leased is (a) reasonable in relation to rents currently
being charged for comparable units in the private unassisted market;
and (b) not in excess of rents currently being charged for most of the
owner's comparable unassisted units.
(13) "Tenant" means any person who is entitled to occupy a dwelling
unit primarily for living or dwelling purposes under a rental
agreement.
(14) "Dwelling unit" means a structure or that part of a structure
which is used as a home, residence, or sleeping place by one person or
by two or more persons maintaining a common household, including but
not limited to single-family residences, manufactured and mobile homes,
and units of multiplexes and apartment buildings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The Washington rental assistance program
is established to provide tenant-based rental assistance in the form of
a payment to the landlord on behalf of low-income single persons,
families, or unrelated persons living together:
(a) Whose income is at or below forty percent of the median income,
adjusted for household size, for the county of residence, as determined
by the federal department of housing and urban development; and
(b) Who are not receiving such assistance through a program
authorized by section 8 of the United States housing act of 1937, 42
U.S.C. Sec. 1437f or any other federal, state, or local rental
assistance program.
(2) A minimum of seventy percent of the dwelling units occupied by
Washington rental assistance program recipients shall be privately
owned units.
(3) Emergency/short-term assistance may be used for rental
assistance up to three months to prevent eviction. Such assistance may
also be used for first and last month's rent or for security or utility
deposits to help the homeless obtain housing. Assistance for deposits
cannot exceed the amount of one month's rent or the usual and customary
charges charged other tenants for the same type of deposits, whichever
is less.
(4) Longer-term tenant-based rental assistance may be provided up
to a maximum term of two years, unless extended consistent with a local
preference. The amount of longer-term tenant-based rental assistance
shall be equal to fifty percent of the fair market value.
(5) Rental assistance available under this program may be used for
rent of a dwelling unit or a manufactured or mobile home pad.
(6) Rental assistance under this program is portable only within
the county in which the application for rental assistance was made and
approved.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The department shall carry out the following
duties:
(1) Send electronic notices through its established listserv to
broadly advertise the availability of the Washington rental assistance
program;
(2) Establish a Washington rental assistance program advisory
committee to assist the department in developing a program and outcome
assessment tool and monitoring the program so as to ensure that it is
administered in a timely, efficient, and effective manner;
(3) Provide administrative and clerical assistance to the
Washington rental assistance program advisory committee; and
(4) Establish and conduct an assessment and performance audit of
the Washington rental assistance program no later than December 31,
2007, and every two years thereafter so long as the program continues.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The Washington rental assistance program
advisory committee shall consist of ten members appointed by the
department, as follows:
(a) Five representatives of for-profit rental housing owners and
managers;
(b) Four representatives of organizations eligible to administer
the rental assistance program; and
(c) One representative of low-income persons.
(2) The members of the Washington rental assistance program
advisory committee shall be appointed for four-year terms beginning on
July 1, 2005. The members of the advisory committee shall serve
without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as
provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) In metropolitan counties, the county
department, division, or agency charged with community development
shall convene the providers of tenant-based rental assistance in the
jurisdiction, both emergency/short-term and longer-term tenant-based
rental assistance providers, to determine the administering agency for
the emergency/short-term program and for the tenant-based rental
assistance program. More than one entity may be selected to administer
different parts of the Washington rental assistance program, e.g., a
housing authority could be selected to operate the longer-term tenant-based rental assistance program and a community action agency could be
selected to administer the emergency/short-term program. In
nonmetropolitan counties, the housing authority will convene providers
for the purpose of determining the administering agency.
(2) Administering agencies must be selected in a timely manner with
disbursement of funds under this program beginning no later than
January 31, 2006.
(3) An administering agency may charge an administrative fee of up
to eight percent of the Washington rental assistance program moneys
administered by that agency.
(4) An administering agency shall:
(a) Verify that an applicant's income is at or below forty percent
of the median income, adjusted for household size, for the county as
determined by the federal department of housing and urban development;
(b) Verify that an applicant is not receiving assistance through a
program authorized by section 8 of the United States housing act of
1937, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1437f, or other federal, state, or local rental
assistance program;
(c) Determine the monthly rental assistance for each eligible
applicant which shall be based upon a formula of fifty percent of fair
market rent as published by the federal department of housing and urban
development based upon the bedroom size for the household and the
jurisdiction in which the dwelling unit is located;
(d) Ensure, through an inspection process that uses the inspection
criteria identified by the federal department of housing and urban
development in its housing quality standards, that dwellings for which
Washington rental assistance program moneys are used are decent, safe,
and sanitary. However, these inspections are not required for
emergency rental assistance;
(e) Ensure that an appropriate lease is executed between landlord
and tenant that complies with all of the terms of chapters 59.18 and
59.20 RCW and that the initial lease is for a term of at least six
months with month-to-month tenancy permissible thereafter;
(f) Ensure that a minimum of seventy percent of Washington rental
assistance program assistance is allocated to recipients residing
within privately owned dwelling units;
(g) Establish local preferences, if any, through a public process;
(h) Distribute rental assistance and implement any local
preferences;
(i) Provide the county and the department with annual financial
reports that separately account for Washington rental assistance
program funds; and
(j) Annually provide the department with the data required by the
monitoring assessment tool developed under section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 36.22 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a
surcharge of ten dollars shall be charged by the county auditor for
each document recorded, which will be in addition to any other charge
allowed by law. The county may retain up to four percent of the funds
collected to cover the costs of collection and the county's costs of
administration. Three percent of the funds collected shall be remitted
to the department to cover the department's costs of administration.
The remaining funds will be disbursed to the administering agencies.
An administering agency may use up to eight percent of the Washington
rental assistance program funds it administers to cover the agency's
costs of administration.
(2) The surcharge imposed in this section does not apply to
assignments or substitutions of previously recorded deeds of trust.

Sec. 8 RCW 36.18.010 and 2002 c 294 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
County auditors or recording officers shall collect the following
fees for their official services:
(1) For recording instruments, for the first page eight and one-half by fourteen inches or less, five dollars; for each additional page
eight and one-half by fourteen inches or less, one dollar. The fee for
recording multiple transactions contained in one instrument will be
calculated for each transaction requiring separate indexing as required
under RCW 65.04.050 as follows: The fee for each title or transaction
is the same fee as the first page of any additional recorded document;
the fee for additional pages is the same fee as for any additional
pages for any recorded document; the fee for the additional pages may
be collected only once and may not be collected for each title or
transaction;
(2) For preparing and certifying copies, for the first page eight
and one-half by fourteen inches or less, three dollars; for each
additional page eight and one-half by fourteen inches or less, one
dollar;
(3) For preparing noncertified copies, for each page eight and one-half by fourteen inches or less, one dollar;
(4) For administering an oath or taking an affidavit, with or
without seal, two dollars;
(5) For issuing a marriage license, eight dollars, (this fee
includes taking necessary affidavits, filing returns, indexing, and
transmittal of a record of the marriage to the state registrar of vital
statistics) plus an additional five-dollar fee for use and support of
the prevention of child abuse and neglect activities to be transmitted
monthly to the state treasurer and deposited in the state general fund
plus an additional ten-dollar fee to be transmitted monthly to the
state treasurer and deposited in the state general fund. The
legislature intends to appropriate an amount at least equal to the
revenue generated by this fee for the purposes of the displaced
homemaker act, chapter 28B.04 RCW;
(6) For searching records per hour, eight dollars;
(7) For recording plats, fifty cents for each lot except cemetery
plats for which the charge shall be twenty-five cents per lot; also one
dollar for each acknowledgment, dedication, and description: PROVIDED,
That there shall be a minimum fee of twenty-five dollars per plat;
(8) For recording of miscellaneous records not listed above, for
the first page eight and one-half by fourteen inches or less, five
dollars; for each additional page eight and one-half by fourteen inches
or less, one dollar;
(9) For modernization and improvement of the recording and indexing
system, a surcharge as provided in RCW 36.22.170((.));
(10) For recording an emergency nonstandard document as provided in
RCW 65.04.047, fifty dollars, in addition to all other applicable
recording fees((.));
(11) For recording instruments, a surcharge as provided in RCW
36.22.178; and
(12) For recording instruments, a surcharge as provided in section
7 of this act. Collection of this surcharge terminates July 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 6, 9, and 11 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act expires December 31, 2009.

--- END ---