BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.70.030 and 1996 c 221 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is created an advisory committee consisting of the
following members:
(a) Three persons appointed by the chief justice of the supreme
court, including the chair of the appellate indigent defense commission
identified in subsection (3) of this section;
(b) Two nonattorneys appointed by the governor;
(c) Two senators, one from each of the two largest caucuses,
appointed by the president of the senate; and two members of the house
of representatives, one from each of the two largest caucuses,
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;
(d) One person appointed by the court of appeals executive
committee;
(e) One person appointed by the Washington state bar association.
(2) During the term of his or her appointment, no appointee may:
(a) Provide indigent defense services except on a pro bono basis; (b)
serve as an appellate judge except on a pro tem basis or as an
appellate court employee; or (c) serve as a prosecutor or prosecutor
employee.
(3) The initial advisory committee shall be comprised of the
current members of the appellate indigent defense commission, as
established by Supreme Court Order No. 25700-B, dated March 9, 1995,
plus two additional legislator members appointed under subsection
(1)(c) of this section. Members shall serve until the termination of
their current terms, and may be reappointed. The two additional
legislator members, who are not on the appellate indigent defense
commission, shall each serve three-year terms. Members of the advisory
committee shall receive no compensation for their services as members
of the commission, but may be reimbursed for travel and other expenses
in accordance with rules adopted by the office of financial management.

--- END ---