BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The department of health shall develop, in
consultation with the department of revenue, a program to provide
business and occupation tax credits for physicians who serve uninsured,
medicare, and medicaid patients in a private practice or a reduced fee
access program for the uninsured and shall submit proposed legislation
to the legislature by December 15, 2005.

--- END ---