BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.102 RCW
to read as follows:
Notwithstanding RCW 35.102.130, a city that imposes a business and
occupation tax shall allocate a person's gross income from the
activities of printing, and of publishing newspapers, periodicals, or
magazines, to the principal place in this state from which the
taxpayer's business is directed or managed. As used in this section,
the activities of printing, and of publishing newspapers, periodicals,
or magazines, have the same meanings as attributed to those terms in
RCW 82.04.280(1) by the department of revenue.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2008.

--- END ---