BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.180
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that immigrants add immeasurably to the
health and vitality of our state and nation and to the quality of life
for all Americans. The legislature further finds that the state's new
graduation requirements will be difficult to meet for recent immigrant
students who are dominant in a language other than English. The
legislature intends to support immigrant students who are eligible for
the state's transitional bilingual program to continue to pursue a high
school diploma beyond the twelfth grade by enrolling in an integrated
program of academic and language skills development that is offered by
a community college or technical college.
(2) By no later than the beginning of the 2006-07 school year, the
state board for community and technical colleges and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall design one or more options
to address the educational needs of recent immigrant high school
students. The purpose of the options is to provide, in an age-appropriate setting, an integrated program of academic and English
language skills development for immigrant students who have taken the
high school Washington assessment of student learning but have not
obtained a certificate of academic achievement or met other state and
district graduation requirements. The options may be provided through
the high school completion programs offered by community and technical
colleges or through the creation of new courses or programs, including
programs based on local contracts.
(3) The options shall be designed for recent immigrant students who
are eligible, or who, within the preceding two years, have been
enrolled in the state's transitional bilingual program. The options
shall include but need not be limited to at least one approach that:
(a) Is a program that is coordinated between one or more school
districts and one or more community colleges or technical colleges that
have entered a cooperative agreement for the approach;
(b) Includes an individualized or group plan that describes the
steps the district, college, and participants will take to help
participants meet state and district graduation requirements;
(c) Includes an explanation of the program and the plan to
participants and their families through an outreach effort in which the
district or college meets directly with the families of potential
participants;
(d) Permits participants to coenroll in the high school and college
and to take the high school Washington assessment of student learning
at least twice a year; and
(e) Provides instruction either in a community college or technical
college facility, or in a school district or other facility through a
community college or technical college.
(4) Beginning with the 2006-07 school year, the superintendent of
public instruction and the state board for community and technical
colleges shall pilot the approach described in subsection (3) of this
section. The pilot shall include at least two school districts, one
east of the mountains and one west of the mountains. The pilot will
also include a focus on two different types of recent immigrants, one
group of students who do not share a common first language, and one
group of students who do.
(5) By December 15, 2007, the superintendent of public instruction
and state board for community and technical colleges shall report to
the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature on the
status of the pilots required in subsection (4) of this section. The
report shall include any recommendations for statewide implementation
of the approach in the pilot and any additional options, including
coenrollment options, identified by the superintendent and the board.
The board and superintendent shall begin statewide implementation of
the options required in subsection (2) of this section in the 2008-09
school year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The joint select committee on immigrant
education is created. The committee shall consist of one member of
each major caucus of the senate, appointed by the president of the
senate, and one member of each major caucus of the house of
representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives. The governor and the superintendent of public
instruction may each appoint a representative to join the committee in
its deliberations. Members of the joint select committee shall be
appointed within fourteen days of the effective date of this act.
(2) The committee shall make recommendations to improve educational
opportunities and attainment for recent immigrant students from diverse
backgrounds and nations for whom English is a second language.
(3) To assist the joint select committee in its work, it shall seek
advice from an advisory committee that shall analyze and make
recommendations to the joint select committee on the following issues:
(a) The incorporation of international distance learning programs
into the state's transitional bilingual program, so students may better
maintain progress in subject areas while developing English language
proficiency;
(b) The availability of distance learning international high school
degree programs;
(c) Strategies to increase the number of teachers who are
culturally and linguistically prepared to teach students from diverse
backgrounds for whom English may be a second language. The strategies
to be considered shall include, but need not be limited to, alternative
K-12 certification opportunities for:
(i) Paraprofessionals with cultural and linguistic competence;
(ii) Immigrants who have educational credentials from their native
countries but whose credentials are not recognized by the state; and
(iii) Refugees who left their country of origin without the
necessary documentation of their qualifications and work experience;
(d) Recommendations on ways to infuse cultural awareness and
understanding into preparation programs for educators and educational
administrators;
(e) Strategies to increase the consultation of and involvement with
community-based organizations, including faith-based organizations, in
the design of professional development programs intended to improve the
cultural competence of educators, administrators, and school staff when
the organizations represent the ethnicity and national origin of the
immigrant students in the school or school district; and
(f) Other actions and strategies to improve educational
opportunities and attainment for recent immigrant students.
(4) The advisory committee may include, but need not be limited to,
representation from the Washington state commissions on African-American affairs, Asian Pacific American affairs, and Hispanic affairs,
the superintendent of public instruction, and teachers and
administrators who provide educational services to recent immigrant
students.
(5) The joint select committee shall report its findings and
recommendations, by December 15, 2005, to the governor, the house of
representatives and senate fiscal and education committees, the
superintendent of public instruction, the state board of education, the
professional educator standards board, and the higher education
coordinating board.
(6) The joint select committee shall receive staffing support from
senate committee services, the house of representatives office of
program research, and the superintendent of public instruction.
(7) Legislative members of the joint select committee shall receive
per diem and travel as provided in RCW 44.04.120.
(8) Per diem and travel for advisory committee members shall be the
responsibility of the agency, organization, or school district that the
advisory committee member represents.
(9) This section expires April 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---