BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.160.010 and 1985 c 236 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature recognizes the increasing evidence that tobacco
secondhand smoke ((in closely confined places may)) creates a danger to
the health of ((some)) the citizens of this state. In order to protect
the health and welfare of those citizens, it is necessary to prohibit
smoking in public places ((except in areas designated as smoking
areas)).

Sec. 2 RCW 70.160.020 and 1985 c 236 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.
(1) "Smoke" or "smoking" means the carrying or smoking of any kind
of lighted pipe, cigar, cigarette, or any other lighted smoking
equipment.
(2) "Public place" means that portion of any building or vehicle
used by and open to the public, regardless of whether the building or
vehicle is owned in whole or in part by private persons or entities,
the state of Washington, or other public entity, and regardless of
whether a fee is charged for admission.
Public places include, but are not limited to: Elevators, public
conveyances or transportation facilities, museums, concert halls,
theaters, auditoriums, exhibition halls, indoor sports arenas,
hospitals, nursing homes, health care facilities or clinics, enclosed
shopping centers, retail stores, retail service establishments,
financial institutions, educational facilities, ticket areas, public
hearing facilities, state legislative chambers and immediately adjacent
hallways, public restrooms, libraries, ((restaurants,)) waiting areas,
lobbies, restaurants, bars, taverns, bowling alleys, skating rinks, and
reception areas. A public place does not include a private residence.
This chapter is not intended to restrict smoking in private facilities
which are occasionally open to the public except upon the occasions
when the facility is open to the public.
(3) "Restaurant" means any building, structure, or area used,
maintained, or advertised as, or held out to the public to be, an
enclosure where meals are made available to be consumed on the
premises, for consideration of payment.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.160.030 and 1985 c 236 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
No person may smoke in a public place ((except in designated
smoking areas)).

Sec. 4 RCW 70.160.050 and 1985 c 236 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Owners, or in the case of a leased or rented space the lessee or
other person in charge, of a place regulated under this chapter shall
make every reasonable effort to prohibit smoking in public places by
posting signs prohibiting ((or permitting)) smoking as appropriate
under this chapter. Signs shall be posted conspicuously at each
building entrance. In the case of retail stores and retail service
establishments, signs shall be posted conspicuously at each entrance
and in prominent locations throughout the place. ((The boundary
between a nonsmoking area and a smoking permitted area shall be clearly
designated so that persons may differentiate between the two areas.))

Sec. 5 RCW 70.160.070 and 1985 c 236 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person intentionally violating this chapter by smoking in
a public place ((not designated as a smoking area)) or any person
removing, defacing, or destroying a sign required by this chapter is
subject to a civil fine of up to one hundred dollars. Local law
enforcement agencies shall enforce this section by issuing a notice of
infraction to be assessed in the same manner as traffic infractions.
The provisions contained in chapter 46.63 RCW for the disposition of
traffic infractions apply to the disposition of infractions for
violation of this subsection except as follows:
(a) The provisions in chapter 46.63 RCW relating to the provision
of records to the department of licensing in accordance with RCW
46.20.270 are not applicable to this chapter; and
(b) The provisions in chapter 46.63 RCW relating to the imposition
of sanctions against a person's driver's license or vehicle license are
not applicable to this chapter.
The form for the notice of infraction for a violation of this
subsection shall be prescribed by rule of the supreme court.
(2) ((When violations of RCW 70.160.040 or 70.160.050 occur, a
warning shall first be given to the owner or other person in charge.
Any subsequent violation is subject to a civil fine of up to one
hundred dollars. Each day upon which a violation occurs or is
permitted to continue constitutes a separate violation.)) A person who
violates RCW 70.160.050 is guilty of an infraction punishable by:
(a) A warning to the owner or person in charge for the first
violation that occurs within a calendar year;
(b) A fine not exceeding one hundred dollars for a second violation
that occurs within a calendar year; and
(c) A fine not exceeding five hundred dollars for each additional
violation that occurs within a calendar year.
(3) Local fire departments or fire districts shall enforce RCW
((70.160.040 or)) 70.160.050 regarding the duties of owners or persons
in control of public places, and local health departments shall enforce
RCW ((70.160.040 or)) 70.160.050 regarding the duties of owners of
restaurants by either of the following actions:
(a) Serving notice requiring the correction of any violation; or
(b) Calling upon the city or town attorney or county prosecutor to
maintain an action for an injunction to enforce RCW ((70.160.040 and))
70.160.050, to correct a violation, and to assess and recover a civil
penalty for the violation.

Sec. 6 RCW 70.160.080 and 1985 c 236 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Local fire departments or fire districts and local health
departments may adopt regulations as required to implement this
chapter.
(2) Nothing in this chapter prevents a city, town, or county from
adopting ordinances more restrictive than this chapter or regulations
adopted under this chapter that restrict or prohibit smoking in public
places situated within its jurisdiction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 70.160.040 (Designation of smoking areas in public places--Exceptions -- Restaurant smoking areas -- Entire facility or area may be
designated as nonsmoking) and 1985 c 236 s 4; and
(2) RCW 70.160.060 (Intent of chapter as applied to certain private
workplaces) and 1995 c 369 s 60, 1986 c 266 s 121, & 1985 c 236 s 6.

--- END ---