BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.24.015 and 2001 c 334 s 6 and 2001 c 323 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to establish a community mental
health program which shall help people experiencing mental illness to
retain a respected and productive position in the community. This will
be accomplished through programs which provide for:
(1) Access to mental health services for adults of the state who
are acutely mentally ill, chronically mentally ill, or seriously
disturbed and children of the state who are, or are at risk of
becoming, acutely mentally ill, severely emotionally disturbed, or
seriously disturbed, which services recognize the special needs of
underserved populations, including minorities, children, the elderly,
disabled, and low-income persons. Access to mental health services
shall not be limited by a person's history of confinement in a state,
federal, or local correctional facility. It is also the purpose of
this chapter to promote the early identification of mentally ill
children and to ensure that they receive the mental health care and
treatment which is appropriate to their developmental level. This care
should improve home, school, and community functioning, maintain
children in a safe and nurturing home environment, and should enable
treatment decisions to be made in response to clinical needs in
accordance with sound professional judgment while also recognizing
parents' rights to participate in treatment decisions for their
children;
(2) Accountability of efficient and effective services through
state of the art outcome and performance measures and statewide
standards for monitoring client and system outcomes, performance, and
reporting of client and system outcome information. These processes
shall be designed so as to maximize the use of available resources for
direct care of people with a mental illness;
(3) Minimum service delivery standards;
(4) Priorities for the use of available resources for the care of
the mentally ill consistent with the priorities defined in the statute;
(5) Coordination of services within the department, including those
divisions within the department that provide services to children,
between the department and the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, and among state mental hospitals, county authorities,
community mental health services, and other support services, which
shall to the maximum extent feasible also include the families of the
mentally ill, and other service providers; and
(6) Coordination of services aimed at reducing duplication in
service delivery and promoting complementary services among all
entities that provide mental health services to adults and children.
It is the policy of the state to encourage the provision of a full
range of treatment and rehabilitation services in the state for mental
disorders. The legislature intends to encourage the development of
county-based and county-managed mental health services with adequate
local flexibility to assure eligible people in need of care access to
the least-restrictive treatment alternative appropriate to their needs,
and the availability of treatment components to assure continuity of
care. To this end, counties are encouraged to enter into joint
operating agreements with other counties to form regional systems of
care which integrate planning, administration, and service delivery
duties assigned to counties under chapters 71.05 and 71.24 RCW to
consolidate administration, reduce administrative layering, and reduce
administrative costs.
It is further the intent of the legislature to integrate the
provision of services to provide continuity of care through all phases
of treatment. To this end the legislature intends to promote active
engagement with mentally ill persons and collaboration between families
and service providers.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.24.025 and 2001 c 323 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Acutely mentally ill" means a condition which is limited to a
short-term severe crisis episode of:
(a) A mental disorder as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in the case
of a child, as defined in RCW 71.34.020;
(b) Being gravely disabled as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in the
case of a child, a gravely disabled minor as defined in RCW 71.34.020;
or
(c) Presenting a likelihood of serious harm as defined in RCW
71.05.020 or, in the case of a child, as defined in RCW 71.34.020.
(2) "Available resources" means funds appropriated for the purpose
of providing community mental health programs under RCW 71.24.045,
federal funds, except those provided according to Title XIX of the
Social Security Act, and state funds appropriated under this chapter or
chapter 71.05 RCW by the legislature during any biennium for the
purpose of providing residential services, resource management
services, community support services, and other mental health services.
This does not include funds appropriated for the purpose of operating
and administering the state psychiatric hospitals, except as negotiated
according to RCW 71.24.300(1)(e).
(3) "Child" means a person under the age of eighteen years.
(4) "Chronically mentally ill adult" means an adult who has a
mental disorder and meets at least one of the following criteria:
(a) Has undergone two or more episodes of hospital care for a
mental disorder within the preceding two years; or
(b) Has experienced a continuous psychiatric hospitalization or
residential treatment exceeding six months' duration within the
preceding year; or
(c) Has been unable to engage in any substantial gainful activity
by reason of any mental disorder which has lasted for a continuous
period of not less than twelve months. "Substantial gainful activity"
shall be defined by the department by rule consistent with Public Law
92-603, as amended.
(5) "Community mental health program" means all mental health
services, activities, or programs using available resources.
(6) "Community mental health service delivery system" means public
or private agencies that provide services specifically to persons with
mental disorders as defined under RCW 71.05.020 and receive funding
from public sources.
(7) "Community support services" means services authorized,
planned, and coordinated through resource management services
including, at a minimum, assessment, diagnosis, emergency crisis
intervention available twenty-four hours, seven days a week,
prescreening determinations for mentally ill persons being considered
for placement in nursing homes as required by federal law, screening
for patients being considered for admission to residential services,
diagnosis and treatment for acutely mentally ill and severely
emotionally disturbed children discovered under screening through the
federal Title XIX early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and
treatment program, investigation, legal, and other nonresidential
services under chapter 71.05 RCW, case management services, psychiatric
treatment including medication supervision, counseling, psychotherapy,
assuring transfer of relevant patient information between service
providers, and other services determined by regional support networks.
(8) "County authority" means the board of county commissioners,
county council, or county executive having authority to establish a
community mental health program, or two or more of the county
authorities specified in this subsection which have entered into an
agreement to provide a community mental health program.
(9) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(10) "Licensed service provider" means an entity licensed according
to this chapter or chapter 71.05 RCW or an entity deemed to meet state
minimum standards as a result of accreditation by a recognized
behavioral health accrediting body recognized and having a current
agreement with the department, that meets state minimum standards or
individuals licensed under chapter 18.57, 18.71, 18.83, or 18.79 RCW,
as it applies to registered nurses and advanced registered nurse
practitioners.
(11) "Mental health services" means all services provided by
regional support networks and other services provided by the state for
the mentally ill.
(12) "Mentally ill persons" and "the mentally ill" mean persons and
conditions defined in subsections (1), (4), (17), and (18) of this
section.
(13) "Regional support network" means a county authority or group
of county authorities recognized by the secretary that enter into joint
operating agreements to contract with the secretary pursuant to this
chapter.
(14) "Residential services" means a complete range of residences
and supports authorized by resource management services and which may
involve a facility, a distinct part thereof, or services which support
community living, for acutely mentally ill persons, chronically
mentally ill adults, severely emotionally disturbed children, ((or))
seriously disturbed adults determined by the regional support network
to be at risk of becoming acutely or chronically mentally ill, or
children determined by the regional support network to be at risk of
becoming severely emotionally disturbed. The services shall include at
least evaluation and treatment services as defined in chapter 71.05
RCW, acute crisis respite care, long-term adaptive and rehabilitative
care, and supervised and supported living services, and shall also
include any residential services developed to service mentally ill
persons in nursing homes. Residential services for children in out-of-home placements related to their mental disorder shall not include the
costs of food and shelter, except for children's long-term residential
facilities existing prior to January 1, 1991.
(15) "Resource management services" mean the planning,
coordination, and authorization of residential services and community
support services administered pursuant to an individual service plan
for: (a) Acutely mentally ill adults and children; (b) chronically
mentally ill adults; (c) severely emotionally disturbed children;
((or)) (d) seriously disturbed adults determined solely by a regional
support network to be at risk of becoming acutely or chronically
mentally ill; or (e) children determined by the regional support
network to be at risk of becoming severely emotionally disturbed. Such
planning, coordination, and authorization shall include mental health
screening for children eligible under the federal Title XIX early and
periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment program. Resource
management services include seven day a week, twenty-four hour a day
availability of information regarding mentally ill adults' and
children's enrollment in services and their individual service plan to
county-designated mental health professionals, evaluation and treatment
facilities, and others as determined by the regional support network.
(16) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.
(17) "Seriously disturbed person" means a person who:
(a) Is gravely disabled or presents a likelihood of serious harm to
himself or herself or others, or to the property of others, as a result
of a mental disorder as defined in chapter 71.05 RCW;
(b) Has been on conditional release status, or under a less
restrictive alternative order, at some time during the preceding two
years from an evaluation and treatment facility or a state mental
health hospital;
(c) Has a mental disorder which causes major impairment in several
areas of daily living;
(d) Exhibits suicidal preoccupation or attempts; or
(e) Is a child diagnosed by a mental health professional, as
defined in chapter 71.34 RCW, as experiencing a mental disorder which
is clearly interfering with the child's functioning in family or school
or with peers or is clearly interfering with the child's personality
development and learning.
(18) "Severely emotionally disturbed child" means a child who has
been determined by the regional support network to be experiencing a
mental disorder as defined in chapter 71.34 RCW, including those mental
disorders that result in a behavioral or conduct disorder, that is
clearly interfering with the child's functioning in family or school or
with peers and who meets at least one of the following criteria:
(a) Has undergone inpatient treatment or placement outside of the
home related to a mental disorder within the last two years;
(b) Has undergone involuntary treatment under chapter 71.34 RCW
within the last two years;
(c) Is currently served by at least one of the following child-serving systems: Juvenile justice, child-protection/welfare, special
education, or developmental disabilities;
(d) Is at risk of escalating maladjustment due to:
(i) Chronic family dysfunction involving a mentally ill or
inadequate caretaker;
(ii) Changes in custodial adult;
(iii) Going to, residing in, or returning from any placement
outside of the home, for example, psychiatric hospital, short-term
inpatient, residential treatment, group or foster home, or a
correctional facility;
(iv) Subject to repeated physical abuse or neglect;
(v) Drug or alcohol abuse; or
(vi) Homelessness.
(19) "State minimum standards" means minimum requirements
established by rules adopted by the secretary and necessary to
implement this chapter for: (a) Delivery of mental health services;
(b) licensed service providers for the provision of mental health
services; (c) residential services; and (d) community support services
and resource management services.
(20) "Tribal authority," for the purposes of this section and RCW
71.24.300 only, means: The federally recognized Indian tribes and the
major Indian organizations recognized by the secretary insofar as these
organizations do not have a financial relationship with any regional
support network that would present a conflict of interest.

Sec. 3 RCW 71.24.035 and 2001 c 334 s 7 and 2001 c 323 s 10 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The department is designated as the state mental health
authority.
(2) The secretary shall provide for public, client, and licensed
service provider participation in developing the state mental health
program, developing contracts with regional support networks, and any
waiver request to the federal government under medicaid.
(3) The secretary shall provide for participation in developing the
state mental health program for children and other underserved
populations, by including representatives on any committee established
to provide oversight to the state mental health program.
(4) The secretary shall be designated as the county authority if a
county fails to meet state minimum standards or refuses to exercise
responsibilities under RCW 71.24.045.
(5) The secretary shall:
(a) Develop a biennial state mental health program that
incorporates county biennial needs assessments and county mental health
service plans and state services for mentally ill adults and children.
The secretary may also develop a six-year state mental health plan;
(b) Assure that any regional or county community mental health
program provides access to treatment for the county's residents in the
following order of priority: (i) The acutely mentally ill; (ii)
chronically mentally ill adults and severely emotionally disturbed
children; ((and)) (iii) the seriously disturbed; and (iv) children
determined by the regional support network to be at risk of becoming
severely emotionally disturbed. Such programs shall provide:
(A) Outpatient services;
(B) Emergency care services for twenty-four hours per day;
(C) Day treatment for mentally ill persons which includes training
in basic living and social skills, supported work, vocational
rehabilitation, and day activities. Such services may include
therapeutic treatment. In the case of a child, day treatment includes
age-appropriate basic living and social skills, educational and
prevocational services, day activities, and therapeutic treatment;
(D) Screening for patients being considered for admission to state
mental health facilities to determine the appropriateness of admission;
(E) Employment services, which may include supported employment,
transitional work, placement in competitive employment, and other work-related services, that result in mentally ill persons becoming engaged
in meaningful and gainful full or part-time work. Other sources of
funding such as the division of vocational rehabilitation may be
utilized by the secretary to maximize federal funding and provide for
integration of services;
(F) Consultation and education services; and
(G) Community support services;
(c) Develop and adopt rules establishing state minimum standards
for the delivery of mental health services pursuant to RCW 71.24.037
including, but not limited to:
(i) Licensed service providers. The secretary shall provide for
deeming of compliance with state minimum standards for those entities
accredited by recognized behavioral health accrediting bodies
recognized and having a current agreement with the department;
(ii) Regional support networks; and
(iii) Inpatient services, evaluation and treatment services and
facilities under chapter 71.05 RCW, resource management services, and
community support services;
(d) Assure that the special needs of minorities, the elderly,
disabled, children, and low-income persons are met within the
priorities established in this section;
(e) Establish a standard contract or contracts, consistent with
state minimum standards, which shall be used in contracting with
regional support networks or counties. The standard contract shall
include a maximum fund balance, which shall not exceed ten percent;
(f) Establish, to the extent possible, a standardized auditing
procedure which minimizes paperwork requirements of county authorities
and licensed service providers. The audit procedure shall focus on the
outcomes of service and not the processes for accomplishing them;
(g) Develop and maintain an information system to be used by the
state, counties, and regional support networks that includes a tracking
method which allows the department and regional support networks to
identify mental health clients' participation in any mental health
service or public program on an immediate basis. The information
system shall not include individual patient's case history files.
Confidentiality of client information and records shall be maintained
as provided in this chapter and in RCW 71.05.390, 71.05.400, 71.05.410,
71.05.420, 71.05.430, and 71.05.440. The design of the system and the
data elements to be collected shall be reviewed by the work group
appointed by the secretary under section 5(1) of this act and
representing the department, regional support networks, service
providers, consumers, and advocates. The data elements shall be
designed to provide information that is needed to measure performance
and achieve the service outcomes identified in section 5 of this act;
(h) License service providers who meet state minimum standards;
(i) Certify regional support networks that meet state minimum
standards;
(j) Periodically monitor the compliance of certified regional
support networks and their network of licensed service providers for
compliance with the contract between the department, the regional
support network, and federal and state rules at reasonable times and in
a reasonable manner;
(k) Fix fees to be paid by evaluation and treatment centers to the
secretary for the required inspections;
(l) Monitor and audit counties, regional support networks, and
licensed service providers as needed to assure compliance with
contractual agreements authorized by this chapter; and
(m) Adopt such rules as are necessary to implement the department's
responsibilities under this chapter.
(6) The secretary shall use available resources only for regional
support networks.
(7) Each certified regional support network and licensed service
provider shall file with the secretary, on request, such data,
statistics, schedules, and information as the secretary reasonably
requires. A certified regional support network or licensed service
provider which, without good cause, fails to furnish any data,
statistics, schedules, or information as requested, or files fraudulent
reports thereof, may have its certification or license revoked or
suspended.
(8) The secretary may suspend, revoke, limit, or restrict a
certification or license, or refuse to grant a certification or license
for failure to conform to: (a) The law; (b) applicable rules and
regulations; (c) applicable standards; or (d) state minimum standards.
(9) The superior court may restrain any regional support network or
service provider from operating without certification or a license or
any other violation of this section. The court may also review,
pursuant to procedures contained in chapter 34.05 RCW, any denial,
suspension, limitation, restriction, or revocation of certification or
license, and grant other relief required to enforce the provisions of
this chapter.
(10) Upon petition by the secretary, and after hearing held upon
reasonable notice to the facility, the superior court may issue a
warrant to an officer or employee of the secretary authorizing him or
her to enter at reasonable times, and examine the records, books, and
accounts of any regional support network or service provider refusing
to consent to inspection or examination by the authority.
(11) Notwithstanding the existence or pursuit of any other remedy,
the secretary may file an action for an injunction or other process
against any person or governmental unit to restrain or prevent the
establishment, conduct, or operation of a regional support network or
service provider without certification or a license under this chapter.
(12) The standards for certification of evaluation and treatment
facilities shall include standards relating to maintenance of good
physical and mental health and other services to be afforded persons
pursuant to this chapter and chapters 71.05 and 71.34 RCW, and shall
otherwise assure the effectuation of the purposes of these chapters.
(13)(a) The department, in consultation with affected parties,
shall establish a distribution formula that reflects county needs
assessments based on the number of persons who are acutely mentally
ill, chronically mentally ill, severely emotionally disturbed children,
((and)) seriously disturbed, and children determined by the regional
support network to be at risk of becoming severely emotionally
disturbed. The formula shall take into consideration the impact on
counties of demographic factors in counties which result in
concentrations of priority populations as set forth in subsection
(5)(b) of this section. These factors shall include the population
concentrations resulting from commitments under chapters 71.05 and
71.34 RCW to state psychiatric hospitals, as well as concentration in
urban areas, at border crossings at state boundaries, and other
significant demographic and workload factors.
(b) The formula shall also include a projection of the funding
allocations that will result for each county, which specifies
allocations according to priority populations, including the allocation
for services to children and other underserved populations.
(c) After July 1, 2003, the department may allocate up to two
percent of total funds to be distributed to the regional support
networks for incentive payments to reward the achievement of superior
outcomes, or significantly improved outcomes, as measured by a
statewide performance measurement system consistent with the framework
recommended in the joint legislative audit and review committee's
performance audit of the mental health system. The department shall
annually report to the legislature on its criteria and allocation of
the incentives provided under this subsection.
(14) The secretary shall assume all duties assigned to the
nonparticipating counties under chapters 71.05, 71.34, and 71.24 RCW.
Such responsibilities shall include those which would have been
assigned to the nonparticipating counties under regional support
networks.
The regional support networks, or the secretary's assumption of all
responsibilities under chapters 71.05, 71.34, and 71.24 RCW, shall be
included in all state and federal plans affecting the state mental
health program including at least those required by this chapter, the
medicaid program, and P.L. 99-660. Nothing in these plans shall be
inconsistent with the intent and requirements of this chapter.
(15) The secretary shall:
(a) Disburse funds for the regional support networks within sixty
days of approval of the biennial contract. The department must either
approve or reject the biennial contract within sixty days of receipt.
(b) Enter into biennial contracts with regional support networks.
The contracts shall be consistent with available resources. No
contract shall be approved that does not include progress toward
meeting the goals of this chapter by taking responsibility for: (i)
Short-term commitments; (ii) residential care; and (iii) emergency
response systems.
(c) Allocate one hundred percent of available resources to the
regional support networks in accordance with subsection (13) of this
section. Incentive payments authorized under subsection (13) of this
section may be allocated separately from other available resources.
(d) Notify regional support networks of their allocation of
available resources at least sixty days prior to the start of a new
biennial contract period.
(e) Deny funding allocations to regional support networks based
solely upon formal findings of noncompliance with the terms of the
regional support network's contract with the department. Written
notice and at least thirty days for corrective action must precede any
such action. In such cases, regional support networks shall have full
rights to appeal under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(16) The department, in cooperation with the state congressional
delegation, shall actively seek waivers of federal requirements and
such modifications of federal regulations as are necessary to allow
federal medicaid reimbursement for services provided by free-standing
evaluation and treatment facilities certified under chapter 71.05 RCW.
The department shall periodically report its efforts to the appropriate
committees of the senate and the house of representatives.

--- END ---