BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.0264 and 1980 c 37 s 31 are each amended to read
as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of motor
vehicles, trailers, or campers to nonresidents of this state for use
outside of this state, even though delivery ((be)) is made within this
state, but only when:
(1) The vehicles, trailers, or campers will be taken from the point
of delivery in this state directly to a point outside this state under
the authority of a one-transit permit issued by the director of
licensing pursuant to the provisions of RCW 46.16.160((, or));
(2) ((said)) The motor vehicles, trailers, or campers will be
registered and licensed immediately under the laws of the state of the
purchaser's residence, will not be used in this state more than three
months, and will not be required to be registered and licensed under
the laws of this state; or
(3) Vehicles that are either motorcycles or off-road vehicles will
be transported to the purchaser's state of residence using a motor
vehicle or trailer licensed in the purchaser's state of residence. For
the purposes of this subsection, "motorcycle," "motor vehicle," off-road vehicle," and "trailer" have the same meanings as provided in
Title 46 RCW.

--- END ---