BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the goal of the state of Washington to
provide adequate ferry capacity in corridors where service elements
have been eliminated or reduced. In the case of the Seattle-Bremerton
ferry corridor, the elimination of passenger-only services has caused
significant inconveniences to the traveling public including reduced
service frequency and service hours and crowded conditions for
passenger-on auto ferries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall assign two super-class ferry vessels or
equivalent vessels in terms of auto and passenger capacity and speed to
the Seattle-Bremerton ferry run. This action is aimed at improving
service in the corridor in order to provide greater passenger capacity
during peak periods and provide once-hourly frequency of service, which
must include a 5:20 a.m. departure from Bremerton.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
on the date the Washington State Ferries implements the 2005 summer
schedule.

--- END ---