BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 50.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A student services office is established as a pilot program in
the employment security department to coordinate job placement
activities and resources for graduate and professional students at the
University of Washington and Washington State University career
services departments, while acting as a liaison between the employment
security department WorkSource program, and the business community and
graduate and professional students of the University of Washington and
Washington State University. This pilot program begins July 1, 2005,
and expires June 30, 2007.
(2) The center for career services at the University of Washington
and career services at Washington State University shall each hire one
full-time equivalent employee to facilitate career services for
graduate and professional students. The responsibilities of this
employee are at the discretion of the department, except that the
employee must coordinate career services resources and events between
the individual department and the employment security department.
(3) The student services office shall create an annual job
placement survey for graduate and professional students at the
University of Washington and Washington State University. The survey
will be implemented at the end of the 2005-06 and 2006-07 academic
years for each participating institution. The University of Washington
and Washington State University must participate in this survey.
Information from this survey will be used for internal purposes at the
employment security department, the University of Washington, and
Washington State University. Some information shall be made public for
the benefit of students and businesses, but only to the extent and in
the manner permitted by law.
(4) The student services office advisory board is hereby created to
oversee this program. This board shall consist of a representative
from each department at the University of Washington and Washington
State University at which a new full-time equivalent employee is
employed for the purposes in this section. The student services office
director shall also be a member of the board. A representative from
the University of Washington and Washington State University shall each
hold the chair position and responsibilities for one year. The board
shall meet four times yearly, once per quarter. Each institution shall
host a meeting before an institution may again host the meeting. The
board may permit an institution to not host a meeting on a one-time
basis with a unanimous vote of approval.
(5) By December 1, 2006, the student services office advisory board
shall report to appropriate committees of the legislature on the impact
of the pilot program in this section on job placement services for
graduate and professional students at the University of Washington and
Washington State University.
(6) Funds for this pilot program shall provide for two full-time
equivalent employees: One full-time equivalent employee placed with
the employment security department as the director of the student
services office; and one full-time equivalent employee placed with the
employment security department to coordinate and implement the job
placement survey. Additional funding shall be provided for necessary
administrative support and coordination of events and resources between
the employment security department, the University of Washington, and
Washington State University.
(7) This section expires June 30, 2007.

--- END ---