BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that when members of the Washington
national guard are called into overseas active duty, their absence
poses a hardship on their families in many ways. Frequently their
compensation is reduced from its normal levels, making financial
obligations more difficult to meet. Therefore, the legislature intends
to support national guard members by waiving their children's tuition
charges while they are on overseas active duty.
(2) Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing
boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The
Evergreen State College, and the community colleges may waive all or a
portion of tuition and fees for students who:
(a) Are dependent children of members of the Washington national
guard who have been ordered into federal active military service for a
period exceeding thirty days to serve in a war or conflict fought on
foreign soil; and
(b) Qualify as a resident student under RCW 28B.15.012, except RCW
28B.15.012(2)(g).
(3) If a governing board exercises the authority under this
section, the board shall also adopt policies that provide a full or
partial refund of tuition already paid for a quarter or semester during
which a student becomes eligible for the waiver under this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.15.910 and 2004 c 275 s 51 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For the purpose of providing state general fund support to
public institutions of higher education, except for revenue waived
under programs listed in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, and
unless otherwise expressly provided in the omnibus state appropriations
act, the total amount of operating fees revenue waived, exempted, or
reduced by a state university, a regional university, The Evergreen
State College, or the community colleges as a whole, shall not exceed
the percentage of total gross authorized operating fees revenue in this
subsection. As used in this section, "gross authorized operating fees
revenue" means the estimated gross operating fees revenue as estimated
under RCW 82.33.020 or as revised by the office of financial
management, before granting any waivers. This limitation applies to
all tuition waiver programs established before or after July 1, 1992.
(a) University of Washington 21 percent
(b) Washington State University 20 percent
(c) Eastern Washington University 11 percent
(d) Central Washington University 8 percent
(e) Western Washington University 10 percent
(f) The Evergreen State College 6 percent
(g) Community colleges as a whole 35 percent
(2) The limitations in subsection (1) of this section apply to
waivers, exemptions, or reductions in operating fees contained in the
following:
(a) RCW 28B.10.265;
(b) RCW 28B.15.014;
(c) RCW 28B.15.100;
(d) RCW 28B.15.225;
(e) RCW 28B.15.380;
(f) RCW 28B.15.520;
(g) RCW 28B.15.526;
(h) RCW 28B.15.527;
(i) RCW 28B.15.543;
(j) RCW 28B.15.545;
(k) RCW 28B.15.555;
(l) RCW 28B.15.556;
(m) RCW 28B.15.615;
(n) RCW 28B.15.620;
(o) RCW 28B.15.628;
(p) RCW 28B.15.730;
(q) RCW 28B.15.740;
(r) RCW 28B.15.750;
(s) RCW 28B.15.756;
(t) RCW 28B.50.259;
(u) RCW 28B.70.050; and
(v) ((During the 1997-99 fiscal biennium, the western interstate
commission for higher education undergraduate exchange program for
students attending Eastern Washington University)) Section 1 of this
act.
(3) The limitations in subsection (1) of this section do not apply
to waivers, exemptions, or reductions in services and activities fees
contained in the following:
(a) RCW 28B.15.522;
(b) RCW 28B.15.540; and
(c) RCW 28B.15.558.
(4) The total amount of operating fees revenue waived, exempted, or
reduced by institutions of higher education participating in the
western interstate commission for higher education western
undergraduate exchange program under RCW 28B.15.544 shall not exceed
the percentage of total gross authorized operating fees revenue in this
subsection.
(a) Washington State University 1 percent
(b) Eastern Washington University 3 percent
(c) Central Washington University 3 percent

--- END ---