BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that land use and environmental
permitting programs have been created to protect public health and
environmental quality. The legislature believes that such permitting
processes should be fair, transparent, and understandable. The
legislature also finds that permit applicants seek predictability,
efficiency, and collaboration in permitting decisions.
(2) At the local permitting level, the legislature finds that
accurate information, permit coordination, and problem solving are
critical for applicants. The legislature finds that local permitting
centers must respond to a wide variety of permit applicants, from the
individual citizen seeking a building permit to international
corporations requiring multiple federal, state, and local permits. The
legislature recognizes that local permitting departments may not be
sufficiently funded or organized to the extent necessary to provide
enhanced technical assistance for different types of applicants.
(3) Therefore, the legislature intends to provide financial
assistance to local permitting departments to assist them in enhancing
service, improving process efficiency, and increasing predictable
permitting outcomes.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.42.010 and 2003 c 71 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The office of regulatory assistance is created in the office of
financial management and shall be administered by the office of the
governor to assist citizens, businesses, and project applicants.
(2) The office shall:
(a) Maintain and furnish information as provided in RCW 43.42.040;
(b) Furnish facilitation as provided in RCW 43.42.050;
(c) Furnish coordination as provided in RCW 43.42.060;
(d) Coordinate cost reimbursement as provided in RCW 43.42.070;
(e) Work with state agencies and local governments to continue to
develop a range of permit assistance options for project applicants;
(f) Review initiatives developed by the transportation permit
efficiency and accountability committee established in chapter 47.06C
RCW and determine if any would be beneficial if implemented for other
types of projects;
(g) Work to develop informal processes for dispute resolution
between agencies and permit applicants;
(h) Conduct customer surveys to evaluate its effectiveness; ((and))
(i) Provide the following biennial reports to the governor and the
appropriate committees of the legislature:
(i) A performance report, based on the customer surveys required in
(h) of this subsection;
(ii) A report on any statutory or regulatory conflicts identified
by the office in the course of its duties that arise from differing
legal authorities and roles of agencies and how these were resolved.
The report may include recommendations to the legislature and to
agencies; and
(iii) A report regarding use of outside independent consultants
under RCW 43.42.070, including the nature and amount of work performed
and implementation of requirements relating to costs;
(j) Disseminate information about best permitting practices to
local government permitting departments; and
(k) Select two local government planning and permitting offices to
participate in an enhanced permit assistance pilot program. Such
enhancements may include, but are not limited to:
(i) Creation of local and state interagency planning and permit
review teams;
(ii) Use of advanced online planning and permit applications;
(iii) Streamlining planning and permit processes;
(iv) Using loaned executives; and
(v) Additional technical assistance and guidance for permit
applicants.
(3) ((A director of the office shall be hired no later than June 1,
2003.
(4))) The office shall give priority to furnishing assistance to
small projects when expending general fund moneys allocated to it.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This sum of two hundred thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2006, from the general fund to the office of
regulatory assistance for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---