BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, construction
work performed by any natural person under contract is employment
included within the mandatory coverage of this title, and the person
performing the construction work shall be deemed to be a worker while
performing this work.
(2) Premiums on construction work included within the mandatory
coverage of this title by this section shall be the responsibility of
the holder of the registration under chapter 18.27 RCW or the license
under chapter 19.28 RCW under which the work is performed. If the work
is performed without a registration or license, the premiums on the
work shall be the responsibility of the person contracting for the
work. Persons responsible for premiums under this section shall be
considered the employer of the person performing the construction work
for the purposes of this title.
(3)(a) For the purposes of this section, "construction work" means
manual labor that is:
(i) The work of a contractor, as defined in RCW 18.27.010,
performed under circumstances requiring registration under chapter
18.27 RCW; or
(ii) The work of installing wires or equipment to convey electrical
current or installing apparatus to be operated by such current as it
pertains to the electrical industry, as described in chapter 19.28 RCW,
performed under circumstances requiring licensing under chapter 19.28
RCW.
(b) For the purposes of this section, "construction work" does not
include administrative, clerical, or other work of a similar nature and
does not include the work of directly supervising others performing
construction work.

--- END ---