BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.70.011 and 2001 c 272 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Vehicle" means and includes every device capable of being
moved upon a public highway and in, upon, or by which any persons or
property is or may be transported or drawn upon a public highway,
excepting devices moved by human or animal power or used exclusively
upon stationary rails or tracks.
(2) "Motor vehicle" means every vehicle which is self-propelled and
every vehicle which is propelled by electric power obtained from
overhead trolley wires, but not operated upon rails, and which is
required to be registered and titled under Title 46 RCW, Motor
Vehicles.
(3) "Recreational vehicle" means a travel trailer, motor home,
truck camper, or camping trailer that is primarily designed and used as
temporary living quarters, is either self-propelled or mounted on or
drawn by another vehicle, is transient, is not occupied as a primary
residence, and is not immobilized or permanently affixed to a mobile
home lot.
(4) "Vehicle dealer" means any person, firm, association,
corporation, or trust, not excluded by subsection (((4))) (5) of this
section, engaged in the business of buying, selling, listing,
exchanging, offering, brokering, leasing with an option to purchase,
auctioning, soliciting, or advertising the sale of new or used
vehicles, or arranging or offering or attempting to solicit or
negotiate on behalf of others, a sale, purchase, or exchange of an
interest in new or used motor vehicles, irrespective of whether the
motor vehicles are owned by that person. Vehicle dealers shall be
classified as follows:
(a) A "motor vehicle dealer" is a vehicle dealer that deals in new
or used motor vehicles, or both;
(b) A "mobile home and travel trailer dealer" is a vehicle dealer
that deals in mobile homes, park trailers, or travel trailers, or more
than one type of these vehicles;
(c) A "miscellaneous vehicle dealer" is a vehicle dealer that deals
in motorcycles or vehicles other than motor vehicles or mobile homes
and travel trailers or any combination of such vehicles;
(d) A "recreational vehicle dealer" is a vehicle dealer that deals
in travel trailers, motor homes, truck campers, or camping trailers
that are primarily designed and used as temporary living quarters, are
either self-propelled or mounted on or drawn by another vehicle, are
transient, are not occupied as a primary residence, and are not
immobilized or permanently affixed to a mobile home lot.
(((4))) (5) The term "vehicle dealer" does not include, nor do the
licensing requirements of RCW 46.70.021 apply to, the following
persons, firms, associations, or corporations:
(a) Receivers, trustees, administrators, executors, guardians, or
other persons appointed by, or acting under a judgment or order of, any
court; or
(b) Public officers while performing their official duties; or
(c) Employees of vehicle dealers who are engaged in the specific
performance of their duties as such employees; or
(d) Any person engaged in an isolated sale of a vehicle in which
that person is the registered or legal owner, or both, thereof; or
(e) Any person, firm, association, corporation, or trust, engaged
in the selling of equipment other than vehicles, subject to
registration, used for agricultural or industrial purposes; or
(f) A real estate broker licensed under chapter 18.85 RCW, or an
affiliated licensee, who, on behalf of another negotiates the purchase,
sale, lease, or exchange of a manufactured or mobile home in
conjunction with the purchase, sale, exchange, rental, or lease of the
land upon which the manufactured or mobile home is, or will be,
located; or
(g) Owners who are also operators of the special highway
construction equipment or of the highway construction equipment for
which a vehicle license and display vehicle license number plate is
required as defined in RCW 46.16.010; or
(h) Any bank, trust company, savings bank, mutual savings bank,
savings and loan association, credit union, and any parent, subsidiary,
or affiliate thereof, authorized to do business in this state under
state or federal law with respect to the sale or other disposition of
a motor vehicle owned and used in their business; or with respect to
the acquisition and sale or other disposition of a motor vehicle in
which the entity has acquired an interest as a lessor, lessee, or
secured party; or
(i) Any person who is regularly engaged in the business of
acquiring leases or installment contracts by assignment, with respect
to the acquisition and sale or other disposition of a motor vehicle in
which the person has acquired an interest as a result of the business.
(((5))) (6) "Vehicle salesperson" means any person who for any form
of compensation sells, auctions, leases with an option to purchase, or
offers to sell or to so lease vehicles on behalf of a vehicle dealer.
(((6))) (7) "Department" means the department of licensing, which
shall administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter.
(((7))) (8) "Director" means the director of licensing.
(((8))) (9) "Manufacturer" means any person, firm, association,
corporation, or trust, resident or nonresident, who manufactures or
assembles new and unused vehicles or remanufactures vehicles in whole
or in part and further includes the terms:
(a) "Distributor," which means any person, firm, association,
corporation, or trust, resident or nonresident, who in whole or in part
offers for sale, sells, or distributes any new and unused vehicle to
vehicle dealers or who maintains factory representatives.
(b) "Factory branch," which means a branch office maintained by a
manufacturer for the purpose of selling or offering for sale, vehicles
to a distributor, wholesaler, or vehicle dealer, or for directing or
supervising in whole or in part factory or distributor representatives,
and further includes any sales promotion organization, whether a
person, firm, or corporation, which is engaged in promoting the sale of
new and unused vehicles in this state of a particular brand or make to
vehicle dealers.
(c) "Factory representative," which means a representative employed
by a manufacturer, distributor, or factory branch for the purpose of
making or promoting for the sale of their vehicles or for supervising
or contracting with their dealers or prospective dealers.
(((9))) (10) "Established place of business" means a location
meeting the requirements of RCW 46.70.023(1) at which a vehicle dealer
conducts business in this state.
(((10))) (11) "Principal place of business" means that dealer
firm's business location in the state, which place the dealer
designates as their principal place of business.
(((11))) (12) "Subagency" means any place of business of a vehicle
dealer within the state, which place is physically and geographically
separated from the principal place of business of the firm or any place
of business of a vehicle dealer within the state, at which place the
firm does business using a name other than the principal name of the
firm, or both.
(((12))) (13) "Temporary subagency" means a location other than the
principal place of business or subagency within the state where a
licensed vehicle dealer may secure a license to conduct the business
and is licensed for a period of time not to exceed ten days for a
specific purpose such as auto shows, shopping center promotions, tent
sales, exhibitions, or similar merchandising ventures. No more than
six temporary subagency licenses may be issued to a licensee in any
twelve-month period.
(((13))) (14) "Wholesale vehicle dealer" means a vehicle dealer who
buys and sells other than at retail.
(((14))) (15) "Retail vehicle dealer" means a vehicle dealer who
may buy and sell at both wholesale and retail.
(((15))) (16) "Listing dealer" means a used mobile home dealer who
makes contracts with sellers who will compensate the dealer for
obtaining a willing purchaser for the seller's mobile home.
(((16))) (17) "Auction" means a transaction conducted by means of
exchanges between an auctioneer and the members of the audience,
constituting a series of oral invitations for offers for the purchase
of vehicles made by the auctioneer, offers to purchase by members of
the audience, and the acceptance of the highest or most favorable offer
to purchase.
(((17))) (18) "Auction company" means a sole proprietorship,
partnership, corporation, or other legal or commercial entity licensed
under chapter 18.11 RCW that only sells or offers to sell vehicles at
auction or only arranges or sponsors auctions.
(((18))) (19) "Buyer's agent" means any person, firm, partnership,
association, limited liability company, limited liability partnership,
or corporation retained or employed by a consumer to arrange for or to
negotiate, or both, the purchase or lease of a new motor vehicle on
behalf of the consumer, and who is paid a fee or receives other
compensation from the consumer for its services.
(((19))) (20) "New motor vehicle" means any motor vehicle that is
self-propelled and is required to be registered and titled under Title
46 RCW, has not been previously titled to a retail purchaser or lessee,
and is not a "used vehicle" as defined under RCW 46.04.660.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Before the department may issue a temporary subagency
license to a recreational vehicle dealer engaged in offering new or new
and used recreational vehicles for sale at a recreational vehicle show,
a recreational vehicle dealer of new or new and used recreational
vehicles shall submit to the department a manufacturer's written
authorization for the sale and specifying the dates of the show, the
location of the show, and the identity of the manufacturer's brand or
model names of the new or used recreational vehicles.
(b) The department may issue a temporary subagency license if the
location of the show is within fifty miles of the recreational vehicle
dealer's established place of business or permanent location. The
department may issue a temporary subagency license for a show outside
fifty miles of the recreational vehicle dealer's established place of
business or permanent location only if the product represented is new
and is within the factory designated sales territory for each brand of
new recreational vehicles to be offered for sale, and only those
specific brands of new recreational vehicles may be offered for sale
under the terms of the temporary subagency license.
(2) Whenever three or fewer recreational vehicle dealers
participate in a show under a temporary subagency license issued under
this section, each recreational vehicle dealer shall conspicuously
include all of the following information in all advertising and
promotional materials designed to attract the public to attend the
show:
(a) Each recreational vehicle dealer's business name and the
location of the recreational vehicle dealer's established place of
business must be printed in a size equivalent to the second largest
type used in the advertisement and must be placed at the top of the
advertisement; and
(b) The manufacturer's brand or model names of those new
recreational vehicles being offered for sale; and
(c) If the recreational vehicles being offered for sale are used,
the word "used" must immediately precede the identification of the
brand name of the model or be immediately adjacent to the depiction of
used vehicles.
(3) Notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter, no more than
two temporary subagency licenses may be issued to a recreational
vehicle dealer engaged in offering new or new and used recreational
vehicles for sale for events with three or fewer recreational vehicle
dealers participating, and no more than six temporary subagency
licenses may be issued to a recreational vehicle dealer in any twelve-month period for events including four or more recreational vehicle
dealers.
(4) The legislature finds that the practices covered by this
section are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the
purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.
Violations of this section are not reasonable in relation to the
development and preservation of business. A violation of this section
is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method
of competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW.

--- END ---