BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.43.845 and 1990 c 33 s 577 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon a guilty plea or conviction of a person of any felony
crime involving the physical neglect of a child under chapter 9A.42
RCW, the physical injury or death of a child under chapter 9A.32 or
9A.36 RCW (except motor vehicle violations under chapter 46.61 RCW),
sexual exploitation of a child under chapter 9.68A RCW, sexual offenses
under chapter 9A.44 RCW ((where a minor is the victim)), promoting
prostitution of a minor under chapter 9A.88 RCW, or the sale or
purchase of a minor child under RCW 9A.64.030, the prosecuting attorney
shall determine whether the person holds a certificate or permit issued
under chapters 28A.405 and 28A.410 RCW or is employed by a school
district. If the person is employed by a school district or holds a
certificate or permit issued under chapters 28A.405 and 28A.410 RCW,
the prosecuting attorney shall notify the state patrol of such guilty
pleas or convictions.
(2) When the state patrol receives information that a person who
has a certificate or permit issued under chapters 28A.405 and 28A.410
RCW or is employed by a school district has pled guilty to or been
convicted of one of the felony crimes under subsection (1) of this
section, the state patrol shall immediately transmit that information
to the superintendent of public instruction. It shall be the duty of
the superintendent of public instruction to provide this information to
the state board of education and the school district employing the
individual who pled guilty or was convicted of the crimes identified in
subsection (1) of this section.

--- END ---