BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.47.020 and 2004 c 192 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Washington basic health plan" or "plan" means the system of
enrollment and payment for basic health care services, administered by
the plan administrator through participating managed health care
systems, created by this chapter.
(2) "Administrator" means the Washington basic health plan
administrator, who also holds the position of administrator of the
Washington state health care authority.
(3) "Health coverage tax credit program" means the program created
by the Trade Act of 2002 (P.L. 107-210) that provides a federal tax
credit that subsidizes private health insurance coverage for displaced
workers certified to receive certain trade adjustment assistance
benefits and for individuals receiving benefits from the pension
benefit guaranty corporation.
(4) "Health coverage tax credit eligible enrollee" means individual
workers and their qualified family members who lose their jobs due to
the effects of international trade and are eligible for certain trade
adjustment assistance benefits; or are eligible for benefits under the
alternative trade adjustment assistance program; or are people who
receive benefits from the pension benefit guaranty corporation and are
at least fifty-five years old.
(5) "Managed health care system" means: (a) Any health care
organization, including health care providers, insurers, health care
service contractors, health maintenance organizations, or any
combination thereof, that provides directly or by contract basic health
care services, as defined by the administrator and rendered by duly
licensed providers, to a defined patient population enrolled in the
plan and in the managed health care system; or (b) a self-funded or
self-insured method of providing insurance coverage to subsidized
enrollees provided under RCW 41.05.140 and subject to the limitations
under RCW 70.47.100(7).
(6) "Subsidized enrollee" means an individual, or an individual
plus the individual's spouse or dependent children: (a) Who is not
eligible for medicare; (b) who is not confined or residing in a
government-operated institution, unless he or she meets eligibility
criteria adopted by the administrator; (c) who resides in an area of
the state served by a managed health care system participating in the
plan; (d) whose gross family income at the time of enrollment does not
exceed two hundred percent of the federal poverty level as adjusted for
family size and determined annually by the federal department of health
and human services; and (e) who chooses to obtain basic health care
coverage from a particular managed health care system in return for
periodic payments to the plan. To the extent that state funds are
specifically appropriated for this purpose, with a corresponding
federal match, "subsidized enrollee" also means an individual, or an
individual's spouse or dependent children, who meets the requirements
in (a) through (c) and (e) of this subsection and whose gross family
income at the time of enrollment is more than two hundred percent, but
less than two hundred fifty-one percent, of the federal poverty level
as adjusted for family size and determined annually by the federal
department of health and human services.
(7) "Nonsubsidized enrollee" means an individual, or an individual
plus the individual's spouse or dependent children: (a) Who is not
eligible for medicare; (b) who is not confined or residing in a
government-operated institution, unless he or she meets eligibility
criteria adopted by the administrator; (c) who is accepted for
enrollment by the administrator as provided in RCW 48.43.018, either
because the potential enrollee cannot be required to complete the
standard health questionnaire under RCW 48.43.018, or, based upon the
results of the standard health questionnaire, the potential enrollee
would not qualify for coverage under the Washington state health
insurance pool; (d) who resides in an area of the state served by a
managed health care system participating in the plan; (((d))) (e) who
chooses to obtain basic health care coverage from a particular managed
health care system; and (((e))) (f) who pays or on whose behalf is paid
the full costs for participation in the plan, without any subsidy from
the plan.
(8) "Subsidy" means the difference between the amount of periodic
payment the administrator makes to a managed health care system on
behalf of a subsidized enrollee plus the administrative cost to the
plan of providing the plan to that subsidized enrollee, and the amount
determined to be the subsidized enrollee's responsibility under RCW
70.47.060(2).
(9) "Premium" means a periodic payment, ((based upon gross family
income)) which an individual, their employer or another financial
sponsor makes to the plan as consideration for enrollment in the plan
as a subsidized enrollee, a nonsubsidized enrollee, or a health
coverage tax credit eligible enrollee.
(10) "Rate" means the amount, negotiated by the administrator with
and paid to a participating managed health care system, that is based
upon the enrollment of subsidized, nonsubsidized, and health coverage
tax credit eligible enrollees in the plan and in that system.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.43.018 and 2004 c 244 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in (a) through (e) of this subsection, a
health carrier may require any person applying for an individual health
benefit plan and the health care authority shall require any person
applying for nonsubsidized enrollment in the basic health plan to
complete the standard health questionnaire designated under chapter
48.41 RCW.
(a) If a person is seeking an individual health benefit plan or
enrollment in the basic health plan as a nonsubsidized enrollee due to
his or her change of residence from one geographic area in Washington
state to another geographic area in Washington state where his or her
current health plan is not offered, completion of the standard health
questionnaire shall not be a condition of coverage if application for
coverage is made within ninety days of relocation.
(b) If a person is seeking an individual health benefit plan or
enrollment in the basic health plan as a nonsubsidized enrollee:
(i) Because a health care provider with whom he or she has an
established care relationship and from whom he or she has received
treatment within the past twelve months is no longer part of the
carrier's provider network under his or her existing Washington
individual health benefit plan; and
(ii) His or her health care provider is part of another carrier's
or a basic health plan managed care system's provider network; and
(iii) Application for a health benefit plan under that carrier's
provider network individual coverage or for basic health plan
nonsubsidized enrollment is made within ninety days of his or her
provider leaving the previous carrier's provider network; then
completion of the standard health questionnaire shall not be a
condition of coverage.
(c) If a person is seeking an individual health benefit plan or
enrollment in the basic health plan as a nonsubsidized enrollee due to
his or her having exhausted continuation coverage provided under 29
U.S.C. Sec. 1161 et seq., completion of the standard health
questionnaire shall not be a condition of coverage if application for
coverage is made within ninety days of exhaustion of continuation
coverage. A health carrier or the health care authority as
administrator of basic health plan nonsubsidized coverage shall accept
an application without a standard health questionnaire from a person
currently covered by such continuation coverage if application is made
within ninety days prior to the date the continuation coverage would be
exhausted and the effective date of the individual coverage applied for
is the date the continuation coverage would be exhausted, or within
ninety days thereafter.
(d) If a person is seeking an individual health benefit plan or
enrollment in the basic health plan as a nonsubsidized enrollee due to
his or her receiving notice that his or her coverage under a conversion
contract is discontinued, completion of the standard health
questionnaire shall not be a condition of coverage if application for
coverage is made within ninety days of discontinuation of eligibility
under the conversion contract. A health carrier or the health care
authority as administrator of basic health plan nonsubsidized coverage
shall accept an application without a standard health questionnaire
from a person currently covered by such conversion contract if
application is made within ninety days prior to the date eligibility
under the conversion contract would be discontinued and the effective
date of the individual coverage applied for is the date eligibility
under the conversion contract would be discontinued, or within ninety
days thereafter.
(e) If a person is seeking an individual health benefit plan or
enrollment in the basic health plan as a nonsubsidized enrollee and,
but for the number of persons employed by his or her employer, would
have qualified for continuation coverage provided under 29 U.S.C. Sec.
1161 et seq., completion of the standard health questionnaire shall not
be a condition of coverage if: (i) Application for coverage is made
within ninety days of a qualifying event as defined in 29 U.S.C. Sec.
1163; and (ii) the person had at least twenty-four months of continuous
group coverage immediately prior to the qualifying event. A health
carrier or the health care authority as administrator of basic health
plan nonsubsidized coverage shall accept an application without a
standard health questionnaire from a person with at least twenty-four
months of continuous group coverage if application is made no more than
ninety days prior to the date of a qualifying event and the effective
date of the individual coverage applied for is the date of the
qualifying event, or within ninety days thereafter.
(2) If, based upon the results of the standard health
questionnaire, the person qualifies for coverage under the Washington
state health insurance pool, the following shall apply:
(a) The carrier may decide not to accept the person's application
for enrollment in its individual health benefit plan and the health
care authority, as administrator of basic health plan nonsubsidized
coverage, shall not accept the person's application for enrollment as
a nonsubsidized enrollee; and
(b) Within fifteen business days of receipt of a completed
application, the carrier or the health care authority as administrator
of basic health plan nonsubsidized coverage shall provide written
notice of the decision not to accept the person's application for
enrollment to both the person and the administrator of the Washington
state health insurance pool. The notice to the person shall state that
the person is eligible for health insurance provided by the Washington
state health insurance pool, and shall include information about the
Washington state health insurance pool and an application for such
coverage. If the carrier or the health care authority as administrator
of basic health plan nonsubsidized coverage does not provide or
postmark such notice within fifteen business days, the application is
deemed approved.
(3) If the person applying for an individual health benefit plan:
(a) Does not qualify for coverage under the Washington state health
insurance pool based upon the results of the standard health
questionnaire; (b) does qualify for coverage under the Washington state
health insurance pool based upon the results of the standard health
questionnaire and the carrier elects to accept the person for
enrollment; or (c) is not required to complete the standard health
questionnaire designated under this chapter under subsection (1)(a) or
(b) of this section, the carrier or the health care authority as
administrator of basic health plan nonsubsidized coverage, whichever
entity administered the standard health questionnaire, shall accept the
person for enrollment if he or she resides within the carrier's or the
basic health plan's service area and provide or assure the provision of
all covered services regardless of age, sex, family structure,
ethnicity, race, health condition, geographic location, employment
status, socioeconomic status, other condition or situation, or the
provisions of RCW 49.60.174(2). The commissioner may grant a temporary
exemption from this subsection if, upon application by a health
carrier, the commissioner finds that the clinical, financial, or
administrative capacity to serve existing enrollees will be impaired if
a health carrier is required to continue enrollment of additional
eligible individuals.

--- END ---