BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Voting is part of the fabric of our democracy and, by
increasing voter participation, restoring the right to vote to former
felons both strengthens democracy and reintegrates ex felons into
society;
(b) The system for determining how, when, and where former felons
have their right to vote restored is contributing to uncertainty about
the validity of the election process and local county auditors find it
impossible to access clear information about this determination; and
(c) Washington currently denies the right to vote to all persons
who have not completed their terms of community custody or fully paid
legal financial obligations, even though they have completed all other
requirements of their felony sentences.
(2) The legislature intends to establish a clear standard for the
restoration of the voting rights of former felons and to institute a
data system in the office of the secretary of state that will provide
information about former felon voting rights that will be available to
local election officials.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 29A.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the civil
right to vote is restored to a person convicted of a felony upon
completion of any term of confinement imposed under chapter 9.94A RCW.
Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, this subsection
applies to any offender:
(a) Currently serving a sentence for a crime committed prior to the
effective date of this act; or
(b) Convicted, on or after the effective date of this act, of a
crime committed before, on, or after the effective date of this act.
(2) This section does not impair or alter an offender's ability to
obtain a certificate of discharge if eligible under RCW 9.94A.637.
(3) This section does not affect or prevent the enforcement of
legal financial obligations or the offender's obligation to comply with
an order issued under chapter 10.99 RCW or any other legal authority
that excludes or prohibits the offender from having contact with a
specified person, or coming within a set distance of any specified
location, that was contained in the judgment and sentence.
(4) An offender may not have his or her right to vote restored
under any circumstances if he or she:
(a) Has previously had his or her right to vote restored under
subsection (1) of this section; and
(b) Is subsequently convicted of a crime committed on or after the
effective date of this act.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.637 and 2004 c 121 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) When an offender has completed all requirements of the
sentence, including any and all legal financial obligations, and while
under the custody and supervision of the department, the secretary or
the secretary's designee shall notify the sentencing court, which shall
discharge the offender and provide the offender with a certificate of
discharge by issuing the certificate to the offender in person or by
mailing the certificate to the offender's last known address.
(b)(i) When an offender has reached the end of his or her
supervision with the department and has completed all the requirements
of the sentence except his or her legal financial obligations, the
secretary's designee shall provide the county clerk with a notice that
the offender has completed all nonfinancial requirements of the
sentence.
(ii) When the department has provided the county clerk with notice
that an offender has completed all the requirements of the sentence and
the offender subsequently satisfies all legal financial obligations
under the sentence, the county clerk shall notify the sentencing court,
including the notice from the department, which shall discharge the
offender and provide the offender with a certificate of discharge by
issuing the certificate to the offender in person or by mailing the
certificate to the offender's last known address.
(c) When an offender who is subject to requirements of the sentence
in addition to the payment of legal financial obligations either is not
subject to supervision by the department or does not complete the
requirements while under supervision of the department, it is the
offender's responsibility to provide the court with verification of the
completion of the sentence conditions other than the payment of legal
financial obligations. When the offender satisfies all legal financial
obligations under the sentence, the county clerk shall notify the
sentencing court that the legal financial obligations have been
satisfied. When the court has received both notification from the
clerk and adequate verification from the offender that the sentence
requirements have been completed, the court shall discharge the
offender and provide the offender with a certificate of discharge by
issuing the certificate to the offender in person or by mailing the
certificate to the offender's last known address.
(2) The court shall send a copy of every signed certificate of
discharge to the auditor for the county in which the court resides and
to the department. The department shall create and maintain a data
base containing the names of all felons who have been issued
certificates of discharge, the date of discharge, and the date of
conviction and offense.
(3) An offender who is not convicted of a violent offense or a sex
offense and is sentenced to a term involving community supervision may
be considered for a discharge of sentence by the sentencing court prior
to the completion of community supervision, provided that the offender
has completed at least one-half of the term of community supervision
and has met all other sentence requirements.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the
discharge shall have the effect of restoring all civil rights lost by
operation of law upon conviction, except the right to vote, and the
certificate of discharge shall so state. An offender's right to vote
may only be restored under section 2 of this act. Nothing in this
section prohibits the use of an offender's prior record for purposes of
determining sentences for later offenses as provided in this chapter.
Nothing in this section affects or prevents use of the offender's prior
conviction in a later criminal prosecution either as an element of an
offense or for impeachment purposes. A certificate of discharge is not
based on a finding of rehabilitation.
(5) Unless otherwise ordered by the sentencing court, a certificate
of discharge shall not terminate the offender's obligation to comply
with an order ((issued under chapter 10.99 RCW)) that excludes or
prohibits the offender from having contact with a specified person or
coming within a set distance of any specified location that was
contained in the judgment and sentence. An offender who violates such
an order after a certificate of discharge has been issued shall be
subject to prosecution ((according to the chapter under which the order
was originally issued)).
(6) Upon release from custody, the offender may apply to the
department for counseling and help in adjusting to the community. This
voluntary help may be provided for up to one year following the release
from custody.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If an offender has previously had his or her right to vote
restored under section 2 of this act and is subsequently convicted of
a crime committed on or after the effective date of this act, the
sentencing court shall send notice to the secretary of state that the
offender has permanently lost his or her right to vote.
(2) The notice must contain the county where the current conviction
occurred and the last known residence of the offender, if any.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 29A.08 RCW
to read as follows:
Upon receipt of notice under section 4 of this act that an offender
has permanently lost his or her right to vote, the secretary of state
shall maintain the information in the elections data base. The
secretary of state shall transmit notice that the offender has lost the
right to vote to every county auditor in this state.

--- END ---