BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.46.010 and 1994 c 272 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of any county or city shall identify
in the adopted budget the capital projects funded in whole or in part
from the proceeds of the tax authorized in this section, and shall
indicate that such tax is intended to be in addition to other funds
that may be reasonably available for such capital projects.
(2) The legislative authority of any county or any city may impose
an excise tax on each sale of real property in the unincorporated areas
of the county for the county tax and in the corporate limits of the
city for the city tax at a rate not exceeding one-quarter of one
percent of the selling price. The revenues from this tax shall be used
by any city or county with a population of five thousand or less and
any city or county that does not plan under RCW 36.70A.040 for any
capital purpose identified in a capital improvements plan and local
capital improvements, including those listed in RCW 35.43.040.
After April 30, 1992, revenues generated from the tax imposed under
this subsection in counties over five thousand population and cities
over five thousand population that are required or choose to plan under
RCW 36.70A.040 shall be used solely for financing capital projects
specified in a capital facilities plan element of a comprehensive plan
and housing relocation assistance under RCW 59.18.440 and 59.18.450.
However, revenues (a) pledged by such counties and cities to debt
retirement prior to April 30, 1992, may continue to be used for that
purpose until the original debt for which the revenues were pledged is
retired, or (b) committed prior to April 30, 1992, by such counties or
cities to a project may continue to be used for that purpose until the
project is completed.
(3) In lieu of imposing the tax authorized in RCW 82.14.030(2), the
legislative authority of any county or any city may impose an
additional excise tax on each sale of real property in the
unincorporated areas of the county for the county tax and in the
corporate limits of the city for the city tax at a rate not exceeding
one-half of one percent of the selling price.
(4) Taxes imposed under this section shall be collected from
persons who are taxable by the state under chapter 82.45 RCW upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within the unincorporated areas of the
county or within the corporate limits of the city, as the case may be.
(5) Taxes imposed under this section shall comply with all
applicable rules, regulations, laws, and court decisions regarding real
estate excise taxes as imposed by the state under chapter 82.45 RCW.
(6) As used in this section, "city" means any city or town and
"capital project" means those public works projects of a local
government for planning, acquisition, construction, reconstruction,
repair, replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of streets; roads;
highways; sidewalks; street and road lighting systems; traffic signals;
bridges; domestic water systems; storm and sanitary sewer systems;
parks; recreational facilities; law enforcement facilities; fire
protection facilities; trails; libraries; administrative and/or
judicial facilities; river and/or waterway flood control projects ((by
those jurisdictions that, prior to June 11, 1992, have expended funds
derived from the tax authorized by this section for such purposes; and,
until December 31, 1995,)); or housing projects ((for those
jurisdictions that, prior to June 11, 1992, have expended or committed
to expend funds derived from the tax authorized by this section or the
tax authorized by RCW 82.46.035 for such purposes)).

Sec. 2 RCW 82.46.035 and 1992 c 221 s 3 and 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 33
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of any county or city shall identify
in the adopted budget the capital projects funded in whole or in part
from the proceeds of the tax authorized in this section, and shall
indicate that such tax is intended to be in addition to other funds
that may be reasonably available for such capital projects.
(2) The legislative authority of any county or any city that plans
under RCW 36.70A.040(1) may impose an additional excise tax on each
sale of real property in the unincorporated areas of the county for the
county tax and in the corporate limits of the city for the city tax at
a rate not exceeding one-quarter of one percent of the selling price.
Any county choosing to plan under RCW 36.70A.040(2) and any city within
such a county may only adopt an ordinance imposing the excise tax
authorized by this section if the ordinance is first authorized by a
proposition approved by a majority of the voters of the taxing district
voting on the proposition at a general election held within the
district or at a special election within the taxing district called by
the district for the purpose of submitting such proposition to the
voters.
(3) Revenues generated from the tax imposed under subsection (2) of
this section shall be used by such counties and cities solely for
financing capital projects specified in a capital facilities plan
element of a comprehensive plan. However, revenues (a) pledged by such
counties and cities to debt retirement prior to March 1, 1992, may
continue to be used for that purpose until the original debt for which
the revenues were pledged is retired, or (b) committed prior to March
1, 1992, by such counties or cities to a project may continue to be
used for that purpose until the project is completed.
(4) Revenues generated by the tax imposed by this section shall be
deposited in a separate account.
(5) As used in this section, "city" means any city or town and
"capital project" means those public works projects of a local
government ((for planning, acquisition, construction, reconstruction,
repair, replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of streets, roads,
highways, sidewalks, street and road lighting systems, traffic signals,
bridges, domestic water systems, storm and sanitary sewer systems, and
planning, construction, reconstruction, repair, rehabilitation, or
improvement of parks)) authorized by RCW 82.46.010.
(6) When the governor files a notice of noncompliance under RCW
36.70A.340 with the secretary of state and the appropriate county or
city, the county or city's authority to impose the additional excise
tax under this section shall be temporarily rescinded until the
governor files a subsequent notice rescinding the notice of
noncompliance.

--- END ---