BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The department of ecology and the
administrative office of the courts shall assess the need and demand
for adjudications within the state. The department of ecology and the
administrative office of the courts shall identify basins that are
candidates for adjudications, recommend a priority for basin
adjudications, and determine the scope of financial and human resources
and court systems necessary to complete the recommended adjudications.
The department of ecology and the administrative office of the courts
shall submit a joint report on this assessment to the joint task force
created under section 2 of this act by October 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The joint task force on water rights
dispute resolution is created. The purpose of the joint task force is
to provide a forum for review and discussion of legislative and policy
changes or implementation strategies for resolution of water rights
disputes. The joint task force shall consist of the following ten
members:
(a) Four members of the house of representatives, two from each of
the major caucuses, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(b) Four members of the senate, two from each of the major
caucuses, appointed by the majority leader of the senate;
(c) One member from the office of the governor; and
(d) One member from the office of the attorney general.
(2) The joint task force members shall be cochaired by one senator
and one state representative chosen by the task force.
(3) The joint task force shall review and make recommendations for
legislation and policy regarding:
(a) The establishment of a water court system, either as a
permanent structure or on a pilot project basis;
(b) The creation of an office of water court commissioners as an
alternative to a water court system;
(c) Methods to determine or settle federal and tribal water rights,
including creation of a compact commission and identification of
incentives to encourage negotiation and settlement;
(d) Mechanisms to address interstate and international water rights
disputes;
(e) Authorization for limited special adjudications to resolve a
limited number of claims or claims in stream reaches or limited ground
water areas;
(f) The role of the pollution control hearings board with respect
to water rights and management disputes;
(g) The appropriate level of deference by appellate courts for
trial court decisions on water rights and management disputes;
(h) The role of the department of ecology in providing information
to a court conducting a general adjudication and to claimants involved
in an adjudication, including guidance regarding maintenance and
documentation of water rights, prefiling conferences with claimants,
tentative determinations of water rights validity, and background
information reports;
(i) Methods to facilitate the process of water rights
adjudications, including expanded use of mediation, elimination of the
affidavit of prejudice, requirement for prefiled testimony, and use of
information technology;
(j) Systems to maintain currency of adjudicated water rights and to
review and make determinations on the validity of water rights
independent of an adjudication, including an administrative title
system or department of ecology administrative process; and
(k) Other issues identified by the task force.
(4) The joint task force shall commence by July 1, 2005, and
present a final report to the appropriate committees of the legislature
by December 1, 2005. The joint task force shall include the report
submitted by the department of ecology and the administrative office of
the courts under section 1 of this act in the final report. The joint
task force shall be staffed by the office of program research and
senate committee services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires June 30, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---