BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Access to necessary and effective health services is an
essential need of all human beings, yet almost six hundred thousand
people in the state of Washington lack health insurance coverage. Lack
of access to health coverage results in increased rates of preventable
disease, premature death, and increased cost of publicly funded medical
care;
(2) The primary method used to pay for necessary care in Washington
state is health insurance, whether financed by private or public funds;
(3) The cost of health insurance is rising substantially faster
than the rate of inflation. These costs are making it increasingly
difficult for employers to find and provide decent health benefits to
their employees, and have a significant impact on the viability of
businesses in Washington state. Moreover, increasing health care costs
limit employers' ability to provide wage increases to their employees,
negatively impacting workers' standard of living. Increasing costs
also result in hardship to employees and their families, particularly
low-wage workers, who are being forced to bear an increasing portion of
this cost burden. State and local governments also are straining under
the pressure of rising health care costs;
(4) Despite increases in overall health care spending, health care
providers are faced with insufficient compensation from publicly funded
programs and the growing complexity of administrative requirements,
from both public and private purchasers; and
(5) The state of Washington has a strong interest in ensuring that
all of its residents have access to health coverage, improving the
health status of its residents, and containing rising health care
costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The legislative/executive task force on
health care access, delivery, and financing is hereby established. The
task force shall consist of thirteen members, as follows: The
secretary of the department of social and health services, or his or
her designee; the administrator of the health care authority, or his or
her designee; the secretary of health, or his or her designee; the
chair of the state board of health, or his or her designee; a
representative from the governor's office; four members of the senate
appointed by the president of the senate, two of whom shall be members
of the majority caucus and two of whom shall be members of the minority
caucus; and four members of the house of representatives appointed by
the speaker of the house of representatives, two of whom shall be
members of the majority caucus and two of whom shall be members of the
minority caucus. Staff support for the task force shall be provided by
the office of financial management, the house of representatives office
of program research, and senate committee services.
(2) Task force members may be reimbursed for travel expenses as
authorized under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 and chapter 44.04 RCW, as
appropriate.
(3) The task force shall evaluate the effectiveness of the
privately and publicly funded health insurance system in the state of
Washington and propose revisions to the system. Any proposed revisions
to the system must meet the following criteria:
(a) Access to ensure health care coverage for all residents of the
state of Washington for a reasonable set of necessary health services.
The determination of necessary health services shall be based, to the
extent possible, upon medical and other evidence related to the
clinical and cost-effectiveness of services, with particular attention
given to preventive health services and management of chronic illness;
(b) Significant reductions in administrative costs so that
available health care dollars are spent directly on health care
services. In reviewing proposals to reduce administrative costs, the
task force shall consider the potential benefits of information
technology innovations, such as electronic health records, electronic
claims processing, and centralized storage of information needed for
provider credentialing;
(c) Adequacy of financing from all sectors of society, including
local, state, and federal governments, employers, and consumers.
Consumer cost obligations must be based upon ability to pay.
(d) Improvement in the health status of residents of Washington
state. In developing proposals to achieve this criteria, the task
force shall address adequate financing for public health services, the
role of personal behavior change in improving health outcomes,
increased adoption and use of evidence-based models to manage chronic
illness, and payment models that create incentives to achieve improved
health outcomes for consumers.
(4) The task force shall evaluate any proposed revisions with
respect to feasibility and net costs, or savings, as compared to
continuation of the current system.
(5) The task force shall seek testimony and information from a
broad range of health care stakeholders, and actively solicit public
input in a community meeting process designed to present the proposals
and invite discussion toward building a consensus on revision of the
health care system. The task force shall seek grant funds for the
community meeting process and is encouraged to coordinate its efforts
with others who are educating, listening to, and mobilizing the general
public about health care issues.
(6) The task force may establish one or more technical advisory
committees to assist it in its efforts. The task force shall endeavor
to have representation of at least the following interests on the
technical advisory committee: Large employers; small employers;
organized labor; employed health care consumers; low-income health care
consumers insured through public subsidized programs; health care
consumers who are chronically ill and/or disabled; uninsured consumers;
children's health advocates; mental health consumer advocates; health
carriers; hospitals; physicians; allied health professions; and local
public health officials. Advisory committee members, if appointed,
shall not receive compensation or reimbursement for travel or expenses.
(7) The joint task force shall report its findings and
recommendations to the governor and appropriate committees of the
legislature by November 15, 2006.

--- END ---