BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 67.16 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature hereby authorizes class 1 racing associations to
conduct horse race handicapping contests. The commission shall
establish rules for the conduct of handicapping contests involving the
outcome of multiple horse races.

--- END ---