BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.40.167 and 2003 c 378 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When an offender is subject to a standard range ((commitment of
15 to 65 weeks)) disposition involving confinement by the department,
the court may:
(a) Impose the standard range; or
(b) Suspend the standard range disposition on condition that the
offender complies with the terms of this mental health disposition
alternative.
(2) The court may impose this disposition alternative when the
court finds the following:
(a) The offender has a current diagnosis, consistent with the
American psychiatry association diagnostic and statistical manual of
mental disorders, of axis I psychiatric disorder, excluding youth that
are diagnosed as solely having a conduct disorder, oppositional defiant
disorder, substance abuse disorder, paraphilia, or pedophilia;
(b) An appropriate treatment option is available in the local
community;
(c) The plan for the offender identifies and addresses requirements
for successful participation and completion of the treatment
intervention program including: Incentives and graduated sanctions
designed specifically for amenable youth, including the use of
detention, detoxication, and in-patient or outpatient substance abuse
treatment and psychiatric hospitalization, and structured community
support consisting of mental health providers, probation, educational
and vocational advocates, child welfare services, and family and
community support. For any mental health treatment ordered for an
offender under this section, the treatment option selected shall be
chosen from among programs which have been successful in addressing
mental health needs of juveniles and successful in mental health
treatment of juveniles and identified as research-based best practice
programs. A list of programs which meet these criteria shall be agreed
upon by: The Washington association of juvenile court administrators,
the juvenile rehabilitation administration of the department of social
and health services, a representative of the division of public
behavioral health and justice policy at the University of Washington,
and the Washington institute for public policy. The list of programs
shall be created not later than July 1, 2003. The group shall provide
the list to all superior courts, its own membership, the legislature,
and the governor. The group shall meet annually and revise the list as
appropriate; and
(d) The offender, offender's family, and community will benefit
from use of the mental health disposition alternative.
(3) The court on its own motion may order, or on motion by either
party, shall order a comprehensive mental health evaluation to
determine if the offender has a designated mental disorder. The court
may also order a chemical dependency evaluation to determine if the
offender also has a co-occurring chemical dependency disorder. The
evaluation shall include at a minimum the following: The offender's
version of the facts and the official version of the facts, the
offender's offense, an assessment of the offender's mental health and
drug-alcohol problems and previous treatment attempts, and the
offender's social, criminal, educational, and employment history and
living situation.
(4) The evaluator shall determine if the offender is amenable to
research-based treatment. A proposed case management and treatment
plan shall include at a minimum:
(a) The availability of treatment;
(b) Anticipated length of treatment;
(c) Whether one or more treatment interventions are proposed and
the anticipated sequence of those treatment interventions;
(d) The education plan;
(e) The residential plan; and
(f) The monitoring plan.
(5) The court on its own motion may order, or on motion by either
party, shall order a second mental health or chemical dependency
evaluation. The party making the motion shall select the evaluator.
The requesting party shall pay the cost of any examination ordered
under this subsection and subsection (3) of this section unless the
court finds the offender is indigent and no third party insurance
coverage is available, in which case the state shall pay the cost.
(6) Upon receipt of the assessments, evaluations, and reports the
court shall consider whether the offender and the community will
benefit from use of the mental health disposition alternative. The
court shall consider the victim's opinion whether the offender should
receive the option.
(7) If the court determines that the mental health disposition
alternative is appropriate, the court shall impose a standard range
disposition ((of not more than 65 weeks)), suspend execution of the
disposition, and place the offender on community supervision up to one
year and impose one or more other local sanctions. Confinement in a
secure county detention facility, other than county group homes,
inpatient psychiatric treatment facilities, and substance abuse
programs, shall be limited to thirty days. As a condition of a
suspended disposition, the court shall require the offender to
participate in the recommended treatment interventions.
(8) The treatment providers shall submit monthly reports to the
court and parties on the offender's progress in treatment. The report
shall reference the treatment plan and include at a minimum the
following: Dates of attendance, offender's compliance with
requirements, treatment activities, medication management, the
offender's relative progress in treatment, and any other material
specified by the court at the time of the disposition.
(9) If the offender fails to comply with the suspended disposition,
the court may impose sanctions pursuant to RCW 13.40.200 or may revoke
the suspended disposition and order the disposition's execution.
(10) An offender is ineligible for the mental health disposition
option under this section if ((the offender is adjudicated of a sex or
violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030)):
(a) The offender is ordered to serve a disposition for a firearm
violation under RCW 13.40.193; or
(b) The offense for which the disposition is being considered is:
(i) An offense category A+, A, or A- offense, or an attempt,
conspiracy, or solicitation to commit a class A+, A, or A- offense;
(ii) Manslaughter in the first degree (RCW 9A.32.060);
(iii) A sex or violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; or
(iv) Any offense category B+ or B offense, when the offense
includes infliction of bodily harm upon another or when during the
commission or immediate withdrawal from the offense the respondent was
armed with a deadly weapon.

--- END ---